BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 62A.1-101 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-101 are each
amended to read as follows:
SHORT TITLES. (1) This Title ((shall be known and)) may be cited
as the Uniform Commercial Code.
(2) This article may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code--General
Provisions.

Sec. 2 RCW 62A.1-102 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-102 are each
amended to read as follows:
((PURPOSES; RULES OF CONSTRUCTION; VARIATION BY AGREEMENT.)) SCOPE
OF ARTICLE. (((1) This Title shall be liberally construed and applied
to promote its underlying purposes and policies.
(2) Underlying purposes and policies of this Title are
(a) to simplify, clarify and modernize the law governing commercial
transactions;
(b) to permit the continued expansion of commercial practices
through custom, usage and agreement of the parties;
(c) to make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.
(3) The effect of provisions of this Title may be varied by
agreement, except as otherwise provided in this Title and except that
the obligations of good faith, diligence, reasonableness and care
prescribed by this Title may not be disclaimed by agreement but the
parties may by agreement determine the standards by which the
performance of such obligations is to be measured if such standards are
not manifestly unreasonable.
(4) The presence in certain provisions of this Title of the words
"unless otherwise agreed" or words of similar import does not imply
that the effect of other provisions may not be varied by agreement
under subsection (3).
(5) In this Title unless the context otherwise requires
(a) words in the singular number include the plural, and in the
plural include the singular;
(b) words of the masculine gender include the feminine and the
neuter, and when the sense so indicates words of the neuter gender may
refer to any gender.)) This article applies to a transaction to the
extent that it is governed by another article of the Uniform Commercial
Code.

Sec. 3 RCW 62A.1-103 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-103 are each
amended to read as follows:
((SUPPLEMENTARY GENERAL PRINCIPLES OF LAW APPLICABLE.))
CONSTRUCTION OF UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE TO PROMOTE ITS PURPOSES AND
POLICIES; APPLICABILITY OF SUPPLEMENTAL PRINCIPLES OF LAW. (1) The
Uniform Commercial Code must be liberally construed and applied to
promote its underlying purposes and policies, which are:
(a) To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing
commercial transactions;
(b) To permit the continued expansion of commercial practices
through custom, usage, and agreement of the parties; and
(c) To make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.
(2) Unless displaced by the particular provisions of ((this Title))
the Uniform Commercial Code, the principles of law and equity,
including the law merchant and the law relative to capacity to
contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation,
duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, ((or)) and other validating or
invalidating cause ((shall)) supplement its provisions.

Sec. 4 RCW 62A.1-104 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-104 are each
amended to read as follows:
CONSTRUCTION AGAINST ((IMPLICIT)) IMPLIED REPEAL. ((This Title))
The Uniform Commercial Code being a general act intended as a unified
coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be
impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can
reasonably be avoided.

Sec. 5 RCW 62A.1-105 and 2001 c 32 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
((TERRITORIAL APPLICATION OF THE TITLE; PARTIES' POWER TO CHOOSE
APPLICABLE LAW.)) SEVERABILITY. (((1) Except as provided hereafter in
this section, when a transaction bears a reasonable relation to this
state and also to another state or nation the parties may agree that
the law either of this state or of such other state or nation shall
govern their rights and duties. Failing such agreement this Title
applies to transactions bearing an appropriate relation to this state.
(2) Where one of the following provisions of this Title specifies
the applicable law, that provision governs and a contrary agreement is
effective only to the extent permitted by the law (including the
conflict of laws rules) so specified:
Rights of creditors against sold goods. RCW 62A.2-402.
Applicability of the Article on Leases. RCW 62A.2A-105 and
62A.2A-106.
Applicability of the Article on Bank Deposits and Collections. RCW
62A.4-102.
Governing law in the Article on Funds Transfers. RCW 62A.4A-507.
Letters of Credit. RCW 62A.5-116.
Applicability of the Article on Investment Securities. RCW
62A.8-110.
Law governing perfection, the effect of perfection or
nonperfection, and the priority of security interests and agricultural
liens. RCW 62A.9A-301 through 62A.9A-307.)) If any provision or clause
of the Uniform Commercial Code or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or applications of the Uniform Commercial Code which can be
given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this
end the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code are severable.

Sec. 6 RCW 62A.1-106 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-106 are each
amended to read as follows:
((REMEDIES TO BE LIBERALLY ADMINISTERED.)) USE OF SINGULAR AND
PLURAL; GENDER. (((1) The remedies provided by this Title shall be
liberally administered to the end that the aggrieved party may be put
in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed but
neither consequential or special nor penal damages may be had except as
specifically provided in this Title or by other rule of law.
(2) Any right or obligation declared by this Title is enforceable
by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and
limited effect.)) In the Uniform Commercial Code, unless the statutory
context otherwise requires:
(1) Words in the singular number include the plural, and those in
the plural include the singular; and
(2) Words of any gender also refer to any other gender.

Sec. 7 RCW 62A.1-108 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-108 are each
amended to read as follows:
((SEVERABILITY.)) RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL AND
NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT. ((If any provision or clause of this Title or
application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid,
such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
the Title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Title are declared
to be severable.)) This article modifies, limits, and supersedes the
federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15
U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., except that nothing in this article
modifies, limits, or supersedes section 7001(c) of that act or
authorizes electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
section 7003(b) of that act.

Sec. 8 RCW 62A.1-201 and 2001 c 32 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
GENERAL DEFINITIONS. Unless the context otherwise requires, words
or phrases defined in this section, or in the additional definitions
contained in other articles of the Uniform Commercial Code that apply
to particular articles or parts thereof, have the meanings stated.
Subject to ((additional)) definitions contained in ((the
subsequent)) other articles of ((this Title which are applicable to
specific)) the Uniform Commercial Code that apply to particular
articles or parts thereof((, and unless the context otherwise requires,
in this Title)):
(1) "Action," in the sense of a judicial proceeding, includes
recoupment, counterclaim, set-off, suit in equity, and any other
proceeding((s)) in which rights are determined.
(2) "Aggrieved party" means a party entitled to ((resort to))
pursue a remedy.
(3) "Agreement," as distinguished from "contract," means the
bargain of the parties in fact, as found in their language or ((by
implication)) inferred from other circumstances, including course of
performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade ((or course of
performance)) as provided in ((this Title (RCW 62A.1-205, RCW 62A.2-208, and RCW 62A.2A-207). Whether an agreement has legal consequences
is determined by the provisions of this Title, if applicable; otherwise
by the law of contracts (RCW 62A.1-103))) RCW 62A.1-303. (((Compare
"Contract".)))
(4) "Bank" means any person engaged in the business of banking and
includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union,
and trust company.
(5) "Bearer" means ((the)) a person in possession of ((an)) a
negotiable instrument, document of title, or certificated security that
is payable to bearer or indorsed in blank.
(6) "Bill of lading" means a document evidencing the receipt of
goods for shipment issued by a person engaged in the business of
transporting or forwarding goods((, and includes an airbill. "Airbill"
means a document serving for air transportation as a bill of lading
does for marine or rail transportation, and includes an air consignment
note or air waybill)).
(7) "Branch" includes a separately incorporated foreign branch of
a bank.
(8) "Burden of establishing" a fact means the burden of persuading
the trier((s)) of fact that the existence of the fact is more probable
than its ((non-existence)) nonexistence.
(9) "Buyer in ordinary course of business" means a person that buys
goods in good faith, without knowledge that the sale violates the
rights of another person in the goods, and in the ordinary course from
a person, other than a pawnbroker, in the business of selling goods of
that kind. A person buys goods in the ordinary course if the sale to
the person comports with the usual or customary practices in the kind
of business in which the seller is engaged or with the seller's own
usual or customary practices. A person that sells oil, gas, or other
minerals at the wellhead or minehead is a person in the business of
selling goods of that kind. A buyer in ordinary course of business may
buy for cash, by exchange of other property, or on secured or unsecured
credit, and may acquire goods or documents of title under a ((pre-existing)) preexisting contract for sale. Only a buyer that takes
possession of the goods or has a right to recover the goods from the
seller under Article 62A.2 RCW may be a buyer in ordinary course of
business. "Buyer in the ordinary course of business" does not include
a person that acquires goods in a transfer in bulk or as security for
or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt ((is not a buyer in
ordinary course of business)).
(10) "Conspicuous,"((:)) with reference to a term ((or clause is
conspicuous when it is)), means so written, displayed, or presented
that a reasonable person against ((whom)) which it is to operate ought
to have noticed it. ((A printed heading in capitals (as: NON-NEGOTIABLE BILL OF LADING) is conspicuous. Language in the body of a
form is "conspicuous" if it is in larger or other contrasting type or
color. But in a telegram any stated term is "conspicuous".)) Whether
a term ((or clause)) is "conspicuous" or not is ((for)) a decision
((by)) for the court. Conspicuous terms include the following:
(a) A heading in capitals equal to or greater in size than the
surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the
surrounding text of the same or lesser size; and
(b) Language in the body of a record or display in larger type than
the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the
surrounding text of the same size, or set off from surrounding text of
the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the
language.
(11) "Consumer" means an individual who enters into a transaction
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(12) "Contract," as distinguished from "agreement," means the total
legal obligation ((which)) that results from the parties' agreement as
((affected)) determined by ((this Title and)) the Uniform Commercial
Code as supplemented by any other applicable ((rules of)) laws.
(((Compare "Agreement".)
(12))) (13) "Creditor" includes a general creditor, a secured
creditor, a lien creditor, and any representative of creditors,
including an assignee for the benefit of creditors, a trustee in
bankruptcy, a receiver in equity, and an executor or administrator of
an insolvent debtor's or assignor's estate.
(((13))) (14) "Defendant" includes a person in the position of
defendant in a ((cross-action or)) counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim.
(((14))) (15) "Delivery," with respect to an instrument((s)),
document((s)) of title, or chattel paper, ((or certificated
securities)) means voluntary transfer of possession.
(((15))) (16) "Document of title" includes bill of lading, dock
warrant, dock receipt, warehouse receipt or order for the delivery of
goods, and also any other document which in the regular course of
business or financing is treated as adequately evidencing that the
person in possession of it is entitled to receive, hold, and dispose of
the document and the goods it covers. To be a document of title, a
document must purport to be issued by or addressed to a bailee and
purport to cover goods in the bailee's possession which are either
identified or are fungible portions of an identified mass.
(((16))) (17) "Fault" means a default, breach, or wrongful act((,))
or omission ((or breach)).
(((17))) (18) "Fungible goods" ((with respect to goods or
securities)) means:
(a) Goods ((or securities)) of which any unit ((is)), by nature or
usage of trade, is the equivalent of any other like unit((.)); or
(b) Goods ((which are not fungible shall be deemed fungible for the
purposes of this Title to the extent)) that ((under a particular)) by
agreement ((or document unlike units)) are treated as equivalent((s)).
(((18))) (19) "Genuine" means free of forgery or counterfeiting.
(((19))) (20) "Good faith," except as otherwise provided in Article
5, means honesty in fact ((in the conduct or transaction concerned))
and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.
(((20))) (21) "Holder" ((with respect to a negotiable instrument,))
means:
(a) The person in possession ((if the)) of a negotiable instrument
that is payable either to bearer or((, in the case of an instrument
payable)) to an identified person((, if the identified)) that is the
person ((is)) in possession((. "Holder" with respect to)); or
(b) The person in possession of a document of title ((means the
person in possession)) if the goods are deliverable either to bearer or
to the order of the person in possession.
(((21) To "honor" is to pay or to accept and pay, or where a credit
so engages to purchase or discount a draft complying with the terms of
the credit.))
(22) "Insolvency proceeding((s))" includes ((any)) an assignment
for the benefit of creditors or other proceeding((s)) intended to
liquidate or rehabilitate the estate of the person involved.
(23) ((A person is)) "Insolvent" ((who either has)) means:
(a) Having generally ceased to pay ((his or her)) debts in the
ordinary course of business ((or cannot)) other than as a result of a
bona fide dispute;
(b) Being unable to pay ((his or her)) debts as they become due; or
((is))
(c) Being insolvent within the meaning of ((the)) federal
bankruptcy law.
(24) "Money" means a medium of exchange currently authorized or
adopted by a domestic or foreign government ((and)). The term includes
a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental
organization or by agreement between two or more ((nations)) countries.
(25) ((A person has "notice" of a fact when
(a) he or she has actual knowledge of it; or
(b) he or she has received a notice or notification of it; or
(c) from all the facts and circumstances known to him or her at the
time in question he or she has reason to know that it exists.
A person "knows" or has "knowledge" of a fact when he or she has actual
knowledge of it. "Discover" or "learn" or a word or phrase of similar
import refers to knowledge rather than to reason to know. The time and
circumstances under which a notice or notification may cease to be
effective are not determined by this Title.
(26) A person "notifies" or "gives" a notice or notification to
another by taking such steps as may be reasonably required to inform
the other in ordinary course whether or not such other actually comes
to know of it. A person "receives" a notice or notification when
(a) it comes to his or her attention; or
(b) it is duly delivered at the place of business through which the
contract was made or at any other place held out by him or her as the
place for receipt of such communications.
(27) Notice, knowledge or a notice or notification received by an
organization is effective for a particular transaction from the time
when it is brought to the attention of the individual conducting that
transaction, and in any event from the time when it would have been
brought to his or her attention if the organization had exercised due
diligence. An organization exercises due diligence if it maintains
reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the
person conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance
with the routines. Due diligence does not require an individual acting
for the organization to communicate information unless such
communication is part of his or her regular duties or unless he or she
has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be
materially affected by the information.
(28))) "Organization" ((includes a corporation, government or
governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust,
partnership or association, two or more persons having a joint or
common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity)) means a
person other than an individual.
(((29))) (26) "Party,"((,)) as ((distinct)) distinguished from
"third party,"((,)) means a person ((who)) that has engaged in a
transaction or made an agreement ((within this Title)) subject to the
Uniform Commercial Code.
(((30))) (27) "Person" ((includes)) means an individual ((or an
organization (See RCW 62A.1-102).
(31) "Presumption" or "presumed" means that the trier of fact must
find the existence of the fact presumed unless and until evidence is
introduced which would support a finding of its nonexistence.
(32))), corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(28) "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain of one
or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain by
use of either an interest rate specified by the parties if that rate is
not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction is entered into
or, if an interest rate is not so specified, a commercially reasonable
rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances at the time
the transaction is entered into.
(29) "Purchase" ((includes)) means taking by sale, lease, discount,
negotiation, mortgage, pledge, lien, security interest, issue or ((re-issue)) reissue, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an
interest in property.
(((33))) (30) "Purchaser" means a person ((who)) that takes by
purchase.
(((34))) (31) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a
tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and
is retrievable in perceivable form.
(32) "Remedy" means any remedial right to which an aggrieved party
is entitled with or without resort to a tribunal.
(((35))) (33) "Representative" ((includes)) means a person
empowered to act for another, including an agent, an officer of a
corporation or association, and a trustee, executor, or administrator
of an estate((, or any other person empowered to act for another)).
(((36))) (34) "Right((s))" includes ((remedies)) remedy.
(((37))) (35) "Security interest" means an interest in personal
property or fixtures which secures payment or performance of an
obligation((, except for lease-purchase agreements under chapter 63.19
RCW. The term also)). "Security interest" includes any interest of a
consignor and a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, a payment intangible,
or a promissory note in a transaction that is subject to Article 9A.
"Security interest" does not include the special property interest of
a buyer of goods on identification of ((such)) those goods to a
contract for sale under RCW 62A.2-401 ((is not a "security interest")),
but a buyer may also acquire a "security interest" by complying with
Article 9A. Except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.2-505, the right
of a seller or lessor of goods under Article 2 or 2A to retain or
acquire possession of the goods is not a "security interest," but a
seller or lessor may also acquire a "security interest" by complying
with Article 9A. The retention or reservation of title by a seller of
goods notwithstanding shipment or delivery to the buyer ((()) under RCW
62A.2-401(())) is limited in effect to a reservation of a "security
interest." Whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a
((lease or)) "security interest" is determined ((by the facts of each
case. However, a transaction creates a security interest if the
consideration the lessee is to pay the lessor for the right to
possession and use of the goods is an obligation for the term of the
lease not subject to termination by the lessee, and:
(a) The original term of the lease is equal to or greater than the
remaining economic life of the goods;
(b) The lessee is bound to renew the lease for the remaining
economic life of the goods or is bound to become the owner of the
goods;
(c) The lessee has an option to renew the lease for the remaining
economic life of the goods for no additional consideration or nominal
additional consideration upon compliance with the lease agreement; or
(d) The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for
no additional consideration or nominal additional consideration upon
compliance with the lease agreement.
A transaction does not create a security interest merely because it
provides that:
(a) The present value of the consideration the lessee is obligated
to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is
substantially equal to or is greater than the fair market value of the
goods at the time the lease is entered into;
(b) The lessee assumes risk of loss of the goods, or agrees to pay
taxes, insurance, filing, recording, or registration fees, or service
or maintenance costs with respect to the goods;
(c) The lessee has an option to renew the lease or to become the
owner of the goods;
(d) The lessee has an option to renew the lease for a fixed rent
that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market
rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal at the time
the option is to be performed;
(e) The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for
a fixed price that is equal to or greater than the reasonably
predictable fair market value of the goods at the time the option is to
be performed; or
(f) The amount of rental payments may or will be increased or
decreased by reference to the amount realized by the lessor upon sale
or disposition of the goods.
For purposes of this subsection (37):
(a) Additional consideration is not nominal if (i) when the option
to renew the lease is granted to the lessee the rent is stated to be
the fair market rent for the use of the goods for the term of the
renewal determined at the time the option is to be performed, or (ii)
when the option to become the owner of the goods is granted to the
lessee the price is stated to be the fair market value of the goods
determined at the time the option is to be performed. Additional
consideration is nominal if it is less than the lessee's reasonably
predictable cost of performing under the lease agreement if the option
is not exercised;
(b) "Reasonably predictable" and "remaining economic life of the
goods" are to be determined with reference to the facts and
circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into; and
(c) "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain of one or
more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The
discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if
the rate is not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction is
entered into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially
reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances of
each case at the time the transaction was entered into)) pursuant to
RCW 62A.1-203.
(((38))) (36) "Send" in connection ((with any)) a writing, record,
or notice means:
(a) To deposit in the mail or deliver for transmission by any other
usual means of communication with postage or cost of transmission
provided for and properly addressed and, in the case of an instrument,
to an address specified thereon or otherwise agreed, or if there be
none to any address reasonable under the circumstances((. The receipt
of any writing)); or
(b) In any other way to cause to be received any record or notice
within the time ((at which)) it would have arrived if properly sent
((has the effect of a proper sending)).
(((39))) (37) "Signed" includes any symbol executed or adopted ((by
a party)) with present intention to ((authenticate)) adopt or accept a
writing.
(((40))) (38) "State" means a State of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or
any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(39) "Surety" includes a guarantor or other secondary obligor.
(((41) "Telegram" includes a message transmitted by radio,
teletype, cable, any mechanical method of transmission, or the like.
(42))) (40) "Term" means ((that)) a portion of an agreement
((which)) that relates to a particular matter.
(((43))) (41) "Unauthorized((")) signature" means ((one)) a
signature made without actual, implied, or apparent authority ((and)).
The term includes a forgery.
(((44) "Value". Except as otherwise provided with respect to
negotiable instruments and bank collections (RCW 62A.3-303, RCW 62A.4-210, and RCW 62A.4-211) a person gives "value" for rights if he or she
acquires them
(a) in return for a binding commitment to extend credit or for the
extension of immediately available credit whether or not drawn upon and
whether or not a charge-back is provided for in the event of
difficulties in collection; or
(b) as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a
preexisting claim; or
(c) by accepting delivery pursuant to a pre-existing contract for
purchase; or
(d) generally, in return for any consideration sufficient to
support a simple contract.
(45))) (42) "Warehouse receipt" means a receipt issued by a person
engaged in the business of storing goods for hire.
(((46) "Written" or)) (43) "Writing" includes printing,
typewriting, or any other intentional reduction to tangible form.
"Written" has a corresponding meaning.

Sec. 9 RCW 62A.1-202 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-202 are each
amended to read as follows:
((PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE BY THIRD PARTY DOCUMENTS.)) NOTICE;
KNOWLEDGE. ((A document in due form purporting to be a bill of lading,
policy or certificate of insurance, official weigher's or inspector's
certificate, consular invoice, or any other document authorized or
required by the contract to be issued by a third party shall be prima
facie evidence of its own authenticity and genuineness and of the facts
stated in the document by the third party.)) (1) Subject to subsection
(6) of this section, a person has "notice" of a fact if the person:
(a) Has actual knowledge of it;
(b) Has received a notice or notification of it; or
(c) From all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the
time in question, has reason to know that it exists.
(2) "Knowledge" means actual knowledge. "Knows" has a
corresponding meaning.
(3) "Discover," "learn," or words of similar import refer to
knowledge rather than to reason to know.
(4) A person "notifies" or "gives" a notice or notification to
another person by taking such steps as may be reasonably required to
inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other
person actually comes to know of it.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, a person "receives"
a notice or notification when:
(a) It comes to that person's attention; or
(b) It is duly delivered in a form reasonable under the
circumstances at the place of business through which the contract was
made or at another location held out by that person as the place for
receipt of such communications.
(6) Notice, knowledge, or a notice or notification received by an
organization is effective for a particular transaction from the time it
is brought to the attention of the individual conducting that
transaction and, in any event, from the time it would have been brought
to the individual's attention if the organization had exercised due
diligence. An organization exercises due diligence if it maintains
reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the
person conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance
with the routines. Due diligence does not require an individual acting
for the organization to communicate information unless the
communication is part of the individual's regular duties or the
individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the
transaction would be materially affected by the information.

Sec. 10 RCW 62A.1-203 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-203 are each
amended to read as follows:
((OBLIGATION OF GOOD FAITH.)) LEASE DISTINGUISHED FROM SECURITY
INTEREST. ((Every contract or duty within this Title imposes an
obligation of good faith in its performance or enforcement.)) (1)
Whether a transaction in the form of a lease creates a lease or
security interest is determined by the facts of each case.
(2) A transaction in the form of a lease creates a security
interest if the consideration that the lessee is to pay the lessor for
the right to possession and use of the goods is an obligation for the
term of the lease and is not subject to termination by the lessee, and:
(a) The original term of the lease is equal to or greater than the
remaining economic life of the goods;
(b) The lessee is bound to renew the lease for the remaining
economic life of the goods or is bound to become the owner of the
goods;
(c) The lessee has an option to renew the lease for the remaining
economic life of the goods for no additional consideration or for
nominal additional consideration upon compliance with the lease
agreement; or
(d) The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for
no additional consideration or for nominal additional consideration
upon compliance with the lease agreement.
(3) A transaction in the form of a lease does not create a security
interest merely because:
(a) The present value of the consideration the lessee is obligated
to pay the lessor for the right to possession and use of the goods is
substantially equal to or is greater than the fair market value of the
goods at the time the lease is entered into;
(b) The lessee assumes risk of loss of the goods;
(c) The lessee agrees to pay, with respect to the goods, taxes,
insurance, filing, recording, or registration fees, or service or
maintenance costs;
(d) The lessee has an option to renew the lease or to become the
owner of the goods;
(e) The lessee has an option to renew the lease for a fixed rent
that is equal to or greater than the reasonably predictable fair market
rent for the use of the goods for the term of the renewal at the time
the option is to be performed; or
(f) The lessee has an option to become the owner of the goods for
a fixed price that is equal to or greater than the reasonably
predictable fair market value of the goods at the time the option is to
be performed.
(4) Additional consideration is nominal if it is less than the
lessee's reasonably predictable cost of performing under the lease
agreement if the option is not exercised. Additional consideration is
not nominal if:
(a) When the option to renew the lease is granted to the lessee,
the rent is stated to be the fair market rent for the use of the goods
for the term of the renewal determined at the time the option is to be
performed; or
(b) When the option to become the owner of the goods is granted to
the lessee, the price is stated to be the fair market value of the
goods determined at the time the option is to be performed.
(5) The "remaining economic life of the goods" and "reasonably
predictable" fair market rent, fair market value, or cost of performing
under the lease agreement must be determined with reference to the
facts and circumstances at the time the transaction is entered into.

Sec. 11 RCW 62A.1-204 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-204 are each
amended to read as follows:
((TIME; REASONABLE TIME; "SEASONABLY".)) VALUE. (((1) Whenever
this Title requires any action to be taken within a reasonable time,
any time which is not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed by
agreement.
(2) What is a reasonable time for taking any action depends on the
nature, purpose and circumstances of such action.
(3) An action is taken "seasonably" when it is taken at or within
the time agreed or if no time is agreed at or within a reasonable
time.)) Except as otherwise provided in Articles 3, 4, and 5, a person
gives value for rights if the person acquires them:
(1) In return for a binding commitment to extend credit or for the
extension of immediately available credit, whether or not drawn upon
and whether or not a charge-back is provided for in the event of
difficulties in collection;
(2) As security for, or in total or partial satisfaction of, a
preexisting claim;
(3) By accepting delivery under a preexisting contract for
purchase; or
(4) In return for any consideration sufficient to support a simple
contract.

Sec. 12 RCW 62A.1-205 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-205 are each
amended to read as follows:
((COURSE OF DEALING AND USAGE OF TRADE.)) REASONABLE TIME;
SEASONABLENESS. (((1) A course of dealing is a sequence of previous
conduct between the parties to a particular transaction which is fairly
to be regarded as establishing a common basis of understanding for
interpreting their expressions and other conduct.
(2) A usage of trade is any practice or method of dealing having
such regularity of observance in a place, vocation or trade as to
justify an expectation that it will be observed with respect to the
transaction in question. The existence and scope of such a usage are
to be proved as facts. If it is established that such a usage is
embodied in a written trade code or similar writing the interpretation
of the writing is for the court.
(3) A course of dealing between parties and any usage of trade in
the vocation or trade in which they are engaged or of which they are or
should be aware give particular meaning to and supplement or qualify
terms of an agreement.
(4) The express terms of an agreement and an applicable course of
dealing or usage of trade shall be construed wherever reasonable as
consistent with each other; but when such construction is unreasonable
express terms control both course of dealing and usage of trade and
course of dealing controls usage of trade.
(5) An applicable usage of trade in the place where any part of
performance is to occur shall be used in interpreting the agreement as
to that part of the performance.
(6) Evidence of a relevant usage of trade offered by one party is
not admissible unless and until he has given the other party such
notice as the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise to the
latter.)) (1) Whether a time for taking an action required by the
Uniform Commercial Code is reasonable depends on the nature, purpose,
and circumstances of the action.
(2) An action is taken seasonably if it is taken at or within the
time agreed or, if no time is agreed, at or within a reasonable time.

Sec. 13 RCW 62A.1-206 and 1995 c 48 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
((STATUTE OF FRAUDS FOR KINDS OF PERSONAL PROPERTY NOT OTHERWISE
COVERED.)) PRESUMPTIONS. (((1) Except in the cases described in
subsection (2) of this section a contract for the sale of personal
property is not enforceable by way of action or defense beyond five
thousand dollars in amount or value of remedy unless there is some
writing which indicates that a contract for sale has been made between
the parties at a defined or stated price, reasonably identifies the
subject matter, and is signed by the party against whom enforcement is
sought or by his authorized agent.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to contracts for
the sale of goods (RCW 62A.2-201) nor of securities (RCW 62A.8-113) nor
to security agreements (RCW 62A.9-203).)) Whenever the Uniform
Commercial Code creates a "presumption" with respect to a fact, or
provides that a fact is "presumed," the trier of fact must find the
existence of the fact unless and until evidence is introduced that
supports a finding of its nonexistence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-301, to read as follows:
TERRITORIAL APPLICABILITY; PARTIES' POWER TO CHOOSE APPLICABLE LAW.
(1) In this section:
(a) "Domestic transaction" means a transaction other than an
international transaction.
(b) "International transaction" means a transaction that bears a
reasonable relation to a country other than the United States.
(2) This section applies to a transaction to the extent that it is
governed by another article of the Uniform Commercial Code.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) An agreement by parties to a domestic transaction that any or
all of their rights and obligations are to be determined by the law of
this State or of another State is effective, whether or not the
transaction bears a relation to the State designated; and
(b) An agreement by parties to an international transaction that
any or all of their rights and obligations are to be determined by the
law of this State or of another State or country is effective, whether
or not the transaction bears a relation to the State or country
designated.
(4) In the absence of an agreement effective under subsection (3)
of this section, and except as provided in subsections (5) and (7) of
this section, the rights and obligations of the parties are determined
by the law that would be selected by application of this State's
conflict of laws principles.
(5) If one of the parties to a transaction is a consumer, the
following rules apply:
(a) An agreement referred to in subsection (3) of this section is
not effective unless the transaction bears a reasonable relation to the
State or country designated.
(b) Application of the law of the State or country determined
pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section may not deprive the
consumer of the protection of any rule of law governing a matter within
the scope of this section, which both is protective of consumers and
may not be varied by agreement:
(i) Of the State or country in which the consumer principally
resides, unless (b)(ii) of this subsection applies; or
(ii) If the transaction is a sale of goods, of the State or country
in which the consumer both makes the contract and takes delivery of
those goods, if such State or country is not the State or country in
which the consumer principally resides.
(6) An agreement otherwise effective under subsection (3) of this
section is not effective to the extent that application of the law of
the State or country designated would be contrary to a fundamental
policy of the State or country whose law would govern in the absence of
agreement under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) To the extent that the Uniform Commercial Code governs a
transaction, if one of the following provisions of the Uniform
Commercial Code specifies the applicable law, that provision governs
and a contrary agreement is effective only to the extent permitted by
the law so specified:
(a) RCW 62A.2-402;
(b) RCW 62A.2A-105 and 62A.2A-106;
(c) RCW 62A.4-102;
(d) RCW 62A.4A-507;
(e) RCW 62A.5-116;
(f) [Reserved.];
(g) RCW 62A.8-110;
(h) RCW 62A.9-301 through 62A.9-307.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-302, to read as follows:
VARIATION BY AGREEMENT. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection (2) of this section or elsewhere in the Uniform Commercial
Code, the effect of provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code may be
varied by agreement.
(2) The obligations of good faith, diligence, reasonableness, and
care prescribed by the Uniform Commercial Code may not be disclaimed by
agreement. The parties, by agreement, may determine the standards by
which the performance of those obligations is to be measured if those
standards are not manifestly unreasonable. Whenever the Uniform
Commercial Code requires an action to be taken within a reasonable
time, a time that is not manifestly unreasonable may be fixed by
agreement.
(3) The presence in certain provisions of the Uniform Commercial
Code of the phrase "unless otherwise agreed," or words of similar
import, does not imply that the effect of other provisions may not be
varied by agreement under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-303, to read as follows:
COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, COURSE OF DEALING, AND USAGE OF TRADE. (1)
A "course of performance" is a sequence of conduct between the parties
to a particular transaction that exists if:
(a) The agreement of the parties with respect to the transaction
involves repeated occasions for performance by a party; and
(b) The other party, with knowledge of the nature of the
performance and opportunity for objection to it, accepts the
performance or acquiesces in it without objection.
(2) A "course of dealing" is a sequence of conduct concerning
previous transactions between the parties to a particular transaction
that is fairly to be regarded as establishing a common basis of
understanding for interpreting their expressions and other conduct.
(3) A "usage of trade" is any practice or method of dealing having
such regularity of observance in a place, vocation, or trade as to
justify an expectation that it will be observed with respect to the
transaction in question. The existence and scope of such a usage must
be proved as facts. If it is established that such a usage is embodied
in a trade code or similar record, the interpretation of the record is
a question of law.
(4) A course of performance or course of dealing between the
parties or usage of trade in the vocation or trade in which they are
engaged or of which they are or should be aware is relevant in
ascertaining the meaning of the parties' agreement, may give particular
meaning to specific terms of the agreement, and may supplement or
qualify the terms of the agreement. A usage of trade applicable in the
place in which part of the performance under the agreement is to occur
may be so utilized as to that part of the performance.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section,
the express terms of an agreement and any applicable course of
performance, course of dealing, or usage of trade must be construed
whenever reasonable as consistent with each other. If such a
construction is unreasonable:
(a) Express terms prevail over course of performance, course of
dealing, and usage of trade;
(b) Course of performance prevails over course of dealing and usage
of trade; and
(c) Course of dealing prevails over usage of trade.
(6) Subject to RCW 62A.2-209, a course of performance is relevant
to show a waiver or modification of any term inconsistent with the
course of performance.
(7) Evidence of a relevant usage of trade offered by one party is
not admissible unless that party has given the other party notice that
the court finds sufficient to prevent unfair surprise to the other
party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-304, to read as follows:
OBLIGATION OF GOOD FAITH. Every contract or duty within the
Uniform Commercial Code imposes an obligation of good faith in its
performance and enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-305, to read as follows:
REMEDIES TO BE LIBERALLY ADMINISTERED. (1) The remedies provided
by the Uniform Commercial Code must be liberally administered to the
end that the aggrieved party may be put in as good a position as if the
other party had fully performed but neither consequential or special
damages nor penal damages may be had except as specifically provided in
the Uniform Commercial Code or by other rule of law.
(2) Any right or obligation declared by the Uniform Commercial Code
is enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a
different and limited effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-306, to read as follows:
WAIVER OR RENUNCIATION OF CLAIM OR RIGHT AFTER BREACH. A claim or
right arising out of an alleged breach may be discharged in whole or in
part without consideration by agreement of the aggrieved party in an
authenticated record.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-307, to read as follows:
PRIMA FACIE EVIDENCE BY THIRD-PARTY DOCUMENTS. A document in due
form purporting to be a bill of lading, policy or certificate of
insurance, official weigher's or inspector's certificate, consular
invoice, or any other document authorized or required by the contract
to be issued by a third party is prima facie evidence of its own
authenticity and genuineness and of the facts stated in the document by
the third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-308, to read as follows:
PERFORMANCE OR ACCEPTANCE UNDER RESERVATION OF RIGHTS. (1) A party
that with explicit reservation of rights performs or promises
performance or assents to performance in a manner demanded or offered
by the other party does not thereby prejudice the rights reserved.
Such words as "without prejudice," "under protest," or the like are
sufficient.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an accord and
satisfaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-309, to read as follows:
OPTION TO ACCELERATE AT WILL. A term providing that one party or
that party's successor in interest may accelerate payment or
performance or require collateral or additional collateral "at will" or
when the party "deems itself insecure," or words of similar import,
means that the party has power to do so only if that party in good
faith believes that the prospect of payment or performance is impaired.
The burden of establishing lack of good faith is on the party against
which the power has been exercised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to Article 62A.1
RCW, to be codified as RCW 62A.1-310, to read as follows:
SUBORDINATED OBLIGATIONS. An obligation may be issued as
subordinated to performance of another obligation of the person
obligated, or a creditor may subordinate its right to performance of an
obligation by agreement with either the person obligated or another
creditor of the person obligated. Subordination does not create a
security interest as against either the common debtor or a subordinated
creditor.

Sec. 24 RCW 62A.2-103 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-803 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEFINITIONS AND INDEX OF DEFINITIONS. (1) In this Article unless
the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Buyer" means a person who buys or contracts to buy goods.
(b) (("Good faith" in the case of a merchant means honesty in fact
and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing
in the trade.)) [Reserved.]
(c) "Receipt" of goods means taking physical possession of them.
(d) "Seller" means a person who sells or contracts to sell goods.
(2) Other definitions applying to this Article or to specified
Parts thereof, and the sections in which they appear are:

"Acceptance." RCW 62A.2-606.

"Banker's credit." RCW 62A.2-325.

"Between merchants." RCW 62A.2-104.

"Cancellation." RCW 62A.2-106(((4))).

"Commercial unit." RCW 62A.2-105.

"Confirmed credit." RCW 62A.2-325.

"Conforming to contract." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Contract for sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Cover." RCW 62A.2-712.

"Entrusting." RCW 62A.2-403.

"Financing agency." RCW 62A.2-104.

"Future goods." RCW 62A.2-105.

"Goods." RCW 62A.2-105.

"Identification." RCW 62A.2-501.

"Installment contract." RCW 62A.2-612.

"Letter of credit." RCW 62A.2-325.

"Lot." RCW 62A.2-105.

"Merchant." RCW 62A.2-104.

"Overseas." RCW 62A.2-323.

"Person in position of
seller." RCW 62A.2-707.

"Present sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Sale on approval." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Sale or return." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Termination." RCW 62A.2-106.

(3) The following definitions in other Articles apply to this
Article:

"Check." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Consignee." RCW 62A.7-102.

"Consignor." RCW 62A.7-102.

"Consumer goods." RCW 62A.9A-102.

"Dishonor." RCW 62A.3-502.

"Draft." RCW 62A.3-104.

(4) In addition Article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.

Sec. 25 RCW 62A.2-202 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-202 are each
amended to read as follows:
FINAL WRITTEN EXPRESSION: PAROL OR EXTRINSIC EVIDENCE. Terms with
respect to which the confirmatory memoranda of the parties agree or
which are otherwise set forth in a writing intended by the parties as
a final expression of their agreement with respect to such terms as are
included therein may not be contradicted by evidence of any prior
agreement or of a contemporaneous oral agreement but may be explained
or supplemented:
(((a))) (1) By course of performance, course of dealing, or usage
of trade (((RCW 62A.1-205) or by course of performance (RCW 62A.2-208))) (RCW 62A.1-303); and
(((b))) (2) By evidence of consistent additional terms unless the
court finds the writing to have been intended also as a complete and
exclusive statement of the terms of the agreement.

Sec. 26 RCW 62A.2A-103 and 2000 c 250 s 9A-808 are each amended
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS AND INDEX OF DEFINITIONS. (1) In this Article unless
the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Buyer in ordinary course of business" means a person who in
good faith and without knowledge that the sale to him or her is in
violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold
interest of a third party in the goods buys in ordinary course from a
person in the business of selling goods of that kind but does not
include a pawnbroker. "Buying" may be for cash, or by exchange of
other property, or on secured or unsecured credit, and includes
receiving goods or documents of title under a preexisting contract for
sale but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security for or in
total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.
(b) "Cancellation" occurs when either party puts an end to the
lease contract for default by the other party.
(c) "Commercial unit" means such a unit of goods as by commercial
usage is a single whole for purposes of lease and division of which
materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A
commercial unit may be a single article, as a machine, or a set of
articles, as a suite of furniture or a line of machinery, or a
quantity, as a gross or carload, or any other unit treated in use or in
the relevant market as a single whole.
(d) "Conforming" goods or performance under a lease contract means
goods or performance that are in accordance with the obligations under
the lease contract.
(e) "Consumer lease" means a lease that a lessor regularly engaged
in the business of leasing or selling makes to a lessee who is an
individual who takes under the lease primarily for a personal, family,
or household purpose, if the total payments to be made under the lease
contract, excluding payments for options to renew or buy, do not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars.
(f) "Fault" means wrongful act, omission, breach, or default.
(g) "Finance lease" means a lease with respect to which:
(i) The lessor does not select, manufacture, or supply the goods;
(ii) The lessor acquires the goods or the right to possession and
use of the goods in connection with the lease; and
(iii) Only in the case of a consumer lease, either:
(A) The lessee receives a copy of the contract by which the lessor
acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods
before signing the lease contract;
(B) The lessee's approval of the contract by which the lessor
acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods is
a condition to effectiveness of the lease contract; or
(C) The lessee, before signing the lease contract, receives an
accurate and complete statement designating the promises and
warranties, and any disclaimers of warranties, limitations or
modifications of remedies, or liquidated damages, including those of a
third party, such as the manufacturer of the goods, provided to the
lessor by the person supplying the goods in connection with or as part
of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to
possession and use of the goods.
(h) "Goods" means all things that are movable at the time of
identification to the lease contract, or are fixtures (RCW 62A.2A-309),
but the term does not include money, documents, instruments, accounts,
chattel paper, general intangibles, or minerals or the like, including
oil and gas, before extraction. The term also includes the unborn
young of animals.
(i) "Installment lease contract" means a lease contract that
authorizes or requires the delivery of goods in separate lots to be
separately accepted, even though the lease contract contains a clause
"each delivery is a separate lease" or its equivalent.
(j) "Lease" means a transfer of the right to possession and use of
goods for a term in return for consideration, but a sale, including a
sale on approval or a sale or return, or retention or creation of a
security interest is not a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublease.
(k) "Lease agreement" means the bargain, with respect to the lease,
of the lessor and the lessee in fact as found in their language or by
implication from other circumstances including course of dealing or
usage of trade or course of performance as provided in this Article.
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a
sublease agreement.
(l) "Lease contract" means the total legal obligation that results
from the lease agreement as affected by this Article and any other
applicable rules of law. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublease contract.
(m) "Leasehold interest" means the interest of the lessor or the
lessee under a lease contract.
(n) "Lessee" means a person who acquires the right to possession
and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublessee.
(o) "Lessee in ordinary course of business" means a person who in
good faith and without knowledge that the lease to him or her is in
violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold
interest of a third party in the goods, leases in ordinary course from
a person in the business of selling or leasing goods of that kind, but
does not include a pawnbroker. "Leasing" may be for cash, or by
exchange of other property, or on secured or unsecured credit and
includes receiving goods or documents of title under a preexisting
lease contract but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security
for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.
(p) "Lessor" means a person who transfers the right to possession
and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the term includes a sublessor.
(q) "Lessor's residual interest" means the lessor's interest in the
goods after expiration, termination, or cancellation of the lease
contract.
(r) "Lien" means a charge against or interest in goods to secure
payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, but the term does
not include a security interest.
(s) "Lot" means a parcel or a single article that is the subject
matter of a separate lease or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient
to perform the lease contract.
(t) "Merchant lessee" means a lessee that is a merchant with
respect to goods of the kind subject to the lease.
(u) "Present value" means the amount as of a date certain of one or
more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The
discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if
the rate was not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction
was entered into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a
commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and
circumstances of each case at the time the transaction was entered
into.
(v) "Purchase" includes taking by sale, lease, mortgage, security
interest, pledge, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an
interest in goods.
(w) "Sublease" means a lease of goods the right to possession and
use of which was acquired by the lessor as a lessee under an existing
lease.
(x) "Supplier" means a person from whom a lessor buys or leases
goods to be leased under a finance lease.
(y) "Supply contract" means a contract under which a lessor buys or
leases goods to be leased.
(z) "Termination" occurs when either party pursuant to a power
created by agreement or law puts an end to the lease contract otherwise
than for default.
(2) Other definitions applying to this Article or to specified
Parts thereof, and the sections in which they appear are:

"Accessions." RCW 62A.2A-310(((1))).

"Construction
mortgage." RCW
62A.2A-309(((1)(d))).

"Encumbrance." RCW
62A.2A-309(((1)(e))).

"Fixtures." RCW
62A.2A-309(((1)(a))).

"Fixture filing." RCW
62A.2A-309(((1)(b))).

"Purchase money
lease." RCW
62A.2A-309(((1)(c))).

(3) The following definitions in other Articles apply to this
Article:

"Account." RCW 62A.9A-102(((a)(2))).

"Between
merchants." RCW 62A.2-104(((3))).

"Buyer." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(a))).

"Chattel paper." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(11))).

"Consumer goods." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(23))).

"Document." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(30))).

"Entrusting." RCW 62A.2-403(((3))).

"General intangible." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(42))).

(("Good faith." RCW 62A.2-103(1)(b).))

"Instrument." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(47))).

"Merchant." RCW 62A.2-104(((1))).

"Mortgage." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(55))).

"Pursuant to
commitment." RCW
62A.9A-102(((a)(68))).

"Receipt." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(c))).

"Sale." RCW 62A.2-106(((1))).

"Sale on approval." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Sale or return." RCW 62A.2-326.

"Seller." RCW 62A.2-103(((1)(d))).

(4) In addition, Article 62A.1 RCW contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.

Sec. 27 RCW 62A.2A-501 and 1993 c 230 s 2A-501 are each amended
to read as follows:
DEFAULT: PROCEDURE. (1) Whether the lessor or the lessee is in
default under a lease contract is determined by the lease agreement and
this Article.
(2) If the lessor or the lessee is in default under the lease
contract, the party seeking enforcement has rights and remedies as
provided in this Article and, except as limited by this Article, as
provided in the lease agreement.
(3) If the lessor or the lessee is in default under the lease
contract, the party seeking enforcement may reduce the party's claim to
judgment, or otherwise enforce the lease contract by self help or any
available judicial procedure or nonjudicial procedure, including
administrative proceeding, arbitration, or the like, in accordance with
this Article.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in ((RCW 62A.1-106(1))) RCW 62A.1-305 or this Article or the lease agreement, the rights and remedies
referred to in subsections (2) and (3) of this section are cumulative.
(5) If the lease agreement covers both real property and goods, the
party seeking enforcement may proceed under this Part 5 as to the
goods, or under other applicable law as to both the real property and
the goods in accordance with that party's rights and remedies in
respect of the real property, in which case this Part 5 does not apply.

Sec. 28 RCW 62A.2A-518 and 1993 c 230 s 2A-518 are each amended
to read as follows:
COVER; SUBSTITUTE GOODS. (1) After a default by a lessor under the
lease contract of the type described in ((())RCW 62A.2A-508(1)(())),
or, if agreed, after other default by the lessor, the lessee may cover
by making any purchase or lease of or contract to purchase or lease
goods in substitution for those due from the lessor.
(2) Except as otherwise provided with respect to damages liquidated
in the lease agreement (RCW 62A.2A-504) or otherwise determined
pursuant to agreement of the parties (((RCW 62A.1-102(3))) (RCW 62A.1-302 and 62A.2A-503), if a lessee's cover is by a lease agreement
substantially similar to the original lease agreement and the new lease
agreement is made in good faith and in a commercially reasonable
manner, the lessee may recover from the lessor as damages (((i))) (a)
the present value, as of the date of the commencement of the term of
the new lease agreement, of the rent under the new lease applicable to
that period of the new lease term which is comparable to the then
remaining term of the original lease agreement minus the present value
as of the same date of the total rent for the then remaining lease term
of the original lease agreement, and (((ii))) (b) any incidental or
consequential damages, less expenses saved in consequence of the
lessor's default.
(3) If a lessee's cover is by lease agreement that for any reason
does not qualify for treatment under subsection (2) of this section, or
is by purchase or otherwise, the lessee may recover from the lessor as
if the lessee had elected not to cover and RCW 62A.2A-519 governs.

Sec. 29 RCW 62A.2A-519 and 1993 c 230 s 2A-519 are each amended
to read as follows:
LESSEE'S DAMAGES FOR NONDELIVERY, REPUDIATION, DEFAULT, AND BREACH
OF WARRANTY IN REGARD TO ACCEPTED GOODS. (1) Except as otherwise
provided with respect to damages liquidated in the lease agreement (RCW
62A.2A-504) or otherwise determined pursuant to agreement of the
parties (((RCW 62A.1-102(3)))) (RCW 62A.1-302 and 62A.2A-503), if a
lessee elects not to cover or a lessee elects to cover and the cover is
by lease agreement that for any reason does not qualify for treatment
under RCW 62A.2A-518(2), or is by purchase or otherwise, the measure of
damages for nondelivery or repudiation by the lessor or for rejection
or revocation of acceptance by the lessee is the present value, as of
the date of the default, of the then market rent minus the present
value as of the same date of the original rent, computed for the
remaining lease term of the original lease agreement, together with
incidental and consequential damages, less expenses saved in
consequence of the lessor's default.
(2) Market rent is to be determined as of the place for tender or,
in cases of rejection after arrival or revocation of acceptance, as of
the place of arrival.
(3) Except as otherwise agreed, if the lessee has accepted goods
and given notification (RCW 62A.2A-516(((3)))), the measure of damages
for nonconforming tender or delivery or other default by a lessor is
the loss resulting in the ordinary course of events from the lessor's
default as determined in any manner that is reasonable together with
incidental and consequential damages, less expenses saved in
consequence of the lessor's default.
(4) Except as otherwise agreed, the measure of damages for breach
of warranty is the present value at the time and place of acceptance of
the difference between the value of the use of the goods accepted and
the value if they had been as warranted for the lease term, unless
special circumstances show proximate damages of a different amount,
together with incidental and consequential damages, less expenses saved
in consequence of the lessor's default or breach of warranty.

Sec. 30 RCW 62A.2A-527 and 1993 c 230 s 2A-527 are each amended
to read as follows:
LESSOR'S RIGHTS TO DISPOSE OF GOODS. (1) After a default by a
lessee under the lease contract of the type described in RCW 62A.2A-523
(1) or (3)(a) or after the lessor refuses to deliver or takes
possession of goods (RCW 62A.2A-525 or 62A.2A-526), or, if agreed,
after other default by a lessee, the lessor may dispose of the goods
concerned or the undelivered balance thereof by lease, sale, or
otherwise.
(2) Except as otherwise provided with respect to damages liquidated
in the lease agreement (RCW 62A.2A-504) or otherwise determined
pursuant to agreement of the parties (((RCW 62A.1-102(3))) (RCW 62A.1-302 and 62A.2A-503), if the disposition is by lease agreement
substantially similar to the original lease agreement and the new lease
agreement is made in good faith and in a commercially reasonable
manner, the lessor may recover from the lessee as damages (((i))) (a)
accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of the commencement of the term
of the new lease agreement, (((ii))) (b) the present value, as of the
same date, of the total rent for the then remaining lease term of the
original lease agreement minus the present value, as of the same date,
of the rent under the new lease agreement applicable to that period of
the new lease term which is comparable to the then remaining term of
the original lease agreement, and (((iii))) (c) any incidental damages
allowed under RCW 62A.2A-530, less expenses saved in consequence of the
lessee's default.
(3) If the lessor's disposition is by lease agreement that for any
reason does not qualify for treatment under subsection (2) of this
section, or is by sale or otherwise, the lessor may recover from the
lessee as if the lessor had elected not to dispose of the goods and RCW
62A.2A-528 governs.
(4) A subsequent buyer or lessee who buys or leases from the lessor
in good faith for value as a result of a disposition under this section
takes the goods free of the original lease contract and any rights of
the original lessee even though the lessor fails to comply with one or
more of the requirements of this Article.
(5) The lessor is not accountable to the lessee for any profit made
on any disposition. A lessee who has rightfully rejected or
justifiably revoked acceptance shall account to the lessor for any
excess over the amount of the lessee's security interest (RCW 62A.2A-508(((5)))).

Sec. 31 RCW 62A.2A-528 and 1993 c 230 s 2A-528 are each amended
to read as follows:
LESSOR'S DAMAGES FOR NONACCEPTANCE, FAILURE TO PAY, REPUDIATION, OR
OTHER DEFAULT. (1) Except as otherwise provided with respect to
damages liquidated in the lease agreement (RCW 62A.2A-504) or otherwise
determined pursuant to agreement of the parties (((RCW 62A.1-102(3)))
(RCW 62A.1-302 and 62A.2A-503), if a lessor elects to retain the goods
or a lessor elects to dispose of the goods and the disposition is by
lease agreement that for any reason does not qualify for treatment
under RCW 62A.2A-527(2), or is by sale or otherwise, the lessor may
recover from the lessee as damages for a default of the type described
in RCW 62A.2A-523 (1) or (3)(a), or, if agreed, for other default of
the lessee, (((i))) (a) accrued and unpaid rent as of the date of
default if the lessee has never taken possession of the goods, or, if
the lessee has taken possession of the goods, as of the date the lessor
repossesses the goods or an earlier date on which the lessee makes a
tender of the goods to the lessor, (((ii))) (b) the present value as of
the date determined under (a) of this subsection (((1)(i) of this
section)) of the total rent for the then remaining lease term of the
original lease agreement minus the present value as of the same date of
the market rent at the place where the goods are located computed for
the same lease term, and (((iii))) (c) any incidental damages allowed
under RCW 62A.2A-530, less expenses saved in consequence of the
lessee's default.
(2) If the measure of damages provided in subsection (1) of this
section is inadequate to put a lessor in as good a position as
performance would have, the measure of damages is the present value of
the profit, including reasonable overhead, the lessor would have made
from full performance by the lessee, together with any incidental
damages allowed under RCW 62A.2A-530, due allowance for costs
reasonably incurred and due credit for payments or proceeds of
disposition.

Sec. 32 RCW 62A.3-103 and 1993 c 229 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEFINITIONS. (((a))) (1) In this Article:
(((1))) (a) "Acceptor" means a drawee who has accepted a draft.
(((2))) (b) "Drawee" means a person ordered in a draft to make
payment.
(((3))) (c) "Drawer" means a person who signs or is identified in
a draft as a person ordering payment.
(((4) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.
(5))) (d) [Reserved.]
(e) "Maker" means a person who signs or is identified in a note as
a person undertaking to pay.
(((6))) (f) "Order" means a written instruction to pay money signed
by the person giving the instruction. The instruction may be addressed
to any person, including the person giving the instruction, or to one
or more persons jointly or in the alternative but not in succession.
An authorization to pay is not an order unless the person authorized to
pay is also instructed to pay.
(((7))) (g) "Ordinary care" in the case of a person engaged in
business means observance of reasonable commercial standards,
prevailing in the area in which the person is located, with respect to
the business in which the person is engaged. In the case of a bank
that takes an instrument for processing for collection or payment by
automated means, reasonable commercial standards do not require the
bank to examine the instrument if the failure to examine does not
violate the bank's prescribed procedures and the bank's procedures do
not vary unreasonably from general banking usage not disapproved by
this Article or Article 4.
(((8))) (h) "Party" means a party to an instrument.
(((9))) (i) "Promise" means a written undertaking to pay money
signed by the person undertaking to pay. An acknowledgment of an
obligation by the obligor is not a promise unless the obligor also
undertakes to pay the obligation.
(((10))) (j) "Prove" with respect to a fact means to meet the
burden of establishing the fact (RCW 62A.1-201(((8)))).
(((11))) (k) "Remitter" means a person who purchases an instrument
from its issuer if the instrument is payable to an identified person
other than the purchaser.
(((b))) (2) Other definitions applying to this Article and the
sections in which they appear are:

"Acceptance" RCW 62A.3-409

"Accommodated party" RCW 62A.3-419

"Accommodation party" RCW 62A.3-419

"Alteration" RCW 62A.3-407

"Anomalous indorsement" RCW 62A.3-205

"Blank indorsement" RCW 62A.3-205

"Cashier's check" RCW 62A.3-104

"Certificate of deposit" RCW 62A.3-104

"Certified check" RCW 62A.3-409

"Check" RCW 62A.3-104

"Consideration" RCW 62A.3-303

"Draft" RCW 62A.3-104

"Holder in due course" RCW 62A.3-302

"Incomplete instrument" RCW 62A.3-115

"Indorsement" RCW 62A.3-204

"Indorser" RCW 62A.3-204

"Instrument" RCW 62A.3-104

"Issue" RCW 62A.3-105

"Issuer" RCW 62A.3-105

"Negotiable instrument" RCW 62A.3-104

"Negotiation" RCW 62A.3-201

"Note" RCW 62A.3-104

"Payable at a definite time" RCW 62A.3-108

"Payable on demand" RCW 62A.3-108

"Payable to bearer" RCW 62A.3-109

"Payable to order" RCW 62A.3-109

"Payment" RCW 62A.3-602

"Person entitled to enforce" RCW 62A.3-301

"Presentment" RCW 62A.3-501

"Reacquisition" RCW 62A.3-207

"Special indorsement" RCW 62A.3-205

"Teller's check" RCW 62A.3-104

"Transfer of instrument" RCW 62A.3-203

"Traveler's check" RCW 62A.3-104

"Value" RCW 62A.3-303

(((c))) (3) The following definitions in other Articles apply to
this Article:

"Bank" RCW 62A.4-105

"Banking day" RCW 62A.4-104

"Clearing house" RCW 62A.4-104

"Collecting bank" RCW 62A.4-105

"Depositary bank" RCW 62A.4-105

"Documentary draft" RCW 62A.4-104

"Intermediary bank" RCW 62A.4-105

"Item" RCW 62A.4-104

"Payor bank" RCW 62A.4-105

"Suspends payments" RCW 62A.4-104

(((d))) (4) In addition, Article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.

Sec. 33 RCW 62A.4-104 and 1995 c 48 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEFINITIONS AND INDEX OF DEFINITIONS. (((a))) (1) In this Article,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(((1))) (a) "Account" means any deposit or credit account with a
bank, including a demand, time, savings, passbook, share draft, or like
account, other than an account evidenced by a certificate of deposit;
(((2))) (b) "Afternoon" means the period of a day between noon and
midnight;
(((3))) (c) "Banking day" means the part of a day on which a bank
is open to the public for carrying on substantially all of its banking
functions, except that it shall not include a Saturday, Sunday, or
legal holiday;
(((4))) (d) "Clearing house" means an association of banks or other
payors regularly clearing items;
(((5))) (e) "Customer" means a person having an account with a bank
or for whom a bank has agreed to collect items, including a bank that
maintains an account at another bank;
(((6))) (f) "Documentary draft" means a draft to be presented for
acceptance or payment if specified documents, certificated securities
(RCW 62A.8-102) or instructions for uncertificated securities (RCW
62A.8-102), or other certificates, statements, or the like are to be
received by the drawee or other payor before acceptance or payment of
the draft;
(((7))) (g) "Draft" means a draft as defined in RCW 62A.3-104 or an
item, other than an instrument, that is an order;
(((8))) (h) "Drawee" means a person ordered in a draft to make
payment;
(((9))) (i) "Item" means an instrument or a promise or order to pay
money handled by a bank for collection or payment. The term does not
include a payment order governed by Article 4A or a credit or debit
card slip;
(((10))) (j) "Midnight deadline" with respect to a bank is midnight
on its next banking day following the banking day on which it receives
the relevant item or notice or from which the time for taking action
commences to run, whichever is later;
(((11))) (k) "Settle" means to pay in cash, by clearing-house
settlement, in a charge or credit or by remittance, or otherwise as
agreed. A settlement may be either provisional or final;
(((12))) (l) "Suspends payments" with respect to a bank means that
it has been closed by order of the supervisory authorities, that a
public officer has been appointed to take it over or that it ceases or
refuses to make payments in the ordinary course of business.
(((b))) (2) Other definitions applying to this Article and the
sections in which they appear are:

"Agreement for electronic
presentment" RCW 62A.4-110.

"Bank" RCW 62A.4-105.

"Collecting bank" RCW 62A.4-105.

"Depositary bank" RCW 62A.4-105.

"Intermediary bank" RCW 62A.4-105.

"Payor bank" RCW 62A.4-105.

"Presenting bank" RCW 62A.4-105.

"Presentment notice" RCW 62A.4-110.

(((c))) (3) The following definitions in other Articles apply to
this Article:

"Acceptance" RCW 62A.3-409.

"Alteration" RCW 62A.3-407.

"Cashier's check" RCW 62A.3-104.

"Certificate of deposit" RCW 62A.3-104.

"Certified check" RCW 62A.3-409.

"Check" RCW 62A.3-104.

"Draft" RCW 62A.3-104.

(("Good faith" RCW 62A.3-103.))

"Holder in due course" RCW 62A.3-302.

"Instrument" RCW 62A.3-104.

"Notice of dishonor" RCW 62A.3-503.

"Order" RCW 62A.3-103.

"Ordinary care" RCW 62A.3-103.

"Person entitled to enforce" RCW 62A.3-301.

"Presentment" RCW 62A.3-501.

"Promise" RCW 62A.3-103.

"Prove" RCW 62A.3-103.

"Teller's check" RCW 62A.3-104.

"Unauthorized signature" RCW 62A.3-403.

(((d))) (4) In addition Article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.

Sec. 34 RCW 62A.4A-105 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-105 are each
amended to read as follows:
OTHER DEFINITIONS. (1) In this Article:
(a) "Authorized account" means a deposit account of a customer in
a bank designated by the customer as a source of payment orders issued
by the customer to the bank. If a customer does not so designate an
account, any account of the customer is an authorized account if
payment of a payment order from that account is not inconsistent with
a restriction on the use of the account.
(b) "Bank" means a person engaged in the business of banking and
includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union,
and trust company. A branch or separate office of a bank is a separate
bank for purposes of this Article.
(c) "Customer" means a person, including a bank, having an account
with a bank or from whom a bank has agreed to receive payment orders.
(d) "Funds-transfer business day" of a receiving bank means the
part of a day during which the receiving bank is open for the receipt,
processing, and transmittal of payment orders and cancellations and
amendments of payment orders.
(e) "Funds-transfer system" means a wire transfer network,
automated clearing house, or other communication system of a clearing
house or other association of banks through which a payment order by a
bank may be transmitted to the bank to which the order is addressed.
(f) (("Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.)) [Reserved.]
(g) "Prove" with respect to a fact means to meet the burden of
establishing the fact (RCW 62A.1-201(((8)))).
(2) Other definitions applying to this Article and the sections in
which they appear are:

"Acceptance" RCW 62A.4A-209

"Beneficiary" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Beneficiary's bank" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Executed" RCW 62A.4A-301

"Execution date" RCW 62A.4A-301

"Funds transfer" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Funds-transfer system rule" RCW 62A.4A-501

"Intermediary bank" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Originator" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Originator's bank" RCW 62A.4A-104

"Payment by beneficiary's
bank to beneficiary" RCW 62A.4A-405

"Payment by originator to
beneficiary" RCW 62A.4A-406

"Payment by sender to
receiving bank" RCW 62A.4A-403

"Payment date" RCW 62A.4A-401

"Payment order" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Receiving bank" RCW 62A.4A-103

"Security procedure" RCW 62A.4A-201

"Sender" RCW 62A.4A-103

(3) The following definitions in Article 4 (RCW 62A.4-101 through
62A.4-504) apply to this Article:

"Clearing house" ((section 4-104 of this act))
RCW 62A.4-104

"Item" ((section 4-104 of this act))
RCW 62A.4-104

"Suspends payments" ((section 4-104 of this act))
RCW 62A.4-104

(4) In addition ((to)), Article 1 (((RCW 62A.1-101 through
62A.1-208))) contains general definitions and principles of
construction and interpretation applicable throughout this Article.

Sec. 35 RCW 62A.4A-106 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-106 are each
amended to read as follows:
TIME PAYMENT ORDER IS RECEIVED. (1) The time of receipt of a
payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is
determined by the rules applicable to receipt of a notice stated in
((RCW 62A.1-201(27))) RCW 62A.1-202. A receiving bank may fix a cut-off time or times on a funds-transfer business day for the receipt and
processing of payment orders and communications canceling or amending
payment orders. Different cut-off times may apply to payment orders,
cancellations, or amendments, or to different categories of payment
orders, cancellations, or amendments. A cut-off time may apply to
senders generally or different cut-off times may apply to different
senders or categories of payment orders. If a payment order or
communication canceling or amending a payment order is received after
the close of a funds-transfer business day or after the appropriate
cut-off time on a funds-transfer business day, the receiving bank may
treat the payment order or communication as received at the opening of
the next funds-transfer business day.
(2) If this Article refers to an execution date or payment date or
states a day on which a receiving bank is required to take action, and
the date or day does not fall on a funds-transfer business day, the
next day that is a funds-transfer business day is treated as the date
or day stated, unless the contrary is stated in this Article.

Sec. 36 RCW 62A.4A-204 and 1991 sp.s. c 21 s 4A-204 are each
amended to read as follows:
REFUND OF PAYMENT AND DUTY OF CUSTOMER TO REPORT WITH RESPECT
UNAUTHORIZED PAYMENT ORDER. (1) If a receiving bank accepts a payment
order issued in the name of its customer as sender which is (a) not
authorized and not effective as the order of the customer under RCW
62A.4A-202, or (b) not enforceable, in whole or in part, against the
customer under RCW 62A.4A-203, the bank shall refund any payment of the
payment order received from the customer to the extent the bank is not
entitled to enforce payment and shall pay interest on the refundable
amount calculated from the date the bank received payment to the date
of the refund. However, the customer is not entitled to interest from
the bank on the amount to be refunded if the customer fails to exercise
ordinary care to determine that the order was not authorized by the
customer and to notify the bank of the relevant facts within a
reasonable time not exceeding ninety days after the date the customer
received notification from the bank that the order was accepted or that
the customer's account was debited with respect to the order. The bank
is not entitled to any recovery from the customer on account of a
failure by the customer to give notification as stated in this section.
(2) Reasonable time under subsection (1) of this section may be
fixed by agreement as stated in ((RCW 62A.1-204(1))) RCW 62A.1-302, but
the obligation of a receiving bank to refund payment as stated in
subsection (1) of this subsection may not otherwise be varied by
agreement.

Sec. 37 RCW 62A.5-103 and 1997 c 56 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
SCOPE. (1) This Article applies to letters of credit and to
certain rights and obligations arising out of transactions involving
letters of credit.
(2) The statement of a rule in this Article does not by itself
require, imply, or negate application of the same or a different rule
to a situation not provided for, or to a person not specified, in this
Article.
(3) With the exception of this subsection, subsections (1) and (4)
of this section, RCW 62A.5-102(1) (i) and (j), 62A.5-106(4), and 62A.5-114(4), and except to the extent prohibited in ((RCW 62A.1-102(3))) RCW
62A.1-302 and 62A.5-117(((4))), the effect of this Article may be
varied by agreement or by a provision stated or incorporated by
reference in an undertaking. A term in an agreement or undertaking
generally excusing liability or generally limiting remedies for failure
to perform obligations is not sufficient to vary obligations prescribed
by this Article.
(4) Rights and obligations of an issuer to a beneficiary or a
nominated person under a letter of credit are independent of the
existence, performance, or nonperformance of a contract or arrangement
out of which the letter of credit arises or which underlies it,
including contracts or arrangements between the issuer and the
applicant and between the applicant and the beneficiary.

Sec. 38 RCW 62A.8-102 and 1995 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
DEFINITIONS. (1) In this Article:
(a) "Adverse claim" means a claim that a claimant has a property
interest in a financial asset and that it is a violation of the rights
of the claimant for another person to hold, transfer, or deal with the
financial asset.
(b) "Bearer form," as applied to a certificated security, means a
form in which the security is payable to the bearer of the security
certificate according to its terms but not by reason of an indorsement.
(c) "Broker" means a person defined as a broker or dealer under the
federal securities laws, but without excluding a bank acting in that
capacity.
(d) "Certificated security" means a security that is represented by
a certificate.
(e) "Clearing corporation" means:
(i) A person that is registered as a "clearing agency" under the
federal securities laws;
(ii) A federal reserve bank; or
(iii) Any other person that provides clearance or settlement
services with respect to financial assets that would require it to
register as a clearing agency under the federal securities laws but for
an exclusion or exemption from the registration requirement, if its
activities as a clearing corporation, including adoption of rules, are
subject to regulation by a federal or state governmental authority.
(f) "Communicate" means to:
(i) Send a signed writing; or
(ii) Transmit information by any mechanism agreed upon by the
persons transmitting and receiving the information.
(g) "Entitlement holder" means a person identified in the records
of a securities intermediary as the person having a security
entitlement against the securities intermediary. If a person acquires
a security entitlement by virtue of RCW 62A.8-501(2) (b) or (c), that
person is the entitlement holder.
(h) "Entitlement order" means a notification communicated to a
securities intermediary directing transfer or redemption of a financial
asset to which the entitlement holder has a security entitlement.
(i) "Financial asset," except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.8-103, means:
(i) A security;
(ii) An obligation of a person or a share, participation, or other
interest in a person or in property or an enterprise of a person, which
is, or is of a type, dealt in or traded on financial markets, or which
is recognized in any area in which it is issued or dealt in as a medium
for investment; or
(iii) Any property that is held by a securities intermediary for
another person in a securities account if the securities intermediary
has expressly agreed with the other person that the property is to be
treated as a financial asset under this Article.
As context requires, the term means either the interest itself or the
means by which a person's claim to it is evidenced, including a
certificated or uncertificated security, a security certificate, or a
security entitlement.
(j) (("Good faith," for purposes of the obligation of good faith in
the performance or enforcement of contracts or duties within this
Article, means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable
commercial standards of fair dealing.)) [Reserved.]
(k) "Indorsement" means a signature that alone or accompanied by
other words is made on a security certificate in registered form or on
a separate document for the purpose of assigning, transferring, or
redeeming the security or granting a power to assign, transfer, or
redeem it.
(l) "Instruction" means a notification communicated to the issuer
of an uncertificated security which directs that the transfer of the
security be registered or that the security be redeemed.
(m) "Registered form," as applied to a certificated security, means
a form in which:
(i) The security certificate specifies a person entitled to the
security; and
(ii) A transfer of the security may be registered upon books
maintained for that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer, or the
security certificate so states.
(n) "Securities intermediary" means:
(i) A clearing corporation; or
(ii) A person, including a bank or broker, that in the ordinary
course of its business maintains securities accounts for others and is
acting in that capacity.
(o) "Security," except as otherwise provided in RCW 62A.8-103,
means an obligation of an issuer or a share, participation, or other
interest in an issuer or in property or an enterprise of an issuer:
(i) Which is represented by a security certificate in bearer or
registered form, or the transfer of which may be registered upon books
maintained for that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer;
(ii) Which is one of a class or series or by its terms is divisible
into a class or series of shares, participations, interests, or
obligations; and
(iii) Which:
(A) Is, or is of a type, dealt in or traded on securities exchanges
or securities markets; or
(B) Is a medium for investment and by its terms expressly provides
that it is a security governed by this Article.
(p) "Security certificate" means a certificate representing a
security.
(q) "Security entitlement" means the rights and property interest
of an entitlement holder with respect to a financial asset specified in
Part 5 of this Article.
(r) "Uncertificated security" means a security that is not
represented by a certificate.
(2) Other definitions applying to this Article and the sections in
which they appear are:

Appropriate person RCW 62A.8-107

Control RCW 62A.8-106

Delivery RCW 62A.8-301

Investment company
security RCW 62A.8-103

Issuer RCW 62A.8-201

Overissue RCW 62A.8-210

Protected purchaser RCW 62A.8-303

Securities account RCW 62A.8-501

(3) In addition Article 1 contains general definitions and
principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
this Article.
(4) The characterization of a person, business, or transaction for
purposes of this Article does not determine the characterization of the
person, business, or transaction for purposes of any other law,
regulation, or rule.

Sec. 39 RCW 62A.9A-102 and 2001 c 32 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
DEFINITIONS AND INDEX OF DEFINITIONS. (((a))) (1) Article 9A
definitions. In this Article:
(((1))) (a) "Accession" means goods that are physically united with
other goods in such a manner that the identity of the original goods is
not lost.
(((2)(A))) (b)(i) "Account," except as used in "account for," means
a right to payment of a monetary obligation, whether or not earned by
performance, (((i))) (A) for property that has been or is to be sold,
leased, licensed, assigned, or otherwise disposed of, (((ii))) (B) for
services rendered or to be rendered, (((iii))) (C) for a policy of
insurance issued or to be issued, (((iv))) (D) for a secondary
obligation incurred or to be incurred, (((v))) (E) for energy provided
or to be provided, (((vi))) (F) for the use or hire of a vessel under
a charter or other contract, (((vii))) (G) arising out of the use of a
credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the
card, or (((viii))) (H) as winnings in a lottery or other game of
chance operated or sponsored by a state, governmental unit of a state,
or person licensed or authorized to operate the game by a state or
governmental unit of a state. The term includes health-care-insurance
receivables.
(((B))) (ii) The term does not include (((i))) (A) rights to
payment evidenced by chattel paper or an instrument, (((ii))) (B)
commercial tort claims, (((iii))) (C) deposit accounts, (((iv))) (D)
investment property, (((v))) (E) letter-of-credit rights or letters of
credit, or (((vi))) (F) rights to payment for money or funds advanced
or sold, other than rights arising out of the use of a credit or charge
card or information contained on or for use with the card.
(((3))) (c) "Account debtor" means a person obligated on an
account, chattel paper, or general intangible. The term does not
include persons obligated to pay a negotiable instrument, even if the
instrument constitutes part of chattel paper.
(((4))) (d) "Accounting," except as used in "accounting for," means
a record:
(((A))) (i) Authenticated by a secured party;
(((B))) (ii) Indicating the aggregate unpaid secured obligations as
of a date not more than thirty-five days earlier or thirty-five days
later than the date of the record; and
(((C))) (iii) Identifying the components of the obligations in
reasonable detail.
(((5))) (e) "Agricultural lien" means an interest, other than a
security interest, in farm products:
(((A))) (i) Which secures payment or performance of an obligation
for:
(((i))) (A) Goods or services furnished in connection with a
debtor's farming operation; or
(((ii))) (B) Rent on real property leased by a debtor in connection
with its farming operation;
(((B))) (ii) Which is created by statute in favor of a person that:
(((i))) (A) In the ordinary course of its business, furnished goods
or services to a debtor in connection with a debtor's farming
operation; or
(((ii))) (B) Leased real property to a debtor in connection with
the debtor's farming operation; and
(((C))) (iii) Whose effectiveness does not depend on the person's
possession of the personal property.
(((6))) (f) "As-extracted collateral" means:
(((A))) (i) Oil, gas, or other minerals that are subject to a
security interest that:
(((i))) (A) Is created by a debtor having an interest in the
minerals before extraction; and
(((ii))) (B) Attaches to the minerals as extracted; or
(((B))) (ii) Accounts arising out of the sale at the wellhead or
minehead of oil, gas, or other minerals in which the debtor had an
interest before extraction.
(((7))) (g) "Authenticate" means:
(((A))) (i) To sign; or
(((B))) (ii) To execute or otherwise adopt a symbol, or encrypt or
similarly process a record in whole or in part, with the present intent
of the authenticating person to identify the person and adopt or accept
a record.
(((8))) (h) "Bank" means an organization that is engaged in the
business of banking. The term includes savings banks, savings and loan
associations, credit unions, and trust companies.
(((9))) (i) "Cash proceeds" means proceeds that are money, checks,
deposit accounts, or the like.
(((10))) (j) "Certificate of title" means a certificate of title
with respect to which a statute provides for the security interest in
question to be indicated on the certificate as a condition or result of
the security interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien
creditor with respect to the collateral.
(((11))) (k) "Chattel paper" means a record or records that
evidence both a monetary obligation and a security interest in specific
goods, a security interest in specific goods and software used in the
goods, a security interest in specific goods and license of software
used in the goods, a lease of specific goods, or a lease of specific
goods and license of software used in the goods. In this subsection,
"monetary obligation" means a monetary obligation secured by the goods
or owed under a lease of the goods and includes a monetary obligation
with respect to software used in the goods. The term "chattel paper"
does not include (((A))) (i) charters or other contracts involving the
use or hire of a vessel or (((B))) (ii) records that evidence a right
to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or
information contained on or for use with the card. If a transaction is
evidenced by records that include an instrument or series of
instruments, the group of records taken together constitutes chattel
paper.
(((12))) (l) "Collateral" means the property subject to a security
interest or agricultural lien. The term includes:
(((A))) (i) Proceeds to which a security interest attaches;
(((B))) (ii) Accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, and
promissory notes that have been sold; and
(((C))) (iii) Goods that are the subject of a consignment.
(((13))) (m) "Commercial tort claim" means a claim arising in tort
with respect to which:
(((A))) (i) The claimant is an organization; or
(((B))) (ii) The claimant is an individual, and the claim:
(((i))) (A) Arose in the course of the claimant's business or
profession; and
(((ii))) (B) Does not include damages arising out of personal
injury to, or the death of, an individual.
(((14))) (n) "Commodity account" means an account maintained by a
commodity intermediary in which a commodity contract is carried for a
commodity customer.
(((15))) (o) "Commodity contract" means a commodity futures
contract, an option on a commodity futures contract, a commodity
option, or another contract if the contract or option is:
(((A))) (i) Traded on or subject to the rules of a board of trade
that has been designated as a contract market for such a contract
pursuant to federal commodities laws; or
(((B))) (ii) Traded on a foreign commodity board of trade,
exchange, or market, and is carried on the books of a commodity
intermediary for a commodity customer.
(((16))) (p) "Commodity customer" means a person for which a
commodity intermediary carries a commodity contract on its books.
(((17))) (q) "Commodity intermediary" means a person that:
(((A))) (i) Is registered as a futures commission merchant under
federal commodities law; or
(((B))) (ii) In the ordinary course of its business, provides
clearance or settlement services for a board of trade that has been
designated as a contract market pursuant to federal commodities law.
(((18))) (r) "Communicate" means:
(((A))) (i) To send a written or other tangible record;
(((B))) (ii) To transmit a record by any means agreed upon by the
persons sending and receiving the record; or
(((C))) (iii) In the case of transmission of a record to or by a
filing office, to transmit a record by any means prescribed by filing-office rule.
(((19))) (s) "Consignee" means a merchant to which goods are
delivered in a consignment.
(((20))) (t) "Consignment" means a transaction, regardless of its
form, in which a person delivers goods to a merchant for the purpose of
sale and:
(((A))) (i) The merchant:
(((i))) (A) Deals in goods of that kind under a name other than the
name of the person making delivery;
(((ii))) (B) Is not an auctioneer; and
(((iii))) (C) Is not generally known by its creditors to be
substantially engaged in selling the goods of others;
(((B))) (ii) With respect to each delivery, the aggregate value of
the goods is one thousand dollars or more at the time of delivery;
(((C))) (iii) The goods are not consumer goods immediately before
delivery; and
(((D))) (iv) The transaction does not create a security interest
that secures an obligation.
(((21))) (u) "Consignor" means a person that delivers goods to a
consignee in a consignment.
(((22))) (v) "Consumer debtor" means a debtor in a consumer
transaction.
(((23))) (w) "Consumer goods" means goods that are used or bought
for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(((24))) (x) "Consumer-goods transaction" means a consumer
transaction in which:
(((A))) (i) An individual incurs a consumer obligation; and
(((B))) (ii) A security interest in consumer goods secures the
obligation.
(((25))) (y) "Consumer obligation" means an obligation which:
(((A))) (i) Is incurred as part of a transaction entered into
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; and
(((B))) (ii) Arises from an extension of credit, or commitment to
extend credit, in an aggregate amount not exceeding forty thousand
dollars, or is secured by personal property used or expected to be used
as a principal dwelling.
"Consumer obligor" means an obligor who is an individual and who
incurred a consumer obligation.
(((26))) (z) "Consumer transaction" means a transaction in which
(((A))) (i) an individual incurs a consumer obligation, (((B))) (ii) a
security interest secures the obligation, and (((C))) (iii) the
collateral is held or acquired primarily for personal, family, or
household purposes. The term includes consumer-goods transactions.
(((27))) (aa) "Continuation statement" means an amendment of a
financing statement which:
(((A))) (i) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing
statement to which it relates; and
(((B))) (ii) Indicates that it is a continuation statement for, or
that it is filed to continue the effectiveness of, the identified
financing statement.
(((28))) (bb) "Debtor" means:
(((A))) (i) A person having an interest, other than a security
interest or other lien, in the collateral, whether or not the person is
an obligor;
(((B))) (ii) A seller of accounts, chattel paper, payment
intangibles, or promissory notes; or
(((C))) (iii) A consignee.
(((29))) (cc) "Deposit account" means a demand, time, savings,
passbook, or similar account maintained with a bank. The term does not
include investment property or accounts evidenced by an instrument.
(((30))) (dd) "Document" means a document of title or a receipt of
the type described in RCW 62A.7-201(2).
(((31))) (ee) "Electronic chattel paper" means chattel paper
evidenced by a record or records consisting of information stored in an
electronic medium.
(((32))) (ff) "Encumbrance" means a right, other than an ownership
interest, in real property. The term includes mortgages and other
liens on real property.
(((33))) (gg) "Equipment" means goods other than inventory, farm
products, or consumer goods.
(((34))) (hh) "Farm products" means goods, other than standing
timber, with respect to which the debtor is engaged in a farming
operation and which are:
(((A))) (i) Crops grown, growing, or to be grown, including:
(((i))) (A) Crops produced on trees, vines, and bushes; and
(((ii))) (B) Aquatic goods produced in aquacultural operations;
(((B))) (ii) Livestock, born or unborn, including aquatic goods
produced in aquacultural operations;
(((C))) (iii) Supplies used or produced in a farming operation; or
(((D))) (iv) Products of crops or livestock in their unmanufactured
states.
(((35))) (ii) "Farming operation" means raising, cultivating,
propagating, fattening, grazing, or any other farming, livestock, or
aquacultural operation.
(((36))) (jj) "File number" means the number assigned to an initial
financing statement pursuant to RCW 62A.9A-519(a).
(((37))) (kk) "Filing office" means an office designated in RCW
62A.9A-501 as the place to file a financing statement.
(((38))) (ll) "Filing-office rule" means a rule adopted pursuant to
RCW 62A.9A-526.
(((39))) (mm) "Financing statement" means a record or records
composed of an initial financing statement and any filed record
relating to the initial financing statement.
(((40))) (nn) "Fixture filing" means the filing of a financing
statement covering goods that are or are to become fixtures and
satisfying RCW 62A.9A-502 (a) and (b). The term includes the filing of
a financing statement covering goods of a transmitting utility which
are or are to become fixtures.
(((41))) (oo) "Fixtures" means goods that have become so related to
particular real property that an interest in them arises under real
property law.
(((42))) (pp) "General intangible" means any personal property,
including things in action, other than accounts, chattel paper,
commercial tort claims, deposit accounts, documents, goods,
instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of
credit, money, and oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction. The
term includes payment intangibles and software.
(((43) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of
reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing.
(44))) (qq) [Reserved.]
(rr) "Goods" means all things that are movable when a security
interest attaches. The term includes (((A))) (i) fixtures, (((B)))
(ii) standing timber that is to be cut and removed under a conveyance
or contract for sale, (((C))) (iii) the unborn young of animals,
(((D))) (iv) crops grown, growing, or to be grown, even if the crops
are produced on trees, vines, or bushes, and (((E))) (v) manufactured
homes. The term also includes a computer program embedded in goods and
any supporting information provided in connection with a transaction
relating to the program if (((i))) (A) the program is associated with
the goods in such a manner that it customarily is considered part of
the goods, or (((ii))) (B) by becoming the owner of the goods, a person
acquires a right to use the program in connection with the goods. The
term does not include a computer program embedded in goods that consist
solely of the medium in which the program is embedded. The term also
does not include accounts, chattel paper, commercial tort claims,
deposit accounts, documents, general intangibles, instruments,
investment property, letter-of-credit rights, letters of credit, money,
or oil, gas, or other minerals before extraction or a manufactured home
converted to real property under chapter 65.20 RCW.
(((45))) (ss) "Governmental unit" means a subdivision, agency,
department, county, parish, municipality, or other unit of the
government of the United States, a state, or a foreign country. The
term includes an organization having a separate corporate existence if
the organization is eligible to issue debt on which interest is exempt
from income taxation under the laws of the United States.
(((46))) (tt) "Health-care-insurance receivable" means an interest
in or claim under a policy of insurance which is a right to payment of
a monetary obligation for health-care goods or services provided.
(((47))) (uu) "Instrument" means a negotiable instrument or any
other writing that evidences a right to the payment of a monetary
obligation, is not itself a security agreement or lease, and is of a
type that in ordinary course of business is transferred by delivery
with any necessary indorsement or assignment. The term does not
include (((A))) (i) investment property, (((B))) (ii) letters of
credit, (((C))) (iii) writings that evidence a right to payment arising
out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on
or for use with the card, (((D))) (iv) writings that do not contain a
promise or order to pay, or (((E))) (v) writings that are expressly
nontransferable or nonassignable.
(((48))) (vv) "Inventory" means goods, other than farm products,
which:
(((A))) (i) Are leased by a person as lessor;
(((B))) (ii) Are held by a person for sale or lease or to be
furnished under a contract of service;
(((C))) (iii) Are furnished by a person under a contract of
service; or
(((D))) (iv) Consist of raw materials, work in process, or
materials used or consumed in a business.
(((49))) (ww) "Investment property" means a security, whether
certificated or uncertificated, security entitlement, securities
account, commodity contract, or commodity account.
(((50))) (xx) "Jurisdiction of organization," with respect to a
registered organization, means the jurisdiction under whose law the
organization is organized.
(((51))) (yy) "Letter-of-credit right" means a right to payment or
performance under a letter of credit, whether or not the beneficiary
has demanded or is at the time entitled to demand payment or
performance. The term does not include the right of a beneficiary to
demand payment or performance under a letter of credit.
(((52))) (zz) "Lien creditor" means:
(((A))) (i) A creditor that has acquired a lien on the property
involved by attachment, levy, or the like;
(((B))) (ii) An assignee for benefit of creditors from the time of
assignment;
(((C))) (iii) A trustee in bankruptcy from the date of the filing
of the petition; or
(((D))) (iv) A receiver in equity from the time of appointment.
(((53))) (aaa) "Manufactured home" means a manufactured home or
mobile home as defined in RCW 46.04.302.
(((54))) (bbb) [Reserved.]
(((55))) (ccc) "Mortgage" means a consensual interest in real
property, including fixtures, which secures payment or performance of
an obligation.
(((56))) (ddd) "New debtor" means a person that becomes bound as
debtor under RCW 62A.9A-203(d) by a security agreement previously
entered into by another person.
(((57))) (eee) "New value" means (((A))) (i) money, (((B))) (ii)
money's worth in property, services, or new credit, or (((C))) (iii)
release by a transferee of an interest in property previously
transferred to the transferee. The term does not include an obligation
substituted for another obligation.
(((58))) (fff) "Noncash proceeds" means proceeds other than cash
proceeds.
(((59))) (ggg) "Obligor" means a person that, with respect to an
obligation secured by a security interest in or an agricultural lien on
the collateral, (((A))) (i) owes payment or other performance of the
obligation, (((B))) (ii) has provided property other than the
collateral to secure payment or other performance of the obligation, or
(((C))) (iii) is otherwise accountable in whole or in part for payment
or other performance of the obligation. The term does not include
issuers or nominated persons under a letter of credit.
(((60))) (hhh) "Original debtor,"((,)) except as used in RCW
62A.9A-310(((c))), means a person that, as debtor, entered into a
security agreement to which a new debtor has become bound under RCW
62A.9A-203(d).
(((61))) (iii) "Payment intangible" means a general intangible
under which the account debtor's principal obligation is a monetary
obligation.
(((62))) (jjj) "Person related to," with respect to an individual,
means:
(((A))) (i) The spouse of the individual;
(((B))) (ii) A brother, brother-in-law, sister, or sister-in-law of
the individual;
(((C))) (iii) An ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or
the individual's spouse; or
(((D))) (iv) Any other relative, by blood or marriage, of the
individual or the individual's spouse who shares the same home with the
individual.
(((63))) (kkk) "Person related to," with respect to an
organization, means:
(((A))) (i) A person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled
by, or under common control with the organization;
(((B))) (ii) An officer or director of, or a person performing
similar functions with respect to, the organization;
(((C))) (iii) An officer or director of, or a person performing
similar functions with respect to, a person described in (((63)(A)))
(kkk)(i) of this subsection;
(((D))) (iv) The spouse of an individual described in (((63)(A)))
(kkk)(i), (((B))) (ii), or (((C))) (iii) of this subsection; or
(((E))) (v) An individual who is related by blood or marriage to an
individual described in(((63)(A))) (kkk)(i), (((B))) (ii), (((C)))
(iii), or (((D))) (iv) of this subsection and shares the same home with
the individual.
(((64))) (lll) "Proceeds(("))," except as used in RCW
62A.9A-609(((b))), means the following property:
(((A))) (i) Whatever is acquired upon the sale, lease, license,
exchange, or other disposition of collateral;
(((B))) (ii) Whatever is collected on, or distributed on account
of, collateral;
(((C))) (iii) Rights arising out of collateral;
(((D))) (iv) To the extent of the value of collateral, claims
arising out of the loss, nonconformity, or interference with the use
of, defects or infringement of rights in, or damage to, the collateral;
or
(((E))) (v) To the extent of the value of collateral and to the
extent payable to the debtor or the secured party, insurance payable by
reason of the loss or nonconformity of, defects or infringement of
rights in, or damage to, the collateral.
(((65))) (mmm) "Promissory note" means an instrument that evidences
a promise to pay a monetary obligation, does not evidence an order to
pay, and does not contain an acknowledgment by a bank that the bank has
received for deposit a sum of money or funds.
(((66))) (nnn) "Proposal" means a record authenticated by a secured
party, which includes the terms on which the secured party is willing
to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation
it secures pursuant to RCW 62A.9A-620, 62A.9A-621, and 62A.9A-622.
(((67))) (ooo) "Public-finance transaction" means a secured
transaction in connection with which:
(((A))) (i) Debt securities are issued;
(((B))) (ii) All or a portion of the securities issued have an
initial stated maturity of at least twenty years; and
(((C))) (iii) The debtor, obligor, secured party, account debtor or
other person obligated on collateral, assignor or assignee of a secured
obligation, or assignor or assignee of a security interest is a state
or a governmental unit of a state.
(((68))) (ppp) "Pursuant to commitment," with respect to an advance
made or other value given by a secured party, means pursuant to the
secured party's obligation, whether or not a subsequent event of
default or other event not within the secured party's control has
relieved or may relieve the secured party from its obligation.
(((69))) (qqq) "Record," except as used in "for record," "of
record," "record or legal title," and "record owner," means information
that is inscribed on a tangible medium or which is stored in an
electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(((70))) (rrr) "Registered organization" means an organization
organized solely under the law of a single state or the United States
and as to which the state or the United States must maintain a public
record showing the organization to have been organized.
(((71))) (sss) "Secondary obligor" means an obligor to the extent
that:
(((A))) (i) The obligor's obligation is secondary; or
(((B))) (ii) The obligor has a right of recourse with respect to an
obligation secured by collateral against the debtor, another obligor,
or property of either.
(((72))) (ttt) "Secured party" means:
(((A))) (i) A person in whose favor a security interest is created
or provided for under a security agreement, whether or not any
obligation to be secured is outstanding;
(((B))) (ii) A person that holds an agricultural lien;
(((C))) (iii) A consignor;
(((D))) (((iv))) A person to which accounts, chattel paper, payment
intangibles, or promissory notes have been sold;
(((E))) (v) A trustee, indenture trustee, agent, collateral agent,
or other representative in whose favor a security interest or
agricultural lien is created or provided for; or
(((F))) (vi) A person that holds a security interest arising under
RCW 62A.2-401, 62A.2-505, 62A.2-711(3), 62A.2A-508(5), 62A.4-210, or
62A.5-118.
(((73))) (uuu) "Security agreement" means an agreement that creates
or provides for a security interest.
(((74))) (vvv) "Send," in connection with a record or notification,
means:
(((A))) (i) To deposit in the mail, deliver for transmission, or
transmit by any other usual means of communication, with postage or
cost of transmission provided for, addressed to any address reasonable
under the circumstances; or
(((B))) (ii) To cause the record or notification to be received
within the time that it would have been received if properly sent under
(((A))) (vvv)(i) of this subsection.
(((75))) (www) "Software" means a computer program and any
supporting information provided in connection with a transaction
relating to the program. The term does not include a computer program
that is included in the definition of goods.
(((76))) (xxx) "State" means a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or
any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States.
(((77))) (yyy) "Supporting obligation" means a letter-of-credit
right or secondary obligation that supports the payment or performance
of an account, chattel paper, a document, a general intangible, an
instrument, or investment property.
(((78))) (zzz) "Tangible chattel paper" means chattel paper
evidenced by a record or records consisting of information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium.
(((79))) (aaaa) "Termination statement" means an amendment of a
financing statement which:
(((A))) (i) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing
statement to which it relates; and
(((B))) (ii) Indicates either that it is a termination statement or
that the identified financing statement is no longer effective.
(((80))) (bbbb) "Transmitting utility" means a person primarily
engaged in the business of:
(((A))) (i) Operating a railroad, subway, street railway, or
trolley bus;
(((B))) (ii) Transmitting communications electrically,
electromagnetically, or by light;
(((C))) (iii) Transmitting goods by pipeline or sewer; or
(((D))) (iv) Transmitting or producing and transmitting
electricity, steam, gas, or water.
(((b))) (2) Definitions in other Articles. The following
definitions in other Articles apply to this Article:

"Applicant." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Beneficiary." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Broker." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Certificated security." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Check." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Clearing corporation." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Contract for sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Customer." RCW 62A.4-104.

"Entitlement holder." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Financial asset." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Holder in due course." RCW 62A.3-302.

"Issuer" with respect to a
letter of credit or letter-of-credit right. RCW 62A.5-102.

"Issuer" with respect to a
security. RCW 62A.8-201.

"Lease." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lease agreement." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lease contract." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Leasehold interest." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessee." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessee in ordinary course
of business." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessor." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Lessor's residual interest." RCW 62A.2A-103.

"Letter of credit." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Merchant." RCW 62A.2-104.

"Negotiable instrument." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Nominated person." RCW 62A.5-102.

"Note." RCW 62A.3-104.

"Proceeds of a letter of
credit." RCW 62A.5-114.

"Prove." RCW 62A.3-103.

"Sale." RCW 62A.2-106.

"Securities account." RCW 62A.8-501.

"Securities intermediary." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Security." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Security certificate." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Security entitlement." RCW 62A.8-102.

"Uncertificated security." RCW 62A.8-102.

(((c))) (3) Article 1 definitions and principles. Article 1
contains general definitions and principles of construction and
interpretation applicable throughout this Article.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 62A.1-107 (Waiver or renunciation of claim or right after
breach) and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-107;
(2) RCW 62A.1-109 (Section captions) and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-109;
(3) RCW 62A.1-207 (Performance or acceptance under reservation of
rights) and 1993 c 229 s 2 & 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 1-207;
(4) RCW 62A.1-208 (Option to accelerate at will) and 1965 ex.s. c
157 s 1-208;
(5) RCW 62A.2-208 (Course of performance or practical construction)
and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 2-208; and
(6) RCW 62A.2A-207 (Course of performance or practical
construction) and 1993 c 230 s 2A-207.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 Sections 14 through 23 of this act shall be
placed in chapter 62A.1 RCW under the heading:

PART 3
TERRITORIAL APPLICABILITY AND GENERAL RULES

--- END ---