BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.380 and 2006 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The procedures governing adjudicative proceedings before
agencies under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act,
govern hearings before the commission and govern all other actions
before the commission unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The
standard of proof in actions before the commission is clear, cogent,
and convincing evidence.
(2) In all hearings requested under RCW 43.101.155, a five-member
hearings panel shall both hear the case and make the commission's final
administrative decision. Members of the commission or the board on law
enforcement training standards and education may, but need not be,
appointed to the hearings panels. The commission shall appoint as
follows two or more panels to hear appeals from ((decertification))
certification actions:
(a) When a hearing is requested in relation to ((decertification))
a certification action of a Washington peace officer who is not a peace
officer of the Washington state patrol, the commission shall appoint to
the panel: (i) One police chief; (ii) one sheriff; (iii) two certified
Washington peace officers who are at or below the level of first line
supervisor, ((who are)) one of whom is from a city or county law
enforcement ((agencies)) agency, and who have at least ten years'
experience as peace officers; and (iv) one person who is not currently
a peace officer and who represents a community college or four-year
college or university.
(b) When a hearing is requested in relation to ((decertification))
a certification action of a peace officer of the Washington state
patrol, the commission shall appoint to the panel: (i) Either one
police chief or one sheriff; (ii) one administrator of the state
patrol; (iii) one certified Washington peace officer who is at or below
the level of first line supervisor, who is ((from a city or county law
enforcement agency)) not a state patrol officer, and who has at least
ten years' experience as a peace officer; (iv) one state patrol officer
who is at or below the level of first line supervisor, and who has at
least ten years' experience as a peace officer; and (v) one person who
is not currently a peace officer and who represents a community college
or four-year college or university.
(c) When a hearing is requested in relation to ((decertification))
a certification action of a tribal police officer, the commission shall
appoint to the panel (i) either one police chief or one sheriff; (ii)
one tribal police chief; (iii) one certified Washington peace officer
who is at or below the level of first line supervisor, ((who is from a
city or county law enforcement agency,)) and who has at least ten
years' experience as a peace officer; (iv) one tribal police officer
who is at or below the level of first line supervisor, and who has at
least ten years' experience as a peace officer; and (v) one person who
is not currently a peace officer and who represents a community college
or four-year college or university.
(d) Persons appointed to hearings panels by the commission shall,
in relation to any ((decertification matter)) certification action on
which they sit, have the powers, duties, and immunities, and are
entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular commission members.
(3) Where the charge upon which revocation or denial is based is
that a peace officer was "discharged for disqualifying misconduct," and
the discharge is "final," within the meaning of RCW 43.101.105(1)(d),
and the officer received a civil service hearing or arbitration hearing
culminating in an affirming decision following separation from service
by the employer, the hearings panel may revoke or deny certification if
the hearings panel determines that the discharge occurred and was based
on disqualifying misconduct; the hearings panel need not redetermine
the underlying facts but may make this determination based solely on
review of the records and decision relating to the employment
separation proceeding. However, the hearings panel may, in its
discretion, consider additional evidence to determine whether such a
discharge occurred and was based on such disqualifying misconduct. The
hearings panel shall, upon written request by the subject peace
officer, allow the peace officer to present additional evidence of
extenuating circumstances.
Where the charge upon which revocation or denial of certification
is based is that a peace officer "has been convicted at any time of a
felony offense" within the meaning of RCW 43.101.105(1)(c), the
hearings panel shall revoke or deny certification if it determines that
the peace officer was convicted of a felony. The hearings panel need
not redetermine the underlying facts but may make this determination
based solely on review of the records and decision relating to the
criminal proceeding. However, the hearings panel shall, upon the
panel's determination of relevancy, consider additional evidence to
determine whether the peace officer was convicted of a felony.
Where the charge upon which revocation or denial is based is under
RCW 43.101.105(1) (a), (b), (e), or (f), the hearings panel shall
determine the underlying facts relating to the charge upon which
revocation or denial of certification is based.
(4) The commission's final administrative decision is subject to
judicial review under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

--- END ---