BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.101.095 and 2008 c 74 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As a condition of continuing employment as peace officers, all
Washington peace officers: (a) Shall timely obtain certification as
peace officers, or timely obtain certification or exemption therefrom,
by meeting all requirements of RCW 43.101.200, as that section is
administered under the rules of the commission, as well by meeting any
additional requirements under this chapter; and (b) shall maintain the
basic certification as peace officers under this chapter.
(2)(a) As a condition of continuing employment for any applicant
that has been offered a conditional offer of employment as a fully
commissioned peace officer or a reserve officer after July 24, 2005,
including any person whose certification has lapsed as a result of a
break of more than twenty-four consecutive months in the officer's
service as a fully commissioned peace officer or reserve officer, the
applicant shall successfully pass a psychological examination and a
polygraph or similar test as administered by the county, city, or state
law enforcement agency that complies with the following requirements:
(i) The psychological examination shall be administered by a
psychiatrist licensed in the state of Washington pursuant to chapter
18.71 RCW or a psychologist licensed in the state of Washington
pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW((. The examination shall consist of, at
a minimum, a standardized clinical test that is widely used as an
objective clinical screening tool for personality and psychosocial
disorders. The test that is used and the conditions under which the
test is administered, scored, and interpreted must comply with accepted
psychological)) in compliance with standards established in rules of
the commission. ((Additional tests may be administered at the option
of the employing law enforcement agency.))
(ii) The polygraph examination or similar assessment shall be
administered by an experienced polygrapher who is a graduate of a
polygraph school accredited by the American polygraph association.
(b) The employing county, city, or state law enforcement agency may
require that each peace officer or reserve officer who is required to
take a psychological examination and a polygraph or similar test pay a
portion of the testing fee based on the actual cost of the test or four
hundred dollars, whichever is less. County, city, and state law
enforcement agencies may establish a payment plan if they determine
that the peace officer or reserve officer does not readily have the
means to pay for his or her portion of the testing fee.
(3) The commission shall certify peace officers who have satisfied,
or have been exempted by statute or by rule from, the basic training
requirements of RCW 43.101.200 on or before January 1, 2002.
Thereafter, the commission may revoke certification pursuant to this
chapter.
(4) The commission shall allow a peace officer to retain status as
a certified peace officer as long as the officer: (a) Timely meets the
basic law enforcement training requirements, or is exempted therefrom,
in whole or in part, under RCW 43.101.200 or under rule of the
commission; (b) meets or is exempted from any other requirements under
this chapter as administered under the rules adopted by the commission;
(c) is not denied certification by the commission under this chapter;
and (d) has not had certification revoked by the commission.
(5) As a prerequisite to certification, as well as a prerequisite
to pursuit of a hearing under RCW 43.101.155, a peace officer must, on
a form devised or adopted by the commission, authorize the release to
the commission of his or her personnel files, termination papers,
criminal investigation files, or other files, papers, or information
that are directly related to a certification matter or decertification
matter before the commission.
(6) The commission is authorized to receive criminal history record
information that includes nonconviction data for any purpose associated
with employment by the commission or peace officer certification under
this chapter. Dissemination or use of nonconviction data for purposes
other than that authorized in this section is prohibited.
(7) For a national criminal history records check, the commission
shall require fingerprints be submitted and searched through the
Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section.
The Washington state patrol shall forward the fingerprints to the
federal bureau of investigation.

--- END ---