BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the production of
wine grapes and hops in the state are important segments of Washington
agriculture as evidenced by the continued investments made by the state
and local governments in developing the wine and beer industries,
including the creation of viticulture and enology programs at
Washington State University. The legislature further finds that the
promotion and sale of Washington wine and beer at the legislative gift
center is harmonious with the purpose of the gift center, which is to
promote the state and the goods produced around the state. Therefore,
the legislature intends to allow the legislative gift center to sell
wine and beer produced in Washington to visitors of legal drinking age.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this title shall apply to or prevent the legislative
gift center created in chapter 44.73 RCW from selling at retail for
off-premises consumption wine and beer produced in Washington by a
licensed domestic winery or brewery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislative gift center is authorized to
sell at retail for off-premises consumption wine and beer produced in
Washington by a licensed domestic winery or brewery. Wine and beer
sold by the legislative gift center must: (1) Be sold to individuals
twenty-one years of age or older; (2) be sold for personal use and not
for resale; and (3) have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine
distributor or from a manufacturer authorized to distribute wine or
beer of its own production.
The legislative gift center must collect and remit to the
department of revenue all applicable state and local taxes on sales of
wine and beer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 44.73 RCW.

--- END ---