BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
growing population and economy will put a strain on energy supplies and
threaten the ability of the state to meet its climate policy goals
unless specific steps are taken to reduce demand and utilize energy
more efficiently. Water heating for domestic and industrial use relies
almost entirely on electricity and natural gas and accounts for a
significant percentage of the state's electrical and natural gas
consumption. Solar water heating systems represent one of the largest
untapped electricity and natural gas conservation potential remaining
in Washington. The legislature finds that solar water heaters can
provide half or more of the hot water needs in the average home, and
reduce electric or natural gas consumption with free renewable energy
from the sun.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to facilitate the
installation of solar water heating systems in homes and businesses by
providing: (a) A rebate to customers who install solar water heating
systems; and (b) a tax credit to the light and power business based on
the amount of solar water heating systems installed by their customers.
The rebate and tax credit will support energy conservation, save
thousands of dollars in home heating costs, and preserve the
environment. The legislature finds that the rebate and tax credit has
broad application for the installation of solar water heating systems
in urban, rural, business, and residential locations, as well as in any
climate throughout the state.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a business
for installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving solar hot
water heating systems that qualify for rebates under section 6 of this
act, eligible net metering systems under chapter 80.60 RCW, or
renewable energy systems eligible to receive investment cost recovery
incentives under RCW 82.16.110.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for renewable energy manufacturing expenditures.
(2) The amount of the credit provided in subsection (1) of this
section may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
tax reporting period.
(3) The total amount of credits taken under this section in any
year by a person may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.
(4) A person may sell or otherwise transfer the economic value of
any credit provided in this section for a renewable energy
manufacturing expenditure. The buyer is entitled to take a credit
equal to seventy percent of the remaining credit that would have
otherwise been allowed under this section.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Renewable energy manufacturing expenditures" means
expenditures for:
(i) Land that includes a renewable energy manufacturing facility;
(ii) Machinery and equipment used in or integral to a renewable
energy manufacturing facility; and
(iii) Tangible personal property and labor and services used in the
construction, expansion, or reconstruction of a renewable energy
manufacturing facility.
(b) "Renewable energy manufacturing facility" means a facility used
solely for manufacturing solar, wind, geothermal, or bioenergy
equipment.
(6) A person taking the credit under this section must report as
required under RCW 82.32.535.
(7) Credits may be carried forward until used; however, no credit
may be earned under this section on or after July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
reconstructing, or expanding of a renewable energy manufacturing
facility, to sales of tangible personal property that will be
incorporated as an ingredient or component of such facility during the
course of the constructing, reconstructing, or expanding, or to labor
and services rendered in respect to installing, during the course of
constructing, reconstructing, or expanding, building fixtures not
otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b). The
exemption is available only when the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
taking the exemption under this section must report as required under
RCW 82.32.535.
(3) "Renewable energy manufacturing facility" has the same meaning
as provided in section 3 of this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
reconstructing, or expanding of a renewable energy manufacturing
facility, to tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of such facility during the course of the
constructing, reconstructing, or expanding, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing,
reconstructing, or expanding, building fixtures not otherwise eligible
for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report as
required under RCW 82.32.535.
(3) "Renewable energy manufacturing facility" has the same meaning
as provided in section 3 of this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, a light and power business or gas
company may provide a rebate to its retail customers for the costs
incurred by such customers in installing solar water heating systems in
their home or business. The amount of the rebate must not be more
than:
(a) Fifty percent of the total costs incurred by the customer for
solar water heating systems manufactured outside of Washington; and
(b) Seventy-five percent of the total costs incurred by the
customer for solar water heating systems manufactured in Washington.
(2) In determining the amount of the rebate, a light and power
business or gas company must determine a tiered amount based on the
efficiency of the solar water heating system.
(3)(a) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for rebates for more than four thousand dollars per
calendar year.
(b) For solar water heating systems manufactured in Washington, no
individual, household, business, or local governmental entity is
eligible for rebates for more than five thousand dollars per calendar
year.
(4) In no event may the total amount of such rebates for each light
and power business or gas company, during any calendar year, exceed the
amount of the tax credit provided under section 7 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this act, a solar water heating system
must, at a minimum, have a solar rating and certification corporation
(SRCC) certification as of July 1, 2009.
(6) This section expires December 31, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each light and power business or gas company must be allowed a
credit against taxes due under this chapter in an amount up to fifty
percent of rebates made in any calendar year under section 6 of this
act.
(2) The credit must be taken in a form and manner as required by
the department.
(3) The credit under this section for the calendar year may not
exceed twenty-five one-hundredths of one percent of the businesses'
taxable power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or fifty thousand
dollars, whichever is greater.
(4) The credit may not exceed the tax that would otherwise be due
under this chapter.
(5) Refunds may not be granted in the place of credits.
(6) Expenditures not used to earn a credit in one calendar fiscal
year may not be used to earn a credit in subsequent years, except that
this limitation does not apply to expenditures made between January 1,
2009, and July 1, 2009, which expenditures may be used to earn a credit
through December 31, 2009.
(7) The total amount of credits that may be used in any calendar
year may not exceed one million dollars in any calendar year. If
requests for the credit in section 6 of this act exceed the total
amount of credits available, the credits must be reduced
proportionally.
(8) This section expires December 31, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Property equipped with solar energy systems for the purpose of
heating, cooling, or generating electrical energy is exempt from ad
valorem taxation in an amount that equals any positive amount obtained
by subtracting the real market value of the property, as if it were not
equipped with such systems, from the real market value of the property
so equipped.
(2) This section applies to tax years beginning prior to July 1,
2020.
(3) This section does not apply to property used by a light and
power business for the generation of electricity.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.16.110 and 2005 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system owned by local individuals, households,
nonprofit organizations, or nonutility businesses that is placed on the
property owned by a cooperating local governmental entity; or
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is voluntarily funded
by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for their financial
support, the utility gives contributors a payment or credit on their
utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the project.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(ii) "Utility" means a light and power business.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means the alternating current
electricity that is generated from a renewable energy system located on
an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that
is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
Except for community solar projects, a system located on a leasehold
interest does not qualify under this definition. "Customer-generated
electricity" does not include electricity generated by a light and
power business with greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual
sales or a gas distribution business.
(((2))) (3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual
kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied
by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((3))) (4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(((4))) (6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((5))) (7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((6))) (8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((7))) (9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells
and providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((8) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business.))

Sec. 10 RCW 82.16.120 and 2007 c 111 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system ((installed on its property that is
not interconnected to the electric distribution system)). No incentive
may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after
June 30, ((2014)) 2024.
(2) ((When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)))(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for
the incentive allowed under subsection (4) of this section, the
applicant shall submit to the department of revenue and to the climate
and rural energy development center at the Washington State University,
established under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner
prescribed by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the
following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(((4))) (3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the
incentive shall be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(((5))) (4) Except for community solar projects, the investment
cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen cents per economic
development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized
for credit to the participating light and power business. For
community solar projects, the investment cost recovery incentive may be
paid thirty cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless
requests exceed the amount authorized for credit to the participating
light and power business. For the purposes of this section, the rate
paid for the investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by
the following factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(((6))) (5) No individual, household, business, or local
governmental entity is eligible for incentives provided under
subsection (4) of this section for more than ((two)) five thousand
dollars per year. Each applicant in a community solar project is
eligible for up to five thousand dollars per year.
(6) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifty-four
cents per kilowatt-hour generated by a commercial or industrial
customer consuming at least one-half of the electricity generated in
its commercial or industrial activities at the site of the generation.
No incentive provided under this subsection may exceed twenty thousand
dollars per utility revenue meter per year. A person claiming an
incentive payment under this subsection is not eligible for the
incentive provided under subsection (5) of this section for the same
calendar year.
(7) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(8) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(9) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.16.130 and 2005 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A light and power business shall be allowed a credit against
taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to investment cost
recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal year under RCW
82.16.120. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as required
by the department. The credit under this section for the fiscal year
shall not exceed ((twenty-five one-hundredths of)) one percent of the
businesses' taxable power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or
((twenty-five)) one-hundred thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
Incentive payments to participants in a utility-owned community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(1)(a)(ii) may only account for up
to twenty-five percent of the total allowable credit. The credit may
not exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.
Refunds shall not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not
used to earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a
credit in subsequent years.
(2) For any business that has claimed credit for amounts that
exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under RCW 82.16.120,
the amount of tax against which credit was claimed for the excess
payments shall be immediately due and payable. The department shall
assess interest but not penalties on the taxes against which the credit
was claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, ((2015)) 2024. Credits may not be claimed after June 30, ((2016))
2025.

Sec. 12 RCW 82.08.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity using
fuel cells, ((wind,)) biomass resources, sun, solar thermal electric
technology, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, black liquors
derived from algae and other sources, anaerobic digestion, technology
that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust heat, or landfill gas
as the principal source of power, or to sales of or charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment, but only if the purchaser develops with such machinery,
equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not less than two
hundred watts of electricity and provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:
(a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas
as the principal source of power;
(c) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity with fuel cells or by wind energy, solar energy, or
landfill gas power if it provides any part of the process that captures
the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas, converts that energy to
electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems;
(e) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not less than two
hundred watts of electricity using fuel cells, ((wind,)) biomass
resources, sun, solar thermal electric technology, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, black liquors derived from algae and
other sources, anaerobic digestion, technology that converts otherwise
lost energy from exhaust heat, or landfill gas as the principal source
of power, or to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.16.055 and 1980 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax under this chapter there shall be deducted
from the gross income:
(a) An amount equal to the cost of production at the plant for
consumption within the state of Washington of:
(i) Electrical energy produced or generated from cogeneration ((as
defined in RCW 82.35.020)); and
(ii) Electrical energy or gas produced or generated from renewable
energy resources such as solar energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal
resources, black liquors derived from algae and other sources,
anaerobic digestion, wind energy, hydroelectric energy, geothermal
energy, wood, wood wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural products and
wastes, and end-use waste heat; and
(b) Those amounts expended to improve consumers' efficiency of
energy end use or to otherwise reduce the use of electrical energy or
gas by the consumer.
(2)(a) Unless provided otherwise in (b) of this subsection, this
section applies only to new facilities for the production or generation
of energy from cogeneration or renewable energy resources or measures
to improve the efficiency of energy end use on which construction or
installation is begun after June 12, 1980, and before January 1, 1990.
Deductions under subsection (1)(a) of this section for new facilities
under this subsection (2)(a) are allowed for a period not to exceed
thirty years after the project is placed in operation.
(b) This section applies to new facilities for the production and
generation of energy from tidal and wave energy, black liquors derived
from algae and other sources, anaerobic digestion, and from geothermal
resources, on which construction or installation is begun after January
1, 2009, and before January 1, 2019. Deductions under subsection
(1)(a) of this section for new facilities under this subsection (2)(b)
are allowed for a period not to exceed ten years after the project is
placed in operation.
(3) ((Deductions under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be
allowed for a period not to exceed thirty years after the project is
placed in operation.
(4) Measures or projects encouraged under this section shall at the
time they are placed in service be reasonably expected to save,
produce, or generate energy at a total incremental system cost per unit
of energy delivered to end use which is less than or equal to the
incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use from
similarly available conventional energy resources which utilize nuclear
energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric utility could
acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.
(5))) The department ((of revenue)), after consultation with the
utilities and transportation commission ((in the case of investor-owned
utilities)) and the governing bodies of locally regulated utilities,
shall determine the eligibility of individual projects and measures for
deductions under this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 82.04.294 and 2007 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(2)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems, manufactured by that
person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the solar grade
silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the
solar grade silicon to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(3) Beginning October 1, 2009, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar
cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers
are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.965,
82.08.9651, 82.12.965, and 82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((b))) (c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light
directly into electricity without moving parts.
(((c))) (d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell
manufactured from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(((d))) (g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(((4))) (h) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating
substrate on which various semiconducting materials are deposited to
produce a photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.08.965 and 2003 c 149 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
constructing of new buildings used for the manufacturing of
semiconductor materials, to sales of tangible personal property that
will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings
during the course of the constructing, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing,
building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the manufacturer or processor
for hire must meet the following requirements for an eight-year period,
such period beginning the day the new building commences commercial
production, or a portion of tax otherwise due shall be immediately due
and payable pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The manufacturer or processor for hire must maintain at least
seventy-five percent of full employment at the new building for which
the exemption under this section is claimed.
(b) Before commencing commercial production at a new facility the
manufacturer or processor for hire must meet with the department to
review projected employment levels in the new buildings. The
department, using information provided by the taxpayer, shall make a
determination of the number of positions that would be filled at full
employment. This number shall be used throughout the eight-year period
to determine whether any tax is to be repaid. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the manufacturer or processor for hire shall maintain
seventy-five percent of full employment at the manufacturing site
overall.
(d) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
taking the exemption under this section must report as required under
RCW 82.32.535.
(3) If the employment requirement is not met for any one calendar
year, one-eighth of the exempt sales and use taxes shall be due and
payable by April 1st of the following year. The department shall
assess interest to the date the tax was imposed, but not penalties, on
the taxes for which the person is not eligible.
(4) The exemption applies to new buildings, or parts of buildings,
that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of semiconductor
materials, including the storage of raw materials and finished product.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the new
building are completed and production for sale has begun; and
(b) "Full employment" is the number of positions required for full
capacity production at the new building, for positions such as line
workers, engineers, and technicians.
(c) "Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.240(2) and 82.04.294(3).
(6) No exemption may be taken after twelve years after the
effective date of this act, however all of the eligibility criteria and
limitations are applicable to any exemptions claimed before that date.
(7) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 17 RCW 82.08.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the
production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to
gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product,
deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch
or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse
the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the
gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during
the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the
chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place.
For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the
meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under RCW 82.32.5351. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after December 1, 2006.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.12.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under RCW 82.32.5351. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after December 1, 2006.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.32.535 and 2003 c 149 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.240(2) or who
claims an exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.426, 82.08.965,
82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, sections 3 through 5 of this act,
82.04.448, or 84.36.645, shall make an annual report to the department
detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health and
retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing site. The report
shall not include names of employees. The report shall also detail
employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary
positions. The first report filed under this subsection shall include
employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month period
immediately before first use of a preferential tax rate under RCW
82.04.240(2), or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.426,
82.08.965, 82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, sections 3 through 5 of
this act, 82.04.448, or 84.36.645. The report is due by March 31st
following any year in which a preferential tax rate under RCW
82.04.240(2) is used, or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.04.426,
82.08.965, 82.12.965, 82.08.970, 82.12.970, sections 3 through 5 of
this act, 82.04.448, or 84.36.645 is taken. This information is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection the department shall declare the amount of taxes exempted or
credited for that year to be immediately due and payable. Excise taxes
payable under this subsection are subject to interest, as provided
under this chapter. This information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(3) By November 1st of the year occurring five years after the
effective date of this act, and November 1st of the year occurring
eleven years after the effective date of this act, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of chapter 149, Laws of 2003 in regard to keeping
Washington competitive. The report shall measure the effect of chapter
149, Laws of 2003 on job retention, net jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, diversification of the state's economy,
cluster dynamics, and other factors as the committees select. The
reports shall include a discussion of principles to apply in evaluating
whether the legislature should reenact any or all of the tax
preferences in chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.32.600 and 2008 c 81 s 14 and 2008 c 15 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.535, 82.32.5351, 82.32.545, 82.32.610, 82.32.630,
82.82.020, or 82.74.040 must electronically file with the department
all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms or information the
department requires in an electronic format as provided or approved by
the department. As used in this section, "returns" has the same
meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualifying utility is entitled to a rebate of tax paid under
RCW 82.08.020 by it or any other person on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using wind as the principal source
of power, and sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered
in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if such
machinery and equipment is part of a facility capable of generating at
least two hundred watts of electricity and such facility is owned or
operated by the qualifying utility at the time the rebate is claimed
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A qualifying utility may claim one-quarter of the rebate in the
calendar year in which the facility becomes operational and one-quarter
of the rebate in each successive calendar year. A qualifying utility
may claim the rebate by taking a credit against the tax levied under
RCW 82.16.020 or by filing a refund request with the department. The
rebate amount will not include interest.
(3)(a) "Qualifying utility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.285.030.
(b) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualifying utility is entitled to a rebate of tax paid under
this chapter by it or any other person on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using wind as the principal source
of power, and sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered
in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if such
machinery and equipment is part of a facility capable of generating at
least two hundred watts of electricity and such facility is owned or
operated by the qualifying utility at the time the rebate is claimed
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A qualifying utility may claim one-quarter of the rebate in the
calendar year in which the facility becomes operational and one-quarter
of the rebate in each successive calendar year. A qualifying utility
may claim the rebate by taking a credit against the tax levied under
RCW 82.16.020 or by filing a refund request with the department. The
rebate amount will not include interest.
(3) "Qualifying utility" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.285.030. The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

Sec. 23 2006 c 300 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) ((This act and)) Sections 16 and 19, chapter . . ., Laws of
2009 (sections 16 and 19 of this act), section 7, chapter 300, Laws of
2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the
siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor
microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) ((This act)) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first
day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a
significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined
by the director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide notice of
the effective date of this act to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the
department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not
take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the
department ((shall)) must make a determination that ((this act))
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that
would have been otherwise due ((shall be)) are deemed deferred taxes
and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax
under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under section
2 or 5 through 10 ((of this act)), chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 12 and 13 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect June 30, 2009.

--- END ---