BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.20A.320 and 1997 c 58 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may serve upon a responsible parent a notice
informing the responsible parent of the department's intent to submit
the parent's name to the department of licensing and any appropriate
licensing entity as a licensee who is not in compliance with a child
support order. The department shall attach a copy of the responsible
parent's child support order to the notice. Service of the notice must
be by certified mail, return receipt requested. If service by
certified mail is not successful, service shall be by personal service.
(2) The notice of noncompliance must include the ((address and
telephone number of the department's division of child support office
that issues the notice and must inform the responsible parent that))
following information:
(((a) The parent may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest
the issue of compliance with the child support order. The only issues
that may be considered at the adjudicative proceeding are whether the
parent is required to pay child support under a child support order and
whether the parent is in compliance with that order;
(b) A request for an adjudicative proceeding shall be in writing
and must be received by the department within twenty days of the date
of service of the notice;
(c) If the parent requests an adjudicative proceeding within twenty
days of service, the department will stay action to certify the parent
to the department of licensing and any licensing entity for
noncompliance with a child support order pending entry of a written
decision after the adjudicative proceeding;
(d) If the parent does not request an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty days of service and remains in noncompliance with a child
support order, the department will certify the parent's name to the
department of licensing and any appropriate licensing entity for
noncompliance with a child support order;
(e) The department will stay action to certify the parent to the
department of licensing and any licensing entity for noncompliance if
the parent agrees to make timely payments of current support and agrees
to a reasonable payment schedule for payment of the arrears. It is the
parent's responsibility to contact in person or by mail the
department's division of child support office indicated on the notice
within twenty days of service of the notice to arrange for a payment
schedule. The department may stay certification for up to thirty days
after contact from a parent to arrange for a payment schedule;
(f) If the department certifies the responsible parent to the
department of licensing and a licensing entity for noncompliance with
a child support order, the licensing entity will suspend or not renew
the parent's license and the department of licensing will suspend or
not renew any driver's license that the parent holds until the parent
provides the department of licensing and the licensing entity with a
release from the department stating that the responsible parent is in
compliance with the child support order;
(g) If the department certifies the responsible parent as a person
who is in noncompliance with a child support order, the department of
fish and wildlife will suspend the fishing license, hunting license,
commercial fishing license, or any other license issued under chapters
77.32, 77.28 [75.28], and 75.25 RCW that the responsible parent may
possess. Notice from the department of licensing that a responsible
parent's driver's license has been suspended shall serve as notice of
the suspension of a license issued under chapters 77.32 and 75.25 RCW;
(h) Suspension of a license will affect insurability if the
responsible parent's insurance policy excludes coverage for acts
occurring after the suspension of a license;
(i) If after receiving the notice of noncompliance with a child
support order, the responsible parent files a motion to modify support
with the court or requests the department to amend a support obligation
established by an administrative decision, or if a motion for
modification of a court or administrative order for child support is
pending, the department or the court may stay action to certify the
parent to the department of licensing and any licensing entity for
noncompliance with a child support order. A stay shall not exceed six
months unless the department finds good cause. The responsible parent
has the obligation to notify the department that a modification
proceeding is pending and provide a copy of the motion or request for
modification; and
(j))) (a) The address and telephone number of the department's
division of child support office that issued the notice;
(b) That in order to prevent the department from certifying the
parent's name to the department of licensing or any other licensing
entity, the parent has twenty days from receipt of the notice to
contact the department and:
(i) Pay the overdue support amount in full;
(ii) Request an adjudicative proceeding as provided in section 2 of
this act;
(iii) Agree to a payment schedule with the department as provided
in section 4 of this act; or
(iv) File an action to modify the child support order with the
appropriate court or administrative forum, in which case the department
will stay the certification process up to six months;
(c) That failure to contact the department within twenty days of
receipt of the notice will result in certification of the responsible
parent's name to the department of licensing and any other appropriate
licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. Upon
receipt of the notice:
(i) The licensing entity will suspend or not renew the parent's
license and the department of licensing will suspend or not renew any
driver's license that the parent holds until the parent provides the
department of licensing and the licensing entity with a release from
the department stating that the responsible parent is in compliance
with the child support order;
(ii) The department of fish and wildlife will suspend a fishing
license, hunting license, commercial fishing license, or any other
license issued under chapter 77.32 RCW that the responsible parent may
possess. Notice from the department of licensing that a responsible
parent's driver's license has been suspended shall serve as notice of
the suspension of a license issued under chapter 77.32 RCW;
(d) That suspension of a license will affect insurability if the
responsible parent's insurance policy excludes coverage for acts
occurring after the suspension of a license;
(e) If the responsible parent subsequently ((becomes in)) comes
into compliance with the child support order, the department will
promptly provide the parent and the appropriate licensing entities with
a release stating that the parent is in compliance with the order((,
and the parent may request that the licensing entity or the department
of licensing reinstate the suspended license)).
(3) ((A responsible parent may request an adjudicative proceeding
upon service of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section.
The request for an adjudicative proceeding must be received by the
department within twenty days of service. The request must be in
writing and indicate the current mailing address and daytime phone
number, if available, of the responsible parent. The proceedings under
this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements
of chapter 34.05 RCW. The issues that may be considered at the
adjudicative proceeding are limited to whether:
(a) The person named as the responsible parent is the responsible
parent;
(b) The responsible parent is required to pay child support under
a child support order; and
(c) The responsible parent is in compliance with the order.
(4) The decision resulting from the adjudicative proceeding must be
in writing and inform the responsible parent of his or her rights to
review. The parent's copy of the decision may be sent by regular mail
to the parent's most recent address of record.
(5) If a responsible parent contacts the department's division of
child support office indicated on the notice of noncompliance within
twenty days of service of the notice and requests arrangement of a
payment schedule, the department shall stay the certification of
noncompliance during negotiation of the schedule for payment of
arrears. In no event shall the stay continue for more than thirty days
from the date of contact by the parent. The department shall establish
a schedule for payment of arrears that is fair and reasonable, and that
considers the financial situation of the responsible parent and the
needs of all children who rely on the responsible parent for support.
At the end of the thirty days, if no payment schedule has been agreed
to in writing and the department has acted in good faith, the
department shall proceed with certification of noncompliance.
(6) If a responsible parent timely requests an adjudicative
proceeding pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the department
may not certify the name of the parent to the department of licensing
or a licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order
unless the adjudicative proceeding results in a finding that the
responsible parent is not in compliance with the order.
(7) The department may certify to the department of licensing and
any appropriate licensing entity the name of a responsible parent who
is not in compliance with a child support order or a residential or
visitation order if:
(a) The responsible parent does not timely request an adjudicative
proceeding upon service of a notice issued under subsection (1) of this
section and is not in compliance with a child support order twenty-one
days after service of the notice;
(b) An adjudicative proceeding results in a decision that the
responsible parent is not in compliance with a child support order;
(c) The court enters a judgment on a petition for judicial review
that finds the responsible parent is not in compliance with a child
support order;
(d) The department and the responsible parent have been unable to
agree on a fair and reasonable schedule of payment of the arrears;
(e) The responsible parent fails to comply with a payment schedule
established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section; or
The department shall send by regular mail a copy of any
certification of noncompliance filed with the department of licensing
or a licensing entity to the responsible parent at the responsible
parent's most recent address of record.
(8) The department of licensing and a licensing entity shall,
without undue delay, notify a responsible parent certified by the
department under subsection (7) of this section that the parent's
driver's license or other license has been suspended because the
parent's name has been certified by the department as a responsible
parent who is not in compliance with a child support order or a
residential or visitation order.
(9))) When a responsible parent who is served notice under
subsection (1) of this section subsequently complies with the child
support order, ((or when the department receives a court order under
section 886 of this act stating that the parent is in compliance with
a residential or visitation order, the department shall promptly
provide the parent with)) a copy of a release stating that the
responsible parent is in compliance with the order((. A copy of the
release)) shall be transmitted by the department to the appropriate
licensing entities.
(((10) The department may adopt rules to implement and enforce the
requirements of this section. The department shall deliver a copy of
rules adopted to implement and enforce this section to the legislature
by June 30, 1998.
(11) Nothing in this section prohibits a responsible parent from
filing a motion to modify support with the court or from requesting the
department to amend a support obligation established by an
administrative decision. If there is a reasonable likelihood that a
pending motion or request will significantly change the amount of the
child support obligation, the department or the court may stay action
to certify the responsible parent to the department of licensing and
any licensing entity for noncompliance with a child support order. A
stay shall not exceed six months unless the department finds good cause
to extend the stay. The responsible parent has the obligation to
notify the department that a modification proceeding is pending and
provide a copy of the motion or request for modification.
(12))) (4) The department of licensing and a licensing entity may
renew, reinstate, or otherwise extend a license in accordance with the
licensing entity's or the department of licensing's rules after the
licensing entity or the department of licensing receives a copy of the
release specified in subsection (((9))) (3) of this section. The
department of licensing and a licensing entity may waive any applicable
requirement for reissuance, renewal, or other extension if it
determines that the imposition of that requirement places an undue
burden on the person and that waiver of the requirement is consistent
with the public interest.
(((13) The procedures in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, constitute the
exclusive administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of
noncompliance with a child support order and suspension of a license
under this section, and satisfy the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A responsible parent may request an
adjudicative proceeding upon service of the notice described in RCW
74.20A.320. The request for an adjudicative proceeding must be
received by the department within twenty days of service. The request
must be in writing and indicate the current mailing address and daytime
phone number, if available, of the responsible parent.
(2) If a responsible parent timely requests an adjudicative
proceeding, the department may not certify the name of the parent to
the department of licensing or a licensing entity for noncompliance
with a child support order unless the adjudicative proceeding results
in a finding that the responsible parent is not in compliance with the
order and has not made a good faith effort to comply.
(3) The issues that may be considered at the adjudicative
proceeding are limited to whether:
(a) The person named as the responsible parent is the responsible
parent;
(b) The responsible parent is required to pay child support under
a child support order;
(c) The responsible parent is in compliance with the order; and
(d) The responsible parent has made a good faith effort to comply
with the order.
(4) If the administrative law judge finds that the parent is not in
compliance with the support order, but has made a good faith effort to
comply, the administrative law judge shall formulate a payment schedule
as provided in section 4 of this act.
(5) The decision resulting from the adjudicative proceeding must be
in writing and inform the responsible parent of his or her rights to
review. The parent's copy of the decision may be sent by regular mail
to the parent's most recent address of record.
(6) The proceedings under this subsection shall be conducted in
accordance with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act.
(7) The procedures of this section constitute the exclusive
administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of noncompliance
with a child support order and suspension of a license under this
section, and satisfy the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "good faith effort to comply"
is a factual determination to be made by the administrative law judge
based on the responsible parent's payment history, ability to pay, and
efforts to find and maintain gainful employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department may certify to the
department of licensing and any appropriate licensing entity the name
of a responsible parent who is not in compliance with a child support
order if:
(a) Within twenty-one days after service of a notice issued under
RCW 74.20A.320, the responsible parent does not request an adjudicative
proceeding or file a motion with the appropriate court or
administrative forum to modify the child support obligation;
(b) An adjudicative proceeding results in a decision that the
responsible parent is not in compliance with a child support order and
has not made a good faith effort to comply;
(c) The court enters a judgment on a petition for judicial review
that finds the responsible parent is not in compliance with a child
support order and has not made a good faith effort to comply; or
(d) The responsible parent fails to comply with a payment schedule
established pursuant to section 4 of this act.
(2) The department shall send by regular mail a copy of any
certification of noncompliance filed with the department of licensing
or a licensing entity to the responsible parent at the responsible
parent's most recent address of record along with information as to how
the parent may get his or her license reinstated.
(3) The department of licensing and a licensing entity shall,
without undue delay, notify a responsible parent certified by the
department under subsection (1) of this section that the parent's
driver's license or other license has been suspended because the
parent's name has been certified by the department as a responsible
parent who is not in compliance with a child support order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) If a responsible parent contacts the
department's division of child support office indicated on the notice
of noncompliance within twenty days of service of the notice provided
in RCW 74.20A.320 and requests arrangement of a payment schedule, the
department shall stay the certification of noncompliance during
negotiation of the schedule for payment of arrears up to thirty days
from the date of contact by the responsible parent.
(2) In proposing or approving a written payment schedule, the
department or the administrative law judge shall take into
consideration the amount of the arrearages, the amount of the current
support order, the earnings of the responsible parent, and the needs of
all children who rely on the responsible parent for support. The
department or administrative law judge shall consider the individual
financial circumstances of each responsible parent in evaluating the
parent's ability to pay any proposed payment schedule and shall propose
a fair and reasonable payment schedule tailored to the individual
financial circumstances of the responsible parent. A payment schedule
may include a graduated payment plan and may require a responsible
parent to engage in employment-enhancing activities to attain a
satisfactory payment level.
(3) A payment schedule may be for the payment of less than current
monthly support for a reasonable time and is not required to include a
lump sum payment for the amount of arrears.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department may adopt rules to implement
and enforce the requirements of RCW 74.20A.320 and sections 2 through
4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.342 and 2008 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary
restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(xviii) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
(d) It is a traffic infraction for any person to violate this
section when his or her driver's license or driving privilege is, at
the time of the violation, suspended or revoked solely because the
person's license is suspended for the failure to pay child support
pursuant to section 3 of this act and RCW 43.24.112. A violation of
this section is a misdemeanor if a person has a previous traffic
infraction for violating this section when his or her driver's license
or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation, suspended or
revoked solely because the person's license is suspended for the
failure to pay child support pursuant to section 3 of this act and RCW
43.24.112.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 74.20A RCW.

--- END ---