BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that restoration of
the right to vote and serve on a jury, for individuals who have
satisfied every other obligation of their sentence, best serves to
reintegrate them into society, even if a no-contact order exists.
Therefore, the legislature further finds clarification of the existing
statute is desirable to provide clarity to the courts that a
certificate of discharge shall be issued, while the no-contact order
remains in effect, once other obligations are completed.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.637 and 2007 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender has completed all requirements of the
sentence, including any and all legal financial obligations, and while
under the custody and supervision of the department, the secretary or
the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing court, which shall
discharge the offender and provide the offender with a certificate of
discharge by issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by
mailing the certificate to the offender's last known address.
(b)(i) When an offender has reached the end of his or her
supervision with the department and has completed all the requirements
of the sentence except his or her legal financial obligations, the
secretary's designee shall provide the county clerk with a notice that
the offender has completed all nonfinancial requirements of the
sentence.
(ii) When the department has provided the county clerk with notice
that an offender has completed all the requirements of the sentence and
the offender subsequently satisfies all legal financial obligations
under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the sentencing court,
including the notice from the department, which shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(c) When an offender who is subject to requirements of the sentence
in addition to the payment of legal financial obligations either is not
subject to supervision by the department or does not complete the
requirements while under supervision of the department, it is the
offender's responsibility to provide the court with verification of the
completion of the sentence conditions other than the payment of legal
financial obligations. When the offender satisfies all legal financial
obligations under the sentence, the county clerk shall notify the
sentencing court that the legal financial obligations have been
satisfied. When the court has received both notification from the
clerk and adequate verification from the offender that the sentence
requirements have been completed, the court shall discharge the
offender and provide the offender with a certificate of discharge by
issuing the certificate to the offender in person or by mailing the
certificate to the offender's last known address.
(2)(a) For purposes of this subsection (2), a no-contact order is
not a requirement of the offender's sentence. An offender who has
completed all requirements of the sentence, including any and all legal
financial obligations, is eligible for a certificate of discharge even
if the offender has an existing no-contact order that excludes or
prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified person or
business or coming within a set distance of any specified location.
(b) In the case of an eligible offender who has a no-contact order
as part of the judgment and sentence, the offender may petition the
court to issue a certificate of discharge and a separate no-contact
order by filing a petition in the sentencing court and paying the
appropriate filing fee associated with the petition for the separate
no-contact order. This filing fee does not apply to an offender
seeking a certificate of discharge when the offender has a no-contact
order separate from the judgment and sentence.
(i) The court shall issue a certificate of discharge and a separate
no-contact order under this subsection (2) if the court determines that
the offender has completed all requirements of the sentence, including
all legal financial obligations. The court shall reissue the no-contact order separately under a new civil cause number for the
remaining term and under the same conditions as contained in the
judgment and sentence.
(ii) A separately issued no-contact order may be enforced under
chapter 26.50 RCW.
(iii) A separate no-contact order issued under this subsection (2)
is not a modification of the offender's sentence.
(3) Every signed certificate and order of discharge shall be filed
with the county clerk of the sentencing county. In addition, the court
shall send to the department a copy of every signed certificate and
order of discharge for offender sentences under the authority of the
department. The county clerk shall enter into a database maintained by
the administrator for the courts the names of all felons who have been
issued certificates of discharge, the date of discharge, and the date
of conviction and offense.
(((3))) (4) An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense
or a sex offense and is sentenced to a term involving community
supervision may be considered for a discharge of sentence by the
sentencing court prior to the completion of community supervision,
provided that the offender has completed at least one-half of the term
of community supervision and has met all other sentence requirements.
(((4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section,)) (5)
The discharge shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost
by operation of law upon conviction, and the certificate of discharge
shall so state. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of an
offender's prior record for purposes of determining sentences for later
offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section affects
or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a later criminal
prosecution either as an element of an offense or for impeachment
purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a finding of
rehabilitation.
(((5) Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a
certificate of discharge shall not terminate the offender's obligation
to comply with an order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW that excludes or
prohibits the offender from having contact with a specified person or
coming within a set distance of any specified location that was
contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who violates such
an order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall be
subject to prosecution according to the chapter under which the order
was originally issued.))
(6) Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the
department for counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This
voluntary help may be provided for up to one year following the release
from custody.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.50.110 and 2007 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever an order is granted under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or there is a
valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and the
respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order, a violation
of any of the following provisions of the order is a gross misdemeanor,
except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section:
(i) The restraint provisions prohibiting acts or threats of
violence against, or stalking of, a protected party, or restraint
provisions prohibiting contact with a protected party;
(ii) A provision excluding the person from a residence, workplace,
school, or day care;
(iii) A provision prohibiting a person from knowingly coming
within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a
location; or
(iv) A provision of a foreign protection order specifically
indicating that a violation will be a crime.
(b) Upon conviction, and in addition to any other penalties
provided by law, the court may require that the respondent submit to
electronic monitoring. The court shall specify who shall provide the
electronic monitoring services, and the terms under which the
monitoring shall be performed. The order also may include a
requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the convicted person to pay for
electronic monitoring.
(2) A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into
custody a person whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe
has violated an order issued under this chapter, chapter 7.90, 9.94A,
10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection
order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, that restrains the person or
excludes the person from a residence, workplace, school, or day care,
or prohibits the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, if the person
restrained knows of the order. Presence of the order in the law
enforcement computer-based criminal intelligence information system is
not the only means of establishing knowledge of the order.
(3) A violation of an order issued under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid
foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, shall also
constitute contempt of court, and is subject to the penalties
prescribed by law.
(4) Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this
chapter, chapter 7.90, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW,
or of a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and
that does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW
9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and any conduct in
violation of such an order that is reckless and creates a substantial
risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a class
C felony.
(5) A violation of a court order issued under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid
foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, is a class C
felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions for
violating the provisions of an order issued under this chapter, chapter
7.90, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid
foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020. The previous
convictions may involve the same victim or other victims specifically
protected by the orders the offender violated.
(6) Upon the filing of an affidavit by the petitioner or any peace
officer alleging that the respondent has violated an order granted
under this chapter, chapter 7.90, 9.94A, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or
74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW
26.52.020, the court may issue an order to the respondent, requiring
the respondent to appear and show cause within fourteen days why the
respondent should not be found in contempt of court and punished
accordingly. The hearing may be held in the court of any county or
municipality in which the petitioner or respondent temporarily or
permanently resides at the time of the alleged violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---