BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A University of Washington center for human rights is created.
The mission of the center is to expand opportunities for Washington
residents to receive a world-class education in human rights, generate
research data and expert knowledge to enhance public and private
policymaking, and become an academic center for human rights teaching
and research in the nation. Key substantive issues for the center
include: The rights of all persons to security against violence; the
rights of immigrants, native Americans, and ethnic or religious
minorities; human rights and the environment; health as a human right;
human rights and trade; the human rights of working people; and women's
rights as human rights.
(2) The higher education coordinating board may solicit, accept,
receive, and administer federal funds or private funds, in trust or
otherwise, and contract with foundations or with for-profit or
nonprofit organizations to support the purposes of this section.

--- END ---