BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.119.005 and 2002 c 204 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature intends to strengthen ((the link between
postsecondary education and K-12 education)) economic opportunities of
high achieving Washington youth from low-income and middle-income
families by creating the Washington promise scholarship program ((for
academically successful high school graduates from low and middle-income families)). The legislature finds that, increasingly, an
individual's economic viability is contingent on postsecondary
educational opportunities, ((yet the state's full financial obligation
is eliminated after the twelfth grade.)) but that students who ((work
hard in kindergarten through twelfth grade and)) successfully complete
high school with high academic marks or who have achieved high marks on
scholastic achievement tests may not have the financial ability to
attend college because they cannot obtain financial aid or the
financial aid is insufficient.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2004 c 275 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria. Students must be "resident students" as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of ((2002)) 2010, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top ((fifteen)) ten percent of their
graduating class, as identified by each respective high school at the
completion of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students ((graduating from public high schools, approved
private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students))
participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200
RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED
certificate, must ((equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment
test I score of twelve hundred on their first attempt or must equal or
exceed a composite American college test score of twenty-seven on their
first attempt)) achieve a score on either the SAT or ACT that is above
the ninetieth percentile.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition ((rates charged by Washington's
community colleges)) fees charged at the University of Washington. The
higher education coordinating board shall award scholarships to as many
students as possible from among those qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.76.685 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(10) The higher education coordinating board shall establish the
time frame within which the student must use the scholarship.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.119.020 and 2002 c 204 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board, with the assistance of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall implement and
administer the Washington promise scholarship program described in RCW
28B.119.010 as follows:
(1) The first scholarships awarded after 2009 shall be ((awarded))
to eligible students enrolling in postsecondary education in the
((2002-03)) 2010-11 academic year.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide information to the higher education coordinating board that is
necessary for implementation of the program. The higher education
coordinating board and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall jointly establish a timeline and procedures necessary
for accurate and timely data reporting.
(a) For students meeting the academic eligibility criteria as
provided in RCW 28B.119.010(1)(a), the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide the higher education coordinating
board with student names, addresses, birth dates, and unique numeric
identifiers.
(b) Public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195
RCW shall provide requested information necessary for implementation of
the program to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
within the established timeline.
(c) All student data is confidential and may be used solely for the
purposes of providing scholarships to eligible students.
(3) The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

--- END ---