BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Asia and its
interactions with the rest of the world are transforming the way the
world works in the twenty-first century. The legislature further finds
that trade, finance, technology, and global influence and institutions
are all areas in which China, India, and other Asian states are in the
process of reshaping the nature of the international system, and that
Washington state is uniquely situated to contribute to enhance
interactions between the United States and Asia. The legislature
intends to establish a global Asia institute at the University of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A global Asia institute is created within the Henry M. Jackson
School of International Studies. The mission of the institute is to
promote the understanding of Asia and its interactions with Washington
state and the world. The institute shall host visiting scholars and
policymakers, sponsor programs and learning initiatives, engage in
collaborative research projects, and facilitate broader understanding
and cooperation between the state of Washington and Asia through
general public programs and targeted collaborations with specific
communities in the state.
(2) The higher education coordinating board may solicit, accept,
receive, and administer federal funds or private funds, in trust or
otherwise, and contract with foundations or with for-profit or
nonprofit organizations to support the purposes of this section.

--- END ---