BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Equality and uniformity in valuation of real
property is the basis of the property tax system. The legislature has
enacted laws to ensure the fair assessment and revaluation of real
property. The state has vested large measures of control and
discretion in matters of property valuation to county government.
Absent this statutory and administrative structure, the possibility of
serious nonuniformity in valuations exists both between similar
property within the various taxing districts and between general levels
of valuation of the various counties. In particular, government
restrictions on the highest and best use of real property, which
promote the broader public interest and which impact property
valuation, require careful consideration of uniformity among the
counties to ensure fair treatment to individual property owners
affected by these restrictions.
To ensure consistent treatment of government restrictions on
property throughout the state, and to relieve the heavy burden on
property owners caused by repeated appeals on the same grounds,
revaluations must consider reductions ordered by any court or appellate
body based on government restrictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994 c 301 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon review by any court, or appellate body, of a determination
of the valuation of property for purposes of taxation, it ((shall))
must be presumed that:
(a) Except as provided otherwise in (b) of this subsection, the
determination of the public official charged with the duty of
establishing such value is correct ((but this presumption shall not be
a defense against any correction indicated by clear, cogent and
convincing evidence)); and
(b) The determination of the public official charged with the duty
of establishing such value must reflect any reduction from a government
restriction in RCW 84.40.030(1) ordered by any court or appellate body
which is not reversed on subsequent appeal.
(2) The presumptions under this section are not a defense against
any correction indicated by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.41.090 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 46 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department of revenue shall by rule establish appropriate
statistical methods for use by assessors in adjusting the valuation of
property between physical inspections. The department of revenue shall
make and publish such additional rules, regulations and guides which it
determines are needed to supplement materials presently published by
the department of revenue for the general guidance and assistance of
county assessors. Each assessor is hereby directed and required to
value property in accordance with the standards established by RCW
84.40.030 and in accordance with the applicable rules, regulations and
valuation manuals published by the department of revenue. If any court
or appellate body issues an order requiring a value reduction
attributable to government restrictions and the order is not reversed
on subsequent appeal, the assessor must adjust the value of the real
property consistent with the ordered value reduction as long as the
government restriction is in place on the property. From the date of
the order forward, the assessor must include government restrictions as
part of the appraisal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies prospectively only to taxes
levied for collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---