BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2008 c 329 s 921, 2008 c 329 s 920,
2008 c 329 s 919, and 2008 c 328 s 6009 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Priority consideration for the grants or loans made available
under this subsection must be given to a local government involved in
an independent remedial action of a site that requests oversight or
approval of the department due to the cost or complexity of the
remedial action. Local governments that receive loans or grants for
this purpose shall provide written attestation as specified by the
department that the work on the site will begin within six months after
funds are awarded.
(c) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(((c))) (d) Funds may also be appropriated to the department of
health to implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the
federal safe drinking water act for public water systems. The
department of health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed
under RCW 70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(((d))) (e) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the
department shall partner with local communities and liable parties for
cleanups. The department is authorized to use the following additional
strategies in order to ensure a healthful environment for future
generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the
account.
(9) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay.

--- END ---