BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.110 and 2005 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community solar project" means (a) a solar energy system owned
by local individuals, households, or nonutility businesses that is
placed on the property owned by their cooperating local governmental
entity; or (b) a utility-owned solar energy system that is voluntarily
funded by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for their
financial support, the utility gives contributors a payment or credit
on their utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the
project. For the purposes of this definition, "utility" means a light
and power business.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means the alternating current
electricity that is generated from a renewable energy system located on
an individual's, businesses', or local government's real property that
is also provided electricity generated by a light and power business.
Except for community solar projects, a system located on a leasehold
interest does not qualify under this definition. "Customer-generated
electricity" does not include electricity generated by a light and
power business with greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual
sales or a gas distribution business.
(((2))) (3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual
kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied
by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((3))) (4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(((4))) (6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((5))) (7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((6))) (8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((7))) (9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells
and providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((8) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.120 and 2007 c 111 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system ((installed on its property that is
not interconnected to the electric distribution system)). No incentive
may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after
June 30, ((2014)) 2025.
(2) ((When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)))(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for
the incentive allowed under this section, the applicant shall submit to
the department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy
development center at the Washington State University, established
under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed
by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue shall notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(((4))) (3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the
incentive shall be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(((5))) (4) Except for community solar projects, the investment
cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen cents per economic
development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized
for credit to the participating light and power business. For
community solar projects, the investment cost recovery incentive may be
paid thirty cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless
requests exceed the amount authorized for credit to the participating
light and power business. For the purposes of this section, the rate
paid for the investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by
the following factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(((6))) (5) No individual, household, business, or local
governmental entity is eligible for incentives for more than ((two))
five thousand dollars per year. Each applicant in a community solar
project is eligible for up to five thousand dollars per year.
(((7))) (6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive
exceed the amount of funds available for credit to the participating
light and power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(((8))) (7) The climate and rural energy development center at
Washington State University energy program may establish guidelines and
standards for technologies that are identified as Washington
manufactured and therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(((9))) (8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.16.130 and 2005 c 300 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A light and power business shall be allowed a credit against
taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to investment cost
recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal year under RCW
82.16.120. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as required
by the department. The credit under this section for the fiscal year
shall not exceed ((twenty-five one-hundredths of)) one percent of the
businesses' taxable power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or
((twenty-five)) one-hundred thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
Incentive payments to participants in a utility-owned community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(1)(b) may only account for up to
twenty-five percent of the total allowable credit. The credit may not
exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds
shall not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not used to
earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a credit in
subsequent years.
(2) For any business that has claimed credit for amounts that
exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under RCW 82.16.120,
the amount of tax against which credit was claimed for the excess
payments shall be immediately due and payable. The department shall
assess interest but not penalties on the taxes against which the credit
was claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, ((2015)) 2025. Credits may not be claimed after June 30, ((2016))
2026.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility that acquires solar energy may count that
acquisition at four times its base value where the energy is produced
using solar inverters and modules manufactured in Washington state.
(j) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

--- END ---