BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that approval of the state budget is among
the most important acts of the legislature in any year, and that the
public is entitled to a reasonable opportunity to learn how public
funds are proposed to be expended before bills making appropriations
become law. The legislature further finds that public notice,
dissemination of information, and informed analysis of proposed budgets
is an essential requisite of transparent, accountable government.
Omnibus appropriations bills frequently have been acted on by the
legislature in a manner that has afforded little opportunity for public
review and information about proposed expenditures, or for members of
the legislature to deliberate upon proposed appropriations in an
informed and conscientious manner. The legislature finds this practice
has weakened the performance of the legislature in its stewardship of
public funds, and reduced public trust in government. The legislature
finds that many other states, in their constitutions, statutes, or
legislative rules, require an opportunity for public and legislative
review of budget legislation.
The legislature therefore finds it in the public interest to
provide for an appropriate period of public and legislative review of
all omnibus appropriations bills before they are acted on by the
legislature and submitted to the governor for approval.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
An omnibus operating, capital, or transportation appropriations
bill, or proposed substitute, striking amendment, or conference
committee report thereon, must be made publicly available to the
members of the legislature and the public at least three calendar days
before such a bill may be voted on by the senate or the house of
representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
budget sunshine act.

--- END ---