BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A life insurer may include the following noninsurance benefits
as part of a policy of individual life insurance, with the prior
approval of the commissioner:
(a) Will preparation services;
(b) Financial planning and estate planning services;
(c) Probate and estate settlement services; and
(d) Such other services as the commissioner may identify by rule.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules to ensure disclosure of the
noninsurance benefits permitted under this section, including but not
limited to guidelines concerning the provision of the coverage.
(3) Those providing the services listed in subsection (1) of this
section must be appropriately licensed.
(4) This section does not require the commissioner to approve any
particular proposed noninsurance benefit. The commissioner may
disapprove any proposed noninsurance benefit that the commissioner
determines may tend to promote or facilitate the violation of any other
section of this title.
(5) This section does not expand, limit, or otherwise affect the
authority and ethical obligations of those who are authorized by the
state supreme court to practice law in this state. This section does
not limit the prohibition against the unauthorized practice of law
under chapter 2.48 RCW.
(6) This section does not affect the application of chapter 21.20
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A life insurer may include the following noninsurance benefits
as part of a policy or certificate of group life insurance, with the
prior approval of the commissioner:
(a) Will preparation services;
(b) Financial planning and estate planning services;
(c) Probate and estate settlement services; and
(d) Such other services as the commissioner may identify by rule.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules to regulate the disclosure of
noninsurance benefits permitted under this section, including but not
limited to guidelines regarding the coverage provided under the policy
or certificate of insurance.
(3) Those providing the services listed in subsection (1) of this
section must be appropriately licensed.
(4) This section does not require the commissioner to approve any
particular proposed noninsurance benefit. The commissioner may
disapprove any proposed noninsurance benefit that the commissioner
determines may tend to promote or facilitate the violation of any other
section of this title.
(5) This section does not expand, limit, or otherwise affect the
authority and ethical obligations of those who are authorized by the
state supreme court to practice law in this state. This section does
not limit the prohibition against the unauthorized practice of law
under chapter 2.48 RCW.
(6) This section does not affect the application of chapter 21.20
RCW.

--- END ---