BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The holder of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a beer
and/or wine restaurant license, or a tavern license may allow
well-behaved leashed dogs accompanied by their owners on the premises
during business hours. The board shall develop rules to implement this
section.

--- END ---