BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to provide the
opportunity for the restoration and redevelopment of unfinished nuclear
power project sites for the purpose of creating energy parks for the
generation of electricity.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.300 and 2000 c 243 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to unfinished nuclear power projects.
If a certificate holder stops construction of a nuclear energy facility
before completion, terminates the project or otherwise resolves not to
complete construction, never introduces or stores fuel for the energy
facility on the site, and never operates the energy facility as
designed to produce energy, the certificate holder may contract,
establish interlocal agreements, or use other formal means to effect
the transfer of site restoration responsibilities, which may include
economic development activities, to any political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state composed of elected officials. The
contracts, interlocal agreements, or other formal means of cooperation
may include, but are not limited to provisions effecting the transfer
or conveyance of interests in the site and energy facilities from the
certificate holder to other political subdivisions of the state,
including costs of maintenance and security, capital improvements, and
demolition and salvage of the unused energy facilities and
infrastructure.
(2) If a certificate holder transfers all or a portion of the site
to a political subdivision or subdivisions of the state composed of
elected officials and located in the same county as the site, the
council shall amend the site certification agreement to release those
portions of the site that it finds are no longer intended for the
development of an energy facility.
Immediately upon release of all or a portion of the site pursuant
to this section, all responsibilities for maintaining the public
welfare for portions of the site transferred, including but not limited
to health and safety, are transferred to the political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state. For sites located on federal land, all
responsibilities for maintaining the public welfare for all of the
site, including but not limited to health and safety, must be
transferred to the political subdivision or subdivisions of the state
irrespective of whether all or a portion of the site is released.
(3) If a certificate holder transfers all or a portion of the site
for the purpose of creating an energy park, the council shall amend the
site certification agreement to release those portions of the site that
are transferred. For all or a portion of sites that have been
transferred after January 1, 2009, the following condition applies:
The department of ecology shall continue any authorization under the
site certification agreement for the use of water at an energy park in
good standing and bearing the same date as the issuance of the site
certification agreement for an amount of water up to fifteen cubic feet
per second as requested by, and for use by, the recipient of all or a
portion of the site. The certificate holder shall assign such
authorization to the recipient of such site.
(4) The legislature finds that for all or a portion of sites that
have been transferred to a political subdivision or subdivisions of the
state prior to September 1, 1999, ensuring water for site restoration
including economic development, completed pursuant to this section can
best be accomplished by a transfer of existing surface water rights,
and that such a transfer is best accomplished administratively through
procedures set forth in existing statutes and rules. However, if a
transfer of water rights is not possible, the department of ecology
shall, within six months of the transfer of the site or portion thereof
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, create a trust water right
under chapter 90.42 RCW containing between ten and twenty cubic feet
per second for the benefit of the appropriate political subdivision or
subdivisions of the state. The trust water right shall be used in
fulfilling site restoration responsibilities, including economic
development. The trust water right shall be from existing valid water
rights within the basin where the site is located.
(((4))) (5) For purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Political subdivision or subdivisions of the state" means a
city, town, county, public utility district, port district, or joint
operating agency; and
(b) "Energy park" means an unfinished site for a nuclear power
project that is partially or wholly developed to generate electricity
with a production capacity of not less than 10 megawatts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment that is used to generate electricity in energy
parks, or to sales of, or charges made for, labor and services rendered
in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the
purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) "Energy park" is defined as provided in RCW 80.50.300.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used to generate electricity in energy parks.
(2) "Energy park" is defined as provided in RCW 80.50.300.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---