BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.119.020 and 1999 c 153 s 67 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires ((another meaning:))
otherwise.
(1) "Backflow assembly tester" means a person in charge of
inspecting, testing, maintaining, and repairing backflow assemblies,
devices, or air gaps that protect the public water system.
(2) "Certificate" means a certificate of competency issued by the
secretary stating that the operator has met the requirements for the
specified operator classification of the certification program.
(((2)))(3) "Certified operator" means an individual holding a valid
certificate and employed or appointed by any county, water-sewer
district, municipality, public or private corporation, company,
institution, person, federal agency, or the state of Washington and who
is designated by the employing or appointing officials as the person
responsible for active daily technical operation.
(((3)))(4) "Cross-connection control specialist" means a person in
charge of developing and implementing cross-connection control
programs.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(((4)))(6) "Distribution system" means that portion of a public
water system which stores, transmits, pumps and distributes water to
consumers.
(((5)))(7) "Groundwater under the direct influence of surface
water" means any water beneath the surface of the ground with:
(a) Significant occurrence of insects or other macroorganisms,
algae, or large diameter pathogens such as giardia lamblia; or
(b) Significant and relatively rapid shifts in water
characteristics such as turbidity, temperature, conductivity, or pH
which closely correlate to climatological or surface water conditions.
(((6)))(8) "Group A water system" means a system with fifteen or
more service connections, regardless of the number of people; or a
system serving an average of twenty-five or more people per day for
sixty or more days within a calendar year, regardless of the number of
service connections. ((Group A water system does not include a system
serving fewer than fifteen single-family residences, regardless of the
number of people.
(7)))(9) "Nationally recognized association of certification
authorities" shall mean an organization which serves as an information
center for certification activities, recommends minimum standards and
guidelines for classification of potable water treatment plants, water
distribution systems and waste water facilities and certification of
operators, facilitates reciprocity between state programs and assists
authorities in establishing new certification programs and updating
existing ones.
(((8)))(10) "Operator" includes backflow assembly tester, certified
operator, and cross-connection control specialist as these terms are
defined in this section.
(11) "Public water system" means any system, excluding a system
serving only one single-family residence and a system with four or
fewer connections all of which serve residences on the same farm,
providing piped water for human consumption, including any collection,
treatment, storage, or distribution facilities under control of the
purveyor and used primarily in connection with the system; and
collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under control of the
purveyor but primarily used in connection with the system.
(((9)))(12) "Purification plant" means that portion of a public
water system which treats or improves the physical, chemical or
bacteriological quality of the system's water to bring the water into
compliance with state board of health standards.
(((10)))(13) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
health.
(((11)))(14) "Service" means a connection to a public water system
designed to serve a single-family residence, dwelling unit, or
equivalent use. If the facility has group home or barracks-type
accommodations, three persons will be considered equivalent to one
service.
(((12)))(15) "Surface water" means all water open to the atmosphere
and subject to surface runoff.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.119.030 and 1997 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A public water system shall have a certified operator if:
(a) It is a group A water system; or
(b) It is a public water system using a surface water source or a
groundwater source under the direct influence of surface water.
(2) The certified operators shall be in charge of the technical
direction of a water system's operation, or an operating shift of such
a system, or a major segment of a system necessary for monitoring or
improving the quality of water. The operator shall be certified as
provided in RCW 70.119.050.
(3) A certified operator may provide required services to more than
one system or to a group of systems. The amount of time that a
certified operator shall be required to be present at any given system
shall be based upon the time required to properly operate and maintain
the public water system as designed and constructed in accordance with
RCW 43.20.050. The employing or appointing officials shall designate
the position or positions requiring mandatory certification within
their individual systems and shall assure that such certified operators
are responsible for the system's technical operation.
(4) The department shall, in establishing by rule or otherwise the
requirements for public water systems with fewer than one hundred
connections, phase in such requirements in order to assure that (a) an
adequate number of certified operators are available to serve the
additional systems, (b) the systems have adequate notice and time to
plan for securing the services of a certified operator, (c) the
department has the additional data and other administrative capacity,
(d) adequate training is available to certify additional operators as
necessary, and (e) any additional requirements under federal law are
satisfied. The department shall require certified operators for all
group A systems as necessary to conform to federal law or implementing
rules or guidelines. Unless necessary to conform to federal law,
rules, or guidelines, the department shall not require a certified
operator for a system with fewer than one hundred connections unless
that system is determined by the department to be in significant
noncompliance with operational, monitoring, or water quality standards
that would put the public health at risk, as defined by the department
by rule, or has, or is required to have, water treatment facilities
other than simple disinfection.
(((5) Any examination required by the department as a prerequisite
for the issuance of a certificate under this chapter shall be offered
in each region where the department has a regional office.
(6) Operators not required to be certified by this chapter are
encouraged to become certified on a voluntary basis.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.119 RCW
to read as follows:
Backflow assembly testers and cross-connection control specialists
must hold a valid certificate and must be certified as provided by rule
as adopted under the authority of RCW 70.119.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.119 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any examination required by the department as a prerequisite
for the issuance of certificate under this chapter must be offered in
both eastern and western Washington.
(2) Operators not required to be certified by this chapter are
encouraged to become certified on a voluntary basis.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.119.110 and 1995 c 269 s 2906 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary may ((after conducting a hearing)) revoke or suspend
a certificate: (1) Found to have been obtained by fraud or deceit;
((or)) (2) for fraud, deceit, or gross negligence ((in)) involving the
operation or maintenance of a ((purification plant or distribution
system)) public water system; (3) for fraud, deceit, or gross
negligence in inspecting, testing, maintenance, or repair of backflow
assemblies, devices, or air gaps intended to protect a public water
system from contamination; or (4) for an intentional violation of the
requirements of this chapter or any lawful rules, order, or regulation
of the department. No person whose certificate is revoked under this
section shall be eligible to apply for a certificate ((for one year
from the effective date of the final order of)) until the completion of
the revocation period.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.119.130 and 1991 c 305 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, including any operator or any firm, association,
corporation, municipal corporation, or other governmental subdivision
or agency who, after thirty days' written notice, operates a public
water system which is not in compliance with RCW 70.119.030(1), shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each month of such operation out of
compliance with RCW 70.119.030(1) shall constitute a separate offense.
Upon conviction, violators shall be fined an amount not exceeding one
hundred dollars for each offense. It shall be the duty of the
prosecuting attorney or the attorney general, as appropriate, to secure
injunctions of continuing violations of any provisions of this chapter
or the rules and regulations adopted ((hereunder: PROVIDED, That,
except in the case of fraud, deceit, or gross negligence under RCW
70.119.110, no revocation, citation or charge shall be made under RCW
70.119.110 and 70.119.130 until a proper written notice of violation is
received and a reasonable opportunity for correction has been given))
under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.119.160 and 1993 c 306 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of health certifies ((individuals responsible for
the active daily technical operation of)) public water ((supply
systems)) system operators and monitors public water ((supply)) systems
to ensure that such systems comply with the requirements of this
chapter and ((regulations)) rules implementing this chapter. The
secretary shall establish a schedule of fees for ((certified)) operator
applicants and renewal licenses and a separate schedule of fees for
public water systems to support the waterworks operator certification
program. The fees shall be set at a level sufficient for the
department to recover the costs of the waterworks operator
certification program and in accordance with the procedures established
under RCW 43.70.250.

--- END ---