BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Applied behavior analysis" means the design, implementation,
and evaluation of environmental modifications, using behavioral stimuli
and consequences, to produce socially significant improvement in human
behavior, including the use of direct observation, measurement, and
functional analysis of the relationship between environment and
behavior.
(b) "Autism services provider" means a person, entity, or group
providing treatment for autism spectrum disorders pursuant to a
treatment plan.
(c) "Autism spectrum disorders" means any of the pervasive
developmental disorders as defined by the most recent edition of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, including
autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, and pervasive developmental
disorder not otherwise specified.
(d) "Diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders" means medically
necessary assessments, evaluations, or tests to diagnose whether an
individual has one of the autism spectrum disorders.
(e) "Medically necessary" means any care, treatment, intervention,
service, or item that is prescribed, provided, or ordered by a licensed
physician or a licensed psychologist that will, or is reasonably
expected to, do any of the following:
(i) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, or
disability;
(ii) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental, or developmental
effects of an illness, condition, injury, or disability; or
(iii) Assist to achieve or maintain maximum functional capacity in
performing daily activities, taking into account both the functional
capacity of the individual and the functional capacities that are
appropriate for individuals of the same age.
(f) "Pharmacy care" means medications prescribed by a licensed
physician and any health-related services deemed medically necessary to
determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
(g) "Psychiatric care" means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
(h) "Psychological care" means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which the
psychologist practices.
(i) "Therapeutic care" means direct or consultative services
provided by a speech therapist, occupational therapist, or physical
therapist licensed or certified in the state in which the therapist
practices.
(j) "Treatment of autism spectrum disorders" includes the following
care prescribed, ordered, or provided by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist who determines the care to be medically
necessary:
(i) Applied behavior analysis and other structured behavior
programs;
(ii) Pharmacy care;
(iii) Psychiatric care;
(iv) Psychological care;
(v) Therapeutic care;
(vi) Any care for individuals with autism spectrum disorders that
is determined by the state health department, based upon its review of
best practices or evidence-based research, may be medically necessary
and that is published in the Washington State Register. Any such care,
treatment, intervention, service, or item that was not previously
covered will be included in any health insurance policy delivered,
executed, issued, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after sixty days
following the date of its publication in the Washington State Register.
(k) "Treatment plan" means a plan for the treatment of autism
spectrum disorders developed by a licensed physician or licensed
psychologist pursuant to a comprehensive evaluation or reevaluation
performed in a manner consistent with the most recent clinical report
or recommendations of the American academy of pediatrics.
(2) Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter which is not subject to the provisions of
Title 48 RCW must include coverage for the diagnosis of autism spectrum
disorders and treatment of autism spectrum disorders in individuals
less than twenty-one years of age. To the extent that the diagnosis of
autism spectrum disorders and the treatment of autism spectrum
disorders are not already covered by a health insurance policy,
coverage under this section will be included in health insurance
policies that are delivered, executed, issued, amended, adjusted, or
renewed on or after the effective date of this section. No insurer can
terminate coverage, or refuse to deliver, execute, issue, amend,
adjust, or renew coverage to an individual solely because the
individual is diagnosed with one of the autism spectrum disorders or
has received treatment for autism spectrum disorders.
(3) Coverage under this section will not be subject to any limits
on the number of visits an individual may make to an autism services
provider.
(4) Coverage under this section may be subject to copayment,
deductible, and coinsurance provisions of a health insurance policy to
the extent that other medical services covered by the health insurance
policy are subject to these provisions.
(5) This section will not be construed as limiting benefits that
are otherwise available to an individual under a health insurance
policy, including benefits available under RCW 48.44.341, 48.21.241,
and 48.46.291.
(6) Coverage under this section will be subject to a maximum
benefit of fifty thousand dollars per year. After July 31, 2010, the
insurance commissioner will, on an annual basis, adjust the maximum
benefit for inflation by using the medical care component of the United
States department of labor consumer price index for all urban
consumers. The commissioner will submit the adjusted maximum benefit
for publication annually no later than October of each calendar year,
and the published adjusted maximum benefit will be applicable in the
following calendar year to health insurance policies subject to this
section. Payments made by an insurer on behalf of a covered individual
for any care, treatment, intervention, service, or item unrelated to
autism spectrum disorders will not be applied towards any maximum
benefit established under this section.
(7) Except for inpatient services, if an individual is receiving
treatment for autism spectrum disorders, an insurer will have the right
to request a review of that treatment not more than once every six
months unless the insurer and the individual's licensed physician or
licensed psychologist agrees that a more frequent review is necessary.
The cost of obtaining any review will be borne by the insurer.
(8) The department of health will adopt rules establishing
standards for qualified autism services providers. Once the rules are
adopted, payment for the treatment of autism spectrum disorders covered
under this section will be made only to autism service providers who
meet the standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Applied behavior analysis" means the design, implementation,
and evaluation of environmental modifications, using behavioral stimuli
and consequences, to produce socially significant improvement in human
behavior, including the use of direct observation, measurement, and
functional analysis of the relationship between environment and
behavior.
(b) "Autism services provider" means a person, entity, or group
providing treatment for autism spectrum disorders pursuant to a
treatment plan.
(c) "Autism spectrum disorders" means any of the pervasive
developmental disorders as defined by the most recent edition of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, including
autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, and pervasive developmental
disorder not otherwise specified.
(d) "Diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders" means medically
necessary assessments, evaluations, or tests to diagnose whether an
individual has one of the autism spectrum disorders.
(e) "Medically necessary" means any care, treatment, intervention,
service, or item that is prescribed, provided, or ordered by a licensed
physician or a licensed psychologist that will, or is reasonably
expected to, do any of the following:
(i) Prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury, or
disability;
(ii) Reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental, or developmental
effects of an illness, condition, injury, or disability; or
(iii) Assist to achieve or maintain maximum functional capacity in
performing daily activities, taking into account both the functional
capacity of the individual and the functional capacities that are
appropriate for individuals of the same age.
(f) "Pharmacy care" means medications prescribed by a licensed
physician and any health-related services deemed medically necessary to
determine the need or effectiveness of the medications.
(g) "Psychiatric care" means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychiatrist licensed in the state in which the
psychiatrist practices.
(h) "Psychological care" means direct or consultative services
provided by a psychologist licensed in the state in which the
psychologist practices.
(i) "Therapeutic care" means direct or consultative services
provided by a speech therapist, occupational therapist, or physical
therapist licensed or certified in the state in which the therapist
practices.
(j) "Treatment of autism spectrum disorders" includes the following
care prescribed, ordered, or provided by a licensed physician or
licensed psychologist who determines the care to be medically
necessary:
(i) Applied behavior analysis and other structured behavior
programs;
(ii) Pharmacy care;
(iii) Psychiatric care;
(iv) Psychological care;
(v) Therapeutic care;
(vi) Any care for individuals with autism spectrum disorders that
is determined by the state health department, based upon its review of
best practices or evidence-based research, may be medically necessary
and that is published in the Washington State Register. Any such care,
treatment, intervention, service, or item that was not previously
covered will be included in any health insurance policy delivered,
executed, issued, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after sixty days
following the date of its publication in the Washington State Register.
(k) "Treatment plan" means a plan for the treatment of autism
spectrum disorders developed by a licensed physician or licensed
psychologist pursuant to a comprehensive evaluation or reevaluation
performed in a manner consistent with the most recent clinical report
or recommendations of the American academy of pediatrics.
(2) Each health plan offered to the public under chapter 48.21,
48.44, or 48.46 RCW must include coverage for the diagnosis of autism
spectrum disorders and treatment of autism spectrum disorders in
individuals less than twenty-one years of age. To the extent that the
diagnosis of autism spectrum disorders and the treatment of autism
spectrum disorders are not already covered by a health insurance
policy, coverage under this section will be included in health
insurance policies that are delivered, executed, issued, amended,
adjusted, or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.
No insurer can terminate coverage, or refuse to deliver, execute,
issue, amend, adjust, or renew coverage to an individual solely because
the individual is diagnosed with one of the autism spectrum disorders
or has received treatment for autism spectrum disorders.
(3) Coverage under this section will not be subject to any limits
on the number of visits an individual may make to an autism services
provider.
(4) Coverage under this section may be subject to copayment,
deductible, and coinsurance provisions of a health insurance policy to
the extent that other medical services covered by the health insurance
policy are subject to these provisions.
(5) This section will not be construed as limiting benefits that
are otherwise available to an individual under a health insurance
policy, including benefits available under RCW 48.44.341, 48.21.241,
and 48.46.291.
(6) Coverage under this section will be subject to a maximum
benefit of fifty thousand dollars per year. After July 31, 2010, the
insurance commissioner will, on an annual basis, adjust the maximum
benefit for inflation by using the medical care component of the United
States department of labor consumer price index for all urban
consumers. The commissioner will submit the adjusted maximum benefit
for publication annually no later than October of each calendar year,
and the published adjusted maximum benefit will be applicable in the
following calendar year to health insurance policies subject to this
section. Payments made by an insurer on behalf of a covered individual
for any care, treatment, intervention, service, or item unrelated to
autism spectrum disorders will not be applied towards any maximum
benefit established under this section.
(7) Except for inpatient services, if an individual is receiving
treatment for autism spectrum disorders, an insurer will have the right
to request a review of that treatment not more than once every six
months unless the insurer and the individual's licensed physician or
licensed psychologist agrees that a more frequent review is necessary.
The cost of obtaining any review will be borne by the insurer.
(8) The department of health will adopt rules establishing
standards for qualified autism services providers. Once the rules are
adopted, payment for the treatment of autism spectrum disorders covered
under this section will be made only to autism service providers who
meet the standards.

--- END ---