BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.080 and 1995 c 216 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person subjected to restricted liberty as a sexually
violent predator pursuant to this chapter shall not forfeit any legal
right or suffer any legal disability as a consequence of any actions
taken or orders made, other than as specifically provided in this
chapter.
(2) Any person committed or detained pursuant to this chapter shall
be prohibited from accessing a personal computer unless the resident's
individualized treatment plan states that access to a computer is
necessary to bring about a positive response to a specific and certain
phase or course of treatment.
(3) Any person committed pursuant to this chapter has the right to
adequate care and individualized treatment. The department of social
and health services shall keep records detailing all medical, expert,
and professional care and treatment received by a committed person, and
shall keep copies of all reports of periodic examinations made pursuant
to this chapter. All such records and reports shall be made available
upon request only to: The committed person, his or her attorney, the
prosecuting attorney, the court, the protection and advocacy agency, or
another expert or professional person who, upon proper showing,
demonstrates a need for access to such records.
(((3))) (4) At the time a person is taken into custody or
transferred into a facility pursuant to a petition under this chapter,
the professional person in charge of such facility or his or her
designee shall take reasonable precautions to inventory and safeguard
the personal property of the persons detained or transferred. A copy
of the inventory, signed by the staff member making it, shall be given
to the person detained and shall, in addition, be open to inspection to
any responsible relative, subject to limitations, if any, specifically
imposed by the detained person. For purposes of this subsection,
"responsible relative" includes the guardian, conservator, attorney,
spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person.
The facility shall not disclose the contents of the inventory to any
other person without consent of the patient or order of the court.
(((4))) (5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person presently
committed from exercising a right presently available to him or her for
the purpose of obtaining release from confinement, including the right
to petition for a writ of habeas corpus.
(((5))) (6) No indigent person may be conditionally released or
unconditionally discharged under this chapter without suitable
clothing, and the secretary shall furnish the person with such sum of
money as is required by RCW 72.02.100 for persons without ample funds
who are released from correctional institutions. As funds are
available, the secretary may provide payment to the indigent persons
conditionally released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the
optional provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules
to do so.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.092 and 1995 c 216 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before the court may enter an order directing conditional release
to a less restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (1) The
person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to
provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155
RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific course of
treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment
and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will
report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the
supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of
the special commitment center; (3) housing exists that is sufficiently
secure to protect the community, and the person or agency providing
housing to the conditionally released person has agreed in writing to
accept the person, to provide the level of security required by the
court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor, the
supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of
the special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to which
he or she has been assigned without authorization; (4) the person is
willing to comply with the treatment provider and all requirements
imposed by the treatment provider and by the court; and (5) the person
is willing to comply with supervision requirements imposed by the
department of corrections.
Any person found eligible for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative shall be prohibited from accessing a personal
computer and accessing the internet unless the person's individualized
treatment plan states that access to a computer is necessary to bring
about a positive response to a specific and certain phase or course of
treatment.

--- END ---