BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A focus group is established to examine
the need to provide housing for individuals at risk of being homeless
including, but not limited to, those suffering from mental illness,
those with criminal backgrounds, and those who have chemical or alcohol
dependency issues. The focus group shall review and make
recommendations regarding:
(a) Identification and removal of barriers to finding and
maintaining affordable housing for individuals at risk of being
homeless;
(b) Existing programs that provide housing assistance to at-risk
populations and advisable methods of providing housing assistance in
the future;
(c) Methods to encourage private landlords to provide housing to
at-risk populations;
(d) Statutory changes to the residential landlord-tenant act; and
(e) Quality controls to ensure housing standards for at-risk
tenants.
(2) The focus group shall invite participation from:
(a) Legislative members from related committees in the senate and
the house of representatives;
(b) State agencies or entities that deal with at-risk populations,
including the department of corrections, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, the department of social and health
services, the department of veterans affairs, and the interagency
council on homelessness;
(c) Counties;
(d) Cities;
(e) Crime victims;
(f) Community corrections officers;
(g) Multifamily housing and landlord associations;
(h) Tenant associations or organizations advocating on behalf of
tenants and the homeless;
(i) Local law enforcement; and
(j) Other interested groups as appropriate.
(3) The focus group shall present a report of its findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature, including any proposed legislation, by November 15, 2009.
(4)(a) The focus group is authorized to use legislative facilities,
and staff support must be provided by senate committee services and the
house of representatives office of program research.
(b) Nonlegislative members of the focus group shall serve without
compensation.
(c) Legislative members of the focus group may not be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 for participation
in the focus group.
(5) This section expires December 1, 2009.

--- END ---