BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the practice of
social work improves the lives of many people throughout the state of
Washington by focusing on a broad spectrum of social sciences to
enhance the quality of life and develop the full potential of each
client. The legislature further finds that those individuals who work
as social workers should have a degree from an accredited institution
of higher education approved by the council on social work education to
appropriately address their clients' problems, needs, and concerns so
that their clients may achieve the maximum possible enhancement of
their quality of life, and develop to their full potential.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.225.010 and 2008 c 135 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate
degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the
supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed
independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family
therapist.
(4) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(5) "Department" means the department of health.
(6) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(7) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and
treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human
development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(8) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment
of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or
behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and
family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional
application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and
techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and
families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental
disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the
rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to
individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such
services are offered directly to the general public or through
organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or
otherwise.
(9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of principles
of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics,
and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.
(11) "Social worker" means a person who has met one or more of the
following requirements:
(a) Is licensed under RCW 18.225.090 as an advanced social worker
or an independent clinical social worker; or
(b) Has graduated with a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree
from a social work educational program accredited by the council on
social work education and approved by the secretary based upon
nationally recognized standards.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.124.020 and 1999 c 176 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington.
(2) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the
director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.
(3) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a
person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, optometry, pharmacy, physical therapy, chiropractic, nursing,
dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery.
The term "practitioner" includes a nurse's aide and a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner.
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(5) "Social worker" means ((anyone engaged in a professional
capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or
promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of patients, or
providing social services to patients, whether in an individual
capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution)) a person who has met one or more of the
following requirements:
(a) Is licensed under RCW 18.225.090 as an advanced social worker
or an independent clinical social worker; or
(b) Has graduated with a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree
from a social work educational program accredited by the council on
social work education and approved by the secretary based upon
nationally recognized standards.
(6) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology
under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as
an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.
(7) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter
18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(8) "Abuse or neglect" or "patient abuse or neglect" means the
nonaccidental physical injury or condition, sexual abuse, or negligent
treatment of a state hospital patient under circumstances which
indicate that the patient's health, welfare, or safety is harmed
thereby.
(9) "Negligent treatment" means an act or omission which evinces a
serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a
clear and present danger to the patient's health, welfare, or safety.
(10) "State hospital" means any hospital operated and maintained by
the state for the care of the mentally ill under chapter 72.23 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.225 RCW
to read as follows:
No public agency or private entity doing business in Washington may
use the title of social worker or a form of the title for describing or
designating volunteer or employment positions or within contracts for
services, reference materials, manuals, or other documents, unless the
volunteers or employees working in those positions are qualified as a
social worker as defined in this chapter.
This section does not apply to persons employed in Washington on
the effective date of this section under the job title of social worker
or a form of the title, during the time of their continued employment
in the same position and under the same job description and title held
on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---