BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2011, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2010" or "FY 2010" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010.
(b) "Fiscal year 2011" or "FY 2011" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2011.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not
expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill
the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (19882002)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,036,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,859,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Account (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the appropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account reappropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account reappropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of community, trade, and economic development
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an
administrative model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and
minimize administration costs, this reappropriation must be
administered by guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be
prioritized using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program
criteria. All financing provided through this program must be in the
form of grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum
grant to any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the
funds allocated to the appropriation in section 201, chapter 277, Laws
of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,494,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund - Authorization to Use Loan
Repayments (20044010)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,801,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,399,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (20044011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c) and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department,
except that the Highline historical society project is land
acquisition.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
204, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,615,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,034,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,766,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20064001)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,926,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,174,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (20064004)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,339,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $227,561,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,878,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (20064011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
reappropriation in this section may be used for grants.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,920,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Water System Acquisition and Rehabilitation Program (20064850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation must be jointly
administered by the department of health, the public works board, and
the department of community, trade, and economic development using the
drinking water state revolving fund loan program as an administrative
model. In order to expedite the use of these funds and minimize
administration costs, this appropriation must be administered by
guidance, rather than rule. Projects must generally be prioritized
using the drinking water state revolving fund loan program criteria.
All financing provided through this program must be in the form of
grants that must partially cover project costs. The maximum grant to
any eligible entity may not exceed twenty-five percent of the funds
allocated to this appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,674,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20064851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $6,800,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for the backlog, as defined by
the department, of projects determined by the department to be eligible
under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW.
(2) Up to $4,500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for weatherization
administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(3) Up to $850,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely to promote development of safe
and affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social
and health services.
(4) Up to $500,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for shelters, transitional
housing, or other housing facilities for victims of domestic violence.
(5) Up to $3,000,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for farm worker housing
projects and programs to meet the full spectrum of housing needs of
Washington's farm workers and their families. The department shall work
with stakeholders representing a diversity of farm worker housing
interests to develop a strategic plan in implementing this provision.
(6) Up to $200,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for the implementation and
management of a manufactured and mobile home landlord-tenant ombudsman
conflict resolution program by the office of mobile home affairs as
generally described in section 3, chapter 429, Laws of 2005. The office
of mobile home affairs shall also determine the number of complaints
made to the department since May 2005 that, in the best estimate of the
department, do in fact present violations of chapter 59.20 RCW and
shall produce a summary of the number and types of complaints. The
office of mobile home affairs shall also continue to maintain and
update a database with information about all mobile home parks and
manufactured housing communities.
(7) Up to $150,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for a program to assist
individuals and communities in the home-buying process, including, but
not limited to: Homebuyer education classes, credit and budget
counseling, financial literacy training, and down payment assistance
programs. The department shall contract with a nonprofit organization
as defined under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or
similar successor provision that has experience and expertise in
addressing language access barriers in the home-buying process to
implement this program.
(8) Reappropriations in this section must be included in the
calculation of annual funds available for determining the
administrative costs of the department, which shall not exceed five
percent of the annual funds available for the housing assistance
program and the affordable housing program as authorized under RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185A.030.

Reappropriation:
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $444,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,557,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(3) Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest national labs campus infrastructure project is provided
solely for giga-pop infrastructure.
(4) Up to $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
military communities infrastructure projects. Military communities
infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements and the purchase of real property in fee simple to restrict
the use of accident potential zones and clear zones. The office of
financial management shall establish a competitive process for
selecting projects to receive the grants. Final allocation of these
grants shall be at the discretion and with the approval of the director
of the office of financial management.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones allowed by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Up to $481,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air force base.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,379,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,621,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Jobs in Communities (20064951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,291,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts Grants (20074001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.750.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1027, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,768,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,262,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Services Facilities Grants (20074002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.125.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1029, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,647,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,147,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (20074003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1007, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,050,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20074004)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,098,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,198,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,502,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Water System Acquisition Rehabilitation Program (20074006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for the city of Republic to acquire the Pine Grove
water system.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,928,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,782,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,853,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,635,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20074009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $9,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
weatherization administered through the energy matchmakers program.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to
promote development of safe and affordable housing units for persons
eligible for services from the division of developmental disabilities
within the department of social and health services.
(3) Up to $2,500,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to nonprofit organizations and public housing authorities for
revolving loan, self-help housing programs for low and moderate income
families.
(4) Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
shelters, transitional housing, or other housing facilities for victims
of domestic violence.
(5) Up to $5,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
the development of emergency shelters and transitional housing
opportunities for homeless families with children.
(6) Up to $1,500,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
the development of housing for low-income or homeless Native Americans.
The department shall work with Native American tribes, not-for–profit
organizations with experience in serving Native American populations,
and Native American housing development organizations to prioritize
projects located in the areas of highest identified need.
(7) Up to $4,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
loans and grants to eligible organizations to purchase
manufactured/mobile home communities with the intent of preserving the
communities for affordable housing.
(8) Up to $10,000,000 of the reappropriation is for the creation
and development of low-income housing within areas declared disasters
by the governor after November 2007.
(9) Up to $2,000,000 of the reappropriation from the state taxable
building construction account is provided solely for the development or
preservation of farmworker housing for migrant and seasonal farmworkers
located on private farms. This reappropriation is subject to
appropriate agreements to protect the public investment. Any of this
reappropriation that is not obligated by June 30, 2009, shall be added
to the amount appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(10) The reappropriations in this section from the state building
construction account shall be distributed as grants.
(11) Up to $250,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely to the city of Burien for
housing related purposes.
(12) The reappropriation in this section shall not be used for the
administrative costs of the department. The amount of the
appropriation shall be included in the calculation of annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.
(13) Within available funding provided in this section, the
department shall prepare an inventory of housing assistance programs.
The inventory shall include all state funded programs, the housing
finance commission programs, all programs funded by local governments
and housing authorities, including a description of expenditures from
fees and taxes specifically authorized by state law for housing
assistance and homeless programs, all property tax and sales tax
provisions that are intended to support housing assistance programs,
and all federally funded housing assistance programs provided in the
state. The inventory shall include a description of the program,
biennial appropriation and expenditure levels since the 1999-2001
biennium through the 2007-2009 biennium, a description of eligibility
criteria and the amount of benefit provided per unit or per family, and
the number of units or families assisted. The department shall
coordinate with the joint legislative audit and review committee to
reduce duplicative efforts that may be required by legislation.
(14)(a) Up to $10,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely
for the department to contract with the Washington state housing
finance commission to provide grants or loans to eligible
organizations, described under RCW 43.185A.040, to purchase land or
real property for affordable housing and community facilities
preservation or development in rapidly gentrifying neighborhoods,
redevelopment areas, or communities with a significant low-income
population that is threatened with displacement by such gentrification.
Loans or grants may be made to purchase land or real property for the
preservation or development of affordable housing or community
facilities, including reasonable costs and fees. The Washington state
housing finance commission's review and evaluation of projects for
loans and grants must include, but is not limited to the following:
(i) Consideration of mobile home parks facing closure; (ii) properties
in neighborhoods in King county that are facing gentrification or
redevelopment; and (iii) properties located in the city of Spokane that
are facing the threat of displacing low-income tenants due to the loss
of affordable housing rental units. The Washington state housing
finance commission, with approval from the department, may adopt
guidelines and requirements that are necessary to administer the
affordable housing and community facilities rapid response program. A
loan recipient must preserve affordable rental housing acquired or
developed under this section as affordable housing for a minimum of
thirty years. Interest rates on loans made under this section may be
as low as zero percent but may not exceed three percent. All loan
repayments must be deposited into the Washington housing trust account
and accounted for separately from other funds in the account.
(b) By December 1, 2009, the Washington state housing finance
commission shall report to the department and the appropriate
committees of the legislature: (i) The number of loans that were made
in the program; (ii) for what purposes the loans were made; (iii) to
whom the loans were made; and (iv) when the loans are expected to be
paid back.
(15) Up to $10,000,000 of the reappropriation is for the department
to contract with the Washington state housing finance commission to
administer the facilitation of nonprofit entities' use of tax-exempt
multifamily bonds issued by the Washington state housing finance
commission.
(16)(a) Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation from the Washington
housing trust account is provided solely for the department to work in
consultation with the affordable housing advisory board and
representatives from nonprofit housing development organizations and
affordable housing advocacy groups in the state to:
(i) Identify and analyze all costs associated with affordable
housing development projects financed through the Washington housing
trust fund under chapters 43.185 and 43.185A RCW, which may include,
but are not limited to, costs associated with legal and architectural
services, permitting and impact fees, land acquisition, and general
construction costs;
(ii) Make recommendations for strategies, which must include
recommendations for changes to public policy and department procedures,
to reduce the costs identified in (a)(i) of this subsection; and
(iii) Make recommendations for potential performance measures
appropriate for each strategy identified.
(b) In developing recommendations for strategies to reduce costs,
the department shall analyze and address the fiscal impact of public
policies of the state and of local governments, Washington housing
trust fund policies, and general market forces on affordable housing
development.
(c) The department shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
September 30, 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,700,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,869,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $624,631,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,354,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,576,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (20074015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation may be used for grants.

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,395,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,289,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,684,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,316,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (20081001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for emergency
dredging to prevent the sandbars in the Cowlitz river from obstructing
the intake facility necessary for the city of Longview to obtain
drinking water.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Quincy Water Treatment System Phase 1 (20081002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to increase the capacity of the water treatment
facility in the city of Quincy.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Innovation Partnership Zones (20082003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state will designate unique areas of
the state as innovation partnership zones, where globally competitive
companies, research institutions, and advanced training are creating
special competitive advantages for the state. From among the
innovation partnership zones, using a competitive process based on
need, estimated economic impact, geographic diversity, and local
matches, six zones or projects will be selected to receive funding.
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for shared
telecommunications within the zone, shared infrastructure and
facilities, long-term capital purchases, and up to 10 percent for zone
administration through the locally-designated innovation partnership
zone administrator. It is the intent of the legislature that
innovation partnership zone grants should consider the
commercialization of inventions and innovations.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,731,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $269,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Washington State Horse Park (20082004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section shall complete the state's
capital obligation for the facility.
(2) Land provided for the state horse park by the county or city in
which the park is located shall remain in the ownership of that county
or city unless the county or city determines otherwise. The
legislature encourages the county or city to provide a long-term lease
of selected property to the Washington state horse park authority at a
minimal charge.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,389,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,305,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Development Fund (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1014, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,166,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,166,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Belfair Sewer Improvements (20084852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building Communities Fund Program (20084855)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Schools Program (20084856)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the
acquisition, rehabilitation, expansion, or improvement of surplus
school buildings to be converted into community facilities for the
delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for children and
families.
(2) Eligible applicants include local governments, nonprofit
organizations, nonprofit early learning providers, and tribal
governments. Only the following surplus schools may be eligible for
grant funding under this section: (a) Allen school; (b) Crown Hill
school; (c) Fauntleroy school; (d) University Heights school; (e)
Martin Luther King elementary school; and (f) Lincoln high school north
wing.
(3) As part of the grant process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan for the use of the surplus school that includes
information on the following:
(a) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
applicant to provide or coordinate services for children and families;
(b) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible
applicant and each partner; and
(c) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and coordinated services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this section or from other federal, state, local, or private
sources.
(4) Project applicants must demonstrate that the proposed project
is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and requires
state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project
that may include acquisition.
(5) If grant funds under this subsection are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, the sale proceeds must be
used by the local school board disposing of such property for
renovation, replacement, or new construction of school facilities in
the district, but shall not be used as local match for projects
receiving state school construction assistance grants.
(6) In contracts for grants authorized under this subsection, the
department shall include provisions that require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,152,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,433,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Quillayute Valley Wood-Fire Boiler (20084858)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Snohomish County Biodiesel (20084859)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1019, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,479,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Grays Harbor Wind Project (20084950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Skagit County Digester (20084951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Public Works Trust Fund (30000003)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $396,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,296,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Water System Acquisition and Rehabilitation Program (30000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,201,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,974,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $255,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

(1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects must be selected based on their
readiness to proceed.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Reconstruction of First Stage, Issaquah $400,000

Modular Classrooms for Dance (Gladish) $30,000

Cottage Renovation (Hedgebrook) $20,000

Stage Two (Whidbey) $450,000

Federal Way Performing Arts Center $325,000

Museum Expansion (Maryhill) $1,500,000

New Hands On Children's Museum $1,000,000

Building a Foundation for Discovery $250,000

James Center for the Performing Arts (Sequim) $150,000

Vashon Arts Center $1,115,000

Admiral Theatre-No Theatre Left Behind $140,000

Seattle Opera Center - Phase I Design $650,000

Viva Vera Capital Campaign $70,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts Center $475,000

WA Hall Acquisition and Rehab $400,000

Visual Arts Education Center (Snohomish County) $1,000,000

Artspace Everett Lofts $1,000,000

Legacy Project (Imagine) $200,000

Convert Key Bank To Everett's Plaza Theatre $500,000

Gateway Center (Lummi) $150,000

Phase II Renovation (Mt. Baker Theatre) $1,000,000

Downstairs at the 5th $800,000

Campus Consolidation (Cornish) $375,000

Total $12,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000007)

(1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects must be selected based on their
readiness to proceed.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Spokane Central YMCA $800,000

Toutle River Ranch Phase 3 $360,000

Grant Central Kitsap Community Campus YMCA $800,000

Kitsap Girl Scout Center $205,000

East Pierce County HOPE Center $800,000

Naval Avenue Boys & Girls Club $80,000

Allen Place $800,000

Auburn Boys & Girls Club $800,000

Highline YMCA $800,000

West Sound Teen Center $305,000

Coal Creek Family YMCA $800,000

Hough Pool Renovation $150,000

Jim Parsley Community Center $800,000

Total $7,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects must be selected based on their
readiness to proceed.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $109,735,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,988,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Innovation Partnership Zones (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000,000 of the appropriations are
provided solely for weatherization administered through the energy
matchmakers program.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as otherwise directed before the effective date of this
section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Ready by five $1,000,000

Tri Cities stem school $800,000

Livingston Baker fire & life
safety $750,000

Neighborcare health clinic $1,000,000

South Tacoma community
center $1,000,000

Dawson place child advocacy
center $1,000,000

Zina Linnik Park $950,000

Airway Heights water treatment
plant $1,000,000

Columbia waterfront $3,100,000

Connell infrastructure $1,100,000

Pullman Moscow $2,000,000

Snohomish County emergency
center $1,000,000

Poulsbo marine center $500,000

Walter Clore wine & culinary
center $1,000,000

Carnation farmers market $162,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,362,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Energy Freedom Program (30000056)

Appropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Alternative Energy Investments (30000057)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Infrastructure Investments (30000058)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (20082855)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,192,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,143,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $686,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Graving Dock Settlement (20084001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to fulfill the state's obligations in the settlement
agreement in the case of Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe et al v. State et
al, Thurston county superior court, cause no. 05-2-01595-8, and the
associated economic development agreement, specifically to the city of
Port Angeles for archaeological work as specified in the settlement
agreement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,480,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (30000022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,775,927

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,224,073
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (20021008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,180,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,706,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,886,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Highway-License Building Repair and Renewal (20061013)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,963,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,299,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,262,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Natural Resources Building Repairs and Renewal (20061014)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $258,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,675,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,520,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,503,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081004)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $712,500
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $470,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,182,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,938,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,121,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (20081007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,671,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,329,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,981,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus High Voltage System Improvements (20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,204,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (20081011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,908
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $933,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,106,092
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,639,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $566,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,126,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,179,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,305,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Infrastructure Relocation (20082028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $938,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Newhouse Repairs and South Campus Plan (20082952)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $519,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capital Lake Plan Completion (20082953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Campus Monuments Repair and Restoration (20091003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works Preservation (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,263,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,913,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,986,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,899,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Temple of Justice: Heating, Ventilation and Air Conditioning
Upgrades (30000018)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Program Projects (30000023)

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $670,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,284,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,954,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
East Plaza Renovation (30000031)

Appropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,549,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,314,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,711,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (30000033)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,190,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Powerhouse: Improvements and Preservation (30000056)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,459,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Facility Oversight Program: Staffing (30000063)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department of general administration to assist
the office of financial management with the development and
implementation of RCW 43.82.035 and 43.82.055.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,597,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Heritage Center and Executive Office Building: Construction
(30000481)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided in conjunction with the authorized certificates of
participation solely for construction of the combined heritage center
and executive office building project. The total project cost must not
exceed $134,935,000 for the heritage building and $79,981,000 for the
executive office building plus financing costs.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Insurance Building: Exterior Drainage Repairs (30000082)

Appropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,375,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000086)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,650,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,033,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Infrastructure Savings (30000480)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1078 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Minor Works (30000009)

Appropriation:
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1079 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,120,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $701,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,002,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,823,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1080 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works - Program (20082003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $864,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $964,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,139,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1081 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Flood Warning Systems (20082851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the emergency management division in consultation
with the department of ecology, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, the Washington association of counties, the
United States army corps of engineers, the national oceanic and
atmospheric association, and the national weather service to develop
the following:
(1) An inventory and description of flood warning systems currently
in place in flood hazard areas of the state, including manual systems
and electronic systems;
(2) A needs assessment indication what specific areas of the state
could be better served by flood warning systems based on flooding areas
mapped under the federal emergency management act. The needs
assessment must include recommendations regarding how to make timely
notification of flood warnings and how to gather and share data about
potential flood areas;
(3) An information bank of flood warning systems, with descriptions
of available and emerging technologies, and estimates of the costs of
purchasing, installing, and maintaining these systems;
(4) Sources of potential federal assistance for local flood warning
systems; and
(5) Recommendations to assist local governments in the financing of
capital costs of flood warning systems, including the potential to
modify existing state programs.
The recommendations must be reported to the office of financial
management and legislature by December 15, 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1082 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop: Design and Construction
(20082006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,164,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,519,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,683,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1083 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,069,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,209,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,278,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,172,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1084 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $679,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,193,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,872,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,229,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1085 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Emergency Repairs (30000059)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1086 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Infrastructure Savings (30000480)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1087 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
Minor Works Facility Preservation (30000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,741,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Preservation (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $476,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Dormitory Construction (30000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,745,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,745,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Fire Alarm Upgrade/Replacement (30000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Firing Range Upgrades (30000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Firing Range Addition (30000008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,308,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,608,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
School Mapping (30000011)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Statewide: Facilities Assessment and Cultural Resources Planning
(20061120)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Green Hill School: New Inmate Management Unit, Health Center, and
Administration (20062202)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division-Eastern Washington: Evaluation and Treatment
(20064352)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Mental Health Division-Children's Long-Term Inpatient Program
Facilities: Preservation (20064353)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall evaluate options for
maximizing federal fund contributions for capital needs of privately
owned facilities that contract with the department for children's
long-term inpatient program services.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,701,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,701,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081111)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081112)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081113)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (20081119)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital New Kitchen and Commissary Building
(20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital Laundry Upgrades (20081325)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,658,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,858,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Utility Replacements at the Special Commitment Center (20081504)

The reappropriation and appropriation in this section are subject
to the following conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the
appropriation and reappropriation to replace essential utilities
(sanitary sewer, high voltage electrical, and fiber optic
communications) serving the special commitment center and McNeil
corrections center on McNeil Island by replacing the Island's
electrical feed from the shoreline landing to the McNeil corrections
center generator building, and continuing on to the special commitment
center. The department shall coordinate the work with the department
of corrections for the most cost effective approach to the work.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,490,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School Waste Treatment Plant (20082001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center Medium Management Housing Addition
(20082505)

The appropriation and reappropriation in this section are subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is to add residential space to existing
facilities by remodeling existing residential space and converting
existing program space to residential space for additional beds.
(2) Up to $50,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
update to the predesign for the eighty bed housing unit. This updated
predesign must examine alternatives including the use of modular
structures.
(3) The remaining amount of the appropriation is for the design of
two forty-bed units to be constructed in two phases.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,664,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,939,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Fircrest Campus Master Plan (20082850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall resume and complete a master plan of the
portion of the Fircrest campus that is not utilized by the Fircrest
school or the department of health.
(2) In drafting the master plan, the department shall consult with
the following:
(a) The city of Shoreline;
(b) The department of natural resources;
(c) The department of health regarding their master planning
effort;
(d) Representatives of institutions of higher education with whom
the department has a partnership; and
(e) Representatives of the Shoreline community and neighboring
communities.
(3) The master plan must include a plan for the future of the
property, including recommendations for alternative uses such as
affordable housing and smart growth options. The hybrid option as
described in the Fircrest excess property report dated January 14,
2008, must be used for the purposes of the master plan. The
development of the master plan must not prohibit the potential future
expansion of the public health laboratory by the department of health.
(4) The department must report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management by December 1, 2010.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village: Nine Cottages Renovation, Phase 4, 5, and 6
(20061402)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,190,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,063,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,453,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center - Housing Units (20081041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000366)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,590,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,458,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000367)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,110,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,766,306
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,876,306

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Facilities Preservation (30000368)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,831,123
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,761,123

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Emergency Repairs (30000485)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Capital Project Management: Staffing (30000486)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center: Housing Units Remodel, Phase 3
(30000812)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,355,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Activity Therapy Building Upgrades
(30000832)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works - Program Projects (30000838)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,954,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,954,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Lakeland Village: Pavement Replacement (30000840)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,430,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Traffic Study Implementation (30000843)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $996,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,351,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Childrens Center: Portable Classroom Replacement
(30000844)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $743,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Roof Replacements (30000846)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,085,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,088,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Roof Replacements (30000851)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,198,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,818,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Francis Haddon Morgan Center: Main Building Renovation (30000853)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,249,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,499,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Westlake Building Renovation (30000852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Infrastructure Savings (30000480)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory Addition (20082003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,165,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,003,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,168,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20064001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,922,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,586,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,508,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory HVAC Systems Upgrades (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $412,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,912,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,348,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,348,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
State Veterans Cemetery (20082004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,206,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,546,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,825,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Washington Soldiers Home: Nursing Bed Replacement Predesign
(30000001)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,755,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Facilities Preservation (30000003)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,920,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $575,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,585,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,080,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Program Projects (30000004)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,463,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,893,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Emergency Repairs (30000053)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Coyote Ridge Corrections Center: Design and Construct Medium
Security (19982011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,620,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure (20042008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,100,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,629,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,629,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Corrections: Replace and Stabilize Housing Unit
Siding (20061005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,756,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,713,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,087,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,372,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Steamlines
(20061018)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $319,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $697,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: South Close Security Complex
(20062021)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,950,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,276,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,578,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,804,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (20062043)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,446,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,146,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Healthcare Center
(20062066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,058,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(20062070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,160,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,910,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Health Care Facility (20062072)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,039,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,177,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,377,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Cedar Creek Corrections Center: Add 100 Minimum Security Beds
(20062851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,729,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,229,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Larch Corrections Center: 80-Bed Expansion (20062852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,512,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,072,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Airway Heights Heating and Cooling Loop Replacement (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,419,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Barge Slip Pilings at McNeil Island Corrections Center
(20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,612,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Kitchen Roofs at Monroe Correctional Complex (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,062,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace G Building Roof at Washington Corrections Center (20081004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,631,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Roofs at Washington Corrections Center (20081005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,566,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Roofs at Washington State Penitentiary (20081007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $589,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Fire Alarm System at Washington Corrections Center
(20081008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $445,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,079,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,524,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Replace Electrical Distribution Building at Special Offenders Unit
(20081009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Cell Door and Electronics at Washington State Reformatory
(20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $292,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,253,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Replace Telecommunications Infrastructure at Clallam Bay (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,045,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,895,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2070 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081018)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,458,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2071 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081031)

Reappropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,342,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2072 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Laundry Improvements at Washington State Penitentiary (20081033)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,737,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $314,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2073 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Expand Reception Center at Washington Corrections Center (20082016)

The appropriation and reappropriation in this section are subject
to the following conditions and limitations: Prior to the allotment of
design funds, the office of financial management shall undertake a
budget evaluation study of the project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $397,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,570,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2074 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
100-Bed Expansion at Mission Creek Corrections Center for Women
(20082020)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,627,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2075 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Close Sewer Lagoon at Monroe Correctional Complex (20082022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,524,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,915,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Add 300 Minimum Security Beds
(20082026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitation: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for design of 300 minimum security beds.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Sex Offender Treatment Program Building at Airway Heights
(20082028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,297,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,947,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2078 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

300 Minimum Security Bed Expansion - Predesign - Three Locations
(20082850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $155,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,280,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2079 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,446,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,664,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2080 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000047)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,609,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,194,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,803,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2081 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000086)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,084,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2082 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace 5 Towers and Housing Roofs
(30000108)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2083 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Replace Fire Alarm
(30000121)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2084 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Fire Detection/Suppression
(30000123)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2085 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Center: Washington State Reformatory/Minimum
Security Unit Water Line Replacements (30000137)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,809,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2086 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Transformers and Switches (30000143)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,139,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,978,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2087 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Ahtanum View Work Release: Replace HVAC System (30000148)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,211,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2088 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
McNeil Island Correction Center: Replace Park Road Water Main
(30000153)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,854,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,854,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2089 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Stafford Creek Corrections Center: Heat Exchanger
Replacement/Repair (30000164)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2090 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Minor Works - Programmatic Projects (30000173)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,392,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,157,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,549,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2091 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center for Women: Roof Replacement
(30000178)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2092 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Corrections Complex: Firing Range Realignment (30000291)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,658,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2093 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
New 300 Minimum Security Beds for Women: Land and Predesign
(30000331)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,166,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,776,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2094 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Mission Creek Corrections Center - Women: Visiting Expansion
(30000335)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,855,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,855,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2095 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Emergency Repairs (30000346)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2096 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Highest and Best Use Analysis for Aging Prison Facilities
(30000347)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2097 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Kitchen Improvements (20061007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $402,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,387,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2098 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Infrastructure Savings (30000480)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2099 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
Maple Park Building (30000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,279,000 is appropriated to the
employment security department from the unemployment compensation
administration account--federal, from funds made available to the state
by Section 903 (d) of the Social Security Act, for the renovation of
employment security department headquarters at 212 Maple Park.

Appropriation:
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account--
Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,093,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,372,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,287,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,012,674
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,299,674

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $9,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for design, engineering, and construction of a cover
for filled trenches at the commercial low-level radioactive waste
disposal facility. The cover must be placed as an interim remedial
action in accordance with WAC 173-340-430. The office of financial
management shall not authorize expenditure of this funding until the
department of ecology and the department of health jointly submit to
the office of financial management an updated schedule of actions and
funding needed to complete site closure and decommissioning in
accordance with the requirements described in the May 28, 2004, final
environmental impact statement for the commercial low-level radioactive
waste disposal site, located on the Hanford Federal facility site.

Appropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,345,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,845,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Measuring Devices (2001H009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,492,400
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,144,400

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20024006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,022,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,977,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $392,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,992,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,658,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,626,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Fund (20044007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,765,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,880,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,872,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (20052850)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,788,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $438,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,517,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,830,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (20052851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,065,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (20054009)

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,591,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,329,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,198,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,798,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low Impact Development for Stormwater Management (20062006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
grants to local governments in Puget Sound to fund innovative, low-impact development storm water management projects to meet critical
storm water management needs and protect or restore water quality.
Projects may include use of bioretention, rainwater harvest, permeable
pavement, vegetated roofs, and other low-impact development techniques.
Projects funded in Puget Sound must meet the design guidelines
contained in the low-impact development technical guidance manual for
Puget Sound, unless the municipality can demonstrate that site
conditions warrant a deviation from the design guidelines and the
deviations in design provides similar performance. All projects must
include performance monitoring.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $912,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,088,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Program (20062010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Motor Vehicle Mercury Removal Program (20062850)
Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $498,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,874,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,126,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (20064002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department must give priority loan funding consideration to
on-site septic system rehabilitation and replacement programs in Mason,
Kitsap, and Jefferson counties for up to $1,000,000 from the water
pollution control revolving account--state in the second year of the
funding cycle.
(2) Up to $5,000,000 of the water pollution control revolving
account--state reappropriation is for loans for on-site sewage
replacement. This reappropriation may be used to: (a) Establish new
or expand existing on-site sewage repair and replacement loan programs
by county governments or tribes; or (b) develop a pilot program to
administer an on-site sewage repair and replacement loan program
through a qualified private or nonprofit lending institution. This
appropriation must be used in conjunction with water quality capital
account--state reappropriation in section 3017 of this act provided for
this purpose. The department must work with the department of health,
the Puget Sound water quality action team, local governments, and the
lending industry in developing and piloting this program.

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,045,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,004,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,049,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,568,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,617,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20064007)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,034,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,483,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,418,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,935,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,489,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,424,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,317,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of water for domestic water users in the Yakima Basin
(Water Resource Inventory Areas 37, 38, and 39) that have a surface
water right with a priority date later than May 10, 1905, as well as
for all out-of-priority surface water users in the Yakima Basin. A
portion of the appropriation may be used for administrative and other
costs associated with acquiring and transferring the water rights. The
department must recover all costs from participating domestic water
users for their prorated portion of the cost of securing a water right
or rights for this purpose and associated annual operational costs owed
to the United States bureau of reclamation. Funds recovered in this
manner shall be placed in the drought preparedness account.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Stormwater Projects (20082002)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,489,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,920,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,191,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Stormwater Projects (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $353,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Breazeale Interpretive Center (20082856)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water (20084002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for grants to local governments in Puget Sound to
complete reclaimed water projects. Priority must be given to projects
in water short areas where reclaimed water can be used to replace other
water sources and where reclaimed water can be used to restore
important ecosystem functions in Puget Sound.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,719,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,056,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,931,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,689,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Toxic Sites in Puget Sound (20084005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for the clean-up of contaminated sites that lie adjacent to and are within one-half
mile of Puget Sound. Clean-ups must include orphaned and abandoned
sites that pose a threat to Puget Sound with the highest priority sites
being cleaned up first. The department must provide the Puget Sound
partnership, as created by chapter 341, Laws of 2007, the opportunity
to review and provide comment on proposed projects and activities
recommended for funding. This review must be consistent with the
funding schedule for the program.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,431,372

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,628
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,767,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,059,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Grants (20084009)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,334,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,166,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,120,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,947,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,837,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,904,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,979,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,883,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,473,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,995,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,468,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,532,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
On-Site Septic Replacement Program (20084012)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,429,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $571,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (20084015)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,699,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,801,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Public Health Risks from Wood Stove Pollution (20084019)

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup (20084020)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,792,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,792,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,208,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Cleanup (20084022)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,458,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,542,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reduce Health Risks from Toxic Diesel Pollution (20084024)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $5,380,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
clean diesel school bus projects for local school districts, that the
department may use for the purposes of RCW 28A.160.205.
(2) Up to $4,830,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
clean diesel projects, other than for school buses, as described in RCW
70.94.017(2)(a) and may be distributed through grants to air pollution
control authorities.

Reappropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,449,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,761,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,210,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima Basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and
environmental impact statement. The appropriated funds are to be used
by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to evaluate
potential in basin storage facilities such as the proposed Black Rock
and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives that will
enhance water supply in the Yakima Basin.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (20084028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
grants for projects that improve water supplies and help achieve
instream flows by implementing watershed plans, as follows:
(1) Surface or ground water storage projects, where such projects
are consistent with the recommendations of the water storage task
force. The department shall consult the departments of agriculture and
fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.
(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and
fish restoration purposes. The stream flow improvements and other
public benefits secured from these projects must be commensurate with
the investment of state funds.
(3) Agricultural water supply projects that improve water
conservation and water use efficiency.
(4) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in salmon
critical basins and areas participating in the department of fish and
wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins
where watershed plans call for additional water use measurement.
(5) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish
water banks. The department must give priority to acquisitions in
salmon critical basins. The department must place acquired water into
the state's trust water rights program (chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW).
(6) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation is provided for a portion
of the costs of the Ahtanum creek watershed restoration program,
including construction of the Pine Hollow reservoir, provided there is
agreement among the Yakama nation, Ahtanum irrigation district, and
other jurisdictional federal, state, and local agencies and entities to
proceed with the environmental impact statement.
(7) Up to $560,000 is provided solely for the Chehalis watershed.
(8) Up to $300,000 is provided solely for a grant to the Nisqually
river foundation to support the watershed conservation plan, low-impact
development program, and Nisqually river education program.
(9) Up to $1,200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
grants to lead local government entities for planning unit
administrative support to watershed planning units. Such grants must
be provided only to those entities that have completed, approved plans
that are actively being implemented. Grant amounts will range from
$30,000 to $60,000, based on criteria to be developed by the
department. Criteria should consider factors including complexity of
water issues, geographical size, population growth pressure, rate of
plan implementation, and others issues to be determined by the
department.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mason County Consortium (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Protection Study (20082855)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to conduct a study to determine the
number of decertified levees in the state and to identify strategies
for recertifying the levees so that they provide optimum protection for
the communities protected by the levees. The department must
prioritize areas to include in the study based on population and the
economic impact of potential flood damage.
The study must include the following components:
(1) A working group of levee managers to advise and inform the
study;
(2) A technical review of the structural integrity of levee
systems;
(3) An inventory, map, and rate the effectiveness of existing levee
systems; and
(4) The development of strategies and actions needed to improve the
existing levee system and to ensure certification by the United States
army corps of engineers for one-hundred year flood protection.
The study must be completed and a report provided to the
appropriate legislative committees by July 1, 2010.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Health Threats from Woodstove Pollution (30000010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Reserve Boat Garage (30000011)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup and Prevention of Waste Tire Piles (30000012)

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,270,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for grants to local governments for local waste and
pollution prevention projects. Grants must fund new organics
composting and conversion, green building, and moderate risk waste
initiatives described in the state "beyond waste" plan, including
backyard burning of organic materials.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,060,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Cleanup (30000015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Orphaned and Abandoned Site Cleanup Initiative (30000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $277,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Skykomish Cleanup and Restoration
(30000020)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water Grants Program (30000021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood Hazards (30000023)

Flood damage reduction measures

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Coastal Beaches in Southwest Washington (30000024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for grants for projects that improve water supplies and
help achieve instream flows by implementing watershed plans, as
follows:
(1) Surface or groundwater storage feasibility projects, where such
projects are consistent with the recommendations of the water storage
task force report to the Legislature, February 2001 (department of
ecology publication# 01-11-2002). The department shall consult the
departments of agriculture and fish and wildlife before issuing water
storage grants.
(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and
fish restoration purposes. The stream flow improvements and other
public benefits secured from these projects must be commensurate with
the investment of state funds.
(3) Water supply projects for public agriculture water supply
facilities that improve water conservation and water use efficiency.
(4) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in salmon
critical basins and areas participating in the department of fish and
wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins
where watershed plans call for additional water use or stream flow
measurement.
(5) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish
water banks, water exchanges or similar tools. The department of
ecology must give priority to water acquisitions in salmon critical
basins and in basins with approved watershed plans. The department of
ecology must place acquired water into the state's trust water rights
program (chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

Appropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Stormwater Retrofit and Low Impact Development Implementation Grant
Program (30000097)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wetland Mitigation Banking Pilot (30000098)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District (20061023)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely to construct and surface the northern mile of Rocky
Reach trail, and partially fund installation of signs, interpretive
panels, and bridges related to the 5.1 mile project.

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach Donation (20062853)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Hood Canal Wastewater (20061850)

Reappropriation:
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,772,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,802,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Wastewater (20061851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,895,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,195,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Historic Preservation (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,271,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,101,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment Major Park Upgrade (20081012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Lake Sammamish Major Park Upgrade (20081014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $783,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,033,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Storm Water Improvements (20081027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $371,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $571,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Road Preservation (20081036)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ft. Flagler - Parkwide Sewage Treatment System (20081044)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,973,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,773,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Visible Park Improvements (20081951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,930,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Nisqually Mashel State Park (20081953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $479,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,618,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,118,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Pearrygin Lake Major Park Upgrade (20082016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $967,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,367,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bay View Park Wide Wastewater Treatment System (20082041)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Bigelow House (20082850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
capital improvements to the Bigelow house. The state parks and
recreation commission must accept the donation of the Bigelow house
museum, the grounds, and the contents of the Bigelow house museum from
the Bigelow house preservation association if the Bigelow house
preservation association agrees to continue to provide staff and
programming for the museum.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ike Kinswa State Park Improvement (20082950)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pumpout Grants (20084035)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works Preservation (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,533,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,641,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,174,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trail Development (30000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,434,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Based on the plan developed during the
2007-09 biennium that addressed the key findings in the 2006 study of
the commission's capital development, execution, and monitoring
process, the commission shall, prior to allotment of funds, provide the
office of financial management a comprehensive list of deferred
maintenance projects that when completed will reduce the commission's
backlog of preservation projects. All projects included in the list
should range between $25,000 and $200,000 in total cost.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (30000006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Grant Authority (30000007)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $990,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,990,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (30000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
shall provide lists of potential purchases and sales to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature prior to committing the state parks and recreation
commission to any sale or purchase of land or buildings and prior to
any allotments made for those purchases. The list must include any
potential operating or capital cost impacts known to the state parks
and recreation commission.

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Emergency Repairs (30000010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pumpout Grants (30000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state parks and recreation commission
shall provide lists of potential purchases and sales to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature prior to committing the state parks and recreation
commission to any sale or purchase of land or buildings and prior to
any allotments made for those purchases. The list must include any
potential operating or capital cost impacts known to the state parks
and recreation commission.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,465,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,665,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park Maintenance Shop (30000024)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,188,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,188,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Initiative Projects (30000050)

None

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,626,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,698,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,324,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Twanoh State Park Storm Water Improvements (30000054)

None

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,374,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,624,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Kitsap Memorial State Park Park-wide Sewer System (30000055)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,456,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,633,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment State Park Infrastructure Improvements
(30000085)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach State Park Phase 2C Development (30000101)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach State Park Trail Development (30000169)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $168,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,412,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Mount Spokane State Park Maintenance Facility Relocation (30000171)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,138,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,282,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Flaming Geyser State Park Park-wide Infrastructure Redevelopment
(30000173)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,332,500

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,332,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Casey State Park Parkwide Wastewater Improvement Project
(30000221)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $279,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,481,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse State Park Repairs (30000230)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,989,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Dash Point State Park Sanitary Sewer Collection System (30000269)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,820,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park Visitor Orientation Center (30000289)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,840,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,765,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cape Disappointment State Parks Trails (30000306)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Kiket Island Acquisition (30000431)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Admirality Inlet Heritage Forest Acquisition (30000432)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park Housing Areas Exterior Improvements
(30000433)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $746,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,476,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Illahee State Park Wastewater Treatment Upgrade (30000447)

None

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Infrastructure Savings (30000480)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Projects (19982001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,197,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (19982003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions in section 158, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $687,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,283,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,318,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Program (19982004)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $561,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $574,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Program (20020001)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $379,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20024001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,775,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20024003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund projects in the
following order: (1) The department of natural resources Cypress
Island project; and (2) alternate projects approved by the legislature
from the same account in biennia succeeding that in which the funds
were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $479,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $637,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,363,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20024007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,740,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (20044001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,613,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,540,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,153,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,222,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,699,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,989,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,688,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,312,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20044003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,182,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,507,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20044004)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,032,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,895,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Program (20044006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (20044007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $542,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,193,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,735,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Infrastructure Grant (20044009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,738,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Youth Athletic Fields (20062952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
competitive grants for acquisition, development, and renovation of
youth athletic fields. The committee shall follow the applicable rules
of the youth athletic facilities program, except that grants for
maintenance are not eligible and the amount of a grant need not be in
proportion to the population of the city or county where the community
outdoor athletic facility is located, and if there are not enough
project applications submitted in a category within the account to meet
the requirement of equal distribution of funds to each category, the
recreation and conservation funding board may distribute any remaining
funds to other categories within the account.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (20064001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are provided solely
for grants for salmon recovery efforts. These grants may include a
grant to any regional recovery board and/or may include grants for
additional restoration projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon
recovery actions.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,012,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,522,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,466,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20064002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided for the approved list of
projects in LEAP capital document No. 2005-14 as developed on April 9,
2005.
(2) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to RCW
79A.15.050 must fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category
whether the funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment,
the unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations.
If the cumulative total for acquisition projects is less than the
statutory requirement, the difference may be allocated to the remaining
development projects.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.

Reappropriation:
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,071,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,859,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,930,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,070,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20064003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,617,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Program (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $100,000 of the reappropriation is
for the following studies:
(1) The board must prepare cost estimates for creating a database
of motorized and nonmotorized off-road trails and facilities in
Washington state. The cost estimate shall consider the possibility of
a database that allows the downloading of maps formatted for the most
widely used global positioning system devices, including the
feasibility and cost to make global positioning system maps readily
available for all users of Washington recreational lands and
facilities. For this purpose, available global positioning system maps
shall include global positioning system maps developed by state
agencies, by federal agencies, and proprietary maps offered by private
companies.
(2) The board must recommend a program for enhanced education and
enforcement regarding excessive noise from off-road vehicles. The
study must include a review of relevant existing laws and regulations.
The recommendations must address the appropriate equipment needed for
enforcement, model ordinances, enhanced educational strategies, and a
proposed grant program to assist local governments to more effectively
reduce the impact of excessive off-road vehicle noise in rural
residential neighborhoods and nonresidential areas, including
consideration of grant programs for planning departments, code
enforcement departments, health departments, or other entities of local
government.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,115,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearm and Archery Range Program (20064006)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (20064007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,080,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,420,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
National Recreation Trails Program (20064008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $501,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,299,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (20064018)

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,053,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (20082001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,859,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20084001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,986,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (20084002)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $642,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (20084003)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,121,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,479,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,083,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,667,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (20084005)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the
list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-1, developed March
17, 2007.
(2) The board shall submit a list of recommended projects to be
funded from the aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2009-2011
capital budget to the office of financial management and the
appropriate legislative committees. The list must result from a
competitive grants program developed by the board based upon, at a
minimum: (a) Uniform criteria for selecting projects and awarding
grants for up to fifty percent of the total projects cost; (b) local
community support for the projects; and (c) environmental benefits to
be derived from projects.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,326,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,699,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Hatchery Reform Program (20084006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation (20084007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $830,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (20084008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $450,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for grants to local law enforcement and noise
enforcement agencies for the enforcement of existing state noise laws
and regulations. Grants may be used to acquire noise monitoring
equipment and to compensate law enforcement agencies for staff overtime
and administrative expenses. Funds for noise enforcement grants shall
come from amounts allocated for the purposes specified in RCW
46.09.170(2)(d).

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,852,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
National Recreational Trails Program (20084009)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,606,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $894,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March
17, 2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February
13, 2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the committee may: Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000
each to counties requesting assistance in developing farmlands
preservation strategies for the purpose of seeking grants from the
farmlands preservation account in future grant cycles.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) Up to $627,299 of the reappropriation from the riparian
protection account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge
plain natural area preserve. This amount may not be expended for the
project until the department of natural resources has completed a
management plan for the preserve that maintains recreational access and
that management plan is presented to the house of representatives
capital budget and senate ways and means committees.

Reappropriation:
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,106,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,994,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (20084851)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for
grants for salmon recovery efforts. These grants may include grants to
any regional recovery board and/or may include grants for additional
restoration projects, monitoring activities, or other salmon recovery
actions.
(2) The administrative funding currently provided by the salmon
recovery funding board for the regional salmon recovery organization in
Puget Sound shall be redirected to the Puget Sound partnership created
in chapter 341, Laws of 2007.
(3) Prior to awarding project grants for projects in Puget Sound,
the salmon recovery funding board must submit the list of proposed
projects to the Puget Sound partnership for their review. The Puget
Sound partnership must provide their comments back to the salmon
recovery funding board within forty-five days of receiving the proposed
list of projects.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,616,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,681,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,297,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,703,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000001)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,080,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,882,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for the approved list of
projects to be submitted to the legislature by the governor.
(2) Funds appropriated for distribution according to RCW 79A.15.050
must fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category whether the
funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment, the
unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations. If
the cumulative total for acquisition projects is less than the
statutory requirement, the difference may be allocated to the remaining
development projects.
(3) Funds appropriated for distribution according to the provisions
of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to local
government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects. If the
cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.

Appropriation:
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Fund Board Programs (30000003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway Off-Road Vehicle Activities (NOVA) (30000004)

Appropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,858,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,418,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation (30000005)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000009)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,412,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,907,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000010)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
National Recreational Trails Program (30000012)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to awarding project grants, the salmon recovery funding
board shall submit the list of proposed projects to the Puget Sound
partnership for its review. The Puget Sound partnership shall provide
its comments back to the salmon recovery funding board within forty-five days of receiving the proposed list of projects.
(2) All estuary projects must be submitted for review and
coordination with the executive committee of the Puget Sound nearshore
partnership between the department of fish and wildlife and the United
States army corps of engineers.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000081)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to awarding project grants, the salmon recovery funding
board shall submit the list of proposed projects to the Puget Sound
partnership for its review. The Puget Sound partnership shall provide
its comments back to the salmon recovery funding board within
forty-five days of receiving the proposed list of projects.
(2) All estuary projects must be submitted for review and
coordination with the executive committee of the Puget Sound nearshore
partnership between the department of fish and wildlife and the United
States army corps of engineers.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (20084001)

Reappropriation:
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Water Quality (20084002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $387,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program Cost Share (20084005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $635,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,170,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Flood Assistance for Farm Communities (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely to
restore agricultural infrastructure and equipment necessary to repair,
replace, or maintain infrastructure that provides public health and
safety, water quality, and fish and wildlife habitat protection,
including debris removal, fencing, replacing manure lagoons, and
properly functioning equipment and facilities.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (30000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,910,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Practice Incentive Payment Loan Program (30000005)

Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Facility, Infrastructure, Lands, and Access Condition Improvements
(20061002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,970,687
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,210,687

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (20062001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for
efforts to restore nearshore habitat and estuaries in Puget Sound. The
department of fish and wildlife must focus on restoring natural
nearshore processes, including protection and restoration of beach
sediments and removal of existing bulkheads.
(2) The department of fish and wildlife shall provide the Puget
Sound partnership, as created by chapter 341, Laws of 2007 the
opportunity to review and provide comment on proposed projects and
activities recommended for funding. This review must be consistent
with the funding schedule for the program.
(3) Funded projects require a nonstate match or in-kind
contributions. The department of fish and wildlife must seek to
maximize the amount of nonstate match from local, state, tribal, and
federal partners. Individual projects require a minimum 33 percent
cash or in-kind match.
(4) Eligible projects must be within Puget Sound and identified by
a salmon recovery lead entity or marine resource committee and
identified in a current salmon recovery, watershed, or nearshore
habitat restoration and protection plan.
(5) Project evaluation criteria must be developed by the Puget
Sound nearshore steering committee. The criteria must be consistent
with the technical guidance developed by the Puget Sound nearshore
science team and shall be coordinated with the salmon recovery funding
board to ensure that project funding and matching requirements are
maximized to the greatest extent possible.
(6) The department of fish and wildlife must not utilize any amount
of this reappropriation to support administration or overhead. Funding
to support the administration of the funds and the implementation of
selected projects must be obtained from the department of fish and
wildlife's operating budget.
(7) In recognition of the urgent need to complete the Puget Sound
nearshore ecosystem restoration project general investigation, up to
$723,000 of this reappropriation may be used to match federal funds
implementing the cost-share agreement between the department and the
United States army corps of engineers.
(8) Up to $2,698,735 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
the following projects:

Project Amount
Carpenter creek estuary phase 1 (South Kingston road) $637,000
Duwamish Garden estuary restoration $300,000
Seahurst Park bulkhead phase II $1,100,000
Lower Dosewallips floodplain $609,875
Titlow Beach pocket estuary restoration $51,860

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,910,134
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,510,134

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,189,866
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,445,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,749,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,699,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Statewide Fencing Renovation and Replacement (20081009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,231,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,431,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,025,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081014)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Wiley Slough Restoration (20081028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $265,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,030,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,092,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Bee Be Property (20081029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,373,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Issaquah Hatchery Gravity Intake (20081850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $462,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Spokane Region One Office Phase 2 (20082008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,611,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,258,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3170 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skookumchuck Hatchery Renovation (20082015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,728,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $478,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3171 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Stemilt Basin Acquisition (20082029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3172 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

The reappropriations and appropriations in this section are subject
to the following conditions and limitations: $2,300,000 of the
reappropriations and appropriations are provided solely for capital
projects and engineering to pay the total cost of labor and materials
provided by the department of fish and wildlife.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000

Appropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,625,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $173,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3173 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000149)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $677,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,677,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3174 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Soos Creek Hatchery (20081002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,683,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,483,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3175 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Methow Culverts Replacement (20081027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $384,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3176 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Appropriation:
Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3177 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000022)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,551,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,050,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3178 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Access Areas Preservation (30000086)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,067,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3179 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skamania Hatchery Intake Replacement (30000088)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $824,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,724,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3180 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Grays River Hatchery Intake Replacement (30000089)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,499,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,048,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3181 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Washougal Hatchery Pond Renovation (30000094)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,236,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,236,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3182 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Beaver Creek Fish Passage (30000103)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,462,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,462,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3183 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Johns River Fish Passage and Estuary Restoration (30000104)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $893,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,093,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3184 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Cherry Valley Fish Passage and Stream Restoration (30000105)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3185 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
McDonald Road Access Dike Setback and Riparian Restoration
(30000107)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3186 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (30000135)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,665,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,665,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3187 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (30000145)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,780,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,723,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3188 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000147)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,182,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,122,267
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,304,267

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3189 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Emergency Projects (30000161)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3190 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000173)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,209,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,459,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3191 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Programmatic (30000179)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3192 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Lake Rufus Woods Fishing Access (30000241)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3193 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Deschutes Watershed Center (20062008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $979,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,216,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,315,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3194 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Chambers Creek Adult Trap (20081004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,544,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3195 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Tokul Creek Hatchery (20081005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $345,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,902,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3196 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Blanchard Mountain (20081951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,998,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3197 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Projects (30000071)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3198 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Areas Facilities Preservation and Access (30000079)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,499,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,923,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,422,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3199 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Recreation Capital Renovations (30000109)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $816,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,682,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,498,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3200 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (30000050)

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement (30000051)

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000052)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (30000060)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (30000061)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Statewide Aquatic Restoration Projects (30000062)

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
State Lands Maintenance (30000063)

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,732,050
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,732,050

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Riparian Open Space Program (30000064)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Community and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (30000065)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Forest
Reserve Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (30000066)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year leases for,
certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for
state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, housing and essential
government services, or recreation purposes.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred must be
deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.
(3) Property subject to lease agreements under this section must be
appraised at fair market value. Lease terms must be fifty years with
options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease payments must be
lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of
the lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using
professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed
the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section. Transfer and lease agreements for properties identified
in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the
use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer and lease
agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request
alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are
compatible with the original intended public purpose and the department
and legislature approves such uses.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers that, after
the deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, eighty percent of the total value of transferred property is
timber value and is deposited in the common school construction
account. To achieve the eighty percent requirement, the department may
choose to lease properties originally intended as transfers.
(9) On June 30, 2011, the state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction account and the appropriations in this section
shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,428,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,428,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Programmatic (30000067)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,385,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Right-of-Way Acquisition (30000069)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000070)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,968,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,968,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works - Preservation (30000098)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $201,000
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $134,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $479,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,079,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Fair Improvements (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works - Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Sanitary System (20082002)

Reappropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,837,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4003 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Replace Existing Dormitory (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,229,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4004 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Seattle Crime Laboratory Expansion (20092102)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,377,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $565,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,942,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4005 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works Projects (30000015)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $570,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4006 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION
Columbia River Dredging (2003H001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,723,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4007 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION
Culvert Replacements (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD
Higher Education Preservation Information (30000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely to refresh preservation information that resides in the
state's comparable framework for higher education buildings including
any necessary revisions or adjustments that will enable more direct
translation of information, updates for last renewal or replacement of
major systems, and quality assurance field sampling. In executing this
continued capital study, the higher education coordinating board shall
consult the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees about its workplan to ensure timely delivery of assembled
facilities information and related capital models in an easy to
understand format. As a general condition, upon appropriations
provided to higher education agencies in this act, the state board for
community and technical colleges and each state baccalaureate
institution shall provide requested facilities information in a timely
manner to enable the higher education coordinating board to complete
the tasks and oversight assigned in this section.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2001-03 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20024001)

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,993,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2003-05 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20044001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,346,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,074,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,371,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $194,211,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-07 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20064100)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,975,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $545,519,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $641,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-07 Apple Achievement Awards (20064850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions in section 196, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $496,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2005-07 High Performance School Building Grants (20064852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,308,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,103,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Aviation High School (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Regional School Construction Assistance Program (20082857)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (20084200)

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $352,207,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $376,350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,650,300

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,056,700
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,707,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $866,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,370,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,440,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Small Repair Grants (30000036)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Capital Project Administration (30000037)

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,097,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,434,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Center Minor Capital Projects (30000002)

Appropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,694,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program-Maintenance
(30000031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In calculating square foot eligibility for
state assistance grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be
reduced by fifty percent.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $430,992,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $311,702,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,806,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $827,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,921,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,748,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $820,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,290,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Vocational Education, Cafeteria, and Maintenance Support Building
(20082002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,713,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,187,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
Minor Works Preservation (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,794,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,794,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell and Cascadia Community College - State Route 522 Off
Ramp (20022014)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,695,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Computing and Communications Upgrades and Data Center (20082004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20061002)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20061003)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (20061005)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,510,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,510,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Clark Hall Renovation (20061007)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,054,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,054,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Denny Hall Renovation (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Balmer Hall Reconstruction (20081004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Intermediate Student Service and Classroom Improvements (20081005)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,781,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,281,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (20082001)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Interdisciplinary Academic Building (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,554,000
Higher Education Non-Proprietary Local
Capital Accounts--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,554,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,554,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Phase 3 (20082005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,044,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,194,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Bothell Phase 3 - Predesign (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,013,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,163,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Burke Museum Renovation (20082850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Soils Remediation (20082852)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Miller Hall Renovation (20091001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,981,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Anderson Hall Renovation (20091002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,225,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (20092003)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,526,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma Phase 4 (20102002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,225,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,725,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Global Public Health and Pharmacy Building (30000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,205,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
House of Knowledge Longhouse (30000021)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,757,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,057,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000027)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Program (30000110)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Infrastructure Savings (30000289)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Biomedical Sciences Facility (20042009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,380,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Pullman - Biotechnology and Life Sciences 2 (20042085)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane - Nursing Building at Riverpoint (20042941)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(20062950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,707,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,596,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Undergraduate Classroom Building (20062951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,977,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,023,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Utilities Extension (20081100)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,036,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,536,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
University-wide Infrastructure (20081701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Library Road Infrastructure (20081703)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,334,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082002)

Reappropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,045,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,655,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Animal Diagnostic and Research Biocontainment, Phase 1 (20082046)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,909,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,109,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical & Health Sciences (20162953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,865,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,115,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000065)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,628,000
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,628,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,628,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000066)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,460,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (30000421)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081002)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,416,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Biology Chemistry Science Center (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,491,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,891,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000044)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,868,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety and Code Compliance (30000053)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000054)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000055)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000056)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (30000421)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Dean Hall Renovation (20061004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,375,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081009)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,035,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,690,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,290,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (20081011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,202,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,890,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health Safety and Code Requirements (30000002)

none

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $690,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000025)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Samuelson Hall Renovation (30000048)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,139,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,305,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Science Phase 2 (30000045)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,870,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (30000421)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Preservation (20081001)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $925,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,375,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Program (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Longhouse Expansion (20082007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
College Activities Building Renovation (20082009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,120,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Communications Building Preservation and Renovation (30000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,835,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,656,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Preservation (30000003)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, Code Compliance (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Laboratory and Art Annex Building Renovation (30000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $514,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,335,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Program (30000031)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,550,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Infrastructure (30000046)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Lecture Hall - Predesign (30000126)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Savings (30000421)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Instructional Center (20022026)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,844,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (20041953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,773,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,273,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Carver Academic Renovation (20081060)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,676,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,130,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,206,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081090)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,533,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,933,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081091)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,351,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,051,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081092)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,116,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Academic Facilities Modernization Projects (20082099)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facilities Preservation (30000005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,911,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure (30000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,213,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,213,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,213,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
College of Fine and Performing Arts Armory Renovation (30000008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,053,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,303,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,456,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Infrastructure Savings (30000421)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific-Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (2002S001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,221,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant (20024001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $809,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,727,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (20044004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $690,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,310,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 733, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,318,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,346,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,664,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Tacoma State History Museum Building Preservation (20071001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $425,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
project list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects.
(3) The 2011-13 projects must be selected based on their readiness
to proceed.

Project Recommended

Wenatchee Valley Museum $150,000

West Point Light Station $300,000

Des Moines Field House $420,000

Washington Hall $381,000

Percival Landing $567,000

Roslyn City Hall & Library $194,000

Spokane County courthouse $500,000

Snoqualmie Chapel car #5 $125,000

Edmonds Carnegie Library
museum $48,000

Ilwaco museum collections $41,000

Minkler Mansion $200,000

Cheney house for a museum $87,000

Longview Columbia theatre $1,000,000

Chinook School $350,000

Territorial Courthouse of 1858 $167,000

Hanford Interpretive Center $147,000

Carnegie Library Museum $883,000

Dynamite Train Canopy $50,000

King Street Station $750,000

Lakewood Carriage House $110,000

Lincoln School $175,000

Quincy Pioneer Church $195,000

Ezra Meeker Mansion $100,000

Port Townsend Storage Facility $450,000

Puyallup Church Spire $17,000

Morris House and Washington
Harbor School $27,000

Kalama Interpretive Center $212,000

Foss Waterway Seaport
Building $750,000

Pioneer State Bank Building $201,000

Kirkman House $32,000

Malo Sawmill $70,000

Stimson-Green Mansion $23,000

Lightship #83 $335,000

Masonic Temple Building $350,000

Wilkeson Centennial
Monument $10,000

Eddon Boatyard ways and dock $243,000

Commencement Restoration $86,000

Vessel Shenandoah $179,000

Walt's Mill $75,000

TOTAL $10,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000093)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Museum System Repair and Upgrades/Preservation (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,857,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $534,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,534,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Minor Works - Program (30000008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $698,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Historical Courthouse Rehabilitation (20082851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for courthouse
protection and preservation, including character defining architectural
features, general repairs, system upgrades, payments for renovation
completed since January 1, 2006, and improvements to access and
accommodations for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation work
must comply with the secretary of interior's standards for
rehabilitation. Grants may not be used for expenditures for courthouse
maintenance. Only counties with historic courthouses that continue to
maintain county functions are eligible for grants. Counties receiving
grants shall provide an equal amount of matching funds from public or
private sources. The department shall use up to two percent of the
appropriation for program administration.
(2) The society shall continue to use the revised eligibility
criteria and grant application process that includes the review of
projects selected for funding by the courthouse advisory committee.
Those projects chosen for funding shall undergo a review by the
department of general administration's barrier free program to ensure
that they meet Americans with disabilities act standards and
accessibility and all other Americans with disabilities act
requirements are maintained during the construction. The existing
historic courthouse advisory committee shall continue to review grant
applications and make funding recommendations to the state historic
preservation officer.
(3) The society and the courthouse advisory committee shall include
readiness to proceed when developing the priority list of projects to
fund.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Historic Barn Preservation (20084851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the heritage barn preservation program created in
chapter 333, Laws of 2007.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $342,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Historic Barn Preservation (30000098)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of the heritage barn preservation program created in
chapter 333, Laws of 2007. Projects must be selected based on their
readiness to proceed.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Courthouse Preservation (30000099)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for courthouse protection
and preservation, including character defining architectural features,
general repairs, system upgrades, payments for renovation completed
since January 1, 2006, and improvements to access and accommodations
for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation work must comply
with the secretary of interior's standards for rehabilitation. Grants
may not be used for expenditures for courthouse maintenance. Only
counties with historic courthouses that continue to maintain county
functions are eligible for grants. Counties receiving grants shall
provide an equal amount of matching funds from public or private
sources. The department shall use up to two percent of the
appropriation for program administration.
(2) The society shall continue to use the revised eligibility
criteria and grant application process that includes the review of
projects selected for funding by the courthouse advisory committee.
Those projects chosen for funding shall undergo a review by the
department of general administration's barrier free program to ensure
that they meet the Americans with disabilities act standards and that
all other Americans with disabilities act requirements are maintained
during the construction. The existing historic courthouse advisory
committee shall continue to review grant applications and make funding
recommendations to the state historic preservation officer.
(3) The society and the courthouse advisory committee shall include
readiness to proceed when developing the priority list of projects to
fund.
(4) Projects must be selected based on their readiness to proceed.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup - Phase III Expansion (20002676)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $84,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,251,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,335,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College - Science Building (20012687)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,996,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,996,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5136 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Science Building (20012688)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,804,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,804,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5137 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Glenn Anthon Hall - Replacement
(20041207)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,045,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,645,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5138 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College - Replacement Science and Technology Building
(20041208)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,603,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,640,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5139 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College - Science Building Replacement (20041209)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,999,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,037,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,073,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5140 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Science Building Replacement (20041212)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,995,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,722,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5141 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College - Welding and Auto Collision
Replacement (20041213)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,659,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,038,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5142 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Lower Columbia College - Instructional Fine Arts Building
(20041214)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,362,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,662,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5143 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College - East County Satellite (20041689)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,576,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,576,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5144 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Computer Technology Center
(20042682)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,799,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,999,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5145 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College - Science and Technology (20042690)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,285,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5146 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Puyallup - Communication Arts and Health Building
(20042691)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,987,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5147 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College - University Center at North Puget Sound
(20042692)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,999,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,813,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,812,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5148 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Cascadia - Center for Arts, Technology, Communication (20042693)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,063,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,604,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,667,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5149 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College, Fort Steilacoom - Science and Technology (20042694)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,376,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,018,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,394,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5150 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College - Science Complex (20042695)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,870,500
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,120,500

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5151 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College - Science Building (20042850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,863,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,113,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5152 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls - Business and Social Science Building (20051853)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,313,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5153 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College - Training Facility (20051854)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,701,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,752,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5154 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works Preservation (Repairs and Minor Improvements)
(20061001)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,526,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5155 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs (20061010)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,340,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5156 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs (20061050)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,327,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,327,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5157 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs (20061090)

Reappropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,517,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,837,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5158 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College - Humanities and Student Services (20061204)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,104,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5159 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Humanities and Classroom Building
(20061205)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,928,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,809,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5160 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College - Vocational Education Renovation (20061303)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,142,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,372,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5161 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Information Technologies and
Visual Communications (20061304)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,876,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5162 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College - Library Renovation (20061305)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,960,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5163 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College - Brier Hall Renovation (20061307)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,604,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,304,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5164 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College - Science Lab Renovation
(20061308)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5165 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College - Annex Renovation (20061312)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,559,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,739,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5166 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Physical Education Renovation
(20061313)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,295,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5167 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Raymond Hall Renovation
(20061325)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,019,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5168 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom - Cascade Core Phase I (20061326)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,453,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,953,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5169 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College - Wellness Center Repairs
(20061330)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $295,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,705,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5170 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Water System Replacement (20061501)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,943,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5171 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Maritime Academy Repairs
(20061502)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $216,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,956,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5172 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (20061751)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $539,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,177,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,716,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5173 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (20062130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,343,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,263,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5174 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Greenhouse/Educational Center
(20062410)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5175 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Campus Classrooms (20062696)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,082,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,884,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5176 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College - Allied Health Building
(20062697)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,332,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,929,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5177 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College - Learning Resource Center
(20062698)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,256,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $209,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,465,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5178 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College - Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,405,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5179 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College - Employment Resource Center
(20062851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,090,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5180 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College - Automotive Building (Phase I)
(20062951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5181 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation - Repairs and Minor Improvements
(20081001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,663,000 of the reappropriation is
provided solely for emergency repairs to the L Building at Bellevue
Community College. Repairs include water leaks, mold, and other
related damage and will restore the building and eliminate the
potential for future problems.

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5182 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation - Roof Repairs (20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,455,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,455,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,221,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,676,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5183 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081050)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,243,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5184 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081090)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,158,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,082,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5185 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,111,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,438,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,491,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5186 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College - Vocational Building (20081217)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $892,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,204,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $910,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,006,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5187 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College - Business and Humanities Center (20081218)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,397,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,697,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5188 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Chemistry and Life Science
Building (20081219)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,783,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5189 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5190 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College - Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,301,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,205,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5191 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Trades and Industry Building
(20081222)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,737,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5192 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College - Instructional Resource Center
(20081223)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,103,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,087,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,927,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5193 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College - Academic and Student Services Building
(20081224)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,949,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5194 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College - Health and Science Building (20081225)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,969,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,405,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,874,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5195 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College - Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,583,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,478,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5196 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Edison North Renovation
(20081314)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,284,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5197 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College - Business Education Building (20081315)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,420,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,020,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5198 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College - Building 22 Renovation
(20081316)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,013,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,002,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,346,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,361,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5199 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Brown Dental Hygiene Building
(20081317)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5200 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College - Meadowdale Hall Renovation (20081318)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,006,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,256,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5201 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Building 7 Renovation (20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $650,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,748,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $359,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,757,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5202 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Music Building 15 Renovation
(20081320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $481,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,806,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $661,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,948,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5203 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom - Cascade Core Phase II (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $902,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,340,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,641,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5204 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Primary Electrical Replacement
(20081506)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,870,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5205 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Edmonds Community College - Primary Electrical Replacement
(20081508)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $666,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,466,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5206 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College - L Building Emergency Repairs
(20081850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $303,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,663,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5207 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (20082130)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5208 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Shoreline Community College - Automotive Training Center (20082413)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $994,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5209 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia College - Health and Wellness Education Center (20082414)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5210 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Magnuson Building Remodel
(20082415)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $941,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5211 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College - Child Care Facility (20082416)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5212 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College - Child and Family Studies Center (20082417)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $991,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5213 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College - Early Childhood Education and Child Care
Center (20082418)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $970,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5214 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Walla Walla Community College - Culinary Arts/Student Development
Center (20082419)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5215 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College - Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,946,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,565,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5216 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College - Health Science Building (20082702)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,506,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5217 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College - Mohler Communications Technology Center
(20082703)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,755,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $153,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,398,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,326,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5218 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Columbia Basin College - Social Science Center (20082704)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,413,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,041,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,565,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5219 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College - Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(20082705)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,506,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $225,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,598,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,354,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5220 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Higher Education Cost Escalation (20082850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the state board for community and technical colleges to assist public
community and technical colleges to manage unanticipated cost
escalation for projects bid during the 2007-09 biennium. Not more than
$750,000 shall be made available to any single project and amounts
provided for this purpose must be matched equally from other resources.
The state board for community and technical colleges shall manage the
distribution of funds to ensure that the requesting college has managed
its project within the current appropriation through preparation of bid
documents and that the scope of the project is no greater than was
originally specified in the design. Prior to the office of financial
management approving use of a minor works appropriation as a match, and
its transfer to the project with unanticipated cost escalation, the
state board for community and technical colleges shall require the
college to describe what it has done to identify and develop
alternative resources for a match, and the specific minor works
projects that would be deferred as a result of the transfer. The state
board for community and technical colleges will report to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature on the use of these funds.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,796,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $442,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,238,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5221 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000010)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,493,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,493,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5222 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000036)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,710,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5223 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000048)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5224 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (30000078)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,858,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,714,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,572,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $99,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5225 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - College and City Library
(30000113)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5226 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College - Sophia Bremer Child Development Center (30000115)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5227 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College - Fisheries Program (30000117)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5228 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College - Myklebust Gymnasium (30000118)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5229 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College - Music and Arts Center (30000119)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5230 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College - Seattle Maritime Academy
(30000120)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,839,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,483,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,322,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5231 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College - Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,464,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,509,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,973,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5232 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College - College Instruction Center (30000122)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,759,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,009,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5233 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia College - Student Services (30000123)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,583,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,833,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5234 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Photography and Fine Arts
(30000124)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,736,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,986,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5235 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College - Hospitality Institute (30000125)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,919,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,169,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5236 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College - Allied Health and Early Childhood Development
Center (30000126)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,642,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5237 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor - Student Services and Instructional Building
(30000127)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,065,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,437,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5238 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College - Cascade Court (30000128)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,850,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5239 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College - Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,976,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,337,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,313,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5240 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Science Math and Technology
Building (30000130)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,545,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5241 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College - West Wing Renovation (30000131)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,077,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,484,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5242 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College - Shop Building Renovation (30000132)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,459,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,709,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5243 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Seattle Community College - Automotive Technology Building
(30000133)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,141,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,391,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5244 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Renton Technical College - Automotive Complex Renovation (30000134)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,160,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5245 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College - North County Satellite (30000135)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,087,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5246 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College - Learning Resource Center (30000136)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $330,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,616,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,946,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5247 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College - Infrastructure (30000190)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,061,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5248 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (30000210)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,116,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,116,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5249 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,208,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,010,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5250 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Infrastructure Savings (30000421)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Projects that are completed in accordance
with section 6004 of this act may have their remaining funds
transferred to this appropriation for other preservation projects
approved by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects,
progress reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the
project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports will be
submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007 The department of general administration
shall not charge the facility depreciation component of lease charges
for nonprofit tenants in the building adjoining Capitol Way and 11th
avenue during the 2009-2011 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into
financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or
nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the
principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under
this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract
option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase
agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or
financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures
made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue
date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of
participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to
the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the
state finance committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $685,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the preservation of the
transportation building.
(2) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,958,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.
(3) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(4) University of Washington: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $86,526,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects.
(5) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $15,750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects. If funds in this
subsection are used to finance the wastewater reclamation project, all
treated effluent may be used only for the domestic water requirements
of the Pullman energy plant and chilled water facilities and irrigating
general university grounds, excluding the golf course.
(6) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $7,788,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects.
(7) Eastern Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $5,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for campus projects.
(8) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $109,804,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for various campus projects.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of North Seattle
Community College for up to $23,721,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
employment resource center.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellingham
Technical College for up to $1,390,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
instructional resource center.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
College for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop the Myklebust
gymnasium.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community
College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide space for allied
health and construction industry.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $3,400,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Riverpoint One
building.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community
College for up to $25,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a student fitness and
health center.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a music and
art center.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community
College for up to $6,900,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Federal Way
towne center.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $6,900,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire up to forty
acres for campus expansion.
(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 40,000
square foot addition to Green River Kent station.
(9) Washington state convention and trade center: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the museum
condominium unit located adjacent to the state convention center.
(10) Office of the secretary of state: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $134,935,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the heritage
center. The heritage center is one part of a combined facility of the
heritage center and executive office building, authorized in subsection
(11) of this section.
(11) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $79,981,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to construct the executive office building. The executive office
building is one part of a combined facility of the executive office
building and the heritage center authorized in subsection (9) of this
section.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $10,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the John L. O'Brien building, subject to
approval of the project scope by the speaker of the house of
representatives and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated
in this act for original construction of school plant facilities is
provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects
in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided
solely for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The Washington state arts commission may combine the
proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art
or mobile art displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2009-2011 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces
in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2011-2013 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 (1) "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2009, from the 2007-2009 biennial
appropriations for each project.
(2) "Reappropriations" in sections 5126, 5130, and 5131 of this act
shall be reduced in this act to the unexpended balance remaining as of
the end of fiscal year 2009 for the 2007-09 biennial appropriations in
sections 1085, 1086, and 5145, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS.
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from the
state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds.
Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter
. . ., Laws of 2009 for deposit into the state taxable building
construction account that are in excess of amounts required to comply
with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations shall
be deposited into the state building construction account. The state
treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building
construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6017 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the fiscal committees of the legislature, may select
capital projects that have completed predesign to undergo a budget
evaluation study. The budget evaluation study team approach using
value engineering techniques must be utilized by the office of
financial management in conducting the studies. The office of
financial management shall select the budget evaluation team members,
contract for the study, and report the results to the legislature and
agencies in a timely manner following the study. Funds from the
project appropriation must be used by the office of financial
management through an interagency agreement with the affected agencies
to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the
Common School Construction Account, an
amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000,000

Sec. 6019 RCW 43.155.050 and 2008 c 328 s 6002 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. For the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium, moneys in the account
may be used for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter
488, Laws of 2005 ((, for the infrastructure investment system
implementation plan identified in section 1022, chapter 328, Laws of
2008)); for the interest rate buy-down pilot program identified in
section 1004, chapter 328, Laws of 2008; and for the housing
assistance, weatherization, and affordable housing program identified
in section 1005, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in *RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to *RCW 44.28.801(2). Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. ((The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.))

Sec. 6020 RCW 43.155.068 and 2001 c 131 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may make low-interest or interest-free loans to local
governments for preconstruction activities on public works projects
before ((the legislature approves)) the construction phase of the
project. Preconstruction activities include design, engineering, bid-document preparation, environmental studies, right-of-way acquisition,
and other preliminary phases of public works projects as determined by
the board. The purpose of the loans authorized in this section is to
accelerate the completion of public works projects by allowing
preconstruction activities to be performed before the approval of the
construction phase of the project ((by the legislature)).
(2) Projects receiving loans for preconstruction activities under
this section must be evaluated using the priority process and factors
in RCW 43.155.070(((2)))(4). The receipt of a loan for preconstruction
activities does not ensure the receipt of a construction loan for the
project under this chapter. Construction loans for projects receiving
a loan for preconstruction activities under this section are subject to
((legislative approval under RCW 43.155.070 (4) and (5))) the board's
priority and selection process pursuant to this chapter. The board
shall adopt a single application process for local governments seeking
both a loan for preconstruction activities under this section and a
construction loan for the project.

Sec. 6021 RCW 43.155.070 and 2008 c 299 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(k) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(l) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each year, the board shall develop and
submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives a description of the loans made under ((RCW 43.155.065,
43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section)) this chapter during
the preceding fiscal year ((and a prioritized list of projects which
are recommended for funding by the legislature,)) including one copy to
the staff of each of the committees. The ((list)) description shall
include, but not be limited to, a ((description)) summary of each
project and ((recommended)) its financing, the terms and conditions of
the loan or financial guarantee, the local government jurisdiction and
unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's critical need
for the project and documentation of local funds being used to finance
the public works project. The ((list)) description shall also include
measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction ((recommended for))
to receive financial assistance, compared to authorized limits and
state averages, including local government sales taxes; real estate
excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes on sewerage,
water, garbage, and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account ((before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board)) unless the
project has been considered under the priority process provided in this
section.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 6022 RCW 40.14.024 and 2008 c 328 s 6005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The local government archives account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected by the county auditors under RCW
40.14.027 and 36.22.175 for local government services, such as
providing records scheduling, security microfilm inspection and
storage, archival preservation, cataloging, and indexing for local
government records and digital data and access to those records and
data through the regional branch archives of the division of archives
and records management, must be deposited into the account, and
expenditures from the account may be used only for these purposes.
During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local government archives account to the Washington
state heritage center account such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance in the account.

Sec. 6023 RCW 43.09.282 and 2008 c 328 s 6007 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of centralized funding, accounting, and
distribution of the costs of the audits performed on local governments
by the state auditor, there is hereby created an account entitled the
municipal revolving account. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the account. All moneys received by the state auditor or by any
officer or employee thereof shall be deposited with the state treasurer
and credited to the municipal revolving account. Only the state
auditor or the auditor's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. No appropriation is required for expenditures. The state
auditor shall keep such records as are necessary to detail the auditing
costs attributable to the various types of local governments. During
the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the municipal revolving account to the Washington state
heritage center account such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in
the account.

Sec. 6024 RCW 67.40.040 and 2008 c 329 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170, and during the
((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
state convention and trade center account to the Washington housing
trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
account; and during the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the state convention and trade center
account to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance in the account;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center;
(iv) For debt service for the acquisition, design, and construction
and retrofit of the museum of history and industry museum property or
other future expansions of the convention center as approved by the
legislature; and
(v) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this section,
starting in fiscal year 2008, the state treasurer shall transfer:
(a) The sum of four million dollars, or as much as may be available
pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the state
convention and trade center account to the tourism enterprise account,
with the maximum transfer being four million dollars per fiscal year;
and
(b) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much as may be
available pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the
state convention and trade center account to the tourism development
and promotion account, with the maximum transfer being five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year.
(6)(a) Funds required for debt service payments and reserves for
bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030; for debt service authorized under RCW
67.40.170; and for the issuance and sale of financial instruments
associated with the acquisition, design, construction, and retrofit of
the museum of history and industry museum property or for other future
expansions of the center, as approved by the legislature, shall be
maintained within the state convention and trade center account.
(b) No less than six million one hundred fifty thousand dollars per
year shall be retained in the state convention and trade center account
for funding capital maintenance as required by the center's long-term
capital plan, facility enhancements, unanticipated replacements, and
operating reserves for the convention center operation. This amount
shall be escalated annually as follows:
(i) Four percent for annual inflation for capital maintenance,
repairs, and replacement;
(ii) An additional two percent for enhancement to the facility; and
(iii) An additional three percent for growth in expenditure due to
aging of the facility and the need to maintain an operating reserve.
(c) Sufficient funds shall be reserved within the state convention
and trade center account to fund operating appropriations for the
annual operation of the convention center.

Sec. 6025 RCW 79.17.010 and 2008 c 328 s 6012 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands;
(b) Consolidate and block-up state lands;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands;
(e) Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by the
board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state land
is held.
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4) During the biennium ending June 30, ((2009)) 2011, for the
purposes of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring
natural resource lands at risk of development, the department, with
approval of the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land
and any timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when
it can be demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be
better fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the resource management cost account
to pay for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the exchange partner
may not exceed five percent of the total value of the exchange. The
receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of the transaction
from an exchange to a sale.
(5) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 6026 RCW 79.17.020 and 2008 c 328 s 6013 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of any county and/or the
mayor and city council or city commission of any city or town and/or
the board shall have authority to exchange, each with the other, or
with the federal forest service, the federal government or any proper
agency thereof and/or with any private landowner, county land of any
character, land owned by municipalities of any character, and state
forest land owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the
department, for real property of equal value for the purpose of
consolidating and blocking up the respective land holdings of any
county, municipality, the federal government, or the state of
Washington or for the purpose of obtaining lands having commercial
recreational leasing potential.
(2) During the biennium ending June 30, ((2009)) 2011, for the
purposes of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring
natural resource lands at risk of development, the department, with
approval of the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land
and any timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when
it can be demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be
better fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the forest development account to pay
for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the exchange partner
may not exceed five percent of the total value of the exchange. The
receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of the transaction
from an exchange to a sale.
(3) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues, and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 6027 RCW 43.19.501 and 2008 c 328 s 6016 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the
state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account
may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by
the department of general administration in Thurston county. For the
((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for
predesign identified in section 1037, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

Sec. 6028 RCW 43.99N.060 and 2008 c 328 s 6017 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The stadium and exhibition center account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the taxes imposed
under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW 67.70.240(5) shall be
deposited into the account. Only the director of the office of
financial management or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required
for expenditures from this account.
(2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up to five million
dollars per year beginning January 1, 1999, shall be used for the
purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, all remaining moneys in
the account shall be transferred to the public stadium authority,
created under RCW 36.102.020, to be used for public stadium authority
operations and development of the stadium and exhibition center.
(3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all moneys in the
stadium and exhibition center account shall be used exclusively for the
following purposes in the following priority:
(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office of financial
management shall accumulate in the stadium and exhibition center
account an amount at least equal to the amount required in the next
succeeding twelve months for the payment of principal of and interest
on the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020;
(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected
average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued
under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained in the
account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at any time if
necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, and,
following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the first tax revenues and
other amounts deposited in the account after meeting the requirements
of (a) of this subsection; and
(c) The balance, if any, shall be transferred to the youth athletic
facility account under subsection (4) of this section.
Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by RCW 36.38.010(5)
and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used as provided under (a) and
(b) of this subsection would cause the loss of any tax exemption under
federal law for interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be
deposited in and used exclusively for the purposes of the youth
athletic facility account and shall not be used, directly or
indirectly, as a source of payment of principal of or interest on bonds
issued under RCW 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds
used for that purpose.
(4) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account not
required or permitted to be used for the purposes described in
subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be deposited in the
youth athletic facility account hereby created in the state treasury.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of grants
or loans to cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations for
community outdoor athletic facilities. ((For the 2005-2007 biennium,
moneys in the account may also be used for a recreation level of
service study for local and regional active recreation facilities.))
Only the director of the recreation and conservation office or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The athletic
facility grants or loans may be used for acquiring, developing,
equipping, maintaining, and improving community outdoor athletic
facilities. Funds shall be divided equally between the development of
new community outdoor athletic facilities, the improvement of existing
community outdoor athletic facilities, and the maintenance of existing
community outdoor athletic facilities. Cities, counties, and qualified
nonprofit organizations must submit proposals for grants or loans from
the account. To the extent that funds are available, cities, counties,
and qualified nonprofit organizations must meet eligibility criteria as
established by the director of the recreation and conservation office.
The grants and loans shall be awarded on a competitive application
process and the amount of the grant or loan shall be in proportion to
the population of the city or county for where the community outdoor
athletic facility is located. Grants or loans awarded in any one year
need not be distributed in that year. In the ((2007–2009)) 2009-2011
biennium, if there are not enough project applications submitted in a
category within the account to meet the requirement of equal
distribution of funds to each category, the director of the recreation
and conservation office may distribute any remaining funds to other
categories within the account. The director of the recreation and
conservation office may expend up to one and one-half percent of the
moneys deposited in the account created in this subsection for
administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6029 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Self-Contained Breathing Apparatus Building Completion (30000014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000

Sec. 6030 2008 c 328 s 5001 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (08-4-200)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For state assistance grants for purposes of calculating square
foot eligibility, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced
by fifty percent.
(2) The legislature has made a commitment to phase in all-day
kindergarten programs beginning with the 2007-08 school year. However,
the legislature finds that one potential barrier to successful
expansion of all-day kindergarten programs may be a lack of facilities
that meet the requirements of an all-day kindergarten program. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the school facilities citizen advisory panel, shall examine
alternatives for addressing school facilities needs for all-day
kindergarten programs, including adapting existing unused space,
creating innovative public-private partnerships and partnerships with
early learning providers, shifting the location of current programs
within a district or a school, and temporary, limited use of portables.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
report to the capital budget committee of the house of representatives
and the ways and means committee of the senate by September 1, 2007,
with recommendations on preferred alternatives and an analysis of the
feasibility and cost of implementing the alternatives.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall review and evaluate the
cost and other implications of changing the current annual release
cycle for the school construction assistance program. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report
resulting from their review and evaluation by December 1, 2008. This
report must include a specific plan for implementing the change in the
2009-2011 biennium.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,394,000))
$152,394,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($769,185,000))
$639,185,000
Common School Reimbursable Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,495,689,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,287,448,000

Sec. 6031 2007 c 520 s 6013 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS.
The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from
any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Washington state patrol: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $1,360,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the dormitory facility at the
Washington state patrol fire training academy in North Bend,
Washington.
(2) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $685,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the preservation of the
transportation building.
(3) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $17,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide additional work release beds.
(4) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract in an amount not to exceed $2,000,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop Cama
Beach state park.
(5) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Kent
Station phase 2.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community
College for up to $3,600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an early childhood
education and learning center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin
College for up to $300,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an academic support
and achievement center.
(6) Evergreen State College: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $16,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the college activities building
renovation.
(7) Washington state convention and trade center: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $58,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and
renovate the museum condominium unit located adjacent to the state
convention center. The purchase price shall not exceed fair market
value. A purchase agreement with the owner of the unit on the
effective date of this section shall include the following
requirements: (a) Upon completion of the purchase of the property, the
seller shall retain $5,750,000 of the sale proceeds in a restricted
investment account, reserving such funds for capital costs associated
with development of its principal heritage center to be located within
the city of Seattle. Principal and accrued earnings in such an account
shall be available for expenditure by the seller when the seller or the
city of Seattle has executed a construction contract for either a new
facility or improvements to an existing structure to serve as the
principal heritage center to be operated by the seller within the city;
and (b) in the event that the conditions of (a) of this subsection are
not met by June 30, 2017, the entire amount in the restricted account
shall be transferred to the state general fund and shall represent a
recovery of the state's contribution towards the development of the
museum. In the event of such a transfer, the rightful ownership of the
property by the Washington state convention and trade center shall not
be impaired.
(8) Department of information services: Enter into a financing
contract for an amount approved by the office of financial management
for costs and financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to lease develop or lease purchase a state
((general)) data center and an office building ((and facilities)) for
the department of information services on the state-owned property
called "the Wheeler block" in Olympia. The office building((s)) shall
be constructed and financed so that agencies occupancy costs per gross
square foot or per employee will not exceed 110 percent of comparable
private market rental rates per gross square foot or per employee. The
comparable ((general)) office space rate shall be calculated based on
recent Thurston county leases of new space of at least 100,000 rentable
square feet ((adjusted for known escalation clauses, expected
inflation, and differences in the level of service provided by the
comparable leases as determined by the department in consultation with
the department of general administration. In addition to the
department of information services, state agency tenants shall include
the consolidation of state patrol offices and general office facilities
for small agencies and offices. The department of information services
shall design and operate the general office facilities for small
agencies and offices as a demonstration of the efficiencies gained from
the integration of office space and telecommunications and computer
technology. The demonstration project shall provide office space,
furniture, telecommunications, and computer technology as a single
package. The facility shall be designed so that small agencies and
offices can move in and out of the facility without the typical moving
expenses that result from individual agency ownership of furniture and
technology. The facility for small agencies and offices shall also
provide for staffing and space efficiencies resulting from central
reception, support services, and spaces. The office of financial
management shall certify to the state treasurer: (a) The project
description and dollar amount; and (b) that all requirements of this
subsection (8) have been met)). Such comparable leases shall be for
typical office space with typical office tenant improvements adjusted
for known escalation clauses, expected inflation, nontypical tenant
improvements or code requirements, leadership in energy and
environmental design requirements, nontypical on and off site
requirements, infrastructure upgrades, market conditions and
differences in the level of service provided by the comparable leases
as determined by the department in consultation with the office of
financial management. The department of information services shall
design and operate the facilities. Should the department of
information services choose to use a financing contract that does not
provide for the issuance of certificates of participation, the
financing contract shall be subject to approval by the state finance
committee as required by RCW 39.94.010. ((In approving a financing
contract not providing for the use of certificates of participation,
the state finance committee should be reasonably certain that the
contract is excluded from the computation of indebtedness, particularly
that the contract is not backed by the full faith and credit of the
state and the legislature is expressly not obligated to appropriate
funds to make payments. For purposes of this section, "financing
contract" includes but is not limited to a certificate of participation
and tax exempt financing similar to that authorized in RCW 47.79.140.))
(9) Office of the secretary of state: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $112,942,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the heritage
center. The heritage center is one part of a combined facility of the
heritage center and executive office building, authorized in subsection
(10) of this section. The authorization for financing under this
subsection (9) shall lapse unless chapter ... (Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5882, providing funding for the heritage building project), Laws of
2007 is enacted by June 30, 2007.
(10) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $75,863,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct the executive
office building. The executive office building is one part of a
combined facility of the executive office building and the heritage
center authorized in subsection (9) of this section. The authorization
for financing under this subsection (10) shall lapse unless chapter ...
(Substitute Senate Bill No. 5882, providing funding for the heritage
building project), Laws of 2007 is enacted by June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6032 Eastern Washington University is
authorized to sell its Spokane center. Proceeds from the sale must be
deposited into the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account. Proceeds may be used to acquire or design a facility on or
adjacent to the Riverpoint higher education campus for the university's
Spokane-based program offerings. Eastern Washington University must
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature upon the sale of the center and with
regard to expenditure of the proceeds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6033 Section 6002 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6034 Sections 6022 and 6023 of this act expire
June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6035 2007 c 520 s 6006 (uncodified) is
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6036 Part headings in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6037 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6038 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 6020, 6021, and 6024 through 6028 of
this act which take effect July 1, 2009.

(End of Part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 55
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 140, 236
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
WASHINGTON STATE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
--- END ---