BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the projects described and authorized by the legislature in the
capital and operating appropriations acts for the 2007-2009 and
2009-2011 fiscal bienniums, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of
the state of Washington in the sum of two billion two hundred nineteen
million dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance
these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in
this section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee
shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered
for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of
the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The proceeds from the sale of the bonds
authorized in section 1 of this act shall be deposited in the state
building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The proceeds
shall be transferred as follows:
(1) One billion nine hundred forty-seven million dollars to remain
in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;
(2) Twenty-seven million dollars to the outdoor recreation account
created by RCW 79A.25.060;
(3) Twenty-seven million dollars to the habitat conservation
account created by RCW 79A.15.020;
(4) Six million dollars to the riparian protection account created
by RCW 79A.15.120;
(5) Ten million dollars to the farmlands preservation account
created by RCW 79A.15.130;
(6) One hundred fifty-nine million dollars to the state taxable
building construction account. All receipts from taxable bond issues
are to be deposited into the account. If the state finance committee
deems it necessary or advantageous to issue more than the amount
specified in this subsection (6) as taxable bonds in order to comply
with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining
to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce the total
financing costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such additional
taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account in lieu of any transfer otherwise provided by this
section. The state treasurer shall submit written notice to the
director of financial management if it is determined that any such
additional transfer to the state taxable building construction account
is necessary. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.
These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified
in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the
issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section,
and shall be administered by the office of financial management subject
to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1), (2), (3), (4),
(5), and (6) of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 2 (1), (2), (3), (4),
(5), and (6) of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 2 (1), (2),
(3), (4), (5), and (6) of this act the state treasurer shall withdraw
from any general state revenues received in the state treasury and
deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an
amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee to
be due on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3
of this act shall state that they are a general obligation of the state
of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of the state to
the payment of the principal thereof and the interest thereon, and
shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature may provide additional means
for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act, and sections 2 and 3 of
this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for the
payment.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.10.867 and 2003 c 147 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of providing funds for the planning, design,
construction, reconstruction, and other necessary costs for
transportation projects, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of
((three)) two hundred forty-nine million five hundred thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and
all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be
sold at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No
bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In order to provide funds necessary for the
location, design, right-of-way, and construction of the state route
number 520 corridor projects, as allowed in section 2, chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2211), Laws of 2009, there shall
be issued and sold upon the request of the department of transportation
a total of one billion nine hundred fifty million dollars of general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington first payable from toll
revenue and excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in
accordance with section 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Upon the request of the department of
transportation, the state finance committee shall supervise and provide
for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by this
act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. Bonds authorized by this act
shall be sold in the manner, at time or times, in amounts, and at the
price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds may be
offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by this act shall be deposited in the state route number 520
corridor account created under section 4, chapter . . . (Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2211), Laws of 2009, and shall be available
only for the purposes enumerated in section 8 of this act, for the
payment of bond anticipation notes or other interim financing, if any,
capitalizing interest on the bonds, and for the payment of bond
issuance costs, including the costs of underwriting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The toll facility bond retirement account
is created in the state treasury for the purpose of payment of the
principal of and interest and premium on bonds. Both principal of and
interest on the bonds issued for the purposes of this act shall be
payable from the toll facility bond retirement account. The state
finance committee may provide that special subaccounts be created in
the account to facilitate payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds. The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th
of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for
principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Bonds issued under the authority of this
section and sections 8, 13, and 14 of this act shall distinctly state
that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall
pledge the full faith and credit of the state to the payment of the
principal thereof and the interest thereon, and shall contain an
unconditional promise to pay such principal and interest as the same
shall become due. The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be
first payable in the manner provided in this section and sections 8,
13, and 14 of this act from toll revenue and then from proceeds of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels to the extent toll
revenue is not available for that purpose. Toll revenue and the state
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters
82.36 and 82.38 RCW are hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and
the interest thereon issued under the authority of this section and
sections 8, 13, and 14 of this act, and the legislature agrees to
continue to impose these toll charges on the state route number 520
corridor, and on any other eligible toll facility designated by the
legislature and on which the imposition of tolls is authorized by the
legislature in respect of the bonds, and excise taxes on motor vehicle
and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal
and interest on all bonds issued under the authority of this section
and sections 8, 13, and 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 For bonds issued under the authority of
this section and sections 8, 12, and 14 of this act, the state
treasurer shall first withdraw toll revenue from the state route number
520 corridor account created under section 4, chapter . . . (Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2211), Laws of 2009, and, to the extent toll
revenue is not available, excise taxes on motor vehicle and special
fuels in the motor vehicle fund and deposit in the toll facility bond
retirement account, or a special subaccount in the account, such
amounts, and at such times, as are required by the bond proceedings.
Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels required for
bond retirement or interest on the bonds authorized by this section and
sections 8, 12, and 14 of this act shall be taken from that portion of
the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes
on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is, or may be,
appropriated to the department for state highway purposes. Funds
required shall never constitute a charge against any other allocations
of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel tax revenues to the state,
counties, cities, and towns unless the amount arising from excise taxes
on motor vehicle and special fuels distributed to the state in the
motor vehicle fund proves insufficient to meet the requirements for
bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.
Any payments for bond retirement or interest on the bonds taken
from other revenues from the motor vehicle fuel or special fuel taxes
that are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns shall
be repaid from available toll revenue in the manner provided in the
bond proceedings or, if toll revenue is not available for that purpose,
from the first excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels
distributed to the motor vehicle fund not required for bond retirement
or interest on the bonds. Any excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels required for bond retirement or interest on the bonds
authorized by this section and sections 8, 12, and 14 of this act shall
be reimbursed to the motor vehicle fund from toll revenue in the manner
and with the priority specified in the bond proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Bonds issued under the authority of
sections 8, 12, and 13 of this act and this section and any other
general obligation bonds of the state of Washington that have been or
that may be authorized and that pledge motor vehicle and special fuels
excise taxes for the payment of principal and interest thereon shall be
an equal charge against the revenues from such motor vehicle and
special fuels excise taxes.

Sec. 15 RCW 47.56.850 and 2008 c 122 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless these powers are otherwise delegated by the legislature,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for the state.
The tolling authority shall:
(a) Set toll rates, establish appropriate exemptions, if any, and
make adjustments as conditions warrant on eligible toll facilities;
(b) Review toll collection policies, toll operations policies, and
toll revenue expenditures on the eligible toll facilities and report
annually on this review to the legislature.
(2) The tolling authority, in determining toll rates, shall
consider the policy guidelines established in RCW 47.56.830.
(3) Unless otherwise directed by the legislature, in setting and
periodically adjusting toll rates, the tolling authority must ensure
that toll rates will generate revenue sufficient to:
(a) Meet the operating costs of the eligible toll facilities,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, renewal, replacement,
administration, and toll enforcement by public law enforcement;
(b) Meet obligations for the ((repayment)) timely payment of debt
((and interest on the)) service on bonds issued for eligible toll
facilities, and any other associated financing costs including, but not
limited to, required reserves, minimum debt coverage or other
appropriate contingency funding, ((and)) insurance, and compliance with
all other financial and other covenants made by the state in the bond
proceedings; ((and))
(c) Meet obligations to reimburse the motor vehicle fund for excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels applied to the payment of
bonds issued for eligible toll facilities; and
(d) Meet any other obligations of the tolling authority to provide
its proportionate share of funding contributions for any projects or
operations of the eligible toll facilities.
(4) The established toll rates may include variable pricing, and
should be set to optimize system performance, recognizing necessary
trade-offs to generate revenue for the purposes specified in subsection
(3) of this section. Tolls may vary for type of vehicle, time of day,
traffic conditions, or other factors designed to improve performance of
the system.
(5) In fixing and adjusting toll rates under this section, the only
toll revenue to be taken into account must be toll revenue pledged to
bonds that includes toll receipts, and the only debt service
requirements to be taken into account must be debt service on bonds
payable from and secured by toll revenue that includes toll receipts.
(6) The legislature pledges to appropriate toll revenue as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. When the
legislature has specifically identified and designated an eligible toll
facility and authorized the issuance of bonds for the financing of the
eligible toll facility that are payable from and secured by a pledge of
toll revenue, the legislature further agrees for the benefit of the
owners of outstanding bonds issued by the state for eligible toll
facilities to continue in effect and not to impair or withdraw the
authorization of the tolling authority to fix and adjust tolls as
provided in this section. The state finance committee shall pledge the
state's obligation to impose and maintain tolls, together with the
application of toll revenue as described in this section, to the owners
of any bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If and to the extent that the state finance
committee determines, in consultation with the department of
transportation and the tolling authority, that it will be beneficial
for the state to issue any bonds authorized in sections 8 and 12
through 14 of this act as toll revenue bonds rather than as general
obligation bonds, the state finance committee is authorized to issue
and sell, upon the request of the department of transportation, such
bonds as toll revenue bonds and not as general obligation bonds.
Notwithstanding section 12 of this act, each such bond shall contain a
recital that payment or redemption of the bond and payment of the
interest and any premium thereon is payable solely from and secured
solely by a direct pledge, charge, and lien upon toll revenue and is
not a general obligation of the state to which the full faith and
credit of the state is pledged.
Toll revenue is hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the
interest thereon issued under the authority of this section, and the
legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the
state route number 520 corridor, and on any other eligible toll
facility designated by the legislature and on which the imposition of
tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of the bonds, in
amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all
bonds issued under the authority of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The state finance committee may determine
and include in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds
under this act, such terms, provisions, covenants, and conditions as it
may deem appropriate in order to assist with the marketing and sale of
the bonds, confer rights upon the owners of bonds, and safeguard rights
of the owners of bonds including, among other things:
(1) Provisions regarding the maintenance and operation of eligible
toll facilities;
(2) The pledges, uses, and priorities of application of toll
revenue;
(3) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely
by toll revenue as provided by section 16 of this act, or shall be
payable from and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit
of the state as provided in sections 8 and 12 through 14 of this act;
(4) In consultation with the department of transportation and the
tolling authority, financial covenants requiring that the eligible toll
facilities must produce specified coverage ratios of toll revenue to
debt service on bonds;
(5) The purposes and conditions that must be satisfied prior to the
issuance of any additional bonds that are to be payable from and
secured by any toll revenue on an equal basis with previously issued
and outstanding bonds payable from and secured by toll revenue;
(6) Provisions that bonds for which any toll revenue are pledged,
or for which a pledge of any toll revenue may be reserved, may be
structured on a senior, parity, subordinate, or special lien basis in
relation to any other bonds for which toll revenue is pledged, with
respect to toll revenue only; and
(7) Provisions regarding reserves, credit enhancement, liquidity
facilities, and payment agreements with respect to bonds.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, covenants and conditions detailing
the character of management, maintenance, and operation of eligible
toll facilities, insurance for eligible toll facilities, financial
management of toll revenue, and disposition of eligible toll facilities
must first be approved by the department of transportation.
The owner of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate
proceeding require and compel performance of any duties imposed upon
the tolling authority and the department of transportation and their
respective officials, including any duties imposed upon or undertaken
by them or by their respective officers, agents, and employees, in
connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of
eligible toll facilities and in connection with the collection,
deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of the proceeds of
the bonds and toll revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 (1) For the purposes of this act, "toll
revenue" means all toll receipts, all interest income derived from the
investment of toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds
received for the benefit of eligible toll facilities. However, for the
purpose of any pledge of toll revenue to the payment of particular
bonds issued under this act, "toll revenue" means and includes only
such toll revenue or portion thereof that is pledged to the payment of
those bonds in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds.
Toll revenue constitutes "fees and revenues derived from the ownership
or operation of any undertaking, facility, or project" as that phrase
is used in Article VIII, section 1(c)(1) of the state Constitution.
(2) For the purposes of this act, "tolling authority" has the same
meaning as in RCW 47.56.810.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 8 through 14 and 16 through 18 of
this act are each added to chapter 47.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---