BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.129.105 and 1997 c 392 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
No long-term care facility or nursing facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW shall require or request residents to sign waivers of
potential liability for losses of personal property or injury, or to
sign waivers of residents' rights set forth in this chapter or in the
applicable licensing or certification laws, or to sign waivers, without
prior advice from the resident's attorney, of any rights set forth in
the vulnerable adults statute, chapter 74.34 RCW.

--- END ---