BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.72.010 and 2001 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) "Materially false statement" means any false statement oral or
written, regardless of its admissibility under the rules of evidence,
which could have affected the course or outcome of the proceeding((;
whether a false statement is material shall be determined by the court
as a matter of law));
(2) "Oath" includes an affirmation and every other mode authorized
by law of attesting to the truth of that which is stated; in this
chapter, written statements shall be treated as if made under oath if:
(a) The statement was made on or pursuant to instructions on an
official form bearing notice, authorized by law, to the effect that
false statements made therein are punishable;
(b) The statement recites that it was made under oath, the
declarant was aware of such recitation at the time he or she made the
statement, intended that the statement should be represented as a sworn
statement, and the statement was in fact so represented by its delivery
or utterance with the signed jurat of an officer authorized to
administer oaths appended thereto; or
(c) It is a statement, declaration, verification, or certificate,
made within or outside the state of Washington, which is certified or
declared to be true under penalty of perjury as provided in RCW
9A.72.085.
(3) An oath is "required or authorized by law" when the use of the
oath is specifically provided for by statute or regulatory provision or
when the oath is administered by a person authorized by state or
federal law to administer oaths;
(4) "Official proceeding" means a proceeding heard before any
legislative, judicial, administrative, or other government agency or
official authorized to hear evidence under oath, including any referee,
hearing examiner, commissioner, notary, or other person taking
testimony or depositions;
(5) "Juror" means any person who is a member of any jury, including
a grand jury, impaneled by any court of this state or by any public
servant authorized by law to impanel a jury; the term juror also
includes any person who has been drawn or summoned to attend as a
prospective juror;
(6) "Testimony" includes oral or written statements, documents, or
any other material that may be offered by a witness in an official
proceeding.

--- END ---