BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.77.065 and 2005 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may cause any county road to be constructed or improved
by ((day labor)) use of county forces as provided in this section.
(1) As used in this section((,)):
(a) "County forces" means regular employees of a county; and
(b) "((county)) Road construction ((budget)) project costs" means
the aggregate total of those costs as defined by the budgeting,
accounting, and reporting system for counties and cities and other
local governments authorized under RCW 43.09.200 and 43.09.230 as
prescribed in the state auditor's budget, accounting, and reporting
manual's (BARS) road and street construction accounts: PROVIDED, That
such costs shall not include those costs assigned to the right-of-way
account, ancillary operations account, ((and that portion of the
engineering account that is)) preliminary engineering account, and
construction engineering account in the budget, accounting, and
reporting manual.
(2) For counties with a population that equals or exceeds ((fifty))
four hundred thousand people, the total amount of ((day labor)) road
construction ((programs)) project costs one county may perform annually
with county forces shall ((total)) be no more than the total of the
following amounts ((determined in the following manner)):
(a) ((Any county with a total annual county road construction
budget of four million dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to no more than eight hundred thousand
dollars or fifteen percent of the county's total annual county road
construction budget, whichever is greater.
(b) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
of one million five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four
million dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to not more than five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or
twenty percent of the county's total annual county road construction
budget, whichever is greater.
(c) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
of five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than one million five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction
budget equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five
percent of the county's total annual county road construction budget,
whichever is greater.
(d) Any county with a total annual county road construction budget
less than five hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars:
PROVIDED, That any county with a total annual road construction budget
of less than five hundred thousand dollars may, by resolution of the
board at the time the county road construction budget is adopted, elect
to construct or improve county roads by day labor in an amount not to
exceed thirty-five thousand dollars on any one project, including
labor, equipment, and materials; such election to be in lieu of the two
hundred fifty thousand dollar limit provided for in this section,
except that any project means a complete project and the division of
any project into units of work or classes of work so as to permit
construction by day labor is not authorized)) Three million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars; and
(b) The previous year's county motor vehicle fuel tax distribution
factor, as provided for in RCW 46.68.124(5), multiplied by the amount
listed in (a) of this subsection.
(3) For counties with a population ((of)) that equals or exceeds
one hundred fifty thousand, but is less than ((fifty)) four hundred
thousand people, the total amount of ((day labor)) road construction
((programs)) project costs one county may perform annually ((may
total)) with county forces shall be no more than the total of the
following amounts ((determined in the following manner)):
(a) ((A county with a total annual county road construction budget
of four million dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to not more than eight hundred eighty
thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the county's total annual
county road construction budget, whichever is greater;
(b) A county with a total annual county road construction budget of
one million five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than four
million dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to not more than five hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars or
thirty percent of the county's total annual county road construction
budget, whichever is greater;
(c) A county with a total annual county road construction budget of
five hundred thousand dollars or more and less than one million five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction
budget equal to two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars or forty-five
percent of the county's total annual county road construction budget,
whichever is greater;
(d) A county with a total annual county road construction budget
less than five hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road
construction budget equal to two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars.
However, such a county may, by resolution of the board at the time the
county road construction budget is adopted, elect instead to construct
or improve county roads by day labor in an amount not to exceed thirty-eight thousand five hundred dollars on any one project, including
labor, equipment, and materials. That election is in lieu of the two
hundred seventy-five thousand dollar limit provided for in this
section. As used in this section, "any project" means a complete
project, and a county may not divide a project into units of work or
classes of work so as to permit construction by day labor.
(4) Any county that adopts a county road construction budget
unreasonably exceeding that county's actual road construction
expenditures for the same budget year which has the effect of
permitting the county to exceed the day labor amounts established in
this section is in violation of the county road administration board's
standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of
this section.)) One million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars; and
(b) The previous year's county motor vehicle fuel tax distribution
factor, as provided for in RCW 46.68.124(5), multiplied by the amount
listed in (a) of this subsection.
(4) For counties with a population that equals or exceeds thirty
thousand, but is less than one hundred fifty thousand people, the total
amount of road construction project costs one county may perform
annually with county forces shall be no more than the total of the
following amounts:
(a) One million one hundred fifty thousand dollars; this amount
shall increase to one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars
effective January 1, 2012; and
(b) The previous year's county motor vehicle fuel tax distribution
factor, as provided for in RCW 46.68.124(5), multiplied by the amount
listed in (a) of this subsection.
(5) For counties with a population that is less than thirty
thousand people, the total amount of road construction project costs
one county may perform annually with county forces shall be no more
than the total of the following amounts:
(a) Seven hundred thousand dollars; this amount shall increase to
eight hundred thousand dollars effective January 1, 2012; and
(b) The previous year's county motor vehicle fuel tax distribution
factor, as provided for in RCW 46.68.124(5), multiplied by the amount
listed in (a) of this subsection.
(6) Any county((,)) whose expenditure for ((day labor)) county
forces for road construction projects ((unreasonably)) exceeds the
limits specified in this section, is in violation of the county road
administration board's standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020
and is in violation of this section.
(((5))) (7) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section,
whenever the construction work or improvement is the installation of
electrical traffic control devices, highway illumination equipment,
electrical equipment, wires, or equipment to convey electrical current,
in an amount exceeding ten thousand dollars for any one project
including labor, equipment, and materials, such work shall be performed
by contract as in this chapter provided. This section means a complete
project and does not permit the construction of any project by ((day
labor)) county forces by division of the project into units of work or
classes of work.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.77.070 and 1983 c 3 s 81 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the board determines that any construction should be performed
by ((day labor)) county forces, and the estimated cost of the work
exceeds ((twenty-five hundred)) ten thousand dollars, it shall cause to
be published in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the
county, a brief description of the work to be done and the county road
engineer's estimate of the cost thereof. At the completion of such
construction, the board shall cause to be published in one issue of
such a newspaper a similar brief description of the work together with
an accurate statement of the true and complete cost of performing such
construction by ((day labor)) county forces.
Failure to make the required publication shall subject each county
commissioner to a fine of one hundred dollars for which he shall be
liable individually and upon his official bond and the prosecuting
attorney shall prosecute for violation of the provisions of this
section and RCW 36.77.065.

--- END ---