BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.16.090 and 1963 c 4 s 36.16.090 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boards of county commissioners of the several counties of the
state shall provide a suitable furnished office for each of the county
officers in their respective courthouses and may provide additional
offices elsewhere for the officers at the board's discretion.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.23.080 and 1963 c 4 s 36.23.080 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The office of)) The clerk of the superior court shall ((be kept))
keep an office at the county seat of the county of which he or she is
clerk.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.28.160 and 1963 c 4 s 36.28.160 are each amended to
read as follows:
The sheriff must keep ((his)) an office at the county seat of the
county of which he or she is sheriff.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.29.170 and 2001 c 299 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county treasurer shall keep ((the)) an office ((of the
treasurer)) at the county seat, and shall keep the same open for
transaction of business during business hours; and the treasurer and
the treasurer's deputy are authorized to administer all oaths necessary
in the discharge of the duties of the office.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.80.015 and 1963 c 4 s 36.80.015 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county road engineer shall keep ((his)) an office at the county
seat in such room or rooms as are provided by the county, and he or she
shall be furnished with all necessary cases and other suitable
articles, and also with all blank books and blanks necessary to the
proper discharge of his or her official duties. The records and books
in the county road engineer's office shall be public records, and shall
at all proper times be open to the inspection and examination of the
public.

--- END ---