BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.577 and 1993 c 430 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 397 is
established as follows:
Beginning at ((Piert Road in the vicinity southeast of Finely))
state route number 82 at exit 114, thence easterly, northwesterly, and
northerly across the Columbia River, thence easterly and northerly to
a junction with state route number 395 in Pasco.

--- END ---