BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.118.021 and 2007 c 425 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means new motor vehicle arbitration board.
(2) "Collateral charges" means any sales or lease related charges
including but not limited to sales tax, use tax, arbitration service
fees, unused license fees, unused registration fees, unused title fees,
finance charges, prepayment penalties, credit disability and credit
life insurance costs not otherwise refundable, any other insurance
costs prorated for time out of service, transportation charges, dealer
preparation charges, or any other charges for service contracts,
undercoating, rustproofing, or factory or dealer installed options.
(3) "Condition" means a general problem that results from a defect
or malfunction of one or more parts, or their improper installation by
the manufacturer, its agents, or the new motor vehicle dealer.
(4) "Consumer" means any person who has entered into an agreement
or contract for the transfer, lease, or purchase of a new motor
vehicle, other than for purposes of resale or sublease, during the
duration of the ((warranty)) eligibility period defined under this
section.
(5) "Court" means the superior court in the county where the
consumer resides, except if the consumer does not reside in this state,
then the superior court in the county where an arbitration hearing or
determination was conducted or made pursuant to this chapter.
(6) "Eligibility period" means the period ending two years after
the date of the original delivery to the consumer of a new motor
vehicle, or the first twenty-four thousand miles of operation,
whichever occurs first.
(7) "Incidental costs" means any reasonable expenses incurred by
the consumer in connection with the repair of the new motor vehicle,
including any towing charges and the costs of obtaining alternative
transportation.
(((7))) (8) "Manufacturer" means any person engaged in the business
of constructing or assembling new motor vehicles or engaged in the
business of importing new motor vehicles into the United States for the
purpose of selling or distributing new motor vehicles to new motor
vehicle dealers. "Manufacturer" includes to the extent the
modification affects the use, value, or safety of a new motor vehicle,
a postmanufacturing modifier of a new motor vehicle that modifies or
has a modification done to a new motor vehicle before the initial
retail sale or lease of a new motor vehicle, except as provided in this
chapter. "Manufacturer" does not include any person engaged in the
business of set-up of motorcycles as an agent of a new motor vehicle
dealer if the person does not otherwise construct or assemble
motorcycles.
(((8))) (9) "Motorcycle" means any motorcycle as defined in RCW
46.04.330 which has an engine displacement of at least seven hundred
fifty cubic centimeters.
(((9))) (10) "Motor home" means a vehicular unit designed to
provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel
use, built on or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle
chassis or on a chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the
completed vehicle.
(((10))) (11) "Motor home manufacturer" means the first stage
manufacturer, the component manufacturer, and the final stage
manufacturer.
(a) "First stage manufacturer" means a person who manufactures
incomplete new motor vehicles such as chassis, chassis cabs, or vans,
that are directly warranted by the first stage manufacturer to the
consumer, and are completed by a final stage manufacturer into a motor
home.
(b) "Component manufacturer" means a person who manufactures
components used in the manufacture or assembly of a chassis, chassis
cab, or van that is completed into a motor home and whose components
are directly warranted by the component manufacturer to the consumer.
(c) "Final stage manufacturer" means a person who assembles,
installs, or permanently affixes a body, cab, or equipment to an
incomplete new motor vehicle such as a chassis, chassis cab, or van
provided by a first stage manufacturer, to complete the vehicle into a
motor home.
(((11))) (12) "New motor vehicle" means any new self-propelled
vehicle, including a new motorcycle, primarily designed for the
transportation of persons or property over the public highways that was
originally purchased or leased at retail from a new motor vehicle
dealer or leasing company in this state, but does not include vehicles
purchased or leased by a business as part of a fleet of ten or more
vehicles at one time or under a single purchase or lease agreement.
This chapter shall apply to a motor vehicle purchased or leased with a
manufacturer written warranty by a member of the armed forces
regardless of in which state the vehicle was purchased or leased, if
the vehicle otherwise meets the definition of a new motor vehicle and
the consumer is a member of the armed forces stationed or residing in
this state at the time the consumer submits a request for arbitration
to the attorney general. If the motor vehicle is a motor home, this
chapter shall apply to the self-propelled vehicle and chassis, but does
not include those portions of the vehicle designated, used, or
maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, or commercial space.
The term "new motor vehicle" does not include trucks with nineteen
thousand pounds or more gross vehicle weight rating. The term "new
motor vehicle" includes a demonstrator or lease-purchase vehicle as
long as a manufacturer's warranty was issued as a condition of sale.
(((12))) (13) "New motor vehicle dealer" means a person who holds
a dealer agreement with a manufacturer for the sale of new motor
vehicles, who is engaged in the business of purchasing, selling,
servicing, exchanging, or dealing in new motor vehicles, and who is
licensed or required to be licensed as a vehicle dealer by the state of
Washington.
(((13))) (14) "Nonconformity" means a defect, serious safety
defect, or condition that substantially impairs the use, value, or
safety of a new motor vehicle, but does not include a defect or
condition that is the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized
modification or alteration of the new motor vehicle.
(((14))) (15) "Purchase price" means the cash price of the new
motor vehicle appearing in the sales agreement or contract.
(a) "Purchase price" in the instance of a lease means the actual
written capitalized cost disclosed to the consumer contained in the
lease agreement. If there is no disclosed capitalized cost in the
lease agreement the "purchase price" is the manufacturer's suggested
retail price including manufacturer installed accessories or items of
optional equipment displayed on the manufacturer label, required by 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1232.
(b) "Purchase price" in the instance of both a vehicle purchase or
lease agreement includes any allowance for a trade-in vehicle but does
not include any manufacturer-to-consumer rebate appearing in the
agreement or contract that the consumer received or that was applied to
reduce the purchase or lease cost.
Where the consumer is a subsequent transferee and the consumer
selects repurchase of the motor vehicle, "purchase price" means the
consumer's subsequent purchase price. Where the consumer is a
subsequent transferee and the consumer selects replacement of the motor
vehicle, "purchase price" means the original purchase price.
(((15))) (16) "Reasonable offset for use" means the definition
provided in RCW 19.118.041(1)(c) ((for a new motor vehicle other than
a new motorcycle. The reasonable offset for use for a new motorcycle
shall be computed by the number of miles that the vehicle traveled
before the manufacturer's acceptance of the vehicle upon repurchase or
replacement multiplied by the purchase price, and divided by twenty-five thousand)).
(((16))) (17) "Reasonable number of attempts" means the definition
provided in RCW 19.118.041.
(((17))) (18) "Replacement motor vehicle" means a new motor vehicle
that is identical or reasonably equivalent to the motor vehicle to be
replaced, as the motor vehicle to be replaced existed at the time of
original purchase or lease, including any service contract,
undercoating, rustproofing, and factory or dealer installed options.
(((18))) (19) "Serious safety defect" means a life-threatening
malfunction or nonconformity that impedes the consumer's ability to
control or operate the new motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonable
intended purposes or creates a risk of fire or explosion.
(((19))) (20) "Subsequent transferee" means a consumer who acquires
a motor vehicle, within the ((warranty)) eligibility period, as defined
in this section, with an applicable manufacturer's written warranty and
where the vehicle otherwise met the definition of a new motor vehicle
at the time of original retail sale or lease.
(((20))) (21) "Substantially impair" means to render the new motor
vehicle unreliable, or unsafe for ordinary use, or to diminish the
resale value of the new motor vehicle below the average resale value
for comparable motor vehicles.
(((21))) (22) "Warranty" means any implied warranty, any written
warranty of the manufacturer, or any affirmation of fact or promise
made by the manufacturer in connection with the sale of a new motor
vehicle that becomes part of the basis of the bargain. The term
"warranty" pertains to the obligations of the manufacturer in relation
to materials, workmanship, a modification by a new motor vehicle dealer
installing the new motor vehicle manufacturer's authorized parts or
their equivalent for the specific new motor vehicle pursuant to the
manufacturer approved specifications, and fitness of a new motor
vehicle for ordinary use or reasonably intended purposes throughout the
duration of the ((warranty)) eligibility period as defined under this
section.
(((22) "Warranty period" means the period ending two years after
the date of the original delivery to the consumer of a new motor
vehicle, or the first twenty-four thousand miles of operation,
whichever occurs first.))

Sec. 2 RCW 19.118.031 and 1998 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The manufacturer shall publish an owner's manual and provide it
to the new motor vehicle dealer or leasing company. The owner's manual
shall include a list of the addresses and phone numbers for the
manufacturer's customer assistance division, or zone or regional
offices. A manufacturer shall provide to the new motor vehicle dealer
or leasing company all applicable manufacturer's written warranties.
The dealer or leasing company shall transfer to the consumer, at the
time of original retail sale or lease, the owner's manual and
applicable written warranties as provided by a manufacturer.
(2) At the time of purchase, the new motor vehicle dealer shall
provide the consumer with a written statement that explains the
consumer's rights under this chapter. The written statement shall be
prepared and supplied by the attorney general and shall contain a toll-free number that the consumer can contact for information regarding the
procedures and remedies under this chapter. In the event a consumer
requests modification of the new motor vehicle in a manner which may
partially or completely void the manufacturer's implied or express
warranty, and which becomes part of the basis of the bargain of the
initial retail sale or lease of the vehicle, a new motor vehicle dealer
shall provide a clear and conspicuous written disclosure, independently
signed and dated by the consumer, stating "Your requested modification
may void all or part of a manufacturer warranty and a resulting defect
or condition may not be subject to remedies afforded by the motor
vehicle warranties act, chapter 19.118 RCW." A dealer who obtains a
signed written disclosure under circumstances where the warranty may be
void is not subject to this chapter as a manufacturer to the extent the
modification affects the use, value, or safety of a new motor vehicle.
Failure to provide the disclosure specified in this subsection does not
constitute a violation of chapter 19.86 RCW.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, if a new motor vehicle does
not conform to the warranty and the consumer reports the nonconformity
during the term of the ((warranty)) eligibility period or the period of
coverage of the applicable manufacturer's written warranty, whichever
is less, to the manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle
dealer who sold the new motor vehicle, the manufacturer, its agent, or
the new motor vehicle dealer shall make repairs as are necessary to
conform the vehicle to the warranty, regardless of whether such repairs
are made after the expiration of the ((warranty)) eligibility period.
Any corrections or attempted repairs undertaken by a new motor vehicle
dealer under this chapter shall be treated as warranty work and billed
by the dealer to the manufacturer in the same manner as other work
under the manufacturer's written warranty is billed. For purposes of
this subsection, the manufacturer's written warranty shall be at least
one year after the date of the original delivery to the consumer of the
vehicle or the first twelve thousand miles of operation, whichever
occurs first.
(4) Upon request from the consumer, the manufacturer or new motor
vehicle dealer shall provide a copy of any report or computer reading
compiled by the manufacturer's field or zone representative regarding
inspection, diagnosis, or test-drive of the consumer's new motor
vehicle, or shall provide a copy of any technical service bulletin
issued by the manufacturer regarding the year and model of the
consumer's new motor vehicle as it pertains to any material, feature,
component, or the performance thereof.
(5) The new motor vehicle dealer shall provide to the consumer each
time the consumer's vehicle is returned from being diagnosed or
repaired under the warranty, a fully itemized, legible statement or
repair order indicating any diagnosis made, and all work performed on
the vehicle including but not limited to, a general description of the
problem reported by the consumer or an identification of the defect or
condition, parts and labor, the date and the odometer reading when the
vehicle was submitted for repair, and the date when the vehicle was
made available to the consumer.
(6) No manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer may
refuse to diagnose or repair any nonconformity covered by the warranty
for the purpose of avoiding liability under this chapter.
(7) For purposes of this chapter, consumers shall have the rights
and remedies, including a cause of action, against manufacturers as
provided in this chapter.
(8) The ((warranty)) eligibility period and thirty-day out-of-service period, and sixty-day out-of-service period in the case of a
motor home, shall be extended by any time that repair services are not
available to the consumer as a direct result of a strike, war,
invasion, fire, flood, or other natural disaster.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.118.041 and 2007 c 426 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer
is unable to conform the new motor vehicle to the warranty by repairing
or correcting any nonconformity after a reasonable number of attempts,
the manufacturer, within forty calendar days of a consumer's written
request to the manufacturer's corporate, dispute resolution, zone, or
regional office address shall, at the option of the consumer, replace
or repurchase the new motor vehicle.
(a) The replacement motor vehicle shall be identical or reasonably
equivalent to the motor vehicle to be replaced as the motor vehicle to
be replaced existed at the time of original purchase or lease,
including any service contract, undercoating, rustproofing, and factory
or dealer installed options. Where the manufacturer supplies a
replacement motor vehicle, the manufacturer shall be responsible for
sales tax, license, registration fees, and refund of any incidental
costs. Compensation for a reasonable offset for use shall be paid by
the consumer to the manufacturer in the event that the consumer accepts
a replacement motor vehicle.
(b) When repurchasing the new motor vehicle, the manufacturer shall
refund to the consumer the purchase price, all collateral charges, and
incidental costs, less a reasonable offset for use. When repurchasing
the new motor vehicle, in the instance of a lease, the manufacturer
shall refund to the consumer all payments made by the consumer under
the lease including but not limited to all lease payments, trade-in
value or inception payment, security deposit, all collateral charges
and incidental costs less a reasonable offset for use. The
manufacturer shall make such payment to the lessor and/or lienholder of
record as necessary to obtain clear title to the motor vehicle and upon
the lessor's and/or lienholder's receipt of that payment and payment by
the consumer of any late payment charges, the consumer shall be
relieved of any future obligation to the lessor and/or lienholder.
(c) The reasonable offset for use shall be computed by multiplying
the number of miles that the vehicle traveled directly attributable to
use by the consumer during the time between the original purchase,
lease, or in-service date and the date beginning the first attempt to
diagnose or repair a nonconformity which ultimately results in the
repurchase or replacement of the vehicle multiplied times the purchase
price, and dividing the product by one hundred twenty thousand, except
in the case of a motor home, in which event it shall be divided by
ninety thousand or in the case of a motorcycle, it shall be divided by
twenty-five thousand. However, the reasonable offset for use
calculation total for a motor home is subject to modification by the
board by decreasing or increasing the offset total up to a maximum of
one-third of the offset total. The board may modify the offset total
in those circumstances where the board determines that the wear and
tear on those portions of the motor home designated, used, or
maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, or commercial space
are significantly greater or significantly less than that which could
be reasonably expected based on the mileage attributable to the
consumer's use of the motor home. Except in the case of a motor home,
where a manufacturer repurchases or replaces a vehicle solely due to
accumulated days out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one
or more nonconformities, "the number of miles that the vehicle traveled
directly attributable to use by the consumer" shall be limited to the
period between the original purchase, lease, or in-service date and the
date of the fifteenth cumulative calendar day out of service. Where
the consumer is a second or subsequent purchaser, lessee, or transferee
of the motor vehicle and the consumer selects repurchase of the motor
vehicle, "the number of miles that the vehicle traveled" directly
attributable to use by the consumer shall be limited to the period
between the date of purchase, lease by, or transfer to the consumer and
the date of the consumer's initial attempt to obtain diagnosis or
repair of a nonconformity which ultimately results in the repurchase or
replacement of the vehicle or which adds to thirty or more cumulative
calendar days out of service. Where the consumer is a second or
subsequent purchaser, lessee, or transferee of the motor vehicle and
the consumer selects replacement of the motor vehicle, "the number of
miles that the vehicle traveled" directly attributable to use by the
consumer shall be calculated from the date of the original purchase,
lease, or in-service date and the first attempt to diagnose or repair
a nonconformity which ultimately results in the replacement of the
vehicle. Except in the case of a motor home, where the consumer is a
second or subsequent purchaser, lessee, or transferee of the motor
vehicle and the manufacturer replaces the vehicle solely due to
accumulated days out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one
or more nonconformities, "the number of miles that the vehicle
traveled" directly attributable to use by the consumer shall be
calculated from the date of the original purchase, lease, or in service
date and the date of the fifteenth cumulative calendar day out of
service.
(d) In the case of a motor vehicle that is a motor home, where a
manufacturer repurchases or replaces a motor home from the first
purchaser, lessee, or transferee or from the second or subsequent
purchaser, lessee, or transferee solely due to accumulated days out of
service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or more
nonconformities, "the number of miles that a motor home traveled
directly attributable to use by the consumer" shall be limited to the
period between the original purchase, lease, or in-service date and the
date of the thirtieth cumulative calendar day out-of-service.
(2) Reasonable number of attempts, except in the case of a new
motor vehicle that is a motor home ((acquired after June 30, 1998)),
shall be deemed to have been undertaken by the manufacturer, its agent,
or the new motor vehicle dealer to conform the new motor vehicle to the
warranty within the ((warranty)) eligibility period, if: (a) The same
serious safety defect has been subject to diagnosis or repair two or
more times, at least one of which is during the period of coverage of
the applicable manufacturer's written warranty, and the serious safety
defect continues to exist; (b) the same nonconformity has been subject
to diagnosis or repair four or more times, at least one of which is
during the period of coverage of the applicable manufacturer's written
warranty, and the nonconformity continues to exist; ((or)) (c) the
vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or
more nonconformities for a cumulative total of thirty calendar days, at
least fifteen of them during the period of the applicable
manufacturer's written warranty; or (d) within a twelve-month period,
two or more different serious safety defects have been subject to
diagnosis or repair one or more times, where at least one attempt for
each serious safety defect or nonconformity occurs during the period of
coverage of the applicable manufacturer's written warranty and within
the eligibility period. For purposes of this subsection, the
manufacturer's written warranty shall be at least one year after the
date of the original delivery to the consumer of the vehicle or the
first twelve thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first. A
new motor vehicle is deemed to have been "subject to diagnose or
repair" when a consumer presents the new motor vehicle for warranty
service at a service and repair facility authorized, designated, or
maintained by a manufacturer to provide warranty services or a facility
to which the manufacturer or an authorized facility has directed the
consumer to obtain warranty service. A new motor vehicle has not been
"subject to diagnose or repair" if the consumer refuses to allow the
facility to attempt or complete a recommended warranty repair, or
demands return of the vehicle to the consumer before an attempt to
diagnose or repair can be completed.
(3)(a) In the case of a new motor vehicle that is a motor home
((acquired after June 30, 1998)), a reasonable number of attempts shall
be deemed to have been undertaken by the motor home manufacturers,
their respective agents, or their respective new motor vehicle dealers
to conform the new motor vehicle to the warranty within the
((warranty)) eligibility period, if: (i) The same serious safety
defect has been subject to diagnosis or repair one or more times during
the period of coverage of the applicable motor home manufacturer's
written warranty, plus a final attempt to repair the vehicle as
provided for in (b) of this subsection, and the serious safety defect
continues to exist; (ii) the same nonconformity has been subject to
repair three or more times, at least one of which is during the period
of coverage of the applicable motor home manufacturer's written
warranty, plus a final attempt to repair the vehicle as provided for in
(b) of this subsection, and the nonconformity continues to exist;
((or)) (iii) the vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or
repair of one or more nonconformities for a cumulative total of sixty
calendar days aggregating all motor home manufacturer days out of
service, and the motor home manufacturers have had at least one
opportunity to coordinate and complete an inspection and any repairs of
the vehicle's nonconformities after receipt of notification from the
consumer as provided for in (c) of this subsection; or (iv) two or more
different serious safety defects have been subject to diagnosis or
repair one or more times, where at least one attempt for each serious
safety defect or nonconformity occurs during the period of coverage of
the applicable manufacturer's written warranty and within the
eligibility period. Requests or notices for a final repair attempt are
not required. For purposes of this subsection, each motor home
manufacturer's written warranty must be at least one year after the
date of the original delivery to the consumer of the vehicle or the
first twelve thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first.
(b) In the case of a new motor vehicle that is a motor home, after
one attempt has been made to repair a serious safety defect, or after
three attempts have been made to repair the same nonconformity, the
consumer shall give written notification of the need to repair the
nonconformity to each of the motor home manufacturers at their
respective corporate, zone, or regional office addresses to allow the
motor home manufacturers to coordinate and complete a final attempt to
cure the nonconformity. The motor home manufacturers each have fifteen
days, commencing upon receipt of the notification, to respond and
inform the consumer of the location of the facility where the vehicle
will be repaired. If the vehicle is unsafe to drive due to a serious
safety defect, or to the extent the repair facility is more than one
hundred miles from the motor home location, the motor home
manufacturers are responsible for the cost of transporting the vehicle
to and from the repair facility. The motor home manufacturers have a
cumulative total of thirty days, commencing upon delivery of the
vehicle to the designated repair facility by the consumer, to conform
the vehicle to the applicable motor home manufacturer's written
warranty. This time period may be extended if the consumer agrees in
writing. If a motor home manufacturer fails to respond to the consumer
or perform the repairs within the time period prescribed, that motor
home manufacturer is not entitled to a final attempt to cure the
nonconformity.
(c) In the case of a new motor vehicle that is a motor home, if the
vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or
more nonconformities by the motor home manufacturers, their respective
agents, or their respective new motor vehicle dealers for a cumulative
total of thirty or more days aggregating all motor home manufacturer
days out of service, the consumer shall so notify each motor home
manufacturer in writing at their respective corporate, zone, or
regional office addresses to allow the motor home manufacturers, their
respective agents, or their respective new motor vehicle dealers an
opportunity to coordinate and complete an inspection and any repairs of
the vehicle's nonconformities. The motor home manufacturers have
fifteen days, commencing upon receipt of the notification, to respond
and inform the consumer of the location of the facility where the
vehicle will be repaired. If the vehicle is unsafe to drive due to a
serious safety defect, or to the extent the repair facility is more
than one hundred miles from the motor home location, the motor home
manufacturers are responsible for the cost of transporting the vehicle
to and from the repair facility. Once the buyer delivers the vehicle
to the designated repair facility, the inspection and repairs must be
completed by the motor home manufacturers either (i) within ten days or
(ii) before the vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or
repair of one or more nonconformities for sixty days, whichever time
period is longer. This time period may be extended if the consumer
agrees in writing. If a motor home manufacturer fails to respond to
the consumer or perform the repairs within the time period prescribed,
that motor home manufacturer is not entitled to at least one
opportunity to inspect and repair the vehicle's nonconformities after
receipt of notification from the buyer as provided for in this
subsection (3)(c).
(4) No new motor vehicle dealer may be held liable by the
manufacturer for any collateral charges, incidental costs, purchase
price refunds, or vehicle replacements. Manufacturers shall not have
a cause of action against dealers under this chapter. ((Consumers
shall not have a cause of action against dealers under this chapter,
but a violation of any responsibilities imposed upon dealers under this
chapter is a per se violation of chapter 19.86 RCW.)) A violation of
any responsibilities expressly imposed upon dealers under this chapter
is a per se violation of chapter 19.86 RCW. Except in the limited
circumstances of a dealer becoming a manufacturer due to a
postmanufacturing modification of a new motor vehicle as defined in RCW
19.118.021(8), consumers shall not have a cause of action against
dealers under this chapter. Consumers may pursue rights and remedies
against dealers under any other law, including chapters 46.70 and 46.71
RCW. Manufacturers and consumers may not make dealers parties to
arbitration board proceedings under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.118.061 and 1998 c 298 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer shall be prohibited from reselling any motor
vehicle determined or adjudicated as having a serious safety defect
unless the serious safety defect has been corrected and the
manufacturer warrants upon the first subsequent resale that the defect
has been corrected.
(2) Before any sale or transfer of a vehicle that has been replaced
or repurchased by the manufacturer ((that was determined or adjudicated
as having a nonconformity or to have been out of service for thirty or
more calendar days, or sixty or more calendar days in the case of a
motor home,)) after a determination, adjudication, or settlement of a
claim under this chapter, the manufacturer shall:
(a) Notify the attorney general ((and the department of licensing,
by certified mail or by personal service,)) upon receipt of the motor
vehicle and submit a title application to the department of licensing
in this state for title to the motor vehicle in the name of the
manufacturer within sixty days;
(b) Attach a resale disclosure notice to the vehicle in a manner
and form to be specified by the attorney general. Only the retail
purchaser may remove the resale disclosure notice after execution of
the disclosure form required under subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) Notify the attorney general and the department of licensing if
the nonconformity in the motor vehicle is corrected.
(3) Upon the first subsequent resale, either at wholesale or
retail, or transfer of title of a motor vehicle and which was
previously returned after a final determination, adjudication, or
settlement under this chapter or under a similar statute of any other
state, the manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer who
has actual knowledge of said final determination, adjudication or
settlement, shall execute and deliver to the buyer before sale an
instrument in writing setting forth information identifying the
nonconformity in a manner to be specified by the attorney general, and
the department of licensing shall place on the certificate of title
information indicating the vehicle was returned under this chapter.
(4) Upon receipt of the manufacturer's notification under
subsection (2) of this section that the nonconformity has been
corrected and ((upon)) the manufacturer's ((request and payment of any
fees)) application for title in the name of the manufacturer under this
section, the department of licensing shall issue a new title with
((information)) a title brand indicating the vehicle was returned under
this chapter and information that the nonconformity has been corrected.
Upon the first subsequent resale, either at wholesale or retail, or
transfer of title of a motor vehicle, as provided under ((subsection
(2)(c) of)) this section, the manufacturer shall warrant upon the
resale that the nonconformity has been corrected, and the manufacturer,
its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer who has actual knowledge of
the corrected nonconformity, shall execute and deliver to the buyer
before sale an instrument in writing setting forth information
identifying the nonconformity and indicating that it has been corrected
in a manner to be specified by the attorney general.
(5) After repurchase or replacement and following a manufacturer's
receipt of a vehicle under this section and prior to a vehicle's first
subsequent retail transfer by resale or lease, any intervening
transferor of a vehicle subject to the requirements of this section who
has received the disclosure, correction and warranty documents, as
specified by the attorney general and required under this chapter,
shall deliver the documents with the vehicle to the next transferor,
purchaser or lessee to ensure proper and timely notice and disclosure.
Any intervening transferor who fails to comply with this subsection
shall, at the option of the subsequent transferor or first subsequent
retail purchaser or lessee: (a) Indemnify any subsequent transferor or
first subsequent retail purchaser for all damages caused by such
violation; or (b) repurchase the vehicle at the full purchase price
including all fees, taxes and costs incurred for goods and services
which were included in the subsequent transaction.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.118.080 and 1998 c 245 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 19.118.160, the attorney general
shall contract with one or more ((private)) entities to conduct
arbitration proceedings in order to settle disputes between consumers
and manufacturers as provided in this chapter, and each ((private))
entity shall constitute a new motor vehicle arbitration board for
purposes of this chapter. The entities shall not be affiliated with
any manufacturer or new motor vehicle dealer and shall have available
the services of persons with automotive technical expertise to assist
in resolving disputes under this chapter. No ((private)) entity or its
officers or employees conducting board proceedings and no arbitrator
presiding at such proceedings shall be directly involved in the
manufacture, distribution, sale, or warranty service of any motor
vehicle. Payment to the entities for the arbitration services shall be
made from the new motor vehicle arbitration account.
(2) The attorney general shall adopt rules for the uniform conduct
of the arbitrations by the boards whether conducted by ((a private)) an
entity or by the attorney general pursuant to RCW 19.118.160, which
rules shall include but not be limited to the following procedures:
(a) At all arbitration proceedings, the parties are entitled to
present oral and written testimony, to present witnesses and evidence
relevant to the dispute, to cross-examine witnesses, and to be
represented by counsel.
(b) A dealer, manufacturer, or other persons shall produce records
and documents requested by a party which are reasonably related to the
dispute. If a dealer, manufacturer, or other person refuses to comply
with such a request, a party may present a request ((to the board)) for
the attorney general to issue a subpoena ((on behalf of the board)).
The subpoena shall be issued only for the production of records and
documents which the ((board)) attorney general has determined are
reasonably related to the dispute, including but not limited to
documents described in RCW 19.118.031 (4) or (5).
If a party fails to comply with the subpoena, the arbitrator may at
the outset of the arbitration hearing impose any of the following
sanctions: (i) Find that the matters which were the subject of the
subpoena, or any other designated facts, shall be taken to be
established for purposes of the hearing in accordance with the claim of
the party which requested the subpoena; (ii) refuse to allow the
disobedient party to support or oppose the designated claims or
defenses, or prohibit that party from introducing designated matters
into evidence; (iii) strike claims or defenses, or parts thereof; or
(iv) render a decision by default against the disobedient party.
If a nonparty fails to comply with a subpoena and upon an
arbitrator finding that without such compliance there is insufficient
evidence to render a decision in the dispute, the attorney general
((shall)) may enforce such subpoena in superior court and the
arbitrator shall continue the arbitration hearing until such time as
the nonparty complies with the subpoena or the subpoena is quashed.
(c) A party may obtain written affidavits from employees and agents
of a dealer, a manufacturer or other party, or from other potential
witnesses, and may submit such affidavits for consideration by the
board.
(d) Records of the board proceedings shall be open to the public.
The hearings shall be open to the public to the extent practicable.
(e) ((Where the board proceedings are conducted by one or more
private entities,)) A single arbitrator may be designated to preside at
such proceedings.
(3) A consumer shall exhaust the new motor vehicle arbitration
board remedy or informal dispute resolution settlement procedure under
RCW 19.118.150 before filing any superior court action.
(4) The attorney general shall maintain records of each dispute
submitted to the new motor vehicle arbitration board, including an
index of new motor vehicles by year, make, and model.
(5) The attorney general shall compile aggregate annual statistics
for all disputes submitted to, and decided by, the new motor vehicle
arbitration board, as well as annual statistics for each manufacturer
that include, but shall not be limited to, the number and percent of:
(a) Replacement motor vehicle requests; (b) purchase price refund
requests; (c) replacement motor vehicles obtained in prehearing
settlements; (d) purchase price refunds obtained in prehearing
settlements; (e) replacement motor vehicles awarded in arbitration; (f)
purchase price refunds awarded in arbitration; (g) board decisions
neither complied with during the forty calendar day period nor
petitioned for appeal within the thirty calendar day period; (h) board
decisions appealed categorized by consumer or manufacturer; (i) the
nature of the court decisions and who the prevailing party was; (j)
appeals that were held by the court to be brought without good cause;
and (k) appeals that were held by the court to be brought solely for
the purpose of harassment. The statistical compilations shall be
public information.
(6) The attorney general shall adopt rules to implement this
chapter. Such rules shall include uniform standards by which the
boards shall make determinations under this chapter, including but not
limited to rules which provide:
(a) A board shall find that a nonconformity exists if it determines
that the consumer's new motor vehicle has a defect, serious safety
defect, or condition that substantially impairs the use, value, or
safety of the vehicle.
(b) A board shall find that a reasonable number of attempts to
repair a nonconformity have been undertaken if((: (i) The same serious
safety defect has been subject to diagnosis or repair two or more
times, at least one of which is during the period of coverage of the
applicable manufacturer's written warranty, and the serious safety
defect continues to exist; (ii) the same nonconformity has been subject
to diagnosis or repair four or more times, at least one of which is
during the period of coverage of the applicable manufacturer's written
warranty, and the nonconformity continues to exist; or (iii) the
vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or
more nonconformities for a cumulative total of thirty calendar days, at
least fifteen of them during the period of the applicable
manufacturer's written warranty. For purposes of this subsection, the
manufacturer's written warranty shall be at least one year after the
date of the original delivery to the consumer of the vehicle or the
first twelve thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first)) the
history of attempts to diagnose or repair defects or conditions in the
new motor vehicle meets or exceeds those identified in RCW 19.118.041.
(c) A board shall find that a manufacturer has failed to comply
with RCW 19.118.041 if it finds that the manufacturer, its agent, or
the new motor vehicle dealer has failed to correct a nonconformity
after a reasonable number of attempts and the manufacturer has failed,
within forty days of the consumer's written request, to repurchase the
vehicle or replace the vehicle with a vehicle identical or reasonably
equivalent to the vehicle being replaced.
(7) The attorney general shall provide consumers with information
regarding the procedures and remedies under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 19.118.090 and 1998 c 298 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A consumer may request arbitration under this chapter by
submitting the request to the attorney general. Within ten days after
receipt of an arbitration request, the attorney general shall make a
reasonable determination of the cause of the request for arbitration
and provide necessary information to the consumer regarding the
consumer's rights and remedies under this chapter. The attorney
general shall ((assign the dispute to a board, except that if it
clearly appears from the materials submitted by the consumer that the
dispute is not eligible for arbitration, the attorney general may
refuse to assign the dispute and shall explain any required procedures
to the consumer)) accept a request for arbitration, except where it
clearly appears from the materials submitted by the consumer that the
dispute is not eligible because it is lacking a statement of a claim,
incomplete, untimely, frivolous, fraudulent, filed in bad faith, res
judicata, or beyond the authority established in this chapter. A
dispute found to be ineligible for arbitration because it lacks a
statement of a claim or is incomplete may be reconsidered by the
attorney general upon the submission of other information or documents
regarding the dispute.
(2) After a dispute is accepted, the attorney general shall assign
the dispute to the board. From the date the consumer's request for
arbitration is assigned by the attorney general, the board shall have
forty-five calendar days to have an arbitrator hear the dispute and
sixty days for the board to submit a decision to the attorney general.
If the board determines that additional information is necessary to
make a fair and reasoned decision, the arbitrator may continue the
arbitration proceeding on a subsequent date within ten calendar days of
the initial hearing. The board may require a party to submit
additional information or request that the attorney general issue a
subpoena to a nonparty for documents and records for a continued
hearing.
(((2))) (3) Manufacturers shall submit to arbitration if such
arbitration is requested by the consumer within thirty months from the
date of the original delivery of the new motor vehicle to a consumer at
retail and if the consumer's dispute is ((deemed eligible)) accepted
for arbitration by the ((board)) attorney general. In the case of a
motor home, the thirty-month period will be extended by the amount of
time it takes the motor home manufacturers to complete the final repair
attempt at the designated repair facility as provided for in RCW
19.118.041(3)(b).
(((3) The new motor vehicle arbitration board may reject for
arbitration any dispute that it determines to be frivolous, fraudulent,
filed in bad faith, res judicata or beyond its authority. Any dispute
deemed by the board to be ineligible for arbitration due to
insufficient evidence may be reconsidered by the board upon the
submission of other information or documents regarding the dispute that
would allegedly qualify for relief under this chapter. Following a
second review, the board may reject the dispute for arbitration if
evidence is still clearly insufficient to qualify the dispute for
relief under this chapter. A rejection by the board is subject to
review by the attorney general or may be appealed under RCW 19.118.100.
A decision to reject any dispute for arbitration shall be sent by
certified mail to the consumer and the manufacturer, and shall contain
a brief explanation as to the reason therefor.))
(4) The manufacturer shall complete a written manufacturer response
to the consumer's request for arbitration. The manufacturer shall
provide a response to the consumer and the ((board)) attorney general
within ten calendar days from the date of the manufacturer's receipt of
((the board's)) notice of ((acceptance)) the attorney general's
assignment of a dispute for arbitration. The manufacturer response
shall include all issues and affirmative defenses related to the
nonconformities identified in the consumer's request for arbitration
that the manufacturer intends to raise at the arbitration hearing.
(5) ((The arbitration board shall award the remedies under RCW
19.118.041 if it finds a nonconformity and that a reasonable number of
attempts have been undertaken to correct the nonconformity. The board
shall award reasonable costs and attorneys' fees incurred by the
consumer where the manufacturer has been directly represented by
counsel: (a) In dealings with the consumer in response to a request to
repurchase or replace under RCW 19.118.041; (b) in settlement
negotiations; (c) in preparation of the manufacturer's statement; or
(d) at an arbitration board hearing or other board proceeding.
In the case of an arbitration involving a motor home, the board may
allocate liability among the motor home manufacturers.
(6) It is an affirmative defense to any claim under this chapter
that: (a) The alleged nonconformity does not substantially impair the
use, value, or safety of the new motor vehicle; or (b) the alleged
nonconformity is the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized
modifications or alterations of the new motor vehicle.
(7) The board shall have forty-five calendar days from the date the
board receives the consumer's request for arbitration to hear the
dispute. If the board determines that additional information is
necessary, the board may continue the arbitration proceeding on a
subsequent date within ten calendar days of the initial hearing. The
board shall decide the dispute within sixty calendar days from the date
the board receives the consumer's request for arbitration.)) It is an
affirmative defense to any claim under this chapter that: (a) The
alleged nonconformity does not substantially impair the use, value, or
safety of the new motor vehicle; or (b) the alleged nonconformity is
the result of abuse, neglect, or unauthorized modifications or
alterations of the new motor vehicle.
(6) The arbitration decision ((of the board shall be delivered by
certified mail or personal service to the consumer and the
manufacturer, and shall)) must contain a written finding of whether the
new motor vehicle ((meets)) should be repurchased or replaced pursuant
to the standards set forth under this chapter.
(((8))) (a) The board shall award the remedies under this chapter
if a finding is made pursuant to RCW 19.118.041 that one or more
nonconformities have been subject to a reasonable number of attempts.
(b) If the board awards remedies under this chapter after a finding
is made pursuant to RCW 19.118.041 that one or more nonconformities
have been subject to a reasonable number of attempts, the board shall
award reasonable costs and attorneys' fees incurred by the consumer
where the manufacturer has been directly represented by counsel: (i)
In dealings with the consumer in response to a request to repurchase or
replace under RCW 19.118.041; (ii) in settlement negotiations; (iii) in
preparation of the manufacturer's statement; or (iv) at an arbitration
hearing or other arbitration proceeding. In the case of an arbitration
involving a motor home, the board may allocate liability among the
motor home manufacturers.
(c) The decision of the board shall be submitted to the attorney
general who shall deliver it by certified mail, electronic mail
confirmed by an electronic notice of delivery status or similar
confirmation, or personal service to the consumer and the manufacturer.
(7) The consumer may accept or reject the arbitration board
decision ((or appeal to superior court, pursuant to RCW 19.118.100)).
Upon acceptance by the consumer, the arbitration board decision shall
become final. The consumer shall send written notification of
acceptance or rejection to the ((arbitration board)) attorney general
within sixty days of receiving the decision and the ((arbitration
board)) attorney general shall immediately deliver a copy of the
consumer's acceptance to the manufacturer by certified mail, return
receipt requested, electronic mail confirmed by an electronic notice of
delivery status or similar confirmation, or by personal service.
Failure of the consumer to respond to the ((arbitration board))
attorney general within sixty calendar days of receiving the decision
shall be considered a rejection of the decision by the consumer.
(8) Where a consumer rejects an arbitration decision, the consumer
may appeal to superior court pursuant to RCW 19.118.100. The consumer
shall have one hundred twenty calendar days from the date of rejection
to file a petition of appeal in superior court. At the time the
petition of appeal is filed, the consumer shall deliver, by certified
mail or personal service, a conformed copy of such petition to the
attorney general.
(9) Upon receipt of the consumer's acceptance, the manufacturer
shall have forty calendar days to comply with the arbitration board
decision or thirty calendar days to file a petition of appeal in
superior court. At the time the petition of appeal is filed, the
manufacturer shall deliver, by certified mail or personal service, a
conformed copy of such petition to the attorney general. If the
attorney general receives no notice of petition of appeal after forty
calendar days, the attorney general shall contact the consumer to
verify compliance.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.118.095 and 1995 c 254 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Compliance with an arbitration board decision under this
chapter must be accomplished at a time, place, and in a manner to be
determined by the mutual agreement of the consumer and manufacturer.
(a) The consumer shall make the motor vehicle available to the
manufacturer free of damage other than that related to any
nonconformity, defect, or condition to which a warranty applied, or
that can reasonably be expected in the use of the vehicle for ordinary
or reasonably intended purposes and in consideration of the ((mileage
attributable to the consumer's use)) miles traveled by the vehicle.
Any insurance claims or settlement proceeds for repair of damage to the
vehicle due to fire, theft, vandalism, or collision must be assigned to
the manufacturer or, at the consumer's option, the repair must be
completed before return of the vehicle to the manufacturer.
The consumer may not remove any equipment or option that was
included in the original purchase or lease of the vehicle or that is
otherwise included in the repurchase or replacement award. In removing
any equipment not included in the original purchase or lease, the
consumer shall exercise reasonable care to avoid further damage to the
vehicle but is not required to return the vehicle to original
condition.
(b) At the time of compliance with an arbitration board decision
that awards repurchase, the manufacturer shall make full payment to the
consumers and either the lessor or lienholder, or both, or provide
verification to the consumer of prior payment to either the lessor or
lienholder, or both.
At the time of compliance with an arbitration board decision that
awards replacement, the manufacturer shall provide the replacement
vehicle together with any refund of incidental costs.
(c) At any time before compliance a party may request the ((board))
attorney general to resolve disputes regarding compliance with the
arbitration board decision including but not limited to time and place
for compliance, condition of the vehicle to be returned, clarification
or recalculation of refund amounts under the award, or a determination
if an offered vehicle is reasonably equivalent to the vehicle being
replaced. The attorney general may resolve the dispute or refer
compliance-related disputes to the board pursuant to RCW 19.118.160 for
a compliance dispute hearing and decision. In resolving compliance
disputes the attorney general or board may not review, alter, or
otherwise change the findings of a decision or extend the time for
compliance beyond the time necessary ((for the board)) to resolve the
dispute.
(d) Failure of the consumer to make the vehicle available within
sixty calendar days in response to a manufacturer's unconditional
tender of compliance is considered a rejection of the arbitration
decision by the consumer, except as provided in (c) of this subsection
or subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If, at the end of the forty calendar day period, neither
compliance with nor a petition to appeal the board's decision has
occurred, the attorney general may impose a fine of up to one thousand
dollars per day until compliance occurs or a maximum penalty of one
hundred thousand dollars accrues unless the manufacturer can provide
clear and convincing evidence that any delay or failure was beyond its
control or was acceptable to the consumer as evidenced by a written
statement signed by the consumer. If the manufacturer fails to provide
the evidence or fails to pay the fine, the attorney general may
initiate proceedings against the manufacturer for failure to pay any
fine that accrues until compliance with the board's decision occurs or
the maximum penalty of one hundred thousand dollars results. If the
attorney general prevails in an enforcement action regarding any fine
imposed under this subsection, the attorney general is entitled to
reasonable costs and attorneys' fees. Fines and recovered costs and
fees shall be returned to the new motor vehicle arbitration account.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.118.120 and 1987 c 344 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of this chapter ((shall constitute)) is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business and is an unfair or
deceptive ((trade practice affecting the public interest under)) act in
trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose
of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. ((All
public and private remedies provided under that chapter shall be
available to enforce this chapter.))

Sec. 9 RCW 19.118.160 and 1989 c 347 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the attorney general is unable ((at any time)) to contract with
((private)) one or more entities to conduct arbitrations ((under the
procedures and standards in this chapter)), the attorney general shall
establish ((one or more new motor vehicle)) an arbitration ((boards.
Each such board shall consist of three members appointed by the
attorney general, only one of whom may be directly involved in the
manufacture, distribution, sale, or service of any motor vehicle.
Board members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and shall be compensated pursuant to
RCW 43.03.240)) program and conduct arbitrations under the procedures
and standards established in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is remedial in nature and applies
retroactively to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---