BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
reduce organ transplant benefit waiting periods for covered persons who
have had prior continuous coverage and have changed health carriers or
health benefit plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For each health benefit plan that is issued or renewed on or
after January 1, 2010, a health carrier shall reduce any organ
transplant benefit waiting period by the amount of time a covered
person had prior creditable coverage. Benefits provided are subject to
all other terms and conditions of the health benefit plan, including
but not limited to any applicable coinsurances, deductibles, and
copayments.
(2) The following definitions apply to this section:
(a) "Covered person" means the same as set forth in RCW
48.43.005(8).
(b) "Creditable coverage" means the same as set forth in section
2701 of the federal health insurance portability and accountability act
of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg) and also includes coverage which
terminated during the period beginning ninety days and ending sixty-four days before the date of application for the new plan if that
coverage would otherwise have qualified as creditable coverage under
the federal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg).
(c) "Organ transplant" means the same as defined under the
applicable health benefit plan.

--- END ---