BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some students are
eager to complete a degree in the shortest time possible in order to
enter the job market. The legislature further finds that providing a
streamlined path to a baccalaureate degree would shorten the time
required for students to complete a degree, improve the graduation
rate, and improve accessibility for students who have proven academic
abilities. The legislature intends to provide an accelerated
baccalaureate degree program that will allow academically qualified
students to obtain baccalaureate degrees in three years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) State universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may develop accelerated baccalaureate degree programs
that will allow academically qualified students to obtain a
baccalaureate degree in three years without attending summer classes or
enrolling in more than a full-time class load during the regular
academic year. The programs must allow academically qualified students
to begin course work within their academic field during their first
term or semester of enrollment.
(2) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College shall report on their plans for the accelerated
baccalaureate degree programs to the higher education coordinating
board for approval.

--- END ---