BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.060 and 1998 c 321 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, the legislature shall not impose
responsibility for new programs or increased levels of service under
existing programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the
subdivision is fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new
programs or increases in service levels. Reimbursement by the state
may be made by: (a) A specific appropriation; or (b) increases in
state distributions of revenue to political subdivisions occurring
after January 1, 1998.
(2) After July 1, 2008, any court rule enacted by the supreme court
that creates a new nonconstitutionally mandated program or that
increases levels of service under existing programs on any political
subdivision of the state shall not be enforceable unless a specific
appropriation is made to cover the costs of the new program or the
increased level of service.
(3) If by order of any court, or legislative enactment, the costs
of a federal or local government program are transferred to or from the
state, the otherwise applicable state expenditure limit shall be
increased or decreased, as the case may be, by the dollar amount of the
costs of the program.
(((3))) (4) The legislature, in consultation with the office of
financial management or its successor agency, shall determine the costs
of any new programs or increased levels of service under existing
programs imposed on any political subdivision or transferred to or from
the state.
(((4))) (5) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the
costs incurred for voting devices or machines under RCW ((29.04.200))
29A.12.150.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.04.190 and 1987 c 202 s 101 are each amended to read
as follows:
The supreme court shall have the power to prescribe, from time to
time, the forms of writs and all other process, the mode and manner of
framing and filing proceedings and pleadings; of giving notice and
serving writs and process of all kinds; of taking and obtaining
evidence; of drawing up, entering and enrolling orders and judgments;
and generally to regulate and prescribe by rule the forms for and the
kind and character of the entire pleading, practice and procedure to be
used in all suits, actions, appeals and proceedings of whatever nature
by the supreme court, superior courts, and district courts of the
state. In prescribing such rules the supreme court shall have regard
to the simplification of the system of pleading, practice and procedure
in said courts to promote the speedy determination of litigation on the
merits. Any court rule enacted by the supreme court that creates a new
nonconstitutionally mandated program or that increases levels of
service under existing programs on any political subdivision of the
state shall not be enforceable unless a specific appropriation is made
to cover the costs of the new program or the increased level of
service.

--- END ---