BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public,
education, and government access channels are a vital public resource
that should be easily accessible. The collection of aggregate
viewership data promotes good management of this resource while still
protecting personal privacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A city, county, or other local
governmental entity that grants a franchise for cable television
service must include the following requirements in its franchise
agreement: (a) Public, education, and government access channels shall
be carried on the lowest cost tier of service; (b) public, education,
and government access channels shall not be separated numerically; (c)
after the initial designation of public, education, and government
access channel numbers, the numbers shall not be changed without the
agreement of the franchising authority; and (d) weekly aggregate
viewership data for each public, education, and government access
program shall be provided to the franchising authority.
(2) Each franchising authority shall post the aggregate viewership
data to a web site for public inspection. The web site shall be
updated at least weekly.
(3) The following definitions apply to this chapter:
(a) "Cable television service" has the same meaning as "cable
service" in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 522; and
(b) "Franchise" and "franchising authority" are defined in 47
U.S.C. Sec. 522. "Franchising authority" means a city, county, or
other local governmental entity that grants a franchise for cable
television service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---