BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the proliferation of rules by state
agencies is problematic for many of our citizens and businesses.
Voluminous and complicated rules can ultimately increase economic
difficulties for employers and may diminish job opportunities. When
small employers must spend their time working to identify, understand,
and comply with a variety of rules, there is less energy devoted to job
development and business expansion. The rules adopted by the
department of labor and industries alone span more than one volume of
the Washington Administrative Code. Therefore, the legislature intends
to begin with the department of labor and industries to institute a
moratorium on adopting new rules and launching a thorough review of the
necessity and effectiveness of the current rules.
(2) Notwithstanding other statutory rule-making authority, the
director of the department of labor and industries may not adopt or
pursue the adoption of any rule from the effective date of this act
until July 1, 2011, except under the following circumstances:
(a) The rule is required by federal law; or
(b) The director is adopting rules implementing the annual
readjustment of basic rates of industrial insurance under RCW
51.16.035.
(3)(a) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the director of
the department of labor and industries shall review the agency's rules
to determine which rules continue to be necessary and effective.
(b) The department will consult with the members of the workers'
compensation advisory committee established under RCW 51.04.110 and
with the members of the Washington industrial safety and health act
advisory committee established under RCW 49.17.055 to develop standards
for reviewing rules and to prioritize the rules for review. The
standards shall be developed with the ultimate goal of reducing the
number and length of rules at the department of labor and industries.
(c) Upon determining that a rule is no longer necessary or needs
revising, the department shall repeal or revise the rule after July 1,
2011.

--- END ---