BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.434 and 1988 c 288 s 409 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The agency or the office of administrative hearings shall set
the time and place of the hearing and give not less than seven days
advance written notice to all parties and to all persons who have filed
written petitions to intervene in the matter.
(2) The notice shall include:
(a) Unless otherwise ordered by the presiding officer, the names
and mailing addresses of all parties to whom notice is being given and,
if known, the names and addresses of their representatives;
(b) If the agency intends to appear, the mailing address and
telephone number of the office designated to represent the agency in
the proceeding;
(c) The official file or other reference number and the name of the
proceeding;
(d) The name, official title, mailing address, and telephone number
of the presiding officer, if known;
(e) A statement of the time, place and nature of the proceeding;
(f) A statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under which
the hearing is to be held;
(g) A reference to the particular sections of the statutes and
rules involved;
(h) A short and plain statement of the matters asserted by the
agency;
(i) A statement explaining the process for requesting a subpoena
for the production of testimony or evidence relevant to the proceeding;
and
(((i))) (j) A statement that a party who fails to attend or
participate in a hearing or other stage of an adjudicative proceeding
may be held in default in accordance with this chapter.
(3) If the agency is unable to state the matters required by
subsection (2)(h) of this section at the time the notice is served, the
initial notice may be limited to a statement of the issues involved.
If the proceeding is initiated by a person other than the agency, the
initial notice may be limited to the inclusion of a copy of the
initiating document. Thereafter, upon request, a more definite and
detailed statement shall be furnished.
(4) The notice may include any other matters considered desirable
by the agency.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.449 and 1989 c 175 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The presiding officer shall regulate the course of the
proceedings, in conformity with applicable rules and the prehearing
order, if any.
(2) To the extent necessary for full disclosure of all relevant
facts and issues, the presiding officer shall require each party to
disclose any knowledge of the existence of audio or video recordings
that may be relevant to the proceeding, and the presiding officer may
issue a subpoena to obtain such recordings. The presiding officer
shall afford to all parties the opportunity to respond, present
evidence and argument, conduct cross-examination, and submit rebuttal
evidence, except as restricted by a limited grant of intervention or by
the prehearing order.
(3) In the discretion of the presiding officer, and where the
rights of the parties will not be prejudiced thereby, all or part of
the hearing may be conducted by telephone, television, or other
electronic means. Each party in the hearing must have an opportunity
to participate effectively in, to hear, and, if technically and
economically feasible, to see the entire proceeding while it is taking
place.
(4) The presiding officer shall cause the hearing to be recorded by
a method chosen by the agency. The agency is not required, at its
expense, to prepare a transcript, unless required to do so by a
provision of law. Any party, at the party's expense, may cause a
reporter approved by the agency to prepare a transcript from the
agency's record, or cause additional recordings to be made during the
hearing if the making of the additional recording does not cause
distraction or disruption.
(5) The hearing is open to public observation, except for the parts
that the presiding officer states to be closed under a provision of law
expressly authorizing closure or under a protective order entered by
the presiding officer pursuant to applicable rules. A presiding
officer may order the exclusion of witnesses upon a showing of good
cause. To the extent that the hearing is conducted by telephone,
television, or other electronic means, and is not closed, the
availability of public observation is satisfied by giving members of
the public an opportunity, at reasonable times, to hear or inspect the
agency's record, and to inspect any transcript obtained by the agency.

--- END ---