BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.520 and 1995 c 397 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Responses to requests for public records shall be made promptly
by agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office
of the chief clerk of the house of representatives. Within five
business days of receiving a public record request, an agency, the
office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk
of the house of representatives must respond by either (((1))) (a)
providing the record; (((2))) (b) acknowledging that the agency, the
office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk
of the house of representatives has received the request and providing
a reasonable estimate of the time the agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives will require to respond to the request; or (((3)))
(c) denying the public record request.
(2) Additional time required to respond to a request may be based
upon the need to clarify the intent of the request, to locate and
assemble the information requested, to notify third persons or agencies
affected by the request, or to determine whether any of the information
requested is exempt and that a denial should be made as to all or part
of the request. In acknowledging receipt of a public record request
that is unclear, an agency, the office of the secretary of the senate,
or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives may
ask the requestor to clarify what information the requestor is seeking.
If the requestor fails to clarify the request, the agency, the office
of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the
house of representatives need not respond to it.
(3) A request may be denied by the agency if the requesting party
has an outstanding balance with the agency for unpaid charges for
records previously provided.
(4) Denials of requests must be accompanied by a written statement
of the specific reasons therefor. Agencies, the office of the
secretary of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives shall establish mechanisms for the most prompt
possible review of decisions denying inspection, and such review shall
be deemed completed at the end of the second business day following the
denial of inspection and shall constitute final agency action or final
action by the office of the secretary of the senate or the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives for the purposes of
judicial review.

--- END ---