BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.120 and 2005 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No fee shall be charged for the inspection of public records.
No fee shall be charged for locating public documents and making them
available for copying. A reasonable charge may be imposed for
providing copies of public records and for the use by any person of
agency equipment or equipment of the office of the secretary of the
senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives
to copy public records, which charges shall not exceed the amount
necessary to reimburse the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for its actual costs directly incident to such copying.
Agency charges for photocopies shall be imposed in accordance with the
actual per page cost or other costs established and published by the
agency. In no event may an agency charge a per page cost greater than
the actual per page cost as established and published by the agency.
To the extent the agency has not determined the actual per page cost
for photocopies of public records, the agency may not charge in excess
of fifteen cents per page. An agency may require a deposit in an
amount not to exceed ten percent of the estimated cost of providing
copies for a request. If an agency makes a request available on a
partial or installment basis, the agency may charge for each part of
the request as it is provided. If an installment of a records request
is not claimed or reviewed, the agency is not obligated to fulfill the
balance of the request.
(2) Agencies may recover per page costs regardless of whether the
photocopies are taken by the requestor.
(3) As used in this section, "per page cost" means the cost of all
photocopies made to fulfill the particular request divided by the
number of pages.

--- END ---