BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) When funded, the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs shall convene a jail medication
management work group to develop a model policy regarding the
management of medications in jails, to be applicable to jails as
defined in RCW 70.48.020. The work group shall address medication
management for all units of local government that operate jails that do
not have an on-site pharmacy nor own or operate, in whole or in part,
a pharmacy. The model policy shall be designed to reflect best
practices regarding medication management and to provide guidance in
the areas specified under this section.
(2) In developing the model policy, the work group shall consult
with members of the pharmaceutical community, including the Washington
state pharmacy association and the board of pharmacy, department of
health, and members of the nursing community, including the Washington
state nurses association. The work group shall review and consider the
current policies and practices of cities and counties throughout the
state, as directed in RCW 70.48.071, other state policies and
practices, and the standards of national organizations, such as the
national commission on correctional health care and the American jail
association.
(3) The jail medication management work group shall present the
final model policy to the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs for adoption or rejection by December 31, 2009.
(4) The model policy developed by the association shall provide
written guidelines regarding jail policies and procedures for the
proper dispensing, storage, control, delivery, administration, and
disposal of medications. The guidelines shall address the following
matters:
(a) Provision for agreement between the jail and a licensed
pharmacist, pharmacy, or other licensed health care provider or health
care facility to ensure access to pharmaceutical services on a twenty-four hour a day basis, including consultation and dispensing services;
(b) Intake and screening for inmate medical conditions requiring
pharmaceutical services, and evaluation and verification of any
pharmaceuticals or medications an inmate has in his or her possession
at intake;
(c) Notice to inmates of jail policies for gaining access to
pharmaceutical services during confinement;
(d) Verifying and recording that medications have or have not been
delivered, administered, and ingested by an inmate;
(e) Reporting by the responsible pharmacist to the jail
administrator or chief law enforcement executive regarding services
provided to the jail by the pharmacy;
(f) Written policies regarding the qualifications of and training
for jail personnel regarding all aspects of medication services
provided including, but not limited to, nonpractitioner jail personnel
authorized to deliver and administer prescription and nonprescription
medications under section 4 of this act;
(g) Provisions for providing prescribed medication to inmates upon
their release or transfer as necessary;
(h) Maintenance of a medication storage and delivery system, which
ensures that all medications are appropriately secured, stored, and
regularly inventoried, and prohibits stocks of prescription medication
from being maintained within a jail without an on-site pharmacy, except
for the storage of medications to be delivered to a specific inmate as
directed by a licensed practitioner;
(i) Ensuring that all medications requiring a prescription are
properly dispensed, labeled, packaged, and transferred only in
accordance with the direction from the pharmacist and applicable state
laws;
(j) Ensuring the proper disposition of unused medications;
(k) Maintaining proper and complete inmate files regarding all
prescriptions and administration of medications;
(l) Prohibiting the administration, distribution, delivery, or
dispensing of medication by inmates;
(m) Policies and procedures regarding nonprescription medications,
including how they are to be made available;
(n) Policies regarding inmate self-administration of prescription
and nonprescription medications and safeguards for preventing potential
abuse;
(o) Preventing the unauthorized use of medications by anyone other
than the intended patient;
(p) Providing for the routine review and renewal of medication
orders by a licensed practitioner with prescriptive authority to ensure
patient safety and appropriateness of medication;
(q) Providing for the right of an individual to refuse medication,
except as required by court order and of the right to informed consent;
and
(r) Any other policies or procedures deemed applicable by the work
group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter or in any provision of law shall be
interpreted to invest the board with the authority to regulate or
establish standards regarding a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020 that
does not operate, in whole or in part, a pharmacy or a correctional
pharmacy. This section does not limit the board's authority to
regulate a pharmacist that has entered into an agreement with a jail
for the provision of pharmaceutical services.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.48.020 and 1987 c 462 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the words and phrases in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Holding facility" means a facility operated by a governing
unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of
adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or
sentencing and for the temporary housing of such persons during or
after trial and/or sentencing, but in no instance shall the housing
exceed thirty days.
(2) "Detention facility" means a facility operated by a governing
unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of
adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or
sentencing and for the housing of adult persons for purposes of
punishment and correction after sentencing or persons serving terms not
to exceed ninety days.
(3) "Special detention facility" means a minimum security facility
operated by a governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for
the housing of special populations of sentenced persons who do not
require the level of security normally provided in detention and
correctional facilities including, but not necessarily limited to,
persons convicted of offenses under RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.
(4) "Correctional facility" means a facility operated by a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the housing of
adult persons serving terms not exceeding one year for the purposes of
punishment, correction, and rehabilitation following conviction of a
criminal offense.
(5) "Jail" means any holding, detention, special detention, or
correctional facility as defined in this section.
(6) "Health care" means preventive, diagnostic, and rehabilitative
services provided by licensed health care professionals and/or
facilities; such care to include providing prescription drugs where
indicated.
(7) "Governing unit" means the city and/or county or any
combinations of cities and/or counties responsible for the operation,
supervision, and maintenance of a jail.
(8) "Major urban" means a county or combination of counties which
has a city having a population greater than twenty-six thousand based
on the 1978 projections of the office of financial management.
(9) "Medium urban" means a county or combination of counties which
has a city having a population equal to or greater than ten thousand
but less than twenty-six thousand based on the 1978 projections of the
office of financial management.
(10) "Rural" means a county or combination of counties which has a
city having a population less than ten thousand based on the 1978
projections of the office of financial management.
(11) "Office" means the office of financial management.
(12) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by
nonpractitioner jail personnel to an inmate residing in a jail to
facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or
controlled substance or nonprescription medication. "Medication
assistance" includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the
medication container to the individual, opening the individual's
medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in
the individual's hand.
(13) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
69.41.010.
(14) "Nonpractitioner jail personnel" means appropriately trained
staff who are authorized to manage, deliver, or administer prescription
and nonprescription medication under section 4 of this act.
(15) "Administration" means the direct application of a drug
whether by ingestion or inhalation, to the body of an inmate by a
practitioner or nonpractitioner jail personnel.
(16) "Drug" and "legend drug" have the same meanings as provided in
RCW 69.41.010.
(17) "Medication" means a drug, legend drug, or controlled
substance requiring a prescription or an over-the-counter or
nonprescription drug.
(18) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of medication whether or
not there is an agency relationship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
Jails may provide for the delivery and administration of
medications and medication assistance for inmates in their custody by
nonpractitioner jail personnel, subject to the following conditions:
(1) The jail administrator or his or her designee, or chief law
enforcement executive or his or her designee, shall enter into an
agreement between the jail and a licensed pharmacist, pharmacy, or
other licensed practitioner or health care facility to ensure access to
pharmaceutical services on a twenty-four hour a day basis, including
consultation and dispensing services.
(2) The jail administrator or chief law enforcement executive shall
adopt policies which address the designation and training of
nonpractitioner jail personnel who may deliver and administer
medications or provide medication assistance to inmates as provided in
this chapter. The policies must address the administration of
prescriptions from licensed practitioners prescribing within the scope
of their prescriptive authority, the identification of medication to be
delivered and administered or administered through medication
assistance, the means of securing medication with attention to the
safeguarding of legend drugs, and the means of maintaining a record of
the delivery, administration, self-administration, or medication
assistance of all medication. The jail administrator or chief law
enforcement executive shall designate a physician licensed under
chapter 18.71 RCW, or a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, to train the designated
nonpractitioner jail personnel in proper medication procedures.
(3) The jail administrator or chief law enforcement executive shall
seek input from one or more pharmacists, licensed physicians, or nurses
in the course of developing the policies described in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section. A jail shall provide the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs with a copy of the jail's
current policies regarding medication management.
(4) The practitioner or nonpractitioner jail personnel delivering,
administering, or providing medication assistance is in receipt of (a)
for prescription drugs, a written, current, and unexpired prescription,
and instructions for administration from a licensed practitioner
prescribing within the scope of his or her prescriptive authority for
administration of the prescription drug; (b) for nonprescription drugs,
a written, current, and unexpired instruction from a licensed
practitioner regarding the administration of the nonprescription drug;
and (c) for minors under the age of eighteen, a written, current
consent from the minor's parent, legal guardian, or custodian
consenting to the administration of the medication.
(5) Nonpractitioner jail personnel may help in the preparation of
legend drugs or controlled substances for self-administration where a
practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written
direction that the medication preparation assistance is necessary and
appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with
intravenous medications or injectable medications.
(6) Nonpractitioner jail personnel shall not include inmates.
(7) All medication is delivered and administered and all medication
assistance is provided by a practitioner or nonpractitioner jail
personnel pursuant to the policies adopted in this section, and in
compliance with the prescription of a practitioner prescribing within
the scope of his or her prescriptive authority, or the written
instructions as provided in this section.
(8) The jail administrator or the chief law enforcement executive
shall ensure that all nonpractitioner jail personnel authorized to
deliver, administer, and provide medication assistance are trained
pursuant to the policies adopted in this section prior to being
permitted to deliver, administer, or provide medication assistance to
an inmate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If specific funding for the purposes of
section 1 of this act, referencing section 1 of this act by bill or
chapter number and section number, is not provided by June 30, 2009, in
the omnibus appropriations act, section 1 of this act is null and void.

--- END ---