BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who timely offers a defense of insanity pursuant to
RCW 10.77.030 may be found "guilty and mentally ill" at trial if the
trier of fact finds that:
(a) The state has proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the
defendant is guilty of the crime charged;
(b) The defendant has failed to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence the asserted insanity defense; and
(c) The defendant has proven by a preponderance of the evidence
that he or she was mentally ill at the time of the commission of the
offense.
(2) A person who waives the right to trial may plead guilty and
mentally ill. No plea of guilty and mentally ill may be accepted by
the trial judge until the defendant has undergone examination by a
psychologist or psychiatrist and the judge has examined the
psychological or psychiatric report or reports, has held a hearing on
the issue of the defendant's mental condition, and is satisfied that
there is a factual basis that the defendant was mentally ill at the
time of the offense to which the plea is entered. If the trial judge
refuses to accept a plea of guilty and mentally ill, the defendant
shall be permitted to withdraw the plea.
(3) A person found guilty and mentally ill or whose plea of guilty
and mentally ill is accepted pursuant to subsection 2 of this section
may have any sentence imposed that may lawfully be imposed on any
person convicted of the same offense. The person shall be placed under
the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, but shall be
committed into the custody of the department of social and health
services, which shall place the person in a secure mental health
facility for the purpose of mental health treatment.
(4) A person shall not remain confined for treatment at a secure
mental health facility under subsection (3) of this section for longer
than the confinement term of the person's sentence. The person shall
be eligible for earned release time under RCW 9.94A.728, as determined
by the department of corrections and the department of social and
health services according to subsection (6) of this section. The
department of social and health services shall have the authority to
discharge the person and return the person to the custody of the
department of corrections at any time prior to the completion of
sentence, if the department of social and health services determines
that such a discharge will be in the person's best interest, or that
the person can no longer benefit from mental health treatment, or that
the person's condition has stabilized to the point at which the person
can be maintained in the custody of the department of corrections
without any substantial risk to the health, safety, or well-being of
the person or others. A person who is discharged from the custody of
the department of social and health services under this subsection
shall be released with a report describing the person's condition,
diagnosis, course of treatment, prognosis for remission of symptoms,
danger to self or others, and recommendations for further treatment.
(5) A person committed to a secure mental health facility under
this section shall not become eligible for unescorted privileges on the
grounds or outside the grounds of the facility before the end of the
confinement term of the person's sentence without the written
permission of the secretary of the department of corrections or the
secretary's designee.
(6) The department of corrections and department of social and
health services may adopt rules or make agreements necessary for the
implementation of this section.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "mental illness" and
"mentally ill" means a substantial disorder of thought, mood, or
behavior that has a substantial adverse effect on a person's cognitive
or volitional functions, but not rising to the level of insanity
pursuant to RCW 9A.12.010.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.040 and 1998 c 297 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the issue of insanity is submitted to the jury, the court
shall instruct the jury to return a special verdict in substantially
the following form:

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2008 c 231 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to RCW
9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision, the
risk assessment shall classify the offender or a probationer sentenced
in superior court into one of at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor
probationer ordered by a superior court to probation under the
supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or
9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody or the
probationer's supervision include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender was found guilty and mentally ill under section
1 of this act;
(v) The offender was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650 or 9.94A.670; or
(((v))) (vi) The offender is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer
unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is
required under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---