BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As limited in subsection (3) of this section, a watershed
management partnership formed or qualified under the authority of RCW
39.34.200 and 39.34.210, including a separate legal entity established
by such a partnership to conduct the cooperative undertaking of the
partnership under the same statutory authority, may exercise the power
of eminent domain as provided in chapter 8.12 RCW.
(2) The eminent domain authority granted under subsection (1) of
this section may be exercised only for those utility purposes for which
the watershed partnership was formed.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section applies only to a watershed
management partnership that:
(a) Was formed or qualified before July 1, 2006, under the
authority of RCW 39.34.200 and 39.34.210;
(b) Is not engaged in planning or in implementing a plan for a
water resource inventory area under the terms of chapter 90.82 RCW;
(c) Is composed entirely of cities and water-sewer districts
authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner
provided by chapter 8.12 RCW; and
(d) Is governed by a board of directors consisting entirely of
elected officials from the cities and water-sewer districts that
constitute the watershed management partnership.
(4) A watershed management partnership exercising authority under
this section shall:
(a) Comply with the notice requirements of RCW 8.25.290; and
(b) Provide notice to the city, town, or county with jurisdiction
over the subject property by certified mail thirty days prior to the
partnership board authorizing condemnation.

--- END ---