BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20A.060 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 213 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall be
subdivided into divisions, including a division of vocational
rehabilitation. Except as otherwise specified or as federal
requirements may differently require, these divisions shall be
established and organized in accordance with plans to be prepared by
the secretary and approved by the governor. In preparing such plans,
the secretary shall endeavor to promote efficient public management, to
improve programs, and to take full advantage of the economies, both
fiscal and administrative, to be gained from the consolidation of the
departments of public assistance, institutions, the veterans'
rehabilitation council, and the division of vocational rehabilitation
of the coordinating council on occupational education.
(2) The department shall eliminate the information system services
division and may not maintain a similar division in the future. The
division's current responsibilities must be absorbed by the
department's various administrations within the department's current
funding levels.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.290 and 1996 c 171 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state library, with the assistance of ((the department of
information services and)) the state archives, shall establish a pilot
project to design and test an electronic information locator system,
allowing members of the public to locate and access electronic public
records. In designing the system, the following factors shall be
considered: (1) Ease of operation by citizens; (2) access through
multiple technologies, such as direct dial and toll-free numbers,
kiosks, and the internet; (3) compatibility with private online
services; and (4) capability of expanding the electronic public records
included in the system. The pilot project may restrict the type and
quality of electronic public records that are included in the system to
test the feasibility of making electronic public records and
information widely available to the public.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.105.340 and 2008 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) The ((department)) attorney general's office shall
coordinate among state agencies to develop a consumer protection web
site. The web site shall serve as a one-stop web site for consumer
information. At a minimum, the web site must provide links to
information on:
(((a))) (1) Insurance information provided by the office of the
insurance commissioner, including information on how to file consumer
complaints against insurance companies, how to look up authorized
insurers, and how to learn more about health insurance benefits;
(((b))) (2) Child care information provided by the department of
early learning, including how to select a child care provider, how
child care providers are rated, and information about product recalls;
(((c))) (3) Financial information provided by the department of
financial institutions, including consumer information on financial
fraud, investing, credit, and enforcement actions;
(((d))) (4) Health care information provided by the department of
health, including health care provider listings and quality assurance
information;
(((e))) (5) Home care information provided by the home care quality
authority, including information to assist consumers in finding an in-home provider;
(((f))) (6) Licensing information provided by the department of
licensing, including information regarding business, vehicle, and
professional licensing; and
(((g))) (7) Other information available on existing state agency
web sites that could be a helpful resource for consumers.
(((2) By July 1, 2008, state agencies shall report to the
department on whether they maintain resources for consumers that could
be made available through the consumer protection web site.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the department shall make the consumer
protection web site available to the public.
(4) After September 1, 2008, the department, in coordination with
other state agencies, shall develop a plan on how to build upon the
consumer protection web site to create a consumer protection portal.
The plan must also include an examination of the feasibility of
developing a toll-free information line to support the consumer
protection portal. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.))

Sec. 4 RCW 43.105.350 and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of compliance with section 2, chapter 262, Laws of
2008 or any subsequent high-speed internet deployment and adoption
initiative, ((the department of information services,)) the department
of community, trade, and economic development, the utilities and
transportation commission, and any other government agent or agency
shall not gather or request any information related to high-speed
internet infrastructure or service from providers of telecommunications
or high-speed internet services that is classified by the provider as
proprietary or competitively sensitive.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
authority of a state agency or local government to gather or request
information from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services for other purposes pursuant to its statutory authority.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.105.360 and 2008 c 262 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2009, ((the department, in consultation with))
Washington State University((,)) shall identify and make publicly
available a web directory of public facilities that provide community
technology programs throughout the state.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "community technology
program" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.32.020.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.105.800 and 1999 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The K-20 educational network board is created. The purpose of the
K-20 board is to ensure that the K-20 educational telecommunications
network is operated in a way that serves the broad public interest
above the interest of any network user.
(1) The K-20 board shall comprise ((eleven)) nine voting and seven
nonvoting members as follows:
(a) Voting members shall include: A person designated by the
governor; one member of each caucus of the senate, appointed by the
president of the senate; one member of each caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; the superintendent of public instruction or his or her
designee; the executive director of the higher education coordinating
board or his or her designee; the executive director of the state board
for community and technical colleges or his or her designee; ((the
chair of the information services board, or his or her designee; the
director of the department of information services or his or her
designee;)) and one citizen member.
The citizen member shall be appointed to a four-year term by the
governor with the consent of the senate. ((The governor shall appoint
the citizen member of the K-20 board by July 30, 1999.))
(b) Nonvoting members shall include one community or technical
college president, appointed by the state board for technical and
community colleges; one president of a public baccalaureate
institution, appointed by the council of presidents; the state
librarian; one educational service district superintendent, one school
district superintendent, and one representative of an approved private
school, appointed by the superintendent of public instruction; and one
representative of independent baccalaureate institutions, appointed by
the Washington association of independent colleges and universities.
(2) ((The director of the department of information services or his
or her designee shall serve as chair of the K-20 board.)) The chair
must be elected by majority vote from among the voting members. The
((department of information services)) office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide staffing to the K-20 board. A
majority of the voting members of the K-20 board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.
(3) The citizen member of the K-20 board shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any funds remaining in the data processing
revolving fund, the K-20 technology account, and the education
technology revolving fund on January 1, 2010, must be transferred to
the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 through 7 of this act take effect
January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.105.005 (Purpose) and 1990 c 208 s 1 & 1987 c 504 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.105.017 (Legislative intent) and 1992 c 20 s 6, 1990 c
208 s 2, & 1987 c 504 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.105.020 (Definitions) and 2003 c 18 s 2;
(4) RCW 43.105.032 (Information services board -- Members--Chairperson -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Compensation and travel expenses) and
2007 c 158 s 1, 1999 c 241 s 2, 1996 c 137 s 10, 1992 c 20 s 8, 1987 c
504 s 4, 1984 c 287 s 86, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 128, & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 219 s 5;
(5) RCW 43.105.041 (Powers and duties of board) and 2003 c 18 s 3
& 1999 c 285 s 5;
(6) RCW 43.105.047 (Department created -- Appointment of director--Director's duties) and 1999 c 80 s 5, 1992 c 20 s 9, & 1987 c 504 s 6;
(7) RCW 43.105.052 (Powers and duties of department) and 2000 c 180
s 1, 1999 c 80 s 6, 1993 c 281 s 53, 1992 c 20 s 10, 1990 c 208 s 7, &
1987 c 504 s 8;
(8) RCW 43.105.055 (Advisory committees -- Customer advisory board)
and 1999 c 80 s 7 & 1987 c 504 s 9;
(9) RCW 43.105.057 (Rule-making authority) and 1992 c 20 s 11 &
1990 c 208 s 13;
(10) RCW 43.105.060 (Contracts by state and local agencies with
department) and 1987 c 504 s 10, 1973 1st ex.s. c 219 s 9, & 1967 ex.s.
c 115 s 6;
(11) RCW 43.105.070 (Confidential or privileged information) and
1969 ex.s. c 212 s 4;
(12) RCW 43.105.080 (Data processing revolving fund -- Created -- Use)
and 1999 c 80 s 8, 1992 c 235 s 6, 1987 c 504 s 11, 1983 c 3 s 116, &
1974 ex.s. c 129 s 1;
(13) RCW 43.105.095 (Management and oversight structure) and 1999
c 80 s 3;
(14) RCW 43.105.105 (Information technology decisions and plans)
and 1999 c 80 s 4;
(15) RCW 43.105.160 (Strategic information technology plan--Biennial state performance report on information technology) and 2005
c 319 s 110, 1999 c 80 s 9, 1998 c 177 s 3, 1996 c 171 s 9, & 1992 c 20
s 1;
(16) RCW 43.105.170 (Information technology portfolios -- Contents--Performance reports) and 1999 c 80 s 10;
(17) RCW 43.105.180 (Budget request to be evaluated for information
technology projects) and 1999 c 80 s 11;
(18) RCW 43.105.190 (Major information technology projects
standards and policies -- Project evaluation and reporting) and 2005 c
319 s 111, 1999 c 80 s 12, 1998 c 177 s 4, 1996 c 137 s 15, & 1992 c 20
s 4;
(19) RCW 43.105.200 (Application to institutions of higher
education) and 1992 c 20 s 5;
(20) RCW 43.105.210 (Data processing expenditures -- Authorization--Penalties) and 1993 sp.s. c 1 s 903;
(21) RCW 43.105.320 (Departmental authority as certification
authority for electronic authentication) and 1999 c 287 s 18 & 1997 c
27 s 29;
(22) RCW 43.105.330 (State interoperability executive committee)
and 2006 c 76 s 2 & 2003 c 18 s 4;
(23) RCW 43.105.810 (K-20 network technical steering committee) and
1999 c 285 s 6;
(24) RCW 43.105.815 (K-20 operations cooperative -- Ongoing
management) and 1999 c 285 s 8;
(25) RCW 43.105.820 (K-20 telecommunication system -- Technical plan)
and 1999 c 285 s 11 & 1996 c 137 s 8;
(26) RCW 43.105.825 (K-20 network -- Oversight -- Coordination of
telecommunications planning) and 2004 c 275 s 62 & 1999 c 285 s 7;
(27) RCW 43.105.830 (K-20 technology account) and 2004 c 276 s 909,
1999 c 285 s 9, 1997 c 180 s 2, & 1996 c 137 s 7;
(28) RCW 43.105.835 (Education technology revolving fund) and 2004
c 276 s 910, 1999 c 285 s 10, & 1997 c 180 s 1;
(29) RCW 43.105.900 (Severability -- 1973 1st ex.s. c 219) and 1973
1st ex.s. c 219 s 10;
(30) RCW 43.105.901 (Severability -- 1987 c 504) and 1987 c 504 s 25;
(31) RCW 43.105.902 (Effective date -- 1987 c 504) and 1987 c 504 s
26;
(32) RCW 43.105.903 (Effective date -- 1999 c 285) and 1999 c 285 s
14;
(33) RCW 43.105.904 (Actions of telecommunications oversight and
policy committee -- Savings -- 1999 c 285) and 1999 c 285 s 4; and
(34) RCW 43.105.905 (Construction -- 2008 c 262) and 2008 c 262 s 4.

--- END ---