BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the higher education coordinating board, and the state
board for community and technical colleges shall use existing staff and
resources to collaboratively conduct a review of incentive programs in
other states. The incentive programs that are reviewed must have a
purpose of increasing the number of students who meet the state
standards at any grade level and/or motivating students through
incentives to pursue postsecondary education. The agencies shall
provide an opportunity for input and comment by stakeholders throughout
the study. By December 1, 2009, the agencies shall make a joint report
to the legislature detailing the programs that were reviewed and making
recommendations for incentive programs that Washington should consider
for spending any savings realized by the state by eliminating the
statewide assessment as a high school graduation requirement. The
recommendations could include whether the state should create a public-private partnership or use other creative models to implement any of
the recommendations.

--- END ---