BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.118 and 2005 c 274 s 307 and 2005 c 246 s 23 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain a negative file. It shall
contain negatives of all pictures taken by the department of licensing
as authorized by ((RCW 46.20.070 through 46.20.119)) this chapter.
Negatives in the file shall not be available for public inspection and
copying under chapter 42.56 RCW.
(2) The department may make the file available to official
governmental enforcement agencies to assist in the investigation by the
agencies of suspected criminal activity or for the purposes of
verifying identity when a law enforcement officer is authorized by law
to request identification from an individual.
(3) The department shall make the file available to the office of
the secretary of state, at the expense of the secretary of state, to
assist in maintenance of the statewide voter registration database.
(4) The department may also provide a print to the driver's next of
kin in the event the driver is deceased.
(5) The department may make the file available to judicial officers
for the purpose of verifying identity of an individual in a court
proceeding. The department may make the file available only if the
requesting judicial officer declares to the department that he or she
has given notice to the parties that the request to the department will
be made.

--- END ---