BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.52.375 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 43 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The board of each joint operating agency shall by resolution
appoint a treasurer. The treasurer shall be the chief financial
officer of the operating agency, who shall report at least annually to
the board a detailed statement of the financial condition of the
operating agency and of its financial operations for the preceding
fiscal year. The treasurer shall advise the board on all matters
affecting the financial condition of the operating agency. Before
entering upon his or her duties the treasurer shall give bond to the
operating agency, with a surety company authorized to write such bonds
in this state as surety, in an amount which the board finds by
resolution will protect the operating agency against loss, conditioned
that all funds which he or she receives as such treasurer will be
faithfully kept and accounted for and for the faithful discharge of his
or her duties. The amount of such bond may be decreased or increased
from time to time as the board may by resolution direct.
(2) The board shall also appoint an auditor and may require him or
her to give a bond with a surety company authorized to do business in
the state of Washington in such amount as it shall by resolution
prescribe, conditioned for the faithful discharge of his or her duties.
The auditor shall report directly to the board and be responsible to it
for discharging his or her duties.
(3) The premiums on the bonds of the auditor and the treasurer
shall be paid by the operating agency. The board may provide for
coverage of said officers and other persons on the same bond.
(4) All funds of the joint operating agency shall be paid to the
treasurer and shall be disbursed by ((him)) the treasurer only on
checks or warrants issued by the auditor upon orders or vouchers
approved by the board: PROVIDED, That the board by resolution may
authorize the managing director or any other bonded officer or employee
as legally permissible to approve or disapprove vouchers presented to
defray salaries of employees and other expenses of the operating agency
arising in the usual and ordinary course of its business, including
expenses incurred by the board of directors, its executive committee,
or the executive board in the performance of their duties. All moneys
of the operating agency shall be deposited forthwith by the treasurer
in such depositaries, and with such securities as are designated by
rules of the board. The treasurer shall establish a general fund and
such special funds as shall be created by the board, into which he or
she shall place all money of the joint operating agency as the board by
resolution or motion may direct.
(5) The board may adopt a policy for the payment of claims or other
obligations of the operating agency, which are payable out of solvent
funds, and may elect to pay such obligations by check or warrant.
However, if the applicable fund is not solvent at the time payment is
ordered, then no check may be issued and payment shall be by warrant.
When checks are to be used, the board shall designate the qualified
public depositary upon which the checks are to be drawn as well as the
officers required or authorized to sign the checks. For the purposes
of this chapter, "warrant" includes checks where authorized by this
subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.24.010 and 1999 c 18 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The treasurer of the county in which a utility district is
located shall be ex officio treasurer of the district: PROVIDED, That
the commission by resolution may designate some other person having
experience in financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the utility
district. The commission may require a bond, with a surety company
authorized to do business in the state of Washington, in an amount and
under the terms and conditions which the commission by resolution from
time to time finds will protect the district against loss. The premium
on any such bond shall be paid by the district.
(2) All district funds shall be paid to the treasurer and shall be
disbursed by him or her only on warrants issued by an auditor appointed
by the commission, upon orders or vouchers approved by it. The
treasurer shall establish a public utility district fund, into which
shall be paid all district funds, and he or she shall maintain such
special funds as may be created by the commission, into which he or she
shall place all money as the commission may, by resolution, direct.
(3) If the treasurer of the district is the treasurer of the county
all district funds shall be deposited with the county depositaries
under the same restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for
county depositaries; if the treasurer of the district is some other
person, all funds shall be deposited in such bank or banks authorized
to do business in this state as the commission by resolution shall
designate, and with surety bond to the district or securities in lieu
thereof of the kind, no less in amount, as provided in RCW 36.48.020
for deposit of county funds.
(4) Such surety bond or securities in lieu thereof shall be filed
or deposited with the treasurer of the district, and approved by
resolution of the commission.
(5) All interest collected on district funds shall belong to the
district and be deposited to its credit in the proper district funds.
(6) A district may provide and require a reasonable bond of any
other person handling moneys or securities of the district: PROVIDED,
That the district pays the premium thereon.
(7) If the treasurer of the district is some other person than the
treasurer of the county, the commission may adopt a policy for the
payment of claims or other obligations of the utility district, which
are payable out of solvent funds, and may elect to pay such obligations
by check or warrant. However, if the applicable fund is not solvent at
the time payment is ordered, then no check may be issued and payment
shall be by warrant. When checks are to be used, the commission shall
designate the qualified public depositary upon which the checks are to
be drawn as well as the officers required or authorized to sign the
checks. For the purposes of this chapter, "warrant" includes checks
where authorized by this subsection.

--- END ---