BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that healthy
wildlife populations are a valuable and treasured public resource to
the people of the state of Washington. However, the legislature also
finds that as the human population increases and encroaches on wildlife
habitat, interactions between humans and wildlife will become more
frequent.
(2) The legislature further finds that interactions between humans
and wildlife can have significant financial impacts on the affected
landowner. Although the resulting wildlife damage is felt most closely
by the landowner, the general public, as beneficiaries and stewards of
healthy wildlife populations, should bear some responsibility, as
outlined in and limited by this act, for providing a measure of
restitution to the impacted landowner, provided that the landowner has
exhausted all legal, practicable self-help methods available to prevent
wildlife damage from occurring.
(3) The legislature further finds that the commercial agriculture,
horticulture, and livestock industries are important components of the
state economy that can be negatively impacted by interactions with
wildlife. However, the legislature also finds that other landowners,
both commercial and residential, may be faced with wildlife
interactions that result in property damage. It is the intent of the
legislature to craft a solution whereby all property owners have a
potential avenue to petition the state for some mitigation of the
damages caused by wildlife.
(4) The legislature further finds that it is in the best interests
of the state for the department of fish and wildlife to respond quickly
to wildlife damage complaints and to work with those affected to
prevent and minimize negative interactions while maintaining healthy
wildlife populations.
(5) The legislature further finds that negative wildlife
interactions can be best reduced by encouraging landowners to
contribute, through their land management practices, to healthy
wildlife populations and to provide access for related recreation.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.010 and 1996 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless otherwise specified,)) The ((following)) definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Claim" means an application to the department for compensation
under this chapter.
(2) "Commercial crop" means a ((commercially raised)) horticultural
((and/or)) or agricultural product ((and includes)), including the
growing or harvested product ((but does not include livestock)). For
the purposes of this chapter all parts of horticultural trees shall be
considered a commercial crop and shall be eligible for claims.
(((2) "Emergency" means an unforeseen circumstance beyond the
control of the landowner or tenant that presents a real and immediate
threat to crops, domestic animals, or fowl.))
(3) "Commercial livestock" means cattle, sheep, and horses held or
raised by a person for sale.
(4) "Compensation" means a cash payment, materials, or service.
(5) "Damage" means economic losses caused by wildlife interactions.
(6) "Immediate family member" means spouse, state registered
domestic partner, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child, or
grandchild.
(7) "Owner" means a person who has a legal right to commercial
crops, commercial livestock, or other property that was damaged during
a wildlife interaction.
(8) "Wildlife interaction" means the negative interaction and the
resultant damage between wildlife and commercial crops, commercial
livestock, or other property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as limited by RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, the
department shall offer to distribute money appropriated to pay claims
to the owner of commercial crops for damage caused by wild deer or elk
or to the owners of commercial livestock that has been killed by bears,
wolves, or cougars, or injured by bears, wolves, or cougars to such a
degree that the market value of the commercial livestock has been
diminished. Payments for claims for damage to commercial livestock are
not subject to the limitations of RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, but may
not exceed the total amount specifically appropriated therefor.
(b) Owners of commercial crops or commercial livestock are only
eligible for a claim under this subsection if:
(i) The owner satisfies the definition of "eligible farmer" in RCW
82.08.855;
(ii) The conditions of section 4 of this act have been satisfied;
and
(iii) The damage caused to the commercial crop or commercial
livestock satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(c) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria that
clarifies the damage to commercial crops and commercial livestock
qualifying for compensation under this subsection. An owner of a
commercial crop or commercial livestock must satisfy the criteria prior
to receiving compensation under this subsection. The criteria for
damage adopted under this subsection must include, but not be limited
to, a required minimum economic loss to the owner of the commercial
crop or commercial livestock, which may not be set at a value of less
than five hundred dollars.
(2)(a) The department may offer to provide noncash compensation
only to offset wildlife interactions to a person who applies to the
department for compensation for damage to property other than
commercial crops or commercial livestock that is the result of a
mammalian or avian species of wildlife on a case-specific basis if the
conditions of section 4 of this act have been satisfied and if the
damage satisfies the criteria for damage established by the commission
under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
damage to property other than a commercial crop or commercial livestock
that is damaged by wildlife and may be eligible for compensation under
this subsection, including criteria for filing a claim for compensation
under this subsection.
(3)(a) To prevent or offset wildlife interactions, the department
may offer materials or services to a person who applies to the
department for assistance in providing mitigating actions designed to
reduce wildlife interactions if the actions are designed to address
damage that satisfies the criteria for damage established by the
commission under this subsection.
(b) The commission shall adopt and maintain by rule criteria for
mitigating actions designed to address wildlife interactions that may
be eligible for materials and services under this section, including
criteria for submitting an application under this section.
(4) An owner who files a claim under this section may appeal the
decision of the department pursuant to rules adopted by the commission
if the claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the owner and the owner disagrees with the
amount of compensation determined by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No owner may receive compensation for wildlife interactions
under this chapter unless the owner has, as determined by the
department, first:
(a) Utilized applicable legal and practicable self-help preventive
measures available to prevent the damage, including the use of
nonlethal methods and department-provided materials and services when
available under section 3 of this act; and
(b) Exhausted all available compensation options available from
nonprofit organizations that provide compensation to private property
owners due to financial losses caused by wildlife interactions.
(2) In determining if the requirements of this section have been
satisfied, the department may recognize and consider the following:
(a) Property losses may occur without future or anticipated
knowledge of potential problems resulting in an owner being unable to
take preemptive measures.
(b) Normal agricultural practices, animal husbandry practices,
recognized standard management techniques, and other industry-recognized management practices may represent adequate preventative
efforts.
(c) Under certain circumstances, as determined by the department,
wildlife may not logistically or practicably be managed by nonlethal
efforts.
(d) Not all available legal preventative efforts are cost-effective
for the owner to practicably employ.
(e) There are certain effective preventative control options not
available due to federal or state restrictions.
(f) Under certain circumstances, as determined by the department,
permitting public hunting may not be a practicable self-help method due
to the size and nature of the property, the property's setting, or the
ability of the landowner to accommodate public access.
(3) An owner is not eligible to receive compensation if the damages
are covered by insurance.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules implementing this section,
including requirements that owners document nonlethal preventive
efforts undertaken and all permits issued by the department under RCW
77.12.240 and 77.12.150.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall establish:
(1) The form of affidavits or proof required to accompany all
claims under this chapter;
(2) The process, time, and methods used to identify and assess
damage, including the anticipated timeline for the initiation and
conclusion of department action;
(3) How claims will be prioritized when available funds for
reimbursement are limited;
(4) Timelines after the discovery of damage by which an owner must
file a claim or notify the department;
(5) Protocols for an owner to follow if the owner wishes to
undertake activities that would complicate the determination of
damages, such as harvesting damaged crops;
(6) The process for determining damage assessments, including the
role and selection of professional damage assessors and the
responsibility for reimbursing third-party assessors for their
services;
(7) Timelines for a claimant to accept, reject, or appeal a
determination made by the department;
(8) The identification of instances when an owner would be
ineligible for compensation;
(9) An appeals process for an owner eligible for compensation under
section 3 of this act who is denied a claim or feels the compensation
is insufficient; and
(10) Other policies necessary for administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and as limited by
section 3 of this act and RCW 77.36.070 and 77.36.080, the cash
compensation portion of each claim by the department under this chapter
is limited to the lesser of:
(a) The value of the damage to the property by wildlife reduced by
the amount of compensation provided to the claimant by any nonprofit
organizations that provide compensation to private property owners due
to financial losses caused by wildlife interactions, except that,
subject to appropriation to pay compensation for damage to commercial
livestock, the value of killed or injured commercial livestock may be
no more than two hundred dollars per sheep, one thousand five hundred
dollars per head of cattle, and one thousand five hundred dollars per
horse; or
(b) Ten thousand dollars.
(2) The department may offer to pay a claim for an amount in excess
of ten thousand dollars to the owners of commercial crops or commercial
livestock filing a claim under section 3 of this act only if the
outcome of an appeal filed by the claimant under section 3 of this act
determines a payment higher than ten thousand dollars.
(3) All payments of claims by the department under this chapter
must be paid to the owner of the damaged property and may not be
assigned to a third party.
(4) The burden of proving all property damage, including damage to
commercial crops and commercial livestock, belongs to the claimant.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.36.070 and 1996 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department may pay no more than one hundred twenty thousand
dollars per fiscal year from the state wildlife ((fund)) account for
claims ((under RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment costs and compromise of
claims. Such money shall be used to pay animal damage claims only if
the claim meets the conditions of RCW 77.36.040 and the damage occurred
in a place where the opportunity to hunt was not restricted or
prohibited by a county, municipality, or other public entity during the
season prior to the occurrence of the damage)) and assessment costs for
damage to commercial crops caused by wild deer or elk submitted under
section 3 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.36.080 and 1996 c 54 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the legislature declares an emergency under this
section, the department may pay no more than thirty thousand dollars
per fiscal year from the general fund for claims ((under RCW 77.36.040
and for assessment costs and compromise of claims unless the
legislature declares an emergency. Such money shall be used to pay
animal damage claims only if the claim meets the conditions of RCW
77.36.040 and the damage occurred in a place where the opportunity to
hunt was restricted or prohibited by a county, municipality, or other
public entity during the season prior to the occurrence of the damage))
and assessment costs for damage to commercial crops caused by wild deer
or elk submitted under section 3 of this act.
(2)(a) The legislature may declare an emergency((, defined for the
purposes of this section as any happening arising from)) if weather,
fire, or other natural ((conditions, or fire that causes unusually
great)) events result in deer or elk causing excessive damage to
((commercially raised agricultural or horticultural)) commercial crops
((by deer or elk)). ((In))
(b) After an emergency declaration, the department may pay as much
as may be subsequently appropriated, in addition to the funds
authorized under subsection (1) of this section, for claims and
assessment costs under ((RCW 77.36.040 and for assessment and
compromise of claims)) section 3 of this act. Such money shall be used
to pay ((animal damage)) wildlife interaction claims only if the claim
meets the conditions of ((RCW 77.36.040)) section 3 of this act and the
department has expended all funds authorized under RCW 77.36.070 or
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.36.030 and 1996 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to ((the following)) limitations and conditions
established by the commission, the owner, the owner's immediate family
member, the owner's documented employee, or a tenant of real property
may trap, consistent with RCW 77.15.194, or kill wildlife that is
threatening human safety or causing property damage on that property,
without the licenses required under RCW 77.32.010 or authorization from
the director under RCW 77.12.240((, wild animals or wild birds that are
damaging crops, domestic animals, or fowl:
(a) Threatened or endangered species shall not be hunted, trapped,
or killed;
(b) Except in an emergency situation, deer, elk, and protected
wildlife shall not be killed without a permit issued and conditioned by
the director or the director's designee. In an emergency, the
department may give verbal permission followed by written permission to
trap or kill any deer, elk, or protected wildlife that is damaging
crops, domestic animals, or fowl; and
(c) On privately owned cattle ranching lands, the land owner or
lessee may declare an emergency only when the department has not
responded within forty-eight hours after having been contacted by the
land owner or lessee regarding damage caused by wild animals or wild
birds. In such an emergency, the owner or lessee may trap or kill any
deer, elk, or other protected wildlife that is causing the damage but
deer and elk may only be killed if such lands were open to public
hunting during the previous hunting season, or the closure to public
hunting was coordinated with the department to protect property and
livestock)).
(2) ((Except for coyotes and Columbian ground squirrels,)) The
commission shall establish the limitations and conditions of this
section by rule. The rules must include:
(a) Appropriate protection for threatened or endangered species;
(b) Instances when verbal or written permission is required to kill
wildlife;
(c) Species that may be killed under this section; and
(d) Requirements for the disposal of wildlife trapped or killed
under this section ((remain the property of the state, and the person
trapping or killing the wildlife shall notify the department
immediately. The department shall dispose of wildlife so taken within
three days of receiving such a notification and in a manner determined
by the director to be in the best interest of the state)).
(3) In establishing the limitations and conditions of this section,
the commission shall take into consideration the recommendations of the
Washington state wolf conservation and management plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 77.36 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter represents the exclusive remedy against the state for
damage caused by wildlife interactions.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.12.240 and 1989 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((director)) department may authorize the removal or
killing of wildlife that is destroying or injuring property, or when it
is necessary for wildlife management or research.
(2) The ((director or other employees of the)) department shall
dispose of wildlife taken or possessed by them under this title in the
manner determined by the director to be in the best interest of the
state. Proceeds from sales shall be deposited in the state treasury to
be credited to the state wildlife ((fund)) account created in RCW
77.12.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The fish and wildlife commission shall
formally review the rules and policies adopted under this act. If, in
the process of reviewing the rules, the fish and wildlife commission
identifies recommended statutory changes related to the subject of this
act and to the ability of the fish and wildlife commission to fulfill
the intent of this act, those recommendations must be forwarded to the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature during the regularly
scheduled 2014 legislative session.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 77.36.005 (Findings) and 1996 c 54 s 1;
(2) RCW 77.36.020 (Game damage control -- Special hunt/remedial
action) and 2003 c 385 s 1 & 1996 c 54 s 3;
(3) RCW 77.36.040 (Payment of claims for damages -- Procedure--Limitations) and 1996 c 54 s 5;
(4) RCW 77.36.050 (Claimant refusal -- Excessive claims) and 1996 c
54 s 6;
(5) RCW 77.36.060 (Claim refused -- Posted property) and 1996 c 54 s
7; and
(6) RCW 77.12.260 (Agreements to prevent damage to private
property) and 1987 c 506 s 34, 1980 c 78 s 43, & 1955 c 36 s 77.12.260.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The following sections are each decodified:
RCW 77.36.900; and
RCW 77.36.901.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act applies prospectively only and not
retroactively. This act applies only to claims that arise on or after
July 1, 2010. Claims under chapter 77.36 RCW that arise prior to July
1, 2010, must be adjudicated under chapter 77.36 RCW as it existed
prior to July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The fish and wildlife commission shall
complete all initial rule-making activities that are required in order
to allow sections 1 through 14 of this act to take effect on July 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 14 of this act take
effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 12 of this act expires July 30,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---