BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.115 and 2003 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The courses of instruction of both the University of Washington and
Washington State University shall embrace as major lines, pharmacy,
architecture, ((civil engineering, mechanical engineering, chemical
engineering,)) and forest management as distinguished from forest
products and logging engineering which are exclusive to the University
of Washington. These major lines shall be offered and taught at said
institutions only.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.060 and 1985 c 218 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The courses of instruction of the University of Washington shall
embrace as exclusive major lines, law, medicine, forest products,
logging engineering, library sciences, ((aeronautic and astronautic
engineering,)) and fisheries.

--- END ---