BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.62.060 and 2007 c 46 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Clerks of the district courts shall collect the following fees for
their official services:
(1) In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a
district court, the plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement
or transfer, pay to such court a filing fee of forty-three dollars plus
any surcharge authorized by RCW 7.75.035. Any party filing a
counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in such action shall
pay to the court a filing fee of forty-three dollars plus any surcharge
authorized by RCW 7.75.035. No party shall be compelled to pay to the
court any other fees or charges up to and including the rendition of
judgment in the action other than those listed.
(2) For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ, or for filing
an attorney issued writ of garnishment, a fee of twelve dollars.
(3) For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twenty dollars.
(4) For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of one hundred
twenty-five dollars to be paid by the person demanding a jury.
(5) For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of twenty
dollars.
(6) For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's
office a fee of five dollars.
(7) For preparing a certified copy of an instrument on file or of
record in the clerk's office, for the first page or portion of the
first page, a fee of five dollars, and for each additional page or
portion of a page, a fee of one dollar may be charged. For
authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of two dollars for
each additional seal affixed may be charged. For preparing a copy of
an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office without a
seal, a fee of fifty cents per page may be charged. When copying a
document without a seal or file that is in an electronic format, a fee
of twenty-five cents per page may be charged. For copies made on a
compact disc, an additional fee of twenty dollars for each compact disc
may be charged.
(8) For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court
a fee of forty dollars including any costs of tape duplication as
governed by the rules of appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction
(RALJ).
(((8))) (9) For clerk's services such as processing ex parte
orders, performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports,
and conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee
not to exceed twenty dollars per hour or portion of an hour.
(10) For duplication of part or all of the electronic recording of
a proceeding ten dollars per tape or other electronic storage medium.
(((9))) (11) For filing any abstract of judgment or transcript of
judgment from a municipal court or municipal department of a district
court organized under the laws of this state a fee of forty-three
dollars.
(12) A service fee of up to three dollars for the first page and
one dollar for each additional page may be charged for receiving faxed
documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule
17.
The fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as
court costs whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

--- END ---