BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.79.060 and 1984 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no power
boiler, low pressure boiler, or unfired pressure vessel which does not
conform to the rules and regulations formulated by the board governing
new construction and installation shall be installed and operated in
this state after twelve months from the date upon which the first rules
and regulations under this chapter pertaining to new construction and
installation shall have become effective, unless the boiler or unfired
pressure vessel is of special design or construction, and is not
covered by the rules and regulations, nor is in any way inconsistent
with such rules and regulations, in which case ((a special installation
and operating permit)) an inspection certificate may at its discretion
be granted by the board.
(2) ((A special permit)) An inspection certificate may also be
granted for boilers and pressure vessels manufactured before 1951 which
do not comply with the code requirements of the American Society of
Mechanical Engineers adopted under this chapter, if the boiler or
pressure vessel is operated exclusively for the purposes of public
exhibition, and the board finds, upon inspection, that operation of the
boiler or pressure vessel for such purposes is not unsafe.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.79.070 and 1995 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All boilers and unfired pressure vessels which were in use, or
installed ready for use in this state prior to the date upon which the
first rules and regulations under this chapter pertaining to existing
installations became effective, or during the twelve months period
immediately thereafter, shall be made to conform to the rules and
regulations of the board governing existing installations, and the
formulae prescribed therein shall be used in determining the maximum
allowable working pressure for such boilers and unfired pressure
vessels.
(2) This chapter shall not be construed as in any way preventing
the use or sale of boilers or unfired vessels as referred to in
subsection (1) of this section, provided they have been made to conform
to the rules and regulations of the board governing existing
installations, and provided, further, they have not been found upon
inspection to be in an unsafe condition.
(3) ((A special permit)) An inspection certificate may also be
granted for miniature hobby boilers that do not comply with the code
requirements of the American society of mechanical engineers adopted
under this chapter and do not exceed any of the following limits:
(a) Sixteen inches inside diameter of the shell;
(b) Twenty square feet of total heating surface;
(c) Five cubic feet of gross volume of vessel; and
(d) One hundred fifty p.s.i.g. maximum allowable working pressure,
and if the boiler is to be operated exclusively not for commercial or
industrial use and the department of labor and industries finds, upon
inspection, that operation of the boiler for such purposes is not
unsafe.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.79.080 and 2005 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter shall not apply to the following boilers, unfired
pressure vessels and domestic hot water tanks:
(1) Boilers and unfired pressure vessels under federal regulation
or operated by any railroad subject to the provisions of the interstate
commerce act;
(2) Unfired pressure vessels meeting the requirements of the
interstate commerce commission for shipment of liquids or gases under
pressure;
(3) Air tanks located on vehicles operating under the rules of
other state authorities and used for carrying passengers, or freight;
(4) Air tanks installed on the right-of-way of railroads and used
directly in the operation of trains;
(5) Unfired pressure vessels having a volume of five cubic feet or
less when not located in places of public assembly;
(6) Unfired pressure vessels designed for a pressure not exceeding
fifteen pounds per square inch gauge;
(7) Tanks used in connection with heating water for domestic and/or
residential purposes;
(8) Boilers and unfired pressure vessels in cities having
ordinances which are enforced and which have requirements equal to or
higher than those provided for under this chapter, covering the
installation, operation, maintenance and inspection of boilers and
unfired pressure vessels;
(9) Tanks containing water with no air cushion and no direct source
of energy that operate at ((a)) ambient temperature ((of one hundred
thirty degrees Fahrenheit or less));
(10) Electric boilers:
(a) Having a tank volume of not more than one and one-half cubic
feet;
(b) Having a maximum allowable working pressure of one hundred
pounds per square inch or less, with a pressure relief system to
prevent excess pressure; and
(c) If constructed after June 10, 1994, constructed to American
society of mechanical engineers code, or approved or otherwise
certified by a nationally recognized or recognized foreign testing
laboratory or construction code, including but not limited to
Underwriters Laboratories, Edison Testing Laboratory, or Instituto
Superiore Per La Prevenzione E La Sicurezza Del Lavoro;
(11) Electrical switchgear and control apparatus that have no
external source of energy to maintain pressure and are located in
restricted access areas under the control of an electric utility;
(12) Regardless of location, unfired pressure vessels ((and hot
water heaters)) less than one and one-half cubic feet (11.25 gallons)
in volume ((with a safety valve setting of one hundred fifty pounds per
square inch gauge (psig) or less,)) or less than six inches in diameter
((and less than five cubic feet (37.5 gallons) in volume with a safety
valve set at any pressure, or less than fifteen psig containing
substances other than steam, lethal substances, or liquids with low
flash points)) with no limitation on the length of the vessel or
pressure;
(13) Domestic hot water heaters less than one and one-half cubic
feet (11.25 gallons) in volume with a safety valve setting of one
hundred fifty pounds per square inch gauge or less.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.79.090 and 2005 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following boilers and unfired pressure vessels shall be exempt
from the requirements of RCW 70.79.220 and 70.79.240 through 70.79.330:
(1) Boilers or unfired pressure vessels located on farms and used
solely for agricultural purposes;
(2) Unfired pressure vessels that are part of fertilizer applicator
rigs designed and used exclusively for fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations;
(3) Steam boilers used exclusively for heating purposes carrying a
pressure of not more than fifteen pounds per square inch gauge and
which are located in private residences or in apartment houses of less
than six families;
(4) Hot water heating boilers carrying a pressure of not more than
thirty pounds per square inch and which are located in private
residences or in apartment houses of less than six families;
(5) Approved pressure vessels (hot water heaters, hot water storage
tanks, hot water supply boilers, and hot water heating boilers listed
by a nationally recognized testing agency), with approved safety
devices including a pressure relief valve, with a nominal water
containing capacity of one hundred twenty gallons or less having a heat
input of two hundred thousand b.t.u.'s per hour or less, ((used for hot
water supply)) at pressure of one hundred sixty pounds per square inch
or less, and at temperatures of two hundred ten degrees Fahrenheit or
less: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That such pressure vessels are not installed
in schools, child care centers, public and private hospitals, nursing
and boarding homes, churches, public buildings owned or leased and
maintained by the state or any political subdivision thereof, and
assembly halls;
(6) Unfired pressure vessels containing only water under pressure
for domestic supply purposes, including those containing air, the
compression of which serves only as a cushion or airlift pumping
systems, when located in private residences or in apartment houses of
less than six families, or in public water systems as defined in RCW
70.119.020;
(7) Unfired pressure vessels containing liquified petroleum gases.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.79.240 and 1993 c 391 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each boiler and unfired pressure vessel used or proposed to be used
within this state, except boilers or unfired pressure vessels exempt in
RCW 70.79.080 and 70.79.090, shall be thoroughly inspected as to their
construction, installation, condition and operation, as follows:
(1) Power boilers shall be inspected annually both internally and
externally while not under pressure, except that the board may provide
for longer periods between inspections where the contents, history, or
operation of the power boiler or the material of which it is
constructed warrant special consideration. Power boilers shall also be
inspected annually externally while under pressure if possible;
(2) Low pressure heating boilers shall be inspected both internally
and externally biennially where construction will permit, except that
the board may, in its discretion, provide for longer periods between
internal inspections;
(3) Unfired pressure vessels subject to internal corrosion shall be
inspected both internally and externally biennially where construction
will permit, except that the board may, in its discretion, provide for
longer periods between internal inspections;
(4) Unfired pressure vessels not subject to internal corrosion
shall be inspected externally at intervals set by the board, but
internal inspections shall not be required of unfired pressure vessels,
the contents of which are known to be noncorrosive to the material of
which the shell, head, or fittings are constructed, either from the
chemical composition of the contents or from evidence that the contents
are adequately treated with a corrosion inhibitor, provided that such
vessels are constructed in accordance with the rules and regulations of
the board or in accordance with standards substantially equivalent to
the rules and regulations of the board, in effect at the time of
manufacture.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 70.79.210 (Inspectors -- Performance bond
required) and 1951 c 32 s 35 are each repealed.

--- END ---