BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Beginning July 1, 2010, no manufacturer,
wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for
sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state any
bottle or cup that contains bisphenol A and is designed or intended to
be filled with any liquid, food, or beverage primarily for consumption
from that container by children three years of age or younger and is
sold or distributed without containing any liquid, food, or beverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A manufacturer of products that are
restricted under this chapter must notify persons that sell the
manufacturer's products in this state about the provisions of this
chapter no less than ninety days prior to the effective date of the
restrictions.
(2) A manufacturer that produces, sells, or distributes a product
prohibited from manufacture, sale, or distribution in this state under
this chapter shall recall the product and reimburse the retailer or any
other purchaser for the product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer
that manufacturers, knowingly sells, or distributes products in
violation of this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
five thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first
offense. Manufacturers, wholesalers, or retailers who are repeat
violators are subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand
dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties collected under this
section must be deposited in the state toxics control account created
in RCW 70.l05D.070.
(2) Retailers who unknowingly sell products that are restricted
from sale under this chapter are not subject to the civil penalties
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---