BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A wireless communications service
provider must replace the wireless communications device of any
subscriber under contract with the service provider if the subscriber's
wireless communications device ceases to function due to a defect,
malfunction, or failure of one or more components of the device. The
replacement wireless communications device must be as similar as
reasonably possible to the nonfunctioning device. As an alternative to
device replacement, the service provider must allow the subscriber to
cancel the service contract without imposing any termination or penalty
fees.
(2) The legislature finds that the practices covered by this
section are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A
violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive
act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the
purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---