BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Performing group" means a vocal or instrumental group seeking
to use the name of another group that has previously released a
commercial sound recording under that name.
(b) "Recording group" means a vocal or instrumental group, at least
one of whose members has previously released a commercial sound
recording under that group's name and in which the member or members
have a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name
without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group.
(c) "Sound recording" means a work that results from the fixation
on a material object of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds
regardless of the nature of the material object, such as a disk, tape,
or other phonorecord, in which the sounds are embodied.
(2) A person shall not advertise or conduct a live musical
performance or production through the use of a false, deceptive, or
misleading affiliation, connection, or association between a performing
group and a recording group unless any of the following apply:
(a) The performing group is the authorized registrant and owner of
a federal service mark for the group registered in the United States
patent and trademark office;
(b) At least one member of the performing group was previously a
member of the recording group and has a legal right by virtue of use or
operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or
affiliation of the group;
(c) The live musical performance or production is identified in all
advertising and promotion as a salute or tribute;
(d) The advertising does not relate to a live musical performance
or production taking place in this state; or
(e) The performance or production is expressly authorized by the
recording group.
(3)(a) A person who violates this section is subject to a civil
penalty not less than five thousand dollars or more than fifteen
thousand dollars per violation. An action for a civil penalty may be
brought by the attorney general or a county or city prosecutor and is
enforceable as a civil judgment.
(b) A person who violates this section is subject to the equitable
remedies described in chapter 19.86 RCW.
(c) Each performance or production declared unlawful under
subsection (2) of this section constitutes a separate violation.
(d) This section does not preclude prosecution of a violation of
this section under any other provision of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the truth
in music advertising act.

--- END ---