BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.030 and 2008 c 211 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner,
law enforcement officer, professional school personnel, registered or
licensed nurse, social service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist,
employee of the department of early learning, licensed or certified
child care providers or their employees, employee of the department,
juvenile probation officer, placement and liaison specialist,
responsible living skills program staff, HOPE center staff, or state
family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the ombudsman's
office has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse
or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to
be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as
provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(b) When any person, in his or her official supervisory capacity
with a nonprofit or for-profit organization, has reasonable cause to
believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect caused by a person
over whom he or she regularly exercises supervisory authority, he or
she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the
proper law enforcement agency, provided that the person alleged to have
caused the abuse or neglect is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the organization and coaches, trains, educates, or
counsels a child or children or regularly has unsupervised access to a
child or children as part of the employment, contract, or voluntary
service. No one shall be required to report under this section when he
or she obtains the information solely as a result of a privileged
communication as provided in RCW 5.60.060.
Nothing in this subsection (1)(b) shall limit a person's duty to
report under (a) of this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Official supervisory capacity" means a position, status, or
role created, recognized, or designated by any nonprofit or for-profit
organization, either for financial gain or without financial gain,
whose scope includes, but is not limited to, overseeing, directing, or
managing another person who is employed by, contracted by, or
volunteers with the nonprofit or for-profit organization.
(ii) "Regularly exercises supervisory authority" means to act in
his or her official supervisory capacity on an ongoing or continuing
basis with regards to a particular person.
(c) The reporting requirement also applies to department of
corrections personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe
offenders or the children with whom the offenders are in contact. If,
as a result of observations or information received in the course of
his or her employment, any department of corrections personnel has
reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered abuse or neglect,
he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made, to
the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.
(d) The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has
reasonable cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has
suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable of making a report. For
the purposes of this subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the
following: Any single act of abuse that causes physical trauma of
sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause death; any
single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than
one act of physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep
bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or
unconsciousness.
(e) The reporting requirement also applies to guardians ad litem
appointed under Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW, who in the course of their
representation of children in these actions have reasonable cause to
believe a child has been abused or neglected.
(f) The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no
case longer than forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to
believe that the child has suffered abuse or neglect. The report must
include the identity of the accused if known.
(2) The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section
does not apply to the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred
during childhood if it is discovered after the child has become an
adult. However, if there is reasonable cause to believe other children
are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by the accused, the reporting
requirement of subsection (1) of this section does apply.
(3) Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect may report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency or to the department of social and health
services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.
(4) The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the proper law
enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child's welfare is
endangered, the department shall notify the proper law enforcement
agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received
by the department. If the department makes an oral report, a written
report must also be made to the proper law enforcement agency within
five days thereafter.
(5) Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of
alleged abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child
who has died or has had physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him
or her other than by accidental means, or who has been subjected to
alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing as provided
in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney for
appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement
agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and the
law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases,
where the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency
shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In all other
cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement
agency.
(6) Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under
subsection (5) of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the
victim requests, and the local office of the department, of the
decision to charge or decline to charge a crime, within five days of
making the decision.
(7) The department may conduct ongoing case planning and
consultation with those persons or agencies required to report under
this section, with consultants designated by the department, and with
designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if the client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases currently receiving child
protective services. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under
this section if the department determines it is in the best interests
of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.
(8) Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical
opinion that child abuse, neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and
that the child's safety will be seriously endangered if returned home,
the department shall file a dependency petition unless a second
licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such expert
medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a
second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that
such abuse or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the
child's health or safety, and the department agrees with the
physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents' home
while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.
(9) Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7)
of this section shall not further disseminate or release the
information except as authorized by state or federal statute.
Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.
(10) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect, the
department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address,
and telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect
under this section. The department shall provide assurances of
appropriate confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting
under this section. If the department is unable to learn the
information required under this subsection, the department shall only
investigate cases in which:
(a) The department believes there is a serious threat of
substantial harm to the child;
(b) The report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that
has, or is about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or
(c) The department has a prior founded report of abuse or neglect
with regard to a member of the household that is within three years of
receipt of the referral.
(11)(a) For reports of alleged abuse or neglect that are accepted
for investigation by the department, the investigation shall be
conducted within time frames established by the department in rule. In
no case shall the investigation extend longer than ninety days from the
date the report is received, unless the investigation is being
conducted under a written protocol pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and a law
enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney has determined that a longer
investigation period is necessary. At the completion of the
investigation, the department shall make a finding that the report of
child abuse or neglect is founded or unfounded.
(b) If a court in a civil or criminal proceeding, considering the
same facts or circumstances as are contained in the report being
investigated by the department, makes a judicial finding by a
preponderance of the evidence or higher that the subject of the pending
investigation has abused or neglected the child, the department shall
adopt the finding in its investigation.
(12) In conducting an investigation of alleged abuse or neglect,
the department or law enforcement agency:
(a) May interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at
other suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental
notification of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point
in the investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection
of the child or the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing
the interview the department or law enforcement agency shall determine
whether the child wishes a third party to be present for the interview
and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the child's
wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or law enforcement
agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party in any
interview so long as the presence of the third party will not
jeopardize the course of the investigation; and
(b) Shall have access to all relevant records of the child in the
possession of mandated reporters and their employees.
(13) If a report of alleged abuse or neglect is founded and
constitutes the third founded report received by the department within
the last twelve months involving the same child or family, the
department shall promptly notify the office of the family and
children's ombudsman of the contents of the report. The department
shall also notify the ombudsman of the disposition of the report.
(14) In investigating and responding to allegations of child abuse
and neglect, the department may conduct background checks as authorized
by state and federal law.
(15) The department shall maintain investigation records and
conduct timely and periodic reviews of all founded cases of abuse and
neglect. The department shall maintain a log of screened-out
nonabusive cases.
(16) The department shall use a risk assessment process when
investigating alleged child abuse and neglect referrals. The
department shall present the risk factors at all hearings in which the
placement of a dependent child is an issue. Substance abuse must be a
risk factor. The department shall, within funds appropriated for this
purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to persons who are
determined not to require further state intervention.
(17) Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law
enforcement agency may arrange to interview the person making the
report and any collateral sources to determine if any malice is
involved in the reporting.
(18) Upon receiving a report of alleged abuse or neglect involving
a child under the court's jurisdiction under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department shall promptly notify the child's guardian ad litem of the
report's contents. The department shall also notify the guardian ad
litem of the disposition of the report. For purposes of this
subsection, "guardian ad litem" has the meaning provided in RCW
13.34.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.100 and 2000 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings. The court shall attempt to
match the child with a guardian ad litem who has specific training or
education related to the child's individual needs.
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background ((file)) information record shall include, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian(('s)) ad litem's
duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in the dependency system;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(((d))) (f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the
county or counties of appointment;
(((e))) (g) The names of any counties in which the person was
removed from a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance
action, and the name of the court and the cause number of any case in
which the court has removed the person for cause; ((and
(f))) (h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination of state and national criminal
identification data. The examination shall consist of a background
check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy
act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the
federal bureau of investigation. This background check shall be done
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and
may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation,
which shall be through the submission of fingerprints; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information ((report)) record shall be updated
annually. As a condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's
background information record shall be made available to the court. If
the appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program ((the)) a suitable person appointed by the court to act as
guardian ad litem shall provide the background information record to
the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a
((statement containing: His or her training relating to the duties as
a guardian ad litem; the name of any counties in which the person was
removed from a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance
action, and the name of the court and the cause number of any case in
which the court has removed the person for cause; and his or her
criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering
ten years prior to the appointment)) copy of the background information
record. The portion of the background information record containing
the results of the criminal background check and the criminal history
shall not be disclosed to the parties or their attorneys. The
background ((statement)) information record shall not include
identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem,
such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or
pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6) If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older,
or if the guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child
needs to be independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the child's position.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to RCW 13.34.100 shall be deemed a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings before the
court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends ((and the appointment shall be
effective immediately)). The program shall attempt to match the child
with a guardian ad litem who has specific training or education related
to the child's individual needs. The court shall immediately appoint
the person recommended by the program, unless the court believes the
court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or
unqualified.
(9) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.
(10) If a party in a case reasonably believes the person appointed
under subsection (2) of this section is inappropriate or unqualified,
the party may request that the court review the appointment.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.12.175 and 2000 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the
interests of a minor or dependent child when the court believes the
appointment of a guardian ad litem is necessary to protect the best
interests of the child in any proceeding under this chapter. The court
shall attempt to match the child with a guardian ad litem who has
specific training or education related to the child's individual needs.
The family court services professionals may also make a recommendation
to the court regarding whether a guardian ad litem should be appointed
for the child. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem from the
court-appointed special advocate program, if that program exists in the
county.
Either party may request, within five judicial days of appointment,
that the guardian ad litem appointed by the court be removed. The
court shall grant the first request unless, because of the limited pool
of available guardians ad litem, to do so would cause substantial harm
to the children involved. Subsequent requests to remove a guardian ad
litem shall follow the procedures in subsection (5) of this section.
In the event a party requests that a guardian ad litem be removed
within the first five days of appointment, the court shall determine
whether fees should be paid to the guardian ad litem for work completed
during that five-day period, or if fees have already been paid, how
much, if any, should be refunded to the parties.
(b) ((Unless otherwise ordered,)) The guardian ad litem's role is
to investigate and report factual information regarding the issues
ordered to be reported or investigated to the court ((concerning
parenting arrangements for the child, and to represent the child's best
interests)). The guardian ad litem shall always represent the best
interests of the child. Guardians ad litem ((and investigators)) under
this title may make recommendations based upon ((an independent
investigation regarding the best interests of the child)) his or her
investigation, which the court may consider and weigh in conjunction
with the recommendations of all of the parties. If a child expresses
a preference regarding the parenting plan, the guardian ad litem shall
report the preferences to the court, together with the facts relative
to whether any preferences are being expressed voluntarily and the
degree of the child's understanding. The court may require the
guardian ad litem to provide periodic reports to the parties regarding
the status of his or her investigation. The guardian ad litem shall
file his or her report at least sixty days prior to trial.
(c) The parties to the proceeding may file with the court written
responses to any report filed by the guardian ad litem ((or
investigator)). The court shall consider any written responses to a
report filed by the guardian ad litem ((or investigator)), including
any factual information or recommendations provided in the report.
(d) The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and
disbursements to cover the costs of the guardian ad litem. The court
may order either or both parents to pay for the costs of the guardian
ad litem, according to their ability to pay. If both parents are
indigent, the county shall bear the cost of the guardian, subject to
appropriation for guardians' ad litem services by the county
legislative authority. Guardians ad litem who are not volunteers shall
provide the parties with an itemized accounting of their time and
billing for services each month.
(2)(a) If the guardian ad litem appointed is from the county court-appointed special advocate program, the program shall supervise any
guardian ad litem assigned to the case. The court-appointed special
advocate program shall be entitled to notice of all proceedings in the
case.
(b) The legislative authority of each county may authorize creation
of a court-appointed special advocate program. The county legislative
authority may adopt rules of eligibility for court-appointed special
advocate program services that are not inconsistent with this section.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background ((file)) information record shall include, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian(('s)) ad litem's
duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in dissolution proceedings;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(((d))) (f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and
county or counties of appointment;
(((e))) (g) The names of any counties in which the person was
removed from a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance
action, and the name of the court and the cause number of any case in
which the court has removed the person for cause; ((and
(f))) (h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(i) The results of an examination of state and national criminal
identification data. The examination shall consist of a background
check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy
act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the
federal bureau of investigation. This background check shall be done
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification section and
may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation,
which shall be through the submission of fingerprints; and
(j) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information ((report)) record shall be updated
annually. As a condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's
background information record shall be made available to the court. If
the appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program the person appointed as guardian ad litem shall provide the
background information record to the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a
((statement containing: His or her training relating to the duties as
a guardian ad litem; the name of any counties in which the person was
removed from a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance
action, and the name of the court and the cause number of any case in
which the court has removed the person for cause; and his or her
criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering
ten years prior to the appointment)) copy of the background information
record. The portion of the background information record containing
the results of the criminal background check and the criminal history
shall not be disclosed to the parties or their attorneys. The
background ((statement)) information record shall not include
identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem,
such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or
pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.
(4) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends ((and the appointment shall be
effective immediately)). The court shall immediately appoint the
person recommended by the program, unless the court believes the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is
inappropriate or unqualified. Either party may request, within five
judicial days of appointment, that the guardian ad litem appointed by
the court be removed. The court shall grant the first request unless,
because of the limited pool of available guardians ad litem, to do so
would cause substantial harm to the children involved. Subsequent
requests to remove a guardian ad litem shall follow the procedures in
subsection (5) of this section. In the event a party requests that a
guardian ad litem be removed within the first five days of appointment,
the court shall determine whether fees should be paid to the guardian
ad litem for work completed during that five-day period, or if fees
have already been paid, how much, if any, should be refunded to the
parties.
(5) If a party in a case reasonably believes the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem on the grounds the
advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.12.177 and 2007 c 496 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All guardians ad litem and investigators appointed under this
title must comply with the training requirements established under RCW
2.56.030(15), prior to their appointment in cases under Title 26 RCW,
except that volunteer guardians ad litem or court-appointed special
advocates may comply with alternative training requirements approved by
the administrative office of the courts that meet or exceed the
statewide requirements. In cases involving allegations of limiting
factors under RCW 26.09.191, the guardians ad litem and investigators
appointed under this title must have additional relevant training under
RCW 2.56.030(15) and as recommended under RCW 2.53.040, when it is
available.
(2) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem shall maintain a background information record for each guardian
ad litem in the program. The background information record shall
include, but is not limited to, the following information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) General training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(c) Specific training related to issues potentially faced by
children in dissolution, residential placement and parenting plan
proceedings;
(d) Specific training or education related to child disability or
developmental issues;
(e) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(f) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and county or
counties of appointment;
(g) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(h) Founded allegations of abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020; and
(i) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, for the period
covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background information record shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program for compensated guardians ad litem, the person appointed as
guardian ad litem shall provide the background information record to
the court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a copy of
the background information record. The portion of the background
information record containing the results of the criminal background
check and the criminal history shall not be disclosed to the parties or
their attorneys. The background information record shall not include
identifying information, such as home addresses and home telephone
numbers.
(3)(a) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem shall establish a rotational registry system for the appointment
of guardians ad litem and investigators under this title. If a
judicial district does not have a program the court shall establish the
rotational registry system. Guardians ad litem and investigators under
this title shall be selected from the registry except in exceptional
circumstances as determined and documented by the court. The parties
may make a joint recommendation for the appointment of a guardian ad
litem from the registry.
(b) In judicial districts with a population over one hundred
thousand, a list of three names shall be selected from the registry and
given to the parties along with the background information record as
specified in RCW 26.12.175(3), including their hourly rate for
services. Each party may, within three judicial days, strike one name
from the list. If more than one name remains on the list, the court
shall make the appointment from the names on the list. In the event
all three names are stricken the person whose name appears next on the
registry shall be appointed.
(c)(i) Either party may request, within five judicial days of
appointment, that the guardian ad litem appointed by the court be
removed. The court shall grant the first request unless, because of
the limited pool of available guardians ad litem, to do so would cause
substantial harm to the children involved. Subsequent requests to
remove a guardian ad litem shall follow the procedures in (c)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) If a party reasonably believes that the subsequent appointed
guardian ad litem ((lacks the necessary expertise for the proceeding))
is inappropriate or unqualified, charges an hourly rate higher than
what is reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a conflict of
interest, the party may, within three judicial days from the
appointment, move for substitution of the appointed guardian ad litem
by filing a motion with the court.
(d) Under this section, within either registry referred to in (a)
of this subsection, a subregistry may be created that consists of
guardians ad litem under contract with the department of social and
health services' division of child support. Guardians ad litem on such
a subregistry shall be selected and appointed in state-initiated
paternity cases only.
(e) The superior court shall remove any person from the guardian ad
litem registry who ((misrepresents)) has been found to have
substantially misrepresented his or her qualifications ((pursuant to a
grievance procedure established by the court)).
(((3))) (4) The rotational registry system shall not apply to
court-appointed special advocate programs.

--- END ---