BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2005 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision,
the risk assessment shall classify the offender or a probationer
sentenced in superior court into one of at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor probationer
ordered by a superior court to probation under the supervision of the
department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody, community
placement, or community supervision or the probationer's supervision
include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender)) The department shall supervise every offender
sentenced to community custody:
(a) Whose risk assessment, conducted pursuant to subsection (4) of
this section, places the offender in one of the two highest risk
categories; or
(b)(i) Who is not classified in one of the two highest risk
categories and:
(A) Has a current felony conviction for a violent offense or a
crime against persons as provided in RCW 9.94A.411; or
(B) Is required to participate in chemical dependency treatment as
a condition of community custody;
(ii) The department shall terminate supervision for an offender
supervised pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) six months after the date
of release if the offender, after conducting a new risk assessment, is
still not classified in one of the two highest risk categories.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense that is not a
failure to register;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670; or
(((v) The offender)) (e) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody, community placement,
or community supervision ((or any probationer)) unless the offender
((or probationer)) is one for whom supervision is required under
((subsection (2) of)) this section.
(4) ((This section expires July 1, 2010)) The department shall
conduct a risk assessment for every offender sentenced to a term of
community custody, community placement, or community supervision who
may be subject to supervision under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2008 c 231 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((When the department performs a risk assessment pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.500, or to determine a person's conditions of supervision,
the risk assessment shall classify the offender or a probationer
sentenced in superior court into one of at least four risk categories.
(2) The department shall supervise every offender sentenced to a
term of community custody and every misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor
probationer ordered by a superior court to probation under the
supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or
9.95.210:
(a) Whose risk assessment places that offender or probationer in
one of the two highest risk categories; or
(b) Regardless of the offender's or probationer's risk category if:
(i) The offender's or probationer's current conviction is for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(ii) The offender or probationer has a prior conviction for:
(A) A sex offense;
(B) A violent offense;
(C) A crime against persons as defined in RCW 9.94A.411;
(D) A felony that is domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020;
(E) A violation of RCW 9A.52.025 (residential burglary);
(F) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.401 by manufacture or delivery or possession with
intent to deliver methamphetamine; or
(G) A violation of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
violate, RCW 69.50.406 (delivery of a controlled substance to a minor);
(iii) The conditions of the offender's community custody or the
probationer's supervision include chemical dependency treatment;
(iv) The offender)) The department shall supervise every offender
sentenced to community custody:
(a) Whose risk assessment, conducted pursuant to subsection (4) of
this section, classifies the offender as one who is at a high risk to
reoffend; or
(b)(i) Who is classified at a low or moderate risk to reoffend and:
(A) Has a current felony conviction for a violent offense or a
crime against persons as provided in RCW 9.94A.411; or
(B) Is required to participate in chemical dependency treatment as
a condition of community custody;
(ii) The department shall terminate supervision for an offender
supervised pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) six months after the date
of release if the offender, after conducting a new risk assessment,
remains at a low or moderate risk to reoffend.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense that is not a
failure to register;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670; or
(((v) The offender)) (e) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW
9.94A.745.
(3) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody ((or any
probationer)) unless the offender ((or probationer)) is one for whom
supervision is required under ((subsection (2) of)) this section.
(4) ((This section expires July 1, 2010)) The department shall
conduct a risk assessment for every offender sentenced to a term of
community custody who may be subject to supervision under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2008 c 276 s 309, 2008 c 231 s 23, 2008
c 230 s 2, and 2008 c 7 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) "Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(5) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence and served in the community subject to controls
placed on the offender's movement and activities by the department.
(6) "Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period
of community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW
((9.94A.715)) 9.94A.701, as established by the commission or the
legislature under RCW 9.94A.850.
(7) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight hundred
eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or private
school.
(8) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(9) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(10) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to
Title((s)) 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of
guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(11) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(12) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior
convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(13) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(14) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person
who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(15) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any felony or
misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that is
committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).
(16) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing court that
equals the difference between the offender's net daily income and the
reasonable obligations that the offender has for the support of the
offender and any dependents.
(17) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision
designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and compliance with
sentence conditions, and in which the offender is required to report
daily to a specific location designated by the department or the
sentencing court.
(18) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(19) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with
exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(20) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(21) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a sentencing option
available to persons convicted of a felony offense other than a violent
offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for the option under RCW
9.94A.660.
(22) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(23) "Earned release" means earned release from confinement as
provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(24) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(25) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(26) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the sentencing
court to be paid by the offender to the court over a specific period of
time.
(27) "First-time offender" means any person who has no prior
convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time offender
waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(28) "Home detention" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private
residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(29) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that is
ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal
financial obligations which may include restitution to the victim,
statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as assessed
pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal drug funds,
court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense, fines, and any
other financial obligation that is assessed to the offender as a result
of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular assault while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense
of an emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction,
subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or
a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.602;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess.
as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as
it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under Title 9 or 9A RCW and the out-of-state
definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of
sexual motivation contained in this section.
(31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent
offense.
(32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one
year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract
by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or
work crew has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for
a substantial portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in
the community. Partial confinement includes work release, home
detention, work crew, and a combination of work crew and home
detention.
(34) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of
a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(35) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (35)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime was a
stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the perpetrator
established or promoted a relationship with the victim prior to the
offense and the victimization of the victim was a significant reason
the perpetrator established or promoted the relationship; or (c) the
perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor, volunteer, or other person
in authority in any public or private school and the victim was a
student of the school under his or her authority or supervision. For
purposes of this subsection, "school" does not include home-based
instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a coach, trainer,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any recreational activity
and the victim was a participant in the activity under his or her
authority or supervision; or (iii) a pastor, elder, volunteer, or other
person in authority in any church or religious organization, and the
victim was a member or participant of the organization under his or her
authority.
(37) "Private school" means a school regulated under chapter
28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.
(39) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(40) "Risk assessment" means the application of ((an objective))
the risk instrument ((supported by research and adopted by))
recommended to the department ((for the purpose of assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of
the harm done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender
related to risk, the offender's relationship to any victim, and any
information provided to the department by victims. The results of a
risk assessment shall not be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable
allegations)) by the Washington state institute for public policy as
having the highest degree of predictive accuracy for assessing an
offender's risk of reoffense.
(41) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(42) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense
and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(43) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.130(12);
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080; or
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(44) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.
(45) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(46) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length of time
for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime as
prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining the
crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(47) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the offender
twenty-four hours before the offense.
(48) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four
hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(49) "Transition training" means written and verbal instructions
and assistance provided by the department to the offender during the
two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work
ethic camp program. The transition training shall include instructions
in the offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's
period of community custody.
(50) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as
a direct result of the crime charged.
(51) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(52) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting
of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community that
complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(53) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program
as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and lower
the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(54) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.95.204 and 2005 c 400 s 2 and 2005 c 362 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) ((When a superior court places a defendant convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on probation and orders supervision
under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the department of corrections has
initial responsibility for supervision of that defendant.
(2) A county legislative authority may assume responsibility for
the supervision of all defendants within its jurisdiction who have been
convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and sentenced to
probation by a superior court. The assumption of responsibility shall
be made by contract with the department of corrections on a biennial
basis.
(3) If a county assumes supervision responsibility, the county
shall supervise all superior court misdemeanant probationers within
that county for the duration of the biennium, as set forth in the
contract with the department of corrections.
(4) A contract between a county legislative authority and the
department of corrections for the transfer of supervision
responsibility must include, at a minimum, the following provisions:
(a) The county's agreement to supervise all misdemeanant
probationers who are sentenced by a superior court within that county
and who reside within that county;
(b) A reciprocal agreement regarding the supervision of superior
court misdemeanant probationers sentenced in one county but who reside
in another county;
(c) The county's agreement to comply with the minimum standards for
classification and supervision of offenders as required under RCW
9.95.206;
(d) The amount of funds available from the department of
corrections to the county for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers, calculated according to a formula
established by the department of corrections;
(e) A method for the payment of funds by the department of
corrections to the county;
(f) The county's agreement that any funds received by the county
under the contract will be expended only to cover costs of supervision
of superior court misdemeanant probationers;
(g) The county's agreement to account to the department of
corrections for the expenditure of all funds received under the
contract and to submit to audits for compliance with the supervision
standards and financial requirements of this section;
(h) Provisions regarding rights and remedies in the event of a
possible breach of contract or default by either party; and
(i) Provisions allowing for voluntary termination of the contract
by either party, with good cause, after sixty days' written notice.
(5) If the contract between the county and the department of
corrections is terminated for any reason, the department of corrections
shall reassume responsibility for supervision of superior court
misdemeanant probationers within that county. In such an event, the
department of corrections retains any and all rights and remedies
available by law and under the contract.
(6) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, and volunteers who assist
community corrections officers are not liable for any harm caused by
the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under
the supervision of a county. A county, its probation department and
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist probation
officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a
superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of
the department of corrections. This subsection applies regardless of
whether the supervising entity is in compliance with the standards of
supervision at the time of the misdemeanant probationer's actions.
(7) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its
employees, community corrections officers, any county under contract
with the department of corrections pursuant to this section and its
employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist community
corrections officers and)) A county legislative authority may authorize
a probation program for the supervision of defendants within its
jurisdiction who have been convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor and who may be sentenced to probation by a superior court.
(2) To the extent the county legislative authority has authorized
a superior court misdemeanant probation program pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, a superior court may place a defendant convicted
of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on probation and order
supervision under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210.
(3) The state of Washington is not liable for any harm caused by
the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under
the supervision of a county. The state of Washington and a county are
not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor defendant who has been sentenced to a term of probation by
a superior court but who is not being supervised pursuant to a duly
authorized superior court misdemeanant probation program.
(4) The state of Washington, a county, its probation department and
employees, probations officers, and volunteers who assist probation
officers in the superior court misdemeanant probation program are not
liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the
rendering of superior court misdemeanant probation activities unless
the act or omission constitutes gross negligence. For purposes of this
section, "volunteers" is defined according to RCW 51.12.035.
(((8) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.
(9))) (5)(a) If a misdemeanant probationer requests permission to
travel or transfer to another state, the assigned probation officer
employed ((or contracted for)) by the county shall determine whether
such request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for
adult offender supervision. If such request is subject to the compact,
the probation officer shall:
(i) ((Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's
request;
(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting
documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;
(iii) Notify the probationer of the fee due to the department of
corrections for processing an application under the compact;
(iv))) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state
supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;
(((v) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state
before the term of probation expires.
(b) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state)) (ii) Resume supervision if the
probationer returns to this state before the term of probation expires.
(b) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while
being supervised by another state.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.210 and 2005 c 362 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In granting probation, the superior court may suspend the
imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the
suspension may continue upon such conditions and for such time as it
shall designate, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two
years, whichever is longer.
(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the
superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the
county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the
defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense
committed, and court costs. As a condition of probation, the superior
court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the defendant to
make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any
order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make
restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or
damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the
offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees
with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to
pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not
prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be
imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs
of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d)
following consideration of the financial condition of the person
subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of
electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as
a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e)
to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make
restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response
under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance
of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.
(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where
the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims'
compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the
department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime
victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within
one year of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution
order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and
industries, the superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and
shall enter a restitution order.
(4) ((In granting probation, the superior court may order the
probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer
as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to
follow the instructions of the secretary.)) If the county legislative
authority has ((elected to assume responsibility for the supervision
of)) authorized a superior court misdemeanant ((probationers))
probation program within its jurisdiction, the superior court
misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation officer employed
((or contracted for)) by the county. In cases where a superior court
misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but resides within
another county, there must be provisions for the probationer to report
to the agency having supervision responsibility for the probationer's
county of residence.
(5) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the
superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the
probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether
restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered
supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer
shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation
not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation
period. ((The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and
regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of
probation.)) For defendants found guilty in district court, ((like))
functions ((as the secretary performs)) in regard to probation may be
performed by probation officers employed for that purpose by the county
legislative authority of the county wherein the court is located.
(((6) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.))

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.214 and 2005 c 400 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor is placed on probation under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, and
the defendant is supervised by ((the department of corrections or)) a
county probation department, the ((department or)) county probation
department may assess and collect from the defendant for the duration
of the term of supervision a monthly assessment not to exceed one
hundred dollars per month. This assessment shall be paid to the agency
supervising the defendant and shall be applied, along with funds
appropriated by the legislature, toward the payment or part payment of
the cost of supervising the defendant. The ((department or)) county
probation department shall suspend such assessment while the defendant
is being supervised by another state pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.95.220 and 1957 c 227 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the ((state parole officer or other)) officer under whose
supervision the probationer has been placed shall have reason to
believe such probationer is violating the terms of his probation, or
engaging in criminal practices, or is abandoned to improper associates,
or living a vicious life, he shall cause the probationer to be brought
before the court wherein the probation was granted. For this purpose
any peace officer or ((state)) parole officer may rearrest any such
person without warrant or other process. The court may thereupon in
its discretion without notice revoke and terminate such probation. In
the event the judgment has been pronounced by the court and the
execution thereof suspended, the court may revoke such suspension,
whereupon the judgment shall be in full force and effect, and the
defendant shall be delivered to the sheriff to be transported to the
penitentiary or reformatory as the case may be. If the judgment has
not been pronounced, the court shall pronounce judgment after such
revocation of probation and the defendant shall be delivered to the
sheriff to be transported to the penitentiary or reformatory, in
accordance with the sentence imposed.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.92.060 and 2005 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any crime except murder,
burglary in the first degree, arson in the first degree, robbery, rape
of a child, or rape, the superior court may, in its discretion, at the
time of imposing sentence upon such person, direct that such sentence
be stayed and suspended until otherwise ordered by the superior
court((, and that the sentenced person be placed under the charge of a
community corrections officer employed by the department of
corrections, or if the county elects to assume responsibility for the
supervision of all superior court misdemeanant probationers a probation
officer employed or contracted for)).
(2) If the county has authorized a superior court misdemeanant
probation program for the supervision of persons with suspended
sentences as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the sentenced
person shall be placed under the charge of a probation officer employed
by the county, upon such terms as the superior court may determine.
(((2))) (3) As a condition to suspension of sentence, the superior
court shall require the payment of the penalty assessment required by
RCW 7.68.035. In addition, the superior court may require the
convicted person to make such monetary payments, on such terms as the
superior court deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are
necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for the payment
of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who
may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the
crime in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser
offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's
recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a
victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to
a plea agreement; (c) to pay any fine imposed and not suspended and the
court or other costs incurred in the prosecution of the case, including
reimbursement of the state for costs of extradition if return to this
state by extradition was required; and (d) to contribute to a county or
interlocal drug fund.
(((3) As a condition of the suspended sentence, the superior court
may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or
such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the
probation to follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county
legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the
supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its
jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report
to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county.))
(4) In cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is
sentenced in one county, but resides within another county, ((there
must be provisions for)) the superior court may require that the
probationer ((to)) report to the ((agency having supervision
responsibility for the)) probationer's county of residence if the
probationer's county of residence has a superior court misdemeanant
program.
(((4))) (5) If restitution to the victim has been ordered under
subsection (((2))) (3)(b) of this section and the superior court has
ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make
a reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made as
ordered. If the superior court has ordered supervision and restitution
has not been made, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that
violation of the terms of the suspended sentence not less than three
months prior to the termination of the suspended sentence.
(((5) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 apply to sentences imposed
under this section.))

Sec. 9 2008 c 231 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
The existing sentencing reform act contains numerous provisions for
supervision of different types of offenders. This duplication has
caused great confusion for judges, lawyers, offenders, and the
department of corrections, and often results in inaccurate sentences.
The clarifications in this act are intended to support continued
discussions by the sentencing guidelines commission with the courts and
the criminal justice community to identify and propose policy changes
that will further simplify and improve the sentencing reform act
relating to the supervision of offenders. The sentencing guidelines
commission shall submit policy change proposals to the legislature on
or before December 1, 2008.
Sections 7 through 58 of this act are intended to simplify the
supervision provisions of the sentencing reform act and increase the
uniformity of its application. These sections are not intended to
either increase or decrease the authority of sentencing courts or the
department relating to supervision, except for those provisions
instructing the court to apply the provisions of the current community
custody law to offenders sentenced after July 1, 2009, but who
committed their crime prior to August 1, 2009, to the extent that such
application is constitutionally permissible.
This will effect a change for offenders who committed their crimes
prior to the offender accountability act, chapter 196, Laws of 1999.
These offenders will be ordered to a term of community custody rather
than community placement or community supervision. To the extent
constitutionally permissible, the terms of the offender's supervision
will be as provided in current law. With the exception of this change,
the legislature does not intend to make, and no provision of sections
7 through 58 of this act may be construed as making, a substantive
change to the supervision provisions of the sentencing reform act.
((It is the intent of the legislature to reaffirm that section 3,
chapter 379, Laws of 2003, expires July 1, 2010.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 9.95.206 (Misdemeanant probation services -- Offender
classification system -- Supervision standards) and 1996 c 298 s 2; and
(2) RCW 9.95.212 (Standards for supervision of misdemeanant
probationers) and 1998 c 245 s 2 & 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 31.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 2008 c 231 s 60 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) Sections 1, 4 through 8, 10, 11, and 14
of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.
(2) Sections 2, 3, and 9 of this act take effect August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 1 of this act expires August 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act applies retroactively and
prospectively regardless of whether the offender is currently on
community custody or probation with the department, currently
incarcerated with a term of community custody or probation with the
department, or sentenced after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---