BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.28.068 and 1999 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon request by an electrical or gas company, or other party to a
general rate case hearing, the commission may approve rates, charges,
services, and/or physical facilities at a discount for low-income
senior customers and low-income customers. Expenses and lost revenues
as a result of these discounts shall be included in the company's cost
of service and recovered in rates to other customers.

--- END ---