BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.250 and 2006 c 209 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant, subject to the following exceptions:
(a) Applications for the highest management position in a public
agency, county, or local government department with confidential
reference information removed or redacted is not exempt from inspection
and copying; and
(b) Application materials not exempt from inspection and copying
must be available to the public after the finalists are selected, but
before the agency, county, or local government makes its decision;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting a current investigation of a possible unfair practice under
chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible violation of other federal, state,
or local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment; and
(6) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and employee
benefit information collected under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in
RCW 47.64.220(2).
For the purposes of this section, "employment" does not include
service on boards or commissions where the individual does not receive
pay or benefits, even if that individual may receive minimal
reimbursement or stipend for expenses.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.330 and 2008 c 200 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3)(a) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service((; however, these records)). Participants' names, general
locations, and email addresses may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(b) Participants concerned about personal safety may request that
their information not be released to individuals they identify;
(c) No civil liability may be imposed by any court on any public
entity or agency or its officers or employees under this subsection for
erroneously releasing a participant's information, except upon proof of
willful or wanton misconduct;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media((, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety));
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Records reflecting communications transmitted in confidence
between a public official, representative, or employee of a public
agency acting in the performance of his or her duties and an attorney
serving in the capacity of legal advisor for the purpose of rendering
or obtaining legal advice, and records prepared by the attorney or a
public official, representative, or employee of a public agency in
furtherance of the request for or rendition of legal advice, are exempt
from inspection and copying under this chapter pursuant to the
attorney-client privilege.
(2) Records are not exempt from inspection and copying under this
section merely because they reflect communications in meetings where
legal counsel was present or because a record or copy of a record was
provided to legal counsel, if the elements of subsection (1) of this
section are not met.
(3) If an agency elects to produce a record that would otherwise be
protected by the attorney-client privilege, any privilege is waived
only as to the record produced. The production shall not waive the
privilege as to the subject matter addressed in the produced record or
as to any other record.
(4) Nothing in this section changes the applicability of the
privilege set forth in RCW 5.60.060(2) to public agencies, nor its
scope when claimed by a public agency.

--- END ---