BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.05.170 and 1993 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislature finds that the mortality rate in Washington
state among infants and children less than eighteen years of age is
unacceptably high, and that such mortality may be preventable. The
legislature further finds that, through the performance of child
mortality reviews, preventable causes of child mortality can be
identified and addressed, thereby reducing the infant and child
mortality in Washington state.
(b) It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the
performance of child death reviews by local health departments by
providing necessary legal protections to the families of children whose
deaths are studied, local health department officials and employees,
and health care professionals participating in child mortality review
committee activities.
(2) As used in this section, "child mortality review" means a
process authorized by a local health department as such department is
defined in RCW 70.05.010 for examining factors that contribute to
deaths of children less than eighteen years of age. The process may
include a systematic review of medical, clinical, and hospital records;
home interviews of parents and caretakers of children who have died;
analysis of individual case information; and review of this information
by a team of professionals in order to identify modifiable medical,
socioeconomic, public health, behavioral, administrative, educational,
and environmental factors associated with each death.
(3) Local health departments are authorized to conduct child
mortality reviews. In conducting such reviews, the following
provisions shall apply:
(a) ((All medical records, reports, and statements procured by,
furnished to, or maintained by a local health department pursuant to
chapter 70.02 RCW for purposes of a child mortality review are
confidential insofar as the identity of an individual child and his or
her adoptive or natural parents is concerned. Such records may be used
solely by local health departments for the purposes of the review.
This section does not prevent a local health department from publishing
statistical compilations and reports related to the child mortality
review, if such compilations and reports do not identify individual
cases and sources of information.
(b) Any records or documents supplied or maintained for the
purposes of a child mortality review are not subject to discovery or
subpoena in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding related
to the death of a child reviewed. This provision shall not restrict or
limit the discovery or subpoena from a health care provider of records
or documents maintained by such health care provider in the ordinary
course of business, whether or not such records or documents may have
been supplied to a local health department pursuant to this section.
(c) Any summaries or analyses of records, documents, or records of
interviews prepared exclusively for purposes of a child mortality
review are not subject to discovery, subpoena, or introduction into
evidence in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding related
to the death of a child reviewed.)) All health care information
collected as part of a child mortality review is confidential, subject
to the restrictions on disclosure provided for in chapter 70.02 RCW.
When documents are collected as part of a child mortality review, the
records may be used solely by local health departments for the purposes
of the review;
(b) No identifying information related to the deceased child, the
child's guardians, or anyone interviewed as part of the child mortality
review may be disclosed. Any such information shall be redacted from
any records produced as part of the review;
(c) Any witness statements or documents collected from witnesses,
or summaries or analyses of those statements or records prepared
exclusively for purposes of a child mortality review, are not subject
to public disclosure, discovery, subpoena, or introduction into
evidence in any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding related
to the death of a child reviewed. This provision does not restrict or
limit the discovery or subpoena from a health care provider of records
or documents maintained by such health care provider in the ordinary
course of business, whether or not such records or documents may have
been supplied to a local health department pursuant to this section.
This provision shall not restrict or limit the discovery or subpoena of
documents from such witnesses simply because a copy of a document was
collected as part of a child mortality review;
(d) No local health department official or employee, and no members
of technical committees established to perform case reviews of selected
child deaths may be examined in any administrative, civil, or criminal
proceeding as to the existence or contents of documents assembled,
prepared, or maintained for purposes of a child mortality review.
(((e))) (4) This section shall not be construed to prohibit or
restrict any person from reporting suspected child abuse or neglect
under chapter 26.44 RCW nor to limit access to or use of any records,
documents, information, or testimony in any civil or criminal action
arising out of any report made pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW.
(5) This section does not prevent a local health department from
publishing statistical compilations and reports related to the child
mortality review. Any portions of such compilations and reports that
identify individual cases and sources of information must be redacted.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.380 and 2007 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to agriculture and livestock is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Business-related information under RCW 15.86.110;
(2) Information provided under RCW 15.54.362;
(3) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.89, and 16.67 RCW or required by the
department of agriculture to administer these chapters or the
department's programs;
(4) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture;
(5) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; or (b) to the department of agriculture or
commodity boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.100, 15.89, or 16.67 RCW with
respect to domestic or export marketing activities or individual
producer's production information;
(6) ((Except under RCW 15.19.080, information obtained regarding
the purchases, sales, or production of an individual American ginseng
grower or dealer;
(7) Information that can be identified to a particular business and
that is collected under RCW 15.17.140(2) and 15.17.143 for certificates
of compliance;
(8) Financial statements provided under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d);))
Information obtained regarding the purchases, sales, or production of
an individual American ginseng grower or dealer, except for providing
reports to the United States fish and wildlife service under RCW
15.19.080;
(7) Information collected regarding packers and shippers of fruits
and vegetables for the issuance of certificates of compliance under RCW
15.17.140(2) and 15.17.143;
(8) Financial statements obtained under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d) for the
purposes of determining whether or not the applicant meets the minimum
net worth requirements to construct or operate a public livestock
market;
(9) Information submitted by an individual or business for the
purpose of participating in a state or national animal identification
system. Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not
public disclosure. This exemption does not affect the disclosure of
information used in reportable animal health investigations under
chapter 16.36 RCW once they are complete; and
(10) Results of testing for animal diseases not required to be
reported under chapter 16.36 RCW that is done at the request of the
animal owner or his or her designee that can be identified to a
particular business or individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
If the textual description of an exemption under this chapter
conflicts with the statute that it references, the statute that it
references controls.

Sec. 4 RCW 42.56.360 and 2009 c 1 s 24 (Initiative Measure No.
1000) and 2008 c 136 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The following health care information is exempt from disclosure
under this chapter:
(a) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in
RCW 69.45.090;
(b) Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department
of health and its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044,
69.41.280, and 18.64.420;
(c) Information and documents created specifically for, and
collected and maintained by a quality improvement committee under RCW
43.70.510, 70.230.080, or 70.41.200, or by a peer review committee
under RCW 4.24.250, or by a quality assurance committee pursuant to RCW
74.42.640 or 18.20.390, or by a hospital, as defined in RCW 43.70.056,
for reporting of health care-associated infections under RCW 43.70.056,
a notification of an incident under RCW 70.56.040(5), and reports
regarding adverse events under RCW 70.56.020(2)(b), regardless of which
agency is in possession of the information and documents;
(d)(i) Proprietary financial and commercial information that the
submitting entity, with review by the department of health,
specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to or obtained by the department of health in connection with
an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust exemption
sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310;
(ii) If a request for such information is received, the submitting
entity must be notified of the request. Within ten business days of
receipt of the notice, the submitting entity shall provide a written
statement of the continuing need for confidentiality, which shall be
provided to the requester. Upon receipt of such notice, the department
of health shall continue to treat information designated under this
subsection (1)(d) as exempt from disclosure;
(iii) If the requester initiates an action to compel disclosure
under this chapter, the submitting entity must be joined as a party to
demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality;
(e) Records of the entity obtained in an action under RCW 18.71.300
through 18.71.340;
(f) ((Except for published statistical compilations and reports
relating to the infant mortality review studies that do not identify
individual cases and sources of information, any records or documents
obtained, prepared, or maintained by the local health department for
the purposes of an infant mortality review conducted by the department
of health under RCW 70.05.170;
(g))) Complaints filed under chapter 18.130 RCW after July 27,
1997, to the extent provided in RCW 18.130.095(1);
(((h))) (g) Information obtained by the department of health under
chapter 70.225 RCW; ((and
(i))) (h) Information collected by the department of health under
chapter 70.245 RCW except as provided in RCW 70.245.150; and
(i) All documents, including completed forms, received pursuant to
a wellness program under RCW 41.04.362, but not statistical reports
that do not identify an individual.
(2) Chapter 70.02 RCW applies to public inspection and copying of
health care information of patients.
(3)(a) Documents related to infant mortality reviews conducted
pursuant to RCW 70.05.170 are exempt from disclosure as provided for in
RCW 70.05.170(3).
(b)(i) If an agency provides copies of public records to another
agency that are exempt from public disclosure under this subsection
(3), those records remain exempt to the same extent the records were
exempt in the possession of the originating entity.
(ii) For notice purposes only, agencies providing exempt records
under this subsection (3) to other agencies may mark any exempt records
as "exempt" so that the receiving agency is aware of the exemption,
however whether or not a record is marked exempt does not affect
whether the record is actually exempt from disclosure.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.04.362 and 1987 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The)) Directors of ((the department of personnel)) state and
local entities, in consultation with applicable state agencies and
employee organizations, may develop and administer a voluntary state
employee wellness program.
(2) ((The)) A director may:
(a) Develop and implement state employee wellness policies,
procedures, and activities;
(b) Disseminate wellness educational materials to ((state))
agencies and employees;
(c) Encourage the establishment of wellness activities in ((state))
agencies;
(d) Provide technical assistance and training to agencies
conducting wellness activities for their employees;
(e) Develop standards by which agencies sponsoring specific
wellness activities may impose a fee to participating employees to help
defray the cost of those activities;
(f) Monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of this program,
including the collection, analysis, and publication of relevant
statistical information; and
(g) Perform other duties and responsibilities as necessary to carry
out the purpose of this section.
(3) No wellness program or activity that involves or requires
organized or systematic physical exercise may be implemented or
conducted during normal working hours.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 41.04.364 (State employee wellness
program -- Confidentiality of individually identifiable information) and
1987 c 248 s 3 are each repealed.

Sec. 7 RCW 28C.18.020 and 1991 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the workforce training and education
coordinating board as a state agency and as the successor agency to the
state board for vocational education. Once the coordinating board has
convened, all references to the state board for vocational education in
the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the workforce
training and education coordinating board, except that reference to the
state board for vocational education in RCW 49.04.030 shall mean the
state board for community and technical colleges.
(2)(a) The board shall consist of nine voting members appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate, as follows: Three
representatives of business, three representatives of labor, and,
serving as ex officio members, the superintendent of public
instruction, the executive director of the state board for community
and technical colleges, and the commissioner of the employment security
department. The chair of the board shall be a nonvoting member
selected by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. In selecting the chair, the
governor shall seek a person who understands the future economic needs
of the state and nation and the role that the state's training system
has in meeting those needs. Each voting member of the board may
appoint a designee to function in his or her place with the right to
vote. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall seek to
ensure geographic, ethnic, and gender diversity and balance. The
governor shall also seek to ensure diversity and balance by the
appointment of persons with disabilities.
(b) The business representatives shall be selected from among
nominations provided by a statewide business organization representing
a cross-section of industries. However, the governor may request, and
the organization shall provide, an additional list or lists from which
the governor shall select the business representatives. The
nominations and selections shall reflect the cultural diversity of the
state, including women, people with disabilities, and racial and ethnic
minorities, and diversity in sizes of businesses.
(c) The labor representatives shall be selected from among
nominations provided by statewide labor organizations. However, the
governor may request, and the organizations shall provide, an
additional list or lists from which the governor shall select the labor
representatives. The nominations and selections shall reflect the
cultural diversity of the state, including women, people with
disabilities, and racial and ethnic minorities.
(d) Each business member may cast a proxy vote or votes for any
business member who is not present and who authorizes in writing the
present member to cast such vote.
(e) Each labor member may cast a proxy vote for any labor member
who is not present and who authorizes in writing the present member to
cast such vote.
(f) The chair shall appoint to the board one nonvoting member to
represent racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities. The nonvoting member appointed by the chair shall serve
for a term of four years with the term expiring on June 30th of the
fourth year of the term.
(g) The business members of the board shall serve for terms of four
years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term
except that in the case of initial members, one shall be appointed to
a two-year term and one appointed to a three-year term.
(h) The labor members of the board shall serve for terms of four
years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term
except that in the case of initial members, one shall be appointed to
a two-year term and one appointed to a three-year term.
(i) Any vacancies among board members representing business or
labor shall be filled by the governor with nominations provided by
statewide organizations representing business or labor, respectively.
(j) The board shall adopt bylaws and shall meet at least bimonthly
and at such other times as determined by the chair who shall give
reasonable prior notice to the members or at the request of a majority
of the voting members.
(k) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.040 and shall receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(l) The board shall be formed and ready to assume its
responsibilities under this chapter by October 1, 1991.
(m) The director of the board shall be appointed by the governor
from a list of three names submitted by a committee made up of the
business and labor members of the board. However, the governor may
request, and the committee shall provide, an additional list or lists
from which the governor shall select the director. ((The lists
compiled by the committee shall not be subject to public disclosure.))
The governor may dismiss the director only with the approval of a
majority vote of the board. The board, by a majority vote, may dismiss
the director with the approval of the governor.
(3) The state board for vocational education is hereby abolished
and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the
workforce training and education coordinating board. All references to
the director or the state board for vocational education in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the
workforce training and education coordinating board.

Sec. 8 RCW 79A.25.150 and 2007 c 241 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
When requested by the board, members employed by the state shall
furnish assistance to the board from their departments for the analysis
and review of proposed plans and projects, and such assistance shall be
a proper charge against the appropriations to the several agencies
represented on the board. Assistance may be in the form of money,
personnel, or equipment and supplies, whichever is most suitable to the
needs of the board.
The director of the recreation and conservation office shall be
appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor. The governor
shall select the director from a list of three candidates submitted by
the board. However, the governor may request and the board shall
provide an additional list or lists from which the governor may select
the director. ((The lists compiled by the board shall not be subject
to public disclosure.)) The director shall have background and
experience in the areas of recreation and conservation management and
policy. The director shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the
governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. The
director shall appoint such personnel as may be necessary to carry out
the duties of the office. Not more than three employees appointed by
the director shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.

Sec. 9 RCW 42.56.330 and 2008 c 200 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to public utilities and
transportation is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission
or attorney general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are
confidential under RCW 80.04.095;
(2) The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of
the customers of a public utility contained in the records or lists
held by the public utility of which they are customers, except that
this information may be released to the division of child support or
the agency or firm providing child support enforcement for another
state under Title IV-D of the federal social security act, for the
establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order;
(3) The names, residential addresses, residential telephone
numbers, and other individually identifiable records held by an agency
in relation to a vanpool, carpool, or other ride-sharing program or
service; however, these records may be disclosed to other persons who
apply for ride-matching services and who need that information in order
to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to share rides;
(4) The personally identifying information of current or former
participants or applicants in a paratransit or other transit service
operated for the benefit of persons with disabilities or elderly
persons;
(5) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transit passes and other fare payment media including, but not
limited to, stored value smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except
that an agency may disclose this information to a person, employer,
educational institution, or other entity that is responsible, in whole
or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring or using a transit
pass or other fare payment media((, or to the news media when reporting
on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or
groups concerned with public transportation or public safety)) for the
purpose of preventing fraud.
(a) This information may be disclosed in aggregate form if the data
does not contain any personally identifying information.
(b) Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies if the request is accompanied by a court order;
(6) Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is
collected by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation
system or any comparable information equipment attached to a truck,
tractor, or trailer; however, the information may be given to other
governmental agencies or the owners of the truck, tractor, or trailer
from which the information is obtained. As used in this subsection,
"motor carrier" has the same definition as provided in RCW 81.80.010;
(7) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use transponders or other technology to facilitate payment of
tolls. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form as long as
the data does not contain any personally identifying information. For
these purposes aggregate data may include the census tract of the
account holder as long as any individual personally identifying
information is not released. Personally identifying information may be
released to law enforcement agencies only for toll enforcement
purposes. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies for other purposes only if the request is
accompanied by a court order; and
(8) The personally identifying information of persons who acquire
and use a driver's license or identicard that includes a radio
frequency identification chip or similar technology to facilitate
border crossing. This information may be disclosed in aggregate form
as long as the data does not contain any personally identifying
information. Personally identifying information may be released to law
enforcement agencies only for United States customs and border
protection enforcement purposes. Personally identifying information
may be released to law enforcement agencies for other purposes only if
the request is accompanied by a court order.

Sec. 10 RCW 42.56.250 and 2006 c 209 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following employment and licensing information is exempt from
public inspection and copying under this chapter:
(1) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used
to administer a license, employment, or academic examination;
(2) All applications for public employment, including the names of
applicants, resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect
to an applicant;
(3) The residential addresses, residential telephone numbers,
personal wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail
addresses, social security numbers, and emergency contact information
of employees or volunteers of a public agency, and the names, dates of
birth, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, personal
wireless telephone numbers, personal electronic mail addresses, social
security numbers, and emergency contact information of dependents of
employees or volunteers of a public agency that are held by any public
agency in personnel records, public employment related records, or
volunteer rosters, or are included in any mailing list of employees or
volunteers of any public agency. For purposes of this subsection,
"employees" includes independent provider home care workers as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240;
(4) Information that identifies a person who, while an agency
employee: (a) Seeks advice, under an informal process established by
the employing agency, in order to ascertain his or her rights in
connection with a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW
against the person; and (b) requests his or her identity or any
identifying information not be disclosed;
(5) Investigative records compiled by an employing agency
conducting ((a current)) an active and ongoing investigation of a
possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a possible
violation of other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting
discrimination in employment; ((and))
(6) ((Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and employee
benefit information collected under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in
RCW 47.64.220(2).)) Criminal history records checks for board staff
finalist candidates conducted pursuant to RCW 43.33A.025; and
(7) Except as provided in RCW 47.64.220, salary and benefit
information for maritime employees collected from private employers
under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described in RCW 47.64.220(2).

--- END ---