BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.68.110 and 1998 c 292 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a personal representative who has acquired nonintervention
powers does not apply to the court for either of the final decrees
provided for in RCW 11.68.100 as now or hereafter amended, the personal
representative shall, when the administration of the estate has been
completed, file a declaration of completion of probate that must state
as follows:
(a) The date of the decedent's death and the decedent's residence
at the time of death;
(b) Whether or not the decedent died testate or intestate;
(c) If the decedent died testate, the date of the decedent's last
will and testament and the date of the order probating the will;
(d) That each creditor's claim which was justly due and properly
presented as required by law has been paid or otherwise disposed of by
agreement with the creditor, and that the amount of estate taxes due as
the result of the decedent's death has been determined, settled, and
paid;
(e) That the personal representative has completed the
administration of the decedent's estate without court intervention, and
the estate is ready to be closed;
(f) ((If the decedent died intestate,)) The names((,)) and
addresses (if known)((, and relationship)) of each heir, legatee, and
devisee of the decedent to whom the personal representative is required
to give notice as provided in this section and, if the decedent died
intestate, the relationship of each heir to the decedent, together with
the distributive share of each heir; and
(g) The amount of fees paid or to be paid to each of the following:
(i) Personal representative or representatives; (ii) lawyer or lawyers;
(iii) appraiser or appraisers; and (iv) accountant or accountants; and
that the personal representative believes the fees to be reasonable and
does not intend to obtain court approval of the amount of the fees or
to submit an estate accounting to the court for approval.
(2) ((Subject to the requirement of notice as provided in this
section, unless an heir, devisee, or legatee of a decedent petitions
the court either for an order requiring the personal representative to
obtain court approval of the amount of fees paid or to be paid to the
personal representative, lawyers, appraisers, or accountants, or for an
order requiring an accounting, or both, within thirty days from the
date of filing a declaration of completion of probate, the personal
representative will be automatically discharged without further order
of the court and the representative's powers will cease thirty days
after the filing of the declaration of completion of probate, and the
declaration of completion of probate shall, at that time, be the
equivalent of the entry of a decree of distribution in accordance with
chapter 11.76 RCW for all legal intents and purposes.
(3))) Within five days of the date of the filing of the declaration
of completion, the personal representative or the personal
representative's lawyer shall mail a copy of the declaration of
completion to each heir, legatee, or devisee of the decedent, who: (a)
Has not waived notice of the filing, in writing, filed in the cause;
and (b) either has not received the full amount of the distribution to
which the heir, legatee, or devisee is entitled or has a property right
that might be affected adversely by the discharge of the personal
representative under this section, together with a notice which shall
be substantially as follows:

(((4))) (3) If all heirs, devisees, and legatees of the decedent
entitled to notice under this section waive, in writing, the notice
required by this section and such waivers are filed with the court,
whether before or after the filing of the declaration of completion of
probate, then upon the date of the filing of the declaration of
completion of probate, the amount of fees paid or to be paid will be
deemed reasonable, the acts of the personal representative will be
deemed approved, the personal representative's powers will cease, the
personal representative will be automatically discharged without
further order of the court, and the declaration of completion of
probate will become effective as a decree of distribution ((upon the
date of filing thereof)) in accordance with chapter 11.76 RCW for all
legal intents and purposes.
(4) Provided that the personal representative has complied with the
requirements of this section, then unless a petition is filed as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, thirty days after the
filing of the declaration of completion of probate the amount of fees
paid or to be paid will be deemed reasonable, the acts of the personal
representative will be deemed approved, the personal representative's
powers will cease, the personal representative will be automatically
discharged without further order of the court, and the declaration of
completion of probate will be, at that time, the equivalent of the
entry of a decree of distribution in accordance with chapter 11.76 RCW
for all legal intents and purposes.
(5) A declaration of completion of probate will not have the effect
provided in subsection (4) of this section if within thirty days from
the date of its filing an heir, devisee, or legatee of a decedent:
(a) Petitions the court either for an order requiring the personal
representative to obtain court approval of the amount of fees paid or
to be paid to the personal representative, lawyers, appraisers, or
accountants, or for an order requiring an accounting, or both;
(b) Petitions the court to fix a time and place for the hearing of
the petition. Such request may be included in the petition referenced
in (a) of this subsection;
(c) Serves a copy of the petition(s) on the personal representative
or the personal representative's lawyer and on each heir, legatee, and
devisee to whom the personal representative sent a copy of the
declaration of completion of probate at least ten days before the
hearing on the petition; and
(d) Files proof of service of the petition(s) with the court within
thirty-five days after the filing of the declaration of completion of
probate.
(6) In those instances where the personal representative has been
required to furnish bond, and a declaration of completion is filed
pursuant to this section, any bond furnished by the personal
representative ((shall be)) is automatically discharged upon the
discharge of the personal representative.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.68.114 and 1998 c 292 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The personal representative retains the powers to: Deal with
the taxing authority of any federal, state, or local government; hold
a reserve in an amount not to exceed three thousand dollars, for the
determination and payment of any additional taxes, interest, and
penalties, and of all reasonable expenses related directly or
indirectly to such determination or payment; pay from the reserve the
reasonable expenses, including compensation for services rendered or
goods provided by the personal representative or by the personal
representative's employees, independent contractors, and other agents,
in addition to any taxes, interest, or penalties assessed by a taxing
authority; receive and hold any credit, including interest, from any
taxing authority; and distribute the residue of the reserve to the
intended beneficiaries of the reserve; if:
(a) In lieu of the statement set forth in RCW 11.68.110(1)(e), the
declaration of completion of probate states that:

The personal representative has completed the
administration of the decedent's estate without court
intervention, and the estate is ready to be closed, except for
the determination of taxes and of interest and penalties
thereon as permitted under this section;

and
(b) The notice of the filing of declaration of completion of
probate must be in substantially the following form:

CAPTION NOTICE OF FILING OF
OF DECLARATION OF COMPLETION
CASE OF PROBATE

NOTICE IS GIVEN that the attached Declaration of
Completion of Probate was filed by the undersigned in the
above-entitled court on the . . . day of . . . . , . . . .;
unless you file a petition in the above-entitled court
requesting the court to approve the reasonableness of the fees,
or for an accounting, or both, and to set a time and date for
a hearing on the petition, and serve a copy thereof upon the
personal representative or the personal representative's
lawyer, and on each heir, legatee, and devisee to whom the
personal representative sent a copy of this Declaration of
Completion of Probate, within thirty days after the date of the
filing:

(i) The ((schedule)) amount of fees paid or to be paid
set forth in the Declaration of Completion of Probate will be
deemed reasonable;

(ii) The Declaration of Completion of Probate will be
final and deemed the equivalent of a Decree of Distribution
entered under chapter 11.76 RCW;

(iii) The acts that the personal representative
performed before the Declaration of Completion of Probate was
filed will be deemed approved, and the personal representative
will be automatically discharged without further order of the
court with respect to all such acts; and

(iv) The personal representative will retain the power
to deal with the taxing authorities, together with $. . . . for
the determination and payment of all remaining tax obligations.
Only that portion of the reserve that remains after the
settlement of any tax liability, and the payment of any
expenses associated with such settlement, will be distributed
to the persons legally entitled to the reserve.

(2) If the requirements in subsection (1) of this section are met,
the personal representative is discharged from all claims other than
those relating to the settlement of any tax obligations and the actual
distribution of the reserve, at the effective date of the declaration
of completion. The personal representative is discharged from
liability from the settlement of any tax obligations and the
distribution of the reserve, and the personal representative's powers
cease, thirty days after the personal representative has mailed to
those persons who would have shared in the distribution of the reserve
had the reserve remained intact and has filed with the court copies of
checks or receipts showing how the reserve was in fact distributed,
unless a person with an interest in the reserve petitions the court
earlier within the thirty-day period for an order requiring an
accounting of the reserve or an order determining the reasonableness,
or lack of reasonableness, of distributions made from the reserve. If
the personal representative has been required to furnish a bond, any
bond furnished by the personal representative is automatically
discharged upon the final discharge of the personal representative.

--- END ---