BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.84.030 and 2004 c 43 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) An infraction proceeding is initiated by the issuance and
service of a printed notice of infraction and filing of a printed or
electronic copy of the notice of infraction.
(2) A notice of infraction may be issued by a person authorized to
enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the infraction
is established when the infraction occurs in that person's presence.
(3) A court may issue a notice of infraction if a person authorized
to enforce the provisions of the title or chapter in which the
infraction is established files with the court a written statement that
the infraction was committed in that person's presence or that the
officer has reason to believe an infraction was committed.
(4) Service of a notice of infraction issued under subsection (2)
or (3) of this section shall be as provided by court rule.
(5) A notice of infraction shall be filed with a court having
jurisdiction within five days of issuance, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays.
(((6) Failure to sign an infraction notice shall constitute a
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.))

--- END ---