BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.460 and 2008 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
(2) The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section shall be used solely for
the purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of ((new or
expanded)) chemical dependency or mental health treatment programs and
services and for the operation or delivery of ((new or expanded))
therapeutic court programs and services. For the purposes of this
section, "programs and services" includes, but is not limited to,
treatment services, case management, and housing that are a component
of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health treatment program
or service.
(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for
the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as
provided in this section, except that a portion of moneys collected
under this section ((shall not)) may be used to supplant existing
funding for these purposes((, provided that)), as follows:
(a) In a county with a population greater than one million five
hundred thousand persons up to twenty-five percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in the fiscal year ending in 2010; up to
twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in the fiscal
year ending in 2011; up to fifteen percent may be used to supplant
existing funding in the fiscal year ending in 2012; up to ten percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in the fiscal year ending in
2013; and up to five percent may be used to supplant existing funding
in the fiscal year ending in 2014; and
(b) In a county with a population less than one million five
hundred thousand persons up to fifty percent may be used to supplant
existing funding in the fiscal year ending in 2010; up to forty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in the fiscal year ending in
2011; up to thirty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in
the fiscal year ending in 2012; up to twenty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in the fiscal year ending in 2013; and up to
ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in the fiscal year
ending in 2014.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit the
use of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of
lapsed federal funding previously provided for the operation or
delivery of services and programs as provided in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---