BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 41.32.360 (Basis of contributions to disability reserve
fund) and 1991 c 35 s 47, 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 8, 1955 c 274 s 17, & 1947
c 80 s 36; and
(2) RCW 41.32.366 (Basis of contributions to death benefit fund)
and 1991 c 35 s 48 & 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 10.

--- END ---