BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.40.785 and 2000 c 247 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All employees who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after March 1, 2002, for state agencies or
institutes of higher education, or September 1, 2002, for other
employers, shall have a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable
choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of ninety
days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2,
he or she becomes a member of plan 2 or plan 3 as follows:
(a) He or she becomes a member of plan 3 if first employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after March 1, 2002, but prior
to July 1, 2009, for state agencies or institutes of higher education,
or on or after September 1, 2002, but prior to July 1, 2009, for other
employers; or
(b) He or she becomes a member of plan 2 if first employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2009.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

--- END ---