BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.030 and 2007 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2007, and every two years thereafter,
the state actuary shall submit to the council information regarding the
experience and financial condition of each state retirement system, and
make recommendations regarding the long-term economic assumptions set
forth in RCW 41.45.035. When making recommendations regarding the
general salary increase assumption, the state actuary may also consider
the demographic components of total salary growth and make
recommendations to the council concerning any changes to the
demographic assumptions within total salary growth. The council shall
review this and such other information as it may require.
(2) By October 31, 2007, and every two years thereafter, the
council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes
to the long-term economic assumptions established in RCW 41.45.035.
Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the
legislature.
The council shall consult with the economic and revenue forecast
supervisor and the executive director of the state investment board,
and shall consider long-term historical averages, in reviewing possible
changes to the economic assumptions.
(3) The assumptions and the asset value smoothing technique
established in RCW 41.45.035, as modified in the future by the council
or legislature, shall be used by the state actuary in conducting all
actuarial studies of the state retirement systems, including actuarial
fiscal notes under RCW 44.44.040. The assumptions shall also be used
for the administration of benefits under the retirement plans listed in
RCW 41.45.020, pursuant to timelines and conditions established by
department rules.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.090 and 2003 c 295 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall collect and keep in convenient form such
data as shall be necessary for an actuarial valuation of the assets and
liabilities of the state retirement systems, and for making an
actuarial investigation into the mortality, service, compensation, and
other experience of the members and beneficiaries of those systems.
The department and state actuary shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding regarding the specific data the department will collect,
when it will be collected, and how it will be maintained. The
department shall notify the state actuary of any changes it makes, or
intends to make, in the collection and maintenance of such data.
(2) At least once in each six-year period, the state actuary shall
conduct an actuarial experience study of the mortality, service,
compensation, and other experience of the members and beneficiaries of
each state retirement system((, and into the financial condition of
each system)). The state actuary shall make recommendations to the
council regarding the long-term demographic assumptions for the state
retirement systems. Concurrently, when considering the demographic
components of total salary growth, the state actuary may also study the
general salary increase assumption and make recommendations to the
council regarding any change to the noninflationary component of that
economic assumption. The council shall review the experience study
results, the recommendations of the state actuary, and other
information as it may require.
The results of each investigation shall be filed with the
department, the office of financial management, the budget writing
committees of the Washington house of representatives and senate, the
select committee on pension policy, and the pension funding council.
Upon the basis of such actuarial investigation the department shall
adopt such tables, schedules, factors, and regulations as are deemed
necessary in the light of the findings of the actuary for the proper
operation of the state retirement systems.

--- END ---