BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature intends this act to
recognize that acupuncturists licensed by the state of Washington are
practicing a system of medicine, and that changing the name of their
title to "Oriental medicine practitioners" more appropriately captures
the nature and scope of their work. It is further the intent that
references in federal law to "acupuncturists" apply to persons licensed
under this act as "Oriental medicine practitioners."

Sec. 2 RCW 18.06.010 and 1995 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following terms in this chapter shall have the meanings set
forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) (("Acupuncture")) "Oriental medicine" means a health care
service based on an Oriental system of medical theory utilizing
Oriental diagnosis and treatment to promote health and treat organic or
functional disorders ((by treating specific acupuncture points or
meridians. Acupuncture)). Oriental medicine is also commonly known as
acupuncture, traditional Chinese medicine, traditional Oriental
medicine, or east Asian medicine. Oriental medicine includes the
following ((techniques)) modalities:
(a) Use of acupuncture needles to stimulate acupuncture points and
meridians;
(b) Use of electrical, mechanical, or magnetic devices to stimulate
acupuncture points and meridians;
(c) Moxibustion;
(d) Acupressure;
(e) Cupping;
(f) Dermal friction technique;
(g) Infra-red;
(h) Sonopuncture;
(i) Laserpuncture;
(j) Point injection therapy (aquapuncture); and
(k) Dietary advice based on Oriental medical theory provided in
conjunction with ((techniques)) modalities under (((a) through (j) of))
this ((subsection)) section.
(2) (("Acupuncturist")) "Oriental medicine practitioner" means a
person licensed under this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of health.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.06.020 and 1995 c 323 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No one may hold themselves out to the public as an
acupuncturist or ((licensed acupuncturist)) Oriental medicine
practitioner or any derivative thereof which is intended to or is
likely to lead the public to believe such a person is an acupuncturist
or ((licensed acupuncturist)) Oriental medicine practitioner unless
licensed as provided for in this chapter.
(2) A person may not practice Oriental medicine, including
acupuncture, if the person is not licensed under this chapter.
(3) No one may use any configuration of letters after their name
(including Ac. or OMP) which indicates a degree or formal training in
Oriental medicine, including acupuncture, unless licensed as provided
for in this chapter.
(4) The secretary may by rule proscribe or regulate advertising and
other forms of patient solicitation which are likely to mislead or
deceive the public as to whether someone is licensed under this
chapter. Only a person licensed as an Oriental medicine practitioner
under this chapter may also refer to himself or herself as an
acupuncturist.
(5) Any person licensed as an acupuncturist under this chapter
prior to the effective date of this act must, at the date of their next
license renewal date, be given the title Oriental medicine
practitioner.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.06.045 and 1995 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice by an individual credentialed under the laws of
this state and performing services within such individual's authorized
scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an
educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of
services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments
from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor;
(4) The practice of ((acupuncture)) Oriental medicine by any person
credentialed to perform ((acupuncture)) Oriental medicine services in
any other jurisdiction where such person is doing so in the course of
regular instruction of a school of Oriental medicine, including
acupuncture, approved by the secretary or in an educational seminar by
a professional organization of acupuncture, provided that in the latter
case, the practice is supervised directly by a person licensed under
this chapter or licensed under any other healing art whose scope of
practice includes ((acupuncture)) Oriental medicine;
(5) The practice of Oriental medicine by any person credentialed to
perform Oriental medicine, including acupuncture, in good standing in
any other jurisdiction with standards equivalent with Washington state,
where that person is doing so under a declared state of emergency in
the course of administering emergency relief during a declared
disaster, if the practice is supervised directly by a person licensed
under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.06.050 and 2004 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person seeking to be examined shall present to the secretary at
least forty-five days before the commencement of the examination:
(1) A written application on a form or forms provided by the
secretary setting forth under affidavit such information as the
secretary may require; and
(2) Proof that the candidate has:
(a) Successfully completed a course, approved by the secretary, of
didactic training in basic sciences and Oriental medicine, including
acupuncture, over a minimum period of two academic years. The training
shall include such subjects as anatomy, physiology, microbiology,
biochemistry, pathology, hygiene, and a survey of western clinical
sciences. The basic science classes must be equivalent to those
offered at the collegiate level. However, if the applicant is a
licensed chiropractor under chapter 18.25 RCW or a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, the requirements of this subsection relating
to basic sciences may be reduced by up to one year depending upon the
extent of the candidate's qualifications as determined under rules
adopted by the secretary;
(b) Successfully completed five hundred hours of clinical training
in acupuncture that is approved by the secretary.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.06.080 and 1995 c 323 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary is hereby authorized and empowered to execute the
provisions of this chapter and shall offer examinations in
((acupuncture)) Oriental medicine at least twice a year at such times
and places as the secretary may select. The examination shall be a
written examination and may include a practical examination.
(2) The secretary shall develop or approve a licensure examination
in the subjects that the secretary determines are within the scope of
and commensurate with the work performed by ((licensed acupuncturists))
Oriental medicine practitioners and shall include but not necessarily
be limited to anatomy, physiology, microbiology, biochemistry,
pathology, hygiene, and acupuncture. All application papers shall be
deposited with the secretary and there retained for at least one year,
when they may be destroyed.
(3) If the examination is successfully passed, the secretary shall
confer on such candidate the title of ((Licensed Acupuncturist))
Oriental Medicine Practitioner.
(((4) The secretary may appoint members of the profession to serve
in an ad hoc advisory capacity to the secretary in carrying out this
chapter. The members will serve for designated times and provide
advice on matters specifically identified and requested by the
secretary. The members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.040 and
43.03.060.
(5) The secretary, ad hoc committee members, or individuals acting
in their behalf are immune from suit in a civil action based on any
certification or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts
performed in the course of their duties.))

Sec. 7 RCW 18.06.120 and 1996 c 191 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person licensed ((in acupuncture)) under this chapter
shall comply with the administrative procedures and administrative
requirements for registration and renewal set by the secretary under
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
(2) All fees collected under this section and RCW 18.06.070 shall
be credited to the health professions account as required under RCW
43.70.320.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.06.130 and 2003 c 53 s 121 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall develop a form to be used by ((an
acupuncturist)) a person licensed under this chapter to inform the
patient of the ((acupuncturist's)) scope of practice and qualifications
of an Oriental medicine practitioner. All license holders shall bring
the form to the attention of the patients in whatever manner the
secretary, by rule, provides.
(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.06.140 and 2003 c 53 s 122 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Every licensed acupuncturist shall develop a written plan for
consultation, emergency transfer, and referral to other health care
practitioners operating within the scope of their authorized practices.
The written plan shall be submitted with the initial application for
licensure as well as annually thereafter with the license renewal fee
to the department. The department may withhold licensure or renewal of
licensure if the plan fails to meet the standards contained in rules
adopted by the secretary.
(2))) When ((the acupuncturist)) a person licensed under this
chapter sees patients with potentially serious disorders such as
cardiac conditions, acute abdominal symptoms, and such other
conditions, the ((acupuncturist)) person shall immediately request a
consultation or recent written diagnosis from a physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW. ((In the event that the patient with
the disorder refuses to authorize such consultation or provide a recent
diagnosis from such physician, acupuncture treatment shall not be
continued.
(3))) (2) A person violating this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.06.190 and 1995 c 323 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary may license a person without examination if such
person is credentialed as an ((acupuncturist)) Oriental medicine
practitioner in another jurisdiction if, in the secretary's judgment,
the requirements of that jurisdiction are equivalent to or greater than
those of Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.06 RCW
to read as follows:
ORIENTAL MEDICINE ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (1) The secretary shall
appoint an Oriental medicine advisory committee of five members to
further the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Four members of the committee must be licensed under this
chapter and reside in this state, must have not less than five years'
experience in Oriental medicine practice, must be actively engaged in
practice within two years of appointment, and must not be licensed
under chapter 18.71, 18.57, 18.36A, or 18.59 RCW. The fifth member
must be appointed from the public at large and must be a consumer whose
occupation does not include the administration of health activities or
the providing of health services and who has no material financial
interest in providing health care services.
(3) The committee may provide advice on matters specifically
identified and requested by the secretary, such as applications for
licenses.
(4) The committee may be requested by the secretary to recommend an
examination required for licensure under this chapter.
(5) The committee, at the request of the secretary, may recommend
rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, relating to standards for appropriateness of Oriental
medicine care.
(6) The committee must meet at least once each year to provide
advice to the secretary. The committee may elect a chair and a vice-chair. A majority of the members currently serving constitute a
quorum.
(7) Each member of the committee must be reimbursed for travel
expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition,
members of the committee must be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220 when engaged in the authorized business of the committee.
(8) The secretary, members of the committee, or individuals acting
on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal,
based on any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 12 RCW 4.24.240 and 1995 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services((,)) including, but not limited to, ((a licensed
acupuncturist)) an Oriental medicine practitioner, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, ((physician's)) physician assistant, osteopathic
physician's assistant, nurse practitioner, including, in the event such
person is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in subparagraph (a)
of this subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her
employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased,
his or her estate or personal representative; or
(c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in subparagraph (a)
of this subsection, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer,
director, trustee, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and
scope of his or her employment, including in the event such officer,
director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal
representative;
shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of the good
faith performance of their duties on such committees, where such
actions are being brought by or on behalf of the person who is being
evaluated.
(2) No member, employee, staff person, or investigator of a
professional review committee shall be liable in a civil action as a
result of acts or omissions made in good faith on behalf of the
committee; nor shall any person be so liable for filing charges with or
supplying information or testimony in good faith to any professional
review committee; nor shall a member, employee, staff person, or
investigator of a professional society, of a professional examining or
licensing board, of a professional disciplinary board, of a governing
board of any institution, or of any employer of professionals be so
liable for good faith acts or omissions made in full or partial
reliance on recommendations or decisions of a professional review
committee or examining board.

Sec. 13 RCW 4.24.290 and 1995 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In any civil action for damages based on professional negligence
against a hospital which is licensed by the state of Washington or
against the personnel of any such hospital, or against a member of the
healing arts including, but not limited to, an ((acupuncturist))
Oriental medicine practitioner licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, a
physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a chiropractor licensed under chapter
18.25 RCW, a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric
physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, or a nurse
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, the plaintiff in order to prevail
shall be required to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the
defendant or defendants failed to exercise that degree of skill, care,
and learning possessed at that time by other persons in the same
profession, and that as a proximate result of such failure the
plaintiff suffered damages, but in no event shall the provisions of
this section apply to an action based on the failure to obtain the
informed consent of a patient.

Sec. 14 RCW 7.70.020 and 1995 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter "health care provider" means either:
(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or
related services((,)) including, but not limited to, ((a licensed
acupuncturist)) an Oriental medicine practitioner, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist,
pharmacist, optician, ((physician's)) physician assistant, midwife,
osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's
trained mobile intensive care paramedic, including, in the event such
person is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;
(2) An employee or agent of a person described in part (1) above,
acting in the course and scope of his employment, including, in the
event such employee or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal
representative; or
(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or
institution employing one or more persons described in part (1) above,
including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance
organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director, employee, or
agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment,
including in the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is
deceased, his or her estate or personal representative.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.120.020 and 2001 c 251 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants under
chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
((acupuncturists)) Oriental medicine practitioners licensed under
chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons
licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists,
and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and
nutritionists certified by chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians
under chapter 18.84 RCW; and nursing assistants registered or certified
under chapter 18.88A RCW.
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.130.040 and 2009 c 2 s 16 (Initiative Measure No.
1029) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) ((Acupuncturists)) Oriental medicine practitioners licensed
under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(ix) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(x) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(xi) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage and
family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xii) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xiii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiv) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xvi) Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter
18.205 RCW;
(xvii) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xviii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xix) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xx) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW;
(xxi) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxii) Recreational therapists;
(xxiii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiv) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW; and
(xxv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; and
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.70.110 and 2007 c 259 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining
a license. After June 30, 1995, municipal corporations providing
emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter
18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other
emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of
the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary
may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees
would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when
the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees
charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the
department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and
may include costs of necessary inspection.
(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of
licensure activities in the following circumstances:
(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center
as provided in RCW 18.79.202, until June 30, 2013;
(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040,
the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker
licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and
(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians
licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, osteopathic physicians' assistants
licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors
licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW, registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW,
optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors
licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under
chapter 18.108 RCW, clinical social workers licensed under chapter
18.225 RCW, and ((acupuncturists)) Oriental medicine practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, the license fees shall include up to
an additional twenty-five dollars to be transferred by the department
to the University of Washington for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.
(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees
established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the
appropriateness of the level of such fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---