BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.44.145 and 1998 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state patrol shall notify:
(a) Registered sex and kidnapping offenders of any change to the
registration requirements; and
(b) No less than annually, an offender having a duty to register
under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or kidnapping offense committed
when the offender was a juvenile of their ability to petition for
relief from registration as provided in RCW 9A.44.140.
(2) For economic efficiency, the state patrol may combine the
notices in this section into one notice.

--- END ---