BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Tribal authorities, within their reservation boundaries, may
determine based on an engineering and traffic investigation that the
maximum speed permitted under RCW 46.61.400 or 46.61.405 is greater or
less than is reasonable or safe under the conditions found to exist
upon a nonlimited access state highway or part of a nonlimited access
state highway. Then, the tribal authority may determine and declare
a reasonable and safe maximum limit thereon which:
(a) Decreases the limit at intersections;
(b) Increases the limit, not exceeding sixty miles per hour; or
(c) Decreases the limit, not lower than twenty miles per hour.
(2) Any alteration by tribal authorities of maximum limits on a
nonlimited access state highway is not effective until the alteration
has been approved by the secretary of transportation and appropriate
signs giving notice of the alteration have been posted. In the case of
an alteration by tribal authorities of maximum limits on a nonlimited
access state highway that is also part of a city or town street or
county road within tribal reservation boundaries, the alteration is not
effective until that alteration has also been approved by the
applicable local authority.

--- END ---