BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.278 and 2006 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy may form three function-specific subcommittees, as set forth under subsection (2) of this
section, from the members under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e), as
follows:
(a) A public safety subcommittee with one member from each group
under RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e);
(b) An education subcommittee with one member from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (e); and
(c) A state and local government subcommittee, with one retiree
member under RCW 41.04.276(1)(d) and two members from each group under
RCW 41.04.276(1) (a) through (c) and (e).
The retiree members may serve on more than one subcommittee to
ensure representation on each subcommittee.
(2)(a) The public safety subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting public safety employees who are members of the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters', public safety employees', and
Washington state patrol retirement systems.
(b) The education subcommittee shall focus on pension issues
affecting educational employees who are members of the public
employees', teachers', and school employees' retirement systems.
(c) The state and local government subcommittee shall focus on
pension issues affecting state and local government employees who are
members of the public employees' retirement system.
(3) The select committee on pension policy shall form a function-specific subcommittee with one member from each group under RCW
41.04.276(1) (a) through (e) that shall focus, within the amounts
specifically appropriated by the legislature to support its activities,
on pension issues affecting Washington state patrol retirement system
members.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.50.110 and 2008 c 329 s 911 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43,
and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its
proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the
retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing
biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be
computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire
expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the
employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the
entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to
include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the
end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department
of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are
its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be
made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department.
However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of
billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said
billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the department of retirement systems' expense fund to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the fund.
(8) The department shall compute a monthly proportion of any amount
specifically appropriated by the legislature to support the activities
of the subcommittee created under RCW 41.04.278(3), and shall include
the monthly proportion, plus the costs of the department to administer
this subsection, on the bill submitted from the department to the
Washington state patrol under subsection (3) of this section. By means
of proportionate payroll deductions, the Washington state patrol shall
recoup from members of the Washington state patrol retirement system an
amount that is sufficient to fully cover the amounts identified by the
department pursuant to this subsection and the costs of the Washington
state patrol to administer this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---