BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW,
to be codified between RCW 43.43.120 and 43.43.320, to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol retirement system deferred
retirement option plan is created, as an alternative form of accrual
under the retirement system. Effective January 1, 2010, in lieu of
retiring under RCW 43.43.250 and accepting a retirement allowance under
RCW 43.43.260, and either RCW 43.43.270 or 43.43.271, as applicable, an
active member of the Washington state patrol retirement system is
eligible to participate in the Washington state patrol retirement
system deferred retirement option plan if the member: (a) Is not on
disability status; (b) has at least twenty-seven years of service
credit, calculated as the sum of service credit recognized under RCW
43.43.230, 43.43.233, 43.43.235, and 43.43.260; and (c) is eligible to
receive a retirement allowance.
(2) A member of the Washington state patrol retirement system who
is eligible to do so may begin participation in the deferred retirement
option plan on the first day of a month. A member who elects to
participate in the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred
retirement option plan shall: (a) Irrevocably elect a form of monthly
retirement allowance from the Washington state patrol retirement
system; (b) continue employment with the Washington state patrol; (c)
agree to the calculation of a deferred retirement option plan benefit
under this section in lieu of service credit or salary increase
adjustments that would increase the member's average final compensation
during the member's remaining period of service; and (d) identify a
date certain that is (i) the last day of a month, (ii) not more than
five years from the date that the member elects to begin participation
in the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred retirement
option plan, (iii) when the member's employment with the Washington
state patrol terminates, (iv) when the member's participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred retirement option
plan ends, and (v) the date after which the member begins receiving the
member's retirement allowance. The member may designate, or change the
member's designation of, a beneficiary who shall receive the balance of
the accruals to the member's deferred retirement option plan account
created under subsection (3) of this section, in the event that the
member dies during the member's participation in the deferred option
retirement plan option. The member shall make such a designation in
writing to, and in the manner prescribed by, the department of
retirement systems. If someone other than the member's spouse or state
registered domestic partner is designated as the sole primary
beneficiary, then the member must also file with the department of
retirement systems a written statement from the member's spouse or
state registered domestic partner consenting to the beneficiary
designation.
(3) When a member elects to participate in the Washington state
patrol retirement system deferred retirement option plan, a deferred
retirement option plan account is created for the individual member in
the fund of the retirement system. While the member is participating
in the Washington state patrol retirement system deferred retirement
option plan, an amount equal to seventy-five percent of the monthly
retirement allowance that would have been payable had the member
retired and begun receiving a retirement allowance according to the
member's election made under subsection (2)(a) of this section,
adjusted for cost-of-living increases according to subsection (5)(c) of
this section, shall be credited to the member's deferred retirement
option plan account. The member's deferred retirement option plan
account shall be credited on an annual basis with interest at a fixed
rate of six and one-half percent per year.
(4)(a) The member forfeits the accruals under the deferred
retirement option plan if the member terminates participation in the
Washington state patrol retirement system deferred retirement option
plan before the date identified by the member pursuant to subsection
(2)(d) of this section for any reason other than the member's death.
If a member forfeits the amounts credited to the member's deferred
retirement option plan account under this subsection (4)(a), then the
member begins receiving the member's retirement allowance according to
the election made pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section. The
member's service credit in the Washington state patrol retirement
system is not adjusted for the period of the member's participation in
the deferred retirement option plan, nor are salary increase
adjustments made to the member's retirement allowance for the period
during which the member participated in the deferred retirement option
plan.
(b) A member who, during the member's participation in the deferred
retirement option plan, is placed on disability status in accordance
with RCW 43.43.040(1)(a), and receives compensation in accordance with
RCW 43.43.040(2), is (i) deemed to have terminated participation in the
deferred retirement option plan on the last day of the month that
coincides with, or next follows, the date of the member's placement on
disability status; and (ii) not entitled to the accruals under the
deferred retirement option plan, and instead receives the disability
benefit in accordance with RCW 43.43.040.
(c) A member shall be reinstated in the Washington state patrol
retirement system deferred retirement option plan, and the accrual
balance previously established shall be reinstated, on the first day of
the month that coincides with or next follows the date that the member
resumes active duty employment with the Washington state patrol, if the
member (i) received disability benefits under RCW 43.43.040; (ii) was
deemed to have terminated participation in the deferred retirement
option plan; (iii) returns to active duty employment with the
Washington state patrol; and (iv) resumes active membership in the
retirement system.
(d) Any member, who is placed on disability status during the
member's participation in the deferred retirement option plan, whose
deferred retirement option plan account is not reinstated according to
(c) of this subsection, shall not receive a monthly retirement
allowance from the Washington state patrol retirement system.
(5) While a member is participating in the Washington state patrol
retirement system deferred retirement option plan, (a) the member and
employer contributions to the Washington state patrol retirement system
shall continue to be paid to the retirement system at the rate computed
for the current active members under RCW 41.45.0631; (b) the member
shall not earn any additional service credit under the Washington state
patrol retirement system or receive any salary increase adjustments to
the member's retirement allowance calculation; (c) the member's accrual
under the deferred retirement option plan shall be credited with
retirement allowance cost-of-living increases from the Washington state
patrol retirement system, up to a maximum of three percent per year.
(6) At the earlier of the date of the member's death or the date
identified by the member pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section,
and subject to subsection (4) of this section, the balance of the
member's deferred retirement option plan account shall be distributed
pursuant to this subsection, and in accordance with federal law.
(a) The member may elect to receive the accrual balance in the
member's deferred retirement option plan account in (i) a lump sum
payment; or (ii) a direct rollover in accordance with federal law.
(b) If the member dies during the member's participation in the
deferred retirement option plan, then the balance of the accruals in
the member's deferred retirement option plan account shall be
distributed to the member's designated beneficiary as a lump sum or a
direct rollover in accordance with federal law, or if there is no
designated beneficiary or the designated beneficiary predeceases the
member, then to the estate of the member as a lump sum. Distribution
of the member's deferred retirement option plan account balance under
this subsection (6)(b) is in addition to any death benefits payable
under any other statute. A member who receives a distribution pursuant
to this subsection shall not earn any additional service credit under
the Washington state patrol retirement system or receive any salary
increase adjustments to the member's retirement allowance calculation,
even if the member is subsequently reemployed by the Washington state
patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---