BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state and local
responsibility for environmental and natural resources protection,
cleanup and restoration, the selection of means of generating electric
current, the selection of transportation modes and plans, water
conservation, and storm water and sewerage treatment, often transcend
local government boundaries and cover large regions of or even the
entire state. The benefits of expenditures for such purposes also
accrue across numerous governmental jurisdictions, yet too often it is
only the state or one or a few local jurisdictions undertaking
responsibility to finance these expenditures.
The legislature further finds that this burden on the responsible
jurisdiction constitutes an inequitable financial disincentive, thus
discouraging or delaying needed undertakings, or resulting in
suboptimal expenditures of financial and natural resource capital, in
each case to the detriment of the health and welfare of the people and
the natural resources of the state. This disparity between burdens and
benefits can render socially, ecologically, and economically desirable
projects financially unfeasible.
The legislature further finds that a new concept of public
financing, referred to as interjurisdictional financing, would address
this lack of connection between financing burdens and expenditure
benefits, and bypass institutional barriers to the financing of
integrated and beneficial projects. Unlike the traditional municipal
bond finance model in which the repayment of bonds is anticipated
solely from increased utility or tax revenues of the bond issuer,
interjurisdictional bonds would be repaid by allocating shared
responsibility, without diminution of the issuing entity's obligations
to bondholders, among some or all of the jurisdictions that would be
benefited from the expenditure by reduced expenses or increased
revenues based upon the projected cost or tax savings or increased
utility revenues forecast to accrue to each, using methods of
calculation including life cycle assessment protocols adapted to
subject matter and locale. By this means, socially, ecologically, and
economically desirable projects not otherwise financially feasible, may
acquire feasibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) On or before December 31, 2009, the
state treasurer shall provide a report to the fiscal and natural
resources policy committees of the senate and house of representatives
that analyzes the feasibility of financing state and local
environmental protection, cleanup and restoration, the means of
generating electric current, transportation modes and plans, water
conservation and storm water and sewerage treatment, through the
issuance of interjurisdictional financing as described in section 1 of
this act.
(2) The report shall include:
(a) A review of this financing mechanism as proposed, as well as
examples where states or local jurisdictions have implemented similar
mechanisms among municipal corporations;
(b) An identification of potential overall benefits to state and
local jurisdictions to the economy, to the health and welfare of the
people, and to the natural resources of the state, in using this
mechanism over existing finance mechanisms;
(c) An analysis of the methodologies for assessing individual
jurisdiction benefits and for allocating responsibility among all the
benefited jurisdictions for repayment of the bond obligations;
(d) An analysis of necessary enabling legislation to implement this
method, and responsibilities of the state treasurer, the state finance
committee, and other agencies; and
(e) An assessment of the potential for credit markets to accept
this financing mechanism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---