BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The department of health shall establish a
pilot project by which local government can apply for an exemption from
certain food and drug administration food code sections to allow dogs
within certain designated outdoor portions of premises holding a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license or a beer and/or wine
restaurant license or certain designated outdoor portions of premises
whose main business purpose is selling coffee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The governing body of a local government
participating in the pilot project is authorized to establish, by
ordinance, a local exemption procedure to section 6-501.115, 2001 food
and drug administration food code.
(2) The adoption of the local government exemption procedure shall
be at the sole discretion of the governing body of the participating
local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Any local exemption procedure adopted
under this act shall only provide a variance to section 6-501.115, 2001
food and drug administration food code, to allow patrons' dogs within
certain designated outdoor portions of the establishments designated in
section 1 of this act.
(2) In order to protect the health, safety, and general welfare of
the public, the local exemption procedure shall require participating
establishments to apply for and receive a permit from the local
department of health before allowing patrons' dogs on their premises.
The local department of health shall require such information from the
applicant as the department determines reasonably necessary to enforce
the provisions of this act but shall require, at a minimum, the
following information:
(a) Name, location, and mailing address of the establishment;
(b) Name, mailing address, and telephone contact information of the
permit applicant;
(c) A diagram and description of the outdoor area to be designated
as available to patrons' dogs, including dimensions of the designated
area; a depiction of the number and placement of tables, chairs, and
restaurant equipment, if any; the entryways and exits to the designated
outdoor areas; the boundaries of the designated area and of other areas
of outdoor dining not available for patrons' dogs; any fences or other
barriers; surrounding property lines and public rights-of-way,
including sidewalks and common pathways; and such other information
reasonably required by the local department of health; and
(d) A description of the days of the week and hours of operation
that patrons' dogs will be allowed in the designated outdoor area.
(3) In order to protect the health, safety, and general welfare of
the public, the local exemption ordinance shall include such
regulations and limitations as deemed necessary by the participating
local government and shall include at least the following requirements:
(a) All employees of the establishments participating in the pilot
shall wash their hands immediately after touching, petting, or
otherwise handling dogs. Employees are prohibited from touching,
petting, or otherwise handling dogs while serving food or beverages or
handling tableware or before entering other parts of the establishment;
(b) Patrons in a designated outdoor area shall be advised that they
should wash their hands before eating. Waterless hand sanitizer shall
be provided at all tables in the designated outdoor area;
(c) Employees and patrons shall be instructed that they shall not
allow dogs to come into contact with serving dishes, utensils,
tableware, linens, paper products, or any other items involved with
food service operations;
(d) Patrons shall ensure their dogs are licensed by the appropriate
authority, keep their dogs on a leash at all times, and keep their dogs
under reasonable control;
(e) Dogs shall not be allowed on chairs, tables, or other
furnishings;
(f) All table and chair surfaces shall be cleaned and sanitized
with an approved product between seating of patrons. Spilled food and
drink shall be removed from the floor or ground between seating of
patrons;
(g) Accidents involving dog waste shall be cleaned immediately and
the area sanitized with an approved product. A kit with the
appropriate materials for this purpose shall be kept near the
designated outdoor area;
(h) A sign or signs reminding employees of the applicable rules
shall be posted on the premises in a manner and place as determined by
the local department of health; and
(i) A sign or signs shall be posted in a manner and place as
determined by the local permitting authority that places the public on
notice that the designated outdoor area is available for the use of
patrons and patrons' dogs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The participating local departments of
health shall have such powers as are reasonably necessary to regulate
and enforce this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of health shall develop rules
to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act expires June 30, 2014.

--- END ---