BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) A committee is created to study and
report on the creation of a state board to adjudicate complaints
alleging violations of chapter 42.56 RCW, the public records act, and
to adjudicate complaints alleging violations of chapter 42.30 RCW, the
open public meetings act, with thirteen members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The governor shall appoint three members, one of whom
represents the governor, one of whom represents local government, and
one of whom represents the public.
(ii) The attorney general shall appoint three members, one of whom
represents the attorney general, one of whom represents a statewide
media association, and one of whom represents the public.
(iii) The state auditor shall appoint three members, one of whom
represents the auditor, and two of whom represent the public.
(iv) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(v) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(b) The chair of the committee shall be selected by its membership.
(c) The terms of the committee members expire at the end of the
2010 legislative session.
(2)(a) The committee shall study, prepare a draft report with
recommendations, promptly seek public comment on the draft report, and
submit a final report no later than November 15, 2009, on the creation
of a state board with independent authority to:
(i) Review and adjudicate complaints alleging violations of chapter
42.56 RCW, the public records act, and of chapter 42.30 RCW, the open
public meetings act, in an expeditious and inexpensive process;
(ii) Enforce the provisions of the public records act and the open
public meetings act;
(iii) Offer and provide alternative methods for dispute resolution
under the public records act and the open public meetings act;
(iv) Issue interpretive opinions of the public records act and the
open public meetings act;
(v) Provide confidential consultation regarding the duties under
the public records act and the open public meetings act;
(vi) Provide public training on the public records act and the open
public meetings act;
(vii) Recommend legislative improvements to the public records act
and the open public meetings act; and
(viii) Adopt rules to implement these enumerated powers, and other
rules as may be consistent with or necessary to implement these
enumerated powers;
(b) The committee shall consider and report on how a proposed state
board with such enumerated authority might further the goals of the
public records act.
(3) All meetings of the committee shall be open to the public.
(4) The committee must consider input from interested parties.
(5) The office of the attorney general and the state auditor shall
provide staff support to the committee.
(6) Legislative members of the committee shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members of the committee, except those representing an employer or
organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) A majority of the committee members shall provide notice of a
special meeting of the committee pursuant to RCW 42.30.080 for the
purpose of convening an initial meeting no later than August 1, 2009.
The committee shall meet at least once a month and may hold additional
meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of the members
of the committee.
(8) The committee shall consider and report on the efficacy of
other state's laws and programs with similar goals administered by
state agencies or public officers. The committee's report shall detail
the potential associated costs or savings, organizational structure,
and functions of a proposed administrative tribunal, and shall make
recommendations for or against the creation of an administrative
tribunal. The committee shall submit copies of the final report to the
state legislature, the governor, the state auditor, and to the attorney
general, no later than November 15, 2009.
(9) This section expires June 1, 2010.

--- END ---