BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.62 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax credit under this chapter must
file a complete annual survey with the department. The survey is due
by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a person
becomes eligible to claim the tax credit.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax credit claimed
for the calendar year covered by the survey.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax credit was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax credit was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax credit.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in subsection
(5) of this section. If the amount of the tax credit claimed as
reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or
otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax
returns or other information known to the department, the amount
actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax credit that requires an annual survey under this section but fails
to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the amount
of the tax credit claimed for the previous calendar year to be
immediately due. If the tax credit is a deferral of tax, twelve and
one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax credit was claimed, and accrues until
the taxes for which the tax credit was claimed are repaid. Amounts due
under this subsection are not subject to the confidentiality provisions
of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax credit" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax credits requiring a survey under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.62.080 and 1987 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, applications,
reports, and any other information received by the department under
this chapter shall not be confidential and shall be subject to
disclosure.

--- END ---