BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.295.005 and 2007 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds the practice of using "living trusts" as a
marketing tool by persons who are not authorized to practice law, who
are not acting directly under the supervision of a person authorized to
practice law, ((or)) who are not a financial institution, or who are
not properly credentialed and regulated professionals as specified
under RCW 19.295.020 (5) and (6) for purposes of gathering information
for the preparation of an estate distribution document to be a
deceptive means of obtaining personal asset information and of
developing and generating leads for sales to senior citizens. The
legislature further finds that this practice endangers the financial
security of consumers and may frustrate their estate planning
objectives. Therefore, the legislature intends to prohibit the
marketing of services related to preparation of estate distribution
documents by persons who are not authorized to practice law or who are
not a financial institution.
This chapter is not intended to limit consumers from ((receiving))
obtaining legitimate estate planning ((services)) documents, including
"living trusts," from those authorized to practice law; but is intended
to prohibit persons not licensed to engage in the practice of law from
the unscrupulous practice of marketing legal ((services)) documents as
a means of targeting senior citizens for financial exploitation.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.295.010 and 2008 c 161 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Market" or "marketing" includes every offer, contract, or
agreement to prepare or gather information for the preparation of, or
to provide, individualized advice about an estate distribution
document.
(2) "Estate distribution document" means any one or more of the
following documents, instruments, or writings prepared, or intended to
be prepared, for a specific person or as marketing materials for
distribution to any person, other than documents, instruments,
writings, or marketing materials relating to a payable on death account
established under RCW 30.22.040(9) or a transfer on death account
established under chapter 21.35 RCW:
(a) Last will and testament or any writing, however designated,
that is intended to have the same legal effect as a last will and
testament, and any codicil thereto;
(b) Revocable and irrevocable inter vivos trusts and any instrument
which purports to transfer any of the trustor's current and/or future
interest in real or personal property thereto;
(c) Agreement that fixes the terms and provisions of the sale of a
decedent's interest in any real or personal property at or following
the date of the decedent's death.
(3) "Financial institution" means a bank holding company registered
under federal law, a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings
bank, savings and loan association or credit union organized under
state or federal law, or any affiliate, subsidiary, officer, or
employee of a financial institution.
(4) "Gathering information for the preparation of an estate
distribution document" means collecting data, facts, figures, records,
and other particulars about a specific person or persons for the
preparation of an estate distribution document, but does not include
the collection of such information for clients in the customary and
usual course of financial, tax, and associated planning by a
certificate holder or licensee regulated under chapter 18.04 RCW.
(5) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, firm, or association.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.295.020 and 2007 c 67 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it is
unlawful for a person to market estate distribution documents, directly
or indirectly, in or from this state unless the person is authorized to
practice law in this state.
(2) A person employed by someone authorized to practice law in this
state may gather information for, or assist in the preparation of,
estate distribution documents as long as that person does not provide
any legal advice.
(3) This chapter applies to any person who markets estate
distribution documents in or from this state. Marketing occurs in this
state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, if
the offer originates in this state or is directed into this state or is
received or accepted in this state.
(4) This chapter does not apply to any financial institution.
(5) This chapter does not apply to a certificate holder or licensee
regulated under chapter 18.04 RCW for purposes of gathering information
for the preparation of an estate distribution document.
(6) This chapter does not apply to an individual who is an enrolled
agent enrolled to practice before the internal revenue service pursuant
to Treasury Department Circular No. 230 for purposes of gathering
information for the preparation of an estate distribution document.

--- END ---