BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the northern
coast of the Olympic Peninsula and Washington's west coast from Cape
Flattery south to Cape Disappointment:
(a) Possess uniquely rich and highly vulnerable biological, marine,
and cultural resources supporting some of the nation's most valuable
commercial, sport, and tribal fisheries;
(b) Sustain endangered species and numerous species of vulnerable
marine mammals; and
(c) Are internationally recognized through extraordinary
designations including a world heritage site, a national park, a
national marine sanctuary, national wildlife refuges, a maritime area
off-limits to shipping, and tribal lands and fishing areas of federally
recognized coastal Indian tribes.
(2) The legislature further finds that these coasts are
periodically beset by severe storms with dangerously high seas and by
strong currents, obscuring fog, and other conditions that imperil
vessels and crews. When vessels suffer damage or founder, the coasts
are likewise imperiled, particularly if oil is spilled into coastal
waters. Oil spills pose great potential risks to treasured resources.
(3) The legislature further finds that Washington has maintained an
emergency response tug at Neah Bay since 1999 to protect state waters
from maritime casualties and resulting oil spills. The tug is
necessary because of peculiarities of local waters that call for
special precautionary measures. The tug has demonstrated its necessity
and capability by responding to forty-one vessels in need of
assistance. State funding for the tug is scheduled to end on June 30,
2009.
(4) The legislature intends that the maritime industry should
provide and fully fund at least one year-round emergency response tug
at Neah Bay, with necessary logistical and operational support, and
that any tug provided by the maritime industry pursuant to this act
should meet or exceed technical performance requirements specified in
the state's fiscal year 2009 contract for the Neah Bay emergency
response tug.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The owner or operator of a covered vessel that is subject to
requirements specified in RCW 88.46.130 must provide at least one
emergency response towing vessel that must be:
(a) Stationed at Neah Bay; and
(b) Continuously available and capable of responding to any vessel
emergency, including but not limited to:
(i) Loss or serious degradation of propulsion, steering, means of
navigation, primary electrical generating capability, or seakeeping
capability;
(ii) Hull breach; or
(iii) Oil spill.
(2) An emergency response towing vessel must be capable of:
(a) Deploying at any hour of any day to provide emergency
assistance;
(b) Being underway within twenty minutes of a decision to deploy,
with adequate crew to safely remain underway for at least forty-eight
hours;
(c) Effectively employing a ship anchor chain recovery hook and
line throwing gun;
(d) A bollard pull of at least seventy short tons; and
(e) Effectively operating in severe weather conditions with
sustained winds measured at forty knots and wave heights of twelve to
eighteen feet, including:
(i) Holding position within one hundred feet of another vessel; and
(ii) Making up to, stopping, holding, and towing a drifting or
disabled vessel of one hundred eighty thousand metric dead weight tons.
(3) An emergency response towing vessel must be equipped with:
(a) A ship anchor chain recovery hook;
(b) A line throwing gun; and
(c) Appropriate equipment for:
(i) Damage control patching;
(ii) Vessel dewatering;
(iii) Air safety monitoring; and
(iv) Digital photography.
(4) The requirements of this section may be fulfilled by a private
organization or nonprofit cooperative providing umbrella coverage under
contract to a single or multiple covered vessels. If a nonprofit
cooperative is formed or used to meet the requirements of this section,
it shall equitably apportion costs to each participating covered vessel
based on risk associated with particular classes of covered vessels,
navigational and structural characteristics of covered vessels, and the
number of covered vessel transits to or from a Washington port through
the Strait of Juan de Fuca, as defined in RCW 88.46.130(5), except for
transits extending no further west than Race Rocks.
(5) The department is authorized to contract with an emergency
response towing vessel provided under this section. Any use by the
department must be paid by the department.
(6) An owner or operator of a covered vessel that is required to
provide an emergency response towing vessel may not restrict the
emergency response towing vessel from responding to noncovered vessels
in distress.
(7) Nothing in this section prohibits the owner or operator of a
covered vessel or a private organization or nonprofit cooperative from
contracting with an emergency response towing vessel with capabilities
exceeding requirements specified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The legislature finds that all sectors
of the maritime industry have demonstrated the ability to cooperate in
reducing risks of oil spills and in providing for comprehensive
response actions when spills occur. Therefore, the legislature expects
that owners or operators of covered vessels that are subject to
requirements specified in RCW 88.46.130 will cooperate in sharing
responsibility for the emergency response system and in equitably
apportioning costs.
(2) The department of ecology shall monitor progress of the
maritime industry in establishing and funding the emergency response
system required by RCW 88.46.130. The department shall provide interim
progress reports to appropriate standing committees in the senate and
house of representatives by October 1, 2009, and again by December 1,
2009, the latter date coinciding with the deadline for contingency
plans for covered vessels operating in the Strait of Juan de Fuca to
provide for the emergency response system required by RCW 88.46.130.
(3) The department's reports required under subsection (2) of this
section must describe the maritime industry's processes for ensuring
that the emergency response system is established and funded by July 1,
2010, as required by RCW 88.46.130. The reports must provide available
information regarding:
(a) The anticipated annual cost of providing the emergency response
system;
(b) The methodology for determining the anticipated average annual
cost for each class of covered vessel, including:
(i) A system for crediting enhanced navigational or structural
characteristics;
(ii) Appropriate limits on total cost for vessels that frequently
transit the Strait of Juan de Fuca, as defined in RCW 88.46.130(5),
except for transits extending no further west than Race Rocks; and
(iii) Consideration of current economic conditions; and
(c) Any impediment to equitable apportionment of costs.
(4) As used in this section, "class of covered vessel" means:
(a) Oil tankers;
(b) Tank barges;
(c) Tug and oil barge combinations;
(d) Cargo vessels;
(e) Passenger vessels; and
(f) Other covered vessels.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW
to read as follows:
As soon as practicable following return of an emergency response
towing vessel after an incident necessitating a response, the covered
vessel owner or operator or the contracting organization shall submit
a report to the department. The report must provide a detailed
description of the incident necessitating a response and actions taken
to render assistance, and include high quality photographic
documentation.

Sec. 5 RCW 88.46.068 and 2006 c 316 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall ((by rule)) adopt by rule procedures to
determine the adequacy of contingency plans approved under RCW
88.46.060. The rules shall require random practice drills without
prior notice that will test the adequacy of the responding entities.
The rules may provide for unannounced practice drills of individual
contingency plans.
(2) In addition to reviewing and approving contingency plans
required by RCW 88.46.060, the department shall also review and approve
the emergency response system required by RCW 88.46.130. Adequacy of
the system may be determined through practice drills, which may be
conducted without prior notice. Successful responses to vessel
emergencies may satisfy this requirement. Drills must test emergency
response towing vessels' ability to respond to worst case scenarios.
(3) The department shall review and publish a report on the drills,
including an assessment of response time and available equipment and
personnel compared to those listed in the contingency plans relying on
the responding entities, and requirements, if any, for changes in the
plans or their implementation.
(4) The department may require additional drills and changes in
arrangements for implementing approved plans which are necessary to
ensure their effective implementation.

Sec. 6 RCW 88.46.130 and 1991 c 200 s 426 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, the owner or operator of a covered vessel
transiting to or from a Washington port through the Strait of Juan de
Fuca, except for transits extending no further west than Race Rocks,
shall establish and fund an emergency response system ((for the Strait
of Juan de Fuca shall be established by July 1, 1992. In establishing
the emergency response system, the administrator shall consider the
recommendations of the regional marine safety committees. The
administrator shall also consult with the province of British Columbia
regarding its participation in the emergency response system))
providing at least one emergency response towing vessel stationed at
Neah Bay.
(2) Any emergency response towing vessel provided under this
section must:
(a) Be available to serve vessels in distress in the Strait of Juan
de Fuca and off of the western coast of the state from Cape Flattery
light south to Cape Disappointment light; and
(b) Meet the requirements specified in section 2 of this act.
(3) In addition to meeting requirements specified in RCW 88.46.060,
contingency plans for covered vessels operating in the Strait of Juan
de Fuca must provide for the emergency response system required by this
section. Documents demonstrating compliance with this section must be
submitted to the department by December 1, 2009. An initial
contingency plan submitted to the department after December 1, 2009,
must be accompanied by documents demonstrating compliance with this
section.
(4) The requirements of this section are met if:
(a) Owners or operators of covered vessels provide at least one
emergency response towing vessel that complies with subsection (2) of
this section; or
(b) The United States government implements a system of protective
measures that the department determines to be substantially equivalent.
(5) As used in this section, "Strait of Juan de Fuca" means waters
off of the northern coast of the Olympic Peninsula, from Cape Flattery
light east to New Dungeness light, terminating at a line extending from
Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The director of the department of
ecology, or the director's designee, shall initiate discussions with
the director's counterpart in the government for the Canadian province
of British Columbia to explore options for Washington and British
Columbia to share marine emergency response assets required under this
act.
(2) The department of ecology must report any progress or outcomes
from discussions initiated under this section to appropriate committees
of the legislature by January 1, 2011.
(3) This section expires July 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---