BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2007 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Biomass energy" means (a) organic byproducts of the pulping
process; (b) animal waste; (c) solid organic fuels from wood; (d)
forest or field residues; (e) wooden demolition or construction debris;
(f) food waste that is decomposed in an anaerobic digester; (g) black
liquors derived from algae; or (h) dedicated energy crops. "Biomass"
does not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth forests; or municipal solid waste.
(4) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(((4))) (5) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(((5))) (6) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(((6))) (7) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(((7))) (8) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases
electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of community, trade,
and economic development or its successor.
(((9))) (10) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable
resource where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of
such facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five
megawatts.
(((10))) (11) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, ((where: (i))) when the facility is located ((in the Pacific
Northwest; or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into
Washington state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or
integration services; or)) within the geographic jurisdiction of the
western electricity coordinating council or its successor;
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects ((owned by a qualifying utility)) and located in
the Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation
pipes and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments;
(c) Electricity from a generation facility located in the Pacific
Northwest that commenced operation before March 31, 1999, and is
powered by biomass energy;
(d) Electricity from a generation facility located in the Pacific
Northwest that commenced operation before March 31, 1999, and is
powered by water from a generation facility with a generation capacity
of thirty megawatts or less; or
(e) Up to fifty megawatts of electricity from a generation facility
located in the Pacific Northwest that is powered by water and that has
been relicensed after 1985 by the federal energy regulatory commission
under the federal power act. A qualifying utility may not claim
eligible renewable resources under both (d) and (e) of this subsection.
(((11))) (12) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010.
(((12))) (13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered in the most recently completed year by a
qualifying utility to its Washington retail customers.
(((13))) (14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally
related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and
other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(((14))) (15) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined
for the Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698;
16 U.S.C. Sec. 839a).
(((15))) (16) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 39.35C.010.
(((16))) (17) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as
the term "electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves
more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington.
The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy.
(((17))) (18) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable
certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible
renewable resource, regardless of its geographic location, where ((the
generation facility is not powered by fresh water,)) the certificate
includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with that one
megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified by a
renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the department.
(((18))) (19) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor byproduct from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(((19))) (20) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other
entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and
purposes of this chapter.
(((20))) (21) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources or acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year, and may be acquired for compliance
purposes in the current or subsequent year in which the renewable
energy credit is generated. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located ((in the Pacific Northwest where)) within
the geographic jurisdiction of the western electricity coordinating
council or its successor and the cofiring commenced after March 31,
1999, the unit shall be considered to produce eligible renewable
resources in direct proportion to the percentage of the total heat
value represented by the heat value of the renewable resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

--- END ---