BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The health care system in the nation and in Washington state
costs nearly twice as much per capita as other industrialized nations.
(2) The fragmentation and variation in administrative processes
prevalent in our health care system contribute to the high cost of
health care, putting it increasingly beyond the reach of small
businesses and individuals in Washington.
(3) In 2006, the legislature's blue ribbon commission on health
care costs and access requested the office of the insurance
commissioner to conduct a study of administrative costs and
recommendations to reduce those costs. Findings in the report
included:
(a) In Washington state approximately thirty cents of every dollar
received by hospitals and doctors' offices is consumed by the
administrative expenses of public and private payors and the providers;
(b) Before the doctors and hospitals receive the funds for
delivering the care, approximately fourteen percent of the insurance
premium has already been consumed by payor administration. The payor's
portion of expense totals approximately four hundred fifty dollars per
insurance member per year in Washington state;
(c) Over thirteen percent of every dollar received by a physician's
office is devoted to interactions between the provider and payor;
(d) Between 1997 and 2005, billing and insurance related costs for
hospitals in Washington grew at an average pace of nineteen percent per
year; and
(e) The greatest opportunity for improved efficiency and
administrative cost reduction in our health care system would involve
standardizing and streamlining activities between providers and payors.
(4) To address these inefficiencies, constrain health care
inflation, and make health care more affordable for Washingtonians, the
legislature seeks to establish streamlined and uniform procedures for
payors and providers of health care services in the state. It is the
intent of the legislature to foster a continuous quality improvement
cycle to simplify health care administration. This process should
involve leadership in the health care industry and health care
purchasers, with regulatory oversight from the office of the insurance
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner as established
under chapter 48.02 RCW.
(2) "Health care provider" or "provider" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005 and, for the purposes of this act, shall include
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(3) "Lead organization" means a private sector organization or
organizations designated by the commissioner to lead development of
processes, guidelines, and standards to streamline health care
administration and to be adopted by payors and providers of health care
services operating in the state.
(4) "Medical management" means administrative activities
established by the payor to manage the utilization of services through
preservice or postservice reviews. "Medical management" includes, but
is not limited to:
(a) Prior authorization or preauthorization of services;
(b) Precertification of services;
(c) Postservice review;
(d) Medical necessity review; and
(e) Benefits advisory.
(5) "Payor" means public purchasers, as defined in this section,
carriers licensed under chapters 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, 48.46, and 48.62
RCW, and the Washington state health insurance pool established in
chapter 48.41 RCW.
(6) "Public purchaser" means the department of social and health
services, the department of labor and industries, and the health care
authority.
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(8) "Third-party payor" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.02.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The following state agencies are directed to cooperate with the
insurance commissioner and, within funds appropriated specifically for
this purpose, adopt the processes, guidelines, and standards to
streamline health care administration pursuant to sections 2, 5, 6, and
8 through 10 of this act: The department of social and health
services, the health care authority, and, to the extent permissible
under Title 51 RCW, the department of labor and industries.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.47.130 and 2004 c 115 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The activities and operations of the Washington basic health
plan under this chapter, including those of managed health care systems
to the extent of their participation in the plan, are exempt from the
provisions and requirements of Title 48 RCW except:
(a) Benefits as provided in RCW 70.47.070;
(b) Managed health care systems are subject to the provisions of
RCW 48.43.022, 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535,
43.70.235, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, and 70.02.900;
(c) Persons appointed or authorized to solicit applications for
enrollment in the basic health plan, including employees of the health
care authority, must comply with chapter 48.17 RCW. For purposes of
this subsection (1)(c), "solicit" does not include distributing
information and applications for the basic health plan and responding
to questions; ((and))
(d) Amounts paid to a managed health care system by the basic
health plan for participating in the basic health plan and providing
health care services for nonsubsidized enrollees in the basic health
plan must comply with RCW 48.14.0201; and
(e) Administrative simplification requirements as provided in this
act.
(2) The purpose of the 1994 amendatory language to this section in
chapter 309, Laws of 1994 is to clarify the intent of the legislature
that premiums paid on behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees in the basic
health plan are subject to the premium and prepayment tax. The
legislature does not consider this clarifying language to either raise
existing taxes nor to impose a tax that did not exist previously.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The commissioner shall designate one or
more lead organizations to coordinate development of processes,
guidelines, and standards to streamline health care administration and
to be adopted by payors and providers of health care services operating
in the state. The lead organization designated by the commissioner for
this act shall:
(a) Be representative of providers and payors across the state;
(b) Have expertise and knowledge in the major disciplines related
to health care administration; and
(c) Be able to support the costs of its work without recourse to
public funding.
(2) The lead organization shall:
(a) In collaboration with the commissioner, identify and convene
work groups, as needed, to define the processes, guidelines, and
standards required in sections 6 through 10 of this act;
(b) In collaboration with the commissioner, promote the
participation of representatives of health care providers, payors of
health care services, and others whose expertise would contribute to
streamlining health care administration;
(c) Conduct outreach and communication efforts to maximize adoption
of the guidelines, standards, and processes developed by the lead
organization;
(d) Submit regular updates to the commissioner on the progress
implementing the requirements of this act; and
(e) With the commissioner, report to the legislature annually
through December 1, 2012, on progress made, the time necessary for
completing tasks, and identification of future tasks that should be
prioritized for the next improvement cycle.
(3) The commissioner shall:
(a) Participate in and review the work and progress of the lead
organization, including the establishment and operation of work groups
for this act;
(b) Adopt into rule, or submit as proposed legislation, the
guidelines, standards, and processes set forth in this act if:
(i) The lead organization fails to timely develop or implement the
guidelines, standards, and processes set forth in sections 6 through 10
of this act; or
(ii) It is unlikely that there will be widespread adoption of the
guidelines, standards, and processes developed under this act;
(c) Consult with the office of the attorney general to determine
whether an antitrust safe harbor is necessary to enable licensed
carriers and providers to develop common rules and standards; and, if
necessary, take steps, such as implementing rules or requesting
legislation, to establish such safe harbor; and
(d) Convene an executive level work group with broad payor and
provider representation to advise the commissioner regarding the goals
and progress of implementation of the requirements of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By December 31, 2010, the lead organization
shall:
(1) Develop a uniform electronic process for collecting and
transmitting the necessary provider-supplied data to support
credentialing, admitting privileges, and other related processes that:
(a) Reduces the administrative burden on providers;
(b) Improves the quality and timeliness of information for
hospitals and payors;
(c) Is interoperable with other relevant systems;
(d) Enables use of the data by authorized participants for other
related applications; and
(e) Serves as the sole source of credentialing information required
by hospitals and payors from providers for data elements included in
the electronic process, except this shall not prohibit:
(i) A hospital, payor, or other credentialing entity subject to the
requirements of this section from seeking clarification of information
obtained through use of the uniform electronic process, if such
clarification is reasonably necessary to complete the credentialing
process; or
(ii) A hospital, payor, other credentialing entity, or a university
from using information not provided by the uniform process for the
purpose of credentialing, admitting privileges, or faculty appointment
of providers, including peer review and coordinated quality improvement
information, that is obtained from sources other than the provider;
(2) Promote widespread adoption of such process by payors and
hospitals, their delegates, and subcontractors in the state that
credential health professionals and by such health professionals as
soon as possible thereafter; and
(3) Work with the secretary to assure that data used in the uniform
electronic process can be electronically exchanged with the department
of health professional licensing process under chapter 18.122 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.122 RCW
to read as follows:
Pursuant to sections 5 and 6 of this act, the secretary or his or
her designee shall participate in the work groups and, within funds
appropriated specifically for this purpose, implement the standards to
enable the department to transmit data to and receive data from the
uniform process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The lead organization shall:
(1) Establish a uniform standard companion document and data set
for electronic eligibility and coverage verification. Such a companion
guide will:
(a) Be based on nationally accepted ANSI X12 270/271 standards for
eligibility inquiry and response and, wherever possible, be consistent
with the standards adopted by nationally recognized organizations, such
as the centers for medicare and medicaid services;
(b) Enable providers and payors to exchange eligibility requests
and responses on a system-to-system basis or using a payor supported
web browser;
(c) Provide reasonably detailed information on a consumer's
eligibility for health care coverage, scope of benefits, limitations
and exclusions provided under that coverage, cost-sharing requirements
for specific services at the specific time of the inquiry, current
deductible amounts, accumulated or limited benefits, out-of-pocket
maximums, any maximum policy amounts, and other information required
for the provider to collect the patient's portion of the bill; and
(d) Reflect the necessary limitations imposed on payors by the
originator of the eligibility and benefits information;
(2) Recommend a standard or common process to the commissioner to
protect providers and hospitals from the costs of, and payors from
claims for, services to patients who are ineligible for insurance
coverage in circumstances where a payor provides eligibility
verification based on best information available to the payor at the
date of the request; and
(3) Complete, disseminate, and promote widespread adoption by
payors of such document and data set by December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) By December 31, 2010, the lead
organization shall develop implementation guidelines and promote
widespread adoption of such guidelines for:
(a) The use of the national correct coding initiative code edit
policy by payors and providers in the state;
(b) Publishing any variations from component codes, mutually
exclusive codes, and status b codes by payors in a manner that makes
for simple retrieval and implementation by providers;
(c) Use of health insurance portability and accountability act
standard group codes, reason codes, and remark codes by payors in
electronic remittances sent to providers;
(d) The processing of corrections to claims by providers and
payors; and
(e) A standard payor denial review process for providers when they
appeal a denial of a claim that results from differences in clinical
edits where no single, common standards body or process exists and
multiple conflicting sources are in use by payors and providers.
(2) By October 31, 2010, the lead organization shall develop a
proposed set of goals and work plan for additional code standardization
efforts for 2011 and 2012.
(3) Nothing in this section or in the guidelines developed by the
lead organization shall inhibit an individual payor's ability to
develop and implement temporary code edits that are necessary to detect
and deter aberrant or potentially fraudulent billing activities that
will be exempt from disclosure to providers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) By December 31, 2010, the lead
organization shall:
(a) Develop and promote widespread adoption by payors and providers
of guidelines to:
(i) Ensure payors do not automatically deny claims for services
when extenuating circumstances make it impossible for the provider to:
(A) Obtain a preauthorization before services are performed; or (B)
notify a payor within twenty-four hours of a patient's admission; and
(ii) Require payors to use common and consistent time frames when
responding to provider requests for medical management approvals.
Whenever possible, such time frames shall be consistent with those
established by the national committee for quality assurance and be
based upon the acuity of the patient's need for care or treatment;
(b) Develop, maintain, and promote widespread adoption of a single
common web site where providers can obtain payors' preauthorization,
benefits advisory, and preadmission requirements;
(c) Establish guidelines for payors to develop and maintain a web
site that providers can employ to:
(i) Request a preauthorization, including a prospective clinical
necessity review;
(ii) Receive an authorization number; and
(iii) Transmit an admission notification.
(2) By October 31, 2010, the lead organization shall propose to the
commissioner a set of goals and work plan for the development of
medical management protocols, including whether to develop evidence-
based medical management practices addressing specific clinical
conditions and make its recommendation to the commissioner, who shall
report the lead organization's findings and recommendations to the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 2, 5, 6, and 8 through 10 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---