BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.400 and 2006 c 60 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to or upon discharge, a hospital must furnish each
patient receiving inpatient services a written statement providing a
list of physician groups and other professional partners that commonly
provide care for patients at the hospital and from whom the patient may
receive a bill, along with contact phone numbers for those groups. The
statement must prominently display a phone number that a patient can
call for assistance if the patient has any questions about any of the
bills they receive after discharge that relate to their hospital stay.
(2) Consistent with requirements outlined in RCW 70.170.060, each
hospital shall provide notice to patients of its charity care policies.
At a minimum, each hospital must post prominently in locations easily
accessible to and visible by patients, including its web site, and in
the bill sent to patients, a notice stating that charges for services
to people meeting the charity care or discount criteria may be waived
or reduced, and regarding the availability of charity care and how to
qualify. The department of health shall develop model language, not to
exceed fifty words, and type font and style standards that hospitals
must use to satisfy the requirement to provide notice in the bill sent
to patients. The language may be written on the patient's actual bill
if it complies with the department's type font and style requirements.
A notice of charity care policies also may be provided to patients
prior to discharge. The notice must use clear language that would be
easily understood by individuals with limited education.
(3) This section does not apply to any hospital owned or operated
by a health maintenance organization under chapter 48.46 RCW when
providing prepaid health care services to enrollees of the health
maintenance organization or any of its wholly owned subsidiary
carriers.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.170.020 and 1995 c 269 s 2203 are each amended to
read as follows:
((As used in)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means department of health.
(2) "Hospital" means any health care institution which is required
to qualify for a license under RCW 70.41.020(((2))) (4); or as a
psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.
(3) "Secretary" means secretary of health.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 70.170.060(6), "charity
care" means necessary hospital health care rendered to indigent
persons, to the extent that the persons are unable to pay for the care
or to pay deductibles or co-insurance amounts required by a third-party
payer, as determined by the department.
(5) "Sliding fee schedule" means a hospital-determined, publicly
available schedule of discounts ((to charges)) for persons deemed
eligible for charity care((;)). Such schedules shall be established
after consideration of guidelines developed by the department.
(6) "Special studies" means studies which have not been funded
through the department's biennial or other legislative appropriations.
(7) "Federal poverty guidelines" means the poverty income
guidelines established annually by the federal department of health and
human services.
(8) "Hospital costs" is the number derived by multiplying hospital
charges by a hospital's aggregate hospital cost-to-charge ratio
calculated by the health and recovery services administration from the
latest available medicare cost report. If a recalculation of the cost-to-charge ratio occurs sooner than twelve months from the last update
to the hospital's discount policy, the calculation existing prior to
the recalculation may be used for purposes of updating hospital
discount policies. The secretary shall develop alternate means of
determining hospital costs for hospitals that do not file medicare cost
reports, in consultation with such hospitals.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.170.060 and 1998 c 245 s 118 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No hospital or its medical staff shall adopt or maintain
admission practices or policies which result in:
(a) A significant reduction in the proportion of patients who have
no third-party coverage and who are unable to pay for hospital
services;
(b) A significant reduction in the proportion of individuals
admitted for inpatient hospital services for which payment is, or is
likely to be, less than the anticipated charges for or costs of such
services; or
(c) The refusal to admit patients who would be expected to require
unusually costly or prolonged treatment for reasons other than those
related to the appropriateness of the care available at the hospital.
(2) No hospital shall adopt or maintain practices or policies which
would deny access to emergency care based on ability to pay. No
hospital which maintains an emergency department shall transfer a
patient with an emergency medical condition or who is in active labor
unless the transfer is performed at the request of the patient or is
due to the limited medical resources of the transferring hospital.
Hospitals must follow reasonable procedures in making transfers to
other hospitals including confirmation of acceptance of the transfer by
the receiving hospital.
(3) The department shall develop definitions by rule, as
appropriate, for subsection (1) of this section and, with reference to
federal requirements, subsection (2) of this section. The department
shall monitor hospital compliance with subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. The department shall report individual instances of possible
noncompliance to the state attorney general or the appropriate federal
agency.
(4) The department shall establish and maintain by rule, consistent
with the definition of charity care in RCW 70.170.020, the following:
(a) Uniform procedures, data requirements, and criteria for
identifying patients receiving charity care;
(b) A definition of residual bad debt including reasonable and
uniform standards for collection procedures to be used in efforts to
collect the unpaid portions of hospital charges that are the patient's
responsibility.
(5) For the purpose of providing charity care, each hospital shall
develop, implement, and maintain a charity care policy which,
consistent with subsection (1) of this section, shall enable people
with family income below one hundred percent of the federal poverty
((level)) guidelines access to appropriate hospital-based medical
services, and a sliding fee schedule for determination of discounts
((from charges)) for persons ((who qualify for such discounts by
January 1, 1990)) with family income from one hundred to two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty guidelines. Discounts under the
sliding fee schedule shall be applied to the amount derived from the
calculation in subsection (6) of this section. The department shall
develop specific guidelines to assist hospitals in setting sliding fee
schedules required by this section. All persons with family income
below one hundred percent of the federal poverty ((standard))
guidelines shall be deemed charity care patients for the full amount of
hospital charges, provided that such persons are not eligible for other
private or public health coverage sponsorship. Persons who may be
eligible for charity care shall be notified by the hospital as required
in subsection (7) of this section.
(6) For uninsured persons with family income up to four hundred
percent of the federal poverty guidelines, hospitals must provide a
discount for any charges for services provided in the hospital.
Subsection (5) of this section determines the degree of the discount
for persons with family income of up to two hundred fifty percent of
the federal poverty guidelines. For persons with family income in
excess of two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty guidelines,
no patient may be required to pay more than the greater of one hundred
thirty percent of the hospital costs, or an amount equal to the state
average percentage of hospital costs paid by private payers, as
determined by the department. In addition, hospitals shall consider a
catastrophic charity care standard that is triggered when hospital
charges equal ten percent of the patient's annual family income.
(7) Each hospital must provide notice to patients of its charity
care policies. At a minimum, each hospital must post prominently in
locations easily accessible to and visible by patients, including its
web site, and in the bill sent to patients, a notice stating that
charges for services to people meeting the charity care or discount
criteria may be waived or reduced, and regarding the availability of
charity care and how to qualify. The department shall develop model
language, not to exceed fifty words, and type font and style standards
that hospitals must use to satisfy the requirement to provide notice in
the bill sent to patients. The language may be written on the
patient's actual bill if it complies with the department's type font
and style requirements. A notice of charity care policies also may be
provided to patients prior to discharge. The notice must use clear
language that would be easily understood by individuals with limited
education.
(8) Each hospital shall make every reasonable effort to determine
the existence or nonexistence of private or public sponsorship which
might cover in full or part the charges for care rendered by the
hospital to a patient; the family income of the patient as classified
under federal poverty income guidelines; and the eligibility of the
patient for charity care as defined in this chapter and in accordance
with hospital policy. An initial determination of sponsorship status
shall precede collection efforts directed at the patient.
(((7))) (9) The department shall monitor the distribution of
charity care among hospitals, with reference to factors such as
relative need for charity care in hospital service areas and trends in
private and public health coverage. The department shall prepare
reports that identify any problems in distribution which are in
contradiction of the intent of this chapter. The report shall include
an assessment of the effects of the provisions of this chapter on
access to hospital and health care services, as well as an evaluation
of the contribution of all purchasers of care to hospital charity care.
(((8))) (10) The department shall issue a report on the subjects
addressed in this section at least annually((, with the first report
due on July 1, 1990)). The department shall also provide information
to the public on hospital charges for the most common inpatient
diagnosis-related groups, as identified under the patient discharge
information collected under RCW 43.70.052, the relationship between
hospital costs and charges, the cost to the uninsured for the most
common inpatient procedures, and details on hospital charity care
policies. The department's review of charity care provided shall
include analysis of charity care as a percent of total revenue, or
billed charges, for each hospital and a review of charity care in
relation to operating expenses. The department shall verify that the
charity care provided meets the minimum requirements established in RCW
84.36.040(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.170 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before contracting with any entity to act as a hospital's
designated agent, assignee, or contractor for collection of its
accounts receivable, or to purchase its accounts receivable, the
hospital's governing board must have notice of, and affirmatively
approve, the debt collection practices of the entity. The information
regarding the entity's debt collection practices must include detailed
information related to:
(a) Contacts with patients who have debts to the hospital,
including written, telephonic, and electronic contacts;
(b) Policies related to the ability of debtors to make installment
payments, and interest rates charged on any remaining balances;
(c) Circumstances under which the entity files civil actions to
collect debts, and undertakes any of the following collection actions
to execute a judgment in connection with a debt:
(i) Actions to foreclose on real property;
(ii) Actions to place a lien on any property;
(iii) Actions to garnish wages; and
(iv) Actions to attach or seize a bank account or any other
personal property.
(2) At least annually, the governing board of every hospital shall
review a report on collection actions taken by the entity that has a
contract with the hospital under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.16.500 and 1997 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Agencies, departments, taxing districts, political
subdivisions of the state, counties, and cities may retain, by written
contract, collection agencies licensed under this chapter for the
purpose of collecting public debts owed by any person, including any
restitution that is being collected on behalf of a crime victim.
(b) Any governmental entity as described in (a) of this subsection
using a collection agency may add a reasonable fee, payable by the
debtor, to the outstanding debt for the collection agency fee incurred
or to be incurred. The amount to be paid for collection services shall
be left to the agreement of the governmental entity and its collection
agency or agencies, but a contingent fee of up to fifty percent of the
first one hundred thousand dollars of the unpaid debt per account and
up to thirty-five percent of the unpaid debt over one hundred thousand
dollars per account is reasonable, and a minimum fee of the full amount
of the debt up to one hundred dollars per account is reasonable. Any
fee agreement entered into by a governmental entity is presumptively
reasonable.
(2) No debt may be assigned to a collection agency unless (a) there
has been an attempt to advise the debtor (i) of the existence of the
debt and (ii) that the debt may be assigned to a collection agency for
collection if the debt is not paid, and (b) at least thirty days have
elapsed from the time notice was attempted.
(3) Collection agencies assigned debts under this section shall
have only those remedies and powers which would be available to them as
assignees of private creditors.
(4) Nothing in this section applies to public hospital district
duties pursuant to chapter 70.170 RCW.
(5) For purposes of this section, the term debt shall include fines
and other debts, including the fee required under subsection (1)(b) of
this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.36.040 and 2001 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The real and personal property used by nonprofit (a) day care
centers ((as defined pursuant to RCW 74.15.020)); (b) free public
libraries; (c) orphanages and orphan asylums; (d) homes for the sick or
infirm; (e) hospitals for the sick; and (f) outpatient dialysis
facilities, which are used for the purposes of such organizations shall
be exempt from taxation: PROVIDED, That the benefit of the exemption
inures to the user.
(2) The real and personal property leased to and used by a
hospital, owned and operated by a public hospital district established
under chapter 70.44 RCW, for hospital purposes is exempt from taxation.
The benefit of the exemption must inure to the user.
(3)(a) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805.
(b) Hospitals seeking the exemption under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section must also demonstrate that a minimum level of charity
care, equivalent to four percent of total revenue, or billed charges,
consistent with the charity care standards provided by chapter 70.170
RCW, has been provided to the community, as part of the community
benefit standard required by the internal revenue service.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.170.070 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 507 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person who shall violate or knowingly aid and abet the
violation of RCW 70.170.060 (5) or (((6))) (8), 70.170.080, or
70.170.100, or any valid orders or rules adopted pursuant to these
sections, or who fails to perform any act which it is herein made his
or her duty to perform, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Following
official notice to the accused by the department of the existence of an
alleged violation, each day of noncompliance upon which a violation
occurs shall constitute a separate violation. Any person violating the
provisions of this chapter may be enjoined from continuing such
violation. The department has authority to levy civil penalties not
exceeding one thousand dollars for violations of this chapter and
determined pursuant to this section.
(2) Every person who shall violate or knowingly aid and abet the
violation of RCW 70.170.060 (1) or (2), or any valid orders or rules
adopted pursuant to such section, or who fails to perform any act which
it is herein made his or her duty to perform, shall be subject to the
following criminal and civil penalties:
(a) For any initial violations: The violating person shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor, and the department may impose a civil penalty
not to exceed one thousand dollars as determined pursuant to this
section.
(b) For a subsequent violation of RCW 70.170.060 (1) or (2) within
five years following a conviction: The violating person shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor, and the department may impose a penalty not to
exceed three thousand dollars as determined pursuant to this section.
(c) For a subsequent violation with intent to violate RCW
70.170.060 (1) or (2) within five years following a conviction: The
criminal and civil penalties enumerated in (a) of this subsection; plus
up to a three-year prohibition against the issuance of tax exempt bonds
under the authority of the Washington health care facilities authority;
and up to a three-year prohibition from applying for and receiving a
certificate of need.
(d) For a violation of RCW 70.170.060 (1) or (2) within five years
of a conviction under (c) of this subsection: The criminal and civil
penalties and prohibition enumerated in (a) and (b) of this subsection;
plus up to a one-year prohibition from participation in the state
medical assistance or medical care services authorized under chapter
74.09 RCW.
(3) The provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW shall apply to all
noncriminal actions undertaken by the department of health, the
department of social and health services, and the Washington health
care facilities authority pursuant to chapter 9, Laws of 1989 1st ex.
sess.

--- END ---