BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.07.103 and 2003 c 397 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special((, temporary)) permit issued by the department under
this section is required for the slaughter ((and)), preparation, and
sale of one thousand or fewer ((pastured chickens)) poultry in a
calendar year by ((the agricultural)) a poultry producer ((of the
chickens)) for the sale of whole raw ((chickens by the producer))
poultry directly to the ultimate consumer at the producer's farm((, and
for such sale. Such activities shall not be conducted without the
permit. However, if the)). Activities ((are)) conducted under ((such
a)) the permit((, the activities are exempted)) are exempt from any
other licensing requirements of this chapter.
(2)(a) The department must adopt by rule requirements for ((a
special, temporary permit for the activities described in subsection
(1) of this section)) the permit. The requirements must be generally
patterned after those established by ((WAC 246-215-190 as it exists on
July 27, 2003,)) the state board of health for temporary food service
establishments, but must be tailored specifically to ((these)) poultry
slaughter, preparation, and sale activities. The requirements must
include, but are not limited to, those for: Cooling procedures, when
applicable; sanitary facilities, equipment, and utensils; clean water;
washing and other hygienic practices; and waste and wastewater
disposal.
(b) ((The rules must also identify the length of time such a permit
is valid. In determining the length of time, the department must take
care to ensure that it is adequate to accommodate the seasonal nature
of the permitted activities. In adopting any rule under this section,
the department must also carefully consider the economic constraints on
the regulated activity.)) A permit expires December 31st and may be
issued for either one or two years as requested by the permit applicant
upon payment of the applicable fee in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section.
(3) The department shall conduct such inspections ((of the
activities permitted under this section)) as are reasonably necessary
to ensure compliance with permit requirements.
(4) The fee for a special permit ((issued under this section)) is
seventy-five dollars for one year, or one hundred twenty-five dollars
for two years.
(((5) For the purposes of this section, "chicken" means the species
Gallus domesticus.))

--- END ---