BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
2009-11 FISCAL BIENNIUM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The transportation budget of the state
is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final
judgments arising out of such activities, for the period ending June
30, 2011.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2010" or "FY 2010" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010.
(b) "Fiscal year 2011" or "FY 2011" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2011.
(c) "FTE" means full-time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.
(f) "Reappropriation" means appropriation and, unless the context
clearly provides otherwise, is subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations.
(g) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Grade Crossing Protective Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $705,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,389,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,489,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,699,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the office of regulatory assistance integrated
permitting project.
(2) Within existing resources, the office of financial management
shall complete a salary survey to be used for collective bargaining and
arbitration purposes related to the Washington state ferries.
(3) $1,004,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the continued maintenance and support of the
transportation executive information system. Of the amount provided in
this subsection, $502,000 is for two existing FTEs at the department of
transportation to maintain and support the system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $424,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation in this section
is provided solely for road maintenance purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,507,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $351,000 of the motor vehicle account -- state appropriation is
provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel quality
program.
(2) $1,004,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to test the quality of biofuel. The department must
test fuel quality at the biofuel manufacturer, distributor, and
retailer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $422,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is provided
solely for staffing costs to be dedicated to state transportation
activities. Staff hired to support transportation activities must have
practical experience with complex construction projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
(1) As part of its 2009-11 fiscal biennium work plan, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an analysis of the
cost of credit card payment options at the department of
transportation. For programs where a credit card payment option is
offered, the review must include:
(a) An analysis of the direct and indirect cost per transaction to
process customer payments using credit cards;
(b) An analysis of the direct and indirect cost per transaction for
other methods of processing customer payments;
(c) An analysis of the historical and projected total aggregate
costs for processing all forms of customer payments;
(d) Identification of whether there are customer service,
administrative, and revenue collection benefits resulting from credit
card usage; and
(e) A review of the use of credit card payment options in other
state agencies and in similar transportation programs at other states.
The committee shall provide a report on its findings and any
related recommendations to the legislature by January 2010.
(2) As part of its 2009-11 fiscal biennium work plan, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall audit the capital cost
accounting practices of the Washington state ferries. The audit must
review the following and provide a report on its findings and any
related recommendations to the legislature by January 2011:
(a) Costs assigned to capital accounts to determine whether they
are capital costs that meet the statutory requirements for preservation
and improvement activities and whether they are within the scope of
legislative appropriations;
(b) Implementation of the life-cycle cost model required under RCW
47.60.345 to determine if it was developed as required and is
maintained and updated when asset inspections are made; and
(c) Washington state ferries' implementation of the cost allocation
methodology evaluated under section 205, chapter 518, Laws of 2007,
assessing whether actual costs are allocated consistently with the
methodology, whether there are sufficient internal controls to ensure
proper allocation, and the adequacy of staff training.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,542,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,660,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,890,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,092,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,336,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
and $550,000 of the school zone safety account--state appropriation are
provided solely for funding traffic safety task forces.
(2) The commission may oversee pilot projects implementing the use
of automated traffic safety cameras to detect speed violations within
cities that have a population over five hundred thousand. However, no
more than three automated traffic safety cameras may be used to detect
speed violations within any one jurisdiction.
(a) The commission shall comply with RCW 46.63.170 in administering
the projects.
(b) In order to ensure adequate time in the 2009-11 fiscal biennium
to evaluate the effectiveness of the pilot projects, any projects
authorized by the commission must be authorized by December 31, 2009.
(c) By January 1, 2011, the commission shall provide a report to
the legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and
other relevant issues regarding automated traffic safety cameras
demonstrated by the projects.
(3) $2,670,000 of the highway safety account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for a target zero trooper pilot program, which the
commission shall develop and implement in collaboration with the
Washington state patrol. The pilot program must demonstrate the
effectiveness of intense, high visibility, driving under the influence
enforcement in Washington. The commission shall apply to the national
highway traffic safety administration for federal highway safety grants
to cover the cost of the pilot program. If the pilot program is
approved for funding by the national highway traffic safety
administration, and sufficient federal grants are received, the
commission shall provide grants to the Washington state patrol for the
purchase of twenty-one fully equipped patrol vehicles in fiscal year
2010, and up to twenty-four months of salaries and benefits for
eighteen troopers and three sergeants beginning in fiscal year 2011.
The legislature anticipates that an additional $1,830,000 will be
appropriated from the highway safety account--federal in the 2011-13
fiscal biennium to conclude this pilot program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,129,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,423,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,472,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,824,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,651,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,841,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for a comprehensive analysis, as stated in Senate Bill No. 5689, of
mid-term and long-term transportation funding mechanisms and methods.
Elements of the study will include existing data and trends, policy
objectives, performance and evaluation criteria, incremental transition
strategies, and possibly, scaled testing. Baseline data and methods
assessment must be concluded by December 31, 2009. Performance
criteria must be developed by June 30, 2010, and recommended planning
level alternative funding strategies must be completed by December 31,
2010.
(2) $600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for a continuation of the ferry study conducted during the 2007-09
fiscal biennium. The study must include the following:
(a) An analysis of employment issues regarding Washington state
ferries. The committee shall convene a work group, to include the
office of financial management's labor relations office, union
representatives, Washington state ferries representatives, and any
other applicable stakeholders approved by the cochairs to engage in the
analysis. The analysis must summarize the following issues for
consideration by the legislature during the 2010 legislative session:
(i) The collective bargaining process, and terms of collective
bargaining agreements and other items regarding the relationship
between the department of transportation and ferry union employees;
(ii) Terms of collective bargaining agreements that will allow more
efficient operations of Washington state ferries; and
(iii) The role of the marine employees commission; and
(b) Recommendations to the legislature on the following items, to
be due by December 15, 2010, except that recommendations on the
reservation system under (b)(vi) of this subsection must be completed
by December 15, 2009:
(i) A ferry vessel procurement process;
(ii) A ferry vessel maintenance, preservation, and improvement
program;
(iii) Using a third party to manage the design and construction of
new vessels;
(iv) The establishment of a vessel replacement fund;
(v) Third-party project management of major terminal preservation
and improvement projects over fifty million dollars;
(vi) A reservation system and electronic fare system; and
(vii) Project budgeting for terminal projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,237,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,349,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for consultant support services to assist the
commission in updating the statewide transportation plan. The updated
plan must be submitted to the legislature by December 1, 2010.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium,
the transportation commission shall periodically review and, if
necessary, modify the schedule of fares for the Washington state ferry
system. The transportation commission may increase ferry fares,
except no fare schedule modifications may be made prior to September 1,
2009. The commission may only approve ferry fare rate changes that
have the same proportionate change for passengers as for vehicles. The
commission shall work with the Washington state ferries to establish
the administrative policies and infrastructure necessary to support the
imposition of a ferry fare fuel surcharge beginning July 1, 2013. For
purposes of this subsection, "modify" includes increases or decreases
to the schedule.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium,
the transportation commission shall establish, periodically review,
and, if necessary, modify a schedule of toll charges applicable to the
state route number 167 high occupancy toll lane pilot project, as
required under RCW 47.56.403. For purposes of this subsection,
"modify" includes increases or decreases to the schedule.
(4) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium,
the transportation commission shall periodically review and, if
necessary, modify the schedule of toll charges applicable to the Tacoma
Narrows bridge, taking into consideration the recommendations of the
citizen advisory committee created under RCW 47.46.091. For purposes
of this subsection, "modify" includes increases or decreases to the
schedule.
(5) The commission may name state ferry vessels consistent with its
authority to name state transportation facilities under RCW 47.01.420.
When naming or renaming state ferry vessels, the commission shall
consider selling the naming rights and shall make recommendations to
the legislature regarding this option.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $695,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The freight mobility strategic investment
board shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status reports to the office
of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature on the delivery of projects funded by this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD
OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,024,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,602,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the office of financial
management and transportation committees of the legislature by
September 30th of each year.
(3) The Washington state patrol shall discuss the implementation of
the pilot program described under section 219(3) of this act with any
union representing the affected employees.
(4) The Washington state patrol shall assign necessary personnel
and equipment to implement and operate the pilot program described
under section 219(3) of this act using the portion of the automated
traffic safety camera fines deposited into the state patrol highway
account, but not to exceed $370,000. If the fines deposited into the
state patrol highway account from automated traffic safety camera
infractions do not reach $370,000, the department of transportation
shall remit funds necessary to the Washington state patrol to ensure
the completion of the pilot program.
(5) Within existing resources, the Washington state patrol shall
make every reasonable effort to increase the enrollment in each academy
class that commences during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium to fifty-five
cadets.
(6) The Washington state patrol shall collaborate with the
Washington traffic safety commission to develop and implement the
target zero trooper pilot program referenced in section 201(3) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,563,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,371,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,379,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall work with the risk management
division in the office of financial management in compiling the
Washington state patrol's data for establishing the agency's risk
management insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office
of financial management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a
report to the legislative transportation committees by December 31st of
each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to be paid, method
of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(2) $8,673,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
automobile fuel in the 2009-11 fiscal biennium.
(3) $8,638,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(4) $5,254,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for highway
purposes.
(5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for the
purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the Washington
state patrol.
(6) The Washington state patrol may submit information technology-related requests for funding only if the patrol has coordinated with
the department of information services as required under section 601 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- CRIMINAL
HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECKS. In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and
chapter 43.43 RCW, the Washington state patrol is authorized to perform
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies and
nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records
resulting from these activities. The Washington state patrol is
required to charge a fee for these activities, for which it is the
policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover the direct and
indirect costs of performing the criminal history and background checks
and disseminating the information. For each type of criminal history
and background check and dissemination of these records, the Washington
state patrol shall, as nearly as practicable, set fees at levels
sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees if the increases are necessary to fully fund
the cost of supervision and regulation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,373,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $837,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,053,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Highway Safety Account -- Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,805,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $242,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,867,000
Washington State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000
Ignition Interlock Device Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,908,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) By November 1, 2009, the department of licensing, working
with the department of revenue, shall analyze and plan for the transfer
by July 1, 2010, of the administration of fuel taxes imposed under
chapters 82.36, 82.38, 82.41, and 82.42 RCW and other provisions of law
from the department of licensing to the department of revenue. By
November 1, 2009, the departments shall report findings and
recommendations to the governor and the transportation and fiscal
committees of the legislature.
(b) The analysis and planning directed under this subsection must
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(i) Outreach to and solicitation of comment from parties affected
by the fuel taxes, including taxpayers, industry associations, state
and federal agencies, and Indian tribes, and from the transportation
and fiscal committees of the legislature;
(ii) Identification and analysis of relevant factors including, but
not limited to:
(A) Taxpayer reporting and payment processes;
(B) The international fuel tax agreement;
(C) Proportional registration under the provisions of the
international registration plan and chapter 46.87 RCW;
(D) Computer systems;
(E) Best management practices and efficiencies;
(F) Costs; and
(G) Personnel matters;
(iii) Development of recommended actions to accomplish the
transfer; and
(iv) An implementation plan and schedule.
(c) The report must include draft legislation, which transfers
administration of fuel taxes as described under (a) of this subsection
to the department of revenue on July 1, 2010, and amends existing law
as needed.
(2) $55,845,431 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the driver examining program. The department
shall not close any licensing service offices other than the following
anticipated closures: (a) Auburn; (b) Bellevue; (c) Bothell; (d) East
Seattle; (e) Greenwood; (f) Othello; and (g) West Tacoma. The
department shall, on a quarterly basis, report to the transportation
committees of the legislature the following monthly data by licensing
service office locations: (a) Lease costs; (b) salary and benefit
costs; (c) other expenditures; (d) FTEs; (e) number of transactions
completed, by type of transaction; and (f) office hours. The
department may begin a pilot project of no more than five kiosks.
(3) $11,688,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for costs associated with: Issuing enhanced
drivers' licenses and identicards at the thirteen operating enhanced
licensing services offices; extended hours at those licensing services
offices; cross-border tourism education; and other education campaigns.
This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.
(4) $2,490,000 of the ignition interlock device revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to assist
indigent persons with the costs of installing, removing, and leasing
the device, and applicable licensing pursuant to RCW 46.68.340.
(5) By December 31, 2009, the department shall report to the office
of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature a cost-benefit analysis of leasing versus purchasing field
office equipment.
(6) By December 31, 2009, the department shall submit to the office
of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature draft legislation that rewrites RCW 46.52.130 (driving
record abstracts) in plain language.
(7) The department may seek federal funds to implement a driver's
license and identicard biometric matching system pilot program to
verify the identity of applicants for, and holders of, drivers'
licenses and identicards. If funds are received, the department shall
report any benefits or problems identified during the course of the
pilot program to the transportation committees of the legislature upon
the completion of the program.
(8) The department may submit information technology-related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required under section 601 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B
High Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,867,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $585,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,358,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,810,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall make detailed
quarterly expenditure reports available to the transportation
commission and to the public on the department's web site using current
department resources. The reports must include a summary of revenue
generated by tolls on the Tacoma Narrows bridge and an itemized
depiction of the use of that revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,675,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,811,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,676,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,765,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall consult with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to: (a) Ensure
that the department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems; and
(b) when possible, use or develop common statewide information systems
to encourage coordination and integration of information used by the
department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
(2) The department shall provide updated information on six project
milestones for all active projects, funded in part or in whole with
2005 transportation partnership account funds or 2003 nickel account
funds, on a quarterly basis in the transportation executive information
system (TEIS). The department shall also provide updated information
on six project milestones for projects, funded with preexisting funds
and that are agreed to by the legislature, office of financial
management, and the department, on a quarterly basis in TEIS.
(3) $1,216,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation and $1,216,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation are provided solely for the department to
develop a project management and reporting system which is a collection
of integrated tools for capital construction project managers to use to
perform all the necessary tasks associated with project management.
The department shall integrate commercial off-the-shelf software with
existing department systems and enhanced approaches to data management
to provide web-based access for multi-level reporting and improved
business workflows and reporting. On a quarterly basis, the department
shall report to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature on the status of the
development and integration of the system. At a minimum, the reports
shall indicate the status of the work as it compares to the work plan,
any discrepancies, and proposed adjustments necessary to bring the
project back on schedule or budget if necessary.
(4) The department may submit information technology-related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required under section 601 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION --
FACILITY MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS AND CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,501,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,009,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,159,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $50,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is a
reappropriation provided solely to pay any outstanding obligations of
the aviation planning council, which expires July 1, 2009.
(2) $150,000 of the aeronautics account--state appropriation is a
reappropriation provided solely to complete runway preservation
projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,032,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,982,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $750,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to begin compliance with new storm water permit
requirements mandated by the department of ecology.
(2) $100,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation and $100,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation are provided solely to the department to
transition the roles and responsibilities of the statewide project
management group consultants to the department. The department shall
provide an updated copy of the capital construction strategic plan to
the legislative transportation committees and to the office of
financial management on June 30, 2009, and each year thereafter. The
department shall coordinate its work with other budget and performance
efforts, including Roadmap, the findings of the critical applications
modernization and integration strategies study, including proposed next
steps, and the priorities of government process.
(3) The department shall develop a plan for all current and future
surplus property parcels based on the recommendations from the surplus
property legislative work group that were presented to the senate
transportation committee on February 26, 2009. The plan must include,
at a minimum, strategies for maximizing the number of parcels sold, a
schedule that optimizes proceeds, a recommended cash discount, a plan
to report to the joint transportation committee, a recommendation for
regional incentives, and a recommendation for equivalent value
exchanges. This plan must accompany the department's 2010 supplemental
budget request.
(4) The appropriations in this section reflect a reduction of
department administrative costs and the more efficient use of
department resources, resulting from the regional realignment
identified in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5682.
(5) The legislature recognizes that the Dryden pit site (WSDOT
Inventory Control (IC) No. 2-04-00103) is unused state-owned real
property under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation,
and that the public would benefit significantly from the complete
enjoyment of the natural scenic beauty and recreational opportunities
available at the site. Therefore, pursuant to RCW 47.12.080, the
legislature declares that transferring the property to the department
of fish and wildlife is consistent with the public interest in order to
preserve the area for the use of the public. The department of
transportation shall transfer and convey the Dryden pit site to the
department of fish and wildlife for adequate consideration in the
amount of $600,000, the proceeds of which must be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $815,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to develop and
implement public private partnerships at high priority terminals as
identified in the January 12, 2009, final report on joint development
opportunities at Washington state ferries terminals. The department
shall first consider a mutually beneficial agreement at the Edmonds
terminal.
(2) $50,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to investigate the potential to
generate revenue from web site sponsorships and similar ventures and,
if feasible, pursue partnership opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,799,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,596,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is for unanticipated federal funds that may be received during the
2009-11 fiscal biennium. Upon receipt of the funds, the department
shall provide a report on the use of the funds to the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management.
(5) The department may incur costs related to the maintenance of
the decorative lights on the Tacoma Narrows bridge only if:
(a) The nonprofit corporation, narrows bridge lights organization,
maintains an account balance sufficient to reimburse the department for
all costs; and
(b) The department is reimbursed from the narrows bridge lights
organization within three months from the date any maintenance work is
performed. If the narrows bridge lights organization is unable to
reimburse the department for any future costs incurred, the lights must
be removed at the expense of the narrows bridge lights organization
subject to the terms of the contract.
(6) The department may work with the department of corrections to
utilize corrections crews for the purposes of litter pickup on state
highways.
(7) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for increased asphalt costs. If Senate Bill No. 5976
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(8) $16,800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for high priority maintenance backlog. Addressing
the maintenance backlog must result in increased levels of service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,699,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,050,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $127,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $346,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to continue a pilot tow truck
incentive program and to expand the program to other areas of the
state. The department may provide incentive payments to towing
companies that meet clearance goals on accidents that involve heavy
trucks. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature on the
effectiveness of the clearance goals and submit recommendations to
improve the pilot program with the department's 2010 supplemental
budget submittal.
(2) $2,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for low-cost enhancements. The department shall give
priority to low-cost enhancement projects that improve safety or
provide congestion relief. The department shall prioritize low-cost
enhancement projects on a statewide rather than regional basis. By
September 1st of each even-numbered year, the department shall provide
a report to the legislature listing all low-cost enhancement projects
prioritized on a statewide rather than regional basis completed in the
prior year.
(3) The department, in consultation with the Washington state
patrol, may continue a pilot program for the patrol to issue
infractions based on information from automated traffic safety cameras
in roadway construction zones on state highways when workers are
present. The department shall use the following guidelines to
administer the program:
(a) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle;
(b) The department shall plainly mark the locations where the
automated traffic safety cameras are used by placing signs on locations
that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a roadway
construction zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated
traffic safety camera;
(c) Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner
of a vehicle within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;
(d) The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation
if the owner of the vehicle, within fourteen days of receiving
notification of the violation, mails to the patrol, a declaration under
penalty of perjury, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time,
stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than
the registered owner, or any other extenuating circumstances;
(e) For purposes of the 2009-11 fiscal biennium pilot program,
infractions detected through the use of automated traffic safety
cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the
use of automated traffic safety cameras must be processed in the same
manner as parking infractions for the purposes of RCW 3.50.100,
35.20.220, 46.16.216, and 46.20.270(3). However, the amount of the
fine issued under this subsection (3) for an infraction generated
through the use of an automated traffic safety camera is one hundred
thirty-seven dollars. The court shall remit thirty-two dollars of the
fine to the state treasurer for deposit into the state patrol highway
account; and
(f) If a notice of infraction is sent to the registered owner and
the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction must be
dismissed against the business if it mails to the patrol, within
fourteen days of receiving the notice, a declaration under penalty of
perjury of the name and known mailing address of the individual driving
or renting the vehicle when the infraction occurred. If the business
is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the
time the infraction occurred, the business must sign a declaration
under penalty of perjury to this effect. The declaration must be
mailed to the patrol within fourteen days of receiving the notice of
traffic infraction. Timely mailing of this declaration to the issuing
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
section for the notice of infraction. A declaration form suitable for
this purpose must be included with each automated traffic infraction
notice issued, along with instructions for its completion and use.
(4) The department shall implement a pilot project to evaluate the
benefits of using electronic traffic flagging devices. Electronic
traffic flagging devices must be tested by the department at multiple
sites and reviewed for efficiency and safety. The department shall
report to the transportation committees of the legislature on the best
use and practices involving electronic traffic flagging devices,
including recommendations for future use, by June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,153,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $973,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,156,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,324,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,116,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $696,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,045,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the costs to develop an electronic map-based
computer application that will enable law enforcement officers and
others to more easily locate collisions and other incidents in the
field.
(2) The department shall work with the department of ecology, the
county road administration board, and the transportation improvement
board to develop model procedures, and municipal and state rules, to
maximize the use of permeable concrete and asphalt on road construction
and preservation projects. The department shall report to the joint
transportation committee by December 1, 2009, with recommendations that
will increase the use of permeable concrete and asphalt at the state
and local level, and reduce the need for more costly alternative
methods of storm water mitigation.
(3) The department shall, to the greatest extent practicable,
maximize the use of recycled concrete and asphalt on road construction
and preservation projects. The department shall report to the joint
transportation committee by December 1, 2010, regarding the use of
recycled concrete and asphalt. The report must include, at a minimum,
how much recycled concrete and asphalt was used and the resulting cost
savings to the state.
(4) The appropriations in this section reflect a reduction of
department administrative costs and the more efficient use of
department resources, resulting from the regional realignment
identified in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5682.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,331,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $561,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,292,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of financial management must provide a detailed
accounting of the revenues and expenditures of the self- insurance fund
to the transportation committees of the legislature on December 31st
and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,639,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $937,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,060,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,347,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,418,000
(f) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $623,000
(g) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,008,000
(h) FOR USE OF FINANCIAL AND REPORTING SYSTEMS
PROVIDED BY THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000
(i) FOR POLICY AND SYSTEM ASSISTANCE FROM THE
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,980,000
(j) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,526,000
(k) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR THE SECOND PHASE OF THE BOLDT
LITIGATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $672,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V
Regional Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,248,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,765,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,582,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,622,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2007 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2007" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2007 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $7,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools or replace vans; and (b)
incentives for employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant
program for public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no
operating costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding
under this grant program. No additional employees may be hired from
the funds provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and
supplanting of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed.
Additional criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds
other than state funds.
(4) $40,000,000 of the regional mobility grant program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the regional mobility grant
projects identified on the LEAP Transportation Document 2009-B, as
developed March 23, 2009. The department shall review all projects
receiving grant awards under this program at least semiannually to
determine whether the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any
project that has been awarded funds, but does not report activity on
the project within one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by
the department to determine whether the grant should be terminated.
The department shall promptly close out grants when projects have been
completed, and any remaining funds available to the office of transit
mobility shall be used only to fund projects on the LEAP Transportation
Document 2009-B, as developed March 23, 2009. The department shall
provide annual status reports on December 15, 2009, and December 15,
2010, to the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the legislature regarding the projects receiving the
grants. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate funds
through the regional mobility grant program only for projects that will
be completed on schedule.
(5) $3,318,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation and $21,248,000 of the regional mobility grant program
account--state appropriation are reappropriated and provided solely for
the regional mobility grant projects identified on the LEAP
Transportation Document 2007-B, as developed April 20, 2007. The
department shall continue to review all projects receiving grant awards
under this program at least semiannually to determine whether the
projects are making satisfactory progress. The department shall
promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and any
remaining funds available to the office of transit mobility shall be
used only to fund projects on the LEAP Transportation Document 2007-B,
as developed April 20, 2007, or the LEAP Transportation Document
2009-B, as developed March 23, 2009. It is the intent of the
legislature to appropriate funds through the regional mobility grant
program only for projects that will be completed on schedule.
(6) $2,309,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(7) An affected urban growth area that has not previously
implemented a commute trip reduction program is exempt from the
requirements in RCW 70.94.527 if a solution to address the state
highway deficiency that exceeds the person hours of delay threshold has
been funded and is in progress during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium.
(8) Funds provided for the commute trip reduction program may also
be used for the growth and transportation efficiency center program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,905,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $52,463,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry vessel operating fuel
in the 2009-11 fiscal biennium.
(2) $1,100,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a marketing program. The
department shall present a marketing program proposal to the
transportation committees of the legislature during the 2010
legislative session before expending these funds.
(3) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(4) The department shall significantly reduce the number of
injuries suffered by Washington state ferries employees. By December
15, 2009, the department shall submit to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature its
implementation plan to reduce such injuries.
(5) When purchasing uniforms that are required by collective
bargaining agreements, the department shall contract with the lowest
cost provider.
(6) The department shall prepare and submit a zero-based budget
proposal of the operating ferries program for the 2011-13 fiscal
biennium.
(7) As a priority task, the Washington state ferries is directed to
propose a comprehensive incident and accident investigation policy and
appropriate procedures, and to provide the proposal to the legislature
by November 1, 2009, using existing resources and staff expertise. In
addition to consulting with ferry system unions and the United States
coast guard, the Washington state ferries is encouraged to solicit
independent outside expertise on incident and accident investigation
best practices as they may be found in other organizations with a
similar concern for marine safety. The proposed policy must contain,
at a minimum:
(a) The definition of an incident and an accident and the type of
investigation that is required by both types of events;
(b) The process for appointing an investigating officer or officers
and a description of the authorities and responsibilities of the
investigating officer or officers;
(c) The process of working with the affected employee or employees
in accordance with the employee's or employees' respective collective
bargaining agreement and the appropriate union officials, within
protocols afforded to all public employees;
(d) The process by which the United States coast guard is kept
informed of, interacts with, and reviews the investigation;
(e) The process for review, approval, and implementation of any
approved recommendations within the department; and
(f) The process for keeping the public informed of the
investigation and its outcomes, in compliance with any affected
employee's or employees' respective collective bargaining agreement and
state laws and rules regarding public disclosure under chapter 42.56
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y--OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,933,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $29,091,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service contract and
Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and maintaining
the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon completion of the
rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the department shall
provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(2) Amtrak Cascade runs may not be eliminated.
(3) The department shall begin planning for a third roundtrip
Cascades train between Seattle and Vancouver, B.C. by 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,739,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,567,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,306,000

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- CAPITAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,126,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,626,000 is provided solely for the following minor works
projects: $450,000 for academy roofs; $318,000 for academy drive
course repairs; $150,000 for HVAC controls replacement; $168,000 for
upgrades to scales; $50,000 for Bellevue electrical equipment upgrades;
$90,000 for South King detachment window replacement; $200,000 for
replacement of the Naselle tower, shelter, and fence; and $200,000 for
unforeseen emergency repairs.
(2) $1,500,000 is provided solely for the construction of regional
waste water treatment systems for the Shelton academy of the Washington
state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,048,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,448,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,048,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
may be used for county ferry projects as developed pursuant to RCW
47.56.725(4).
(2) The appropriations in this section include funding to counties
to assist them in efforts to recover from federally declared
emergencies, by providing capitalization advances and local match for
federal emergency funding as determined by the county road
administration board. The county road administration board shall
specifically identify any such selected projects and shall include
information concerning such selected projects in its next annual report
to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,779,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,400,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,643,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $213,822,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account--state appropriation
includes up to $7,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
in RCW 47.26.500.
(2) The urban arterial trust account--state appropriation includes
up to $15,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.26.420.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,581,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $290,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for reconstruction of the Wandermere facility that was
destroyed in the 2008-09 winter storms.
(2) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for facilities maintenance backlog projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,703,910,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,489,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $485,506,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,496,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $807,817,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,422,000
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,163,429,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by fund, project, and
amount in LEAP Transportation Document 2009-1, Highway Improvement
Program (I), as developed March 30, 2009. However, limited transfers
of specific line-item project appropriations may occur between projects
for those amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in
section 603 of this act.
(2) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a
record of decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that
project impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as
practicable to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the state route 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any
such impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(3) As required under section 305(6), chapter 518, Laws of 2007,
the department shall report by January 2010 to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the findings of the King county noise
reduction solutions pilot project.
(4) Funding allocated for mitigation costs is provided solely for
the purpose of project impact mitigation, and shall not be used to
develop or otherwise participate in the environmental assessment
process.
(5) For highway construction projects where the department
considers agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance, as
defined in RCW 36.70A.030, in reviewing and selecting sites to meet
environmental mitigation requirements under the national environmental
policy act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and the state environmental
policy act (chapter 43.21C RCW), the department shall, to the greatest
extent possible, consider using public land first. If public lands are
not available that meet the required environmental mitigation needs,
the department may use other sites while making every effort to avoid
any net loss of agricultural lands that have a designation of long-term
commercial significance.
(6) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 520, Columbia river
crossing, and Alaskan Way viaduct projects.
(7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2009, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each active project funded in part or
whole by the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) or the
transportation partnership account. Funding provided at a programmatic
level for transportation partnership account and transportation 2003
account (nickel account) projects relating to bridge rail, guard rail,
fish passage barrier removal, and roadside safety projects should be
reported on a programmatic basis. Projects within this programmatic
level funding should be completed on a priority basis and scoped to be
completed within the current programmatic budget. Other projects may
be reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall work with
the office of financial management and the transportation committees of
the legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements
must include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and
costs, and must be developed according to an earned value method of
project monitoring. The department shall also provide the information
required under this subsection on a quarterly basis via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(8) Within the amounts provided in this section, $1,500,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for
necessary work along the south side of SR 532, identified as project
number 053255C in the LEAP transportation document described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(9) The department shall apply for the competitive portion of
federal transit administration funds for eligible transit-related costs
of the SR 520 bridge replacement and HOV project and the Columbia river
crossing project. The federal funds described in this subsection shall
not include those federal transit administration funds distributed by
formula.
(10) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $747,568,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.
(11) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes up to $1,350,695,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(12) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
up to $11,558,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW
47.10.812.
(13) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$15,000,000 in bond proceeds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.
(14) The department must prepare a tolling study for the Columbia
river crossing project. While conducting the study, the department
must coordinate with the Oregon department of transportation to perform
the following activities:
(a) Evaluate the potential diversion of traffic from Interstate 5
to other parts of the transportation system when tolls are implemented
on Interstate 5 in the vicinity of the Columbia river;
(b) Evaluate the most advanced tolling technology to maintain
travel time speed and reliability for users of the Interstate 5 bridge;
(c) Evaluate available active traffic management technology to
determine the most effective options for technology that could maintain
travel time speed and reliability on the Interstate 5 bridge;
(d) Confer with the project sponsor's council, as well as local and
regional governing bodies adjacent to the Interstate 5 Columbia river
crossing corridor and the Interstate 205 corridor regarding the
implementation of tolls, the impacts that the implementation of tolls
might have on the operation of the corridors, the diversion of traffic
to local streets, and potential mitigation measures;
(e) Regularly report to the Washington transportation commission
regarding the progress of the study for the purpose of guiding the
commission's potential toll setting on the facility;
(f) Research and evaluate options for a potential toll-setting
framework between the Oregon and Washington transportation commissions;
(g) Conduct public work sessions and open houses to provide
information to citizens, including users of the bridge and business and
freight interests, regarding implementation of tolls on the Interstate
5 and to solicit citizen views on the following items:
(i) Funding a portion of the Columbia river crossing project with
tolls;
(ii) Implementing variable tolling as a way to reduce congestion on
the facility; and
(iii) Tolling Interstate 205 separately as a management tool for
the broader state and regional transportation system; and
(h) Provide a report to the governor and the legislature by January
2010.
(15) $400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to conduct a state route number 2
route development plan that will identify essential improvements needed
between the port of Everett/Naval station and approaching the state
route number 9 interchange near the city of Snohomish.
(16)(a) By January 2010, the department must prepare a traffic and
revenue study for Interstate 405 in King county and Snohomish county
that includes funding for improvements and high occupancy toll lanes,
as defined in RCW 47.56.401, for traffic management. The department
must develop a plan to operate up to two high occupancy toll lanes in
each direction on Interstate 405.
(b) For the facility listed in (a) of this subsection, the
department must:
(i) Confer with the mayors and city councils of jurisdictions in
the vicinity of the project regarding the implementation of high
occupancy toll lanes and the impacts that the implementation of these
high occupancy toll lanes might have on the operation of the corridor
and adjacent local streets;
(ii) Conduct public work sessions and open houses to provide
information to citizens regarding implementation of high occupancy toll
lanes and to solicit citizen views;
(iii) Regularly report to the Washington transportation commission
regarding the progress of the study for the purpose of guiding the
commission's potential toll setting on the facility; and
(iv) Provide a report to the governor and the legislature by
January 2010.
(17) Within the amounts provided in this section, $38,000,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation is for
project 600010A, as identified in the LEAP transportation document in
subsection (1) of this section: NSC-North Spokane corridor design and
right-of-way - new alignment. Expenditure of these funds is for
preliminary engineering and right-of-way purchasing to prepare for four
lanes to be built from where existing construction ends at Francis
Avenue for three miles to the Spokane river.
(18) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for project 100224I, as identified in the LEAP
transportation document in subsection (1) of this section: US 2 high
priority safety project. Expenditure of these funds is for safety
projects on state route number 2 between Skykomish and Gold Bar, which
may include median rumble strips, traffic cameras, and electronic
message signs.
(19) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for improvements on SR 516 from Wax Road to 185th
Avenue.
(20) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the addition of a right turn lane to improve
visibility and traffic flow on US 195 at Cheney-Spokane Road.
(21) Project number 330215A in the LEAP transportation document
described in subsection (1) of this section is expanded to include
safety and congestion improvements from Key Peninsula Highway to Purdy
Vicinity. The department shall consult with the Washington traffic
safety commission to ensure that this project includes improvement at
intersections and along the roadway to reduce the frequency and
severity of collisions related to roadway conditions and traffic
congestion.
(22) The appropriations in this section reflect a reduction of
department administrative costs and the more efficient use of
department resources, resulting from the regional realignment
identified in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5682.
(23) Expenditures for the state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct
replacement project must be made in conformance with Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5768.
(24) Within the motor vehicle account--state appropriations in
programs I and P, the department may transfer funds between programs I
and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this section
and section 306 of this act.
(25) The department shall continue to work with the local partners
in developing transportation solutions necessary for the economic
growth in the Red Mountain American Viticulture Area of Benton county.
(26) If the SR 26 - Intersection and Illumination Improvements are
not completed by June 30, 2009, the department shall ensure that the
improvements are completed as soon as practicable after June 30, 2009,
and shall submit monthly progress reports on the improvements beginning
July 1, 2009.
(27) The department must prepare a comprehensive tolling study of
the state route number 167 corridor to determine the feasibility of
administering tolls within the corridor. The department shall
regularly report to the Washington transportation commission regarding
the progress of the study for the purpose of guiding the commission's
potential toll setting on the facility. The elements of the study must
include, at a minimum:
(a) The potential for value pricing to generate revenues for needed
transportation facilities within the corridor;
(b) Maximizing the efficient operation of the corridor; and
(c) Economic considerations for future system investments.
(28) The department shall conduct a public outreach process to
identify and respond to community concerns regarding the Belfair
bypass, including project costs. The department shall use this process
to consider and develop design alternatives that alter the project's
scope so that the community's needs are met within the project budget,
and preferably at costs below the current budget. The department shall
provide a report on the process and outcomes to the legislature by June
30, 2010.
(29) The legislature is committed to the funding and construction
of R8A in a timely manner, supporting the construction of Sound
Transit's East Link. The department shall complete the process of
negotiating the airspace lease with Sound Transit, including
appropriate and independent facility asset assessments required to
accommodate the use and funding of the I-90 center roadway for East
Link in support of East Link project milestones.
(30) $13,977,496 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is a reappropriation provided solely for project 850901F,
as identified in the LEAP transportation document in subsection (1) of
this section: SR 509/I-5 to Sea-Tac Freight & Congestion Relief.
However, this appropriation shall be reduced to reflect expenditures
previously made during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,688,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,531,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,097,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,417,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,237,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $723,470,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriation and the entire transportation partnership account
appropriation are provided solely for the projects and activities as
listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP Transportation Document
2009-1, Highway Preservation Program (P), as developed March 30, 2009.
However, limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations
may occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.
(2) $2,033,304 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $230,361 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for project 602110F, as identified in the LEAP
transportation document in subsection (1) of this section: SR
21/Keller ferry boat - replace ferry boat. The Keller ferry boat
replacement must consist of either a tug and barge or rehabilitation
work to the existing vessel and dock facilities after discussions with
members of the community and any affected tribal governments.
(3) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 520, Columbia river
crossing, and Alaskan Way viaduct projects.
(4) $6,500,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs associated with
the Murray Morgan/11th Street bridge demolition. The department may
negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of transferring
ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street bridge to the city. If the
city agrees to accept ownership of the bridge, the department may use
the Puyallup tribal settlement account appropriation and other
appropriated funds for bridge rehabilitation, bridge replacement,
bridge demolition, and related mitigation. The department's
participation may not exceed $39,953,000. Funds may not be expended
unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the bridge in its
entirety and provides that the payment of these funds extinguishes any
real or implied agreements regarding future bridge expenditures.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2009, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each active project funded in part or
whole by the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) or the
transportation partnership account. Funding provided at a programmatic
level for transportation partnership account projects relating to
seismic bridges should be reported on a programmatic basis. Projects
within this programmatic level funding should be completed on a
priority basis and scoped to be completed within the current
programmatic budget. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic
basis. The department shall work with the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature to
agree on report formatting and elements. Elements must include, but
not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs, and must be
developed according to an earned value method of project monitoring.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information systems (TEIS).
(6) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(7) Within the amounts provided in this section, $1,510,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely to
complete the rehabilitation of the SR 532/84th Ave NW bridge deck.
(8) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the environmental impact statement and
preliminary planning for the replacement of the SR 9 Snohomish river
bridge.
(9) The appropriations in this section reflect a reduction of
department administrative costs and the more efficient use of
department resources, resulting from the regional realignment
identified in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5682.
(10) The motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes up to
$15,000,000 in bond proceeds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.
(11) Within the motor vehicle account--state appropriations in
programs I and P, the department may transfer funds between programs I
and P, except for funds that are otherwise restricted in this section
and section 305 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,396,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,262,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,658,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,946,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,330,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,076,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,731,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $283,083,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $104,498,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation, $37,330,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--federal appropriation, $80,731,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and
$67,044,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation are provided solely for ferry capital projects, project
support, and administration as listed in LEAP Transportation Document
ALL PROJECTS 2009-2, Ferries Construction Program (W), as developed
March 30, 2009. Of the total appropriation, a maximum of $10,627,000
may be used for administrative support, a maximum of $8,184,000 may be
used for terminal project support, and a maximum of $4,497,000 may be
used for vessel project support.
(2) $67,044,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel
account)--state appropriation and $53,137,000 of the transportation
partnership account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
acquisition of four new Island Homes class ferry vessels subject to the
conditions and limitations in RCW 47.56.780, the first two of which
shall be placed on the Port Townsend-Keystone route. The department
shall add additional passenger capacity to two of these vessels to make
them more flexible within the system in the future, if doing so does
not require additional staffing on the vessels.
(3) $6,300,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for emergency capital costs.
(4) The Anacortes terminal may be replaced if additional federal
funds are sought and received by the department. If federal funds
received are not sufficient to replace the terminal, only usable,
discrete phases of the project, up to the amount of federal funds
received, may be constructed with the funds.
(5) $247,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to update the
vessel life-cycle cost model by December 31, 2009.
(6) The department shall provide to the office of financial
management and the legislature quarterly reports providing the status
on each project listed in this section and in the project lists
submitted pursuant to this act and on any additional projects for which
the department has expended funds during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium.
Elements must include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. The department shall also provide the information required
under this subsection via the transportation executive information
systems (TEIS). The quarterly report regarding the status of projects
identified on the list referenced in subsection (1) of this section
must be developed according to an earned value method of project
monitoring.
(7) $4,670,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for a
systemwide reservation system. The department shall complete a
predesign study and present the study to the joint transportation
committee by November 1, 2009. The department may not implement the
statewide reservation system unless the department is authorized to do
so in the 2010 supplemental omnibus transportation appropriations act.
(8) The Puget Sound capital construction account--state
appropriation includes up to $95,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
Essential Rail Assistance Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $675,000
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,416,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,054,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,226,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP
Transportation Document ALL PROJECTS 2009-2, Rail Capital Program (Y),
as developed March 30, 2009. However, limited transfers of specific
line-item project appropriations may occur between projects for those
amounts listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603
of this act.
(b)(i) Within the amounts provided in this section, $116,000 of the
transportation infrastructure account--state appropriation is for a
low-interest loan through the freight rail investment bank program to
the Port of Ephrata for rehabilitation of a rail spur.
(ii) Within the amounts provided in this section, $1,200,000 of the
transportation infrastructure account--state appropriation is for a
low-interest loan through the freight rail investment bank program to
the Port of Everett for a new rail track to connect a cement loading
facility to the mainline.
(iii) The department shall issue the loans referenced in this
subsection (1)(b) with a repayment period of no more than ten years,
and only so much interest as is necessary to recoup the department's
costs to administer the loans.
(c)(i) Within the amounts provided in this section, $1,712,022 of
the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation and $175,000
of the essential rail assistance account--state appropriation are for
statewide - emergent freight rail assistance projects as follows: Port
of Ephrata/Ephrata - additional spur rehabilitation (BIN 722710A)
$362,746; Tacoma Rail/Tacoma - new refinery spur tracks (BIN 711010A)
$420,000; CW Line/Lincoln County - grade crossing rehabilitation (BIN
700610A) $370,650; Clark County owned railroad/Vancouver - track
rehabilitation (BIN 710110A) $366,813; Tacoma Rail/Tacoma - improved
locomotive facility (BIN 711010B) $366,813.
(ii) Within the amounts provided in this section, $500,000 of the
essential rail assistance account--state appropriation and $25,000 of
the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation are for a
statewide - emergent freight rail assistance project grant for the
Tacoma Rail/Roy - new connection to BNSF and Yelm (BIN 711310A)
project, provided that the grantee first executes a written instrument
that imposes on the grantee the obligation to repay the grant within
thirty days in the event that the grantee discontinues or significantly
diminishes service along the line within a period of five years from
the date that the grant is awarded.
(iii) Within the amounts provided in this section, $337,978 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is for a
statewide - emergent freight rail assistance project grant for the
Lincoln County PDA/Creston - new rail spur (BIN 710510A) project,
provided that the grantee first documents to the satisfaction of the
department sufficient commitments from the new shipper or shippers to
locate in the publicly owned industrial park west of Creston to ensure
that the net present value of the public benefits of the project is
greater than the grant amount.
(d) Within the amounts provided in this section, $8,100,000 of the
transportation infrastructure account--state appropriation is for
grants to any intergovernmental entity or local rail district to which
the department of transportation assigns the management and oversight
responsibility for the business and economic development elements of
existing operating leases on the Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC)
rail lines. The PCC rail line system is made up of the CW, P&L, and PV
Hooper rail lines. Business and economic development elements include
such items as levels of service and business operating plans, but must
not include the state's oversight of railroad regulatory compliance,
rail infrastructure condition, or real property management issues. The
PCC rail system must be managed in a self-sustaining manner and best
efforts must be used to ensure that it does not require state capital
or operating subsidy beyond the level of state funding expended on it
to date. The assignment of the stated responsibilities to an
intergovernmental entity or rail district must be on terms and
conditions as the department of transportation and the
intergovernmental entity or rail district mutually agree. The grant
funds may be used only to refurbish the rail lines. It is the intent
of the legislature to make the funds appropriated in this section
available as grants to an intergovernmental entity or local rail
district for the purposes stated in this section at least until June
30, 2012, and to reappropriate as necessary any portion of the
appropriation in this section that is not used by June 30, 2011.
(2)(a) The department shall issue a call for projects for the
freight rail investment bank program and the emergent freight rail
assistance program, and shall evaluate the applications according to
the cost benefit methodology developed during the 2008 interim using
the legislative priorities specified in (c) of this subsection. By
November 1, 2010, the department shall submit a prioritized list of
recommended projects to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature.
(b) When the department identifies a prospective rail project that
may have strategic significance for the state, or at the request of a
proponent of a prospective rail project or a member of the legislature,
the department shall evaluate the prospective project according to the
cost benefit methodology developed during the 2008 interim using the
legislative priorities specified in (c) of this subsection. The
department shall report its cost benefit evaluation of the prospective
rail project, as well as the department's best estimate of an
appropriate construction schedule and total project costs, to the
office of financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature.
(c) The legislative priorities to be used in the cost benefit
methodology are, in order of relative importance:
(i) Economic, safety, or environmental advantages of freight
movement by rail compared to alternative modes;
(ii) Self-sustaining economic development that creates family-wage
jobs;
(iii) Preservation of transportation corridors that would otherwise
be lost;
(iv) Increased access to efficient and cost-effective transport to
market for Washington's agricultural and industrial products;
(v) Better integration and cooperation within the regional,
national, and international systems of freight distribution; and
(vi) Mitigation of impacts of increased rail traffic on
communities.
(3) The department is directed to seek the use of unprogrammed
federal rail crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in program Y.
(4) When the balance of that portion of the miscellaneous program
account apportioned to the department for the grain train program
reaches $1,180,000, the department shall acquire twenty-nine additional
grain train railcars.
(5) At the earliest possible date, the department shall apply, and
assist ports and local jurisdictions in applying, for any federal
funding that may be available for any projects that may qualify for
such federal funding. State projects must be (a) currently identified
on the project list referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this section or
(b) projects for which no state match is required to complete the
project. Local or port projects must not require additional state
funding in order to complete the project, with the exception of (c)
state funds currently appropriated for the project if currently
identified on the project list referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this
section or (d) potential grants awarded in the competitive grant
process for the essential rail assistance program. If the department
receives any federal funding, the department is authorized to obligate
and spend the federal funds in accordance with federal law. To the
extent permissible by federal law, federal funds may be used (e) in
addition to state funds appropriated for projects currently identified
on the project list referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this section in
order to advance funding from future biennia for such projects or (f)
in lieu of state funds; however, the state funds must be redirected
within the rail capital program to advance funding for other projects
currently identified on the project list referenced in subsection
(1)(a) of this section. State funds may be redirected only upon
consultation with the transportation committees of the legislature and
the office of financial management, and approval by the director of the
office of financial management. The department shall spend the federal
funds before the state funds, and shall consult the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature
regarding project scope changes.
(6) The department shall provide quarterly reports to the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature regarding applications that the department submits for
federal funds, the status of such applications, and the status of
projects identified on the list referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this
section. The quarterly report regarding the status of projects
identified on the list referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this section
must be developed according to an earned value method of project
monitoring.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,048,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,363,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,999,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,069,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,918,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,135,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,098,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,390,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $709,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,879,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,417,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists incorporated in this section. For projects funded by
new revenue in the 2003 and 2005 transportation packages, reporting
elements shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information system (TEIS).
(2) $2,879,000 of the passenger ferry account--state appropriation
is provided solely for near and long-term costs of capital improvements
in a business plan approved by the governor for passenger ferry
service.
(3) The department shall seek the use of unprogrammed federal rail
crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to state funds
for eligible costs of projects in local programs, program Z capital.
(4) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in local programs, program
Z capital.
(5) Federal funds may be transferred from program Z to programs I
and P and state funds shall be transferred from programs I and P to
program Z to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match.
Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect
project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be
allotted as appropriated in this act. The department may not transfer
funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of the
office of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2010.
(6) The city of Winthrop may utilize a design-build process for the
Winthrop bike path project. Of the amount appropriated in this section
for this project, $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is contingent upon the state receiving from the
city of Winthrop $500,000 in federal funds awarded to the city of
Winthrop by its local planning organization.
(7) $18,182,113 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation, $8,753,895 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, and $4,000,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the pedestrian and
bicycle safety program projects and safe routes to schools program
projects identified in LEAP Transportation Document 2009-A, pedestrian
and bicycle safety program projects and safe routes to schools program
projects, as developed March 23, 2009, LEAP Transportation Document
2007-A, pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects and safe routes
to schools program projects, as developed April 20, 2007, and LEAP
Transportation Document 2006-B, pedestrian and bicycle safety program
projects and safe routes to schools program projects, as developed
March 8, 2006. Projects must be allocated funding based on order of
priority. The department shall review all projects receiving grant
awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether
the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has
been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within
one year of the grant award must be reviewed by the department to
determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall
promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and
identify where unused grant funds remain because actual project costs
were lower than estimated in the grant award.
(8) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by fund, project, and amount in LEAP
Transportation Document ALL PROJECTS 2009-2, Local Program (Z), as
developed March 30, 2009.
(9) For the 2009-11 project appropriations, unless otherwise
provided in this act, the director of financial management may
authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects
managed by the freight mobility strategic investment board in order for
the board to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all
projects in the respective program.
(10) $500,000 of the freight mobility investment account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Myra Road at Dalles Road
Intersection Project (5LP071F).

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $688,557,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,770,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,961,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,790,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,998,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $466,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,766,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $142,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $769,532,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $675,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $374,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,000,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
$95,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and statutory transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $937,181,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,657,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 407 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- ADMINISTRATIVE
TRANSFERS
(1) Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,288,000
(2) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
(3) Recreational Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(4) License Plate Technology Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Highway Safety
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,750,000
(5) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(6) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,750,000
(7) Department of Licensing Services Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The amount transferred in
subsection (1) of this section represents repayment of operating loans
and reserve payments provided to the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account
from the motor vehicle account in the 2005-07 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 408 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to
the amounts appropriated in this act for revenue for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, and bond retirement and interest including ongoing
bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond
covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 409 The department of transportation is
authorized to undertake federal advance construction projects under the
provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to maintain progress in
meeting approved highway construction and preservation objectives. The
legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be required to
temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance
construction projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

COMPENSATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 COMPENSATION. The appropriations for
state agencies are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
State employee compensation adjustments will be provided in accordance
with funding adjustments provided in the 2009-2011 omnibus
appropriations act.

IMPLEMENTING PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.
(9) Transportation agencies that do not use all of the services of
the department of information services shall investigate opportunities
to achieve savings on information technology expenditures through: (a)
Holistic virtualization strategies; (b) wide-area network optimization
strategies; (c) replacement of traditional telephone communications
systems with alternative systems; and (d) migration of external voice
mail systems to internal voice mail systems coordinated by the agency.
These agencies shall consult with a systems integration firm in order
to assess the potential reduction in information technology
expenditures that can be achieved through the strategies identified in
this subsection. By July 1, 2010, these agencies shall report findings
to the office of financial management and the transportation committees
of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 MEGA-PROJECT REPORTING. Mega-projects are
defined as individual or groups of related projects that cost
$1,000,000,000 or more. These projects include, but are not limited
to: Alaskan Way viaduct, SR 520, SR 167, I-405, North Spokane
corridor, I-5 Tacoma HOV, I-90 Snoqualmie Pass, and the Columbia river
crossing. The department of transportation shall track mega-projects
and report the financial status and schedule of these projects at least
once a year to the transportation committees of the legislature and the
office of financial management. The design of mega-projects must be
evaluated considering cost, capacity, safety, mobility needs, and how
well the design of the facility fits within its urban environment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FUND TRANSFERS. (1) The transportation
2003 projects or improvements and the 2005 transportation partnership
projects or improvements are listed in LEAP Transportation Document
2009-1, which consists of a list of specific projects by fund source
and amount over a sixteen year period. Current fiscal biennium funding
for each project is a line item appropriation, while the outer year
funding allocations represent a sixteen year plan. The department is
expected to use the flexibility provided in this section to assist in
the delivery and completion of all transportation partnership account
and transportation 2003 (nickel) account projects on the LEAP lists
referenced in this act. For the 2009-11 project appropriations, unless
otherwise provided in this act, the director of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects
funded with transportation 2003 account (nickel account)
appropriations, transportation partnership account appropriations, or
multimodal transportation account appropriations, in order to manage
project spending and efficiently deliver all projects in the respective
program under the following conditions and limitations:
(a) Transfers may only be made within each specific fund source
referenced on the respective project list;
(b) Transfers from a project may not be made as a result of the
reduction of the scope of a project, nor shall a transfer be made to
support increases in the scope of a project;
(c) Each transfer between projects may only occur if the director
of financial management finds that any resulting change will not hinder
the completion of the projects as approved by the legislature;
(d) Transfers from a project may be made if the funds appropriated
to the project are in excess of the amount needed to complete the
project;
(e) Transfers may not occur to projects not identified on the
applicable project list; and
(f) Transfers may not be made while the legislature is in session.
(2) At the time the department submits a request to transfer funds
under this section a copy of the request shall be submitted to the
transportation committees of the legislature.
(3) The office of financial management shall work with legislative
staff of the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees to review the requested transfers.
(4) The office of financial management shall document approved
transfers and/or schedule changes in the transportation executive
information system (TEIS), compare changes to the legislative baseline
funding and schedules identified by project identification number
identified in the LEAP lists adopted in this act, and transmit revised
project lists to chairs of the transportation committees of the
legislature on a quarterly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 Executive Order number 05-05,
archaeological and cultural resources, was issued effective November
10, 2005. Agencies and higher education institutions that issue grants
or loans for capital projects shall comply with the requirements set
forth in this executive order.

MISCELLANEOUS 2009-11 FISCAL BIENNIUM
Sec. 701 RCW 46.68.170 and 2007 c 518 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the RV account.
All moneys hereafter deposited in said account shall be used by the
department of transportation for the construction, maintenance, and
operation of recreational vehicle sanitary disposal systems at safety
rest areas in accordance with the department's highway system plan as
prescribed in chapter 47.06 RCW. During the ((2005-2007 and 2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal ((biennia)) biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the RV account to the motor vehicle fund such amounts as
reflect the ((excess)) fund balance of the RV account to accomplish the
purposes identified in this section.

Sec. 702 RCW 47.29.170 and 2007 c 518 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting any unsolicited project proposals, the commission
must adopt rules to facilitate the acceptance, review, evaluation, and
selection of unsolicited project proposals. These rules must include
the following:
(1) Provisions that specify unsolicited proposals must meet
predetermined criteria;
(2) Provisions governing procedures for the cessation of
negotiations and consideration;
(3) Provisions outlining that unsolicited proposals are subject to
a two-step process that begins with concept proposals and would only
advance to the second step, which are fully detailed proposals, if the
commission so directed;
(4) Provisions that require concept proposals to include at least
the following information: Proposers' qualifications and experience;
description of the proposed project and impact; proposed project
financing; and known public benefits and opposition; and
(5) Provisions that specify the process to be followed if the
commission is interested in the concept proposal, which must include
provisions:
(a) Requiring that information regarding the potential project
would be published for a period of not less than thirty days, during
which time entities could express interest in submitting a proposal;
(b) Specifying that if letters of interest were received during the
thirty days, then an additional sixty days for submission of the fully
detailed proposal would be allowed; and
(c) Procedures for what will happen if there are insufficient
proposals submitted or if there are no letters of interest submitted in
the appropriate time frame.
The commission may adopt other rules as necessary to avoid
conflicts with existing laws, statutes, or contractual obligations of
the state.
The commission may not accept or consider any unsolicited proposals
before July 1, ((2009)) 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 To the extent that any appropriation
authorizes expenditures of state funds from the motor vehicle account,
special category C account, Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), transportation
partnership account, transportation improvement account, Puget Sound
capital construction account, multimodal transportation account, or
other transportation capital project account in the state treasury for
a state transportation program that is specified to be funded with
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in chapter 47.10 RCW, the
legislature declares that any such expenditures made prior to the issue
date of the applicable transportation bonds for that state
transportation program are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of
those transportation bonds in a maximum amount equal to the amount of
such appropriation.

Sec. 704 RCW 46.16.685 and 2007 c 518 s 704 are each amended to
read as follows:
The license plate technology account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts collected under RCW 46.01.140(4)(e)(ii) must be
deposited into this account. Expenditures from this account must
support current and future license plate technology and systems
integration upgrades for both the department and correctional
industries. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Additionally, the moneys in this account may be used to
reimburse the motor vehicle account for any appropriation made to
implement the digital license plate system. During the ((2007-2009))
2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
license plate technology account to the ((multimodal transportation))
highway safety account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
of the license plate technology account.

Sec. 705 RCW 47.01.390 and 2007 c 518 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Prior to commencing construction on either project, the
department of transportation must complete all of the following
requirements for both the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall
replacement project, and the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project: (a) In accordance with the national environmental
policy act, the department must designate the preferred alternative,
prepare a substantial project mitigation plan, and complete a
comprehensive cost estimate review using the department's cost estimate
validation process, for each project; (b) in accordance with all
applicable federal highway administration planning and project
management requirements, the department must prepare a project finance
plan for each project that clearly identifies secured and anticipated
fund sources, cash flow timing requirements, and project staging and
phasing plans if applicable; and (c) the department must report these
results for each project to the joint transportation committee.
(2) The requirements of this section shall not apply to (a) utility
relocation work, and related activities, on the Alaskan Way viaduct and
Seattle Seawall replacement project and (b) off-site pontoon
construction supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement
and HOV project.
(3) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply during the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium.

Sec. 706 RCW 88.16.090 and 2008 c 128 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may pilot any vessel subject to this chapter on waters
covered by this chapter only if licensed to pilot such vessels on such
waters under this chapter.
(2)(a) A person is eligible to be licensed as a pilot or a pilot
trainee if the person:
(i) Is a citizen of the United States;
(ii) Is over the age of twenty-five years and under the age of
seventy years;
(iii)(A) Holds at the time of application, as a minimum, a United
States government license as master of steam or motor vessels of not
more than one thousand six hundred gross register tons (three thousand
international tonnage convention tons) upon oceans, near coastal
waters, or inland waters; or the then most equivalent federal license
as determined by the board; any such license to have been held by the
applicant for a period of at least two years before application;
(B) Holds at the time of licensure as a pilot, after successful
completion of the board-required training program, a first class United
States endorsement without restrictions on the United States government
license for the pilotage district in which the pilot applicant desires
to be licensed; however, all applicants for a pilot examination
scheduled to be given before July 1, 2008, must have the United States
pilotage endorsement at the time of application; and
(C) The board may require that applicants and pilots have federal
licenses and endorsements as it deems appropriate; and
(iv) Successfully completes a board-specified training program.
(b) In addition to the requirements of (a) of this subsection, a
pilot applicant must meet such other qualifications as may be required
by the board.
(c) A person applying for a license under this section shall not
have been convicted of an offense involving drugs or the personal
consumption of alcohol in the twelve months prior to the date of
application. This restriction does not apply to license renewals under
this section.
(3) The board may establish such other training license and pilot
license requirements as it deems appropriate.
(4) Pilot applicants shall be evaluated and may be ranked for entry
into a board-specified training program in a manner specified by the
board based on their performance on a written examination or
examinations established by the board, performance on other evaluation
exercises as may be required by the board, and other criteria or
qualifications as may be set by the board.
When the board determines that the demand for pilots requires entry
of an applicant into the training program it shall issue a training
license to that applicant, but under no circumstances may an applicant
be issued a training license more than four years after taking the
written entry examination. The training license authorizes the trainee
to do such actions as are specified in the training program.
After the completion of the training program the board shall
evaluate the trainee's performance and knowledge. The board, as it
deems appropriate, may then issue a pilot license, delay the issuance
of the pilot license, deny the issuance of the pilot license, or
require further training and evaluation.
(5) The board may (a) appoint a special independent committee or
(b) contract with private or governmental entities knowledgeable and
experienced in the development, administration, and grading of
licensing examinations or simulator evaluations for marine pilots, or
(c) do both. Active, licensed pilots designated by the board may
participate in the development, administration, and grading of
examinations and other evaluation exercises. If the board does appoint
a special examination or evaluation development committee, it is
authorized to pay the members of the committee the same compensation
and travel expenses as received by members of the board. Any person
who willfully gives advance knowledge of information contained on a
pilot examination or other evaluation exercise is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
(6) This subsection applies to the review of a pilot applicant's
written examinations and evaluation exercises to qualify to be placed
on a waiting list to become a pilot trainee. Failure to comply with
the process set forth in this subsection renders the results of the
pilot applicant's written examinations and evaluation exercises final.
A pilot applicant may seek board review, administrative review, and
judicial review of the results of the written examinations and
evaluation exercises in the following manner:
(a) A pilot applicant who seeks a review of the results of his or
her written examinations or evaluation exercises must request from the
board-appointed or board-designated examination committee an
administrative review of the results of his or her written examinations
or evaluation exercises as set forth by board rule.
(b) The determination of the examination committee's review of a
pilot applicant's examination results becomes final after thirty days
from the date of service of written notification of the committee's
determination unless a full adjudicative hearing before an
administrative law judge has been requested by the pilot applicant
before the thirty-day period has expired, as set forth by board rule.
(c) When a full adjudicative hearing has been requested by the
pilot applicant, the board shall request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 34.12 RCW who has sufficient
experience and familiarity with pilotage matters to be able to conduct
a fair and impartial hearing. The hearing shall be governed by chapter
34.05 RCW. The administrative law judge shall issue an initial order.
(d) The initial order of the administrative law judge is final
unless within thirty days of the date of service of the initial order
the board or pilot applicant requests review of the initial order under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(e) The board may appoint a person to review the initial order and
to prepare and enter a final order as governed by chapter 34.05 RCW and
as set forth by board rule. The person appointed by the board under
this subsection (6)(e) is called the board reviewing officer.
(7) Pilots are licensed under this section for a term of five years
from and after the date of the issuance of their respective state
licenses. Licenses must thereafter be renewed as a matter of course,
unless the board withholds the license for good cause. Each pilot
shall pay to the state treasurer an annual license fee in an amount set
by the board by rule. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the fees established
under this subsection may be increased ((in excess of the fiscal growth
factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055)) through the fiscal year ending
June 30, ((2009)) 2011. The fees must be deposited in the pilotage
account. The board may assess partially active or inactive pilots a
reduced fee.
(8) All pilots and pilot trainees are subject to an annual physical
examination by a physician chosen by the board. The physician shall
examine the pilot's or pilot trainee's heart, blood pressure,
circulatory system, lungs and respiratory system, eyesight, hearing,
and such other items as may be prescribed by the board. After
consultation with a physician and the United States coast guard, the
board shall establish minimum health standards to ensure that pilots
and pilot trainees licensed by the state are able to perform their
duties. Within ninety days of the date of each annual physical
examination, and after review of the physician's report, the board
shall make a determination of whether the pilot or pilot trainee is
fully able to carry out the duties of a pilot or pilot trainee under
this chapter. The board may in its discretion check with the
appropriate authority for any convictions of or information regarding
offenses by a licensed pilot or pilot trainee involving drugs or the
personal consumption of alcohol in the prior twelve months.
(9) The board may require vessel simulator training for a pilot
trainee and shall require vessel simulator training for a licensed
pilot subject to RCW 88.16.105. The board shall also require vessel
simulator training in the first year of active duty for a new pilot and
at least once every five years for all active pilots.
(10) The board shall prescribe, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, such
reporting requirements and review procedures as may be necessary to
assure the accuracy and validity of license and service claims.
Willful misrepresentation of such required information by a pilot
applicant shall result in disqualification of the pilot applicant.

Sec. 707 RCW 47.12.244 and 2007 c 518 s 707 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the "advance right-of-way revolving fund" in the
custody of the treasurer, into which the department is authorized to
deposit directly and expend without appropriation:
(1) An initial deposit of ten million dollars from the motor
vehicle fund included in the department of transportation's 1991-93
budget;
(2) All moneys received by the department as rental income from
real properties that are not subject to federal aid reimbursement,
except moneys received from rental of capital facilities properties as
defined in chapter 47.13 RCW; and
(3) Any federal moneys available for acquisition of right-of-way
for future construction under the provisions of section 108 of Title
23, United States Code.
(((4))) During the ((2007-09)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
((legislature may transfer)) department shall transfer fourteen million
dollars from the advance right-of-way revolving fund to the motor
vehicle account ((amounts as reflect)), which reflects the excess fund
balance of the advance right-of-way revolving fund.

Sec. 708 RCW 46.16.725 and 2008 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The creation of the board does not in any way preclude the
authority of the legislature to independently propose and enact special
license plate legislation.
(2) The board must review and either approve or reject special
license plate applications submitted by sponsoring organizations.
(3) Duties of the board include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Review and approve the annual financial reports submitted by
sponsoring organizations with active special license plate series and
present those annual financial reports to the senate and house
transportation committees;
(b) Report annually to the senate and house transportation
committees on the special license plate applications that were
considered by the board;
(c) Issue approval and rejection notification letters to sponsoring
organizations, the department, the chairs of the senate and house of
representatives transportation committees, and the legislative sponsors
identified in each application. The letters must be issued within
seven days of making a determination on the status of an application;
(d) Review annually the number of plates sold for each special
license plate series created after January 1, 2003. The board may
submit a recommendation to discontinue a special plate series to the
chairs of the senate and house of representatives transportation
committees;
(e) Provide policy guidance and directions to the department
concerning the adoption of rules necessary to limit the number of
special license plates that an organization or a governmental entity
may apply for.
(4) Except as provided in chapter 72, Laws of 2008, in order to
assess the effects and impact of the proliferation of special license
plates, the legislature declares a temporary moratorium on the issuance
of any additional plates until July 1, ((2009)) 2011. During this
period of time, the special license plate review board created in RCW
46.16.705 and the department of licensing are prohibited from
accepting, reviewing, processing, or approving any applications.
Additionally, no special license plate may be enacted by the
legislature during the moratorium, unless the proposed license plate
has been approved by the board before February 15, 2005.

Sec. 709 RCW 46.68.060 and 2007 c 518 s 714 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as
the highway safety fund to the credit of which shall be deposited all
moneys directed by law to be deposited therein. This fund shall be
used for carrying out the provisions of law relating to driver
licensing, driver improvement, financial responsibility, cost of
furnishing abstracts of driving records and maintaining such case
records, and to carry out the purposes set forth in RCW 43.59.010.
During the ((2005-2007 and 2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal ((biennia))
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the highway safety fund to
the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation account such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the highway safety fund.

Sec. 710 RCW 46.63.170 and 2007 c 372 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The use of automated traffic safety cameras for issuance of
notices of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an
ordinance allowing for their use to detect one or more of the
following: Stoplight, railroad crossing, or school speed zone
violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain the
restrictions described in this section and provisions for public notice
and signage. Cities and counties using automated traffic safety
cameras before July 24, 2005, are subject to the restrictions described
in this section, but are not required to enact an authorizing
ordinance.
(b) Use of automated traffic safety cameras is restricted to two-arterial intersections, railroad crossings, and school speed zones
only.
(c) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, automated traffic safety
cameras may be used to detect speed violations for the purposes of
section 201(2) of this act if the local legislative authority first
enacts an ordinance authorizing the use of cameras to detect speed
violations.
(d) Automated traffic safety cameras may only take pictures of the
vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while an infraction is
occurring. The picture must not reveal the face of the driver or of
passengers in the vehicle.
(((d))) (e) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered
owner of the vehicle within fourteen days of the violation, or to the
renter of a vehicle within fourteen days of establishing the renter's
name and address under subsection (3)(a) of this section. The law
enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with
it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by an
automated traffic safety camera, stating the facts supporting the
notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie
evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding
charging a violation under this chapter. The photographs,
microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be
available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to
adjudicate the liability for the infraction. A person receiving a
notice of infraction based on evidence detected by an automated traffic
safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.
(((e))) (f) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for an
infraction under RCW 46.63.030(1)(e) unless the registered owner
overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075, or, in the case of a rental
car business, satisfies the conditions under subsection (3) of this
section. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified
under subsection (3)(a) of this section is responsible for an
infraction.
(((f))) (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images prepared under this
section are for the exclusive use of law enforcement in the discharge
of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not
be used in a court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action
or proceeding relates to a violation under this section. No
photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image may be used for any
purpose other than enforcement of violations under this section nor
retained longer than necessary to enforce this section.
(((g))) (h) All locations where an automated traffic safety camera
is used must be clearly marked by placing signs in locations that
clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is entering a zone where
traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic safety camera.
(((h))) (i) If a county or city has established an authorized
automated traffic safety camera program under this section, the
compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the equipment used
must be based only upon the value of the equipment and services
provided or rendered in support of the system, and may not be based
upon a portion of the fine or civil penalty imposed or the revenue
generated by the equipment.
(2) Infractions detected through the use of automated traffic
safety cameras are not part of the registered owner's driving record
under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated
by the use of automated traffic safety cameras under this section shall
be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for
the purposes of RCW ((3.46.120,)) 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16.216, and
46.20.270(3). However, the amount of the fine issued for an infraction
generated through the use of an automated traffic safety camera shall
not exceed the amount of a fine issued for other parking infractions
within the jurisdiction.
(3) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction being issued under this section, provide a written notice to
the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to
the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within
eighteen days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing
agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable penalty.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(5) For the purposes of this section, "automated traffic safety
camera" means a device that uses a vehicle sensor installed to work in
conjunction with an intersection traffic control system, a railroad
grade crossing control system, or a speed measuring device, and a
camera synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced
photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the rear of a
motor vehicle at the time the vehicle fails to stop when facing a
steady red traffic control signal or an activated railroad grade
crossing control signal, or exceeds a speed limit in a school speed
zone as detected by a speed measuring device. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, an automated traffic safety camera includes a camera
used to detect speed violations for the purposes of section 201(2) of
this act.

Sec. 711 RCW 47.68.090 and 1980 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation may make available its engineering
and other technical services, with or without charge, to any
municipality or person desiring them in connection with the planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance or operation of
airports or air navigation facilities.
The department may render financial assistance by grant or loan or
both to any municipality or municipalities acting jointly in the
planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or
operation of an airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or
controlled by such municipality or municipalities, or to any Indian
tribe recognized as such by the federal government or such tribes
acting jointly in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement,
maintenance or operation of an airport, owned or controlled, or to be
owned or controlled by such tribe or tribes and to be held available
for the general use of the public, out of appropriations made by the
legislature for such purposes. Such financial assistance may be
furnished in connection with federal or other financial aid for the
same purposes: PROVIDED, That no grant or loan or both shall be in
excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or five hundred thousand
dollars during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, for any one project:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That no grant or loan or both shall be granted unless
the municipality or municipalities acting jointly, or the tribe or
tribes acting jointly shall from their own funds match any funds made
available by the department upon such ratio as the department may
prescribe.
The department is authorized to act as agent of any municipality or
municipalities acting jointly or any tribe or tribes acting jointly,
upon the request of such municipality or municipalities, or such tribe
or tribes in accepting, receiving, receipting for and disbursing
federal moneys, and other moneys public or private, made available to
finance, in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition, construction,
improvement, maintenance or operation of an airport or air navigation
facility; and if requested by such municipality or municipalities, or
tribe or tribes, may act as its or their agent in contracting for and
supervising such planning, acquisition, construction, improvement,
maintenance, or operation; and all municipalities and tribes are
authorized to designate the department as their agent for the foregoing
purposes. The department, as principal on behalf of the state, and any
municipality on its own behalf, may enter into any contracts, with each
other or with the United States or with any person, which may be
required in connection with a grant or loan of federal moneys for
airport or air navigation facility purposes. All federal moneys
accepted under this section shall be accepted and transferred or
expended by the department upon such terms and conditions as are
prescribed by the United States. All moneys received by the department
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and,
unless otherwise prescribed by the authority from which such moneys
were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to
the purposes for which the moneys were made available, and held by the
state in trust for such purposes. All such moneys are hereby
appropriated for the purposes for which the same were made available,
to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions
upon which they were made available: PROVIDED, That any landing fee or
charge imposed by any Indian tribe or tribes for the privilege of use
of an airport facility planned, acquired, constructed, improved,
maintained, or operated with financial assistance from the department
pursuant to this section must apply equally to tribal and nontribal
members: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event any municipality or
municipalities or Indian tribe or tribes, or any distributor of
aircraft fuel as defined by RCW 82.42.020 which operates in any airport
facility which has received financial assistance pursuant to this
section, fails to collect the aircraft fuel excise tax as specified in
chapter 82.42 RCW, all funds or value of technical assistance given or
paid to such municipality or municipalities or Indian tribe or tribes
under the provisions of this section shall revert to the department,
and shall be due and payable to the department immediately.

Sec. 712 RCW 46.68.220 and 2009 c 8 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of licensing services account is created in the
motor vehicle fund. All receipts from service fees received under RCW
46.01.140(4)(b) shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for information and service delivery systems
for the department, and for reimbursement of county licensing
activities. During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal ((biennium))
biennia, the legislature may transfer from the department of licensing
services account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account.

Sec. 713 RCW 43.19.534 and 1993 sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) State agencies, the legislature, and departments shall purchase
for their use all goods and services required by the legislature,
agencies, or departments that are produced or provided in whole or in
part from class II inmate work programs operated by the department of
corrections through state contract. These goods and services shall not
be purchased from any other source unless, upon application by the
department or agency: (1) The department of general administration
finds that the articles or products do not meet the reasonable
requirements of the agency or department, (2) are not of equal or
better quality, or (3) the price of the product or service is higher
than that produced by the private sector. However, the criteria
contained in (1), (2), and (3) of this section for purchasing goods and
services from sources other than correctional industries do not apply
to goods and services produced by correctional industries that
primarily replace goods manufactured or services obtained from outside
the state. The department of corrections and department of general
administration shall adopt administrative rules that implement this
section.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, and in conformance with
section 224(5) of this act, this section does not apply to the purchase
of uniforms by the Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--GENERAL ADMINISTRATION BUILDING TENANT RELOCATION
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
allocation to the Washington state patrol for move planning costs,
relocation costs, and increased ongoing lease costs.

MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 29
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AVIATION -- PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES -- PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS -- PROGRAM K . . . . . . . . . . . . 17
FACILITIES -- PROGRAM D -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
MARINE -- PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y--OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
TOLL OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM B . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT -- PROGRAM S . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION BUILDING TENANT RELOCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
STATE TREASURER
ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 48, 49
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 29
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
CRIMINAL HISTORY AND BACKGROUND CHECKS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
--- END ---