BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.57A.140 and 1991 c 318 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public transportation benefit area authority may authorize
the annexation of territory contiguous to a public transportation
benefit area by the processes described under (a) or (b) of this
subsection. The authority shall consider the annexation of territory
contiguous to the public transportation benefit area at least once
every two years.
(a) A public transportation benefit area authority may authorize
the annexation of territory through a resolution when it determines
that the best interests and general welfare of the public
transportation benefit area would be served. Annexation through
resolution under this subsection (1)(a) is subject to the following
conditions:
(i) A public transportation benefit area authority proposing to
annex territory shall conduct a public hearing prior to the passage of
a resolution. Notice of the hearing must be given as described under
RCW 36.57A.030; and
(ii) A resolution passed under (a)(i) of this subsection does not
take effect for at least thirty days after it has passed. If, within
thirty days of the passage of a resolution under (a)(i) of this
subsection, a petition calling for an election to authorize the
annexation is signed by at least four percent of the qualified voters
residing within the area to be annexed and filed with the auditor of
the county in which the largest portion of the public transportation
benefit area is located, the resolution does not take effect until the
annexation is authorized through an election. Upon receipt of the
petition for an election, the auditor must give notice to the
authority, and the auditor must examine the petition and certify the
sufficiency of the signatures on the petition.
(b) An election to authorize the annexation of territory
((contiguous)) to a public transportation benefit area may be called
within the area to be annexed pursuant to (a) of this subsection or by
resolution or petition in the following manner:
(((a))) (i) By resolution of a public transportation benefit area
authority when it determines that the best interests and general
welfare of the public transportation benefit area would be served((.
The authority shall consider the question of areas to be annexed to the
public transportation benefit area at least once every two years.
(b)));
(ii) By petition calling for such an election signed by at least
four percent of the qualified voters residing within the area to be
annexed and filed with the auditor of the county wherein the largest
portion of the public transportation benefit area is located, and
notice thereof shall be given to the authority. Upon receipt of such
a petition, the auditor shall examine it and certify to the sufficiency
of the signatures thereon((.
(c))); or
(iii) By resolution of a public transportation benefit area
authority upon request of any city for annexation thereto.
(2) If the area proposed to be annexed is located within another
county, the petition or resolution for annexation as set forth in
subsection (1) of this section must be approved by the legislative
authority of the county if the area is unincorporated or by the
legislative authority of the city or town if the area is incorporated.
Any annexation under this subsection must involve contiguous areas.
(3) The resolution or petition ((shall)) in subsection (1) of this
section must describe the boundaries of the area to be annexed((. It
shall require that there also be submitted to the electorate of the
territory sought to be annexed a proposition authorizing the inclusion
of the area within the public transportation benefit area and
authorizing the imposition of such)) and must provide that, upon
annexation, the authority may impose taxes authorized by law to be
collected by the authority.

--- END ---