BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 PURPOSE. The legislature finds that it is
in the interests of the people of the state of Washington to be able to
establish public hospital capital facility areas as quasi-municipal
corporations and independent taxing units existing within the
boundaries of counties composed entirely of islands that receive
medical services from an existing public hospital district but are not
annexed to an existing public hospital district for the purpose of
financing the construction, additions, or betterments of capital
hospital facilities or other capital health care facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. (1) "Public hospital capital
facility area" means a quasi-municipal corporation and independent
taxing authority within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the
state Constitution, and a taxing district within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution, created by a county
legislative authority of a county composed entirely of islands and a
total land area between thirty-eight and forty square miles, that
receive medical services from an existing hospital district when it is
unable to annex to an existing hospital district as a result of its
geographic location and lack of contiguous boundaries. A public
hospital capital facility area may include all or a portion of a city
or town.
(2) "Hospital capital facilities" include both real and personal
property including land, buildings, site improvements, equipment,
furnishings, collections, and all necessary costs related to
acquisition, financing, design, construction, equipping, and
remodeling.
(3) "Other capital health care facilities" means nursing home,
extended care, long-term care, outpatient and rehabilitative
facilities, ambulances, and such other facilities as are appropriate to
the health needs of the population served.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ESTABLISHING A PUBLIC HOSPITAL CAPITAL
FACILITY AREA--BALLOT PROPOSITIONS. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a completed
written request to both establish a public hospital capital facility
area and submit a ballot proposition under section 7 of this act to
finance public hospital capital facilities and other capital health
care facilities, that is signed by a majority of the members of the
board of trustees of a public hospital district serving the proposed
area, the county legislative authority for the county in which a
proposed public hospital capital facility area is to be established
shall submit separate ballot propositions to voters to authorize
establishing the proposed public hospital capital facility area and
authorizing the public hospital capital facility area, if established,
to finance public hospital capital facilities or other capital health
care facilities by issuing general indebtedness and imposing excess
levies to retire the indebtedness.
(b) The ballot propositions must be submitted to voters at a
general or special election. If the proposed election date is not a
general election, the county legislative authority is encouraged to
request an election when another unit of local government with
territory located in the proposed public hospital capital facility area
is already holding a special election under RCW 29A.04.330. Approval
of the ballot proposition to create a public hospital capital facility
area must be by a simple majority vote.
(2) A completed request submitted under this section must include:
(a) A description of the boundaries of the public hospital capital
facility area; and
(b) A copy of the resolution of the legislative authority of each
city or town, and board of trustees of each public hospital district,
with territory included within the proposed public hospital capital
facility area indicating both: (i) Its approval of the creation of the
proposed public hospital capital facility area; and (ii) agreement on
how election costs will be paid for submitting ballot propositions to
voters that authorize the public hospital capital facility area to
incur general indebtedness and impose excess levies to retire the
general indebtedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PETITION FOR LESSER AREA--PROCEDURE. Any
petition for the formation of a public hospital capital facility may
describe an area less than the entire county in which the petition is
filed, the boundaries of which must follow the then existing precinct
boundaries and not divide any voting precinct; and in the event that a
petition is filed containing not less than ten percent of the voters of
the proposed district who voted at the last general election, certified
by the auditor in like manner as for a countywide district, the board
of county commissioners shall fix a date for a hearing on the petition,
and shall publish the petition, without the signatures thereto
appended, for two weeks prior to the date of the hearing, together with
a notice stating the time of the meeting when the petition will be
heard. Publications required by this chapter must be in a newspaper
published in the proposed public hospital capital facility area, or, if
there be no such newspaper, then in a newspaper published in the county
in which the public hospital capital facility area is situated, and of
general circulation in that county. The hearing on the petition may be
adjourned from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all. If upon
the final hearing the board of county commissioners finds that any
lands have been unjustly or improperly included within the proposed
public hospital capital facility area the board shall change and fix
the boundary lines in such manner as it deems reasonable and just and
conducive to the welfare and convenience, and make and enter an order
establishing and defining the boundary lines of the proposed public
hospital capital facility area: PROVIDED, That no lands may be
included within the boundaries so fixed lying outside the boundaries
described in the petition, except upon the written request of the
owners of those lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 GOVERNING BODY. The governing body of the
public hospital capital facility area must consist of three members of
the county legislative authority from each county in which the public
hospital capital facility area is located. In counties that have more
than three members of their legislative body, the three members who
serve on the governing body of the public hospital capital facility
area must be chosen by the full membership of the county legislative
authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 AUTHORITY TO CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, PURCHASE,
MAINTAIN, ADD TO, AND REMODEL FACILITIES--INTERLOCAL AGREEMENTS--LEGAL
TITLE. A public hospital capital facility area may construct, acquire,
purchase, maintain, add to, and remodel public hospital capital
facilities, and the governing body of the public hospital capital
facility area may, by interlocal agreement or otherwise, contract with
a county, city, town, or public hospital district to design, administer
the construction of, operate, or maintain a public hospital capital
facility or other capital health care facility financed pursuant to
this chapter. Legal title to public hospital capital facilities or
other capital health care facilities acquired or constructed pursuant
to this chapter may be transferred, acquired, or held by the public
hospital capital facility area or by a county, city, town, or public
hospital district in which the facility is located and receives
service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 FINANCING--BONDS AUTHORIZED. (1) A public
hospital capital facility area may contract indebtedness or borrow
money to finance public hospital capital facilities and other capital
health care facilities and may issue general obligation bonds for such
purpose not exceeding an amount, together with any existing
indebtedness of the public hospital capital facility area, equal to one
and one-quarter percent of the value of the taxable property in the
public hospital capital facility area and impose excess property tax
levies to retire the general indebtedness as provided in RCW 39.36.050
if a ballot proposition authorizing both the indebtedness and excess
levies is approved by at least three-fifths of the voters of the public
hospital capital facility area voting on the proposition, and the total
number of voters voting on the proposition constitutes not less than
forty percent of the total number of voters in the public hospital
capital facility area voting at the last preceding general election.
The term "value of the taxable property" has the meaning set forth in
RCW 39.36.015. The proposition must be submitted to voters at a
general or special election and may be submitted to voters at the same
election as the election when the ballot proposition authorizing the
establishing of the public hospital capital facility area is submitted.
If the proposed election date is not a general election, the county
legislative authority is encouraged to request an election when another
unit of local government with territory located in the proposed public
hospital capital facility area is already holding a special election
under RCW 29A.04.330.
(2) A public hospital capital facility area may accept gifts or
grants of money or property of any kind for the same purposes for which
it is authorized to borrow money in subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 DISSOLUTION OF PUBLIC HOSPITAL CAPITAL
FACILITY AREA. (1) A public hospital capital facility area may be
dissolved by a majority vote of the governing body when all obligations
under any general obligation bonds issued by the public hospital
capital facility area have been discharged and any other contractual
obligations of the public hospital capital facility area have either
been discharged or assumed by another governmental entity.
(2) A public hospital capital facility area must be dissolved by
the governing body if the first two ballot propositions under section
7 of this act that are submitted to voters are not approved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 LIMITATIONS ON LEGAL CHALLENGES. Unless
commenced within thirty days after the date of the filing of the
certificate of the canvass of an election on the proposition of
creating a new public hospital capital facility area pursuant to
chapter 70.44 RCW, no lawsuit whatever may be maintained challenging in
any way the legal existence of the public hospital capital facility
area or the validity of the proceedings had for the organization and
creation thereof. If the creation of a public hospital capital
facility area is not challenged within the period specified in this
section, the public hospital capital facility area conclusively must be
deemed duly and regularly organized under the laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 TREASURER--DUTIES--FUNDS--DEPOSITARIES--SURETY BONDS, COST. (1) The treasurer of the county in which a public
hospital capital facility area is located shall be treasurer of the
public hospital capital facility area, except that the commission of
the public hospital district in which the facility area is located by
resolution may designate some other person having experience in
financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the public hospital capital
facility area. If the treasurer is not the county treasurer, the
commission shall require a bond, with a surety company authorized to do
business in the state of Washington, in an amount and under the terms
and conditions which the commission by resolution from time to time
finds will protect the public hospital capital facility area against
loss. The premium on any such bond must be paid by the public hospital
capital facility area.
(2) All public hospital capital facility area funds must be paid to
the treasurer and must be disbursed by him or her only on warrants
issued by an auditor appointed by the commission, upon orders or
vouchers approved by it. The treasurer shall establish a public
hospital capital facility area fund, into which all public hospital
capital facility area funds must be paid, and he or she shall maintain
such special funds as may be created by the commission, into which he
or she shall place all money as the commission may, by resolution,
direct.
(3) If the treasurer of the district is the treasurer of the county
all public hospital capital facility area funds must be deposited with
the county depositaries under the same restrictions, contracts, and
security as provided for county depositaries. If the treasurer of the
public hospital capital facility area is some other person, all funds
must be deposited in a bank or banks authorized to do business in this
state as the commission by resolution designates, and with surety bond
to the public hospital capital facility area or securities in lieu
thereof of the kind, no less in amount, for deposit of county funds.
The surety bond or securities in lieu thereof must be filed or
deposited with the treasurer of the public hospital capital facility
area, and approved by resolution of the commission.
(4) All interest collected on public hospital capital facility area
funds belong to the public hospital capital facility area and be
deposited to its credit in the proper public hospital capital facility
area funds.
(5) A public hospital capital facility area may provide and require
a reasonable bond of any other person handling moneys or securities of
the public hospital capital facility area. The public hospital capital
facility area may pay the premium on the bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CONTRACTING WITH OTHER ENTITIES TO PROVIDE
SERVICES FACILITIES. Any public hospital capital facility area may
contract or join with any public hospital district, publicly owned
hospital, nonprofit hospital, legal entity, or individual to acquire,
own, operate, manage, or provide any hospital or other health care
facilities or hospital services or other health care services to be
used by individuals, districts, hospitals, or others, including
providing health maintenance services. If a public hospital capital
facility area chooses to contract or join with another party or parties
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, it may do so through
establishing a nonprofit corporation, partnership, limited liability
company, or other legal entity of its choosing in which the public
hospital capital facility area and the other party or parties
participate. The governing body of the legal entity must include
representatives of the public hospital capital facility area, which
representatives may include members of the public hospital district's
board of commissioners. A public hospital capital facility area
contracting or joining with another party pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, or otherwise
provide property, personnel, and services to the legal entity
established to carry out the contract or joint activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---