BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.12.040 and 1990 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The procedure for the establishment of a rural county library
district shall be as follows:
(1) Petitions signed by at least ten percent of the registered
voters of the county who voted in the last general election, outside of
the area of incorporated cities and towns, asking that the question,
"Shall a rural county library district be established?" be submitted to
a vote of the people, shall be filed with the county legislative
authority. The maximum initial levy rate for the rural county library
district may be included as part of the petition, not to exceed the
limit as set forth in RCW 27.12.050.
(2) The county legislative authority, after having determined that
the petitions were signed by the requisite number of registered voters,
shall place the proposition for the establishment of a rural county
library district on the ballot for the vote of the people of the
county, outside incorporated cities and towns, at the next succeeding
general or special election.
(3) If a majority of those voting on the proposition vote in favor
of the establishment of the rural county library district, the county
legislative authority shall forthwith declare it established.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.12.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
After the board of county commissioners has declared a rural county
library district established, it shall appoint a board of library
trustees and provide funds for the establishment and maintenance of
library service for the district by making a tax levy on the property
in the district of not more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value per year sufficient for the library service as shown to
be required by the budget submitted to the board of county
commissioners by the board of library trustees, and by making a tax
levy in such further amount as shall be authorized pursuant to RCW
27.12.222 or 84.52.052 or 84.52.056. The initial levy rate may not be
higher than the rate set by the vote establishing the rural county
library district, but may be increased as authorized under RCW
27.12.222, 84.52.052, or 84.52.056. Such levies shall be a part of the
general tax roll and shall be collected as a part of the general taxes
against the property in the district.

--- END ---