BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.510 and 2003 c 387 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department must establish and administer a direct retail
endorsement to serve as a single license that permits ((the holder of))
a Washington license holder or alternate operator to commercially
harvest retail-eligible species and to clean, dress, and sell his or
her catch directly to consumers at retail, including over the internet.
The direct retail endorsement must be issued as an optional addition to
all holders of: (a) A commercial fishing license for retail-eligible
species that the department offers under this chapter; and (b) an
alternate operator license who are designated as an alternate operator
on a commercial fishing license for retail eligible species.
(2) The direct retail endorsement must be offered at the time of
application for the qualifying commercial fishing license. Individuals
in possession of a qualifying commercial fishing license issued under
this chapter, and alternate operators designated on such a license, may
add a direct retail endorsement to their current license at any time.
Individuals who do not have a commercial fishing license for retail-eligible species issued under this chapter, and who are not designated
as alternate operators on such a license, may not receive a direct
retail endorsement. The costs, conditions, responsibilities, and
privileges associated with the endorsed commercial fishing license is
not affected or altered in any way by the addition of a direct retail
endorsement. These costs include the base cost of the license and any
revenue and excise taxes.
(3) An individual need only add one direct retail endorsement to
his or her license portfolio. If a direct retail endorsement is
selected by an individual holding more than one commercial fishing
license issued under this chapter, a single direct retail endorsement
is considered to be added to all qualifying commercial fishing licenses
held by that individual, and is the only license required for the
individual to sell at retail any retail-eligible species permitted by
all of the underlying endorsed licenses. ((The direct retail
endorsement applies only to the person named on the endorsed license,
and may not be used by an alternate operator named on the endorsed
license.)) If a direct retail endorsement is selected by an individual
designated as an alternate operator on more than one commercial license
issued under this chapter, a single direct retail endorsement is the
only license required for the individual to sell at retail any retail-eligible species permitted by all of the underlying endorsed licenses
on which the individual is designated as an alternate operator. The
direct retail endorsement applies only to the Washington license holder
or alternate operator obtaining the endorsement.
(4) In addition to any fees charged for the endorsed licenses and
harvest documentation as required by this chapter or the rules of the
department, the department may set a reasonable annual fee not to
exceed the administrative costs to the department for a direct retail
endorsement.
(5) The holder of a direct retail endorsement is responsible for
documenting the commercial harvest of salmon and crab according to the
provisions of this chapter, the rules of the department for a wholesale
fish dealer, and the reporting requirements of the endorsed license.
Any retail-eligible species caught by the holder of a direct retail
endorsement must be documented on fish tickets.
(6) The direct retail endorsement must be displayed in a readily
visible manner by the seller wherever and whenever a sale to someone
other than a licensed wholesale dealer occurs. The commission may
require that the holder of a direct retail endorsement notify the
department up to eighteen hours before conducting an in-person sale of
retail-eligible species, except for in-person sales that have a
cumulative retail sales value of less than one hundred fifty dollars in
a twenty-four hour period that are sold directly from the vessel. For
sales occurring in a venue other than in person, such as over the
internet, through a catalog, or on the phone, the direct retail
endorsement number of the seller must be provided to the buyer both at
the time of sale and the time of delivery. All internet sales must be
conducted in accordance with federal laws and regulations.
(7) The direct retail endorsement is to be held by a natural person
and is not transferrable or assignable. If the endorsed license is
transferred, the direct retail endorsement immediately becomes void,
and the transferor is not eligible for a full or prorated reimbursement
of the annual fee paid for the direct retail endorsement. Upon
becoming void, the holder of a direct retail endorsement must surrender
the physical endorsement to the department.
(8) The holder of a direct retail endorsement must abide by the
provisions of Title 69 RCW as they apply to the processing and retail
sale of seafood. The department must distribute a pamphlet, provided
by the department of agriculture, with the direct retail endorsement
generally describing the labeling requirements set forth in chapter
69.04 RCW as they apply to seafood.
(9) The holder of a qualifying commercial fishing license issued
under this chapter, or an alternate operator designated on such a
license, must either possess a direct retail endorsement or a wholesale
dealer license provided for in RCW 77.65.280 in order to lawfully sell
their catch or harvest in the state to anyone other than a licensed
wholesale dealer.
(10) The direct retail endorsement entitles the holder to sell a
retail-eligible species only at a temporary food service establishment
as that term is defined in RCW 69.06.045, or directly to a restaurant
or other similar food service business.

--- END ---