BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0262 and 1998 c 311 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to:
(a) Sales of airplanes((,)) (i) to the United States government;
(ii) for use in conducting interstate or foreign commerce; or (iii) for
use in providing intrastate air transportation by a commuter air
carrier;
(b) Sales of locomotives, railroad cars, or watercraft for use in
conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting therein or
therewith property and persons for hire or for use in conducting
commercial deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters
of the state ((or airplanes sold to the United States government;
also));
(c) Sales of tangible personal property ((which)) that becomes a
component part of such airplanes, locomotives, railroad cars, or
watercraft, and of motor vehicles or trailers whether owned by or
leased with or without drivers and used by the holder of a carrier
permit issued by the interstate commerce commission or its successor
agency authorizing transportation by motor vehicle across the
boundaries of this state, in the course of constructing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the same; ((also)) and
(d) Sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to such constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving.
(2) The term "commuter air carrier" means an air carrier holding
authority under Title 14, part 298 of the code of federal regulations
that carries passengers on at least five round trips per week on at
least one route between two or more points according to its published
flight schedules that specify the times, days of the week, and places
between which those flights are performed.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.12.0254 and 2003 c 5 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in
respect to the use of:
(a) Any airplane((,)) used primarily in (i) conducting interstate
or foreign commerce or (ii) providing intrastate air transportation by
a commuter air carrier as defined in RCW 82.08.0262;
(b) Any locomotive, railroad car, or watercraft used primarily in
conducting interstate or foreign commerce by transporting therein or
therewith property and persons for hire or used primarily in commercial
deep sea fishing operations outside the territorial waters of the
state((, and in respect to use of));
(c) Tangible personal property ((which)) that becomes a component
part of any such airplane, locomotive, railroad car, or watercraft in
the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same;
((also the use of)) and
(d) Labor and services rendered in respect to such repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving.
(2) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in
respect to the use by a nonresident of this state of any motor vehicle
or trailer used exclusively in transporting persons or property across
the boundaries of this state and in intrastate operations incidental
thereto when such motor vehicle or trailer is registered and licensed
in a foreign state and in respect to the use by a nonresident of this
state of any motor vehicle or trailer so registered and licensed and
used within this state for a period not exceeding fifteen consecutive
days under such rules as the department ((of revenue shall)) must
adopt((: PROVIDED, That)). However, under circumstances determined to
be justifiable by the department ((of revenue)) a second fifteen day
period may be authorized consecutive with the first fifteen day period;
and for the purposes of this exemption the term "nonresident" as used
herein((, shall include)) includes a user who has one or more places of
business in this state as well as in one or more other states, but the
exemption for nonresidents ((shall apply)) applies only to those
vehicles which are most frequently dispatched, garaged, serviced,
maintained, and operated from the user's place of business in another
state.
(3) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in
respect to the use by the holder of a carrier permit issued by the
interstate commerce commission or its successor agency of any motor
vehicle or trailer whether owned by or leased with or without driver to
the permit holder and used in substantial part in the normal and
ordinary course of the user's business for transporting therein persons
or property for hire across the boundaries of this state; and in
respect to the use of any motor vehicle or trailer while being operated
under the authority of a one-transit permit issued by the director of
licensing pursuant to RCW 46.16.160 and moving upon the highways from
the point of delivery in this state to a point outside this state; and
in respect to the use of tangible personal property which becomes a
component part of any motor vehicle or trailer used by the holder of a
carrier permit issued by the interstate commerce commission or its
successor agency authorizing transportation by motor vehicle across the
boundaries of this state whether such motor vehicle or trailer is owned
by or leased with or without driver to the permit holder, in the course
of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the same; also the use
of labor and services rendered in respect to such repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving.

--- END ---