BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.111 and 2004 c 271 s 128 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and
candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the
type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or
election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on
the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each
position, together with the names of the candidates for that office,
shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in the same
jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly
separated from each other. ((No paper ballot or ballot card may be
marked in any way that would permit the identification of the person
who voted that ballot.))
(2) An election official may not issue any ballot with a unique
identifying mark, except as specifically authorized by this subsection.
A ballot may be issued with a nonsequential, anonymously assigned
unique identifying mark solely for auditing and vote reconciliation
purposes, or to determine if a particular ballot has been previously
counted, as long as it is not associated with an individual voter, a
voter's address, or a voter's registration number.
(3) An elections official may not use any unique identifying mark
to associate a specific ballot with a voter or determine or seek to
determine whether any specific voter's ballot has been counted, or
whether the ballots of a group of voters have been counted. The
determination by an elections official using a unique identifying mark
that the ballots of any specific voter or group of voters have been
counted constitutes a separate violation of RCW 29A.84.720 for each
such voter and each individual in the group of voters. This subsection
shall not apply to a ballot returned by or on behalf of a voter
containing a unique identifying mark that was not placed on the ballot
by or at the direction of an elections official.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.60.040 and 2003 c 111 s 1504 are each amended to
read as follows:
A ballot is invalid and no votes on that ballot may be counted if
it is found folded together with another ballot ((or it is marked so as
to identify the voter)).
Those parts of a ballot are invalid and no votes may be counted for
those issues or offices where more votes are cast for the office or
issue than are permitted by law; write-in votes do not contain all of
the information required under RCW ((29A.60.020)) 29A.60.021; or that
issue or office is not marked with sufficient definiteness to determine
the voter's choice or intention. No write-in vote may be rejected due
to a variation in the form of the name if the election board or the
canvassing board can determine the issue for or against which or the
person and the office for which the voter intended to vote.

--- END ---