BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The community health care collaborative grant program is
established to further the efforts of community-based coalitions to
increase access to appropriate, affordable health care for Washington
residents, particularly employed low-income persons and children in
school who are uninsured and underinsured, through local programs
addressing one or more of the following: (a) Access to medical
treatment; (b) the efficient use of health care resources; and (c)
quality of care.
(2) Consistent with funds appropriated for community health care
collaborative grants specifically for this purpose, two-year grants may
be awarded pursuant to section 2 of this act by the administrator of
the health care authority.
(3) The health care authority shall provide administrative support
for the program. Administrative support activities may include health
care authority facilitation of statewide discussions regarding best
practices and standardized performance measures among grantees, or
subcontracting for such discussions.
(4) Eligibility for community health care collaborative grants
shall be limited to nonprofit organizations established to serve a
defined geographic region. To be eligible, a nonprofit or public
organization must have a formal collaborative governance structure and
decision-making process that includes representation by the following
health care providers: Hospitals, public health, behavioral health,
community health centers, rural health clinics, and private
practitioners that serve low-income persons in the region, unless there
are no such providers within the region, or providers decline or refuse
to participate or place unreasonable conditions on their participation.
The nature and format of the application, and the application
procedure, shall be determined by the administrator of the health care
authority. At a minimum, each application shall: (a) Identify the
geographic region served by the organization; (b) show how the
structure and operation of the organization reflects the interests of,
and is accountable to, this region and members providing care within
this region; (c) indicate the size of the grant being requested, and
how the money will be spent; and (d) include sufficient information for
an evaluation of the application based on the criteria established in
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The community health care collaborative grants shall be awarded
on a competitive basis based on a determination of which applicant
organization will best serve the purposes of the grant program
established in section 1 of this act. In making this determination,
priority for funding shall be given to the applicants that demonstrate:
(a) The initiatives to be supported by the community health care
collaborative grant are likely to address, in a measurable fashion,
documented health care access and quality improvement goals aligned
with state health policy priorities and needs within the region to be
served;
(b) The applicant organization must document formal, active
collaboration among key community partners that includes local
governments, school districts, large and small businesses, nonprofit
organizations, tribal governments, carriers, private health care
providers, and public health agencies;
(c) The applicant organization will match the community health care
collaborative grant with funds from other sources. The health care
authority may award grants solely to organizations providing at least
two dollars in matching funds for each community health care
collaborative grant dollar awarded;
(d) The community health care collaborative grant will enhance the
long-term capacity of the applicant organization and its members to
serve the region's documented health care access needs, including the
sustainability of the programs to be supported by the community health
care collaborative grant;
(e) The initiatives to be supported by the community health care
collaborative grant reflect creative, innovative approaches which
complement and enhance existing efforts to address the needs of the
uninsured and underinsured and, if successful, could be replicated in
other areas of the state; and
(f) The programs to be supported by the community health care
collaborative grant make efficient and cost-effective use of available
funds through administrative simplification and improvements in the
structure and operation of the health care delivery system.
(2) The administrator of the health care authority shall endeavor
to disburse community health care collaborative grant funds throughout
the state, supporting collaborative initiatives of differing sizes and
scales, serving at-risk populations.
(3) Grants shall be disbursed over a two-year cycle, provided the
grant recipient consistently provides timely reports that demonstrate
the program is satisfactorily meeting the purposes of the grant and the
objectives identified in the organization's application. The
requirements for the performance reports shall be determined by the
health care authority administrator. The performance measures shall be
aligned with the community health care collaborative grant program
goals and, where possible, shall be consistent with statewide policy
trends and outcome measures required by other public and private grant
funders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
By July 1st of each even-numbered fiscal year the administrator of
the health care authority shall provide the governor and the
legislature with an evaluation of the community health care
collaborative grant program, describing the organizations and
collaborative initiatives funded and the results achieved. The report
shall include the impact of the program, results of performance
measures, general findings, and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The health care authority may adopt rules to
implement this act.

--- END ---