BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.70.040 and 2005 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall keep a running total of all credits
allowed under RCW 82.70.020 during each fiscal year. The department
shall not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed
to exceed ((two)) one million ((seven)) two hundred fifty thousand
dollars in any fiscal year. ((This limitation includes any deferred
credits carried forward under subsection (2)(b)(i) of this section from
prior years.))
(b) If the total amount of credit applied for by all applicants in
any year exceeds the limit in this subsection, the department shall
ratably reduce the amount of credit allowed for all applicants so that
the limit in this subsection is not exceeded. If a credit is reduced
under this subsection, the amount of the reduction may not be carried
forward and claimed in subsequent fiscal years.
(2)(a) A tax credit under this section must be claimed against
taxes due for the calendar year in which the credit was approved. Tax
credits under RCW 82.70.020 may not be claimed in excess of the amount
of tax otherwise due under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.
(b)(((i) Through June 30, 2005, a person with taxes equal to or in
excess of the credit under RCW 82.70.020, and therefore not subject to
the limitation in (a) of this subsection, may elect to defer tax
credits for a period of not more than three years after the year in
which the credits accrue. No credits deferred under this subsection
(2)(b)(i) may be used after June 30, 2008. A person deferring tax
credits under this subsection (2)(b)(i) must submit an application as
provided in RCW 82.70.025 in the year in which the deferred tax credits
will be used. This application is subject to the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section for the year in which the tax credits
will be applied. If a deferred credit is reduced under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the amount of deferred credit disallowed
because of the reduction may be carried forward as long as the period
of deferral does not exceed three years after the year in which the
credit was earned.
(ii))) For any credits approved by the department after June 30,
2005, and before July 1, 2009, the approved credit may be carried
forward ((to)) and claimed, through June 30, 2013, against taxes due in
subsequent years until used. Credits carried forward as authorized by
this subsection are subject to the limitation in subsection (1)(a) of
this section for the fiscal year for which the credits were originally
approved.
(3) No person shall be approved for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020
in excess of ((two)) one hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year.
This limitation does not apply to credits carried forward from prior
years under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) No person may claim tax credits after June 30, 2013.
(5) Credits may not be carried forward other than as authorized in
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(6) No person is eligible for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 if
the additional revenues for the multimodal transportation account
created by Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2231 are terminated.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.70.025 and 2005 c 297 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for tax credits under this chapter must be received
by the department between the first day of January and the 31st day of
January, following the calendar year in which the applicant made
payments to or on behalf of employees for ride sharing in vehicles
carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for
using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting. The
application shall be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the number of employees for which incentives are
paid during the calendar year, the amounts paid to or on behalf of
employees for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons,
for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using
nonmotorized commuting, ((the amount of credit deferred under RCW
82.70.040(2)(b)(i) to be used,)) and other information required by the
department. ((For applications due by January 31, 2006, the
application shall not include amounts paid from January 1, 2005,
through June 30, 2005, to or on behalf of employees for ride sharing in
vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation,
for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting.))
(2) No person may be approved for credit under this chapter more
than twice during the period between January 1, 2010, and January 31,
2013.
(3) The department shall rule on the application within sixty days
of the deadline provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(((3))) (4) The department shall disapprove any application not
received by the deadline provided in subsection (1) of this section
regardless of the reason that the application was received after the
deadline.
(((4))) (5) After an application is approved and tax credit
granted, no increase in the credit shall be allowed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---