BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.110 and 1984 c 7 s 59 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person operating any vehicle or moving any object or conveyance
upon any public highway in this state or upon any bridge or elevated
structure that is a part of any such public highway is liable for all
damages that the public highway, bridge, ((or)) elevated structure, or
other state property may sustain as a result of any illegal operation
of the vehicle or the moving of any such object or conveyance or as a
result of the operation or moving of any vehicle, object, or conveyance
weighing in excess of the legal weight limits allowed by law. This
section applies to any person operating any vehicle or moving any
object or contrivance in any illegal or negligent manner or without a
special permit as provided by law for vehicles, objects, or
contrivances that are overweight, overwidth, overheight, or overlength.
Any person operating any vehicle is liable for any damage to any public
highway, bridge, ((or)) elevated structure, or other state property
sustained as the result of any negligent operation thereof. When the
operator is not the owner of the vehicle, object, or contrivance but is
operating or moving it with the express or implied permission of the
owner, the owner and the operator are jointly and severally liable for
any such damage. Such damage to any state highway ((or)), structure,
or other state property may be recovered in a civil action instituted
in the name of the state of Washington by the department of
transportation. Any measure of damage ((to any public highway))
determined by the department of transportation by reason of this
section is prima facie the amount of damage caused thereby and is
presumed to be the amount recoverable in any civil action therefor.

--- END ---