BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.510 and 2001 c 235 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The licenses issuable under this chapter are as follows:
(a) A wholesaler's license.
(b) A retailer's license.
(2) Application for the licenses shall be made through the master
license system under chapter 19.02 RCW. The ((department of revenue))
board shall adopt rules regarding the regulation of the licenses. The
((department of revenue)) board may refrain from the issuance of any
license under this chapter if the ((department)) board has reasonable
cause to believe that the applicant has wilfully withheld information
requested for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the
applicant to receive a license, or if the ((department)) board has
reasonable cause to believe that information submitted in the
application is false or misleading or is not made in good faith. In
addition, for the purpose of reviewing an application for a
wholesaler's license or retailer's license and for considering the
denial, suspension, or revocation of any such license, the
((department)) board may consider ((criminal convictions of the
applicant related to the selling of cigarettes)) any prior criminal
conduct of the applicant, including an administrative violation history
record with the board and a criminal history record information check
within the previous five years, in any state, tribal, or federal
jurisdiction in the United States, its territories, or possessions, and
the provisions of RCW 9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to
such cases. The ((department)) board may, in its discretion, grant or
refuse the wholesaler's license or retailer's license, subject to the
provisions of RCW 82.24.550.
(3) No person may qualify for a wholesaler's license or a
retailer's license under this section without first undergoing a
criminal background check. The background check shall be performed by
the ((liquor control)) board and must disclose any criminal
((convictions related to the selling of cigarettes)) conduct within the
previous five years in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in
the United States, its territories, or possessions. A person who
possesses a valid license on July 22, 2001, is subject to this
subsection and subsection (2) of this section beginning on the date of
the person's master license expiration, and thereafter. If the
applicant or licensee also has a license issued under chapter 66.24 or
82.26 RCW, the background check done under the authority of chapter
66.24 or 82.26 RCW satisfies the requirements of this section.
(4) Each such license shall expire on the master license expiration
date, and each such license shall be continued annually if the licensee
has paid the required fee and complied with all the provisions of this
chapter and the rules of the ((department of revenue)) board made
pursuant thereto.
(5) Each license and any other evidence of the license that the
board requires must be exhibited in each place of business for which it
is issued and in the manner required for the display of a master
license.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.24.550 and 2005 c 180 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The
board may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce and
administer the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to
administer the provisions of this chapter. The ((department has full
power and authority to)) board may revoke or suspend the license or
permit of any wholesale or retail cigarette dealer in the state upon
sufficient cause appearing of the violation of this chapter or upon the
failure of such licensee to comply with any of the provisions of this
chapter.
(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice
to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the ((department))
board. The ((department)) board, upon finding that the licensee has
failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under this chapter, shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend
the license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than
thirty consecutive business days, and, in the case of a second or
further offense, shall suspend the license or licenses for a period of
not less than ninety consecutive business days nor more than twelve
months, and, in the event the ((department)) board finds the licensee
has been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the
license or licenses.
(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.26 RCW to a person whose
license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section
shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or
revocation under this section.
(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under
this section may ((apply)) reapply to the ((department)) board at the
expiration of one year ((for a reinstatement)) from the date of
revocation of the license or licenses. The license or licenses may be
((reinstated)) approved by the ((department)) board if it appears to
the satisfaction of the ((department)) board that the licensee will
comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter.
(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not
sell cigarettes or tobacco products or permit cigarettes or tobacco
products to be sold during the period of such suspension or revocation
on the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises
controlled by the person or others or in any other manner or form
whatever.
(7) Any determination and order by the ((department)) board, and
any order of suspension or revocation by the ((department)) board of
the license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to
reinstate a license or licenses after revocation shall be reviewable by
an appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court
shall review the order or ruling of the ((department)) board and may
hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this
chapter and the duties imposed upon ((the department and)) the board.
(8) If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or
renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may request a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34 RCW.
(9) For purposes of this section, "tobacco products" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.26.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.150 and 2005 c 180 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The licenses issuable by the ((department)) board under this
chapter are as follows:
(a) A distributor's license; and
(b) A retailer's license.
(2) Application for the licenses shall be made through the master
license system under chapter 19.02 RCW. The ((department)) board may
adopt rules regarding the regulation of the licenses. The
((department)) board may refuse to issue any license under this chapter
if the ((department)) board has reasonable cause to believe that the
applicant has willfully withheld information requested for the purpose
of determining the eligibility of the applicant to receive a license,
or if the ((department)) board has reasonable cause to believe that
information submitted in the application is false or misleading or is
not made in good faith. In addition, for the purpose of reviewing an
application for a distributor's license or retailer's license and for
considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of any such license,
the ((department)) board may consider criminal ((convictions)) conduct
of the applicant ((related to the selling of tobacco products)),
including an administrative violation history record with the board and
a criminal history record information check within the previous five
years, in any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in the United
States, its territories, or possessions, and the provisions of RCW
9.95.240 and chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. The
((department)) board may, in its discretion, issue or refuse to issue
the distributor's license or retailer's license, subject to the
provisions of RCW 82.26.220.
(3) No person may qualify for a distributor's license or a
retailer's license under this section without first undergoing a
criminal background check. The background check shall be performed by
the board and must disclose any criminal ((convictions related to the
selling of tobacco products)) conduct within the previous five years in
any state, tribal, or federal jurisdiction in the United States, its
territories, or possessions. If the applicant or licensee also has a
license issued under chapter 66.24 or 82.24 RCW, the background check
done under the authority of chapter 66.24 or 82.24 RCW satisfies the
requirements of this section.
(4) Each license issued under this chapter shall expire on the
master license expiration date. The license shall be continued
annually if the licensee has paid the required fee and complied with
all the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the ((department))
board adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Each license and any other evidence of the license ((as the
department requires shall)) required under this chapter must be
exhibited in ((the)) each place of business for which it is issued and
in the manner required for the display of a master license.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.26.180 and 2005 c 180 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((department)) board shall compile and maintain a current
record of the names of all distributors and retailers licensed under
this chapter and the status of their license or licenses. The
information must be updated on a monthly basis and published on the
((department's)) board's official internet web site. This information
is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and
shall be disclosed to manufacturers, distributors, retailers, and the
general public upon request.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.26.190 and 2005 c 180 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may engage in or conduct business as a distributor
or retailer in this state after September 30, 2005, without a valid
license issued ((by the department)) under this chapter. Any person
who sells tobacco products to persons other than ultimate consumers or
who meets the definition of distributor under RCW 82.26.010(3)(d) must
obtain a distributor's license under this chapter. Any person who
sells tobacco products to ultimate consumers must obtain a retailer's
license under this chapter.
(b) A violation of this subsection (1) is punishable as a class C
felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) No person engaged in or conducting business as a distributor
or retailer in this state may:
(i) Refuse to allow the department or the board, on demand, to make
a full inspection of any place of business where any of the tobacco
products taxed under this chapter are sold, stored, or handled, or
otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;
(ii) Make, use, or present or exhibit to the department or the
board any invoice for any of the tobacco products taxed under this
chapter that bears an untrue date or falsely states the nature or
quantity of the goods invoiced; or
(iii) Fail to produce on demand of the department or the board all
invoices of all the tobacco products taxed under this chapter within
five years prior to such demand unless the person can show by
satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was due to
causes beyond the person's control.
(b) No person, other than a licensed distributor or retailer, may
transport tobacco products for sale in this state for which the taxes
imposed under this chapter have not been paid unless:
(i) Notice of the transportation has been given as required under
RCW 82.26.140;
(ii) The person transporting the tobacco products actually
possesses invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and
address of the consignor or seller, the true name and address of the
consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and brands of tobacco products
being transported; and
(iii) The tobacco products are consigned to or purchased by a
person in this state who is licensed under this chapter.
(c) A violation of this subsection (2) is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) Any person licensed under this chapter as a distributor, and
any person licensed under this chapter as a retailer, shall not operate
in any other capacity unless the additional appropriate license is
first secured. A violation of this subsection (3) is a misdemeanor.
(4) The penalties provided in this section are in addition to any
other penalties provided by law for violating the provisions of this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.26.210 and 2005 c 180 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
A manufacturer that has manufacturer's representatives who sell or
distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products in this state must
provide the ((department)) board a list of the names and addresses of
all such representatives and must ensure that the list provided to the
((department)) board is kept current. A manufacturer's representative
is not authorized to distribute or sell tobacco products in this state
unless the manufacturer that hired the representative has a valid
distributor's license under this chapter and that manufacturer provides
the ((department)) board a current list of all of its manufacturer's
representatives as required by this section. A manufacturer's
representative must carry a copy of the distributor's license of the
manufacturer that hired the representative at all times when selling or
distributing the manufacturer's tobacco products.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.26.220 and 2005 c 180 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall enforce this chapter. The board may adopt,
amend, and repeal rules necessary to enforce and administer this
chapter.
(2) The department may adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary to
administer this chapter. The ((department has full power and authority
to)) board may revoke or suspend the distributor's or retailer's
license of any distributor or retailer of tobacco products in the state
upon sufficient cause showing a violation of this chapter or upon the
failure of the licensee to comply with any of the rules adopted under
it.
(3) A license shall not be suspended or revoked except upon notice
to the licensee and after a hearing as prescribed by the ((department))
board. The ((department)) board, upon finding that the licensee has
failed to comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule
adopted under it, shall, in the case of the first offense, suspend the
license or licenses of the licensee for a period of not less than
thirty consecutive business days, and in the case of a second or
further offense, suspend the license or licenses for a period of not
less than ninety consecutive business days but not more than twelve
months, and in the event the ((department)) board finds the licensee
has been guilty of willful and persistent violations, it may revoke the
license or licenses.
(4) Any licenses issued under chapter 82.24 RCW to a person whose
license or licenses have been suspended or revoked under this section
shall also be suspended or revoked during the period of suspension or
revocation under this section.
(5) Any person whose license or licenses have been revoked under
this section may ((apply)) reapply to the ((department)) board at the
expiration of one year ((for a reinstatement)) of the license or
licenses. The license or licenses may be ((reinstated)) approved by
the ((department)) board if it appears to the satisfaction of the
((department)) board that the licensee will comply with the provisions
of this chapter and the rules adopted under it.
(6) A person whose license has been suspended or revoked shall not
sell tobacco products or cigarettes or permit tobacco products or
cigarettes to be sold during the period of suspension or revocation on
the premises occupied by the person or upon other premises controlled
by the person or others or in any other manner or form.
(7) Any determination and order by the ((department)) board, and
any order of suspension or revocation by the ((department)) board of
the license or licenses issued under this chapter, or refusal to
reinstate a license or licenses after revocation is reviewable by an
appeal to the superior court of Thurston county. The superior court
shall review the order or ruling of the ((department)) board and may
hear the matter de novo, having due regard to the provisions of this
chapter and the duties imposed upon ((the department and)) the board.
(8) If the board makes an initial decision to deny a license or
renewal, or suspend or revoke a license, the applicant may request a
hearing subject to the applicable provisions under Title 34 RCW.

--- END ---