BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.58.005 and 2005 c 365 s 151 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business days" means Monday through Friday except official
state holidays.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Electronic approval" or "electronically approve" means
approving the content of an electronically filed vital record through
the processes provided by the department. Electronic approval
processes shall be consistent with policies, standards, and procedures
developed by the information services board under RCW 43.105.041.
(4) "Embalmer" means a person licensed as required in chapter 18.39
RCW and defined in RCW 18.39.010.
(((4))) (5) "Funeral director" means a person licensed as required
in chapter 18.39 RCW and defined in RCW 18.39.010.
(((5))) (6) "Vital records" means records of birth, death, fetal
death, marriage, dissolution, annulment, and legal separation, as
maintained under the supervision of the state registrar of vital
statistics.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.58.170 and 2005 c 365 s 154 are each amended to
read as follows:
The funeral director or person having the right to control the
disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 shall file the
certificate of death or fetal death. In preparing such certificate,
the funeral director or person having the right to control the
disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 shall obtain and
enter on the certificate such personal data as the certificate requires
from the person or persons best qualified to supply them. He or she
shall present the certificate of death to the physician, physician's
assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner last in attendance
upon the deceased, or, if the deceased died without medical attendance,
to the health officer, medical examiner, coroner, or prosecuting
attorney having jurisdiction, who shall ((thereupon)) certify the cause
of death according to his or her best knowledge and belief and shall
sign or electronically approve the certificate of death or fetal death
within two business days after being presented with the certificate
unless good cause for not signing or electronically approving the
certificate within the two business days can be established. He or she
shall present the certificate of fetal death to the physician,
physician's assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, midwife,
or other person in attendance at the fetal death, who shall certify the
fetal death and such medical data pertaining thereto as he or she can
furnish.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.58.180 and 2005 c 365 s 155 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the death occurred without medical attendance, the funeral
director or person having the right to control the disposition of the
human remains under RCW 68.50.160 shall notify the coroner, medical
examiner, or prosecuting attorney if there is no coroner or medical
examiner in the county. If the circumstances suggest that the death or
fetal death was caused by unlawful or unnatural causes or if there is
no local health officer with jurisdiction, the coroner((, or if none))
or medical examiner, or the prosecuting attorney shall complete and
sign or electronically approve the certification, noting upon the
certificate that no physician, physician's assistant, or advanced
registered nurse practitioner was in attendance at the time of death.
In case of any death without medical attendance in which there is no
suspicion of death from unlawful or unnatural causes, the local health
officer or his or her deputy, the coroner or medical examiner, and if
none, the prosecuting attorney, shall complete and sign or
electronically approve the certification, noting upon the certificate
that no physician, physician's assistant, or advanced registered nurse
practitioner was in attendance at the time of death, and noting the
cause of death without the holding of an inquest or performing of an
autopsy or post mortem, but from statements of relatives, persons in
attendance during the last sickness, persons present at the time of
death or other persons having adequate knowledge of the facts.
The cause of death, the manner and mode in which death occurred, as
noted by the coroner or medical examiner, or if none, the prosecuting
attorney or the health officer and incorporated in the death
certificate filed with the ((bureau of vital statistics of the board of
health)) department shall be the legally accepted manner and mode by
which the deceased came to his or her death and shall be the legally
accepted cause of death.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.58.230 and 2005 c 365 s 157 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to inter, deposit in a vault,
grave, or tomb, cremate, or otherwise dispose of, or disinter or remove
from one registration district to another, or hold for more than three
business days after death, the human remains of any person whose death
occurred in this state or any human remains which shall be found in
this state, without obtaining, from the local registrar of the district
in which the death occurred or in which the human remains were found,
a permit for the burial, disinterment, or removal of the human remains.
However, a licensed funeral director or embalmer of this state or a
funeral establishment licensed in another state contiguous to
Washington, with a current certificate of removal registration issued
by the director of the department of licensing, may remove human
remains from the district where the death occurred to another
registration district or Oregon or Idaho without having obtained a
permit but in such cases the funeral director or embalmer shall at the
time of removing human remains file with or mail to the local registrar
of the district where the death occurred a notice of removal upon a
blank to be furnished by the state registrar. The notice of removal
shall be signed or electronically approved by the funeral director or
embalmer and shall contain the name and address of the local registrar
with whom the certificate of death will be filed and the burial-transit
permit secured. Every local registrar, accepting a death certificate
and issuing a burial-transit permit for a death that occurred outside
his or her district, shall be entitled to a fee of one dollar to be
paid by the funeral director or embalmer at the time the death
certificate is accepted and the permit is secured. It shall be
unlawful for any person to bring into or transport within the state or
inter, deposit in a vault, grave, or tomb, or cremate or otherwise
dispose of human remains of any person whose death occurred outside
this state unless the human remains are accompanied by a removal or
transit permit issued in accordance with the law and health regulations
in force where the death occurred, or unless a special permit for
bringing the human remains into this state shall be obtained from the
state registrar.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.58.240 and 2005 c 365 s 158 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each funeral director or person having the right to control the
disposition of the human remains under RCW 68.50.160 shall obtain a
certificate of death, sign or electronically approve and file the
certificate with the local registrar, and secure a burial-transit
permit, prior to any permanent disposition of the human remains. He or
she shall obtain the personal and statistical particulars required,
from the person best qualified to supply them. He or she shall present
the certificate to the attending physician or in case the death
occurred without any medical attendance, to the proper official for
certification for the medical certificate of the cause of death and
other particulars necessary to complete the record. He or she shall
supply the information required relative to the date and place of
disposition and he or she shall sign or electronically approve and
present the completed certificate to the local registrar, for the
issuance of a burial-transit permit. He or she shall deliver the
burial permit to the sexton, or person in charge of the place of
burial, before interring the human remains; or shall attach the transit
permit to the box containing the corpse, when shipped by any
transportation company, and the permit shall accompany the corpse to
its destination.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.58.250 and 1961 ex.s. c 5 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The burial-transit permit shall contain a statement by the local
registrar and over his or her signature or electronic approval, that a
satisfactory certificate of death having been filed with him or her, as
required by law, permission is granted to inter, remove, or otherwise
dispose of the body; stating the name of the deceased and other
necessary details upon the form prescribed by the state registrar.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.58.260 and 2005 c 365 s 159 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person in charge of any premises in
which bodies of deceased persons are interred, cremated, or otherwise
permanently disposed of, to permit the interment, cremation, or other
disposition of any body upon such premises unless it is accompanied by
a burial, removal, or transit permit as provided in this chapter. It
shall be the duty of the person in charge of any such premises to, in
case of the interment, cremation, or other disposition of human remains
therein, endorse upon the permit the date and character of such
disposition, over his or her signature or electronic approval, to
return all permits so endorsed to the local registrar of the district
in which the death occurred within ten days from the date of such
disposition, and to keep a record of all human remains disposed of on
the premises under his or her charge, stating, in each case, the name
of the deceased person, if known, the place of death, the date of
burial or other disposition, and the name and address of the
undertaker, which record shall at all times be open to public
inspection, and it shall be the duty of every undertaker, or person
acting as such, when burying human remains in a cemetery or burial
grounds having no person in charge, to sign or electronically approve
the burial, removal, or transit permit, giving the date of burial,
write across the face of the permit the words "no person in charge",
and file the burial, removal, or transit permit within ten days with
the registrar of the district in which the death occurred.

--- END ---