BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that early
intervention services are cost-effective and effectively serve the
developmental needs of infants and toddlers with disabilities and
developmental delays and their families. Therefore, the purpose of
this act is to provide a comprehensive, coordinated, interagency,
interdisciplinary early intervention services system for all eligible
infants and toddlers and their families by enhancing the capacity to
equitably provide quality early intervention services, and facilitating
coordination of payments for early intervention services from various
public and private sources.
(2) The legislature finds that there is an urgent and substantial
need to:
(a) Enhance the development of all eligible infants and toddlers
with disabilities in the state of Washington, in order to minimize
developmental delay and maximize individual potential for adult
independence;
(b) Enhance the capacity of families to meet the special needs of
all eligible infants and toddlers with disabilities;
(c) Reduce educational costs by minimizing the need for special
education and related services when eligible infants and toddlers reach
school age;
(d) Enhance the independence, productivity, and integration with
age-appropriate peers of eligible children and their families;
(e) Reduce social services costs and minimize the need for out-of-home placement; and
(f) Prevent secondary impairments and disabilities by improving the
health of infants and toddlers, thereby reducing health costs for the
families and the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.195 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature intends that the policy of this state shall be
that:
(1) All eligible infants and toddlers with disabilities and
developmental delays have a right to receive early intervention
services to the maximum extent appropriate as determined by the
evaluations, assessments, and the individualized family service plans
pursuant to Part C of the federal individuals with disabilities
education improvement act and the Washington state infant and toddler
early intervention program federally approved plan. A child's
eligibility must be determined according to the Washington state infant
toddler early intervention program policies and procedures and the
federally approved state plan;
(2) The role of the family is of primary importance in all areas of
the child's development, and implementation of services to the child
and decision-making processes regarding the child must fully involve
primary care providers;
(3) Public funding and support must be provided to all eligible
infants and toddlers and their families and must include parent
resources and address their individual concerns and priorities;
(4) On a statewide basis, locally based comprehensive, coordinated,
interdisciplinary, interagency early intervention services for all
eligible infants and toddlers must be developed, implemented,
maintained, and facilitated by the designated infant and toddler early
intervention program local lead agencies;
(5) The local communities' capacity to provide an array of quality
early intervention services must be enhanced; and
(6) All available resources for early intervention within the state
including those from federal, state, local, and private sources must be
identified and coordinated. The individualized family service plan
must incorporate all services and activities, including education,
health, and social services resources necessary to coordinate and
implement early intervention services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.195 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In coordination with other funding sources for early
intervention services, the department of social and health services
shall, in accordance with RCW 71A.14.030, contract with each county
governing authority to provide funding for early intervention services
to all eligible children with disabilities from birth to three years of
age who have been identified as needing services. County governing
authorities shall provide or contract for early intervention services
to all eligible children within the county who have been identified as
needing services in partnership with infant toddler early intervention
program local lead agencies, school districts, and birth-to-three
providers.
(2) In calculating the contract amounts for county governing
authorities, the department of social and health services shall
designate funding for early intervention services to all eligible
children with disabilities from birth to three years of age to provide
all necessary services as determined by the child's individualized
family service plan and by Part C of the federal individuals with
disabilities education improvement act. The state designated lead
agency shall be payer of last resort for birth-to-three early
intervention services provided under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.195 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services is the governor-
appointed state lead agency for implementing the early intervention
section, Part C, of the federal individuals with disabilities education
improvement act and the Washington state federally approved plan, which
shall be administered by the infant toddler early intervention program.
The legislature directs that all public early intervention funding
sources shall assure that services are provided in accordance with the
requirements of Part C and the Washington state federally approved
plan.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2000 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council
shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four
individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the
two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to
supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this
chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of
and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the
official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If
the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in
RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without
approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(5) A councilmember who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the
supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions
specified by the member.
(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without
additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, infant toddler early
intervention program, and adoption support.
(8) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act may be known and cited as the
infant toddler equity act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---