BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.330.010 and 2007 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affordable residential development" or "affordable housing"
means:
(a) For owner-occupied housing, housing that is owned and occupied
by a person or household with an income not exceeding one hundred
twenty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household
size; or
(b) For rental housing, housing that is rented and occupied by a
household with an income not exceeding eighty percent of the median
family income, adjusted for household size, whose monthly housing
costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty
percent of the household's monthly income.
(2) "Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of
community interests.
(((2))) (3) "Comparable replacement housing" means any dwelling
that is (a) decent, safe, and sanitary; (b) adequate in size to
accommodate the displaced occupants; (c) within the financial means of
the displaced occupants; (d) functionally equivalent to the housing
lost; (e) in an area not subject to unreasonably adverse environmental
conditions; and (f) in a location generally not less desirable than the
location of the displaced person's dwelling with respect to public
utilities, facilities, services, transit facilities, and the displaced
person's place of employment.
(4) "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for
wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor and statistics, United States department of labor.
(5) "Dense" means the same as transit-supportive density.
(6) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(((3))) (7) "Director" means the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development.
(((4))) (8) "Eligible jurisdiction" means a county, city, or a
federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of Washington.
(9) "Financial institution" means a bank, trust company, mutual
savings bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized
to do business in this state under state or federal law.
(((5))) (10) "High capacity transit station" means a stop or
station for public transportation that operates on a fixed guideway
rail system or bus rapid transit line designated by the department.
(11) "Increased regulatory flexibility" means reductions in
regulatory burdens on a receiving site, and may include, but is not
limited to, easing of parking requirements, impervious surface limits,
or setback requirements.
(12) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW
43.185A.010.
(13) "Major transit stop" means a stop for a bus or other transit
mode providing fixed route service in intervals of no more than thirty
minutes during peak hours of operation.
(14) "Market interest rate" means the current average market
interest rate as determined using a widely recognized current market
interest rate measurement selected by the department.
(15) "Microenterprise development organization" means a community
development corporation, a nonprofit development organization, a
nonprofit social services organization or other locally operated
nonprofit entity that provides services to low-income entrepreneurs.
(((6))) (16) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is
tax exempt, or not required to apply for an exemption, under section
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, or under similar
successor provisions.
(17) "Receiving site" means an area that a city or county has
designated as a receiving site for the purposes of a transfer of
development rights.
(18) "Residential development" means a unit of housing that is
contained within a single, multifamily, or mixed-use development.
(19) "Rural and resource land transfer of development rights" means
transfer of development rights where the sending site is located on
rural or resource lands.
(20) "Sending site" means an area that a city or county has
designated as a sending site for the purposes of a transfer of
development rights.
(21) "Statewide microenterprise association" means a nonprofit
entity with microenterprise development organizations as members that
serves as an intermediary between the department of community, trade,
and economic development and local microenterprise development
organizations.
(22) "Transfer bonuses" means bonuses provided to transfer of
development rights receiving areas. Transfer bonuses may include, but
are not limited to, increased permitted height, density, or floor area
ratios.
(23) "Transfer of development rights" means the transfer of
development rights from a sending site to a receiving site. Transfer
of development rights may also include transfer bonuses or increased
regulatory flexibility.
(24) "Transit-proximate" means within one-half mile walking
distance of a high capacity transit station or within one-quarter mile
of another major transit stop.
(25) "Transit-supportive density" means a minimum average of fifty
units of residential development per acre within one-half mile of a
high capacity transit station and a minimum average of ten residential
development units per acre of land within one-quarter mile of another
major transit stop where units for each acre of land are measured as
net zoned density. The density requirements may be modified or waived
by the director for a particular project if: (a) The project area is
within one mile of an international airport; (b) the project area is
served by one or more high capacity light rail transit stations; and
(c) the proposed residential infrastructure development project is
consistent with the intent of this chapter.
(26) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is less than
fifty percent of the median family income, adjusted for household size,
for the county where the project is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The residential infrastructure program is created in the
department to provide loans to eligible jurisdictions and grants to
nonprofit organizations for public infrastructure that supports
increased capacity for dense, affordable residential development in
transit-proximate areas.
(2) The department may provide direct loans to eligible
jurisdictions for projects meeting the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section or provide grants to nonprofit organizations for
projects meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.
Funds appropriated through the program must be used to pay for the cost
of public infrastructure projects that support increased capacity for
dense, affordable residential development in transit-proximate areas,
including the planning, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of sidewalks, bicycle
facilities, streets and roads, bridges, publicly owned utilities,
drinking water systems, and storm and sanitary sewage systems. The
department may also provide loans to eligible jurisdictions or grants
to nonprofit organizations for the acquisition of real property when
the acquisition is directly related to the development of public
infrastructure projects to support dense, affordable residential
development in transit-proximate areas.
(3) An eligible jurisdiction seeking a loan from the residential
infrastructure program must:
(a) Designate a project area within its urban growth area
designated under RCW 36.70A.110 if the eligible jurisdiction plans
under RCW 36.70A.110, and demonstrate with official plans that overall
development within the project area will increase the supply of dense,
affordable residential development units and that the project area
currently, or will within eight years of the loan award, meets the
definitions of transit-proximate and will achieve minimum transit-supportive density;
(b) Demonstrate that designated infrastructure projects, for which
an eligible jurisdiction seeks funding:
(i) Are contained in the eligible jurisdiction's capital facilities
element of the comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.070 if the eligible
jurisdiction plans under RCW 36.70A.070;
(ii) Maximize the use of existing infrastructure; and
(iii) Will increase existing system capacity to accommodate
projected population growth in a manner that supports infill and
redevelopment of existing urban areas;
(c) Demonstrate a commitment to promoting affordable residential
development within the designated project area through:
(i) Local funding commitments to affordable residential housing
projects in the proposed project area; or
(ii) The official adoption and implementation of policies and
ordinances that include affordable housing incentive initiatives, such
as those outlined within RCW 36.70A.540, or other policies and programs
intended to promote the creation of affordable housing;
(d) Include a plan to construct, or pay for the construction of,
comparable replacement housing within the eligible jurisdiction when
housing units are lost as a direct result of the public infrastructure
projects funded under this program. A residential unit lost as a
result of the infrastructure project must be replaced one-for-one with
a unit at an equal or better affordability rate, and relocation
assistance must be paid to any displaced households. Projects
receiving financing from the residential infrastructure program must
comply with any relocation standards and requirements and real property
acquisition policies established by the department as a condition of
residential infrastructure program assistance; and
(e) Commit to paying the prevailing wage as described under RCW
39.12.020 for each infrastructure project.
(4) A nonprofit organization seeking grant funds from the
residential infrastructure program must:
(a) Demonstrate that the funding will support public infrastructure
projects or the acquisition of property related to the development of
infrastructure projects, as described in subsection (2) of this
section, related to a specific affordable residential development that
has also received a commitment of funding from the Washington housing
trust fund under chapter 43.185 or 43.185A RCW;
(b) Demonstrate that the area in which the infrastructure project
will take place is within an urban growth area designated by a local
jurisdiction under RCW 36.70A.110 if the local jurisdiction plans under
RCW 36.70A.110, and demonstrate with official plans from the
jurisdiction that overall development within the project area will
increase the supply of dense, affordable residential development and
that the project area currently, or will within eight years of the
grant award, meets the definitions of transit-proximate and will
achieve minimum transit-supportive density;
(c) Demonstrate that the specific affordable housing development
described in (a) of this subsection will, within eight years of the
grant award, contribute to an increase in the supply of dense,
affordable residential development within the area referenced in (b) of
this subsection; and
(d) Comply with the requirements of subsection (3)(d) of this
section, related to the provision of comparable replacement housing and
relocation standards and requirements.
(5) The department must determine each year the total amount of
funding available in loans and grants and each county's share based on
the percentage of statewide real estate excise tax collections that
came from the county, and must establish the total amount of financial
assistance to be appropriated to eligible jurisdiction and nonprofit
organization applicants in each county. Individual project allocations
must be based on: (a) The total amount of money appropriated to the
county under the program; (b) the quality of applications received; (c)
the best available projections of total revenue likely to be available
for the program for the subsequent three years; and (d) relative
density within the county, with a focus on building infrastructure in
the most dense parts of the county. The total amount of financial
assistance allocated must not exceed ten million dollars per project
loan for eligible jurisdictions and not exceed one million dollars per
project grant for nonprofit organizations. The maximum project funding
limits established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by
the office of financial management every other year beginning July 1,
2011, based upon changes in the consumer price index during the time
period since the last adjustment. If the bureau of labor and
statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within
the state, the index covering the greatest number of people, covering
areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all
items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section.
The office of financial management must calculate the new maximum
project funding limits and transmit those new limits to the department.
(6) Loan interest rates must not exceed one-half of one percent a
year. The interest rate must be noted in the closing documents for all
loans, and must be included in all grant contracts for use in the event
the grant must be repaid with interest. The department must establish
policies, priorities, and procedures by which all or part of a loan may
be forgiven if an eligible jurisdiction:
(a) Creates a significantly greater number of affordable
residential housing units within the project area than the number
agreed to during loan contract negotiations;
(b) Creates a significant number of residential units that are
available and affordable to households of income levels significantly
below the maximum income levels allowable under the program; or
(c) Significantly exceeds program expectations in other ways to be
identified by the department.
(7) During each fiscal year in which funds are available for use by
the department for the residential infrastructure program, the
department must announce to all known interested parties, and through
major media throughout the state, a competitive application period for
each county of at least ninety days' duration. This announcement must
be made as often as the director deems appropriate for proper
utilization of resources.
(8) The department shall establish a competitive process for loan
and grant awards within each county and shall review and prioritize
proposals in consultation with the public works board and the
transportation improvement board or designees selected by those boards
to represent them, as well as county government.
(a) Within each county, priority must be awarded to projects that
include plans to:
(i) Maximize capacity to accommodate growth;
(ii) Maximize residential density;
(iii) Maximize the number of affordable housing units;
(iv) Maintain the affordability of the housing for the longest
period of time;
(v) Maximize affordability to low-income households and very low-income households;
(vi) Maximize access to public transit;
(vii) Demonstrate readiness to proceed; and
(viii) Take place in the most dense regions of the county.
(b) The department shall give additional consideration to
jurisdictions that demonstrate a commitment to creating receiving areas
for rural and resource land transfer of development rights, which may
be demonstrated through one of the following actions, listed in order
of highest value and priority:
(i) The jurisdiction has in place at the time of application,
within the area specified by the application or in other areas within
the jurisdiction, designated receiving sites for rural and resource
land transfer of development rights established through an ordinance by
the jurisdiction and an interlocal agreement with a sending site
jurisdiction that enables transfers from rural and resource lands;
(ii) The jurisdiction has in place at the time of application,
within the area specified by the application or in other areas within
the jurisdiction, designated receiving sites for rural and resource
land transfer of development rights established through an ordinance by
the jurisdiction; or
(iii) The jurisdiction states in its comprehensive plan at the time
of application a commitment to consider the development and
implementation of a rural and resource land transfer of development
rights program.
(9) If a county's share of residential infrastructure development
funds under subsection (5) of this section is not exhausted by February
of the year immediately following an allocation, remaining funds may be
allocated to unfunded applications from other counties. These
allocations must prioritize loans over grants, and any loan repayment
proceeds must be returned to the originating county's account for use
in future fiscal years.
(10) Eligible jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations that
receive support from the residential infrastructure program must report
to the department annually by December 31st of each year following the
date of the receipt of the loan or grant until ten years after the
completion of the infrastructure project.
(a) Reporting before and during the construction of the
infrastructure project must include information on the status of the
project, the estimated completion date, and any variations from the
approved proposal.
(b) Reporting after completion of the project must include a
description of how the project area is transit-proximate and has
achieved transit-supportive density requirements or how the eligible
jurisdiction or nonprofit organization is working toward complying with
those requirements. The report must also include information about the
status of the residential development occurring within the project
area, including:
(i) The total number of residential units developed or under
construction; and
(ii) The total number of residential units meeting the definition
of affordable residential development.
(11)(a) If an infrastructure project funded by the residential
infrastructure program is not completed by the agreed upon date or
varies substantially from the approved proposal in a way that will
result in the creation of less affordable residential development than
that agreed to at the time of the project funding award as a condition
of the funding, the eligible jurisdiction or nonprofit organization
associated with the project shall make the necessary project
adjustments as determined by the department or refund all or a portion
of the loan or grant amount.
(b) If an eligible jurisdiction rescinds its public commitment to
promoting affordable residential development within the designated
project area by changing officially adopted policies and ordinances or
failing to implement these policies and ordinances, eligible
jurisdictions may be required to refund all or a portion of the
principal loan amount plus compounded interest calculated at the
current market interest rate.
(c) If a nonprofit organization fails to produce the agreed upon
number of affordable residential units within its designated project,
the nonprofit organizations may be required to refund all or a portion
of its grant amount plus compounded interest calculated at the current
market interest rate.
(d) The department may grant a partial or total exemption from the
repayment requirement under this section if the department determines
that a project is substantially complete or that the property has been
substantially used in keeping with the original affordable residential
housing purpose of the loan or grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The residential infrastructure account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from transfers to the account under section 4
of this act, repayments of loans or grants made under section 2 of this
act, and other sources identified by the legislature must be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes identified in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By August 31, 2010, and by August 31st of each year thereafter,
the state treasurer shall transfer the excess real estate excise tax
growth amount from the general fund as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the residential infrastructure account created
in section 3 of this act; and
(b) Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan
revolving account created in RCW 43.160.080.
(2) By August 1, 2010, and by August 1st of each year thereafter,
the director of the office of financial management shall notify the
state treasurer of the amount to be transferred to the residential
infrastructure account and the public facilities construction loan
revolving account.
(3) By August 1, 2010, and by August 1st of each year thereafter,
the director of the office of financial management shall notify the
department of community, trade, and economic development of the county-by-county breakdown of real estate excise tax collections.
(4) RCW 43.135.035(4) does not apply to the transfers required
under this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Excess growth factor" means the difference between the annual
growth in real estate excise tax collections and the fiscal growth
factor, as determined under this chapter. If the difference is zero or
less, the excess growth factor is zero.
(b) "Excess real estate excise tax growth amount" means the lesser
of fifty million dollars or the dollar amount derived by multiplying
real estate excise tax collections by the excess growth factor.
(c) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state
personal income for the previous ten years.
(d) "Prior fiscal year" means the fiscal year prior to the fiscal
year in which the transfer under subsection (1) of this section is
made.
(e) "Real estate excise tax collections" means the excise tax
collections under chapter 82.45 RCW that are deposited into the general
fund under RCW 82.45.060(2)(c) in the prior fiscal year.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.45.060 and 2005 c 450 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property
at the rate of one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the
selling price.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
distributed as provided in this subsection.
(a) An amount equal to six and one-tenth percent of the proceeds of
this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.
(b) An amount equal to one and six-tenths percent of the proceeds
of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the city-county assistance account created in RCW 43.08.290.
(c) The remainder shall be deposited in the general fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.45.180 and 2006 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the
county treasurer shall collect a five-dollar fee on all transactions
required by this chapter where the transaction does not require the
payment of tax. A total of five dollars shall be collected in the form
of a tax and fee, where the calculated tax payment is less than five
dollars. Through June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
percent of the taxes collected by the county under this chapter and the
treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of
collection. After June 30, 2006, the county treasurer shall place one
and three-tenths percent of the taxes collected by the county under
this chapter and the treasurer's fee in the county current expense fund
to defray costs of collection. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter before July 1, 2006, the county treasurer shall pay over
to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for the
proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the
state under RCW 84.56.280. For taxes collected by the county under
this chapter after June 30, 2006, on a monthly basis the county
treasurer shall pay over to the state treasurer the month's
transmittal. The month's transmittal must be received by the state
treasurer by 12:00 p.m. on the last working day of each month. The
county treasurer shall account to the department for the month's
transmittal by the twentieth day of the month following the month in
which the month's transmittal was paid over to the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds ((in the general fund))
as provided in RCW 82.45.060(2).
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in this
subsection apply.
(i) "Close of business" means the time when the county treasurer
makes his or her daily deposit of proceeds.
(ii) "Month's transmittal" means all proceeds deposited by the
county through the close of business of the day that is two working
days before the last working day of the month. This definition of
"month's transmittal" shall not be construed as requiring any change in
a county's practices regarding the timing of its daily deposits of
proceeds.
(iii) "Proceeds" means moneys collected and receipted by the county
from the taxes imposed by this chapter, less the county's share of the
proceeds used to defray the county's costs of collection allowable in
(a) of this subsection.
(iv) "Working day" means a calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays,
and all legal holidays as provided in RCW 1.16.050.
(2) For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this
chapter, the department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the proceeds of any state tax ((in the general fund)) as
provided in RCW 82.45.060(2). The state treasurer shall deposit the
proceeds of any local taxes imposed under chapter 82.46 RCW in the
local real estate excise tax account hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a
tax under chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax
account shall be credited to the local real estate excise tax account
and distributed to the counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local real estate
excise tax account to the counties, cities, and towns the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority. The state treasurer
shall make the distribution under this subsection without
appropriation.
(3)(a) The real estate excise tax electronic technology account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. An appropriation is not
required for expenditures and the account is not subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Through June 30, 2010, the county treasurer shall collect an
additional five-dollar fee on all transactions required by this
chapter, regardless of whether the transaction requires the payment of
tax. The county treasurer shall remit this fee to the state treasurer
at the same time the county treasurer remits funds to the state under
subsection (1) of this section. The state treasurer shall place money
from this fee in the real estate excise tax electronic technology
account. By the twentieth day of the subsequent month, the state
treasurer shall distribute to each county treasurer according to the
following formula: Three-quarters of the funds available shall be
equally distributed among the thirty-nine counties; and the balance
shall be ratably distributed among the counties in direct proportion to
their population as it relates to the total state's population based on
most recent statistics by the office of financial management.
(c) When received by the county treasurer, the funds shall be
placed in a special real estate excise tax electronic technology fund
held by the county treasurer to be used exclusively for the
development, implementation, and maintenance of an electronic
processing and reporting system for real estate excise tax affidavits.
Funds may be expended to make the system compatible with the automated
real estate excise tax system developed by the department and
compatible with the processes used in the offices of the county
assessor and county auditor. Any funds held in the account that are
not expended by July 1, 2015, revert to the county capital improvements
fund in accordance with RCW 82.46.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.84.092 and 2008 c 128 s 19 and 2008 c 106 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the essential rail assistance
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the residential
infrastructure account, the resource management cost account, the rural
arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the safety and
education account, the site closure account, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---