BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.262 and 2005 c 356 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through digital programs.
"Digital programs" means electronically delivered learning that occurs
primarily away from the classroom. The superintendent of public
instruction has the authority to adopt rules to implement the revised
definition beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium for school districts
claiming state funding for the programs. The rules shall include but
not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours of learning activity as identified in
the student's learning plan, as long as the student is found, through
monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory progress; the rules shall
require districts providing programs under this section to nonresident
students to establish procedures that address, at a minimum, the
coordination of student counting for state funding so that no student
is counted for more than one full-time equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering,
or contracting under RCW 28A.150.305 to offer, a digital program to
adopt and annually review written policies for each program and program
provider and to receive an annual report on its digital learning
programs from its staff;
(3) Requiring each school district offering or contracting to offer
a digital program to report annually to the superintendent of public
instruction on the types of programs and course offerings, and number
of students participating;
(4) Requiring completion of a program self-evaluation;
(5) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(6) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the digital program be provided by certificated
instructional staff;
(7) Requiring each school district offering courses or programs to
identify the ratio of certificated instructional staff to full-time
equivalent students enrolled in such courses or programs, and to
include a description of their ratio as part of the reports required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(8) Requiring reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work; the methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(9) Requiring, for each student receiving instruction in a digital
program, a learning plan that includes a description of course
objectives and information on the requirements a student must meet to
successfully complete the program or courses. The rules shall allow
course syllabi and other additional information to be used to meet the
requirement for a learning plan;
(10) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using, for full-time students, the
state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. However, part-time students
who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments required
under chapter 28A.655 RCW. The rules shall address how students who
reside outside the geographic service area of the school district are
to be assessed;
(11) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with certificated instructional staff at least
weekly until the student completes the course objectives or the
requirements in the learning plan. Direct personal contact is for the
purposes of instruction, review of assignments, testing, evaluation of
student progress, or other learning activities. Direct personal
contact may include the use of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging,
interactive video communication, or other means of digital
communication;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide digital learning programs
to receive accreditation through the ((state accreditation program or
through the regional accreditation program)) northwest association of
accredited schools, a national accreditation program, or an
accreditation program listed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction with the endorsement of the Washington coalition for
online learning;
(13) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide digital learning to
provide information to students and parents on whether or not the
courses or programs: Cover one or more of the school district's
learning goals or of the state's essential academic learning
requirements or whether they permit the student to meet one or more of
the state's or district's graduation requirements; and
(14) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
digital courses to a student provide the parent or guardian of the
student, prior to the student's enrollment, with a description of any
difference between home-based education as described in chapter 28A.200
RCW and the enrollment option selected by the student. The parent or
guardian shall sign documentation attesting to his or her understanding
of the difference and the documentation shall be retained by the
district and made available for audit.

--- END ---