BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2009-10 school year, the legislature intends
to begin a six-year process to equalize the salary allocations to
school districts for state-funded staff pursuant to state basic
education appropriation sections of the biennial budget. By the 2014-15 school year, the salary allocation amounts received by school
districts for certificated instructional staff, classified staff, and
certificated administrative staff shall be the same.
(2) To fulfill the obligation in this section, the salary
allocations to school districts shall be adjusted on the schedule in
this subsection.
(a) In the 2009-10 school year, each school district that in the
2008-09 school year is receiving a base salary allocation for
certificated instructional staff that is below the highest base salary
allocation for certificated instructional staff according to
legislative evaluation and accountability program document 2 referenced
in the biennial budget shall receive an additional allocation
sufficient to make up one-sixth of the difference between that
districts' level and the highest level.
(b) In the 2009-10 school year, each school district that in the
2008-09 school year is receiving a salary allocation for classified
staff or a salary allocation for certificated administrative staff that
is below the highest salary allocation for classified staff or
certificated administrative staff according to legislative evaluation
and accountability program document 2 referenced in the biennial budget
shall receive an additional allocation sufficient to make up one-sixth
of the difference between that districts' level and the highest level.
(c) In each year thereafter, an additional one-sixth, as determined
in (a) and (b) of this subsection shall continue to be added to the
salary allocations until all school districts reach the highest
allocation in all salary allocation categories in the 2014-15 school
year.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2006 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) ((and)),
(4), and (5) of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy
percentage as defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2011, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) For levy collections in calendar years 2010 through 2015, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the difference between the salary allocation amounts that would have
been received if the provisions of section 1 of this act had been in
effect for each respective school year and the salary allocations
received in the prior school year, reduced by the additional
allocations actually received pursuant to section 1 of this act.
(6) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((6))) (7) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable
to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy
reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after
the start of the current school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by
using prior school year data in place of current school year data.
Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school
districts from cities or counties.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((8))) (9) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((9))) (10) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((10))) (11) The superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the
pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((4))) (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2010 through 2015, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the difference between the salary allocation amounts that would have
been received if the provisions of section 1 of this act had been in
effect for each respective school year and the salary allocations
received in the prior school year, reduced by the additional
allocations actually received pursuant to section 1 of this act.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((5))) (6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under subsection
(3) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(((6))) (7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((8))) (9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((9))) (10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Every school district on an annual basis must provide the office of
the superintendent of public instruction with a report outlining the
total compensation and taxable benefits it pays to each individual
staff member it employs. The report must include the following:
(1) The total salary and compensation from supplemental contracts,
and any additional salary compensation, including, but not limited to,
payment for coaching, payment for helping with extracurricular
activities, or payment for working with before or after school
programs, paid to each individual staff member by the school district
and reported on the employee's federal W2 forms;
(2) Any taxable benefits provided to the individual staff member;
and
(3) The staff member's job title and a brief description of those
payments made to the staff member above his or her base salary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---