BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.192 and 2001 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 77.15.194
through 77.15.198.
(1) "Animal" means any nonhuman vertebrate.
(2) "Body-gripping trap" means a trap that grips an animal's body
or body part. Body-gripping trap includes, but is not limited to,
steel-jawed leghold traps, padded-jaw leghold traps, Conibear traps,
neck snares, and nonstrangling foot snares. Cage and box traps,
suitcase-type live beaver traps, and ((common rat and mouse)) traps
used to capture old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the
order Rodentia and new world rats and mice of the family Cricetidae of
the order Rodentia are not considered body-gripping traps.
(3) "Person" means a human being and, where appropriate, a public
or private corporation, an unincorporated association, a partnership,
a government, or a governmental instrumentality.
(4) "Raw fur" means a pelt that has not been processed for purposes
of retail sale.
(5) "Animal problem" means any animal that threatens or damages
timber or private property or threatens or injures livestock or any
other domestic animal.

--- END ---