BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.35D.020 and 2006 c 263 s 330 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(2) "High-performance public buildings" means high-performance
public buildings designed, constructed, and certified to a standard as
identified in this chapter.
(3) "Institutions of higher education" means the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
the community colleges, and the technical colleges.
(4) "Globes standard" means the level of a building's
sustainability and energy efficiency performance as determined by the
green building initiative's green globes rating system.
(5) "Green globes rating system" means the environmental building
rating system established by the green building initiative.
(6) "LEED silver standard" means the United States green building
council leadership in energy and environmental design green building
rating standard, referred to as silver standard.
(((5))) (7)(a) "Major facility project" means: (i) A construction
project larger than five thousand gross square feet of occupied or
conditioned space as defined in the Washington state energy code; or
(ii) a building renovation project when the cost is greater than fifty
percent of the assessed value and the project is larger than five
thousand gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space as defined
in the Washington state energy code.
(b) "Major facility project" does not include: (i) Projects for
which the department, public school district, or other applicable
agency and the design team determine the LEED silver standard, the
globes standard, or the Washington sustainable school design protocol
to be not practicable; or (ii) transmitter buildings, pumping stations,
hospitals, research facilities primarily used for sponsored laboratory
experimentation, laboratory research, or laboratory training in
research methods, or other similar building types as determined by the
department. When the LEED silver standard or the globes standard is
determined to be not practicable for a project, then it must be
determined if any LEED standard or globes standard is practicable for
the project. If LEED standards, globes standard, or the Washington
sustainable school design protocol are not followed for the project,
the public school district or public agency shall report these reasons
to the department.
(((6))) (8) "Public agency" means every state office, officer,
board, commission, committee, bureau, department, and public higher
education institution.
(((7))) (9) "Public school district" means a school district
eligible to receive state basic education moneys pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(((8))) (10) "Washington sustainable school design protocol" means
the school design protocol and related information developed by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with
school districts and the school facilities advisory board.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.35D.030 and 2005 c 12 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any
funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a
financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed,
constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard or the
globes standard. ((This subsection applies to major facility projects
that have not entered the design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to
the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type of
building or facility.))
(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public
agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state
capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least
the LEED silver standard or globes standard. ((This subsection applies
to major facility projects that have not entered the grant application
process prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED
silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.))
(3) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any
funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a
financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, that are four stories
or under must use wood and wood products as building materials for
construction.
(4)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and
document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility
projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this
section.
(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to
the department on major facility projects and operating savings.
(((4))) (5) The department shall consolidate the reports required
in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section into one report and report to
the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered
year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
department shall also report on the implementation of this chapter,
including reasons why the LEED standard or globes standard was not used
as required by RCW 39.35D.020(((5))) (7)(b). The department shall make
recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter,
including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related to
implementing this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.35D.040 and 2006 c 263 s 331 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public school districts
receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed and
constructed to at least the LEED silver standard, the globes standard,
or the Washington sustainable school design protocol. To the extent
appropriate LEED silver, the globes, or Washington sustainable school
design protocol standards exist for the type of building or facility,
this subsection applies to major facility projects that have not
received project approval from the superintendent of public instruction
prior to: (a) July 1, 2006, for volunteering school districts; (b)
July 1, 2007, for class one school districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for
class two school districts.
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
superintendent of public instruction shall also report on the
implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED
standard, the globes standards, or Washington sustainable school design
protocol was not used as required by RCW 39.35D.020(((5))) (7)(b). The
superintendent of public instruction shall make recommendations
regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a
discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this
chapter.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public school
districts. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying compliance with the LEED silver
standard, the globes standard, or the Washington sustainable school
design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the
superintendent of public instruction, the department, and others at the
superintendent of public instruction's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the
superintendent of public instruction implement this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.35D.060 and 2006 c 263 s 332 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department, in consultation with affected public
agencies, shall develop and issue guidelines for administering this
chapter for public agencies. The purpose of the guidelines is to
define a procedure and method for employing and verifying activities
necessary for certification to at least the LEED silver standard or the
globes standard for major facility projects.
(b) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall amend their fee schedules for architectural and
engineering services to accommodate the requirements in the design of
major facility projects under this chapter.
(c) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall procure architecture and engineering services
consistent with chapter 39.80 RCW.
(d) Major facility projects designed to meet standards identified
in this chapter must include building commissioning as a critical cost-saving part of the construction process. This process includes input
from the project design and construction teams and the project
ownership representatives.
(e) As provided in the request for proposals for construction
services, the operating agency shall hold a preproposal conference for
prospective bidders to discuss compliance with and achievement of
standards identified in this chapter for prospective respondents.
(2) The department shall create a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of representatives from the design and
construction industry involved in public works contracting, personnel
from the affected public agencies responsible for overseeing public
works projects, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
and others at the department's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the department
implement this chapter.
(3) The department and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.35D.070 and 2005 c 12 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
A member of the design or construction teams may not be held liable
for the failure of a major facility project to meet the LEED silver
standard, the globes standard, or other LEED standard or globes
standard established for the project as long as a good faith attempt
was made to achieve the LEED or globes standard set for the project.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.35D.090 and 2005 c 12 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent and an established goal of the LEED program as
authored by the United States green building council and the green
globes rating system authored by the green building initiative to
increase demand for building materials and products that are extracted
and manufactured locally, thereby reducing the environmental impacts
and to support the local economy. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to emphasize this defined goal and establish a priority to
use Washington state based resources, building materials, products,
industries, manufacturers, and other businesses to provide economic
development to Washington state and to meet the objectives of this
chapter.

--- END ---