BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that research has
shown the importance of reducing environmental impacts through building
design. The primary focus on building designs has been an attempt to
reduce heating and cooling requirements over the course of a building's
lifetime. However, what has been overlooked are opportunities to
reduce greenhouse gas emissions and other environmental impacts at
earlier stages in the building and construction design process. The
selection of building materials and products, such as using wood and
wood products in the design stage, provides substantial opportunities
to reduce lifetime greenhouse gas emissions. A key component of
life-cycle cost analysis is the energy expended in the manufacturing
and production of the building materials being considered in the
construction of public facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.35.030 and 2001 c 214 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter the following words and phrases
shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Public agency" means every state office, officer, board,
commission, committee, bureau, department, and all political
subdivisions of the state.
(2) "Department" means the state department of general
administration.
(3) "Major facility" means any publicly owned or leased building
having twenty-five thousand square feet or more of usable floor space.
(4) "Initial cost" means the moneys required for the capital
construction or renovation of a major facility.
(5) "Renovation" means additions, alterations, or repairs within
any twelve-month period which exceed fifty percent of the value of a
major facility and which will affect any energy system.
(6) "Economic life" means the projected or anticipated useful life
of a major facility as expressed by a term of years.
(7) "Embodied energy" means the total amount of fossil fuel energy
consumed to extract raw materials and to manufacture, assemble,
transport, and install the materials in a building. "Embodied energy"
includes the initial collection of the resource, refinement, transport,
product manufacture, packaging, installation, maintenance,
refurbishment, and eventual demolition and disposal or recycling.
(8) "Energy management system" means a program, energy efficiency
equipment, technology, device, or other measure including, but not
limited to, a management, educational, or promotional program, smart
appliance, meter reading system that provides energy information
capability, computer software or hardware, communications equipment or
hardware, thermostat or other control equipment, together with related
administrative or operational programs, that allows identification and
management of opportunities for improvement in the efficiency of energy
use, including but not limited to a measure that allows:
(a) Energy consumers to obtain information about their energy usage
and the cost of energy in connection with their usage;
(b) Interactive communication between energy consumers and their
energy suppliers;
(c) Energy consumers to respond to energy price signals and to
manage their purchase and use of energy; or
(d) For other kinds of dynamic, demand-side energy management.
(((8))) (9) "Life-cycle cost" means the initial cost and cost of
operation of a major facility over its economic life. This shall be
calculated as the initial cost plus the operation, maintenance, and
energy costs over its economic life, reflecting anticipated increases
in these costs discounted to present value at the current rate for
borrowing public funds, as determined by the office of financial
management. The energy cost projections used shall be those provided
by the department. The department shall update these projections at
least every two years.
(((9))) (10) "Life-cycle cost analysis" includes, but is not
limited to, the following elements:
(a) The coordination and positioning of a major facility on its
physical site;
(b) The amount of embodied energy used in the building materials of
a major facility;
(c) The amount and type of fenestration employed in a major
facility;
(((c))) (d) The amount of insulation incorporated into the design
of a major facility;
(((d))) (e) The variable occupancy and operating conditions of a
major facility; and
(((e))) (f) An energy-consumption analysis of a major facility.
(((10))) (11) "Energy systems" means all utilities, including, but
not limited to, heating, air-conditioning, ventilating, lighting, and
the supplying of domestic hot water.
(((11))) (12) "Energy-consumption analysis" means the evaluation of
all energy systems and components by demand and type of energy
including the internal energy load imposed on a major facility by its
occupants, equipment, and components, and the external energy load
imposed on a major facility by the climatic conditions of its location.
An energy-consumption analysis of the operation of energy systems of a
major facility shall include, but not be limited to, the following
elements:
(a) The comparison of three or more system alternatives, at least
one of which shall include renewable energy systems, and one of which
shall comply at a minimum with the sustainable design guidelines of the
United States green building council leadership in energy and
environmental design silver standard or similar design standard as may
be adopted by rule by the department;
(b) The simulation of each system over the entire range of
operation of such facility for a year's operating period; and
(c) The evaluation of the energy consumption of component equipment
in each system considering the operation of such components at other
than full or rated outputs.
The energy-consumption analysis shall be prepared by a professional
engineer or licensed architect who may use computers or such other
methods as are capable of producing predictable results.
(((12))) (13) "Renewable energy systems" means methods of facility
design and construction and types of equipment for the utilization of
renewable energy sources including, but not limited to, hydroelectric
power, active or passive solar space heating or cooling, domestic solar
water heating, windmills, waste heat, biomass and/or refuse-derived
fuels, photovoltaic devices, and geothermal energy.
(((13))) (14) "Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two
or more forms of energy from a common fuel or energy source. Where
these forms are electricity and thermal energy, then the operating and
efficiency standards established by 18 C.F.R. Sec. 292.205 and the
definitions established by 18 C.F.R. 292.202 (c) through (m) as of July
28, 1991, shall apply.
(((14))) (15) "Selected buildings" means educational, office,
residential care, and correctional facilities that are designed to
comply with the design standards analyzed and recommended by the
department.
(((15))) (16) "Design standards" means the heating, air-conditioning, ventilating, and renewable resource systems identified,
analyzed, and recommended by the department as providing an efficient
energy system or systems based on the economic life of the selected
buildings.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.35.040 and 1994 c 242 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever a public agency determines that any major facility is to
be constructed or renovated, such agency shall cause to be included in
the design phase of such construction or renovation a provision that
requires a life-cycle cost analysis ((conforming)) that includes the
calculation of the amount of embodied energy used in all building
materials and that conforms with the guidelines developed in RCW
39.35.050 to be prepared for such facility. Such analysis shall be
approved by the agency prior to the commencement of actual construction
or renovation. A public agency may accept the facility design if the
agency is satisfied that the life-cycle cost analysis provides for: An
efficient energy system or systems based on the economic life of the
major facility; and due consideration of low embodied energy building
materials.
Nothing in this section prohibits the construction or renovation of
major facilities which utilize renewable energy systems.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.35.050 and 2001 c 214 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, in consultation with affected public agencies,
shall develop and issue guidelines for administering this chapter. The
purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and method for
performance of life-cycle cost analysis to promote the selection of
low-life-cycle cost alternatives. At a minimum, the guidelines must
contain provisions that:
(1) Address energy considerations during the planning phase of the
project;
(2) Identify energy components and system alternatives including
energy management systems, renewable energy systems, and cogeneration
applications prior to commencing the energy consumption analysis;
(3) Establish a method for calculating the embodied energy used in
building materials for construction of a major facility;
(4) Identify simplified methods to assure the lowest life-cycle
cost alternatives for selected buildings with between twenty-five
thousand and one hundred thousand square feet of usable floor area;
(((4))) (5) Identify simplified methods to ensure low embodied
energy building materials are used in the building design;
(6) Establish times during the design process for preparation,
review, and approval or disapproval of the life-cycle cost analysis;
(((5))) (7) Specify the assumptions to be used for escalation and
inflation rates, equipment service lives, economic building lives, and
maintenance costs;
(((6))) (8) Determine life-cycle cost analysis format and submittal
requirements to meet the provisions of chapter 201, Laws of 1991;
(((7))) (9) Provide for review and approval of life-cycle cost
analysis.

--- END ---