BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.02.030 and 1980 c 162 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The supreme court may, by court rule, establish a method of
making a record of the proceedings of a)) All courts of limited
jurisdiction must use electronic recording equipment to record oral
testimony and other oral proceedings for purposes of review.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.02.040 and 1980 c 162 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator for the courts shall supervise the selection,
installation, and operation of ((any)) the electronic recording
equipment used in courts of limited jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
All of the superior courts must use electronic recording equipment
to record oral testimony and other oral proceedings for purposes of
review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 2.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator for the courts shall supervise the selection,
installation, and operation of the electronic recording equipment used
in the superior courts.

--- END ---