BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is the policy of the state of Washington to provide for the safe and
efficient use of public roads and highways by all types of vehicles
that are authorized to use these roads and highways. In furtherance of
this policy, the legislature finds that many existing vehicle-activated
traffic control signals are operated or installed in a manner that does
not allow for the routine and reliable detection of motorcycles and
bicycles necessary for signal change. It is the policy of the
legislature that this problem be avoided in all new and substantially
upgraded vehicle-activated traffic control signals and that existing
vehicle-activated traffic control signals be operated to detect
motorcycles and bicycles where currently capable consistent with safe
traffic control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Arterial" means a public road or highway that is designated or
qualifies as a principal or minor arterial under a state or local law,
ordinance, regulation, or plan.
(b) "Bicycle" means a human-powered vehicle with metallic wheels at
least sixteen inches in diameter or with metallic braking strips and
metallic components, not necessarily including the frame or fork, which
may be lawfully ridden on a public road or highway.
(c) "Bicycle route" means a route (i) that is designated as a route
for bicycle use in a state or local law, ordinance, rule, or plan, or
(ii) that provides bicycle access to urban areas that are not
reasonably and conveniently accessible through other bicycle routes.
The level of existing or projected use by bicyclists is a factor to
consider in determining whether a bicycle route provides access that is
not reasonably and conveniently available from other bicycle routes.
An intersection that provides necessary linkages in a bicycle route or
between routes is considered a part of the bicycle route or routes.
(d) "Design complete" means that all major design work for a new
vehicle-activated traffic control signal has been completed and that
the funding necessary for complete construction of the vehicle-activated traffic control signal has been firmly secured.
(e) "Existing vehicle-activated traffic control signal" means a
vehicle-activated traffic control signal that is in use or design
complete on or before the effective date of this section.
(f) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle (i) designed to travel on
not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, (ii) ridden by
a driver astride the motor unit or power train, (iii) designed to be
steered with a handle bar, and (iv) capable in its present condition of
being lawfully operated on a public road or highway.
(g) "Restricted right turn lane" means a right turn only lane where
a right turn is not allowed after stopping but only upon a green
signal.
(h) "Routinely and reliably detect motorcycles and bicycles" means
that the detection equipment at a vehicle-activated traffic control
signal is capable of detecting and will reliably detect a motorcycle or
bicycle (i) when the motorcycle or bicycle is present immediately
before a stop bar or crosswalk in the center of a lane at an
intersection or road entrance to such an intersection, or (ii) when the
motorcycle or bicycle is present at marked detection areas.
(i) "Vehicle-activated traffic control signal" means a traffic
control signal on a public road or highway that detects the presence of
a vehicle as a means to change a signal phase.
(2) During routine maintenance or monitoring activities, but no
later than four years after the effective date of this section:
(a) All existing vehicle-activated traffic control signals that do
not currently routinely and reliably detect motorcycles and bicycles
must be adjusted to do so to the extent that the existing equipment is
capable consistent with safe traffic control; and
(b) Where motorcycle and bicycle detection is limited to certain
areas other than immediately before the stop bar or crosswalk in the
center of a lane at a vehicle-activated traffic control signal, those
detection areas must be clearly marked on the pavement at left turn
lanes, through lanes, and limited right turn lanes. These detection
areas must also be marked to allow a bicyclist to leave a bicycle lane
to enter a detection area, if necessary, to cross an intersection.
Pavement markings must be consistent with the standards described in
the state of Washington's "Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices
for Streets and Highways" obtainable from the department of
transportation.
(3)(a) If at least a substantial portion of detection equipment at
an existing vehicle-activated traffic control signal on an arterial or
bicycle route is scheduled to be replaced or upgraded, the replaced or
upgraded detection equipment must routinely and reliably detect
motorcycles and bicycles. For purposes of this subsection (3)(a),
"substantial portion" means that the proposed replacement or upgrade
will cost more than fifteen percent of the cost of full replacement or
upgraded detection equipment that would routinely and reliably detect
motorcycles and bicycles.
(b) If at least a substantial portion of detection equipment at an
existing vehicle-activated traffic control signal on a public road or
highway that is not an arterial or bicycle route is scheduled to be
replaced or upgraded, the replaced or upgraded detection equipment must
routinely and reliably detect motorcycles and bicycles. For purposes
of this subsection (3)(b), "substantial portion" means that the
proposed replacement or upgrade will cost more than fifty percent of
the cost of full replacement or upgraded detection equipment that would
routinely and reliably detect motorcycles and bicycles.
(4) All vehicle-activated traffic control signals that are design
complete and put in operation after the effective date of this section
must be designed and operated, when in use, to routinely and reliably
detect motorcycles and bicycles, including the detection of bicycles in
bicycle lanes that cross an intersection.

--- END ---