BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the cleaning up
of radioactive waste at the Hanford site is crucial to the environment
in this state. The legislature further finds that the purpose of this
tax classification is to provide the same tax treatment allowed to
companies when production activities occurred at the Hanford site. The
legislature clarifies that it intended to include certain activities in
support of the cleanup that should benefit from the reduced business
and occupation tax rate.
It is the legislature's intent in enacting this act to ensure that
the radioactive waste cleanup business and occupation tax
classification applies to all activities funded by the United States
department of energy's environmental management budget and that any
doubts or ambiguities in RCW 82.04.263 should be resolved consistent
with this intent.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.263 and 1996 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
For the purposes of this chapter, "cleaning up radioactive waste
and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development" means the activities of handling, storing, treating,
immobilizing, stabilizing, or disposing of radioactive waste,
radioactive tank waste and capsules, nonradioactive hazardous solid and
liquid wastes, or spent nuclear fuel; spent nuclear fuel conditioning;
removal of contamination in soils and ground water; decontamination and
decommissioning of facilities; information technology and computer
support; services rendered in respect to infrastructure; security,
safety, and health services; and activities ((integral and necessary to
the direct)) supporting the performance of cleanup.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---