BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
practices of body piercing, tattooing, and other forms of body art
involve an invasive procedure with the use of needles, single-use
disposable sharps, reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry. These
practices may be dangerous when improper sterilization techniques are
used, presenting a risk of infecting the client with bloodborne
pathogens including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B, and
hepatitis C. It is in the interests of the public health, safety, and
welfare to establish requirements in the commercial practice of these
activities in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter and RCW 5.40.050 and 70.54.340 unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Body art" means the practice of physical cosmetic body
adornment including the use of branding and scarification. "Body art"
also includes the intentional production of scars upon the body. "Body
art" does not include any health-related procedures performed by
licensed health care practitioners under their scope of practice.
(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane to insert an object, including jewelry, for cosmetic
purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar tissue resulting from
or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing" does not include the use
of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce the earlobe in accordance
with the manufacturer's directions and applicable United States food
and drug administration requirements. "Body piercing" does not include
any health-related procedures performed by licensed health care
practitioners under their scope of practice, nor does anything in this
act authorize a person registered to engage in the business of body
piercing to implant or embed foreign objects into the human body or
otherwise engage in the practice of medicine.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(4) "Individual license" means a body art, body piercing, or tattoo
practitioner license issued under this chapter.
(5) "Location license" means a license issued under this chapter
for a shop or business.
(6) "Shop or business" means a body art, body piercing, or
tattooing shop or business.
(7) "Tattoo artist" means a person who practices the business of
tattooing for a fee.
(8) "Tattooing" means the introduction of an indelible mark,
figure, or decorative design by inserting nontoxic dyes or pigments
into or under the subcutaneous portion of the skin upon the body of a
live human being for cosmetic or figurative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In addition to any other duties imposed by
law, including RCW 18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director has the
following powers and duties:
(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance
with RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;
(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and
administration of licensing;
(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for
practitioners of body art, body piercing, or tattooing as determined by
the department of health;
(5) To maintain the official department record of applicants and
licensees;
(6) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all
licenses consistent with this chapter;
(7) To ensure that all informational notices produced and mailed by
the department regarding statutory and regulatory changes affecting any
particular class of licensees are mailed to each licensee in good
standing in the affected class whose mailing address on record with the
department has not resulted in mail being returned as undeliverable for
any reason; and
(8) To make information available to the department of revenue to
assist in collecting taxes from persons and businesses required to be
licensed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is unlawful for any person to engage
in a practice listed in subsection (2) of this section unless the
person has a license in good standing as required by this chapter. A
license issued under this chapter is considered to be "in good
standing" except when:
(a) The license has expired or has been canceled and has not been
renewed in accordance with section 6 of this act;
(b) The license has been denied, revoked, or suspended under
section 12 or 14 of this act, and has not been reinstated; or
(c) The license is held by a person who has not fully complied with
an order of the director issued under section 12 of this act requiring
the licensee to pay restitution or a fine, or to acquire additional
training.
(2) The director may take action under RCW 18.235.150 and
18.235.160 against any person who does any of the following without
first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required
by this chapter:
(a) Engages in the practice of body art, body piercing, or
tattooing; or
(b) Operates a shop or business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon completion of an application
approved by the department and payment of the proper fee, the director
shall issue the appropriate location license to any person who
completes an application approved by the department, provides
certification of insurance, and provides payment of the proper fee.
(2) The director may consult with the state board of health and the
department of labor and industries in establishing additional
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The director shall issue the appropriate
license to any applicant who meets the requirements as outlined in this
chapter. The director has the authority to set appropriate licensing
fees for body art, body piercing, and tattooing shops and businesses
and body art, body piercing, and tattooing individual practitioners.
Licensing fees for individual practitioners must be set in an amount
less than licensing fees for shops and businesses.
(2) Failure to renew a license by its expiration date subjects the
holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's renewal fee, at the
current rate.
(3) A person whose license has not been renewed within one year
after its expiration date must have his or her license canceled and
must be required to submit an application, pay the license fee, meet
current licensing requirements, and pass any applicable examination or
examinations, in addition to the other requirements of this chapter,
before the license may be reinstated.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes a person whose license has
expired to engage in a practice prohibited under section 4 of this act
until the license is renewed or reinstated.
(5) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established
by rule by the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license
to an applicant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this
section, licenses issued under this chapter expire as follows:
(a) A body art, body piercing, or tattooing shop or business
location license expires one year from issuance or when the insurance
required by section 8(1)(g) of this act expires, whichever occurs
first; and
(b) Body art, body piercing, or tattooing practitioner individual
licenses expire one year from issuance.
(2) The director may provide for expiration dates other than those
set forth in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of
establishing staggered renewal periods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A body art, body piercing, or tattooing
shop or business shall meet the following minimum requirements:
(a) Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for
sleeping or residential purposes;
(b) Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate
toilet facilities located within or adjacent to the shop or business;
(c) Any room used wholly or in part as a shop or business may not
be used for residential purposes, except that toilet facilities may be
used for both residential and business purposes;
(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as
appropriate;
(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of equipment and
substances used in the practices under this chapter;
(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes; and
(g) Certify that the shop or business is covered by a public
liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one hundred
thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability.
(2) The director may by rule determine other requirements that are
necessary for safety and sanitation of shops or businesses. The
director may consult with the state board of health and the department
of labor and industries in establishing minimum shop and business
safety requirements.
(3) Upon receipt of a written complaint that a shop or business has
violated any provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, or the
rules adopted under either chapter, or at least once every two years
for an existing shop or business, the director or the director's
designee shall inspect each shop or business. If the director
determines that any shop or business is not in compliance with this
chapter, the director shall send written notice to the shop or
business. A shop or business which fails to correct the conditions to
the satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time is, upon due
notice, subject to the penalties imposed by the director under RCW
18.235.110. The director may enter any shop or business during
business hours for the purpose of inspection. The director may
contract with health authorities of local governments to conduct the
inspections under this subsection.
(4) A shop or business shall obtain a certificate of registration
from the department of revenue.
(5) Shop or business location licenses issued by the department
must be posted in the shop or business's reception area.
(6) Body art, body piercing, and tattooing practitioner individual
licenses issued by the department must be posted at the licensed
person's work station.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The director shall prepare and provide to
all licensed shops or businesses a notice to consumers. At a minimum,
the notice must state that body art, body piercing, and tattooing shops
or businesses are required to be licensed, that shops or businesses are
required to maintain minimum safety and sanitation standards, that
customer complaints regarding shops or businesses may be reported to
the department, and a telephone number and address where complaints may
be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 It is a violation of this chapter for any
person to engage in the commercial practice of body art, body piercing,
or tattooing except in a licensed shop or business with the appropriate
individual body art, body piercing, or tattooing license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action
against any applicant or licensee under this chapter if the licensee or
applicant:
(1) Has been found to have violated any provisions of chapter 19.86
RCW;
(2) Has engaged in a practice prohibited under section 4 of this
act without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the
license required by this chapter;
(3) Has failed to display licenses required in this chapter; or
(4) Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If, following a hearing, the director finds
that any person or an applicant or licensee has violated any provision
of this chapter or any rule adopted under it, the director may impose
one or more of the following penalties:
(1) Denial of a license or renewal;
(2) Revocation or suspension of a license;
(3) A fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation;
(4) Issuance of a reprimand or letter of censure;
(5) Placement of the licensee on probation for a fixed period of
time;
(6) Restriction of the licensee's authorized scope of practice;
(7) Requiring the licensee to make restitution or a refund as
determined by the director to any individual injured by the violation;
or
(8) Requiring the licensee to obtain additional training or
instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Any person aggrieved by the refusal of the
director to issue any license provided for in this chapter, or to renew
the same, or by the revocation or suspension of any license issued
under this chapter or by the application of any penalty under section
12 of this act has the right to appeal the decision of the director to
the superior court of the county in which the person maintains his or
her place of business. The appeal must be filed within thirty days of
the director's decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The department shall immediately suspend
the license of a person who has been certified under RCW 74.20A.320 by
the department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license is automatic upon the department's receipt of
a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Washington body art, body piercing, and tattooing act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 19 RCW 70.54.340 and 2001 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of health shall adopt by rule requirements, in
accordance with nationally recognized professional standards, for
precautions against the spread of disease, including the sterilization
of needles and other instruments, including single-use disposable
sharps, reusable sharps, and jewelry, employed by electrologists,
persons engaged in the practice of body art, body piercing, and tattoo
artists ((in accordance with nationally recognized professional
standards)). The secretary shall consider the ((universal)) standard
precautions for infection control, as recommended by the United States
centers for disease control, and guidelines for infection control, as
recommended by ((the national environmental health association and the
alliance of professional tattooists,)) national industry standards in
the adoption of these sterilization requirements.

Sec. 20 RCW 5.40.050 and 2001 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A breach of a duty imposed by statute, ordinance, or administrative
rule shall not be considered negligence per se, but may be considered
by the trier of fact as evidence of negligence; however, any breach of
duty as provided by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule relating
to: (1) Electrical fire safety, (2) the use of smoke alarms, (3)
sterilization of needles and instruments used by persons engaged in the
practice of body art, body piercing, tattooing, or electrology, or
other precaution against the spread of disease, as required under RCW
70.54.350, or (4) driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, shall be considered negligence per se.

Sec. 21 RCW 43.24.150 and 2008 c 119 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.96 RCW, landscape architects;
(d) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(e) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(f) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(g) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(h) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;
(i) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(k) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(l) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(m) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public; ((and))
(n) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares; and
(o) Chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 23 of
this act).
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall
not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
shall include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The director of licensing and the
department of health, beginning on the effective date of this section,
may take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is
implemented July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 1 through 18 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 1 through 21 of this act take
effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---