BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of
transportation shall conduct a state route number 2 route development
plan that will identify essential improvements needed between the port
of Everett/Naval Station and approaching the state route number 9
interchange near the city of Snohomish.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---