BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.015 and 1989 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 39.04.010, a ((state))
contracting authority representing the state or municipality is
authorized to negotiate an adjustment to a bid price, based upon agreed
changes to the contract plans and specifications, with a low responsive
bidder under the following conditions:
(1) All bids for a state or municipal public works project
involving buildings and any associated building utilities and
appendants exceed the available funds, as certified by the appropriate
fiscal officer;
(2) The apparent low responsive bid does not exceed the available
funds by: (a) Five percent on projects valued under one million
dollars; (b) the greater of fifty thousand dollars or two and one-half
percent for projects valued between one million dollars and five
million dollars; or (c) the greater of one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars or one percent for projects valued over five million dollars;
and
(3) The negotiated adjustment will bring the bid price within the
amount of available funds.

--- END ---