BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
If the public body and the general contractor agree, in writing, on
a price for additional work, the public body must issue a change order
within sixty days of the written agreement. If the public body does
not issue a change order within the sixty days, interest shall accrue
on the dollar amount of the additional work satisfactorily completed
until a change order is issued. The public body shall pay this
interest at a rate of one percent per month. No interest may accrue on
a change order that is timely issued under this section. The general
contractor shall present a fully documented pay request for additional
work that is satisfactorily completed under a change order executed
between the public body and the general contractor. Payment of a fully
documented pay request must then be made by the public body in
accordance with chapter 39.76 RCW.

--- END ---