BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.050 and 1998 c 190 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this
chapter, "conviction" means:
(a) A final conviction in a state or municipal court;
(b) A failure to appear at a hearing to contest an infraction or
criminal citation; or
(c) An unvacated forfeiture of bail paid as a final disposition for
an offense ((or an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited
to secure the defendant's appearance in court)).
(2) A plea of guilty, or a finding of guilt for a violation of this
title or rule of the commission or director constitutes a conviction
regardless of whether the imposition of sentence is deferred or the
penalty is suspended.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.15.700 and 2007 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall impose revocation and suspension of
privileges in the following circumstances:
(((1))) (a) Upon conviction, if directed by statute for an
offense((;)).
(((2))) (b) Upon conviction of a violation not involving commercial
fishing, if the department finds that actions of the defendant
demonstrated a willful or wanton disregard for conservation of fish or
wildlife. ((Such)) Suspension of privileges under this subsection may
be permanent. ((This subsection (2) does not apply to violations
involving commercial fishing;
(3))) (c) If a person is convicted twice within ten years for a
violation involving unlawful hunting, killing, or possessing big
game((, the department shall order)). Revocation and suspension ((of))
under this subsection must be ordered for all hunting privileges for
two years. ((RCW 77.12.722 or 77.16.050 as it existed before June 11,
1998, may comprise one of the convictions constituting the basis for
revocation and suspension under this subsection;
(4)(a))) (d) If a person violates, three times or more in a ten-year period, recreational hunting or fishing laws or rules for which
the person: (i) Is convicted of an offense((,)); (ii) has an
uncontested notice of infraction((,)); (iii) fails to appear at a
hearing to contest ((an)) a fish and wildlife infraction((,)); or (iv)
is found to have committed an infraction ((three times in ten years
involving any violation of recreational hunting or fishing laws or
rules, the department shall order a)). Revocation and suspension under
this subsection must be ordered of all recreational hunting and fishing
privileges for two years.
(((b))) (2)(a) A violation punishable as an infraction counts
towards the revocation and suspension of recreational hunting and
fishing privileges ((only where)) under this section if that violation
is:
(i) Punishable as a crime on July 24, 2005, and is subsequently
decriminalized; or
(ii) One of the following violations, as they exist on July 24,
2005: RCW 77.15.160 (((1) or (2))); WAC 220-56-116; WAC 220-56-315(11); or WAC 220-56-355 (1) through (4).
(((c))) (b) The commission may, by rule, designate ((additional))
infractions that do not count towards the revocation and suspension of
recreational hunting and fishing privileges.
(((5))) (3) If either the deferred education licensee or the
required nondeferred accompanying person, hunting under the authority
of RCW 77.32.155(2), is convicted of a violation of this title, except
for a violation of RCW 77.15.400 (1) through (3), the department may
revoke all hunting licenses and tags and may order a suspension of
((one)) either or both the deferred education licensee's and the
nondeferred accompanying person's hunting privileges for one year.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.15.310 and 2003 c 39 s 38 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful failure to use or maintain an
approved fish guard on a diversion device if the person owns, controls,
or operates a device used for diverting or conducting water from a
lake, river, or stream and:
(a) The device is not equipped with a fish guard, screen, or bypass
approved by the director as required by RCW ((77.55.040 or 77.55.320))
77.57.010 or 77.57.070; or
(b) The person knowingly fails to maintain or operate an approved
fish guard, screen, or bypass so as to effectively screen or prevent
fish from entering the intake.
(2) Unlawful failure to use or maintain an approved fish guard,
screen, or bypass on a diversion device is a gross misdemeanor.
Following written notification to the person from the department that
there is a violation, each day that a diversion device is operated
without an approved or maintained fish guard, screen, or bypass is a
separate offense.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.15.320 and 2000 c 107 s 241 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful failure to provide, maintain, or
operate a fishway for dam or other obstruction if the person owns,
operates, or controls a dam or other obstruction to fish passage on a
river or stream and:
(a) The dam or obstruction is not provided with a durable and
efficient fishway approved by the director as required by RCW
((77.55.060)) 77.57.030;
(b) Fails to maintain a fishway in efficient operating condition;
or
(c) Fails to continuously supply a fishway with a sufficient supply
of water to allow the free passage of fish.
(2) Unlawful failure to provide, maintain, or operate a fishway for
dam or other obstruction is a gross misdemeanor. Following written
notification to the person from the department that there is a
violation, each day of unlawful failure to provide, maintain, or
operate a fishway is a separate offense.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.15.610 and 1998 c 190 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who holds a fur buyer's license or taxidermy license
is guilty of unlawful use of a commercial wildlife license if the
person:
(a) Fails to have the license in possession while engaged in fur
buying or practicing taxidermy for commercial purposes; or
(b) Violates any rule of the department regarding reporting
requirements or the use, possession, display, or presentation of the
taxidermy or fur buyer's license.
(2) Unlawful use of a commercial wildlife license is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.32.470 and 2008 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two
dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for youth. There is an
additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license, to be deposited in
the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen
dollars for residents, thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five
dollars for resident seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent
surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research
account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to
five consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:
(i) One day - Seven dollars for residents and fourteen dollars for
nonresidents;
(ii) Two days - Ten dollars for residents and twenty dollars for
nonresidents;
(iii) Three days - Thirteen dollars for residents and twenty-six
dollars for nonresidents;
(iv) Four days - Fifteen dollars for residents and thirty dollars
for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - Seventeen dollars for residents and thirty-four
dollars for nonresidents.
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is seven dollars for a one-day
temporary combination fishing license for residents and nonresidents
for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.
(c) A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch
of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing
license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day
period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season
as defined by rule of the commission.
(e) The temporary combination fishing license fee for active duty
military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed
forces is the resident rate as set forth in (a) of this subsection.
Active duty military personnel must provide a valid military
identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary license to
qualify for the resident rate.
(f) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary
combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp, to be
deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is
only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.65.010 and 2005 c 20 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this title, a person ((may
not)) must have a license or permit issued by the director in order to
engage in any of the following activities ((without a license or permit
issued by the director)):
(a) Commercially fish for or take food fish or shellfish;
(b) Deliver from a commercial fishing vessel food fish or shellfish
taken for commercial purposes in offshore waters. As used in this
subsection, "deliver" means arrival at a place or port, and includes
arrivals from offshore waters to waters within the state and arrivals
from state or offshore waters;
(c) Operate a charter boat or commercial fishing vessel engaged in
a fishery;
(d) Engage in processing or wholesaling food fish or shellfish; or
(e) Act as a food fish guide ((for salmon)) for personal use in
freshwater rivers and streams, ((other than that part of the Columbia
river below the bridge at Longview)) except that a charter boat license
is required to operate a vessel from which a person may for a fee fish
for food fish in state waters listed in RCW 77.65.150(4)(b).
(2) No person may engage in the activities described in subsection
(1) of this section unless the licenses or permits required by this
title are in the person's possession, and the person is the named
license holder or an alternate operator designated on the license and
the person's license is not suspended.
(3) A valid Oregon license that is equivalent to a license under
this title is valid in the concurrent waters of the Columbia river if
the state of Oregon recognizes as valid the equivalent Washington
license. The director may identify by rule what Oregon licenses are
equivalent.
(4) No license or permit is required for the production or
harvesting of private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in
RCW 15.85.020 or for the delivery, processing, or wholesaling of such
aquatic products. However, if a means of identifying such products is
required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the exemption from
licensing or permit requirements established by this subsection applies
only if the aquatic products are identified in conformance with those
rules.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.65.370 and 1998 c 190 s 98 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person shall not offer or perform the services of a
((professional salmon)) food fish guide without a food fish guide
license in the taking of ((salmon)) food fish for personal use in
freshwater rivers and streams, ((other than in that part of the
Columbia river below the bridge at Longview, without a professional
salmon guide license)) except that a charter boat license is required
to operate a vessel from which a person may for a fee fish for food
fish in state waters listed in RCW 77.65.150(4)(b).
(2) Only an individual at least sixteen years of age may hold a
((professional salmon)) food fish guide license. No individual may
hold more than one ((professional salmon)) food fish guide license.

Sec. 9 RCW 77.65.440 and 2000 c 107 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall issue the personal licenses listed in this
section according to the requirements of this title. The licenses and
their annual fees are:

Personal License Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 77.95.090 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(1) Alternate Operator $ 35 $ 35 RCW 77.65.130

(2) Geoduck Diver $185 $295 RCW 77.65.410

(3) ((Salmon)) Food
Fish Guide $130 $630 RCW 77.65.370

(plus $20) (plus $100)

Sec. 10 RCW 77.15.510 and 2001 c 253 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of ((commercial)) acting as a game fish
((guiding)) guide, food fish guide, or chartering without a license
if:
(a) The person operates a charter boat and does not hold the
charter boat license required for the food fish taken;
(b) The person acts as a ((professional salmon)) food fish guide
and does not hold a ((professional salmon)) food fish guide license; or
(c) The person acts as a game fish guide and does not hold a game
fish guide license.
(2) ((Commercial)) Acting without a game fish ((guiding or
chartering without a)) guide license, food fish guide license, or
charter license is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.65.480 and 1991 sp.s. c 7 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A taxidermy license allows the holder to practice taxidermy for
((profit)) commercial purposes, as that term is defined in RCW
77.15.110. The fee for this license is one hundred eighty dollars.
(2) A fur dealer's license allows the holder to purchase, receive,
or resell raw furs for ((profit)) commercial purposes, as that term is
defined in RCW 77.15.110. The fee for this license is one hundred
eighty dollars.
(3) A ((fishing)) game fish guide license allows the holder to
offer or perform the services of a ((professional)) game fish guide in
the taking of game fish. The fee for this license is one hundred
eighty dollars for a resident and six hundred dollars for a
nonresident.
(4) A game farm license allows the holder to operate a game farm to
acquire, breed, grow, keep, and sell wildlife under conditions
prescribed by the rules adopted pursuant to this title. The fee for
this license is seventy-two dollars for the first year and forty-eight
dollars for each following year.
(5) A game fish stocking permit allows the holder to release game
fish into the waters of the state as prescribed by rule of the
commission. The fee for this permit is twenty-four dollars.
(6) A fishing or field trial permit allows the holder to promote,
conduct, hold, or sponsor a fishing or field trial contest in
accordance with rules of the commission. The fee for a fishing contest
permit is twenty-four dollars. The fee for a field trial contest
permit is twenty-four dollars.
(7)(a) An anadromous game fish buyer's license allows the holder to
purchase or sell steelhead trout and other anadromous game fish
harvested by Indian ((fishermen)) fishers lawfully exercising fishing
rights reserved by federal statute, treaty, or executive order, under
conditions prescribed by rule of the director. The fee for this
license is one hundred eighty dollars.
(b) An anadromous game fish buyer's license is not required for
those businesses that buy steelhead trout and other anadromous game
fish from Washington licensed game fish dealers and sell solely at
retail.

Sec. 12 RCW 77.15.552 and 2003 c 386 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a person is convicted of two or more qualifying commercial
fishing violations within a three-year period, the person's commercial
fishing license privileges ((to participate in the commercial fishery
to which the violations applied)) under chapter 77.65 RCW may be
suspended by the director for up to one year. A commercial ((fishery))
fishing license that is ((suspended under this section)) impacted by
this privilege suspension may not be transferred after the director
issues a notice of suspension, or used by an alternative operator or
transferred during the period of suspension, if the person who is the
subject of the suspension notice is the person who owns the commercial
fishery license.
(2) For the purposes of this section only, "qualifying commercial
fishing violation" means either:
(a) A conviction under RCW 77.15.500, 77.15.510, 77.15.520,
77.15.530, 77.15.550(1)(a), 77.15.570, 77.15.580, or 77.15.590;
(b) A gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial fish
harvesting, buying, or selling that is unlawful under the terms of the
license, this title, or the rules issued pursuant to this title, if the
quantity of unlawfully harvested, possessed, bought, or sold fish,
other than shellfish, groundfish, or coastal pelagic species of
baitfish totals greater than six percent, by weight, of the harvest
available for inspection at the time of citation and the cumulative
value of the unlawfully harvested fish is more than two hundred fifty
dollars at the time of citation;
(c) A gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial groundfish
or coastal pelagic baitfish harvest, buying, or selling that is
unlawful under the terms of the license, this title, or the rules
issued under this title, if: (i) The quantity of unlawfully harvested,
possessed, bought, or sold groundfish or coastal pelagic baitfish
totals greater than ten percent, by weight, of the harvest available
for inspection at the time of citation and has a cumulative value
greater than five hundred dollars; or (ii) the quantity, by weight, of
the unlawfully commercially harvested groundfish or coastal pelagic
baitfish is ten percent greater than the landing allowances provided
under rules adopted by the department for species categorized as over-fished by the national marine fisheries service; or
(d) A gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial shellfish
harvesting, buying, or selling that is unlawful under the terms of the
license, this title, or the rules issued pursuant to this title, if the
quantity of unlawfully harvested, possessed, bought, or sold shellfish:
(i) Totals greater than six percent of the harvest available for
inspection at the time of citation; and (ii) totals fifty or more
individual shellfish.
(3)(a) The director may refer a person convicted of one qualifying
commercial fishing violation to the license suspension review committee
if the director feels that the qualifying commercial fishing violation
was of a severe enough magnitude to justify suspension of the
individual's license renewal privileges.
(b) The director may refer any person convicted of one egregious
shellfish violation to the license suspension review committee.
(c) For the purposes of this section only, "egregious shellfish
violation" means a gross misdemeanor or felony involving commercial
shellfish harvesting, buying, or selling that is unlawful under the
terms of the license, this title, or the rules issued pursuant to this
title, if the quantity of unlawfully harvested, possessed, bought, or
sold shellfish: (i) Totals more than twenty percent of the harvest
available for inspection at the time of citation; (ii) totals five
hundred or more individual shellfish; and (iii) is valued at two
thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(4) A person who has a commercial fishing license suspended or
revoked under this section may file an appeal with the license
suspension review committee pursuant to RCW 77.15.554. An appeal must
be filed within thirty-one days of notice of license suspension or
revocation. If an appeal is filed, the suspension or revocation issued
by the department does not take effect until after the license
suspension review committee has delivered an opinion. If no appeal is
filed within thirty-one days of notice of license suspension or
revocation, the right to an appeal is considered waived. All
suspensions ordered under this section take effect either thirty-one
days following the conviction for the second qualifying commercial
fishing violation, or upon a decision pursuant to RCW 77.15.554,
whichever is later.
(5) A fishing privilege suspended under this section is in addition
to the statutory penalties assigned to the underlying crime.
(6) For the purposes of this section only, the burden is on the
state to show the dollar amount or the percent of a harvest that is
comprised of unlawfully harvested, bought, or sold individual fish or
shellfish.

Sec. 13 RCW 77.08.010 and 2008 c 277 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title or
rules adopted under this title unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable
of being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line
operated without rod or reel.
(2) "Aquatic invasive species" means any invasive, prohibited,
regulated, unregulated, or unlisted aquatic animal or plant species as
defined under subsections (((48) through (53))) (3), (28), (40), (44),
(58), and (59) of this section, aquatic noxious weeds as defined under
RCW 17.26.020(5)(c), and aquatic nuisance species as defined under RCW
77.60.130(1).
(3) "Aquatic plant species" means an emergent, submersed, partially
submersed, free-floating, or floating-leaving plant species that grows
in or near a body of water or wetland.
(4) "Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game
birds, or game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by
a person, as specified by rule of the commission for a particular
period of time, or as to size, sex, or species.
(5) "Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some or all
species of wild animals or wild birds is prohibited.
(6) "Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places
or waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an
open season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, game fish, food fish, or
shellfish that do not conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission as an open season or
that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, harvest,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.
(7) "Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or
other body of water, where fishing or harvesting is prohibited.
(8) "Commercial" means related to or connected with buying,
selling, or bartering.
(9) "Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.
(10) "Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters
of the Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state
boundary.
(11) "Contraband" means any property that is unlawful to produce or
possess.
(12) "Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal
kingdom not native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the
environment or wildlife of the state.
(((12))) (13) "Department" means the department of fish and
wildlife.
(((13))) (14) "Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.
(((14))) (15) "Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the
commission as seriously threatened with extinction.
(((15))) (16) "Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a
commissioned officer of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency
having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in
general, while the officer is in the appropriate jurisdiction. The
term "ex officio fish and wildlife officer" includes special agents of
the national marine fisheries service, state parks commissioned
officers, United States fish and wildlife special agents, department of
natural resources enforcement officers, and United States forest
service officers, while the agents and officers are within their
respective jurisdictions.
(((16))) (17) "Fish" includes all species classified as game fish
or food fish by statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently
classified as food fish or game fish if such species exist in state
waters. The term "fish" includes all stages of development and the
bodily parts of fish species.
(((17))) (18) "Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed
and commissioned by the director, with authority to enforce this title
and rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as
prescribed by the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a
person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a
fisheries patrol officer.
(((18))) (19) "Fish broker" means a person whose business it is to
bring a seller of fish and shellfish and a purchaser of those fish and
shellfish together.
(20) "Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species
of fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical
area.
(((19))) (21) "Freshwater" means all waters not defined as
saltwater including, but not limited to, rivers upstream of the river
mouth, lakes, ponds, and reservoirs.
(((20))) (22) "Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall
not be trapped except as authorized by the commission.
(((21))) (23) "Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be
hunted except as authorized by the commission.
(((22))) (24) "Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be
hunted except as authorized by the commission.
(((23))) (25) "Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held
or raised for commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game
farm" does not include publicly owned facilities.
(((24))) (26) "Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for
all wild animals and wild birds is prohibited.
(((25))) (27) "Illegal items" means those items unlawful to be
possessed.
(28) "Invasive species" means a plant species or a nonnative animal
species that either:
(a) Causes or may cause displacement of, or otherwise threatens,
native species in their natural communities;
(b) Threatens or may threaten natural resources or their use in the
state;
(c) Causes or may cause economic damage to commercial or
recreational activities that are dependent upon state waters; or
(d) Threatens or harms human health.
(((26))) (29) "License year" means the period of time for which a
recreational license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and
ends March 31st.
(((27))) (30) "Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a
license limitation program established in chapter 77.70 RCW.
(((28))) (31) "Money" means all currency, script, personal checks,
money orders, or other negotiable instruments.
(32) "Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the
qualifications of a resident.
(((29))) (33) "Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific
Ocean outside the territorial boundaries of the state, including the
marine waters of other states and countries.
(((30))) (34) "Open season" means those times, manners of taking,
and places or waters established by rule of the commission for the
lawful hunting, fishing, taking, or possession of game animals, game
birds, game fish, food fish, or shellfish that conform to the special
restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the
commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish,
take, harvest, or possess by rule of the commission. "Open season"
includes the first and last days of the established time.
(((31))) (35) "Owner" means the person in whom is vested the
ownership dominion, or title of the property.
(36) "Person" means and includes an individual; a corporation; a
public or private entity or organization; a local, state, or federal
agency; all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting with a
common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.
(((32))) (37) "Personal use" means for the private use of the
individual taking the fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.
(((33))) (38) "Personal property" or "property" includes both
corporeal and incorporeal personal property and includes, among other
property, contraband and money.
(39) "Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted
throughout the year as authorized by the commission.
(((34))) (40) "Prohibited aquatic animal species" means an invasive
species of the animal kingdom that has been classified as a prohibited
aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((35))) (41) "Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the
commission that shall not be hunted or fished.
(((36))) (42) "Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing
an individual number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars
each and in which a permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access
to hunt big game animals or wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from
the tickets by the person or persons conducting the raffle.
(((37))) (43) "Recreational and commercial watercraft" includes the
boat, as well as equipment used to transport the boat, and any
auxiliary equipment such as attached or detached outboard motors.
(((38))) (44) "Regulated aquatic animal species" means a
potentially invasive species of the animal kingdom that has been
classified as a regulated aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((39))) (45) "Resident" means:
(a) A person who has maintained a permanent place of abode within
the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an application
for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to continue
residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state; and
(b) A person age eighteen or younger who does not qualify as a
resident under (a) of this subsection, but who has a parent that
qualifies as a resident under (a) of this subsection.
(((40))) (46) "Retail-eligible species" means commercially
harvested salmon, crab, and sturgeon.
(((41))) (47) "Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of
river mouths.
(((42))) (48) "Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are
dependent upon the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in
either an attached or free floating form, and includes but is not
limited to marine aquatic plants in the classes Chlorophyta,
Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.
(((43))) (49) "Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.
(((44))) (50) "Shellfish" means those species of marine and
freshwater invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not
be taken except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term
"shellfish" includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of
shellfish species.
(((45))) (51) "State waters" means all marine waters and fresh
waters within ordinary high water lines and within the territorial
boundaries of the state.
(((46))) (52) "To fish," "to harvest," and "to take," and their
derivatives means an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch a fish or
shellfish.
(((47))) (53) "To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to
kill, injure, capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.
(((48))) (54) "To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or
preserving fish, wildlife, or shellfish.
(((49))) (55) "To trap" and its derivatives means a method of
hunting using devices to capture wild animals or wild birds.
(((50))) (56) "Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage,
or engaging in sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife,
or deleterious exotic wildlife.
(((51))) (57) "Unclaimed" means that no owner of the property has
been identified or has requested, in writing, the release of the
property to themselves nor has the owner of the property designated an
individual to receive the property or paid the required postage to
effect delivery of the property.
(58) "Unlisted aquatic animal species" means a nonnative animal
species that has not been classified as a prohibited aquatic animal
species, a regulated aquatic animal species, or an unregulated aquatic
animal species by the commission.
(((52))) (59) "Unregulated aquatic animal species" means a
nonnative animal species that has been classified as an unregulated
aquatic animal species by the commission.
(((53))) (60) "Wholesale fish dealer" means a person who, acting
for commercial purposes, takes possession or ownership of fish or
shellfish and sells, barters, or exchanges or attempts to sell, barter,
or exchange fish or shellfish that have been landed into the state of
Washington or entered the state of Washington in interstate or foreign
commerce.
(61) "Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana
catesbeiana (bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral
domestic mammals or old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of
the order Rodentia.
(((54))) (62) "Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves
whose members exist in Washington in a wild state.
(((55))) (63) "Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom
whose members exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but
is not limited to mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and
invertebrates. The term "wildlife" does not include feral domestic
mammals, old world rats and mice of the family Muridae of the order
Rodentia, or those fish, shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified
as food fish or shellfish by the director. The term "wildlife"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of wildlife
members.
(((56))) (64) "Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing
and under sixteen years old for hunting.

Sec. 14 RCW 77.12.170 and 2005 c 418 s 3, 2005 c 225 s 4, 2005 c
224 s 4, and 2005 c 42 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320.
However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and court-ordered
restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or
wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited pursuant
to RCW 77.15.425;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) ((The sale of personal property seized by the department for
fish, shellfish, or wildlife violations;
(j))) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(((k))) (j) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW
77.32.560.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

Sec. 15 RCW 77.15.100 and 2000 c 107 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise provided in this title, fish, shellfish, or
wildlife unlawfully taken or possessed, or involved in a violation
shall be forfeited to the state upon conviction. Unless already held
by, sold, destroyed, or disposed of by the department, the court shall
order such fish or wildlife to be delivered to the department. Where
delay will cause loss to the value of the property and a ready
wholesale buying market exists, the department may sell property to a
wholesale buyer at a fair market value.
(2) When seized property is forfeited to the department, the
department may retain it for official use unless the property is
required to be destroyed, or upon application by any law enforcement
agency of the state, release the property to the agency for the use of
enforcing this title, or sell such property and deposit the proceeds
into the ((state wildlife fund)) fish and wildlife enforcement reward
account established under RCW ((77.12.170)) 77.15.425. Any sale of
other property shall be at public auction or after public advertisement
reasonably designed to obtain the highest price. The time, place, and
manner of holding the sale shall be determined by the director. The
director may contract for the sale to be through the department of
general administration as state surplus property, or, except where not
justifiable by the value of the property, the director shall publish
notice of the sale once a week for at least two consecutive weeks
before the sale in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the sale is to be held.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful use of a department permit if
the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the requirement for, issuance of, or use of the permit.
(2) Permits covered under subsection (1) of this section include,
but are not limited to, master hunter permits, depredation permits,
landowner hunting permits, commercial carp license permits, permits to
possess or dispense beer or malt liquor pursuant to RCW 66.28.210, and
permits to hold, sponsor, or attend an event requiring a banquet permit
from the liquor control board. Permits excluded from subsection (1) of
this section include fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permits,
commercial use or activity permits, noncommercial use or activity
permits, parking permits, experimental fishery permits, trial
commercial fishery permits, and scientific collection permits.
(3) Unlawful use of a department permit is a misdemeanor.
(4) A person is guilty of unlawful use of an experimental fishery
permit or a trial commercial fishery permit if the person:
(a) Violates any terms or conditions of the permit issued by the
department or the director; or
(b) Violates any rule of the commission or the director applicable
to the issuance or use of the permit.
(5) Unlawful use of an experimental fishery permit or a trial
commercial fishery permit is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Experimental fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
director for either:
(i) An "emerging commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
newly classified species for which the department has determined that
there is a need to limit participation; or
(ii) An "expanding commercial fishery," defined as a fishery for a
previously classified species in a new area, by a new method, or at a
new effort level, for which the department has determined that there is
a need to limit participation.
(b) "Trial commercial fishery permit" means a permit issued by the
department for trial harvest of a newly classified species or harvest
of a previously classified species in a new area or by a new means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to effectively manage wildlife in areas or at times
when a higher proficiency and demonstrated skill level are needed for
resource protection or public safety, the department establishes the
master hunter permit program. The master hunter permit program
emphasizes safe, ethical, responsible, and lawful hunting practices.
Program goals include improving the public's perception of hunting and
perpetuating the highest hunting standards.
(2) A master hunter permit is required to participate in controlled
hunts to eliminate problem animals that damage property or threaten
public safety. The commission may establish by rule the requirements
an applicant must comply with when applying for or renewing a master
hunter permit, including but not limited to a criminal background
check. The director may establish an advisory group to assist the
department with administering the master hunter program.
(3) The fee for an initial master hunter permit may not exceed
fifty dollars, and the cost of renewing a master hunter permit may not
exceed twenty-five dollars. Funds generated under this section must be
deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account
established in RCW 77.15.425, and the funds must be used exclusively to
administer the master hunter program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may suspend a person's master hunter permit for
the following reasons and corresponding lengths of time:
(a) If the person pays the required fine or is found to have
committed an infraction under this chapter or the department's rules,
the department shall suspend the person's master hunter permit for two
years;
(b) If the person pays the required fine or is convicted of a
misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony under this chapter, the
department shall suspend the person's master hunter permit for life;
(c) If the person pays the required fine or is convicted of
trespass, reckless endangerment, criminal conspiracy, or making a false
statement to law enforcement while hunting, fishing, or engaging in any
activity regulated by the department, the department shall suspend the
person's master hunter permit for life;
(d) If the person pays the required fine or is convicted of a
felony prohibiting the possession of firearms, unless firearm
possession is reinstated, the department shall suspend the person's
master hunter permit for life;
(e) If the person has a hunting or fishing license revoked or has
hunting or fishing license privileges suspended in another state, the
department shall suspend the person's master hunter permit for life;
(f) If the person is cited, or charged by complaint, for an offense
under this chapter; or for trespass, reckless endangerment, criminal
conspiracy, or making a false statement to law enforcement while
hunting, fishing, or engaging in any activity regulated by the
department, the department may immediately suspend the person's master
hunter permit until the offense has been adjudicated; or
(g) If the person submits fraudulent information to the department,
the department shall suspend the person's master hunter permit for
life.
(2) Any master hunter who is notified of an intended suspension may
request an appeal hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 19 RCW 77.15.370 and 2005 c 406 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the
first degree if:
(a) The person takes, possesses, or retains two times or more than
the bag limit or possession limit of fish or shellfish allowed by any
rule of the director or commission setting the amount of food fish,
game fish, or shellfish that can be taken, possessed, or retained for
noncommercial use;
(b) The person fishes in a fishway;
(c) The person shoots, gaffs, snags, snares, spears, dipnets, or
stones fish or shellfish in state waters, or possesses fish or
shellfish taken by such means, unless such means are authorized by
express rule of the commission or director; ((or))
(d) The person fishes for or possesses a fish listed as threatened
or endangered in 50 C.F.R. Sec. 17.11 (2002), unless fishing for or
possession of such fish is specifically allowed under federal or state
law; or
(e) The person possesses a sturgeon measuring in excess of the
maximum size limit as established by rules adopted by the department.
(2) Unlawful recreational fishing in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 20 RCW 77.15.425 and 2006 c 148 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fish and wildlife enforcement reward account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. ((All receipts from criminal wildlife
penalty assessments under RCW 77.15.420 and 77.15.400 must be deposited
into the account.)) Deposits to the account include: Receipts from
fish and shellfish overages as a result of a department enforcement
action; fees for hunter education deferral applications; fees for
master hunter applications and master hunter certification renewals;
all receipts from criminal wildlife penalty assessments under RCW
77.15.400 and 77.15.420; all receipts of court-ordered restitution or
donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or wildlife enforcement
action; and proceeds from forfeitures and evidence pursuant to RCW
77.15.070 and 77.15.100. The department may accept money or personal
property from persons under conditions requiring the property or money
to be used consistent with the intent of expenditures from the fish and
wildlife enforcement reward account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for investigation and prosecution of fish and wildlife
offenses, to provide rewards to persons informing the department about
violations of this title and rules adopted under this title, to offset
department-approved costs incurred to administer the hunter education
deferral program and the master hunter program, and for other valid
enforcement uses as determined by the commission. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 21 RCW 77.15.568 and 2007 c 337 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of a secondary commercial fish receiver's
failure to account for commercial harvest if:
(a) The person sells fish or shellfish at retail, stores or holds
fish or shellfish for another in exchange for valuable consideration,
ships fish or shellfish in exchange for valuable consideration, or
brokers fish or shellfish in exchange for valuable consideration;
(b) The fish or shellfish were required to be entered on a
Washington fish receiving ticket or a Washington aquatic farm
production annual report; and
(c) The person fails to maintain records of each receipt of fish or
shellfish, as required under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section, at the location where the fish or shellfish are being sold, at
the location where the fish or shellfish are being stored or held, or
at the principal place of business of the shipper or broker.
(2) This section ((does not apply)) applies to a wholesale fish
dealer((,)) acting in the capacity of a broker. However, this section
does not apply to a wholesale fish dealer acting in the capacity of a
wholesale fish dealer, to a fisher selling under a direct retail sale
endorsement, or to a registered aquatic farmer.
(3) Records of the receipt of fish or shellfish required to be kept
under this section must be in the English language and be maintained
for three years from the date fish or shellfish are received, shipped,
or brokered.
(4) Records maintained by persons that retail or broker must
include the following:
(a) The name, address, and phone number of the wholesale fish
dealer, fisher selling under a direct retail sale endorsement, or
aquatic farmer or shellstock shipper from whom the fish or shellfish
were purchased or received;
(b) The Washington fish receiving ticket number documenting
original receipt or aquatic farm production quarterly report
documenting production, if available;
(c) The date of purchase or receipt; and
(d) The amount and species of fish or shellfish purchased or
received.
(5) Records maintained by persons that store, hold, or ship fish or
shellfish for others must state the following:
(a) The name, address, and phone number of the person and business
from whom the fish or shellfish were received;
(b) The date of receipt; and
(c) The amount and species of fish or shellfish received.
(6) A secondary commercial fish receiver's failure to account for
commercial harvest is a misdemeanor.

Sec. 22 RCW 77.15.620 and 2002 c 301 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of engaging in fish dealing activity without
a license in the second degree if the person:
(a) Engages in the commercial processing of fish or shellfish,
including custom canning or processing of personal use fish or
shellfish and does not hold a wholesale dealer's license required by
RCW 77.65.280(1) or 77.65.480 for anadromous game fish, or a direct
retail endorsement under RCW 77.65.510;
(b) Engages in the wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of food
fish or shellfish and does not hold a wholesale dealer's or buying
license required by RCW 77.65.280(2) or 77.65.480 for anadromous game
fish;
(c) Is a fisher who lands and sells his or her catch or harvest in
the state to anyone other than a licensed wholesale dealer within or
outside the state and does not hold a direct retail endorsement
required by RCW 77.65.510; or
(d) Engages in the commercial manufacture or preparation of
fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish bait, or other byproducts from food
fish or shellfish and does not hold a wholesale dealer's license
required by RCW 77.65.280(4) or 77.65.480 for anadromous game fish.
(2) Engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in the
second degree is a gross misdemeanor.
(3) A person is guilty of engaging in fish dealing activity without
a license in the first degree if the person commits the act described
by subsection (1) of this section and the violation involves: (a) Fish
or shellfish worth two hundred fifty dollars or more; (b) a failure to
document such fish or shellfish with a fish receiving ticket or other
documentation required by statute or rule of the department; or (c)
violates any other rule of the department regarding wholesale fish
buying and dealing. Engaging in fish dealing activity without a
license in the first degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 23 RCW 77.12.879 and 2007 c 350 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The aquatic invasive species prevention account is created in
the state treasury. Moneys directed to the account from RCW 88.02.050
must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may
only be used as provided in this section. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation.
(2) Funds in the aquatic invasive species prevention account may be
appropriated to the department to develop an aquatic invasive species
prevention program for recreational and commercial watercraft. Funds
must be expended as follows:
(a) To inspect recreational and commercial watercraft;
(b) To educate general law enforcement officers on how to enforce
state laws relating to preventing the spread of aquatic invasive
species;
(c) To evaluate and survey the risk posed by recreational and
commercial watercraft in spreading aquatic invasive species into
Washington state waters;
(d) To evaluate the risk posed by float planes in spreading aquatic
invasive species into Washington state waters; and
(e) To implement an aquatic invasive species early detection and
rapid response plan. The plan must address the treatment and immediate
response to the introduction to Washington waters of aquatic invasive
species. Agency and public review of the plan must be conducted under
chapter 43.21C RCW, the state environmental policy act. If the
implementation measures or actions would have a probable significant
adverse environmental impact, a detailed statement under chapter 43.21C
RCW must be prepared on the plan.
(3) Funds in the aquatic invasive species enforcement account
created in RCW 43.43.400 may be appropriated to the department and
Washington state patrol to develop an aquatic invasive species
enforcement program for recreational and commercial watercraft. The
department shall provide training to Washington state patrol employees
working at port of entry weigh stations, and other local law
enforcement employees, on how to inspect recreational and commercial
watercraft for the presence of aquatic invasive species. A person who
enters Washington transporting any commercial or recreational
watercraft that has been used in any designated aquatic invasive
species state or foreign country as defined by rule of the department
must have in his or her possession valid documentation that the
watercraft has been inspected and found free of aquatic invasive
species. The department is authorized to require persons transporting
recreational and commercial watercraft to stop at check stations.
Check stations must be plainly marked by signs, operated by at least
one uniformed fish and wildlife officer, and operated in a safe manner.
Any person stopped at a check station who possesses a recreational or
commercial watercraft that has been used in any designated aquatic
invasive species state or foreign country as defined by rule of the
department, or that is contaminated with aquatic invasive species, must
bear the expense for any necessary impoundment, transportation,
cleaning, and decontamination of the watercraft. Any person stopped at
a check station who possesses a recreational or commercial watercraft
that has been used in any designated aquatic invasive species state or
foreign country as defined by rule of the department, or that is
contaminated with aquatic invasive species, is exempt from the criminal
penalties found in RCW 77.15.253 and 77.15.290, and forfeiture under
RCW 77.15.070, if that person complies with all department directives
for the proper decontamination of the watercraft and equipment.
(4) The department shall submit a biennial report to the
appropriate legislative committees describing the actions taken to
implement this section along with suggestions on how to better fulfill
the intent of chapter 464, Laws of 2005. The first report is due
December 1, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Whenever any personal property comes into
the possession of the officers of the department in connection with the
official performance of their duties and the personal property remains
unclaimed or not taken away for a period of sixty days from the date of
written notice to the owner thereof, if known, which notice shall
inform the owner of the disposition that may be made of the property
under this section and the time that the owner has to claim the
property and in all other cases for a period of sixty days from the
time the property came into the possession of the department, unless
the property has been held as evidence in any court, then, in that
event, after sixty days from date when the case has been finally
disposed of and the property released as evidence by order of the
court, the department may:
(1) At any time thereafter sell the personal property at public
auction to the highest and best bidder for cash in the manner
hereinafter provided;
(2) Retain the property for the use of the department subject to
giving notice in the manner prescribed in RCW 63.35.030 and the right
of the owner, or the owner's legal representative, to reclaim the
property within one year after receipt of notice, without compensation
for ordinary wear and tear if, in the opinion of the director, the
property consists of firearms or other items specifically usable in law
enforcement work. At the end of each calendar year during which there
has been such a retention, the department shall provide the office of
financial management and retain for public inspection a list of such
retained items and an estimation of each item's replacement value;
(3) Destroy an item of personal property at the discretion of the
director if the director determines that the following circumstances
have occurred:
(a) The property has no substantial commercial value or the
probable cost of sale exceeds the value of the property;
(b) The item has been unclaimed by any person after notice
procedures have been met, as prescribed in this section; and
(c) The director has determined that the item is illegal to possess
or sell or unsafe and unable to be made safe for use by any member of
the general public;
(4) If the item is not unsafe or illegal to possess or sell, such
item, after satisfying the notice requirements as prescribed in this
section may be offered by the director to bona fide dealers, in trade
for law enforcement equipment, which equipment must be treated as
retained property for the purpose of annual listing requirements of
subsection (2) of this section; or
(5) At the end of one year, any unclaimed firearm must be disposed
of pursuant to RCW 9.41.098(2). Any other item that is not unsafe or
illegal to possess or sell, but has been, or may be used, in the
judgment of the director, in a manner that is illegal, may be
destroyed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Before the personal property shall be sold,
a notice of such a sale fixing the time and place thereof which shall
be at a suitable place, which will be noted in the advertisement for
sale, and containing a description of the property to be sold must be
published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the property is to be sold at least ten days prior to
the date fixed for the auction. The notice must be signed by the
director. If the owner fails to reclaim the property prior to the time
fixed for the sale in such a notice, the director shall conduct the
sale and sell the property described in the notice at public auction to
the highest and best bidder for cash, and upon payment of the amount of
the bid shall deliver the property to the bidder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The moneys arising from sales under the
provisions of this chapter must be first applied to the payment of the
costs and expenses of the sale and then to the payment of lawful
charges and expenses for the keep of the personal property and the
balance, if any, must be forwarded to the state treasurer to be
deposited into the fish and wildlife enforcement reward account under
RCW 77.15.425.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 If the owner of the personal property so
sold, or the owner's legal representative, shall, at any time within
three years after the money has been deposited in the fish and wildlife
enforcement reward account, furnish satisfactory evidence to the state
treasurer of the ownership of the personal property, the owner or the
owner's legal representative is entitled to receive from the fish and
wildlife enforcement reward account the amount so deposited, with
interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) Chapter 63.24 RCW, unclaimed property
in hands of bailee, does not apply to personal property in the
possession of the department.
(2) The uniform unclaimed property act, chapter 63.29 RCW, does not
apply to personal property in the possession of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 In addition to any other method of
disposition of unclaimed property provided under this chapter, the
department may donate unclaimed personal property to nonprofit
charitable organizations. A nonprofit charitable organization
receiving personal property donated under this section must use the
property, or its proceeds, to benefit needy persons. The charitable
organization must qualify for tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Sections 24 through 29 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 RCW 77.12.065 (Wildlife viewing tourism)
and 2003 c 183 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---