BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2009 c 4 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,807,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,053,000))
$35,189,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,420,000))
$70,556,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) (($194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000)) $383,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 ((are)) is provided solely for the
legislature to contract for an independent economic and actuarial
analysis of health care reform proposals pursuant to Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6333. The results of this evaluation will
be submitted to the governor, the health and fiscal policy committees
of the legislature, and the work group by December 15, 2008.

Sec. 102 2009 c 4 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,990,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,506,000))
$28,374,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,963,000))
$55,831,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $56,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5926
(construction industry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Third Substitute
House Bill No. 1741 (oral history). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the legislature to contract
for an independent economic and actuarial analysis of health care
reform proposals pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6333.
The results of this evaluation will be submitted to the governor, the
health and fiscal policy committees of the legislature, and the work
group by December 15, 2008.

Sec. 103 2009 c 4 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,092,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,765,000))
$16,813,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,857,000))
$32,905,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for chapter 34, Laws of 2007
(Senate Bill No. 5351, court of appeals judges' travel).
(2) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $376,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 104 2009 c 4 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,659,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,239,000))
$33,294,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,558,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,694,000))
$23,713,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Equal Justice Subaccount of the Public Safety and
Education Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,175,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,923,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($157,423,000))
$157,497,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for court-appointed special
advocates in dependency matters. The administrator for the courts,
after consulting with the association of juvenile court administrators
and the association of court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad
litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer court-appointed
special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution of
funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally
accessible to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian
ad litem programs. The administrator for the courts shall not retain
more than six percent of total funding to cover administrative or any
other agency costs. Funding distributed in this subsection shall not
be used to supplant existing local funding for the court-appointed
special advocates program.
(2) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, $1,500,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,500,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for school districts for petitions to juvenile court
for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035.
The office of the administrator for the courts shall develop an
interagency agreement with the superintendent of public instruction to
allocate the funding provided in this subsection. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed. This funding includes amounts school districts may expend on
the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified
mail or by personal service or for the performance of service of
process for any hearing associated with RCW 28A.225.030.
(3)(a) $1,640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,641,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $6,612,000 of the public safety and education
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $6,612,000 of
the public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in
need of services, and at-risk youth petitions. The administrator for
the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula
shall neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average
per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(4) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(5) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of the juror pay pilot
and research project.
(6) $830,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for improving interpreter services
at the trial court level.
(a) Of these amounts, $170,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $170,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts in
developing and implementing language assistance plans. The
administrator of the courts, in consultation with the interpreter
commission, shall adopt language assistance plan standards consistent
with chapters 2.42 and 2.43 RCW. The standards shall include
guidelines on local community input, provisions on notifying court
users on the right and methods to obtain an interpreter, information on
training for judges and court personnel, procedures for identifying and
appointing an interpreter, access to translations of commonly used
forms, and processes to evaluate the development and implementation of
the plan.
(b) Of these amounts, $610,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $950,000
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to assist trial courts with
interpreter services. In order to be eligible for assistance, a trial
court must have completed a language assistance plan consistent with
the standards established in (a) of this subsection that is approved by
the administrator of the courts and submit the amounts spent annually
on interpreter services for fiscal years 2005, 2006, and 2007. The
funding in this subsection (b) shall not be used to supplant existing
funding and cannot be used for any purpose other than assisting trial
courts with interpreter services. At the end of the fiscal year,
recipients shall report to the administrator of the court the amount
the trial court spent on interpreter services.
(c) $50,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 for fiscal year 2009
are provided solely to the administrator of the courts for
administration of this subsection. By December 1, 2009, the
administrator of the courts shall report to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature: (i) The number of trial courts
in the state that have completed a language assistance plan; (ii) the
number of trial courts in the state that have not completed a language
assistance plan; (iii) the number of trial courts in the state that
received assistance under this subsection, the amount of the
assistance, and the amount each trial court spent on interpreter
services for fiscal years 2005 through 2008 and fiscal year 2009 to
date.
(7) $443,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $543,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. Within the amounts provided:
(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for developing training materials for the
family court liaisons.
(b) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for reimbursement costs related to
the family law handbook;
(c) $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for distribution to counties to
provide guardian ad litem services for the indigent for a reduced or
waived fee;
(d) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementing the data tracking
provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution).
(8)(a) $20,458,000 of the judicial information systems account--state appropriation is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the core case management system. In expending the
funds provided within this subsection, the following conditions must
first be satisfied before any subsequent funds may be expended:
(i) Completion of feasibility studies detailing linkages between
the objectives of the core case management system and the following:
The technology efforts required and the impacts of the new investments
on existing infrastructure and business functions, including the
estimated fiscal impacts to the judicial information systems account
and the near general fund accounts; the alignment of critical system
requirements of varying size courts at the municipal, district, and
superior court level with their respective proposed business processes
resulting from business process engineering, and detail on the costs
and other impacts to the courts for providing critical business
requirements not addressed by new common business processes; the
specific requirements and business process needs of state agencies
dependent on data exchange with the judicial information system; and
the results from a proof of implementation phase; and
(ii) Discussion with and presentation to the department of
information systems and the information services board regarding the
impact on the state agencies dependent on successful data exchange with
the judicial information system and the results of the feasibility
studies.
(b) The judicial information systems committee shall provide
quarterly updates to the appropriate committees of the legislature and
the department of information systems on the status of implementation
of the core case management system.
(c) The legislature respectfully requests the judicial information
systems committee invite representatives from the state agencies
dependent on successful data exchange to their regular meetings for
consultation as nonvoting members.
(9) $534,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No.
5320 (public guardianship office). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $29,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(11) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2822 (family and juvenile court). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2903 (access coordinator). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $207,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(14) $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the fifty-third superior court judge
position in King county. The funds appropriated in this subsection
shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving on the
bench.

Sec. 105 2009 c 4 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,863,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,782,000))
$21,205,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,279,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,337,000))
$8,442,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,342,000
Election Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,511,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,128,000))
$118,884,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $13,290,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2) $2,556,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the verification of initiative
and referendum petitions, maintenance of related voter registration
records, and the publication and distribution of the voters and
candidates pamphlet.
(3) $125,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $118,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for legal advertising of state
measures under RCW 29A.52.330.
(4)(a) $2,465,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $2,501,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2007-09 biennium. The funding level
for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount provided in
this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The
office of the secretary of state may make full or partial payment once
all criteria in this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(5) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for humanities Washington's "we
the people" community conversations program.
(6) $575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for settlement costs and attorney fees
resulting from the resolution of Washington Association of Churches, et
al. v. Reed, United States District Court Western District of
Washington at Seattle, Case No. CV06-0726RSM.

Sec. 106 2009 c 4 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,541,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,960,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,143,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,228,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($229,579,000))
$231,391,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($249,295,000))
$251,107,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on appropriations.
(3) $9,446,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increases in salaries and benefits
of assistant attorneys general effective July 1, 2007. This funding is
provided solely for increases to address critical recruitment and
retention problems, and shall not be used for the performance
management program or to fund general administration. The attorney
general shall report to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by October
1, 2008, and provide detailed demographic information regarding
assistant attorneys general who received increased salaries and
benefits as a result of the appropriation. The report shall include at
a minimum information regarding the years of service, division
assignment within the attorney general's office, and client agencies
represented by assistant attorneys general receiving increased salaries
and benefits as a result of the amount provided in this subsection.
The report shall include a proposed salary schedule for all assistant
attorneys general using the same factors used to determine increased
salaries under this section. The report shall also provide initial
findings regarding the effect of the increases on recruitment and
retention of assistant attorneys general.
(4) $69,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $44,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972
(surface mining reclamation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $110,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3274 (port district contracting). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $346,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of sections 2 and
3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term
well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $492,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(9) The agency shall submit a staffing model that supports the need
for increased resources due to casework associated with the sexually
violent predator population to the office of financial management and
the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 31, 2008.
(10) The attorney general shall deposit to the health services
account at least $680,000 from the cy pres monetary portion of the
consent decree in settlement of the consumer protection act litigation
against Caremark Rx, LLC (King county superior court cause no. 08-2-06098-5). These moneys shall be expended pursuant to legislative
appropriation consistent with the terms of the consent decree.

Sec. 107 2009 c 4 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,485,000))
$33,835,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,934,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,269,000
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $175,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,121,000))
$83,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to continue the agricultural pilot programs that identify
projects to enhance farm income and improve natural resource
protection. Specific work will include project outreach and
refinement, stakeholder support, staffing the oversight committee,
seeking federal and private match funding, and further refining the
list of projects to be recommended for funding.
(2) $155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $254,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus
center to fund "proof-of-concept" model and projects recommended by the
oversight committee, as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) $580,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $505,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the association of Washington
cities and the Washington state association of counties for improving
project permitting and mitigation processes.
(4) $320,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the office of regulatory
assistance to develop statewide multiagency permits for transportation
infrastructure and other projects that integrate local, state, and
federal permit requirements and mitigation standards.
(5) $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,050,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5122 (regulatory assistance programs). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(6) $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement chapter 139, Laws of
2007 (student transportation funding) which requires development of two
options for a new K-12 pupil transportation funding formula.
(7) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for financial assistance to local
government agencies in counties representing populations of fewer than
350,000 residents for the acquisition and development of streamlined
permitting technology infrastructure through an integrated business
portal approach. Grant awards may not exceed $100,000 per local
government agency per fiscal year. The funding must be used to acquire
and implement permit tracking systems that can support and are
compatible with a multijurisdictional, integrated approach. Prior to
granting funds, the office of regulatory assistance shall ensure that
the proposed systems and technology are based on open-industry
standards, allow for future integration of processes and sharing of
data, and are extendable.
(8) $474,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of sections
50 through 57 (health resources strategy) of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health
care). If the bill is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement section 3 of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5248 (preserving the viability of agricultural lands).
Funds are provided for a contract with the Ruckelshaus center to
examine conflicts between agriculture activities and critical areas
ordinances. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) The education data center within the office of financial
management may convene a work group to assess the feasibility, costs,
and benefits of a higher education data system that uses privacy-protected student-level data.
(11) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
establish and provide staff support for the Washington citizens' work
group on health care reform, pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6333.
(12) $11,372,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the development and
implementation of the Washington assessment of student learning (WASL)
and related activities and is in addition to the funding amounts
provided in section 511 of this act. The funding provided in this
subsection is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
office of financial management shall develop an interagency agreement
with the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
expenditure of these funds based on a quarterly allotment schedule.
Before releasing funds to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction each quarter, the office of financial management shall
ensure compliance with this subsection. Effective with the 2009
administration of the Washington assessment of student learning, while
maintaining the reliability and validity of the assessment, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall redesign the
assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in
all grades except high school by shortening test administration,
reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions,
and potentially decreasing the number of items utilized in the
assessment, particularly in grades tested under the requirements of the
federal no child left behind act. In selecting and developing the new
contractual obligations for the assessment contractor beginning in
fiscal year 2009, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall preserve legislative authority to set the student
learning assessment policy and potentially make minor or significant
changes to that policy in the future with the least amount of adverse
fiscal and other impacts to the state as possible. In doing this, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall advise and
consult with the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature and the Washington assessment of student learning work
group created in this subsection. Within the amounts appropriated in
this subsection, a legislative work group on the Washington assessment
of student learning is established. The work group will consist of a
maximum of nine members. Legislative members shall be appointed by the
president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives
and shall represent the two largest caucuses of both the senate and the
house of representatives. The purpose of this work group is to review
and evaluate the current assessment system by January 1, 2009, and
potentially make recommendations to improve it. Of the amount provided
in this section, $150,000 is provided solely for costs associated with
hiring independent technical experts to advise the Washington
assessment of student learning work group created in this subsection.
(13) Through prior legislation, many state activities that protect
the general public by safeguarding health, safety, employees, and
consumers are supported by fees assessed on items such as licensing,
registration, certification, and inspections. Moreover, higher
education, workforce training, and a number of other government
services are supported at least in part by fees assessed on those who
participate in these programs. Therefore, the office of financial
management shall conduct a review and analysis of all fees for which
the legislature has delegated to state agencies and institutions of
higher education the ability to establish and determine the amount,
either upon initial establishment or subsequent increases. Fees, as
used in this subsection, has the same meaning as used in RCW
43.135.055. The objective of the review and analysis is to document
the level of fees paid over the past five years, the cost of those
programs over that same time period, and, to the extent available, the
effectiveness of the activity in meeting its performance targets. The
review and analysis shall include the following information:
(a) Information about the program, including the statutory
authority for the program, date enacted, and the parties that benefit
from the program; and
(b) Information about the program fees, including name and
description of the fees, the parties that bear the cost of the fees,
the methodology for determining the fees, and whether the fees directly
fund the program; and
(c) Financial related information, including an assessment of the
program's fee amount assessed over the past five years, the scope of
the program and related costs over the past 5 years, and whether the
program's expenditures are subject to appropriation or allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW; and
(d) To the extent available, information on the program activities
and related performance measures that may assist in assessing the
effectiveness of the program in achieving its goals.
The office of financial management shall report its findings to the
governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1,
2008.
(14) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $305,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 108 2009 c 4 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,702,000))
$32,163,000

Sec. 109 2009 c 4 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,000
Dependent Care Administrative Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $237,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,419,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,959,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1261 (duty disability service credit). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $43,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1680
(emergency medical technician service credit). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3) $72,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1649 (judges' past service credit purchases). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $33,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No.
1262 (plan 1 post retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $315,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed House
Bill No. 2391 (gainsharing revisions). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $12,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5014 (contribution rates). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $17,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5175 (retirement annual increases). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to design a plan for the operation
of a universal voluntary retirement accounts program, and then seek
approval from the federal internal revenue service to offer the plan to
workers and employers in Washington on a tax qualified basis. Features
of Washington voluntary retirement accounts plan include a defined
contribution plan with a limited pre-selected menu of investment
options, administration by the department of retirement systems,
investment oversight by the state investment board, tax-deferred
payroll deductions, retirement account portability between jobs, and a
two-tier system with workplace based individual retirement accounts
open to all workers, and a deferred compensation 401(k)-type program or
SIMPLE IRA-type program open to all employers who choose to participate
for their employees. As part of this process, the director shall
consult with the department of financial institutions, the state
investment board, private sector retirement plan administrators and
providers and other relevant sectors of the financial services
industry, organizations promoting increased economic opportunities for
individuals, employers, workers, and any other individuals or entities
that the director determines relevant to the development of an
effective and efficient method for implementing and operating the
program. As part of this process, the director shall evaluate the most
efficient methods for providing this service and ways to avoid
competition with existing private sector vehicles. The director shall
undertake the legal and development work to determine how to implement
a universal voluntary retirement accounts program, managed through the
department of retirement systems directly or by contract. By December
1, 2008, the director shall report to the legislature on the program's
design and any required changes to state law that are necessary to
implement the program.
(9) $81,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed House Bill No. 2887 (judges' service credit purchases). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $51,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
House Bill No. 3019 (partial year service credit for school district
employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $40,000 of the ((general fund--state)) department of
retirement systems expense account--state appropriation ((for fiscal
year 2009)) is provided solely to contract with a skilled facilitator
to mediate discussions to identify and document all outstanding issues
related to the funding of retiree medical benefits in the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and
for staff resources to be used to conduct research in support of this
effort. The stakeholder group shall include representatives of retired
members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1, local government employers, the department of retirement
systems, and other groups as deemed necessary by the director of the
department of retirement systems.
(12) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $23,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 110 2008 c 329 s 139 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($590,000))
$783,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,651,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,929,000))
$36,893,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,761,000))
$41,918,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are)) is provided solely for the temporary emergency
food assistance program.
(2) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1332 (affordable
housing).
(3) (($391,000 of the general administration services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of costs associated with the planning of agency moves
out of the general administration building.
(4))) The department shall work with the office of financial
management to develop a plan that balances revenues and expenditures
for each line of business within the general administration services
account. State agency rates developed for the 2009-2011 biennium must
equitably and reasonably reflect the actual cost of services provided
to state agencies including the appropriate allocation of agency
overhead costs. By August 31, 2008, the department shall submit to the
office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature financial statements for each line of business that shall
inform the basis for agency rate development for the forthcoming
biennium.
(((5))) (4) The department shall submit a report to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature that
responds to each of the state auditor's motor pool audit
recommendations by August 31, 2008. This report shall consist of
recommendations that have been adopted by the department, progress made
towards achieving those recommendations not yet completed, and
justification for why the department is unable to fulfill any of the
recommendations in the report.

Sec. 111 2009 c 4 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,150,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,003,000))
$97,782,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,788,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($212,544,000))
$207,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for the implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 1002 (taxation of vessels). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1891
(prescription drugs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount in this subsection shall lapse.
(3)(a) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to conduct a study of the taxation
of electronically delivered products. The legislature recognizes that
chapter . . . (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007,
relates to specific types of electronically delivered products and does
not address the taxation of numerous other types of electronically
delivered products. Therefore, a policy question remains concerning
the sales and use taxation of other electronically delivered products.
(b)(i) To perform the study, the department of revenue shall be
assisted by a committee. The committee shall include four legislative
members appointed as follows:
(A) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate; and
(B) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(ii) The department of revenue shall appoint additional members
with balanced representation from different segments of government and
industry, and shall consider representation from the following areas:
Small and large businesses that generate, deliver, or use
electronically delivered products; financial institutions; insurers;
persons with expertise in tax law in an academic or private sector
setting; and persons experienced in working with computers and
electronically delivered products. The department of revenue shall
appoint additional members from the department with expertise in the
excise taxation of electronically delivered products.
(iii) The committee shall choose its chair from among its
membership.
(iv) The department and committee shall review the following
issues: The provision of explicit statutory definitions for
electronically delivered products; the current excise tax treatment of
electronically delivered products in the state of Washington and other
states as well as the tax treatment of these products under the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement; the administration, costs, and
potential recipients of the tax exemptions provided in chapter . . .
(Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981), Laws of 2007; and
alternatives to the excise taxation of electronically delivered
products.
(v) Legislative members of the committee are reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members of
the committee, except those representing an employer or organization,
are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(c) The department shall report its preliminary findings and
recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature
by November 30, 2007. The department shall provide the final report of
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees
of the legislature by September 1, 2008.
(4) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6809 (working families tax exemption). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse. This
subsection does not constitute approval of the exemption under section
2, chapter . . . (ESSB 6809), Laws of 2008 or authorize payments of
remittances.
(5) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
3104 (domestic partnerships). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $214,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 112 2009 c 4 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,574,000))
$2,924,000

Sec. 113 2009 c 4 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,910,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,430,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($194,556,000))
$196,556,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($209,896,000))
$211,896,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $91,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5859 (retail liquor licenses). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $2,070,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to operate an
additional 29 state stores on Sundays by September 1, 2007. The board
shall determine the impacts on sales as a result of operating the
additional stores on Sunday. In doing so, the liquor control board
shall also examine the sales of state and contract liquor stores in
proximity to those stores opened on Sundays to determine whether Sunday
openings have reduced the sales of other state and contract liquor
stores that are not open on Sundays. The board shall present this
information to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by January 31, 2009.

Sec. 114 2009 c 4 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,430,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,353,000))
$11,526,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,334,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,293,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,454,000))
$27,820,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,757,000))
$98,441,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $814,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $337,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($556,000))
$215,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,269,000))
$1,382,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($309,599,000))
$324,594,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($24,454,000)) $27,820,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation and (($86,757,000)) $98,441,000 of the disaster
response account -- federal appropriation may be spent only on disasters
declared by the governor and with the approval of the office of
financial management. The military department shall submit a report
quarterly to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing information on the disaster response
account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into the
account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2007-2009
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) (($556,000)) $215,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account--state appropriation and (($1,269,000)) $1,382,000 of the Nisqually
earthquake account -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
response and recovery costs associated with the February 28, 2001,
earthquake. The military department shall submit a report quarterly to
the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing earthquake recovery costs, including: (a)
Estimates of total costs; (b) incremental changes from the previous
estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining
costs to be paid; and (e) estimates of future payments by biennium.
This information shall be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and
by amount paid on behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The
military department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office
of financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2007-2009 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $61,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) This amount shall not be allotted until a spending plan is
reviewed by the governor's domestic security advisory group and
approved by the office of financial management;
(c) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(d) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the department
shall implement Substitute House Bill No. 1507 (uniformed service
shared leave).
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the military department to
contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to operate a
statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the entire amount
for 2-1-1 and shall not take any of the funds for administrative
purposes.
(6) $200,000 of the enhanced 911 account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to recommend an appropriate funding
mechanism for the implementation of next generation 911. The
department shall consult with the utilities and transportation
commission, the department of revenue, local governments, and
representatives from companies providing telecommunications services in
order to complete the report required under this subsection. The
department may also consult with other public safety and medical
associations in order to complete the study. The department shall
submit the report to the finance committee and the technology, energy,
and communications committee of the house of representatives, and the
ways and means committee and the water, energy, and telecommunications
committee of the senate, by December 1, 2008.

Sec. 115 2009 c 4 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,893,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,878,000))
$1,924,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,771,000))
$3,817,000

Sec. 116 2008 c 329 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,773,000))
$39,769,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,523,000))
$93,519,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2008 c 329 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1)
Appropriations made in this act to the department of social and health
services shall initially be allotted as required by this act.
Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include transfers of
moneys between sections of this act except as expressly provided in
this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP), the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county, during the
2007-2009 biennium. The amount of funding assigned to the pilot
projects from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost
assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program,
actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled in
the pilot project, times the number of clients enrolled in the pilot
project. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department may:
(a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set forth in
RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for individuals
enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.
(5)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2008)) 2009,
unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2008 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management. However, the
department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for
a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year
((2008)) 2009 caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the
medical assistance, long-term care, foster care, adoption support, and
child support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that
are provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall not
transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 202 2009 c 4 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,353,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($338,838,000))
$336,528,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($490,314,000))
$504,970,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,251,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,254,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,298,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,163,363,000))
$1,175,709,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the category of services
titled "intensive family preservation services."
(2) $945,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a foster parent retention
program. This program is directed at foster parents caring for
children who act out sexually.
(5) The providers for the 31 HOPE beds shall be paid a $1,020 base
payment per bed per month, and reimbursed for the remainder of the bed
cost only when the beds are occupied.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $429,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase services provided through children's
advocacy centers.
(9) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a street youth program in
Spokane.
(10) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1472 (child welfare).
(11) $858,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $809,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $715,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5774
(background checks), including sections 6 and 7. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $4,962,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $4,586,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $9,548,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a statewide automated child welfare information system.
(13) $126,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $55,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5321 (child
welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $680,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $594,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1334 (child welfare proceedings). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $2,237,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,238,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,918,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1333 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $137,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $118,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1287
(foster children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
Washington state institute for public policy to study evidence-based,
cost-effective programs and policies to reduce the likelihood of
children entering and remaining in the child welfare system, including
both prevention and intervention programs. If the department does not
receive $100,000 in matching funds from a private organization for the
purpose of conducting this study, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The study shall be completed by April 30,
2008. The department shall cooperate with the institute in
facilitating access to data in their administrative systems. The board
of the Washington state institute for public policy may adjust the due
date for this project as necessary to efficiently manage workload.
(18) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $407,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $48,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1131 (passport to college). This includes funding to develop,
implement, and administer a program of educational transition planning
for youth in foster care as specified in the bill. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(19) The department shall continue spending levels for continuum of
care in region one at the same level allotted during the 2005-2007
biennium.
(20) Within the amounts provided, the department shall develop and
implement a two-tiered reimbursement rate schedule for children from
birth through twenty-four months of age and children twenty-five months
of age through age five served by the medicaid treatment child care
program. The department shall work in collaboration with contracted
providers of the program to develop the rate schedule, taking into
consideration such factors as higher staff level and small group size
requirements for each age group. The department shall implement the
rate schedule no later than January 1, 2008, and neither reimbursement
rate in the two-tiered schedule shall be lower than the reimbursement
rate level from the 2007 fiscal year.
(21) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1624 (child welfare). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 384, Laws of 2007.
(23) The department shall work with the exclusive bargaining
representative for the children's administration social workers to
prioritize social worker tasks and devise methods by which to alleviate
from the social workers' workload lower priority tasks. Discussions on
methods shall include the use of contracting services and home support
specialists. The department and the bargaining representative shall
jointly report their efforts to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by submitting a progress report no later than July 1, 2008,
and a final report by November 15, 2008.
(24) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
largest nonprofit organization in the state conducting education and
outreach on RCW 13.34.360, the safety of newborn children law.
(25) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $184,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to contract with medical professionals for
comprehensive safety assessments of high-risk families. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. $400,000 of this amount is for comprehensive safety
assessments for families receiving in-home child protective services or
family voluntary services. $400,000 of this amount is for
comprehensive safety assessments of families with an infant age birth
to fifteen days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance
exposed and the department received an intake referral related to the
infant due to the substance exposure.
(26) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $29,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6206 (child fatality). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(27) $857,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $140,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 3145 (foster parent licensing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $415,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $264,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the hiring of staff to expedite the phase-in of the
state's policy of a private and individual face-to-face visit each
month with children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and
their caregivers.
(29) $109,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $35,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement sections 2 and 3 of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term well-being). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(30) The appropriations in this section provide specific funds to
implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6792 (dependency
matters).
(31) $812,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $256,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to hire additional staff to perform
child health education and tracking screens.
(32) $1,829,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $578,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to contract with ((nonprofit))
organizations to facilitate twice-monthly visits between siblings
living apart from each other in out-of-home care.
(33) The department shall not close any secure crisis residential
center facilities. The total number of statewide secure crisis
residential center beds is reduced from 63 to 44.

Sec. 203 2009 c 4 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,822,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,716,000))
$82,918,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,662,000))
$5,505,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,898,000
Reinvesting in Youth--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,414,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,975,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,078,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,510,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($230,446,000))
$228,491,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $353,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice
assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended to
provide funding for county adult court costs associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,078,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,078,000 of the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation and $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are intended
to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services
(CJS) formula.
(3) $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and
$2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,030,000 of the general fund--state appropriation and $2,686,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants pursuant
to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). Funds provided
in this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile
accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of
programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,506,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $2,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,947,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs or other programs with a positive
benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County juvenile courts
shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation administration for funding
for program-specific participation and the administration shall provide
grants to the courts consistent with the per-participant treatment
costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $787,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide a
block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile
services funds, community juvenile accountability act grants, the
chemically dependent disposition alternative, and the special sex
offender disposition to county juvenile courts, or groups of courts,
including the Pierce county juvenile court. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall
jointly write criteria for awarding and administering block grants to
county juvenile courts. In developing the criteria, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the family policy council shall seek
the advice of the Washington state institute for public policy. The
criteria shall address, but not be limited to:
(a) The selection of courts for participation in the block grant;
(b) The types of evidence-based programs and practices to which the
funds will be applied. The evidence-based programs and practices shall
either be consistent with those cost-beneficial options identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy in its October 2006
report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates," or be new
approaches that have the potential to demonstrate positive returns for
the taxpayer; and
(c) The protocols for participating courts to collect information
on the effectiveness of programs funded under the block grant,
including: (i) Developing intermediate client outcomes based on the
risk assessment tool currently used by juvenile courts and in
coordination with the juvenile rehabilitation administration; (ii)
reporting treatment outcomes including a process evaluation to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy council by
June 20, 2008, and an outcome evaluation of recidivism and benefit-cost
results submitted within eighteen months of the initiation of the
treatment, when follow-up data are available. The courts shall develop
these evaluations in consultation with the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, the family policy council, and the Washington state
institute for public policy; and (iii) documenting the process for
managing block grant funds on a quarterly basis and provide this report
to the juvenile rehabilitation administration and the family policy
council.
(8) $73,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $98,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 204 2009 c 4 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $305,732,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,382,000))
$298,118,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($396,996,000))
$416,273,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,157,000))
$18,732,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,027,267,000))
$1,038,855,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $103,989,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $122,119,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. Reductions to fiscal
year 2009 allocations shall be distributed proportionally to each
regional support network's percentage of the total state population.
To the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending
shall be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for development and initial implementation
of high-intensity program for active community treatment (PACT) teams,
and other proven program approaches that the department concurs will
enable the regional support network to achieve significant reductions
during fiscal year 2008 and thereafter in the number of beds the
regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 222 per day
throughout fiscal year 2008. Beginning January 1, 2009, the number of
nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support networks at
eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The number of nonforensic
beds allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 777 per day during the first and second quarters of
fiscal year 2008, and 677 per day from January 2008 through August
2008. Beginning September 2008, the number of nonforensic beds
allocated for use by regional support networks at western state
hospital shall be 647 per day until May 2009, at which time the bed
allocation shall be 617 beds per day. Beginning January 2008, beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. Beginning that month, the department shall
separately charge regional support networks for persons served in the
PALS program.
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) At least $902,000 of the federal block grant funding
appropriated in this subsection shall be used for the continued
operation of the mentally ill offender pilot program.
(f) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement. The department is authorized to transfer up
to $418,000 of these amounts each fiscal year to the economic services
program for purposes of facilitating prompt access after their release
from confinement to medical and income assistance services for which
defendants and offenders may be eligible.
(g) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,091,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for grants for innovative mental
health service delivery projects. Such projects may include, but are
not limited to, clubhouse programs and projects for integrated health
care and behavioral health services for general assistance recipients.
These amounts shall supplement, and not supplant, local or other
funding currently being used for activities funded under the projects
authorized in this subsection. The department shall not terminate
early any grant that was contracted under this subsection prior to
January 1, 2009, for the use of funds during fiscal year 2009.
(h) The department is authorized to continue to expend federal
block grant funds and special purpose federal grants through direct
contracts, rather than through contracts with regional support
networks, and to allocate such funds through such formulas as it shall
adopt.
(i) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(j) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $4,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(k) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(l) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $2,961,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,289,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation are provided solely to enable the department to contract
with Pierce county human services for the provision of community mental
health services to include crisis triage, evaluation and treatment, and
mobile crisis services. The legislature intends this to be one-time
funding while a replacement regional support network is being secured.
The department is authorized to reserve $402,000 general fund--state
and $201,000 general fund--local of these amounts for reasonable costs
incurred by Pierce county for the provision of mental health crisis and
related services that exceed reimbursement levels contracted by the
department. In order to receive these funds, Pierce county must
demonstrate to the department that the total cost of mental health
services provided by the county in accordance with formal agreements
has exceeded the revenues received from the department and third-party
payers for these services. The department shall determine the
documentation that is required.
(m) $504,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(n) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement a comprehensive plan for reducing its utilization
of eastern state hospital. Key elements of the plan, which shall be
developed and implemented in consultation with and with the assistance
of the department, may include but shall not be limited to development
of additional crisis triage, crisis stabilization, and evaluation and
treatment beds; provision of housing assistance for high-utilizers of
hospital and jail services who are at risk of homelessness;
implementation of an intensive outpatient treatment team for persons
with co-occurring disorders and other special needs; and delivery of
respite care to assist elderly individuals avoid or return home after
hospitalization. Spokane regional support network shall receive a
proportional share of the fiscal year 2009 nonmedicaid rate reduction
out of its base funding distribution.
(o) The department shall return to the Spokane regional support
network fifty percent of the amounts assessed against the network
during fiscal year 2009 for state hospital utilization in excess of its
contractual limit. The regional support network shall use these funds
for start-up and operation during its initial months of a new sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility that will enable the network to
reduce its use of the state hospital.
(p) The department shall not reduce medicaid capitation rates below
those in effect as of December 15, 2008.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $138,340,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,272,000))
$126,164,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,552,000))
$148,501,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,302,000))
$66,521,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,058,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($486,524,000))
$486,584,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(c) $18,575,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to operate on a temporary basis
five additional adult civil commitment wards at the state psychiatric
hospitals. The legislature intends for these wards to close, on a
phased basis, during the 2007-09 biennium as a result of targeted
investments in community services for persons who would otherwise need
care in the hospitals.
(d) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for safety training and for
protective equipment for staff at eastern and western state hospitals.
Protective equipment shall include shields, helmets, gloves, and body
protection.
(e) $304,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(e)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(f) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to pilot a direct care nurse
staffing plan for two high incident wards at eastern state hospital and
four high incident wards at western state hospital. The pilot provides
funding to fully staff registered nurses, licensed practical nurses,
and mental health technicians in accordance with the state psychiatric
hospitals direct care staffing review and recommendations. The
department shall have the authority to fill the positions with any mix
of these direct care nursing staff so long as a good faith effort is
made to first hire and recruit positions in accordance with the direct
care nurse staffing plan. The department shall monitor outcomes for
improved patient and staff safety and provide a written report to the
legislature by October 1, 2009.
(g) $617,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $334,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to cover additional operating
costs related to the October 11, 2007, laundry fire at western state
hospital.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,892,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,269,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,437,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,189,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of sections 4, 7,
10, and other provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088
(children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. Funds are
also appropriated in sections 207 and 209 of this act for
implementation of 5, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1088.
(b) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $80,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely as one-time funding to make available a mental health
train the trainer first aid course consisting of twelve hours of
instruction based upon a program created by the department of
psychiatry, University of Melbourne in Australia. The course will
provide training to members of the public related to: (i) Giving
appropriate initial help and support to a person suffering from a
mental disorder and responding to mental health crisis situations; and
(ii) depression, anxiety disorders, psychosis, and substance use
disorder, including recognizing symptoms, possible causes or risk
factors, and evidenced-based treatment options. Participants in the
first aid course will train others to provide the training.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,966,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,500,000))
$4,477,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,557,000))
$7,580,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,023,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $164,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to continue the
longitudinal analysis directed in chapter 334, Laws of 2001 (mental
health performance audit), to build upon the evaluation of the impacts
of chapter 214, Laws of 1999 (mentally ill offenders), and to assess
program outcomes and cost effectiveness of the children's mental health
pilot projects as required by chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to contract with a
facilitator to coordinate a review and make recommendations on:
(i) Ward sizes at eastern and western state hospitals and patient
case mix by ward;
(ii) Discharge practices for state hospitals to include the child
and study treatment center; and
(iii) Community placements to include placements for adults and
children.
By October 15, 2008, the department shall provide to the
legislature recommendations for system improvement to include a
cost/benefit analysis. The department shall include representation
from regional support networks in the review and development of
recommendations for discharge practices and community placements.

Sec. 205 2009 c 4 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $348,327,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($362,407,000))
$343,396,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($653,802,000))
$692,598,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,365,440,000))
$1,385,225,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) ((The entire health services account appropriation, $615,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $892,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and
$2,546,011 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers who are
employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a week. The
state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
participating worker per month shall be no greater than $532.00 in
fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 in fiscal year 2009.
(b))) Individuals receiving family support or high school
transition payments as supplemental security income (SSI) state
supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical assistance
under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state supplemental
payments.
(((c) $4,903,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $9,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $15,016,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for community residential and support
services. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for (i)
residents of residential habilitation centers who are able to be
adequately cared for in community settings and who choose to live in
those community settings; (ii) clients without residential services who
are at immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; (iii)
children who are at risk of institutionalization or who are aging out
of other state services; and (iv) current home and community-based
waiver program clients who have been assessed as having an immediate
need for increased services. First priority shall be given to children
who are at risk of institutionalization. The department shall ensure
that the average cost per day for all program services other than
start-up costs shall not exceed $300. In order to maximize the number
of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness of the waiver
programs, the department will strive to limit new client placement
expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If this can be
accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess funds,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall electronically report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(d) $2,399,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,961,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,849,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services for
persons with developmental disabilities who also have community
protection issues. Funding in this subsection shall be prioritized for
(i) clients being diverted or discharged from the state psychiatric
hospitals; (ii) clients participating in the dangerous mentally ill
offender program; (iii) clients participating in the community
protection program; and (iv) mental health crisis diversion
outplacements. The department shall ensure that the average cost per
day for all program services other than start-up costs shall not exceed
$349 in fiscal year 2008 and $356 in fiscal year 2009. In order to
maximize the number of clients served and ensure the cost-effectiveness
of the waiver programs, the department will strive to limit new client
placement expenditures to 90 percent of the budgeted daily rate. If
this can be accomplished, additional clients may be served with excess
funds if the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated. The department shall implement the four new
waiver programs such that decisions about enrollment levels and the
amount, duration, and scope of services maintain expenditures within
appropriations. The department shall electronically report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature, within 45 days following
each fiscal year quarter, the number of persons served with these
additional community services, where they were residing, what kinds of
services they were receiving prior to placement, and the actual
expenditures for all community services to support these clients.
(e) $13,198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $16,354,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $8,579,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for family support programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities. Of the amounts provided
in this subsection (e), $696,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are for state-only services
for individuals with developmental disabilities, as described in Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities). By
January 1, 2008, and by November 1, 2008, the department shall provide
a status report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature on the individual and family services program for people
with developmental disabilities, which shall include the following
information: The number of applicants for funding; the total number of
awards; the number and amount of both annual and one-time awards,
broken down by household income levels; and the purpose of the awards.
(f) $1,692,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $3,645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $2,397,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for employment and day services.
Priority consideration for this new funding shall be young adults with
developmental disabilities living with their family who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation. Services
shall be provided for both waiver and nonwaiver clients. The
legislature finds that some waiver clients are not receiving employment
services that are authorized under their waivers. Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, waiver clients must receive services as
authorized by their waiver, such as pathway to employment, while
waiting for paid employment to be developed. The department shall work
with the counties to establish a consistent proposed policy for minimum
direct service hours for clients, minimum hours of support, time frames
for seeking paid employment, and services provided under pathway to
employment while paid employment is sought. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature on this proposal by November 1, 2008,
including estimated fiscal impacts and an option for making the policy
budget neutral for the current level of clients served. In order to
maximize the number of clients served, the department may serve
additional nonwaiver clients with unspent funds for waiver clients,
provided the total projected carry-forward expenditures do not exceed
the amounts estimated.
(g))) (b) $160,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $140,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5467 (developmental disabilities).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((h))) (c)(i) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are
sufficient to increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent for
boarding homes, effective July 1, 2007, including those currently
receiving exceptional care rates; and by 3.2 percent, effective July 1,
2007, for adult family homes, including those currently receiving
exceptional care rates.
(ii) The department shall implement phase one of full
implementation of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community
residential providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are
sufficient to increase adult family home provider payment rates on
average, effective July 1, 2008, including those currently receiving
exceptional care rates, and to adjust adult family home rates for the
first phase of a seventeen CARE level payment system. Effective July
1, 2008, the provider payment rate allocation for boarding homes
contracted as assisted living shall be the provider's June 30, 2008,
payment rate allocation, and the provider payment rate for boarding
homes contracted as ARCs and EARCs shall be adjusted to reflect phase
one of a seventeen CARE level payment system. This will be in effect
until such time as the rates are consistent between adult family homes
and boarding homes for delivery of the same patient care levels.
(iii) Amounts provided in this section and in section 206 of this
act are sufficient to assist adult family home providers with the cost
of paying liability insurance.
(((i) $921,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $963,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the development and implementation of a federal
home and community-based care waiver to provide intensive behavior
support services to up to one hundred children with developmental
disabilities who have intense behaviors, and their families.
(i) To receive services under the waiver, the child must have a
developmental disability and: (A) Meet an acuity measure, as
determined by the department, indicating that the child is at high risk
of needing an out-of-home placement; (B) be eligible for developmental
disabilities services and a home and community-based care waiver
program; (C) reside in his or her family home or temporarily in an
out-of-home placement with a plan to return home; and (D) have family
that demonstrates the willingness to participate in the services
offered through the waiver, and is not subject to a pending child
protective services referral.
(ii) The department shall authorize, contract for, and evaluate the
provision of intensive in-home services that support the ability of the
child to remain at home with their parents or relatives. Intensive
behavior support services under the waiver shall be provided directly
or by contract, and may include, but are not limited to: (A) Behavior
consultation and management, therapies and respite care; (B) minor home
or motor vehicle modifications and transportation; (C) specialized
nutrition and clothing; (D) training of families and other individuals
working with the child; and (E) inclusion in community activities.
(j) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the purpose of settling all claims in
the Washington Federation of State Employees, et. al v. State of
Washington, Thurston County Superior Court Cause No. 05-2-02422-4. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the release of all
claims in this case, and total settlement costs shall not exceed the
appropriation in this subsection (j). If settlement is not executed by
June 30, 2008, the appropriation in this subsection (j) shall lapse.
(k) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall review current infant-toddler early intervention services
statewide and report to the office of financial management by November
1, 2008, and the appropriate committees of the legislature on a
recommended consistent funding approach per child for the 2009-11
biennium, recognizing the new level of funding anticipated by school
district participation. The recommendations must also include a budget
neutral option for the current level of clients served.
(l))) (d) $325,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for state-only employment services
for young adults with developmental disabilities who need employment
opportunities and assistance after high school graduation.
(((m))) (e) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1),
the department shall implement all necessary rules to facilitate the
transfer to a department home and community-based services (HCBS)
waiver of all eligible individuals who (i) currently receive services
under the existing state-only employment and day program, and (ii)
otherwise meet the waiver eligibility requirements. The amounts
appropriated are sufficient to ensure that all individuals currently
receiving services under the state-only employment and day program who
are not transferred to a department HCBS waiver will continue to
receive services.
(((n) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1), the
department shall define in-home personal care services to include a
client's ability to manage their personal care worker as identified by
characteristics in the functional assessment. Clients whose
assessments demonstrate they are able to manage their own plan of care
are not eligible for personal care through a home care agency. The
department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(o) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
adult day health services.)) (f) Adult day health services shall only
be authorized for in-home clients.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,825,000))
$65,359,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,338,000))
$184,387,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,629,000))
$22,203,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,614,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($356,875,000))
$358,032,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this section to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for services provided to community
clients provided by licensed professionals at the state rehabilitation
centers. The division shall submit claims for reimbursement for
services provided to clients living in the community to medical
assistance or third-party health care coverage, as appropriate, and
shall implement a system for billing clients without coverage.
(c) $642,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.
(d) ((The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
subsidies to clients of residential habilitation center professional
providers to support the treatment of developmentally disabled clients
who do not reside in a residential habilitation center, but shall not
expand eligibility for these services.)) In addition to other
reductions, the appropriations in this section reflect reductions
targeted specifically to state government administrative costs. These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,788,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,953,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((1))) (a) As part of the needs assessment instrument, the
department shall collect data on family income for minor children with
developmental disabilities and all individuals who are receiving
state-only funded services. The department shall ensure that this
information is collected as part of the client assessment process.
(((2))) (b) In addition to other reductions, the reduced
appropriations in this section reflect an additional $399,000 reduction
in administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,841,000

Sec. 206 2009 c 4 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($707,293,000))
$654,689,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,569,912,000))
$1,627,782,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,525,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,444,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,212,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,004,610,000))
$3,009,876,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((The entire health services account appropriation, $10,456,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008,
$11,370,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009, and $26,778,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for health care benefits for agency home care workers
who are employed through state contracts for at least twenty hours a
week. The state contribution to the cost of health care benefits per
eligible participating worker per month shall be no greater than
$532.00 in fiscal year 2008 and $585.00 per month in fiscal year 2009.
(2))) (a) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the
weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $159.34
for fiscal year 2008 and shall not exceed $163.72 for fiscal year 2009,
including the rate add-on described in subsection (((9))) (13) of this
section. For all nursing facilities, the direct care, therapy care,
support services, and operations component rates established in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW shall be adjusted for economic trends
and conditions by 3.2 percent effective July 1, 2007, and by 1.99
percent effective July 1, 2008.
(((3))) (b) $1,835,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $2,574,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for an enhancement of the statewide
weighted average nursing facility payment rate. The enhancement shall
be allocated to facilities proportionally to the rate adjustments that
resulted from Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1694 (chapter 4, Laws
of 2009). Expenditures under this subsection (b) may be in excess of
the weighted average nursing facility payment rate specified in (a) of
this subsection.
(2) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue certificates of capital authorization that result in up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2008((;)) and up to $16,000,000 of increased asset value
completed and ready for occupancy in fiscal year 2009((; and up to
$16,000,000 of increased asset value completed and ready for occupancy
in fiscal year 2010.
(4) Adult day health services shall not be considered a duplication
of services for persons receiving care in long-term care settings
licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW. The department
shall not reduce and shall continue to provide adult day health
services)).
(((5))) (3) In accordance with chapter 74.39 RCW, the department
may implement two medicaid waiver programs for persons who do not
qualify for such services as categorically needy, subject to federal
approval and the following conditions and limitations:
(a) One waiver program shall include coverage of care in community
residential facilities. Enrollment in the waiver shall not exceed 600
persons at any time.
(b) The second waiver program shall include coverage of in-home
care. Enrollment in this second waiver shall not exceed 200 persons at
any time.
(c) The department shall identify the number of medically needy
nursing home residents, and enrollment and expenditures on each of the
two medically needy waivers, on monthly management reports.
(d) If it is necessary to establish a waiting list for either
waiver because the budgeted number of enrollment opportunities has been
reached, the department shall track how the long-term care needs of
applicants assigned to the waiting list are met.
(((6) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operation of
the volunteer chore services program.
(7))) (4) The department shall establish waiting lists to the
extent necessary to assure that annual expenditures on the community
options program entry systems (COPES) program do not exceed
appropriated levels. In establishing and managing any such waiting
list, the department shall assure priority access to persons with the
greatest unmet needs, as determined by department assessment processes.
(((8) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(9) $3,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $3,134,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase compensation for low-wage workers in
nursing homes beginning July 1, 2008. Within the funds provided, the
department shall provide an add-on per resident day per facility based
on the total funding divided by the total number of fiscal year 2009
medicaid patient days as forecasted by the caseload forecast council,
not to exceed $1.57. The department may reduce the level of add-on if
necessary to fit within this appropriation if the caseload forecasted
days increase from the February 2008 forecast. The add-on shall be
used to increase wages, benefits, and/or staffing levels for certified
nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or benefits for dietary aides,
housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other category of worker whose
statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was less than $15 in calendar
year 2006, according to cost report data. The add-on may also be used
to address resulting wage compression for related job classes
immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage workers. The
department shall implement reporting requirements and a settlement
process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(10))) (5) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the
department is authorized to expand the number of boarding homes and
adult family homes that receive exceptional care rates for persons with
Alzheimer's disease and related dementias who might otherwise require
nursing home care. The department may expand the number of licensed
boarding home facilities that specialize in caring for such conditions
by up to 100 beds. Effective July 1, 2008, the department shall be
authorized to provide adult family homes that specialize in caring for
such conditions with exceptional care rates for up to 50 beds. The
department will develop standards for adult family homes to qualify for
such exceptional care rates in order to enhance consumer choice.
(((11))) (6) $1,212,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2055 (traumatic brain injury). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((12))) (7)(a) Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient
to increase provider payment rates by 6.0 percent for boarding homes,
effective July 1, 2007, including those currently receiving exceptional
care rates; and by 3.2 percent, effective July 1, 2007, for adult
family homes, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates.
(b) The department shall implement phase one of full implementation
of a seventeen CARE level payment system for community residential
providers. Amounts appropriated in this section are sufficient to
increase adult family home provider payment rates on average, effective
July 1, 2008, including those currently receiving exceptional care
rates, and to adjust adult family home rates for the first phase of a
seventeen CARE level payment system. Effective July 1, 2008, the
provider payment rate allocation for boarding homes contracted as
assisted living shall be the provider's June 30, 2008, payment rate
allocation, and the provider payment rate for boarding homes contracted
as ARCs and EARCs shall be adjusted to reflect phase one of a seventeen
CARE level payment system. This will be in effect until such time as
the rates are consistent between adult family homes and boarding homes
for delivery of the same patient care levels.
(c) Amounts provided in this section and in section 205 of this act
are sufficient to assist adult family home providers with the cost of
paying liability insurance.
(((13))) (8) The department shall contract for housing with service
models, such as cluster care, to create efficiencies in service
delivery and responsiveness to unscheduled personal care needs by
clustering hours for clients that live in close proximity to each
other.
(((14) $2,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $1,002,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement sections 4 and 8 of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care
programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6220
(nurse delegation) or sections 11 and 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16))) (9) Within the funds appropriated in the section, the
department shall establish one statewide hourly rate to reimburse home
care agencies for the costs related to state clients for hours worked
by direct care workers in receiving mandatory training. The statewide
hourly rate shall be based on the hourly wage paid to individual
providers plus mandatory taxes plus an adjustment based on the formula
created under RCW 74.39A.310.
(((17) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the
department shall define in-home personal care services to include a
client's ability to manage their personal care worker as identified by
characteristics in the functional assessment. Clients whose
assessments demonstrate they are able to manage their own plan of care
are not eligible for personal care through a home care agency. The
department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(18))) (10) In addition to other reductions, the reduced
appropriations in this section reflect an additional $1,002,000
reduction in administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing state government administrative costs).
These administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not
affect direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.
(11) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(12) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for clients
in nonresidential settings.
(13) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility, not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.

Sec.207 2009 c 4 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $586,369,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($464,586,000))
$467,807,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,168,223,000))
$1,197,375,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,233,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,257,003,000))
$2,289,376,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $344,694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($362,304,000)) $225,714,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($733,276,000))
$843,165,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely for all components of the WorkFirst program. Within the amounts
provided for the WorkFirst program, the department may provide
assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for temporary
assistance for needy families. Within the amounts provided for the
WorkFirst program, the department shall:
(a) Establish a career services work transition program;
(b) Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are
designed to achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW
74.08A.410. Outcome data regarding job retention and wage progression
shall be reported quarterly to appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the legislature for families who leave assistance, measured after 12
months, 24 months, and 36 months. The department shall also report the
percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance for
needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months;
(c) Submit a report by October 1, 2007, to the fiscal committees of
the legislature containing a spending plan for the WorkFirst program.
The plan shall identify how spending levels in the 2007-2009 biennium
will be adjusted to stay within available federal grant levels and the
appropriated state-fund levels;
(d) Provide quarterly fiscal reports to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on the amount expended from general fund--state and general fund--federal by activity;
(e) For fiscal year 2009, increase the temporary assistance for
needy families grant standard by three percent to account for increased
housing costs.
(2) Up to $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 of the amounts in subsection (1) of this section
are for the WorkFirst pathway to engagement program. The department
shall collaborate with community partners and represented staff to
identify additional services needed for WorkFirst clients in sanction
status. The department shall contract with qualified community-based
organizations to deliver such services, provided that such services are
complimentary to the work of the department and are not intended to
supplant existing staff or services. The department shall also
contract with community-based organizations for the provision of
services for WorkFirst clients who have been terminated after six
months of sanction. Contracts established pursuant to this subsection
shall have a performance-based component and shall include both
presanction termination and postsanction termination services. Clients
shall be able to choose whether or not to accept the services. The
department shall develop outcome measures for the program related to
outreach and reengagement, reduction of barriers to employment, and
client feedback and satisfaction. Nothing in this subsection is
intended to modify a collective bargaining agreement under chapter
41.80 RCW or to change the state's responsibility under chapter 41.80
RCW. The department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on program
implementation and outcomes. The department also shall report on
implementation of specialized caseloads for clients in sanction status,
including average caseload size, referral process and criteria, and
expected outcomes for specialized caseloads.
(3) $210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $187,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $396,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of section 8 of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1088 (children's mental health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $482,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No.
1009 (child support schedule). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase naturalization
services. These amounts shall supplement and not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(6) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to increase limited English
proficiency pathway services. These amounts shall supplement and not
supplant state and federal resources currently provided by the
department for this purpose.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,782,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $6,431,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5244 (deficit reduction act). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall: (a) Increase the state supplemental payment by $1.77 per month
beginning July 1, 2007, and by an additional $1.83 per month beginning
July 1, 2008, for SSI clients who reside in nursing facilities,
residential habilitation centers, or state hospitals and who receive a
personal needs allowance; and (b) decrease other state supplemental
payments.
(9) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department for the data
tracking provisions specified in sections 701 and 702 of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470 (dissolution proceedings). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,552,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6016 (workfirst program). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to award grants
to small mutual assistance associations or small community-based
organizations that contract with the department for immigrant and
refugee assistance services. The funds shall be awarded to demonstrate
the impact of providing funding for a case worker in the community
organization on the refugees' economic self-sufficiency through the
effective use of social services, and financial and medical assistance.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $850,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase the gross income limits for eligibility for
programs authorized under RCW 74.04.500 and 74.08A.120 to 200 percent
of the federal poverty level. The department shall adjust its rules
and information technology systems to make the eligibility change
effective October 1, 2008.
(14) The department, in conjunction with the House Bill No. 1290
work group, shall identify and analyze barriers preventing city,
county, and state referrals of persons potentially eligible for
expedited application processing authorized under RCW 74.09.555. The
department, in conjunction with the House Bill No. 1290 work group,
shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than November 15, 2008.
(15) $656,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to the department to increase immigration
and naturalization services. These funds shall not supplant state and
federal resources currently provided by the department for this
purpose.
(16) The department shall not increase the child care copayment for
families above 82 percent of the federal poverty level.
(17) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $516,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 208 2009 c 4 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,252,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,049,000))
$55,324,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($168,949,000))
$177,314,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,083,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,555,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,186,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,186,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,464,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,396,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($369,661,000))
$379,301,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,786,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,785,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the parent child assistance
program. The department shall contract with the University of
Washington and community-based providers for the provision of this
program. For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the
program shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) (($11,113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $14,490,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, and $14,269,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion of)) The department
shall not reduce and shall continue to provide chemical dependency
treatment services for adult medicaid eligible and general
assistance-unemployable patients authorized under the 2005-07 biennial
appropriations act. By September 30, 2007, the department shall submit
an expenditure and program report relating to the patients receiving
treatment and other services pursuant to the funding provided in this
subsection (2), as well as to other patients receiving treatment funded
by the department. The report shall be submitted to the office of
financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature. Subsequent updates to this report shall be
provided by January 31 and July 31 of each fiscal year of the 2007-09
biennium. The reports shall include, but not necessarily be limited
to, the following information: (a) The number and demographics
(including categories) of patients served; (b) geographic distribution;
(c) modality of treatment services provided (i.e. residential or
out-patient); (d) treatment completion rates; (e) funds spent; and (f)
where applicable, the estimated cost offsets in medical assistance on
a total and per patient basis.
(3) (($698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $1,060,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $154,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the expansion authorized under
the 2005-07 biennial appropriations act of chemical dependency
treatment services for minors who are under 200 percent of the federal
poverty level. The department shall monitor the number and type of
clients entering treatment, for purposes of determining potential cost
offsets.
(4))) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
the following: (a) To continue an existing pilot program in Pierce
county limited to individuals who began chemical dependency treatment
using the prometa protocol prior to March 11, 2008; and (b) to contract
with an independent evaluator who will, to the extent possible,
evaluate the Pierce county pilot, as well as summarize other research
on the efficacy of the prometa protocol.
(((5))) (4) $4,449,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $1,000,000 of the criminal justice treatment
account appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6665 (crisis response), to continue existing
pilot programs and to expand the intensive crisis response pilot to
Spokane county. The continuation and expansion of the pilot programs
expires June 30, 2009. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((6) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
adult care and low-income treatment and detoxification services.
(7) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to support
the families in recovery program.
(8) The department shall not reduce and shall continue the student
employment program.
(9))) (5) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
provide funding for living allowances to clients in treatment under RCW
74.50.050.
(((10) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
provide funding to drug courts for treatment.
(11))) (6) In addition to other reductions, the reduced
appropriations in this section reflect an additional $76,000 reduction
in administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.
(((12))) (7) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
secure and provide for evaluation training for assessing children with
fetal alcohol spectrum disorders (FASD).

Sec. 209 2009 c 4 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,827,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,533,431,000))
$1,439,526,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,439,060,000))
$4,653,878,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $388,946,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($392,857,000))
$364,314,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,883,000))
$1,727,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,376,726,000))
$8,468,940,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(4) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is at least
equivalent to the benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(5) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(6) $1,111,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,110,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $5,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation, $1,590,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $1,591,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
grants to rural hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds
under a formula that provides a relatively larger share of the
available funding to hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share
of low-income and medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively
smaller net financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal
medicaid program.
(7) $10,546,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $10,546,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $19,725,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural
hospitals. The department shall distribute the funds under a formula
that provides a relatively larger share of the available funding to
hospitals that (a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and
medically indigent patients and (b) have relatively smaller net
financial margins, to the extent allowed by the federal medicaid
program.
(8) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2007-2009 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2007, and by November 1,
2008, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2008 and fiscal
year 2009, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain (a)
one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital
cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by
medical assistance; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal portion
of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under
federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established
using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims
submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the
program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a
baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total
of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid
during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program,
and (b) disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 that pertain to
fiscal year 2005. If payments during the fiscal year exceed the
hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will be made to the
hospital except the federal portion of allowable disproportionate share
hospital payments for which the hospital can certify allowable match.
If payments during the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount,
the hospital will be paid a state grant equal to the difference between
payments during the fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount.
Payment of the state grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year
and distributed in monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated
and redistributed as the baseline is updated during the fiscal year.
The grant payments are subject to an interim settlement within eleven
months after the end of the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be
performed within two years after the end of the related fiscal year.
To the extent that either settlement determines that a hospital has
received funds in excess of what it would have received as described in
this subsection, the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the
state when requested. $61,728,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated
in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, and
(($47,745,000)) $46,490,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section
204(1) of this act and the balance in this section, are provided solely
for state grants for the participating hospitals.
(9) $4,399,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($6,391,000)) $6,094,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and (($55,384,000)) $53,470,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of a replacement system for the existing
medicaid management information system. The amounts are conditioned on
the department satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the department shall
provide the person with the same benefits as he or she would receive if
eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the extent necessary.
(11) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(12) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(13) The department shall, within available resources, continue
operation of the medical care services care management pilot project
for clients receiving general assistance benefits in King and Pierce
counties. The project may use a full or partial capitation model that
includes a mechanism for shared savings.
(14) $1,688,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,689,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to incorporate a mental health
service component to the pilot project established pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section. Addition of the mental health service
component authorized in this subsection is contingent upon the managed
care contractor or the participating counties providing, alone or in
combination, matching funds in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to
one-ninth of the amounts appropriated in this subsection. The mental
health service component may include care coordination, mental health
services, and integrated medical and mental health service delivery for
general assistance clients with mental health disorders, as well as
primary care provider training and education. The department shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2009, on costs, savings, and any outcomes or quality
measures associated with the pilot projects during calendar year 2007
and 2008. To the extent possible, the report shall address any impact
that the mental health services component has had upon clients' use of
medical services, including but not limited to primary care physician's
visits, emergency room utilization, and prescription drug utilization.
(15) $341,000 of the health services account appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,054,000 of the health services account
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,461,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1201 (foster care youth medical). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(16) $6,728,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $8,563,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to provide full benefit dual
eligible beneficiaries with medicare part D prescription drug copayment
coverage in accordance with chapter 3, Laws of 2007 (part D copayment
drug program).
(17) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
financial impact associated with continuing to cover brand name
medications versus the same medication in its generic form. The study
shall account for all rebates paid to the state on each product studied
up until the point where the generic form is less expensive, net of
federally required rebates. The department shall submit its report to
the legislative fiscal committees by December 1, 2007.
(18) (($198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $134,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the first two years of a four-year project by the Seattle-King county health department to improve
management of symptoms and reduce complications related to asthma among
medicaid eligible children. The department shall contract with the
Seattle-King county health department to have trained community health
workers visit medicaid eligible children in their homes to identify and
reduce exposure to asthma triggers, improve clients' self-management
skills, and coordinate clients' care with their primary care and
specialty providers. The contract shall include an evaluation of the
impact of the services provided under the contract on urgent
physician's visits, emergency room utilization, and inpatient
hospitalization.
(19))) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $1,624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development
and implementation of an outreach program as provided in chapter 5,
Laws of 2007 (Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5093, health services
for children).
(a) By December 15, 2007, the department shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress of
implementing the following activities:
(i) Feasibility study and implementation plan to develop online
application capability that is integrated with the department's
automated client eligibility system;
(ii) Development of data linkages with the office of superintendent
of public instruction for free and reduced-price lunch enrollment
information and the department of early learning for child care subsidy
program enrollment information;
(iii) Informing insurers and providers when their enrollees'
eligibility is going to expire so insurers and providers can help
families reenroll;
(iv) Outreach contracts with local governmental entities, community
based organizations, and tribes;
(v) Results of data sharing with outreach contractors, and other
contracted entities such as local governments, community-based
organizations, tribes, health care providers, and insurers to engage,
enroll, and reenroll identified children;
(vi) Results of efforts to maximize federal matching funds,
wherever possible; and
(vii) Plans for sustaining outreach programs proven to be
successful.
(b)(i) Within the amounts provided under this subsection (19),
sufficient funding is provided to the department to develop and
implement in conjunction with the employment security department a plan
that would:
(A) Allow applicants and recipients of unemployment insurance to
request assistance with obtaining health coverage for household
members; and
(B) Authorize the exchange of information between the employment
security department and the department of social and health services to
more efficiently determine eligibility for health coverage under
chapter 74.09 RCW.
(ii) The plan developed in (b)(i) of this subsection should address
permissible uses of federal employment security funding and
infrastructure, identification of any necessary statutory changes, and
cost information. The department shall submit the plan in a report to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2008.
(((20))) (19) $640,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a medicare advantage
program. The department shall:
(a) Pay the premiums associated with enrollment in a medicare
advantage plan for those full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries, as
defined in RCW 74.09.010, who were enrolled on or before November 14,
2006 in a medicare advantage plan sponsored by an entity accredited by
the national committee for quality assurance and for whom the
department had been paying Part C premium as of November 2006; and
(b) Undertake, directly or by contract, a study to determine the
cost-effectiveness of paying premiums for enrollment of full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries in medicare advantage plans in lieu of
paying full benefit dual eligible beneficiaries' medicare cost-sharing.
The study shall compare the cost and health outcomes experience,
including rates of nursing home placement and costs for groups of full
benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are enrolled in medicare
advantage plans, in medicare special needs plan or in medicare fee-for-service. The study shall compare the health status and utilization of
health and long-term care services for the three groups, and the impact
of access to a medical home and specialty care, over a period of two
years to determine any differences in health status, health outcomes,
and state expenditures that result. The department shall submit the
results of the study to the governor and the legislature by June 30,
2009. The department is authorized to accept private cash and in-kind
donations and grants to support the study and evaluation.
(c) Track enrollment and expenditures for this population on
department monthly management reports.
(((21))) (20) The department may not transition to managed care
delivery any population that has been primarily served under fee-for-service delivery unless the department first conducts a cost-effectiveness evaluation of the transition, including an evaluation of
historical data on utilization patterns, and finds that the transition
would result in a more effective and cost-efficient form of service
delivery, pursuant to RCW 74.09.470. Any such finding must be provided
to the governor and the legislature no less than ninety days before the
transition begins.
(((22))) (21) $756,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $1,193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $1,261,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,448,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections
5, 7, 8, and 11 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1088 (children's
mental health). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((23))) (22) $288,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $566,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon comm/health care).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(((24))) (23) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the department of social and
health services, in consultation with the health care authority and the
employment security department, to prepare and submit a report and
recommendations to the governor and the legislature related to coverage
of low-wage workers enrolled on state plans who are employed by
employers with more than fifty employees. The report shall address
multiple approaches, including but not limited to the proposal included
in House Bill No. 2094 (taxpayer health care fairness act). The
discussion of each approach included in the report should identify how
the approach would further the goal of shared responsibility for
coverage of low-wage workers, obstacles to implementation and options
to address them, and estimated implementation costs. The report shall
be submitted on or before November 15, 2007. The agencies shall
establish a workgroup, which shall be closely involved and consulted in
the development of the report and recommendations under this
subsection. The workgroup shall include the following participants:
Persons or organizations representing large employers in the retail,
agricultural and grocery trades, other large employers, organizations
representing employees of large employers, organizations representing
low-wage employees of large employers, state and local governmental
entities as employers, and organizations representing employees of
state and local governmental entities. In addition, the workgroup
shall include three members from each of the two largest caucuses of
the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker, and three
members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate.
(((25))) (24) $1,883,000 of the tobacco prevention and control
account--state appropriation and $1,742,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are for the provision of smoking cessation
benefits pursuant to Senate Bill No. 6421 (smoking cessation). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((26))) (25) As part of the five-year plan on state purchasing to
improve health care quality under chapter 259, Laws of 2007, the
department, in collaboration with the department of health, shall
provide a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
outlining a strategy to improve immunization rates for all children in
the state, including but not limited to vaccine administration fee
increases and pay-for-performance incentives. The department shall
submit the report to the governor and the health policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(((27))) (26) Within existing funds, the department shall evaluate
the fiscal impact of the federal upper limits on medicaid reimbursement
to pharmacies implemented under the federal deficit reduction act, and
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(((28))) (27)(a) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for a feasibility study to
examine processes and systems that would expeditiously link persons
released from confinement in state and local correctional facilities
and institutions for mental diseases to medical assistance benefits for
which they qualify. The study shall present an analysis of the costs
and benefits associated with:
(i) Suspending eligibility for persons who were receiving medical
assistance at the time their confinement began, such that upon the
person's release from confinement, medical assistance benefits would
immediately resume without the filing of a new application. In the
evaluation of eligibility suspension, the department shall examine
process modifications that would allow confined persons to recertify
eligibility before or immediately after release from confinement;
(ii) Improving the efficiency and expanding the scope of the
expedited medical assistance reinstatement and eligibility
determination process established under RCW 74.09.555, including
extending the process to persons other than those with mental
disorders, both for persons who had been previously eligible before
confinement and for persons who had not been eligible before
confinement;
(iii) Providing medical and mental health evaluations to determine
disability for purposes of the medical assistance program before the
person's release from confinement; and
(iv) Notifying the department in a timely manner when a person who
has been enrolled in medical assistance is confined in a state
correctional institution or institution for mental diseases or is
released from confinement.
(b) In conducting the study, the department shall collaborate with
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
department of corrections, the regional support networks, department
field offices, institutions for mental diseases, and correctional
institutions. The department shall submit the study to the governor
and the legislature by November 15, 2008.
(((29))) (28) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 and $50,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of the agency's responsibilities
in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2549 (patient-centered
primary care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((30))) (29) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
provide family planning nurses and supplies at community services
offices.
(((31))) (30) The department shall not eliminate and shall continue
to provide a nurse hotline for foster parents.
(((32))) (31) The department shall not reduce and shall provide
medical assistance to children under three-hundred percent of the
federal poverty level.
(((33))) (32) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
provide maternity support services to pregnant and postpartum women.
(((34) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to
provide transportation services to patients receiving adult day health
services.
(35))) (33) The department shall continue children's health
coverage outreach and education efforts. These efforts shall rely on
existing relationships and systems developed to implement the program
under RCW 74.09.470, such as those with local public health agencies,
health care providers, public schools, the women, infants, and children
program, the early childhood education and assistance program, child
care providers, newborn visiting nurses, and other community-based
organizations. The department shall seek public-private partnerships
and federal funds that may become available to provide on-going support
for outreach and education efforts.
(((36))) (34) The department shall reduce expenditures on
pharmaceuticals and durable medical equipment.
(((37))) (35) The department shall not reduce hospital rates.
(((38))) (36) In addition to other reductions, the reduced
appropriations in this section reflect an additional $1,062,000
reduction in administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing state government administrative costs).
These administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not
affect direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 210 2009 c 4 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,543,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,182,000))
$8,170,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,975,000))
$100,521,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($117,791,000))
$122,325,000

Sec. 211 2009 c 4 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,216,000))
$51,478,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,722,000))
$103,984,000

Sec. 212 2009 c 4 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,085,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,540,000))
$53,620,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,302,000))
$53,864,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($164,927,000))
$166,569,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $235,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and $111,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement sections 2 and
3 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3205 (child long-term
well-being). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2009 c 4 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,934,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,497,000
State Health Care Authority Administrative Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $527,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $271,478,000
Health Services Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($291,795,000))
$289,124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($611,331,000))
$609,160,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) Appropriations in this act include specific funding for health
records banking under section 10 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission).
(5) $11,934,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $11,834,000 of the health services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
funding for health care services provided through local community
clinics.
(6) $784,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $540,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, and $8,200,000 of the state health care authority
administrative account--state appropriation are provided for the
development of a new benefits administration and insurance accounting
system.
(7) $2,000,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the authority to provide
one-time competitive grants to community health centers to increase the
number of adults served on an ongoing basis. Each clinic receiving
grant funding shall report annually, beginning December 2008, on key
adult access indicators established by the authority, including but not
limited to increases in the number of low-income adults served.
(8) $1,639,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for section 5 of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1569 (health insurance partnership
board) and related provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health care).
(9) $664,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of the
Washington quality forum, pursuant to section 9 of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the
section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) $600,000 of the state health care authority administrative
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of the state employee health pilot, pursuant to section 41 of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If
the section is not enacted by June 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $250,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $250,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for continuation
of the community health collaborative grant program in accordance with
chapter 67, Laws of 2006 (E2SSB 6459). The applicant organizations
must assure measurable improvements in health access within their
service region, demonstrate active collaboration with key community
partners, and provide two dollars in matching funds for each grant
dollar awarded.
(12) $731,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008 and $977,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the dental
residency program, including maintenance of the existing residency
positions and the establishment of six additional resident positions in
fiscal year 2008 (four in eastern Washington and two in the Seattle
area), and five additional positions in fiscal year 2009.
(13) Appropriations in this act include funding for sections 14
(reducing unnecessary emergency room use) and 40 (state employee health
program) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission).
(14) $100,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of the
agency's responsibilities in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2549 (patient-centered primary care). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 214 2009 c 4 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,377,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,580,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,523,000))
$1,723,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,480,000))
$8,680,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $115,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $190,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6776
(whistleblower protections). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2009 c 4 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,963,000))
$18,045,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,964,000))
$18,046,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,947,000))
$36,111,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $82,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 and $82,000 of the medical aid
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely
for implementation of chapter 280, Laws of 2008 (industrial insurance
orders).

Sec. 216 2009 c 4 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $306,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,680,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,445,000))
$21,320,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,322,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,361,000))
$50,236,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the criminal justice training
commission is authorized to raise existing fees charged for firearms
certification for security guards in excess of the fiscal growth factor
established pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting the certification programs and the
appropriation levels in this section.
(2) $2,390,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and (($1,809,000)) $1,684,000 of the
public safety and education account--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for ten additional basic law enforcement
academies in fiscal year 2008 and ((nine)) eight additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2009.
(3) $1,044,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $1,191,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs to continue to develop, maintain, and operate the jail booking
and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide automated victim
information and notification system (SAVIN).
(4) $28,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of chapter 10, Laws of 2007 (SSB 5191, missing persons).
(5) $5,400,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $6,922,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $150,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $150,000 of the public safety
and education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely to deliver multi-disciplinary team training sessions
aimed at improving the coordination of, and communication between,
agencies involved in the investigation of child fatality, child sexual
abuse, child physical abuse, and criminal neglect cases.
(7) $25,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987 (gang-related
offenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $50,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $50,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely for support of the coalition of small police agencies
major crimes task force. The purpose of this task force is to pool its
resources and to establish an efficient and cooperative approach in
addressing major violent crimes.
(9) $20,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5315 (forest
fires/property access). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $5,000,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address
and residency of all registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
under RCW 9A.44.130. The Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall:
(a) Enter into performance-based agreements with units of local
government to ensure that registered offender address and residency are
verified:
(A) For level I offenders, every twelve months;
(B) For level II offenders, every six months; and
(C) For level III offenders, every three months.
For the purposes of this subsection, unclassified offenders and
kidnapping offenders shall be considered at risk level I unless in the
opinion of the local jurisdiction a higher classification is in the
interest of public safety.
(b) Collect performance data from all participating jurisdictions
sufficient to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of the address
and residency verification program.
(c) Submit a report on the effectiveness of the address and
residency verification program to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate by September 1,
2009.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up
to three percent of the amount provided in this subsection for the cost
of administration. Any funds not disbursed for address and residency
verification or retained for administration may be allocated to local
prosecutors for the prosecution costs associated with failing to
register offenses.
(11) $750,000 of the public safety and education fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2712 (criminal
street gangs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a grant program to pay for the costs
of local law enforcement agencies participating in specialized crisis
intervention training.

Sec. 217 2009 c 4 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,716,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,624,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,393,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,525,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $908,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,104,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,941,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,948,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,295,000))
$232,617,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($235,445,000))
$235,766,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,634,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,646,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($597,307,000))
$597,950,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,413,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for conducting utilization reviews of physical and
occupational therapy cases at the 24th visit and the associated
administrative costs, including those of entering data into the
claimant's file. The department shall develop and report performance
measures and targets for these reviews to the office of financial
management. The reports are due September 30th for the prior fiscal
year and must include the amount spent and the estimated savings per
fiscal year.
(2) $2,247,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5920
(vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $822,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for vocational services professional staff salary
adjustments necessary to recruit and retain positions required for
anticipated changes in work duties as a result of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5920 (vocational rehabilitation). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Compensation for anticipated changes to work duties is subject
to review and approval by the director of the department of personnel
and is subject to collective bargaining.
(4) $8,000,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to establish a program of safety and health as
authorized by RCW 49.17.210 to be administered under rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, provided that projects funded involve
workplaces insured by the medical aid fund, and that priority is given
to projects fostering accident prevention through cooperation between
employers and employees or their representatives.
(5) $600,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to evaluate and recommend improvements to the
rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, including analyzing how risks are
pooled, the effect of including worker premium contributions in
adjustment calculations, incentives for accident and illness
prevention, return-to-work practices, and other sound risk-management
strategies that are consistent with recognized insurance principles.
(6) $181,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$181,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5443 (workers'
compensation claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $558,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5290
(workers' compensation advisory committees). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $104,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $104,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $361,000
of the accident account--state appropriation, and $361,000 of the
medical aid account--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5675 (workers'
compensation benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $730,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(10) $437,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$437,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5053
(industrial insurance ombudsman). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $74,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$74,000 of the medical aid--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5915 (notices to
employers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $605,000 of the accident account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for a study of the incidence of
permanent total disability pensions in the state's workers'
compensation system. To conduct the study, the department shall
contract with an independent researcher that has demonstrated expertise
in workers' compensation systems. When selecting the independent
researcher, the department shall consult the labor and business members
of the workers' compensation advisory committee and, if the labor and
business members of the workers' compensation advisory committee agree
on a particular independent researcher, the department shall select
that independent researcher. The study must consider causes of the
recent increase in permanent total disability cases, future anticipated
permanent total disability trends, a comparison of Washington's
permanent total disability claims experience and injured workers with
other states and jurisdictions, the impact of the standard for finding
workers employable on the incidence of permanent total disability
pensions, and the impact of vocational rehabilitation under RCW
51.32.095 on the incidence of permanent total disability pensions. The
department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory
committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee,
and the senate labor, commerce, research and development committee on
the results of the study on or before July 1, 2008.
(13) $1,089,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of chapter 27, Laws of 2007 (ESHB 2171, crane
safety).
(14) $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$192,000 of the manufactured home installation training account--state
appropriation are provided solely for Substitute House Bill No. 2118
(mobile/manufactured homes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $107,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$107,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6839 (workers' compensation
coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(16) (($224,000)) $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $741,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation, and $741,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(17) $408,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$72,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2602 (victims' employment
leave). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $3,000 of the public safety and education account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $3,000 of the public safety and
education account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6246
(industrial insurance claims). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to conduct a review of
the need for regulation of general and specialty contractors involved
in the repair, alteration, or construction of single-family homes using
the public interest criteria set forth in RCW 18.118.010 and as
generally described in Second Substitute House Bill No. 3349
(residential contractors). By October 1, 2008, the department and the
department of licensing shall report their findings to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.
(20) The department of labor and industries shall enter into an
interagency agreement with the employment security department to expend
funds from the family leave insurance account for the implementation of
the family leave insurance program.
(21) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section and by
not more than 5.53 percent in fiscal year 2008: Boiler inspection
permits and fees; boiler permit fees; plumbers' continuing education;
and plumbers' licensing and examination fees.
(22) $256,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$256,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of chapter 280, Laws of 2008 (industrial
insurance orders).

Sec. 218 2009 c 4 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,124,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,926,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,060,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,264,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,476,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,025,000))
$1,332,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,317,000))
$3,640,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,437,000
Veteran Estate Management Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,581,000))
$18,211,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((a))) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $560,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to
implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5164 (veterans'
conservation corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((b) The department shall not reduce field service contracts.))

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,484,000))
$4,833,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($43,120,000))
$43,207,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,569,000))
$32,241,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,121,000))
$88,229,000

Sec. 219 2009 c 4 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,232,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,596,000))
$80,596,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,065,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($119,875,000))
$135,219,000
Hospital Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,000))
$215,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,726,000))
$69,054,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,606,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,041,000
Public Health Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,027,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,513,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,975,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,983,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,460,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,055,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,918,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $291,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,122,000
Health Services Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,729,000))
$46,398,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,846,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,025,690,000))
$1,038,102,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
its fee-supported programs in excess of the fiscal growth factor
pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, if necessary, to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055 and RCW 43.70.250, the department is further
authorized to increase fees in its fee-supported programs as necessary
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section, as specifically authorized in LEAP Document
DOH-2008, as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program on March 11, 2008.
(2) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive,
and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not
anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does not require
expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of amounts
anticipated in this act. If the department receives unanticipated
unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent for services
authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) $877,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1099
(dental professions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2304 (cardiac care services). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) $138,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for an evaluation of chronic care
provider training.
(6) $51,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $24,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297 (sex education). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) $103,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1837 (nonambulatory persons). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $201,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2087 (health care facilities). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $293,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for public service announcements
regarding childhood lead poisoning, information pamphlets, rule
development, and for early identification of persons at risk of having
elevated blood-lead levels, which includes systematically screening
children under six years of age and other target populations identified
by the department. Priority will be given to testing children and
increasing the registry in the lead surveillance program.
(10) $101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $81,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $6,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1414 (ambulatory surgical facilities). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(11) $55,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1397 (massage therapy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $58,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5398
(specialty hospitals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $224,000 of the oyster reserve land account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $571,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $458,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1106 (hospital acquired infections). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009, and $1,000,000 of the public health services
account--state appropriation are provided solely for department of
health-funded family planning clinics to increase the capacity of the
clinics to provide family planning and reproductive health services to
low-income men and women who are not otherwise eligible for services
through the department of social and health services medical assistance
program and for clinical or other health services associated with
sexually transmitted disease testing through the infertility prevention
project. Funds appropriated and expended under this subsection for
fiscal year 2009 shall be distributed in a manner that allocates
funding to department of health-funded family planning clinics based
upon the percentage of medical assistance family planning waiver
clients in calendar year 2005 who received services from a provider
located in the geographic area served by the department of
health-funded clinic. Of these amounts, the department is authorized
to expend up to $1,000,000 of its general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 for services provided in fiscal year 2008, if
necessary, to offset reductions in federal funding.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is for one-time funding to purchase and store antiviral
medications to be used in accordance with the state pandemic influenza
response plan. These drugs are to be purchased through the United
States department of health and human services to take advantage of
federal subsidies.
(17) $147,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of health to
provide relevant information on measures taken to facilitate expanded
use of reclaimed water pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the lifelong AIDS alliance to
restore lost federal funding.
(19) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for medical nutritional therapy
for people with HIV/AIDS and other low-income residents in King county
with chronic illnesses.
(20) $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $645,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the neurodevelopmental center
system, which provides therapy and medical services for young, low-income children with developmental disabilities.
(21) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to continue the autism task force
established by chapter 259, Laws of 2005, through June 30, 2008. The
task force shall:
(a) Review and continue to refine criteria for regional autism
centers throughout Washington state based on community needs in each
area, and address the role of autism centers within the larger context
of developmental disabilities;
(b) Prioritize its December 2006 recommendations and develop an
implementation plan for the highest priorities. The plan should detail
how systems will coordinate to improve service and avoid duplication
between state agencies including the department of social and health
services, department of health, office of superintendent of public
instruction, as well as school districts, autism centers, and local
partners and providers. The plan shall also estimate the costs of the
highest priority recommendations and report to the legislature and
governor by December 1, 2007;
(c) Compile information for and draft the "Washington Service
Guidelines for Individuals with Autism - Birth Through Lifespan" book
described in the task force's recommendations. Funding to print and
distribute the book is expected to come from federal or private
sources; and
(d) Monitor the federal combating autism act and its funding
availability and make recommendations on applying for grants to assist
in implementation of the 2006 task force recommendations. The
department of health shall be the lead agency in providing staff for
the task force. The department may seek additional staff assistance
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
committee staff of the legislature. Nonlegislative members, except
those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be
reimbursed for travel expenses.
(22) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of the
Washington state hepatitis C strategic plan.
(23) $142,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5403 (animal massage practitioners). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(24) $174,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5503 (athletic trainers). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $75,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5292 (physical therapist assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(26) $94,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6032 (medical use of marijuana). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $386,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $384,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5894 (large on-site sewage
systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(28) $1,721,000 of the health professions account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of sections 11 and 12 (medical
information) of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). If the sections are not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(29) $10,000,000 of the health services account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $10,000,000 of the health
services account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided
solely for distribution to local health jurisdictions and for the costs
of administering the public health related sections of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on health
care), subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) During the month of January 2008, and January 2009, the
department of health shall distribute funds appropriated in this
section to local health jurisdictions, less an amount not to exceed
five percent for the costs of administering the public health related
sections of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue
ribbon commission on health care). The amount of funding for
distribution to a jurisdiction before the administrative deduction
shall be the greater of: (i) One hundred thousand dollars; or (ii) (A)
a base level of funding of seventy-five thousand dollars plus the per
capita amount, for a jurisdiction with a population of four hundred
thousand persons or fewer; or (B) a base level of funding of twenty-five thousand dollars plus the per capita amount, for a jurisdiction
with a population greater than four hundred thousand persons. Amounts
distributed under this subsection must be used to fund core public
health functions of statewide significance as defined in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5930 (blue ribbon commission on
health care).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Per capita amount" means an amount equal to seven million five
hundred thousand dollars multiplied by the proportion of the population
of the jurisdiction in the previous calendar year to the population of
the state in the previous calendar year.
(ii) "Population" means the number of persons as last determined by
the office of financial management. If the jurisdiction comprises a
single county, "population" means the number of persons in the county.
For a jurisdiction comprising two or more counties, "population" means
the number of persons in all counties comprising the jurisdiction.
(iii) "Local health jurisdiction" or "jurisdiction" means a county
board of health organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district
organized under chapter 70.46 RCW, or a combined city and county health
department organized under chapter 70.08 RCW.
(c) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer this
subsection.
(30) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for an evaluation of the economic
benefits to the state's health care system of the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program under chapter 18.50 RCW. In particular, the
department shall contract with a consultant to conduct a review of
existing research literature on whether these economic benefits exceed
the state expenditures to subsidize the cost of the midwifery licensing
and regulatory program under RCW 43.70.250. The evaluation shall
include an assessment of the economic benefits to consumers who elect
to have out-of-hospital births with midwives, including any reduced use
of procedures that increase the costs of childbirth. The department
shall submit the report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature by January 1, 2008.
(31) $147,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department of health to
convene a work group to develop recommendations regarding the need to
regulate those individuals currently registered with the department of
health as counselors. The department of health shall submit
recommendations of the work group to the legislature and governor by
November 15, 2007. Based on the recommendations of the work group, the
department of health shall draft credentialing guidelines for all
registered counselors by January 1, 2008. Guidelines shall include
education in risk assessment, ethics, professional standards, and
deadlines for compliance.
(32) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483 (local food production). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(33) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the senior falls prevention pilot
program, pursuant to section 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs).
(34) $585,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington state breast and
cervical health program to increase the provider reimbursement rate for
digital mammographies to the medicare equivalent rate.
(35) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the child death review program. The
program shall be transferred from the community and family health
division to the injury prevention division within the department.
(36) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the northwest sickle cell
collaborative program.
(37) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $154,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the restoration of
maxillofacial/cleft palate teams in Yakima, Spokane, Seattle, and
Tacoma.
(38) $17,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6220
(nurse delegation) or sections 11 and 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2668 (long-term care programs). If neither bill is
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(39) $11,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6439
(radiologist assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(40) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $4,261,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Fourth
Substitute House Bill No. 1103 (health professions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(41) $558,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2674 (counselor credentialing). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(42) The department of licensing and the department of health shall
jointly review and report to the appropriate policy committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2008, recommendations for implementing a
process of holding in abeyance for up to six months following the
conclusion of active duty service the expiration of, and currency
requirements for, professional licenses and certificates for
individuals who have been called to active duty military service.
(43) The higher education coordinating board, the department of
licensing, and the department of health shall jointly review and report
to appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 1,
2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the extent to which
veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills sets and
education required while in service to certification, licensure, and
degree requirements.
(44) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $80,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2647
(children's safe products). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(45) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6340 (water
system program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(46) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2549 (patient-centered care). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(47) $96,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
2881 (practice of dentistry). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(48) $130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the midwifery licensure and regulatory
program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There shall be no
change to the current annual fees for new or renewed licenses for the
midwifery program. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory
committee on a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed
midwifery.
(49) $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the Washington colon health program.
Through the program, the department shall provide grants to
participating counties to provide free colorectal screening exams to
individuals fifty to sixty-four years old who are below two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level.
(50) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional $90,000 reduction in administrative
costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5460 (reducing
state government administrative costs). These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.
(51) $500,000 of the health services account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is for the universal children's vaccine program.
These moneys are from the cy pres monetary portion of the consent
decree in settlement of the consumer protection act litigation against
Caremark Rx, LLC (King county superior court cause no. 08-2-06098-5).

Sec. 220 2008 c 329 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS. (1) The appropriations to the
department of corrections in this act shall be expended for the
programs and in the amounts specified herein. However, after May 1,
((2008)) 2009, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year ((2008))
2009 between programs. The department shall not transfer funds, and
the director of financial management shall not approve the transfer,
unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of conserving, to
the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state funds and not
federal funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any deviations
from appropriation levels. The written notification shall include a
narrative explanation and justification of the changes, along with
expenditures and allotments by budget unit and appropriation, both
before and after any allotment modifications or transfers.
(2) The department may transfer up to $15,000,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 into fiscal year 2008,
if deemed necessary by the department and approved in advance by the
director of financial management. The director of financial management
shall notify the fiscal committees of the legislature in writing seven
days prior to approving a transfer under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the transfer including allotment detail by program, budget object, and
budget unit for both fiscal years, both before and after any transfers.

Sec. 221 2009 c 4 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,545,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,652,000))
$52,320,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $169,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,467,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($114,620,000))
$114,288,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $9,389,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the completion of phase three of the
department's offender-based tracking system replacement project. This
amount is conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements of
section 902 of this act.
(b) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and support
of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes as its
members representatives of community-based mental health treatment
programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors and
commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities. The
council will begin to investigate and promote cost-effective approaches
to meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.
(c) $169,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No.
1001 (auto theft). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1422 (incarcerated parents).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(e) Within funds appropriated in this section, the department shall
seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to provide chemical
dependency treatment of offenders in corrections facilities, including
corrections centers and community supervision facilities, which have
demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of offenders and are able to
provide data to show a successful treatment rate.
(f) $314,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $294,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for four additional staff to
collect and analyze data for programs funded through the offender
reentry initiative and collect, analyze, and disseminate information
required by the GMAP process, performance audits, data requests, and
quality assessments and assurances.
(g) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6244 (conversion of facilities to house violators of community
supervision). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(h) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2712 (criminal street gangs). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($601,402,000))
$616,402,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($647,608,000))
$655,534,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,157,000))
$3,941,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,350,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,338,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,492,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,271,689,000))
$1,294,399,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2007-09 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(f) $358,000 of the Washington auto theft prevention authority
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $980,000 of the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 1001 (auto theft). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(g) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1097 (vulnerable adults). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(h) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1319 (correctional agency employee). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(i) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of House
Bill No. 1592 (sentence review board). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(j) $544,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $496,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for development of individual
reentry plans to prepare offenders for release into the community as
generally described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157
(offender recidivism). Individual reentry plans shall be based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool.
The individual reentry plan may be one document, or may be a series of
individual plans that combine to meet the requirements. The individual
reentry plan shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) A plan to maintain contact with the inmate's children and
family, if appropriate. The plan should determine whether parenting
classes, or other services, are appropriate;
(ii) A description of the offender's education, certifications,
work experience, skills, and training; and
(iii) A plan for the offender during the period of incarceration
through reentry into the community that addresses the needs of the
offender including education, employment, substance abuse treatment,
mental health treatment, and family reunification. The individual
reentry plan shall be updated as appropriate during the period of
incarceration, and prior to the inmate's release to address public
safety concerns, consistency with the offender risk management level
assigned by the department, housing, and connecting with a community
justice center in the area in which the offender will be residing, if
a community justice center is located in that area.
(iv) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $133,157,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,881,000))
$146,344,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,319,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,370,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,943,000))
$301,406,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into financial
contracts, paid for from operating resources, for the purposes
indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW.
This authority applies to the following: Lease-develop with the option
to purchase or lease-purchase work release beds in facilities
throughout the state for $8,561,000.
(c) $1,167,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,295,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the establishment and
operation of community justice centers by the department as generally
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6157 (offender
recidivism). At a minimum, a community justice center shall include:
(i) A violator program to allow the department to utilize a range
of available sanctions for offenders who violate conditions of their
supervision;
(ii) An employment opportunity program to assist an offender in
finding employment;
(iii) On-site services or resources for connecting offenders with
services such as mental health and substance abuse treatment,
transportation, training, family reunification, and community services;
and
(iv) The services of a transition coordinator to facilitate
connections between the former offender and the community. The
transition coordinator shall provide information to former offenders
regarding services available to them in the community including, but
not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, education,
vocational training, parent education, financial literacy, treatment
for substance abuse, mental health, anger management, and shall assist
offenders in their efforts to access needed services.
(v) If the appropriation in this subsection is not sufficient for
this program, the department shall prioritize the use of available
funds.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,357,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,358,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $124,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for
transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts
provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and
technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties in
developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient
offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,036,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,082,000))
$29,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,118,000))
$64,079,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for expenditures
related to the Farrakhan v. Locke litigation.

Sec. 222 2009 c 4 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,566,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,375,000))
$2,362,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,584,000))
$18,757,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,545,000))
$23,705,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 are provided solely for an adjustment to the agency lease
rate for space occupied and parking in the Tacoma Rhodes center. The
department of general administration shall increase lease rates to meet
the cash gain/loss break-even point for the Tacoma Rhodes center
effective July 1, 2007.
(2) The department shall not reduce and shall continue to provide
funding for contracted services that provide employment support and
help with life activities for deaf and blind individuals in King
county.

Sec. 223 2009 c 4 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,967,000))
$320,249,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,578,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,907,000))
$273,138,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,802,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,843,000
Family Leave Insurance Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,764,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($610,193,000))
$685,706,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,578,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from funds made available to
the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
These funds are authorized to provide direct services to unemployment
insurance claimants and providing job search review.
(2) $2,300,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue implementation of chapter 4, Laws
of 2003 2nd sp. sess. and for implementation costs relating to chapter
133, Laws of 2005 (unemployment insurance).
(3) $23,162,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions and department services to employers and job seekers.
(4) $372,000 of the administrative contingency account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5653 (self-employment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $12,054,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to fund the unemployment insurance tax
information system (TAXIS) technology initiative for the employment
security department.
(6) $430,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to replace high-risk servers used by the
unemployment security department.
(7) $503,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to provide a system to track computer
upgrades and changes for the unemployment security department.
(8) $183,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from the amounts made
available to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act
(Reed Act). This amount is authorized to conduct a feasibility study
to integrate job search data systems.
(9) $2,331,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for hardware and software to ensure the
ongoing, reliable operation of the telecenters.
(10) $488,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed Act).
This amount is authorized for the relocation of the WorkSource office
in Lakewood.
(11) $1,764,000 of the family leave insurance account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the family leave
insurance program.
(a) The amount provided in this subsection assumes that, in
developing the information technology systems to support the payment of
benefits, the department will incorporate the claim filing and benefit
payment efficiencies recommended by the joint legislative task force on
family leave insurance in Part III of its final report dated January
23, 2008, including:
(i) Eliminating the option for awarding attorney fees and costs for
administrative hearings;
(ii) Authorizing claims for benefits to be filed in the six-week
period beginning on the first day of the calendar week in which the
individual is on family leave;
(iii) Not requiring claimants to verify the birth of a child or the
placement of a child for adoption;
(iv) Including an attestation from the claimant that written notice
has been provided to the employer of the intention to take family
leave; and
(v) Not deducting and withholding federal income taxes from benefit
payments.
(b) In addition, the department shall incorporate the following
claim filing and benefit payment efficiencies:
(i) Define "qualifying year" to mean the first four of the last
five completed calendar quarters or, if eligibility is not established,
the last four completed calendar immediately preceding the first day of
the application year;
(ii) Allow individuals to file a claim for benefits in the six-week
period beginning on the first day of the calendar year in which the
individual is on family leave; and
(iii) After an initial family leave insurance benefit is paid,
subsequent payments must be made biweekly, rather than semimonthly,
thereafter.
(12) $222,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2815 (greenhouse gas emissions). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $155,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely to implement Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6732 (construction industry). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2009 c 4 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $524,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,044,000))
$1,017,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,086,000))
$2,059,000

Sec. 302 2009 c 4 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,109,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,748,000))
$45,761,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,013,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,618,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,207,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,151,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,588,000
State Drought Preparedness -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $421,000
Vessel Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,604,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $694,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,137,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,493,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,247,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,235,000))
$95,125,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,952,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,022,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,635,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,396,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,834,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,306,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,205,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,680,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,690,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $464,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,271,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($459,141,000))
$455,044,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $209,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $200,000 of the general fund--private local
appropriation are provided solely to implement activities associated
with a regional haze program. Funds shall be collected and expended in
accordance with the terms of the contract entered into with affected
businesses and the department of ecology.
(3) $2,000,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to local governments outside of Puget
Sound for municipal storm water programs, including but not limited to,
implementation of phase II municipal storm water permits, source
control for toxics in association with cleanup of contaminated sediment
sites, and source control programs for shellfish protection districts
where storm water is a significant contributor.
(4) Fees approved by the department of ecology in the 2007-09
biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW
43.135.055. Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is further
authorized to increase the following fees in fiscal year 2009 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section: Wastewater discharge permit, not
more than 5.57 percent; dam periodic inspection permit, not more than
5.57 percent; dam construction permit, not more than 5.57 percent; and
mixed waste management, not more than 14.14 percent.
(5) $1,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $927,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to improve the performance of
wetland mitigation. Of this amount, $55,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and $55,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support
a wetland in Whatcom county. The program will engage local, state, and
federal agencies, private investors, property owners, and others in the
creation of one or more wetland banks and other measures to protect
habitat functions and values while accommodating urban growth in the
region. Priority shall be given to state and local government
partnerships for wetland characterization. The department shall issue
a report of its findings and recommendations on how wetland mitigation
success can be improved to the office of financial management and the
appropriate policy committees of the legislature.
(6) $260,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to support pesticide container
recycling activities in Washington.
(7) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a pilot project to provide
grants to two local government jurisdictions located in the Puget Sound
area to improve compliance with existing environmental laws. Grant
funds shall be used for providing information on existing requirements,
providing technical assistance necessary to comply on a voluntary
basis, and taking enforcement action.
(8) $1,257,000 of the reclamation account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5881 (water
power license fees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(9) $694,000 of the underground storage tank account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5475 (underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(10) $2,026,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for local governments located near
hazardous waste clean-up sites, including Duwamish Waterway,
Commencement Bay, and Bellingham Bay, to work with small businesses and
citizens to safely manage hazardous and solid wastes to prevent the
contamination.
(11) $876,000 of the state toxics control account and $876,000 of
the local toxics control account are provided solely for public
participation grants related to toxic cleanup sites within and around
Puget Sound.
(12) $831,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement watershed plans. Of
this amount, $313,650 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to support the implementation
of the WRIA 1 watershed plan and the Bertrand watershed improvement
district plan, including but not limited to implementation of the
Nooksack River basin stream gauging program, study of the feasibility
of a public utility district pipeline in the Bertrand watershed, study
and construction of water storage and augmentation in the Bertrand
watershed, and preparation and development of the next subbasin
watershed plan agreed to by the Bertrand instream flow policy group.
(13) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop, by
rule, guidelines for the appropriate siting and operation of geoduck
aquaculture operations to be included in any master program under the
shorelines management act. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for convening a stakeholder group
to recommend establishing a sustainable statewide regional CBRNE/Hazmat
response capability.
(15) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement key recommendations
and actions identified in the "Washington's Ocean Action Plan:
Enhancing Management of Washington State's Ocean and Outer Coast". The
department shall provide a progress report on implementing this plan to
the appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December 31,
2008.
(16) $464,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $136,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6001 (climate change). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to oversee
beach seaweed removal in the west Seattle Fauntleroy community. The
department may spend up to $25,000 of this amount for its cost of
administration.
(18) $693,000 of the state toxics control account is provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5421 (environmental
covenants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this section shall lapse.
(19) $99,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a marshland study of key areas
of salmon habitat along the Snohomish river estuary.
(20) $196,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $132,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $19,000 of the oil spill prevention account
appropriation are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(21) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to contract with the
U.S. institute for environmental conflict resolution, a federal agency,
to develop a pilot water management process with three federally
recognized treaty Indian tribes. $50,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the northwest
Indian fisheries commission to help establish the pathway for the
process in federal agencies.
(22) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to continue the pilot water pathways
project through the remainder of the biennium. The department will
work with the northwest Indian fisheries commission and the U.S.
institute on environmental conflict resolution to find resolution on
persistent water policy issues between tribes and nontribal entities.
(23) $319,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $241,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6117 (reclaimed water). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(24) $53,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5552 (penalties for oil spills). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the department to convene a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, composed of a balanced
representation from interested state regulatory agencies, Native
American tribes, local governments and the environmental and shellfish
farming communities. The group will be facilitated by the office of
regulatory assistance and will address federal, state, and local
regulatory issues related to shellfish farming.
(26) Within the appropriations provided in this section for the
development of water supplies in the Columbia river basin, the
department shall assist county governments located east of the crest of
the Cascade mountain range that: Have an international border; or
border a county with an international boundary and a county with four
hundred thousand or more residents, to identify water supply projects
to compete for funding from the Columbia river basin water management
program. The department shall provide technical assistance as needed
to further refine priority projects identified by these counties. The
department shall consider and balance regional water supply needs in
its funding allocation decisions made as a part of this program.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for coordinating with the University of
Washington to assess the current energy profile of Washington state
pulp and paper mills. The energy consumption and energy generation
capability will be determined for both steam and electrical power. In
addition, the sources and types of fuels used in various boilers will
be assessed.
(28) $195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to support a collaborative process to
design a proposed comprehensive water management structure for the
Walla Walla river basin. The proposed structure should address the
allocation of functions, authorities, resource requirements, and issues
associated with interstate watershed management of the basin. Invited
participants should include but not be limited to the confederated
tribes of the Umatilla Indian reservation; appropriate state agencies;
and Walla Walla basin interests such as municipalities, irrigation
districts, conservation districts, fisheries, agriculture, economic
development, and environmental representatives. A report outlining the
proposed governance and water management structure shall be submitted
to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2008.
(29) $333,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2647 (children's safe products). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(30) $256,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,027,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2815 (reducing greenhouse gases emissions in the
Washington economy). In participating in the western climate
initiative under Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2815, the
director of the department shall seek to ensure that the design for a
regional multisector market-based system confers equitable economic
benefits and opportunities to electric utilities operating in
Washington by having that system recognize at least the following: (a)
Voluntary investments made by Washington utilities in energy efficiency
measures; (b) emission reduction benefits that other state and
provincial participants in the western climate initiative derive from
consuming renewable energy generated in Washington; and (c) adverse
impacts that climate change uniquely has upon the capabilities of
hydroelectric power generation. Washington state's representatives to
the western climate initiative process shall advocate for a regional
multisector market-based design that addresses competitive
disadvantages that could be experienced by in-region industries as
compared to industries in states or countries that do not have
greenhouse gas reduction programs that are substantively equivalent to
the system designed under the western climate initiative process. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(31) Within the appropriations provided in this section the
department shall ensure that standard statewide protocols for surface
water monitoring are developed and included in status and trends
monitoring to utilize information from other entities, including other
state agencies, local governments, and volunteer groups.
(32)(a) $2,000,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to affected counties
as defined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874
(Columbia river water) to mitigate for negative impacts caused by
releases of Lake Roosevelt water for the purposes described in that
bill. The criteria for allocating these funds shall be developed by
the department in consultation with affected local governments.
(b) $150,000 of the Columbia river water delivery account
appropriation is provided solely for the department to retain a
contractor to perform an independent analysis of legislative options to
protect rural communities in northeast Washington from disproportionate
economic, agricultural, and environmental impacts when upstream water
rights are purchased and transferred for use, or idled and used as
mitigation, in a downstream watershed or county. Before retaining a
contractor, the department shall consult with affected counties as
defined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
river water). The contractor selected shall conduct the independent
analysis and develop a report describing options and recommended
actions. The department of ecology shall provide the report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(c) If Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
river water delivery) is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(33) $210,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely to clean up naturally occurring
asbestos from Swift Creek.
(34) $80,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to create a
stakeholder advisory committee to review and develop recommendations to
help businesses achieve a fifty percent toxics reduction use goal. The
committee shall: (a) Review and make recommendations to improve the
effectiveness and delivery of technical assistance in pollution
prevention planning; (b) develop recommendations for strategies to
encourage moving away from "end-of-pipe" pollution reduction approaches
to increase hazardous waste prevention throughout the state; and (c)
review and make recommendations on revising the hazardous waste
planning fee under RCW 70.95E.030, including opportunities to provide
incentives that reward businesses for toxic use reduction successes in
meeting a fifty percent toxics use reduction goal. The committee shall
report its findings and recommendations to the fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 1,
2008.
(35) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6805
(relating to promoting farm and forest land preservation and
environmental restoration through conservation markets). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 303 2009 c 4 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,970,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,503,000))
$45,508,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,731,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,559,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $234,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,829,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,334,000))
$38,584,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($144,943,000))
$146,198,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in
the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to exceed the fiscal growth factor
under RCW 43.135.055.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for project scoping and cost estimating
for the agency's 2009-11 capital budget submittal.
(4) $2,255,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for costs associated with relocating the
commission's Tumwater headquarters office.
(5) $272,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $271,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for costs associated with
relocating the commission's eastern Washington regional headquarters
office.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for replacing vehicles and equipment.
(7) $1,611,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,428,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for planned and emergency
maintenance of park facilities.
(8) $1,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the recreational boating safety
program.
(9) $954,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,007,000)) $932,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the
operations of Cama Beach state park.
(10) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5219 (weather and avalanche center). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(11) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) $264,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($217,000)) $132,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish a
pilot lifeguard program at Lake Sammamish and Nolte state parks. The
department shall complete a comprehensive risk analysis to determine if
expansion of the lifeguard program or other drowning risk reduction
measures should be implemented. The department shall report its
findings to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by July 1, 2009. The department shall
fully implement this program as intended in this subsection.
(14) $455,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a long-range plan for Fort Worden state park, including architectural and site
design guidelines, business and operations implementation, site and
facilities use plan, and for the department to convene a task force to
recommend alternative governance structures for the park.
(15) $1,600,000 of the parks renewal stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for operating state parks, developing
and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance,
enhancing park stewardship and other state park purposes, pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2275 (raising funds for state parks).
Expenditures from the amount provided in this subsection shall not
exceed actual revenues received under Substitute House Bill No. 2275.
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(16) (($40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(17))) $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $73,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for one-time financial assistance
to the northwest weather and avalanche center, administered by the
United States forest service, to keep the center operational through
the remainder of the biennium.
(((18))) (17) Funds in this section are sufficient for continued
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5010 (foster
home pass). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 304 2009 c 4 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,158,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,062,000))
$49,094,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,270,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,184,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $413,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,022,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $268,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $323,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,600,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,992,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $753,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $842,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,549,000
Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,279,000
Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,187,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,478,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,911,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $483,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,093,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $416,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,000))
$240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($340,078,000))
$340,080,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall use the department of printing for
printing needs. Funds provided in this section may not be used to
staff or fund a stand-alone printing operation.
(2) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(3) The department shall support the activities of the aquatic
nuisance species coordination committee to foster state, federal,
tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues.
The committee shall strive to prevent the introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species that are
introduced.
(4) The department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to
protection of fish habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and
steelhead. Within the amount provided for the agency, the department
shall provide support to the department of health to enforce state
shellfish harvest laws.
(5) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(6) The department shall assist the office of regulatory assistance
in implementing activities consistent with the governor's regulatory
improvement program. The department shall support and provide
expertise to facilitate, coordinate, and simplify citizen and business
interactions so as to improve state regulatory processes involving
state, local, and federal stakeholders.
(7) $634,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for operations and fish production costs
at department-operated Mitchell act hatchery facilities.
(8) $609,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department to implement a pilot
project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation to
develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus Woods
and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of lake
fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to state
and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the Columbia
River water supply program.
(a) For the purposes of the pilot project:
(i) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(ii) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(iii) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy
the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus
Woods;
(iv) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(v) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The director, in collaboration with the Colville Tribes, shall
provide an interim report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2008. The
report shall describe the status of the pilot project, and make
recommendations as needed to fully implement the project, pursuant to
the state and tribal agreement on Lake Rufus Woods.
(9) $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue the ballast water
management program in Puget Sound and expand the program to include the
Columbia river and coastal ports.
(10) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for hatchery facility maintenance
improvements.
(11) $440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $409,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for estimates of juvenile
abundance of federally listed salmon and steelhead populations. The
department shall report to the office of financial management and the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature with a letter stating
the use and measurable results of activities that are supported by
these funds.
(12) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the strategic budget and
accountability program.
(13) $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(14) Prior to submitting its 2009-11 biennial operating and capital
budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office of
financial management, the department shall contract with the hatchery
scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This review
shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent with HSRG
recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the requests based on
their contributions to protecting wild salmonid stocks and meeting the
recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate whether the proposed
requests are being made in the most cost effective manner. The
department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the office of
financial management and the appropriate legislative committees by
October 1, 2008.
(15) $43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5447 (coastal Dungeness crab). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $4,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(17) $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $89,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $204,000 of the aquatic invasive species enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5923 (aquatic invasive species). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(19) $352,000 of the wildlife rehabilitation account is provided
solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5188 (wildlife
rehabilitation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(20) $77,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department of fish and
wildlife to participate in the upper Columbia salmon recovery plan
implementation, habitat conservation plan hatchery committees, and the
priest rapids salmon and steelhead agreement hatchery technical
committee.
(21)(a) Within existing funds, the department of fish and wildlife
shall sell the upper 20-acre parcel of the Beebe springs property.
(b) Proceeds from the sale are to be used to develop the Beebe
springs natural interpretive site. Up to $300,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for
the development of the Beebe springs natural interpretive site. The
department shall not expend more than the amount received from the sale
proceeds.
(22) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $49,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2049 (marine resource committees). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(23) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a study of introducing oxygen
to the waters of Hood Canal. The study shall propose a location in a
small marine area where a large number of bottom-dwelling fish species
exist, and analyze the impact of injected dissolved oxygen on aquatic
life. The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the results of the study and recommend whether to
proceed with a project to inject oxygen into Hood Canal.
(24) $1,310,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to replace state wildlife account funds
for the engineering program and $610,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 are provided solely to replace state
wildlife account funds for the hydraulic project permitting program,
including the development of a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic
project approval program to make the program self supporting. Fees may
be based on factors relating to the complexity of the permit issuance.
The fees received by the department must be deposited into the state
wildlife account and shall be expended exclusively for the purposes of
the hydraulic project permitting program. By December 1, 2008, the
department shall provide a permit fee schedule for the hydraulic
project approval program to the office of financial management and the
appropriate committees of the legislature.
(25) $245,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to the department to work in cooperation
with the department of natural resources to assist with the
implementation of the wild horse coordinated resource management plan.
Implementation may include providing grant funding to other state and
nonstate entities as needed.
(26) $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to develop
siting guidelines for power generation facilities, provide technical
assistance for permitting, support voluntary compliance with the
guidelines, and to conduct bird and wildlife assessments on state lands
most eligible for wind power leases.
(27) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall develop and maintain an
electronic database for aquatic farmer registration. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(28) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall not make a
permanent closure of any hatchery facility currently in operation.
(29) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2008.
(30) $46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
House Bill No. 2514 (orca whale protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(31) The department shall complete an inventory of department
purchased or leased lands acquired for mixed agriculture and fish and
wildlife habitat and provide for each purchase or lease agreement the
cost and date of the agreement, the previous use of the land, any
agreement or deed specifying continuing use of the land, and the
current management cost and status of each parcel of purchased or
leased lands. The department shall provide the inventory to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(32) $289,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $301,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for selective fisheries.
(33) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for removal of derelict gear in Washington
waters.
(34) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for a review of the effectiveness of the
department's existing hydraulic project approval process and
environmental outcomes.
(35) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to implement the 2008 Wiley Slough
restoration project report to the legislature recommendation to
establish a private farmland, public recreation partnership that would
provide farmland preservation, waterfowl management, and public
recreational access.
(36) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Ebey Island property management costs.
(37)(a) A work group on Electron dam salmon passage is established,
with members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The department of fish and wildlife shall appoint at least
one representative from each of the following entities: The department
of fish and wildlife, Puyallup Tribe of Indians, and Puget Sound
energy.
(b) The department of fish and wildlife shall provide staff support
to the work group.
(c) The work group shall study possible enhancements for improving
outbound juvenile salmon passage at Electron dam on the Puyallup river.
(d) Legislative members of the work group shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(e) The expenses of the work group, other than travel expenses of
legislative members, shall be paid within existing funds from the
department of fish and wildlife.
(f) The work group shall present its findings and recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1, 2009.
(g) This subsection expires January 1, 2009.
(38) As part of its 2009-11 biennial budget request, the department
shall submit a report detailing the methodology for determining the
value of payment in lieu of taxes as provided in RCW 79.70.130. At a
minimum, the report will show the number of acres subject to the
payment in lieu of taxes, the tax rates assumed by each affected
county, and the resulting value of the state general fund obligation.
(39) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6821 (fish and wildlife
information).
(40) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6227
(outer coast marine resources committees). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(41) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 6231
(marine protected areas). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 305 2009 c 4 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,328,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,695,000))
$65,720,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,855,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,408,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,603,000))
$57,647,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,196,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,523,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,897,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,633,000))
$95,426,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,279,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,348,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,335,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,650,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,046,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($321,807,000))
$339,669,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,021,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,043,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $13,920,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($13,542,000)) $30,292,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $5,000,000 of the disaster
response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency
fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster response
account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency
indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and
administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining
accounts and appropriations.
(3) Fees approved by the department of natural resources and the
board of natural resources in the 2007-09 biennium are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $199,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to work with
appropriate stakeholders and state agencies in determining how
privately owned lands, in combination with other land ownership such as
public and tribal lands, contribute to wildlife habitat. The
assessment will also determine how commercial forests, forest lands on
the urban fringe, and small privately-owned forest lands that are
managed according to Washington's forest and fish prescriptions, in
combination with other forest management activities, function as
wildlife habitat now and in the future.
(5) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse. The department shall compile the outcomes of these grants
annually and submit them to the office of financial management by
September 1 of 2008 and 2009.
(6) $400,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to the departments of ecology and fish and
wildlife. If federal funding for this purpose is reinstated, this
subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department shall prepare a feasibility study that analyzes
applicable business processes and develops the scope, requirements, and
alternatives for replacement of the department's current suite of
payroll-support systems. The department shall use an independent
consultant to assist with the study, and shall submit the completed
analysis to the office of financial management, the department of
personnel, and the department of information services by August 1,
2008.
(8) $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to continue interagency agreements
with the department of fish and wildlife and the department of ecology
for forest and fish report field implementation tasks.
(9) All department staff serving as recreation-management trail
stewards shall be noncommissioned.
(10) $112,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for spartina eradication efforts. The
department may enter into agreements with federal agencies to eradicate
spartina from private lands that may provide a source of reinfestation
to public lands.
(11) $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to convene and
staff a work group to study issues related to wildfire prevention and
protection. The work group shall be composed of members representing
rural counties in eastern and western Washington, fire districts,
environmental protection organizations, industrial forest landowners,
the agricultural community, the beef industry, small forest landowners,
the building industry, realtors, the governor or a designee, the
insurance commissioner or a designee, the office of financial
management, the state fire marshal or a designee, the state building
code council, and the commissioner or public lands or a designee. The
work group shall issue a report of findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by August 1, 2008.
(12) $249,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the department shall execute activities as
described in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound
partnership).
(13) $2,000,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6044 (derelict vessels). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(14) $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $34,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5236 (public lands management). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) $14,000 of the forest development account--state appropriation
and $52,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5463 (forest fire protection). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(16) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the removal of one or two
large floating dry docks off Lake Washington near the Port Quendall
site in north Renton.
(17) $547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6141 (forest health). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $22,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state
appropriation and $22,000 of the resources management cost account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5972 (surface mining reclamation). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $250,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation are provided solely to extend the 2005-2007 contract with
the University of Washington college of forestry resources for
additional research and technical assistance on the future of
Washington forests. Reports shall be submitted by June 30, 2009, to
the appropriate committees of the legislature on the following topics:
(a) An exploration of the potential markets for renewable energy
from biomass from Washington forests, especially from material removed
from eastern Washington forests as part of forest health improvement
efforts. This exploration shall assess the feasibility of converting
large amounts of underutilized forest biomass into useful products and
green energy by providing required analyses needed to efficiently
collect and deliver forest biomass to green energy end users. The role
of transportation and processing infrastructure in developing markets
for such material for both clean energy and value-added products shall
be included in the exploration. The college shall coordinate with
Washington State University efforts to identify what new biological,
chemical, and engineering technologies are emerging for converting
forest biomass to clean and efficient energy.
(b) Recommendations for the college's northwest environmental forum
for retaining the highest valued working forest lands at risk of
conversion to nonforest uses. These recommendations should include an
examination of means to enhance biodiversity through strategic
retention of certain lands, as well as economic incentives for
landowners to retain lands as working forests and provide ecosystem
services. The recommendations shall consider the health and value of
the forest lands, the rate of loss of working forest lands in the area,
the risk to timber processing infrastructure from continued loss of
working forest lands, and the multiple benefits derived from retaining
working forest lands. The recommendations shall prioritize forest
lands in the Cascade foothills, which include the area generally
encompassing the nonurbanized lands within the Cascade mountain range
and drainages lying between three hundred and three thousand feet above
mean sea level, and located within Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King,
Pierce, Thurston, and Lewis counties.
(20) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for Chelan county, as the chair of
the Stemilt partnership, to perform the following:
(a) Work with private and public land management entities to
identify and evaluate land ownership possibilities;
(b) Allocate up to $10,000 to the department of fish and wildlife
to perform technical studies, baseline assessments, environmental
review, due diligence, and similar real estate evaluations; and
(c) Implement real estate transactions based on the results of the
studies.
(21) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for health benefits to Washington
conservation corps employees.
(22) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for staff support for the natural
heritage program to integrate, analyze, and provide bird area
information, and for state designations and mapping support, among
other activities.
(23) $48,000 of the resource management cost account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute House
Bill No. 2220 (shellfish). The department shall participate in a
shellfish aquaculture regulatory committee, convened by the department
of ecology. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(24) $150,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5445 (cost-reimbursement agreements). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(25) $191,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to coordinate with
the Puget Sound partnership to complete a final habitat conservation
plan for state-owned aquatic lands and an environmental impact
statement by June 2009.
(26) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 2844 (urban forestry). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(27) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to complete maps of lower Hood Canal,
including subsurface geologic layers, lithology, digital layers, and
maps to identify liquifiable sediments for hazard mitigation. The
department shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on maps that were produced by December 1, 2008.
(28) As part of its 2009-11 biennial budget request, the department
shall submit a report detailing the methodology for determining the
value of payment in lieu of taxes as provided in RCW 79.70.130. At a
minimum, the report will show the number of acres subject to the
payment in lieu of taxes, the tax rates assumed by each affected
county, and the resulting value of the state general fund obligation.
(29) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to supplement other available funds for an
analysis of whether forest practices rules (including rules for harvest
on potentially unstable slopes, road construction and maintenance, and
post-harvest slash treatment) effectively protect public resources and
public safety from landslides, and other storm-related impacts. The
analysis is to be accomplished using the forest practices board
adaptive management process. The cooperative monitoring, evaluation,
and research (CMER) committee of the adaptive management program shall
submit a report of its preliminary analysis and conclusions to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008. The
forest practices board shall submit a complete report of the CMER study
on the effectiveness of current prescriptions and practices by June 30,
2009. This amount is ongoing solely to make improvements to the
state's geological survey.
(30) $26,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $71,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 2472 (recreational opportunities).

Sec. 306 2009 c 4 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $560,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,655,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660,000
Water Quality Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,098,000))
$3,898,000
State Toxics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,510,000))
$1,710,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,853,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $600,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, (($1,400,000)) $1,200,000 of the water quality
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,500,000 of
the general fund--private/local appropriation are provided solely for
the education of citizens through attracting and utilizing volunteers
to engage in activities that result in environmental benefits.
(2) $2,208,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $370,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $560,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $1,155,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, then $2,208,000 of the water quality
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $2,209,000 of the
water quality account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009,
$1,155,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, $500,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008, and $500,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are
appropriated to the office of the governor for operation of the Puget
Sound action team.
(3) To implement the 2007-09 Puget Sound biennial plan required by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership),
funding is provided solely for Puget Sound recovery activities in the
budgets of selected agencies and institutions of higher education,
including the department of agriculture, department of community, trade
and economic development, conservation commission, department of
ecology, department of fish and wildlife, department of health,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, department of natural
resources, state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound
partnership, University of Washington, and Washington State University.
During the 2007-09 biennium, moneys are provided solely for these
agencies and institutions of higher education as provided for in ((LEAP
document PSAT-2007)) OFM document PSP-2009.
(4) $305,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 ((and $305,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are)) is provided solely for an outcome monitoring
program first for Puget Sound and Washington's coastline and then
across the remaining salmon recovery regions across the state.
(5) $852,000 of the water quality account--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $231,000 of the water quality account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $900,000 of the state toxics
control account appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the 2020 action agenda.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2009 c 4 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,968,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,334,000))
$32,288,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,629,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,223,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,680,000))
$5,681,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,476,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,687,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,133,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,222,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,010,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,007,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement
Account -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,429,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,057,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,109,000))
$119,064,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $233,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $282,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $357,000 of the fingerprint identification
account--state appropriation are provided solely for workload
associated with implementation of the federal Adam Walsh Act -- the
Children's Safety and Violent Crime Reduction Act of 2006.
(2) In accordance with RCW 10.97.100 and chapter 43.43 RCW, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to perform and charge fees for
criminal history and background checks for state and local agencies,
and nonprofit and other private entities and disseminate the records.
It is the policy of the state of Washington that the fees cover, as
nearly as practicable, the direct and indirect costs of performing
criminal history and background checks activities. Pursuant to RCW
43.135.055, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the Washington state
patrol may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor if the
increases are necessary to fully fund the direct and indirect cost of
the criminal history and background check activities.
(3) $200,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(4) $350,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement the provisions of Senate
Bill No. 6119 (firefighter apprenticeship training program). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for efforts to reduce the number of
convicted offender biological samples awaiting DNA analysis.
(6) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5642 (cigarette
ignition).

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2009 c 4 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,444,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,605,000))
$38,708,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,182,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,231,000))
$152,334,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $11,920,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 and a maximum of (($12,019,000))
$10,152,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 are for the operation and expenses of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. Within the amounts provided in
this subsection, the superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary
accomplishments of four students who have demonstrated a strong
understanding of the civics essential learning requirements to receive
the Daniel J. Evans civic education award. The students selected for
the award must demonstrate understanding through completion of at least
one of the classroom-based civics assessment models developed by the
superintendent of public instruction, and through leadership in the
civic life of their communities. The superintendent shall select two
students from eastern Washington and two students from western
Washington to receive the award, and shall notify the governor and
legislature of the names of the recipients.
(2) $1,080,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $815,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. Within the amounts provided, the board shall implement the
provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education) for which it is responsible,
including: (a) Develop a comprehensive set of recommendations for an
accountability system; (b) adopt high school graduation requirements
aligned with international performance standards in mathematics and
science and, in conjunction with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, identify no more than three curricula that are
aligned with these standards; and (c) review all requirements related
to the high school diploma as directed by section 405, chapter 263,
Laws of 2006.
(3) $4,779,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $6,248,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(a) $930,000 in fiscal year 2008 and (($1,257,000)) $1,284,000 in
fiscal year 2009 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington
professional educator standards board, including administering the
alternative routes to certification program, pipeline for paraeducators
conditional scholarship loan program, and the retooling to teach math
conditional loan program. Within the amounts provided in this
subsection (3)(a), the professional educator standards board shall:
(i) Revise the teacher mathematics endorsement competencies and
alignment of teacher tests to the updated competencies; (ii) review
teacher preparation requirements in cultural understanding and make
recommendations for strengthening these standards; (iii) create a new
professional level teacher assessment; (iv) expand the alternative
routes to teacher certification program for business professionals and
instructional assistants who will teach math and science; (v) revise
requirements for college and university teacher preparation programs to
match a new knowledge- and skill-based performance system; and (vi)
test implementation of a revised teacher preparation program approach
that is classroom experience-intensive and performance-based;
(b) $3,269,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,966,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board. Of
the amounts provided in this subsection (3)(b):
(i) $500,000 each year is provided solely for conditional
scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in special education,
math, science, or bilingual education;
(ii) $2,210,000 for fiscal year 2008 and $3,230,000 for fiscal year
2009 are for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math, science, special
education or bilingual education;
(iii) Remaining amounts in this subsection (3)(b) shall be used to
continue existing alternative routes to certification programs; and
(iv) Candidates seeking math and science endorsements under (i) and
(ii) of this subsection (3)(b) shall receive priority for funding;
(c) $236,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the recruiting Washington
teachers program established in Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5955
(educator preparation, professional development, and compensation);
(d) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $110,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 provided in this subsection (3) are for $4,000
conditional loan stipends for paraeducators participating in the
pipeline for paraeducators established in Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education); and
(e) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for conditional stipends for certificated teachers
pursuing a mathematics or science endorsement under the retooling to
teach mathematics or science program established in Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). The
conditional stipends shall be for endorsement exam fees as well as
stipends for teachers who must also complete coursework.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the professional educator standards board (PESB) to convene a work
group to develop recommendations for increasing teacher knowledge,
skills, and competencies to address the needs of English language
learner students, pursuant to Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673
(student learning opportunities).
(5) $425,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,975,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are for replacement of the apportionment system, which
includes the processes that collect school district budget and
expenditure information, staffing characteristics, and the student
enrollments that drive the funding process.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
direct services and support to schools around an integrated,
interdisciplinary approach to instruction in conservation, natural
resources, sustainability, and human adaptation to the environment.
Specific integration efforts will focus on science, math, and the
social sciences. Integration between basic education and career and
technical education, particularly agricultural and natural sciences
education, is to be a major element.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the creation of a statewide data base of longitudinal student
information. This amount is conditioned on the department satisfying
the requirements in section 902 of this act.
(8) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
comprehensive cultural competence and anti-bias education programs for
educators and students. The office of superintendent of public
instruction shall administer grants to school districts with the
assistance and input of groups such as the anti-defamation league and
the Jewish federation of Seattle.
(9) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is to
promote the financial literacy of students. The effort will be
coordinated through the financial literacy public-private partnership.
(10) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5843 (regarding educational data and data systems).
(11) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1052 (legislative
youth advisory council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
1422 (children and families of incarcerated parents).
(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098
(Washington college bound scholarship). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5297
(regarding providing medically and scientifically accurate sexual
health education in schools).
(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a program to recognize the work of outstanding classified staff in
school districts throughout the state.
(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a full-time director of skills centers within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(17) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract
with the northwest educational research laboratory (NWREL) to conduct
two educational studies. Specifically, NWREL shall:
(a) Conduct a study regarding teacher preparation, training, and
coordinated instructional support strategies for English language
learners, as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). An
interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final report is due
December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the governor, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate
early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the legislature;
and
(b) Conduct a study of the effectiveness of the K-3 demonstration
projects as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and achievement). An
interim report is due November 1, 2008, and the final report is due
December 1, 2009. Both reports shall be delivered to the governor, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the appropriate
early learning, education, and fiscal committees of the legislature.
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to contract
with Washington State University social and economic sciences research
center (WSU-SESRC) to conduct to educational research studies. The
WSU-SESRC shall:
(a) Conduct a study which reviews chapter 207, Laws of 2002
(bullying in schools), evaluate the outcomes resulting from the
legislation, and to make recommendations for continued improvement.
The study shall, at a minimum, determine: (i) Whether the policies
have been developed and implemented in all elementary, middle, and high
schools; (ii) whether there has been any measurable improvement in the
safety and civility of schools' climate and environment as a result of
the legislation; (iii) whether there are still issues that need to be
addressed in light of the original intent of the legislation; and (iv)
recommended actions to be taken at the school, district, and state
level to address the identified issues. Additionally, WSU-SESRC shall
research and identify effective programs and the components of
effective programs. A report shall be submitted to the education
committees of the legislature and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction by September 1, 2008.
(b) Conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and science
instructional coach program as described in Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). Findings
shall include an evaluation of the coach development institute,
coaching support seminars, and other coach support activities;
recommendations with regard to the characteristics required of the
coaches; identification of changes in teacher instruction related to
coaching activities; and identification of the satisfaction level with
coaching activities as experienced by classroom teachers and
administrators. An interim report is due November 1, 2008. The final
report is due December 1, 2009. Both the interim and final report
shall be presented to the governor, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature.
(19) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for additional costs incurred by the state board of education in
reviewing proposed math standards and curriculum.
(20) During the 2007-09 biennium, to the maximum extent possible,
in adopting new agency rules or making any changes to existing rules or
policies related to the fiscal provisions in the administration of part
V of this act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall attempt to request approval through the normal legislative budget
process.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a comprehensive analysis of math and science teacher supply and
demand issues by the professional educator standards board. By
December 1, 2008, the professional educator standards board shall
submit a final report to the governor and appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature, that includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Specific information on the current number of math and science
teachers assigned to teach mathematics and science both with and
without appropriate certification in those subjects by region and
statewide; (b) projected demand information by detailing the number of
K-12 mathematics and science teachers needed by the 2010-11 school year
by region and statewide; (c) specific recommendations on how the demand
will be met through recruitment programs, alternative route
certification programs, potential financial incentives, retention
strategies, and other efforts; and (d) identification of strategies,
based on best practices, to improve the rigor and productivity of
state-funded mathematics and science teacher preparation programs. As
part of the final report, the professional educator standards board and
the Washington state institute for public policy shall provide
information from a study of differential pay for teachers in high-demand subject areas such as mathematics and science, including the
design, successes, and limitations of differential pay programs in
other states. In order for the professional educator standards board
to quantify demand, each school district shall provide to the board, by
a date and in a format specified by the board, the number of teachers
assigned to teach mathematics and science, both with and without
appropriate certification and endorsement in those subjects, and the
number of mathematics and science teaching vacancies needing to be
filled, and the board shall include this data, by district, in its
analysis.
(22) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6556 (anaphylactic
policy).
(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6742 (guidelines
for students with autism) and Substitute Senate Bill No. 6743
(training for students with autism).
(24) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided for the implementation of Second Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5100 (health insurance information for students).
(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2722
(achievement gap for African-American students). The center for the
improvement of student learning will convene an advisory committee to
conduct a detailed analysis of the achievement gap for African-American
students; recommend a comprehensive plan for closing the gap pursuant
to goals under the federal no child left behind act for all groups of
students to meet academic standards by 2014; and identify performance
measures to monitor adequate yearly progress. A study update shall be
submitted by September 15, 2008, and the committee's final report shall
be submitted by December 30, 2008, to the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the governor, the P-20
council, the basic education finance task force, and the education
committees of the legislature.
(26) Within the appropriations in this section specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2598 (online
mathematics curriculum).
(27) Within the appropriations in this section specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 2635 (school
district boundaries and organization).
(28) Within the appropriations in this section specific funding is
provided to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 3129 (online
learning programs for high school students to earn college credit).
(29) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of superintendent of public instruction to assign at
least one full-time equivalent staff position to serve as the world
language supervisor.
(30) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction, to be
dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to
students, health education, and training for school staff.
(31) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the school safety center in the office of the superintendent of
public instruction subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The safety center shall: Disseminate successful models of
school safety plans and cooperative efforts; provide assistance to
schools to establish a comprehensive safe school plan; select models of
cooperative efforts that have been proven successful; act as an
information dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs
in a school district either in Washington or in another state;
coordinate activities relating to school safety; review and approve
manuals and curricula used for school safety models and training; and
develop and maintain a school safety information web site.
(b) The school safety center advisory committee shall develop a
training program, using the best practices in school safety, for all
school safety personnel.
(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a school safety training program provided by the criminal justice
training commission. The commission, in collaboration with the school
safety center advisory committee, shall provide the school safety
training for all school administrators and school safety personnel,
including school safety personnel hired after the effective date of
this section.
(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the safety center advisory committee to develop and distribute a
pamphlet to promote internet safety for children, particularly in
grades seven through twelve. The pamphlet shall be posted on the
superintendent of public instruction's web site. To the extent
possible, the pamphlet shall be distributed in schools throughout the
state and in other areas accessible to youth, including but not limited
to libraries and community centers.
(34) $9,670,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a nonviolence and leadership training program provided by the
institute for community leadership. The program shall provide a
request for proposal process, with up to 80 percent funding, for
nonviolence leadership workshops serving at least 12 school districts
with direct programming in 36 elementary, middle, and high schools
throughout Washington state.
(36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a pilot youth suicide prevention and information program. The
office of superintendent of public instruction will work with selected
school districts and community agencies in identifying effective
strategies for preventing youth suicide.
(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for programs to improve safety and emergency preparedness and planning
in public schools, as generally described in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5097. The superintendent of public instruction shall design and
implement the grant program in consultation with the educational
service districts, the school safety advisory committee, and the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs. The funding
shall support grants to school districts for the development and
updating of comprehensive safe school plans, school safety training,
and the conducting of safety-related drills. As a condition of
receiving these funds, school districts must ensure that schools (a)
conduct at least one lockdown and one shelter in place safety drill
each school year, and (b) send updated school mapping database
information on an annual basis to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.
(38) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington state school directors' association to mediate and
facilitate a school disciplinary action task force to review and make
recommendations on a model policy regarding the use of physical force
in schools. The model policy shall be submitted to the appropriate
policy committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(39) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for K-20 telecommunications network technical support in the K-12
sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school
utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities
of the network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and
advanced technical support for the network.
(40) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
coordinate, in collaboration with educational service districts, a
system of outreach to school districts not currently maximizing their
eligibility for federal e-rate funding through the schools and
libraries program administered by the federal communications
commission. By December 15, 2008, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall issue a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature identifying school districts that were eligible but did not
apply for e-rate funding for the last two years, and an estimate of the
amounts for which they were eligible in those years. The report shall
also include recommendations for following-up on the findings relative
to the e-rate program contained in the state auditor's performance
audit of educational service districts completed September, 2007.
(41) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is to
expand the special services pilot project to include up to seven
participating districts. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall allocate these funds to the district or districts
participating in the pilot program according to the provisions of RCW
28A.630.016.
(42) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.
(43) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for vocational student leadership organizations.
(44) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington civil liberties education program.
(45) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington state achievers scholarship program. The funds
shall be used to support community involvement officers that recruit,
train, and match community volunteer mentors with students selected as
achievers scholars.
(46) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia pilot reading program in up to five
school districts.
(47) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for developing and disseminating curriculum and other materials
documenting women's role in World War II.
(48) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for incentive grants for districts and pilot projects to develop
preapprenticeship programs. Incentive grant awards up to $10,000 each
shall be used to support the program's design, school/business/labor
agreement negotiations, and recruiting high school students for
preapprenticeship programs in the building trades and crafts.
(49) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the dissemination of the Navigation 101 curriculum to all
districts, including disseminating electronic student planning tools
and software for analyzing the impact of the implementation of
Navigation 101 on student performance, and grants to at least one
hundred school districts each year for the implementation of the
Navigation 101 program. The implementation grants will be limited to
a maximum of two years and the school districts selected shall
represent various regions of the state and reflect differences in
school district size and enrollment characteristics.
(50) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the enhancement of civics education. Of this amount, $25,000 each
year is provided solely for competitive grants to school districts for
curriculum alignment, development of innovative civics projects, and
other activities that support the civics assessment established in
chapter 113, Laws of 2006.
(51) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1573
(authorizing a statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and retrieval).
(52) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the communities in school program in Pierce county.
(53) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for support and expansion of the mentoring advanced placement program
in current operation in southwest Washington.
(54) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for program initiatives to address the educational needs of Latino
students and families. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with the Seattle community coalition of
compana quetzal to provide for three initiatives: (a) Early childhood
education; (b) parent leadership training; and (c) high school success
and college preparation programs. Campana quetzal shall report to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 2009,
regarding impact of the programs on addressing the academic achievement
gap, including high school drop-out rates and college readiness rates,
for Latino students.
(55) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2870
(professional development for instructional assistants). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(56) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a pilot project to encourage bilingual high school students to
pursue public school teaching as a profession. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with the Latino/a
educational achievement project (LEAP) to work with school districts to
identify and mentor not fewer than fifty bilingual students in their
junior year of high school, encouraging them to become bilingual
instructors in schools with high English language learner populations.
Students shall be mentored by bilingual teachers and complete a
curriculum developed and approved by the participating districts.
(57) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional (($225,000)) $122,000 reduction in
administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 502 2009 c 4 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,436,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,477,998,000))
$4,510,419,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,373,000))
$9,387,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,624,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,265,714,000))
$9,298,149,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3;
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12; and
(iv) An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for
grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units
for grade 4. Any funds allocated for the additional certificated units
provided in this subsection (iv) shall not be considered as basic
education funding;
(A) Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of
the amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established
under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district
documents an actual ratio in grades K-4 equal to or greater than 53.2
certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent
students. For any school district documenting a lower certificated
instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional staff ratio
achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;
(B) Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate
up to 1.3 of the 53.2 funding ratio to employ additional classified
instructional assistants assigned to basic education classrooms in
grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under
this section, funds used by the district to employ additional
classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified
instructional assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be
determined using the 1989-90 school year as the base year;
(C) Any district maintaining a ratio in grades K-4 equal to or
greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students may use allocations generated under this
subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of that required to maintain the
minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ
additional basic education certificated instructional staff or
classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6. Funds allocated
under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) shall only be expended to reduce class
size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated instructional
funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2008-09 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (g)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(i) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (i) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
58.75 average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.11 percent in the 2007-08 school year and 16.75 percent in the 2008-09 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 17.04 percent in the
2007-08 school year and 18.72 percent in the 2008-09 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (h) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$9,703 per certificated staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a
maximum of $10,178 per certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $23,831 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $24,999 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $18,489 per certificated
staff unit in the 2007-08 school year and a maximum of $19,395 per
certificated staff unit in the 2008-09 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $555.20 for the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) $1,870,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $2,421,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1432 (granting service credit to educational
staff associates for nonschool employment).
(10) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($16,620,000))
$16,634,000 outside the basic education formula during fiscal years
2008 and 2009 as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $547,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2008
and a maximum of $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2009;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2008 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2009 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $393,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) (($9,373,000)) $9,387,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is provided solely for allocations for equipment
replacement in vocational programs and skills centers. Each year of
the biennium, the funding shall be allocated based on $75 per full-time
equivalent vocational student and $125 per full-time equivalent skills
center student.
(f) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5790 (regarding
skills centers).
(11) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 5.7 percent from the 2006-07 school year to the
2007-08 school year and 6.0 percent from the 2007-08 school year to the
2008-09 school year.
(12) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (h) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(13) The appropriation levels in part V of this act assume
implementation of the reimbursement provisions of Senate Bill No. 6450
(school district reimbursement of performance audits).

Sec. 503 2008 c 329 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $161,280,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($405,228,000))
$407,478,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($275,000))
$276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($566,783,000))
$569,034,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($500,195,000)) $502,039,000 is provided solely for the
following:
(a) A cost of living adjustment of 3.7 percent effective September
1, 2007, and another 3.9 percent effective September 1, 2008, pursuant
to Initiative Measure No. 732.
(b) An additional .5 percent cost of living adjustment is provided
above the amount required by Initiative Measure No. 732, effective
September 1, 2008.
(c) Additional salary increases as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary increases shall be provided to all 262
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule. These additional
salary increases will result in a decrease in the number of
grandfathered districts from the current thirty-four to twenty-four in
the 2007-08 school year and to twelve in the 2008-09 school year.
(d) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional
salary increases shall ensure a minimum salary allocation for
certificated administrative staff of $54,405 in the 2007-08 school year
and $57,986 in the 2008-09 school year.
(e) Additional salary increases to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 503(2)(b) of this act. These additional salary increases
ensure a minimum salary allocation for classified staff of $30,111 in
the 2007-08 school year and $31,865 in the 2008-09 school year.
(f) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates 13.47 percent for the
2007-08 school year and 16.11 percent for the 2008-09 school year for
certificated staff and 13.54 percent for the 2007-08 school year and
15.22 percent for the 2008-09 school year for classified staff.
(g) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Increases for
general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 502 and 503 of this
act. Increases for special education result from increases in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
502 and 503 of this act.
(h) The appropriations in this section provide cost of living and
incremental fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as
follows:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $1.08 $2.46

Highly Capable (per formula student) $11.13 $25.51

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $29.80 $68.33

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $7.00 $18.86

(i) The appropriations in this section include $925,000 for fiscal
year 2008 and (($2,314,000)) $2,322,000 for fiscal year 2009 for salary
increase adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) (($66,591,000)) $66,719,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance
benefit allocations is $682.54 per month for the 2007-08 and 2008-09
school years. The appropriations in this section provide for a rate
increase to $707.00 per month for the 2007-08 school year and $732.00
per month for the 2008-09 school year. The adjustments to health
insurance benefit allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2007-08 2008-09

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.22 $0.45

Highly Capable (per formula student) $1.50 $3.05

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $3.96 $8.01

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $0.86 $2.05

(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 504 2008 c 329 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,409,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($276,510,000))
$291,499,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($574,919,000))
$589,908,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $848,000 of this fiscal year 2008 appropriation
and a maximum of $878,000 of the fiscal year 2009 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $44.84 per weighted mile in the 2007-08 school
year and $45.68 per weighted mile in the 2008-09 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) $25,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for temporary assistance to school
districts for pupil transportation programs. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the joint
legislative audit and review committee, will develop a method of
allocating these funds to school districts. The allocation method
shall be based primarily on the findings and analysis from the joint
legislative and audit review committee's K-12 pupil transportation
study completed in December 2006.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.

Sec. 505 2008 c 329 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,469,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($581,925,000))
$580,312,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($435,692,000))
$438,852,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,575,647,000))
$1,577,194,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt the full
cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed by the committee and
recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to section 501(1)(k),
chapter 372, Laws of 2006, and ensure that all school districts adopt
the method beginning in the 2007-08 school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2007-08 and 2008-09 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, (($53,926,000)) $56,553,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts
with demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the
amounts provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the federal
safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the
federal appropriation in this subsection (8) in any fiscal year, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards. In the determination of need, the committee shall require
that districts demonstrate that they are maximizing their eligibility
for all state and federal revenues related to services for special
education-eligible students. Awards associated with (b) and (c) of
this subsection shall not exceed the total of a district's specific
determination of need.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) Using criteria developed by the committee, the committee shall
then consider extraordinary costs associated with communities that draw
a larger number of families with children in need of special education
services. The safety net awards to school districts shall be adjusted
to reflect amounts awarded under (b) of this subsection.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999. The state
safety net oversight committee shall ensure that safety net
documentation and awards are based on current medicaid revenue amounts.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review and streamline the application process to access safety net
funds, provide technical assistance to school districts, and annually
survey school districts regarding improvement to the process.
(12) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(13) A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation is provided for projects to provide special education
students with appropriate job and independent living skills, including
work experience where possible, to facilitate their successful
transition out of the public school system. The funds provided by this
subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.
(14) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
2009, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be
expended to support a special education ombudsman program within the
office of superintendent of public instruction. The purpose of the
program is to provide support to parents, guardians, educators, and
students with disabilities. The program will provide information to
help families and educators understand state laws, rules, and
regulations, and access training and support, technical information
services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program will provide
data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the office of
superintendent of public instruction, school districts, educational
service districts, state need projects, and the parent and teacher
information center. Within the appropriations in this section there is
sufficient funding provided to also provide at least a half-time
support staff position for the special education ombudsman program.
(15) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(16) A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation may be expended by the superintendent for projects
related to use of inclusion strategies by school districts for
provision of special education services.
(17) The superintendent, consistent with the new federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(18) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(19) $262,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.

Sec. 506 2008 c 329 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,555,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($220,100,000))
$224,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($423,655,000))
$428,069,000

Sec. 507 2008 c 329 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,105,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,764,000))
$21,664,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,869,000))
$40,769,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $187,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($133,797)) $329,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to maintain at
least one certificated instructional staff and related support services
at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to
support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to
furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 508 2008 c 329 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY
CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,383,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,788,000))
$8,776,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,171,000))
$17,159,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $372.15 per funded
student for the 2007-08 school year and (($378.13)) $378.32 per funded
student for the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded
students shall be a maximum of 2.314 percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2008 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2009 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec. 509 2009 c 4 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,272,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,636,000))
$84,663,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,890,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($152,568,000))
$157,299,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($421,366,000))
$426,124,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $19,716,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, (($20,948,000)) $22,096,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009, $1,350,000 of the education legacy
trust account--state appropriation, and (($15,870,000)) $18,236,000 of
the general fund -- federal appropriation are provided solely for
development and implementation of the Washington assessments of student
learning (WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of
retake assessments for high school students who are not successful in
one or more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to
implement the certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent
of public instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on
development and implementation of alternative assessments or appeals
procedures. Within these amounts, the superintendent of public
instruction shall contract for the early return of 10th grade student
WASL results, on or around June 10th of each year. In addition to the
amounts provided for the Washington assessments of student learning in
this subsection, $11,372,000 is also included in the appropriations to
the office of financial management in this act for an interagency
agreement with the office of superintendent of public instruction for
the expenditure of those funds based on compliance with certain
requirements.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 3166 (design of the state assessment system and the Washington
assessment of student learning), including section 3 of the act
providing for end-of-course tests in math. If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $1,630,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the development and implementation
of diagnostic assessments, subject to the following terms and
conditions:
(a) A maximum of $2,540,000 of the funding provided in this
subsection shall support the development and implementation of
voluntary classroom-based diagnostic assessments and progress
monitoring tools for all subject areas included in the WASL by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction; and
(b) $2,360,000 of the funding provided in this subsection is for
allocations to school districts to purchase assessment tools which
supplement the system of diagnostic tests developed by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction as described in (a) of this
subsection.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
second grade assessments.
(5) $1,414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 ((and)) is provided solely for (a) the tenth grade
mathematics assessment tool that: (i) Presents the mathematics
essential learnings in segments for assessment; (ii) is comparable in
content and rigor to the tenth grade mathematics WASL when all segments
are considered together; (iii) is reliable and valid; and (iv) can be
used to determine a student's academic performance level; (b) tenth
grade mathematics knowledge and skill learning modules to teach middle
and high school students specific skills that have been identified as
areas of difficulty for tenth grade students; and (c) making the
modules available on-line.
(6) $1,966,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 and $2,337,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation are provided solely to develop a system of mathematics
and science standards and instructional materials that are
internationally competitive and consistent with emerging best practices
research. Funding in this subsection shall fund all of the following
specific projects:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in mathematics as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education). Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
mathematics selected by the board, and convening education
practitioners and community members in an advisory capacity regarding
revised standards in mathematics.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic mathematics curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised
mathematics standards.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt revised state standards in science as directed by Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education. Activities include conducting research at the request of
the state board of education, engaging one or more national experts in
science selected by the board, and convening education practitioners
and community members in an advisory capacity regarding revised
standards in science.
(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall research and
identify not more than three basic science curricula as well as
diagnostic and supplemental instructional materials for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans that align with the revised science
standards.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
evaluate science textbooks, instructional materials, and diagnostic
tools to determine the extent to which they are aligned with the
revised science standards. Once the evaluations have been conducted,
results will be shared with science teachers, other educators, and
community members.
(f) Funding is provided for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to develop WASL knowledge and skill learning modules
to assist students performing at tenth grade level 1 and level 2 in
science.
(g) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $300,000 is
provided solely to the state board of education to increase capacity to
implement the provisions of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education) and Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6023 (regarding alternative assessments).
(7) $8,950,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits for the
equivalent of two additional professional development days each school
year for fourth and fifth grade teachers. The allocations shall be
made based on the calculations of certificated instructional staff
units for fourth and fifth grade provided in section 502 of this act
and on the calculations of compensation provided in sections 503 and
504 of this act. Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are
intended to be formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant
budget drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008. In the
2007-08 school year, the professional development activities funded by
this subsection shall be focused on development of mathematics
knowledge and instructional skills and on improving instruction in
science. In the 2008-09 school year, the additional professional
development shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international mathematics and science standards and curriculum.
Districts may use the funding to support additional days for
professional development as well as job-embedded forms of professional
development.
(8) $13,058,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
for allocations to districts for salaries and benefits for the
equivalent of three additional professional development days for middle
and high school math teachers and the equivalent of three additional
professional development days for middle and high school science
teachers. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules to determine the number of math and science teachers in
middle and high schools within each district. Allocations made
pursuant to this subsection are intended to be formula-driven, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide
updated projections of the relevant budget drivers by November 20,
2007, and by November 20, 2008. Districts may use the funding to
support additional days for professional development as well as job-embedded forms of professional development, consistent with the
following:
(a) For middle school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on development of basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills and the additional science professional
development shall focus on examination of student science assessment
data and identification of science knowledge and skill areas in need of
additional instructional attention. For middle school teachers during
the 2008-09 school year the additional math professional development
shall focus on skills related to implementing the new international
mathematics standards and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to implementing the new
international science standards.
(b) For high school teachers during the 2007-08 school year the
additional math professional development funded in this subsection
shall focus on skills related to implementing state math learning
modules, the segmented math class/assessment program, the collection of
evidence alternative assessment, and basic mathematics knowledge and
instructional skills, and the additional science professional
development shall focus on skills related to examination of student
science assessment data and identification of science knowledge and
skill areas in need of additional instructional attention. For high
school teachers during the 2008-09 school year the additional math
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international mathematics standards and the additional science
professional development shall focus on skills related to implementing
the new international science standards.
(9) $17,491,000 of the education legacy trust fund appropriation is
for allocations to districts for specialized professional development
in math for one math teacher and one science teacher in each middle
school and one math teacher and one science teacher in each high
school. The allocations shall be based on five additional professional
development days per teacher and an additional allocation per teacher
of $1,500 for training costs. In order to generate an allocation under
this subsection, a teacher must participate in specialized professional
development that leads to the implementation of mathematics and science
courses that add new rigor to the math and science course offerings in
the school. Allocations made pursuant to this subsection are intended
to be formula-driven, and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide updated projections of the relevant budget
drivers by November 20, 2007, and by November 20, 2008.
(10) $5,376,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a math and science instructional
coaches program pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906
(improving mathematics and science education). Funding shall be used
to provide grants to schools and districts to provide salaries,
benefits, and professional development activities to twenty-five
instructional coaches in middle and high school math in the 2007-08 and
2008-09 school years and twenty-five instructional coaches in middle
and high school science in the 2008-09 school years; and up to $300,000
may be used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to administer and coordinate the program. Each instructional coach
will receive five days of training at a coaching institute prior to
being assigned to serve two schools each. These coaches will attend
meetings during the year to further their training and assist with
coordinating statewide trainings on math and science.
(11) $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science education). The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide allocations to
districts for middle and junior high school students in accordance with
the funding formulas provided in section 502 of this act. Although the
allocations are formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall
consider the funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and
shall adjust funding to stay within the amounts provided in this
subsection.
(12) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for (a) staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to coordinate and promote efforts to develop integrated math, science,
technology, and engineering programs in schools and districts across
the state; and (b) grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high
school teachers each year professional development training for
implementing integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
program in their schools.
(13) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for in-service training and educational programs conducted by the
Pacific science center and for the Washington state leadership
assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional partnership
coordinated at the Pacific science center.
(14) $51,701,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools, as provided in Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill 5841 (enhancing student learning
opportunities and achievement). The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide allocations to districts for recipient
schools in accordance with the funding formulas provided in section 502
of this act. Each kindergarten student who enrolls for the voluntary
full-day program in a recipient school shall count as one-half of one
full-time equivalent student for the purpose of making allocations
under this subsection. Although the allocations are formula-driven,
the office of the superintendent shall consider the funding provided in
this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit the number of
recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts appropriated each
fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided in this
subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten programs for
10 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2007-08 school year and 20
percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2008-09 school year. Funding
priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty levels, as
measured by prior year free and reduced priced lunch eligibility rates
in each school. Additionally, as a condition of funding, school
districts must agree to provide the full-day program to the children of
parents who request it in each eligible school. For the purposes of
calculating a school district levy base, funding provided in this
subsection shall be considered a state block grant program under RCW
84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(15) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for support of a full-day kindergarten "lighthouse" resource program at
the Bremerton school district, as provided in Engrossed Second Senate
Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and
achievement). The purpose of the program is to provide technical
assistance to districts in the initial stages of implementing a high
quality full-day kindergarten program.
(16) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants for three demonstration projects for kindergarten through
grade three. The purpose of the grants is to implement best practices
in developmental learning in kindergarten through third grade pursuant
to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement).
(17) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(18) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants to school districts to implement emerging best practices
activities in support of classroom teachers' instruction of students,
with a first language other than English, who struggle with acquiring
academic English skills, as outlined in Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student learning opportunities and
achievement). Best practices shall focus on professional development
for classroom teachers and support of instruction for English language
learners in regular classrooms. School districts qualifying for these
grants shall serve a student population that reflects many different
first languages among their students. The Northwest educational
research laboratory (NWREL) shall evaluate the effectiveness of the
practices supported by the grants as provided in section 501 of this
act. Recipients of these grants shall cooperate with NWREL in the
collection of program data.
(19) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for training of paraprofessional classroom assistants and certificated
staff who work with classroom assistants as provided in RCW
28A.415.310.
(20) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260, and for a mentor
academy. Up to $200,000 of the amount in this subsection may be used
each fiscal year to operate a mentor academy to help districts provide
effective training for peer mentors. Funds for the teacher assistance
program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number of
first year beginning teachers.
(21) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the leadership internship program for superintendents, principals,
and program administrators.
(22) $105,765,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(23) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a principal support program. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction may contract with an independent organization to
administer the program. The program shall include: (a) Development of
an individualized professional growth plan for a new principal or
principal candidate; and (b) participation of a mentor principal who
works over a period of between one and three years with the new
principal or principal candidate to help him or her build the skills
identified as critical to the success of the professional growth plan.
Within the amounts provided, $25,000 per year shall be used to support
additional participation of secondary principals.
(24) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction for focused
assistance. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall conduct educational audits of low-performing schools and enter
into performance agreements between school districts and the office to
implement the recommendations of the audit and the community. Each
educational audit shall include recommendations for best practices and
ways to address identified needs and shall be presented to the
community in a public meeting to seek input on ways to implement the
audit and its recommendations.
(25) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for a high school and school district improvement program modeled after
the office of the superintendent of public instruction's existing
focused assistance program in subsection (25)(b) of this section. The
state funding for this improvement program will match an equal amount
committed by a nonprofit foundation in furtherance of a jointly funded
program.
(26) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for summer accountability institutes offered by the superintendent of
public instruction. The institutes shall provide school district staff
with training in the analysis of student assessment data, information
regarding successful district and school teaching models, research on
curriculum and instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve
instruction in reading, mathematics, language arts, social studies,
including civics, and guidance and counseling. The superintendent of
public instruction shall offer at least one institute specifically for
improving instruction in mathematics in fiscal years 2008 and 2009 and
at least one institute specifically for improving instruction in
science in fiscal year 2009.
(27) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the evaluation of mathematics textbooks, other instructional
materials, and diagnostic tools to determine the extent to which they
are aligned with the state standards. Once the evaluations have been
conducted, results will be shared with math teachers, other educators,
and community members for the purposes of validating the conclusions
and then selecting up to three curricula, supporting materials, and
diagnostic instruments as those best able to assist students to learn
and teachers to teach the content of international standards. In
addition, the office of the superintendent shall continue to provide
support and information on essential components of comprehensive,
school-based reading programs.
(28) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the mathematics helping corps subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(a) In order to increase the availability and quality of technical
mathematics assistance statewide, the superintendent of public
instruction shall employ mathematics school improvement specialists to
provide assistance to schools and districts. The specialists shall be
hired by and work under the direction of a statewide school improvement
coordinator. The mathematics improvement specialists shall not be
permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) The school improvement specialists shall provide the following:
(i) Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data
and develop improvement plans based on those data;
(ii) Consultation with schools and districts concerning their
performance on the Washington assessment of student learning and other
assessments emphasizing the performance on the mathematics assessments;
(iii) Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the
essential academic learning requirements emphasizing the academic
learning requirements for mathematics, the Washington assessment of
student learning, and meets the needs of diverse learners;
(iv) Assistance in the identification and implementation of
research-based instructional practices in mathematics;
(v) Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional
strategies and classroom-based assessment for mathematics;
(vi) Assistance in developing and implementing family and community
involvement programs emphasizing mathematics; and
(vii) Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to
improve student mathematics learning.
(29) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the improvement of reading achievement and implementation of
research-based reading models. The superintendent shall evaluate
reading curriculum programs and other instructional materials to
determine the extent to which they are aligned with state standards.
A report of the analyses shall be made available to school districts.
The superintendent shall report to districts the assessments that are
available to screen and diagnose reading difficulties, and shall
provide training on how to implement a reading assessment system.
Resources may also be used to disseminate grade level expectations and
develop professional development modules and web-based materials.
(30) $30,706,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(31) $500,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to award five grants to parent, community, and
school district partnership programs that will meet the unique needs of
different groups of students in closing the achievement gap. The
legislature intends that the pilot programs will help students meet
state learning standards, achieve the skills and knowledge necessary
for college or the workplace, reduce the achievement gap, prevent
dropouts, and improve graduation rates.
(a) The pilot programs shall be designed in such a way as to be
supplemental to educational services provided in the district and shall
utilize a community partnership based approach to helping students and
their parents.
(b) The grant recipients shall work in collaboration with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop
measurable goals and evaluation methodologies for the pilot programs.
$25,000 of this appropriation may be used by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to hold a statewide meeting to
disseminate successful strategies developed by the grantees.
(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue a report to the legislature in the 2009 session on the progress
of each of the pilot programs.
(32) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to support
and award Washington community learning center program grants pursuant
to Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5841 (enhancing student
learning opportunities and achievement). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(33) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the elimination of the lunch co-pay for students in grades
kindergarten through third grade that are eligible for reduced price
lunch.
(34) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the development of mathematics support activities provided by
community organizations in after school programs. Pursuant to Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving mathematics and science
education), the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall administer grants to community organizations that partner with
school districts to provide these activities and develop a mechanism to
report program and student success.
(35) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for: (a) The meals for kids program under RCW 28A.235.145 through
28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the breakfast co-pay for students
eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c) for additional assistance for
school districts initiating a summer food service program.
(36) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the Washington reading corps. The superintendent shall allocate
reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts
that are implementing comprehensive, proven, research-based reading
programs. Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading
corps programs. Grants provided under this section may be used by
school districts for expenditures from September 2007 through August
31, 2009.
(37) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of care for
children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of
care program exists in the area in which the school district is
located, the local plan shall provide for coordination with existing
programs to the greatest extent possible. Grant funds shall be
allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.
(38) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on
school district technology development, promoting standards for school
district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology
support centers, including state support activities, under chapter
28A.650 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate
a process to facilitate the evaluation and provision of online
curriculum courses to school districts which includes the following:
Creation of a general listing of the types of available online
curriculum courses; a survey conducted by each regional educational
technology support center of school districts in its region regarding
the types of online curriculum courses desired by school districts; a
process to evaluate and recommend to school districts the best online
courses in terms of curriculum, student performance, and cost; and
assistance to school districts in procuring and providing the courses
to students.
(39) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the development and posting of web-based instructional tools,
assessment data, and other information that assists schools and
teachers implementing higher academic standards.
(40) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the operation of the center for the improvement of student learning
pursuant to RCW 28A.300.130.
(41) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for one-time allocations for technology upgrades and improvements. The
funding shall be allocated based on $3,000 for each elementary school,
$6,000 for each middle or junior high school, and $11,000 for each high
school. In cases where a particular school's grade span or
configuration does not fall into these categories, the office of
superintendent of public instruction will develop an allocation to that
school that recognizes the unique characteristics but maintains the
proportionate allocation identified in this subsection.
(42) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for costs associated with office of the superintendent of public
instruction establishing a statewide director of technology position
pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1906 (improving
mathematics and science education).
(43)(a) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards and who are teaching in a Washington public school, subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,000 per
teacher in fiscal year 2008 and adjusted for inflation in fiscal year
2009. Beginning in the 2007-2008 school year and thereafter, national
board certified teachers who become public school principals shall
continue to receive this bonus for as long as they are principals and
maintain the national board certification;
(ii) During the 2007-2008 school year, for national board certified
teachers who teach in schools where at least 70 percent of student
headcount enrollment is eligible for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program, an additional $5,000 annual bonus to be paid in one lump
sum. Beginning in the 2008-2009 school year and thereafter, an
additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national board
certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where at
least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch; and
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner.
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits. Unless Senate Bill No. 6657 (salary
bonuses for individuals certified by the national board for
professional teaching standards) is enacted by June 30, 2008, the
annual bonus shall not be included in the definition of "earnable
compensation" under RCW 41.32.010(10).
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "the percent of the student
headcount enrollment eligible for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program" shall be defined as: (i) For the 2007-08 and the 2008-09 school years, schools in which the prior year percentage of students
eligible for the federal free and reduced price lunch program meets the
criteria specified in subsection (41)(a)(ii) of this section; and (ii)
in the 2008-09 school year, any school that met the criterion in (c)(i)
of this subsection in the 2007-08 school year.
(d) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the office
of superintendent of public instruction shall revise rules to allow
teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching at the
Washington school for the deaf or Washington school for the blind, to
receive the annual bonus amounts specified in this subsection if they
are otherwise eligible.
(44) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6377
(career and technical education).
(45) $3,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for an allocation of four dollars and nine
cents per full-time equivalent student, or as much as the funding in
this subsection will allow, to maintain and improve library materials,
collections, and services. The funding provided in this subsection
shall be used to augment current funding for librarian programs
provided through basic education and other existing funding mechanisms.
In order to receive allocations under this section, school districts
must agree that to the maximum extent possible they will ensure that
library programs and services are equitably provided throughout the
district.
(46) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6483 (local
farms-healthy kids and communities).
(47) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6673 (student learning opportunities) which requires the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to explore online curriculum
support in languages other than English.
(48) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for grants to five skills centers to develop and plan for
implementation of integrated English language development/career skills
programs that pair English language development teachers with
career/technical education instructors in the classroom. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction and skill center staff shall
work with the state board for community and technical colleges I-BEST
program staff and local community and technical college program staff
to develop the program to assure critical program elements are included
and that the skill center programs provide a seamless transition for
high school students to the community and technical college programs
for students choosing that pathway. The request for proposal or grant
application shall be issued no later than May 1, 2008, so that grant
recipients can begin program planning and development efforts on July
1, 2008. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
resulting implementation plans to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(49) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
for support of public high schools' participation in the FIRST robotics
program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
issue grants not to exceed $10,000 per school to be used for teacher
stipends, registration fees, equipment, and other costs associated with
direct participation in the program. High-poverty schools and schools
starting up robotics programs shall be given priority in funding.
(50) In addition to other reductions, the reduced appropriations in
this section reflect an additional (($499,000)) $602,000 reduction in
administrative costs required by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5460 (reducing state government administrative costs). These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

Sec. 510 2009 c 4 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,381,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,654,000))
$86,268,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $360,660,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . 45,953,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($559,648,000))
$561,262,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $220.34 per funded student for the
2007-08 school year and $265.08 per funded student for the 2008-09
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) In addition to amounts allocated in (b) and (c) of this
subsection, an additional amount shall be allocated to a school
district for each school year in which the district's allocation is
less than the amount the district received for the general fund -- state
learning assistance program allocation in the 2004-05 school year. The
amount of the allocation in this section shall be sufficient to
maintain the 2004-05 school year allocation.
(e) If Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673 (student learning
opportunities) is enacted by June 30, 2008, in addition to the amounts
allocated in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, an additional amount
shall be allocated to school districts with high concentrations of
poverty and English language learner students beginning in the 2008-2009 school year, subject to the following rules and conditions:
(i) To qualify for additional funding under this subsection, a
district's October headcount enrollment in grades kindergarten through
grade twelve must have at least twenty percent enrolled in the
transitional bilingual instruction program based on an average of the
program headcount taken in October and May of the prior school year;
and must also have at least forty percent eligible for free or reduced
price lunch based on October headcount enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve in the prior school year.
(ii) Districts meeting the specifications in (e)(i) of this
subsection shall receive additional funded students for the learning
assistance program at the rates specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section. The number of additional funded student units shall be
calculated by subtracting twenty percent from the district's percent
transitional bilingual instruction program enrollment as defined in
(e)(i) of this subsection, and the resulting percent shall be
multiplied by the district's kindergarten through twelve annual average
full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school year.
(2) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(3) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.
(6) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, funding is for
the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6673
(student learning opportunities) which establishes the extended
learning program to provide additional instructional services for
eligible students in grades eight, eleven, and twelve during the
regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at other times in order
to meet the needs of these students. This funding is in addition to
the estimated $986,000 of associated compensation increases associated
with this legislation in section 504 of this act.

Sec. 511 2009 c 4 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT
PROGRAM
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,369,000
Student Achievement Account -- State Appropriation
(FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($436,910,000))
$136,910,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $860,279,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $450.00 per FTE student for the 2007-
08 school year and $458.10 per FTE student for the 2008-09 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) $300,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is from
the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 fiscal stabilization
funds which shall be used, in combination with student achievement
funds, to achieve the maximum rate allocations per FTE student
designated in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The appropriations ((is)) are allocated for the following uses
as specified in RCW 28A.505.210:
(a) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(b) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such
as small high school writing classes;
(c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school; or
(f) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions and
extended learning opportunities under (a) through (c) of this
subsection (((2))) (3).
(((3))) (4) The superintendent of public instruction shall
distribute the school year allocation according to the monthly schedule
defined in RCW 28A.505.220.

Sec. 512 2008 c 329 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,595,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,560,000))
$68,924,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,243,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($180,398,000))
$179,762,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $824.12 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2007-08 school year and $840.64 in
the 2008-09 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.
(6) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260, during the 2007-09 biennium, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall not make exit
of the transitional bilingual program contingent on passing both the
Washington language proficiency test and the Washington assessment of
student learning without prior legislative approval.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2009 c 4 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $373,726,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,727,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,000))
$350,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,181,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,513,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,371,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($788,818,000))
$788,868,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $15,744,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand general enrollments by 625 student FTEs in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 625 student FTEs in fiscal year
2009. Of these, 165 FTEs in 2008 and 165 FTEs in 2009 are expected to
be graduate student FTEs.
(2) $6,975,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to expand math and science undergraduate enrollments
by 250 student FTEs in each fiscal year. The programs expanded shall
include mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences. The
university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in math
and science programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
Washington state academy of sciences, authorized by chapter 70.220 RCW.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support of the
William D. Ruckelshaus center.
(5) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at the
University of Washington by 250 students each year. TRIO students
include low-income, first-generation, and college students with
disabilities. The student support services program shall report
annually to the office of financial management and the appropriate
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature on the retention and
completion rates of students served through this appropriation.
Retention rates shall continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students
in this program.
(6) $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $84,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to establish the state
climatologist position.
(7) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center to identify and carry out, or otherwise appropriately support,
a process to identify issues that have led to conflict around land use
requirements and property rights, and explore practical and effective
ways to resolve or reduce that conflict. A report with conclusions and
recommendations shall be submitted to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate committees of the legislature by October 31, 2007.
Work will continue after the submission of the initial report, to
include continuing research and the development of financial and policy
options and a progress report on fact finding efforts and stakeholder
positions due December 1, 2008.
(8) $3,830,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand health sciences capacity at
the University of Washington. Consistent with the medical and dental
school extension program appropriations at Washington State University
and Eastern Washington University, funding is provided to expand
classes at the University of Washington. Medical and dental students
shall take the first year of courses for this program at the Riverpoint
campus in Spokane and the second year of courses at the University of
Washington in Seattle.
(9) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the University
of Washington are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the combined number of baccalaureate degrees conferred
per year at all campuses to 8,850;
(b) Increase the combined number of high-demand baccalaureate
degrees conferred at all campuses per year to 1,380;
(c) Increase the combined number of advanced degrees conferred per
year at all campuses to 3,610;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 74.7 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 76.0 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 93.0 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 92 percent
at the Seattle campus and 92.5 percent at the Bothell and Tacoma
campuses, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
subsection.
The University of Washington shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(10) $750,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation
is provided solely to increase participation in international learning
opportunities, particularly for students with lower incomes who would
otherwise not have the chance to study, work, or volunteer outside the
United States.
(11) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(12) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for coastal marine research by the
Olympic natural resources center.
(13) $95,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for increased education, training,
and support services for the families of children with autism, and for
the production and distribution of digital video discs in both English
and Spanish about strategies for working with people with autism.
(14) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $3,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for operating support for the
department of global health.
(15) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(16) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the rural technology initiative
(initiative) at the University of Washington and the transportation
research group (group) at the Washington State University to conduct an
economic analysis of the costs to safely provide log hauling services.
The initiative will be the lead investigator and administer the
project. Neither the University of Washington nor the Washington State
University may make a deduction for administrative costs. The project
shall rely upon the Washington state patrol for determination of basic
safe characteristics, consistent with applicable state and federal law.
The analysis shall include:
(a) An estimate of log haulers' cost to operate and maintain a
basic and safe log truck without operator including:
(i) Variable costs such as fuel, etc;
(ii) Quasi-variable costs such as:
(A) Tires, brakes, wrappers, and other safety related equipment;
(B) Vehicle insurance, taxes, fees, etc;
(C) Maintenance costs such as oil, lubrication, and minor repairs;
and
(D) Depreciation and replacement costs;
(b) The source of these cost estimates where possible should be
independent vendors of equipment and services or already existing
studies;
(c) A calculation of costs for safe operation expressed as per
mile, hour or load volume including consideration for regional
differences as well as off-road vs. on-road;
(d) An evaluation of comparable trucking services; and
(e) A review of log truck safety statistics in Washington state.
In conducting the analysis, the initiative shall consult with the
northwest log truckers cooperative, the Washington trucking
association, the Washington contract loggers association, the
Washington farm forestry association, and the Washington forest
protection association. By June 30, 2008, the initiative shall provide
a report of its findings to the legislature and governor and distribute
the findings to interested industry groups.
(17) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the Burke museum to support
science and social science educational programs including public
outreach programs, new educational programs and resources, web-based
interactive learning experiences, teacher training, and traveling
educational opportunities.
(18) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to the institute for learning and
brain sciences.
(19) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
to gather data and conduct research associated with preparing the
basin-wide assessment and to solicit nominations for review and
submittal to the Washington academy of sciences for the creation of the
Puget Sound science panel pursuant to Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5372 (Puget Sound partnership).
(20)(a) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 is provided solely for the University of Washington
school of law loan repayment assistance program endowment fund. The
University of Washington shall conduct fund-raising activities to
increase private sector support of the endowment program and $250,000
of the appropriation in this subsection is contingent on a private
sector match. Funds in the law school repayment assistance program
endowment fund shall be used to provide graduates who pursue careers in
public interest legal positions with payment assistance toward their
student loan debt.
(b) The University of Washington law school shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2010, information about the loan repayment
assistance program. The report shall contain at least the following
information:
(i) A financial summary of the endowment program;
(ii) The number of individuals receiving assistance from the
program and information related to the positions in which these
individuals are working;
(iii) Any available information regarding the effect of the loan
repayment assistance program on student recruitment and enrollment; and
(iv) Other information the school of law deems relevant to the
evaluation of the program.
(c) In its rules for administering the program, the school of law
must make provision for cases of hardship or exceptional circumstances,
as defined by the school of law. Examples of such circumstances
include, but are not limited to, family leave, medical leave, illness
or disability, and loss of employment.
(d) The loan repayment assistance program must be available to
otherwise eligible graduates of the law school who work in positions
with nonprofit organizations or government agencies. Such positions
must be located within Washington state. Government agencies shall
include the various branches of the military.
(21) $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $54,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the University of Washington
geriatric education center to develop a voluntary adult family home
certification program. In addition to the minimum qualifications
required under RCW 70.128.120, individuals participating in the
voluntary adult family home certification program shall complete fifty-two hours of class requirements as established by the University of
Washington geriatric education center. Individuals completing the
requirements of RCW 70.128.120 and the voluntary adult family home
certification program shall be issued a certified adult family home
license by the department of social and health services. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules implementing
the provisions of this subsection.
(22) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the William D. Ruckelshaus
center for implementation of section 5 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3123 (nurse staffing). If section 5 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(23) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely to establish an e-Science institute that
will provide infrastructure and consulting expertise to university
researchers in advanced computational techniques needed to capture,
store, organize, access, mine, visualize, and interpret massive data
sets.
(24) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for incentive grants to support medical
research or medical training projects focused upon improvement of
services to persons with developmental disabilities. The university
shall report to appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2008, on incentive grants awarded, and other efforts to improve
training for medical students in treating persons with developmental
disabilities.
(25) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, the
University of Washington shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 602 2009 c 4 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,272,000))
$45,275,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,219,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($113,512,000))
$113,515,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,474,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase general enrollments by 70 FTE students in
fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 211 FTE enrollments in fiscal
year 2009. At least 30 of the additional fiscal year 2009 enrollments
are expected to be graduate students.
(2) $1,816,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2008 is to increase math and science
enrollments by 105 FTE students in fiscal year 2008 and by an
additional 89 FTE students in fiscal year 2009. The university shall
provide data to the office of financial management regarding math and
science enrollments, graduations, and employment of college graduates
related to state investments in math and science enrollment programs.
Data may be provided through the centralized higher education
enrollment system or through an alternative means agreed to by the
institutions and the office of financial management.
(3) $1,801,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is to increase high-demand undergraduate enrollments by
85 student FTEs in fiscal year 2008 and by an additional 70 FTE
students in fiscal year 2009. The programs expanded shall include, but
are not limited to, bilingual education and information technology.
The university shall provide data to the office of financial management
that is required to track changes in enrollments, graduations, and the
employment of college graduates related to state investments in high-demand enrollment programs. Data may be provided through the public
centralized higher education enrollment system or through an
alternative means agreed to by the institutions and the office of
financial management.
(4) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the number of TRIO eligible
students served in the student support services program at Central
Washington University by 250 students each year. TRIO students include
low-income, first-generation, and college students with disabilities.
The student support services program shall report annually to the
office of financial management and the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the retention and completion rates of
students served through this appropriation. Retention rates shall
continue to exceed 85 percent for TRIO students in this program.
(5) The higher education coordinating board, the office of
financial management, and the higher education institutions negotiated
a set of performance measures, checkpoints, and targets in 2006. By
July 31, 2007, the university and the board shall review and revise
these targets based on per-student funding in the 2007-09
appropriations act. In addition, the board shall compile comparable
data from peer institutions in the eight global challenge states
identified in the Washington Learns study.
The checkpoints previously agreed by the board and the Central
Washington University are enumerated as follows:
(a) Increase the number of baccalaureate degrees conferred per year
to 2,050;
(b) Increase the number of high-demand baccalaureate degrees
conferred per year to 49;
(c) Increase the number of advanced degrees conferred per year at
all campuses to 196;
(d) Improve the six-year graduation rate for baccalaureate students
to 51.1 percent;
(e) Improve the three-year graduation rate for students who
transfer with an associates degree to 72.3 percent;
(f) Improve the freshman retention rate to 78.2 percent;
(g) Improve time to degree for baccalaureate students to 86.6
percent, measured by the percent of admitted students who graduate
within 125 percent of the credits required for a degree; and
(h) The institution shall provide a report on Pell grant
recipients' performance within each of the measures included in this
section.
Central Washington University shall report its progress and ongoing
efforts toward meeting the provisions of this section to the higher
education coordinating board prior to November 1, 2009.
(6) $500,000 of the education legacy trust account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1497
(Central Washington University operating fee waivers). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, this appropriation shall lapse.
(7) In an effort to introduce students to and inform students of
post-secondary opportunities in Washington state, by October 1st of
each year the university shall report to the higher education
coordinating board progress towards developing and implementing
outreach programs designed to increase awareness of higher education to
K-12 populations.
(8) When implementing reductions in fiscal year 2009, Central
Washington University shall minimize impacts on academic programs,
maximize reductions in administration, and not reduce enrollments below
enrollment levels referenced in 2008 c 329 s 604 and section 601 of
this act.

Sec. 603 2009 c 4 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,008,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,533,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,333,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,874,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $169,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to)) Within the funds appropriated
in this section, the board shall maintain and update a scholarship
clearinghouse that lists every public and private scholarship available
to Washington students. The higher education coordinating board shall
develop a web-based interface for students and families as well as a
common application for these scholarships.
(2) (($339,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $330,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of)) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) (($200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of)) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1131 (the passport to college promise). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) (($152,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for administration of)) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall administer
conditional scholarships.
(5) ((Except for moneys provided in this section for specific
purposes, and to the extent that the executive director finds that the
agency will not require the full amount appropriated for a fiscal year
in this section, the unexpended appropriation shall be transferred to
the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140 for
purposes of fulfilling unfunded scholarship commitments that the board
made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(6))) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to implement a capital facility and technology capacity study
which will compare the 10-year enrollment projections with the capital
facility requirements and technology application and hardware capacity
needed to deliver higher education programs for the period 2009-2019.
The higher education coordinating board shall:
(a) Develop the study in collaboration with the state board for
community and technical colleges, four-year universities, and the
Washington independent colleges;
(b) Determine the 10-year capital facilities and technology
application and hardware investment needed by location to deliver
higher education programs to additional student FTE;
(c) Estimate operational and capital costs of the additional
capacity; and
(d) Report findings to the legislature on October 1, 2008.
(((7) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the board to)) (6) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall prepare a program
and operating plan for a higher education center in the Kitsap county
area. The plan shall be developed in consultation with an advisory
committee of civic, business, and educational leaders from Clallam,
Jefferson, Kitsap, and Mason counties. It shall include a projection
of lower and upper division and graduate enrollment trends in the study
area; a review of assessments of employer needs; an inventory of
existing and needed postsecondary programs; recommended strategies for
promoting active program participation in and extensive program
offerings at the center by public and private baccalaureate
institutions; and an estimate of operating and capital costs for the
creation and operation of the center. The board shall submit its
findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature by
December 1, 2008.
(((8) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for implementation of)) (7) Within the
funds appropriated in this section, the board shall implement Engrossed
House Bill No. 2641 (education performance agreements). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(((9))) (8) The higher education coordinating board, the department
of licensing, and the department of health shall jointly review and
report to appropriate policy committees of the legislature by December
1, 2008, on barriers and opportunities for increasing the extent to
which veterans separating from duty are able to apply skills sets and
education required while in service to certification, licensure, and
degree requirements.
(((10) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the higher education coordinating
board to)) (9) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the board
shall convene interested parties from Snohomish, Island, and Skagit
counties to consider the November 2007 site options and recommendations
for a new campus of the University of Washington in Snohomish county.
The three local communities shall develop a consensus recommendation on
a single preferred site and present the recommendation to the higher
education coordinating board. The higher education coordinating board
shall then present the single preferred site recommendation to the
appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees by December 1,
2008.

Sec. 604 2009 c 4 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,286,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,498,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,113,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,188,000))
$106,588,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,085,000))
$471,485,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $154,760,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008, $178,707,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009, $49,902,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation for fiscal year 2008, $40,050,000 of the education legacy
trust account appropriation for fiscal year 2009, and $2,886,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for student
financial aid payments under the state need grant; the state work study
program including a four percent administrative allowance; the
Washington scholars program; and the Washington award for vocational
excellence. All four programs shall increase grant awards sufficiently
to offset the full cost of the resident undergraduate tuition increases
authorized under this act.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall be expanded to include students with family
incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income,
adjusted for family size. Awards for students with incomes between 66
percent and 70 percent of the state median shall be 50 percent of the
award amount granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the
median.
(3) ((To the extent that the executive director determines that the
agency will not award the full amount appropriated in subsection (1) of
this section for a fiscal year, unexpended funds shall be transferred
to the state education trust account established under RCW 28B.92.140
for purposes first of fulfilling the unfunded scholarship commitments
that the board made under its federal GEAR UP Grant 1.
(4))) $7,400,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is provided solely for investment to fulfill the
scholarship commitments that the state incurs in accordance with Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5098 (the college bound scholarship). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((5))) (4) $2,500,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to expand the gaining early awareness
and readiness for undergraduate programs project to at least 25
additional school districts.
(((6))) (5) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to increase the future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program
by at least 35 students per year. $500,000 of this amount is provided
to support state work study positions for students to intern in
secondary math and science classrooms.
(((7) $2,336,000)) (6) $736,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1131
(passport to college). Funds are provided for student scholarships,
and for incentive payments to the colleges they attend for
individualized student support services which may include, but are not
limited to, college and career advising, counseling, tutoring, costs
incurred for students while school is not in session, personal
expenses, health insurance, and emergency services. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((8))) (7) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are for community scholarship matching grants and
its administration. To be eligible for the matching grant, nonprofit
groups organized under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code must demonstrate they have raised at least $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. Groups may receive no more than one $2,000 matching grant per
year and preference shall be given to groups affiliated with
scholarship America. Up to a total of $46,000 per year of the amount
appropriated in this section may be awarded to a nonprofit community
organization to administer scholarship matching grants, with preference
given to an organization affiliated with scholarship America.
(((9))) (8) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for higher education student
child care matching grants under chapter 28B.135 RCW.
(((10))) (9) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2008 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for implementation of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1179 (state need grant). State
need grants provided to students enrolled in just three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits,
shall not exceed the amounts appropriated in this subsection. By
November 1 of each year, the board shall report to the office of
financial management and to the operating budget committees of the
house of representatives and senate on the number of eligible but
unserved students enrolled in just three to five quarterly credits, or
the semester equivalent, and the estimated cost of serving them. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((11))) (10) $5,000,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1779 (GET ready for math and science). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((12))) (11) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the health professional
scholarship and loan program. The funds provided in this subsection
(a) shall be prioritized for health care deliver sites demonstrating a
commitment to serving the uninsured; and (b) shall be allocated between
loan repayments and scholarships proportional to current program
allocations.

Sec. 605 2009 c 4 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,362,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,120,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($192,192,000))
$202,483,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($323,680,000))
$333,971,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $47,919,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $56,437,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services.
(a) Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial
amount of state matching dollars required to receive federal child care
and development fund grant dollars.
(b) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the number of children receiving early
childhood education and assistance program services by 2,250 slots.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1), the
department shall increase the minimum provider per slot payment to
$6,500 in fiscal year 2008. Any provider receiving slot payments
higher than $6,500 shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor rate increase in
fiscal year 2008. All providers shall receive a 2.0 percent vendor
rate increase in fiscal year 2009.
(2) $775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $1,825,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to: (a) Develop a quality rating
and improvement system; and (b) pilot the quality rating and
improvement system in multiple locations. Four of the pilot sites are
to be located within the following counties: Spokane, Kitsap, King, and
Yakima. The department shall analyze and evaluate the pilot sites and
report initial findings to the legislature by December 1, 2008. Prior
to statewide implementation of the quality rating and improvement
system, the department of early learning shall present the system to
the legislature and the legislature shall formally approve the
implementation of the system through the omnibus appropriations act or
by statute or concurrent resolution.
(3) $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for the department to contract for
child care referral services.
(4) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers. This
includes funding for the department to conduct a random sample survey
of parents to determine the types of early learning services and
materials parents are interested in receiving from the state. The
department shall report the findings to the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 2008.
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a child care consultation
pilot program linking child care providers with evidence-based and best
practice resources regarding caring for infants and young children who
present behavior concerns.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($500,000)) $400,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to expand the
child care career and wage ladder program created by chapter 507, Laws
of 2005.
(7) $172,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 is provided solely for the department to purchase licensing
capability from the department of social and health services through
the statewide automated child welfare information system.
(8) $1,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and (($1,100,000)) $1,025,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2009 are provided solely for a childcare
grant program for public community colleges and public universities.
A community college or university that employs collectively bargained
staff to operate childcare programs may apply for up to $25,000 per
year from the department per each type of the following programs: Head
start, childcare, early childhood assistance and education. The
funding shall only be provided for salaries for collectively bargained
employees.
(9) Beginning October 1, 2007, the department shall be the lead
agency for and recipient of the federal child care and development fund
grant. Amounts within this grant shall be used to fund child care
licensing, quality initiatives, agency administration, and other costs
associated with child care subsidies. The department shall transfer a
portion of this grant to the department of social and health services
to partially fund the child care subsidies paid by the department of
social and health services on behalf of the department of early
learning.
(10) Prior to the development of an early learning information
system, the department shall submit to the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature a completed feasibility study and a
proposal approved by the department of information systems and the
information services board. The department shall ensure that any
proposal for the early learning information system includes the cost
for modifying the system as a result of licensing rule changes and
implementation of the quality rating and improvement system.
(11) The department, in conjunction with the early learning
advisory council, shall report by June 30, 2009, to the governor and
the appropriate committees of the legislature regarding the following:
(a) Administration of the state training and registry system,
including annual expenditures, participants, and average hours of
training provided per participant; and
(b) An evaluation of the child care resource and referral network
in providing information to parents and training and technical
assistance to child care providers.
(12) The department shall use child care development fund money to
satisfy the federal audit requirement of the improper payments act
(IPIA) of 2002. In accordance with the IPIA's rules, the money spent
on the audits will not count against the five percent state limit on
administrative expenditures.
(13) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for the department of early learning to
work with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
collaborate with thrive by five Washington, to study and make
recommendations regarding the implementation of a statewide
kindergarten entry assessment. The department and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall jointly submit a report with
recommendations for implementing the kindergarten entry assessment to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 15, 2008. In the study and development of the
recommendations, the department shall:
(a) Consult with early learning experts, including research and
educator associations, early learning and kindergarten teachers, and
Washington Indian tribes;
(b) Identify a preferred kindergarten entry assessment based on
research and examples of other assessments, and which is sensitive to
cultural and socioeconomic differences influencing the development of
young children;
(c) Recommend a plan for the use of the assessment in a pilot phase
and a voluntary use phase, and recommend a time certain when school
districts must offer the assessment;
(d) Recommend how to report the results of the assessment to
parents, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the department of early learning in a common format, and for a
methodology for conducting the assessments;
(e) Analyze how the assessment could be used to improve instruction
for individual students entering kindergarten and identify whether and
how the assessment results could be used to improve the early learning
and K-12 systems, including the transition between the systems;
(f) Identify the costs of the assessment, including the time
required to administer the assessment; and
(g) Recommend how to ensure that the assessment shall not be used
to screen or otherwise preclude children from entering kindergarten if
they are otherwise eligible.
(14) $120,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009 is provided solely for encouraging private match investment
for innovative, existing local early learning coalitions to achieve one
or more of the following:
(a) Increase communities' abilities to implement their business
plans for comprehensive local and regional early learning systems;
(b) Involve parents in their children's education;
(c) Enhance coordination between the early childhood and K-12
system; or
(d) Improve training and support for raising the level of child
care givers' professional skills to ensure that children are healthy
and ready to succeed in school and life.

Sec. 606 2009 c 4 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,969,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,069,000))
$6,135,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,599,000))
$13,665,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008 and $40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 are provided solely to defend the state's interpretive
position in the case of Delyria & Koch v. Washington State School for
the Blind.
(2) $5,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one-half of one percent effective
July 1, 2008.

Sec. 607 2009 c 4 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,858,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,764,000))
$8,792,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,938,000))
$17,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $84,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation for
fiscal year 2009 is provided solely for the operation of the shared
reading video outreach program. The school for the deaf shall provide
this service to the extent it is funded by contracts with school
districts and educational service districts.
(2) $9,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2009 is provided solely for increasing salaries for certificated
instructional staff by an average of one-half of one percent effective
July 1, 2008.

Sec. 608 2009 c 4 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,454,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,382,000))
$1,518,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $154,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,538,000))
$6,674,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2008 c 329 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $823,274,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($696,324,000))
$690,224,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,970,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $513,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,902,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,589,000))
$2,590,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,536,743,000))
$1,530,644,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2008 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2008.

Sec. 702 2008 c 329 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,535,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,135,000))
$5,136,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,135,000))
$5,136,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,805,000))
$32,807,000

Sec. 703 2008 c 329 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,848,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,728,000))
$27,729,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($135,967,000))
$136,147,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($190,543,000))
$190,774,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2008 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2008.

Sec. 704 2008 c 329 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,546,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,640,000))
$3,649,000

Sec. 705 2008 c 329 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL
Disaster Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$9,500,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire appropriation is for the
purpose of making allocations to the Washington state patrol for any
Washington state fire service resource mobilization costs incurred in
response to an emergency or disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and
43.43.964.

Sec. 706 2008 c 329 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT -- FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$3,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$9,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account for the purposes
specified in section 705 of this act.

Sec. 707 2008 c 329 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations
for sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on
vouchers approved by the director of financial management, except as
otherwise provided, as follows:
(1) Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:
(a) George E. Linkenhoker, claim number SCJ 2008-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,628
(b) Charles A. Gardner, claim number SCJ 2008-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,715
(c) Judd Hurst, claim number SCJ 2008-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000
(d) Thomas J. Nelson, claim number SCJ 2008-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000
(e) William R. Sauters, Jr., claim number
SCJ 2008-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,408
(f) Michael E. Greene, claim number SCJ 2008-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500
(g) Jeffery A. Cobb, claim number SCJ 2008-08 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,600
(h) Robert R. Park, claim number SCJ 2008-09 . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,385
(i) Donald Willett, claim number SCJ 2008-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600
(j) Antonio Perez, claim number SCJ 2009-01 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,179
(k) James D. Romans, claim number SCJ 2009-02 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,481
(l) Michael V. Shong, claim number SCJ 2009-03 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,118
(m) Gerald A. Tinkess, claim number SCJ 2009-04 . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,865
(n) Linh D. Hguyen, claim number SCJ 2009-05 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
(o) Rafael R. Robinson, claim number SCJ 2009-06 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200
(p) Anthony J. Magnesi, claim number SCJ 2009-07 . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,888
(q) Jerry Startzell, claim number 99970000 . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,975
(2) Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by
wildlife pursuant to RCW 77.36.050:
(a) David Guenther, claim number 99970001 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,660
(b) Wilbur Eaton, claim number 99970002 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,069
(c) Eaton Brothers, claim number 99970003 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809
(d) Travis Eaton, claim number 99970004 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532

Sec. 708 2007 c 522 s 712 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO
RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this section are subject to
the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the
law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be
made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 2007, consistent with chapter
41.45 RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial
retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with
chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,400,000))
$51,122,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,600,000))
$97,322,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,600,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,800,000

Sec. 709 2008 c 329 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,618,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,993,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Public Safety and Education Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Water Quality Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Violence Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account--State
Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2008) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
Health Services Account--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000
((Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $640,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,301,000))
$4,661,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations are provided solely for expenditure into the
health care authority administrative account.
(2) To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and
accounts, the office of financial management shall transfer or direct
the transfer of sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or account,
including local funds of state agencies and institutions of higher
education, to the health care authority administrative account in
accordance with LEAP document number C04-2008, dated March 10, 2008.
Agencies and institutions of higher education with local funds will
deposit sufficient money to the health care authority administrative
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION
ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,512,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the capitol building construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $228,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the election account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CLARKE-MCNARY ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2009) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,353,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the Clarke-McNary account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT
Budget Stabilization Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the state general fund.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2009 c 4 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,654,000))
$7,499,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,557,000))
$46,743,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions. Of this amount,
$903,000 is provided solely for the
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6297 (prosecuting attorney salaries).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2008,
the amount provided shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,902,000))
$4,829,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,400,000))
$4,491,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,000))
$47,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat
conservation program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,245,000))
$2,296,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account
Appropriation for the Confederated
Tribes of the Colville Reservation.
This amount is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia River
water delivery). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, this amount
shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,775,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account
Appropriation for the Spokane Tribe
of Indians. This amount is provided
solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6874 (Columbia
River water delivery). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2008, this amount
shall lapse. . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,250,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly
funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,192,000))
$2,352,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation
for harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation
for distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,753,000))
$65,089,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,127,000))
$62,778,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,636,000))
$24,375,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for
liquor excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,397,000))
$55,244,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,148,000))
$69,817,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution;
PROVIDED: That the legislature, in making this
appropriation for distribution under the formula
prescribed in RCW 43.08.290 for the 2007-09
biennium, ratifies and approves the prior
distributions, as certified by the department
of revenue to the state treasurer, made for the
2005-07 biennium from the appropriation in
section 801, chapter 372, Laws of 2006 as amended
by section 1701, chapter 522, Laws of 2007 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,865,000))
$22,679,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation
for distribution to local taxing jurisdictions
to mitigate the unintended revenue redistribution
effect of the sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,980,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($423,077,000))
$.........

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2007 c 522 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,174,000))
$3,050,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803 2007 c 522 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driving Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,449,000))
$2,033,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2007-09 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804 2007 c 522 s 804 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal
grazing fees distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,950,000))
$3,145,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood
control funds distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,000))
$69,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal
forest reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($84,500,000))
$85,201,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,524,000))
$88,415,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 805 2009 c 4 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
State Treasurer's Service Account: For
transfer to the state general fund,
$10,000,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$31,000,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,000,000))
$66,000,000
((Pension Funding Stabilization Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000))
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operations Account:
For transfer to the state general fund on June 30,
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Capital Account:
For transfer to the state general fund on
June 30, 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000,000
After the transfers in this section are made from
the state convention and trade center operations
and capital accounts, these accounts will
have sufficient funds for: (1) A ten million
dollar requirement for the retrofit of the museum
of history and industry; (2) the requirements of
RCW 67.40.040(5) and 67.40.040(6); and (3) a
sufficient capital reserve. After the transfer
is made, the capital reserve may be applicable for
payment of debt service or operating shortfalls.
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the water
quality account, $12,200,000 for fiscal year
2008 and (($12,201,000)) $7,851,000 for fiscal
year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,401,000))
$20,051,000
Education Legacy Trust Account: For transfer
to the student achievement account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,800,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance repayment
account, an amount not to exceed . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000,000))
$24,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the drinking water assistance account,
$7,200,000 for fiscal year 2008 and
$3,600,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,800,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer
to the job development account, $25,000,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $25,000,000 for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to
the oil spill prevention account for
fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer
to the health services account, in an
amount not to exceed the actual amount
of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($168,111,000))
$178,373,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the
life sciences discovery fund, in an amount
not to exceed the actual amount of the
strategic contribution supplemental payment
to the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,000,000))
$64,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the water
quality account, $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2008
and $3,942,500 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,885,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account, $3,466,000
for fiscal year 2008 and $3,466,000 for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,932,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the tobacco
prevention and control account,
$10,523,000 for fiscal year 2008 and (($10,168,000))
$9,601,000 for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,691,000))
$20,124,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline
sales and use tax account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,600,000
((General Fund: For transfer to the health services
account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000,000))
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the
disaster response account for fiscal year 2008 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Public Safety and Education Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Reading Achievement Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, an amount not to exceed the
actual balance of the reading achievement account.
This transfer is intended to liquidate the reading
achievement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,691,000
Family Leave Insurance Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, an amount not to exceed
the actual balance of the family leave insurance
account on the effective date of this section. . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,458,000
Streamline Sales Tax Account: For transfer to the
state general fund on June 30, 2009, an amount not
to exceed the actual balance of the streamline sales
tax account. . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,620,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,204,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,088,000
Pension Funding Stabilization Account: For transfer to the
state general fund on June 30, 2009, an amount not
to exceed the actual balance of the pension funding
stabilization account. This transfer is intended
to liquidate the pension funding stabilization
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,400,000
Judicial Information System Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Natural Resources Equipment Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000
Site Closure Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Employment Training Finance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009. After the
transfer in this section is made, the employment
training finance account shall have a balance of
$175,000 to continue customized training program
activities . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer to the
state general fund for fiscal year 2009, an amount
not to exceed the actual balance of the college
faculty awards trust fund. This transfer is intended
to liquidate the college faculty awards trust
fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
Washington Distinguished Professorship Trust Account:
For transfer to the state general fund for fiscal
year 2009, an amount not to exceed the actual
balance of the Washington distinguished professorship
trust account. This transfer is intended to
liquidate the Washington distinguished professorship
trust account . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal year
2009, an amount not to exceed the actual balance of
the Washington graduate fellowship trust account. This
transfer is intended to liquidate the Washington
graduate fellowship trust account . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Get Ready for Math and Science Scholarship Account: For
transfer to the state general fund for fiscal year
2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000
Health Services Account: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000
Student Achievement Fund: For transfer to the state
general fund for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,000,000
Student Achievement Fund: For transfer to the
education legacy trust account . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,000,000
Oil Spill Response Account: For transfer to the oil
spill prevention account for fiscal year 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 A new section is added to 2007 c 522
(uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED. Nothing in this act
or chapter 5 (ESSB 5460), Laws of 2009 prohibits the expenditure of any
funds by an agency or institution of the state for benefits guaranteed
by any collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date
of chapter 5, Laws of 2009 (February 18, 2009).

Sec. 902 RCW 2.68.020 and 2005 c 282 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information
system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of
providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and
providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary.
The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the
purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and
other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and
administration of information services, telecommunications, systems,
software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal
and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 903 RCW 28B.50.837 and 2003 c 129 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington community and technical college exceptional
faculty awards program is established. The program shall be
administered by the college board. The college faculty awards trust
fund hereby created shall be administered by the state treasurer.
(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the community and
technical college exceptional faculty awards program shall be deposited
in the college faculty awards trust fund. At the request of the
college board, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to
the local endowment fund of the college or its foundation. No
appropriation is necessary for the expenditure of moneys from the fund.
Expenditures from the fund may be used solely for the exceptional
faculty awards program. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the college faculty awards trust fund to
the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the account.

Sec. 904 RCW 28B.67.030 and 2006 c 112 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 shall
be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state
board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures
from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures.
The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances
under the Washington customized employment training program created in
RCW 28B.67.020. The deposit of payments under this section from a
participant shall cease when the board specifies that the participant
has met the monetary obligations of the program. During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the employment
training finance account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW
28B.67.020(4) shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 905 RCW 28B.76.565 and 2004 c 275 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the distinguished
professorship program shall be deposited in the distinguished
professorship trust fund. At the request of the higher education
coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.575, the treasurer shall release
the state matching funds to the designated institution's local
endowment fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the
fund. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the distinguished professorship trust fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
account.

Sec. 906 RCW 28B.76.610 and 2004 c 275 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the graduate fellowship
program shall be deposited in the graduate fellowship trust fund. At
the request of the higher education coordinating board under RCW
28B.76.620, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the
designated institution's local endowment fund. No appropriation is
required for expenditures from the fund. During the 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the graduate fellowship
trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance in the account.

Sec. 907 RCW 28B.105.110 and 2008 c 329 s 908 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all money received for
the GET ready for math and science scholarship program from
appropriations and private sources. The account shall be
self-sustaining.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students and for purchases of GET units. Purchased GET units
shall be owned and held in trust by the board. Expenditures from the
account shall be an equal match of state appropriations and private
funds raised by the program administrator. During the 2007-09 fiscal
biennium, expenditures from the account not to exceed five percent may
be used by the program administrator to carry out the provisions of RCW
28B.105.090.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.
(7) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer state appropriations to the GET ready for math and science
scholarship account that have not been matched by private contributions
to the state general fund.

Sec. 908 RCW 41.45.230 and 2008 c 329 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
The pension funding stabilization account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for payment of state
government employer contributions for members of the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees'
retirement system. During the 2007-09 fiscal biennium, expenditures
from the account may also be used for payment of the retirement and
annuity plans for higher education employees and for transfer into the
general fund. The account may not be used to pay for any new benefit
or for any benefit increase that takes effect after July 1, 2005. An
increase that is provided in accordance with a formula that is in
existence on July 1, 2005, is not considered a benefit increase for
this purpose. Moneys in the account shall be for the exclusive use of
the specified retirement systems and invested by the state investment
board pursuant to RCW 43.33A.030 and 43.33A.170. For purposes of RCW
43.135.035, expenditures from the pension funding stabilization account
shall not be considered a state program cost shift from the state
general fund to another account. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the pension funding stabilization
account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the account.

Sec. 909 RCW 43.30.305 and 2005 c 518 s 928 are each amended to
read as follows:
A revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer, to be known
as the natural resources equipment fund, is hereby created to be
expended by the department without appropriation solely for the
purchase of equipment, machinery, and supplies for the use of the
department and for the payment of the costs of repair and maintenance
of such equipment, machinery, and supplies. During the ((2005-2007))
2007-2009 fiscal biennium the legislature may transfer such amounts as
represent the excess balance of the fund to the state general fund.

Sec. 910 RCW 43.72.900 and 2005 c 518 s 930 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The health services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Subject
to the transfers described in subsection (3) of this section, moneys in
the account may be expended only for maintaining and expanding health
services access for low-income residents, maintaining and expanding the
public health system, maintaining and improving the capacity of the
health care system, containing health care costs, and the regulation,
planning, and administering of the health care system.
(2) Funds deposited into the health services account under RCW
82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) shall be used solely as follows:
(a) Five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2002, and five million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2003, shall be appropriated by the legislature for programs
that effectively improve the health of low-income persons, including
efforts to reduce diseases and illnesses that harm low-income persons.
The department of health shall submit a report to the legislature on
March 1, 2002, evaluating the cost-effectiveness of programs that
improve the health of low-income persons and address diseases and
illnesses that disproportionately affect low-income persons, and making
recommendations to the legislature on which of these programs could
most effectively utilize the funds appropriated under this subsection.
(b) Ten percent of the funds deposited into the health services
account under RCW 82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) remaining after the
appropriation under (a) of this subsection shall be transferred no less
frequently than annually by the treasurer to the tobacco prevention and
control account established by RCW 43.79.480. The funds transferred
shall be used exclusively for implementation of the Washington state
tobacco prevention and control plan and shall be used only to
supplement, and not supplant, funds in the tobacco prevention and
control account as of January 1, 2001, however, these funds may be used
to replace funds appropriated by the legislature for further
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan for the biennium beginning July 1, 2001. For each state fiscal
year beginning on and after July 1, 2002, the legislature shall
appropriate no less than twenty-six million two hundred forty thousand
dollars from the tobacco prevention and control account for
implementation of the Washington state tobacco prevention and control
plan.
(c) Because of its demonstrated effectiveness in improving the
health of low-income persons and addressing illnesses and diseases that
harm low-income persons, the remainder of the funds deposited into the
health services account under RCW 82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) shall be
appropriated solely for Washington basic health plan enrollment as
provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. Funds appropriated under this
subsection may be used to support outreach and enrollment activities
only to the extent necessary to achieve the enrollment goals described
in this section.
(3) Prior to expenditure for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, funds deposited into the health services account
under RCW 82.24.028 ((and 82.26.028)) shall first be transferred to the
following accounts to ensure the continued availability of previously
dedicated revenues for certain existing programs:
(a) To the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520, two million two hundred forty-nine thousand five hundred
dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, four million
two hundred forty-eight thousand dollars for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2002, seven million seven hundred eighty-nine
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2003, six million
nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2005, and six million nine hundred thirty-two thousand dollars
for each biennium thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(2);
(b) To the health services account under this section, nine million
seventy-seven thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July
1, 2001, seventeen million one hundred eighty-eight thousand dollars
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, thirty-one million
seven hundred fifty-five thousand dollars for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2003, twenty-eight million six hundred twenty-two thousand
dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and twenty-eight
million six hundred twenty-two thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.020(3); and
(c) To the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030, two million
two hundred three thousand five hundred dollars for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2001, four million two hundred forty-four
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002,
eight million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2003, seven million eight hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars for the biennium beginning July 1, 2005, and seven
million eight hundred eighty-five thousand dollars for each biennium
thereafter, as required by RCW 82.24.027(((2)(a))).
During the ((2005-2007)) 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the health services account such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account to the state general fund.

Sec. 911 RCW 43.135.045 and 2007 c 520 s 6035 and 2007 c 484 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The student achievement fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(2) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.
(4) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the student achievement fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 912 RCW 43.200.080 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 21 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The director of ecology shall, in addition to the powers and duties
otherwise imposed by law, have the following special powers and duties:
(1) To fulfill the responsibilities of the state under the lease
between the state of Washington and the federal government executed
September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land lying within
the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington. The department of
ecology may sublease to private or public entities all or a portion of
the land for specific purposes or activities which are determined,
after public hearing, to be in agreement with the terms of the lease
and in the best interests of the citizens of the state consistent with
any criteria that may be developed as a requirement by the legislature;
(2) To assume the responsibilities of the state under the perpetual
care agreement between the state of Washington and the federal
government executed July 29, 1965 and the sublease between the state of
Washington and the site operator of the Hanford low-level radioactive
waste disposal facility. In order to finance perpetual surveillance
and maintenance under the agreement and ensure site closure under the
sublease, the department of ecology shall impose and collect fees from
parties holding radioactive materials for waste management purposes.
The fees shall be established by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW
and shall be an amount determined by the department of ecology to be
necessary to defray the estimated liability of the state. Such fees
shall reflect equity between the disposal facilities of this and other
states. A site closure account and a perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account is hereby created in the state treasury. The site
closure account shall be exclusively available to reimburse, to the
extent that moneys are available in the account, the site operator for
its costs plus a reasonable profit as agreed by the operator and the
state, or to reimburse the state licensing agency and any agencies
under contract to the state licensing agency for their costs in final
closure and decommissioning of the Hanford low-level radioactive waste
disposal facility. If a balance remains in the account after
satisfactory performance of closure and decommissioning, this balance
shall be transferred to the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account. The perpetual surveillance and maintenance account shall be
used exclusively by the state to meet post-closure surveillance and
maintenance costs, or for otherwise satisfying surveillance and
maintenance obligations. Appropriations are required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the site closure account
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account. All moneys,
including earnings from the investment of balances in the site closure
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, less the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund, pursuant to RCW
43.08.190 accruing under the authority of this section shall be
directed to the site closure account until December 31, 1992.
Thereafter receipts including earnings from the investment of balances
in the site closure and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, less the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund,
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 shall be directed to the site closure account
and the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account as specified by
the department. Additional moneys specifically appropriated by the
legislature or received from any public or private source may be placed
in the site closure account and the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer up to thirteen million eight hundred thousand
dollars from the site closure account to the general fund;
(3)(a) Subject to the conditions in (b) of this subsection, on July
1, 2008, and each July 1st thereafter, the treasurer shall transfer
from the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account to the site
closure account the sum of nine hundred sixty-six thousand dollars.
The nine hundred sixty-six thousand dollars transferred on July 1,
2009, and thereafter shall be adjusted to a level equal to the
percentage increase in the United States implicit price deflator for
personal consumption. The last transfer under this section shall occur
on July 1, 2033.
(b) The transfer in (a) of this subsection shall occur only if
written agreement is reached between the state department of ecology
and the United States department of energy pursuant to section 6 of the
perpetual care agreement dated July 29, 1965, between the United States
atomic energy commission and the state of Washington. If agreement
cannot be reached between the state department of ecology and the
United States department of energy by June 1, 2008, the treasurer shall
transfer the funds from the general fund to the site closure account
according to the schedule in (a) of this subsection.
(c) If for any reason the Hanford low level radioactive waste
disposal facility is closed to further disposal operations during or
after the 2003-2005 biennium and before 2033, then the amount remaining
to be repaid from the 2003-2005 transfer of thirteen million eight
hundred thousand dollars from the site closure account shall be
transferred by the treasurer from the general fund to the site closure
account to fund the closure and decommissioning of the facility. The
treasurer shall transfer to the site closure account in full the amount
remaining to be repaid upon written notice from the secretary of health
that the department of health has authorized closure or that disposal
operations have ceased. The treasurer shall complete the transfer
within sixty days of written notice from the secretary of health.
(d) To the extent that money in the site closure account together
with the amount of money identified for repayment to the site closure
account, pursuant to (a) through (c) of this subsection, equals or
exceeds the cost estimate approved by the department of health for
closure and decommissioning of the facility, the money in the site
closure account together with the amount of money identified for
repayment to the site closure account shall constitute adequate
financial assurance for purposes of the department of health financial
assurance requirements;
(4) To assure maintenance of such insurance coverage by state
licensees, lessees, or sublessees as will adequately, in the opinion of
the director, protect the citizens of the state against nuclear
accidents or incidents that may occur on privately or state-controlled
nuclear facilities;
(5) To institute a user permit system and issue site use permits,
consistent with regulatory practices, for generators, packagers, or
brokers using the Hanford low-level radioactive waste disposal
facility. The costs of administering the user permit system shall be
borne by the applicants for site use permits. The site use permit fee
shall be set at a level that is sufficient to fund completely the
executive and legislative participation in activities related to the
Northwest Interstate Compact on Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management;
(6) To make application for or otherwise pursue any federal funds
to which the state may be eligible, through the federal resource
conservation and recovery act or any other federal programs, for the
management, treatment or disposal, and any remedial actions, of wastes
that are both radioactive and hazardous at all Hanford low-level
radioactive waste disposal facilities; ((and))
(7) To develop contingency plans for duties and options for the
department and other state agencies related to the Hanford low-level
radioactive waste disposal facility based on various projections of
annual levels of waste disposal. These plans shall include an analysis
of expected revenue to the state in various taxes and funds related to
low-level radioactive waste disposal and the resulting implications
that any increase or decrease in revenue may have on state agency
duties or responsibilities. The plans shall be updated annually;
(8) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the site closure account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 913 RCW 44.04.120 and 1985 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each member of the senate or house of representatives when serving
on official legislative business shall be entitled to receive, in lieu
of per diem or any other payment, for each day or major portion thereof
in which he is actually engaged in legislative business or business of
the committee, commission, or council, notwithstanding any laws to the
contrary, an allowance in an amount fixed by the secretary of the
senate and chief clerk of the house, respectively, in accordance with
applicable rules and resolutions of each body. Such allowance shall be
reasonably calculated to reimburse expenses, exclusive of mileage,
which are ordinary and necessary in the conduct of legislative
business, recognizing cost variances which are encountered in different
locales. The allowance authorized shall not exceed the greater of
forty-four dollars per day or the maximum daily amount determined under
RCW 43.03.050, as now or hereafter amended. In addition, a mileage
allowance shall be paid at the rate per mile provided for in RCW
43.03.060, as now or hereafter amended, when authorized by the house,
committee, commission, or council of which he is a member and on the
business of which he is engaged. Daily expense allowances shall not be
paid to any member of the legislature during any special session of the
legislature in fiscal year 2009.

Sec. 914 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2008 c 329 s 921, 2008 c 329 s 920,
2008 c 329 s 919, and 2008 c 328 s 6009 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; and
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) ((Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(d))) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department
shall partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups.
The department is authorized to use the following additional strategies
in order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local
toxics control accounts shall be allocated only for public
participation grants to persons who may be adversely affected by a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary purpose of these
grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and organizations
in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. ((However, during the 1999-2001
fiscal biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in
lobbying activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their
cumulative grant awards under this section exceed two hundred thousand
dollars.)) No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the local toxics control account to the state toxics
control account and the state general fund such amounts as reflect
excess fund balance in the account.
(9) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay.
(10) During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 915 RCW 71.24.310 and 2006 c 333 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and
this chapter can be most efficiently and effectively implemented as
part of the regional support network defined in RCW 71.24.025. For
this reason, the legislature intends that the department and the
regional support networks shall work together to implement chapter
71.05 RCW as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2006, regional support networks shall recommend to
the department the number of state hospital beds that should be
allocated for use by each regional support network. The statewide
total allocation shall not exceed the number of state hospital beds
offering long-term inpatient care, as defined in this chapter, for
which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act.
(2) If there is consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of state hospital beds that should be allocated
for use by each regional support network, the department shall contract
with each regional support network accordingly.
(3) If there is not consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of beds that should be allocated for use by each
regional support network, the department shall establish by emergency
rule the number of state hospital beds that are available for use by
each regional support network. The emergency rule shall be effective
September 1, 2006. The primary factor used in the allocation shall be
the estimated number of ((acutely and chronically mentally ill)) adults
with acute and chronic mental illness in each regional support network
area, based upon population-adjusted incidence and utilization.
(4) The allocation formula shall be updated at least every three
years to reflect demographic changes, and new evidence regarding the
incidence of acute and chronic mental illness and the need for long-term inpatient care. In the updates, the statewide total allocation
shall include (a) all state hospital beds offering long-term inpatient
care for which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act;
plus (b) the estimated equivalent number of beds or comparable
diversion services contracted in accordance with subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) The department is encouraged to enter performance-based
contracts with regional support networks to provide some or all of the
regional support network's allocated long-term inpatient treatment
capacity in the community, rather than in the state hospital. The
performance contracts shall specify the number of patient days of care
available for use by the regional support network in the state
hospital.
(6) If a regional support network uses more state hospital patient
days of care than it has been allocated under subsection (3) or (4) of
this section, or than it has contracted to use under subsection (5) of
this section, whichever is less, it shall reimburse the department for
that care. The reimbursement rate per day shall be the hospital's
total annual budget for long-term inpatient care, divided by the total
patient days of care assumed in development of that budget.
(7) One-half of any reimbursements received pursuant to subsection
(6) of this section shall be used to support the cost of operating the
state hospital and, during the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, implementing
new services that will enable a regional support network to reduce its
utilization of the state hospital. The department shall distribute the
remaining half of such reimbursements among regional support networks
that have used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of
care at that hospital, proportional to the number of patient days of
care not used.

Sec. 916 RCW 79.105.150 and 2008 c 299 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands
enhancement account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
the excess fund balance of the account.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 917 RCW 82.14.495 and 2007 c 6 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account is created
in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall transfer into the
account from the general fund amounts as directed in RCW 82.14.500.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purpose of
mitigating the negative fiscal impacts to local taxing jurisdictions as
a result of RCW 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of 2007 amendments to
RCW 82.14.020. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the streamlined sales and use tax mitigation account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2008, the state treasurer, as directed by the
department, shall distribute the funds in the streamlined sales and use
tax mitigation account to local taxing jurisdictions in accordance with
RCW 82.14.500.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 82.14.390 and 82.14.500.
(a) "Agreement" means the same as in RCW 82.32.020.
(b) "Local taxing jurisdiction" means counties, cities,
transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045, public facilities
districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57 RCW, public transportation
benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, and regional transit authorities
under chapter 81.112 RCW, that impose a sales and use tax.
(c) "Loss" or "losses" means the local sales and use tax revenue
reduction to a local taxing jurisdiction resulting from the sourcing
provisions in RCW ((82.14.020)) 82.14.490 and the chapter 6, Laws of
2007 amendments to RCW 82.14.020.
(d) "Net loss" or "net losses" means a loss offset by any voluntary
compliance revenue.
(e) "Voluntary compliance revenue" means the local sales tax
revenue gain to each local taxing jurisdiction reported to the
department from persons registering through the central registration
system authorized under the agreement.
(f) "Working day" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.45.180.

Sec. 918 RCW 90.56.500 and 1991 c 200 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the incidence of oil spills has
declined due to increased oil spill prevention efforts. This has
reduced the costs associated with oil spill response, clean up and
restoration. Increasing the investment in oil spill prevention will
further reduce the need for expenditures from the account established
in subsection (2) of this section. During the 2007-2009 fiscal
biennium it is therefore prudent to allow transfers of fees collected
under RCW 82.23B.020(1) from the account established in subsection (2)
of this section to the oil spill prevention account established under
90.56.510.
(2) The state oil spill response account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from RCW 82.23B.020(1) shall be deposited in
the account. All costs reimbursed to the state by a responsible party
or any other person for responding to a spill of oil shall also be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be spent only
after appropriation. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW. The account shall be used exclusively to pay
for the costs associated with the response to spills of crude oil or
petroleum products into the navigable waters of the state. Payment of
response costs under this section shall be limited to spills which the
director has determined are likely to exceed fifty thousand dollars.
Before expending moneys from the account, the director shall make
reasonable efforts to obtain funding for response costs from the person
responsible for the spill and from other sources, including the federal
government. Reimbursement for response costs shall be allowed only for
costs which are not covered by funds appropriated to the agencies
responsible for response activities. Costs associated with the
response to spills of crude oil or petroleum products shall include:
(((1))) (a) Natural resource damage assessment and related
activities;
(((2))) (b) Spill related response, containment, wildlife rescue,
cleanup, disposal, and associated costs;
(((3))) (c) Interagency coordination and public information related
to a response; and
(((4))) (d) Appropriate travel, goods and services, contracts, and
equipment.
During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state oil spill response account to the state oil spill
prevention account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 920 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 213
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 221
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 231
OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 67
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 218
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 215
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 233
CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 232
CLARKE-MCNARY ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 233
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 229
FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 229
HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 231
HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 232
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 128
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 149
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 225
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 226
STATE TREASURER
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 227, 228
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 236
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 237
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 236
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 234
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 238
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 230
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 200
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 204
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 226
--- END ---