BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
HEALTH SERVICES ACCOUNT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 43.72.900 (Health services account) and
2005 c 518 s 930, 2003 c 259 s 1, 2002 c 371 s 909, 2002 c 2 s 2, &
1993 c 492 s 469 are each repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.068 and 2005 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The authority may participate as an employer-sponsored program
established in section 1860D-22 of the medicare prescription drug,
improvement, and modernization act of 2003, P.L. 108-173 et seq., to
receive federal employer subsidy funds for continuing to provide
retired employee health coverage, including a pharmacy benefit. The
administrator, in consultation with the office of financial management,
shall evaluate participation in the employer incentive program,
including but not limited to any necessary program changes to meet the
eligibility requirements that employer-sponsored retiree health
coverage provide prescription drug coverage at least equal to the
actuarial value of standard prescription drug coverage under medicare
part D. Any employer subsidy moneys received from participation in the
federal employer incentive program shall be deposited in the ((health
services account established in RCW 43.72.900)) state general fund.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.41.260 and 1995 c 265 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
The health care authority, the office of financial management, and
the department of social and health services shall together monitor the
enrollee level in the basic health plan and the medicaid caseload of
children ((funded from the health services account)). The office of
financial management shall adjust the funding levels by interagency
reimbursement of funds between the basic health plan and medicaid and
adjust the funding levels between the health care authority and the
medical assistance administration of the department of social and
health services to maximize combined enrollment.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79.480 and 2005 c 424 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
((transferred to the health services account for the purposes set forth
in RCW 43.72.900, and)) appropriated for transfer to the tobacco
prevention and control account for purposes set forth in this section.
The legislature shall transfer amounts received as strategic
contribution payments as defined in RCW 43.350.010 to the life sciences
discovery fund created in RCW 43.350.070.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.84.092 and 2008 c 128 s 19 and 2008 c 106 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the essential rail assistance
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, ((the health services account,)) the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the safety and education account, the site closure account,
the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.14.0201 and 2005 c 405 s 1, 2005 c 223 s 6, and
2005 c 7 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxpayer" means a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(2) Each taxpayer shall pay a tax on or before the first day of
March of each year to the state treasurer through the insurance
commissioner's office. The tax shall be equal to the total amount of
all premiums and prepayments for health care services received by the
taxpayer during the preceding calendar year multiplied by the rate of
two percent.
(3) Taxpayers shall prepay their tax obligations under this
section. The minimum amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of
the taxpayer's tax obligation for the preceding calendar year
recomputed using the rate in effect for the current year. For the
prepayment of taxes due during the first calendar year, the minimum
amount of the prepayments shall be percentages of the taxpayer's tax
obligation that would have been due had the tax been in effect during
the previous calendar year. The tax prepayments shall be paid to the
state treasurer through the commissioner's office by the due dates and
in the following amounts:
(a) On or before June 15, forty-five percent;
(b) On or before September 15, twenty-five percent;
(c) On or before December 15, twenty-five percent.
(4) For good cause demonstrated in writing, the commissioner may
approve an amount smaller than the preceding calendar year's tax
obligation as recomputed for calculating the health maintenance
organization's, health care service contractor's, self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangement's, or certified health plan's prepayment
obligations for the current tax year.
(5) Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the
general fund ((through March 31, 1996, and in the health services
account under RCW 43.72.900 after March 31, 1996)).
(6) The taxes imposed in this section do not apply to:
(a) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the United States or any
instrumentality thereof as prepayments for health care services
provided under Title XVIII (medicare) of the federal social security
act.
(b) Amounts received by any taxpayer from the state of Washington
as prepayments for health care services provided under:
(i) The medical care services program as provided in RCW 74.09.035;
(ii) The Washington basic health plan on behalf of subsidized
enrollees as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW; or
(iii) The medicaid program on behalf of elderly or ((disabled))
clients with disabilities as provided in chapter 74.09 RCW when these
prepayments are received prior to July 1, 2009, and are associated with
a managed care contract program that has been implemented on a
voluntary demonstration or pilot project basis.
(c) Amounts received by any health care service contractor, as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, as prepayments for health care services
included within the definition of practice of dentistry under RCW
18.32.020.
(d) Participant contributions to self-funded multiple employer
welfare arrangements that are not taxable in this state.
(7) Beginning January 1, 2000, the state does hereby preempt the
field of imposing excise or privilege taxes upon taxpayers and no
county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision shall have the right
to impose any such taxes upon such taxpayers. This subsection shall be
limited to premiums and payments for health benefit plans offered by
health care service contractors under chapter 48.44 RCW, health
maintenance organizations under chapter 48.46 RCW, and self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
The preemption authorized by this subsection shall not impair the
ability of a county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision to
impose excise or privilege taxes upon the health care services directly
delivered by the employees of a health maintenance organization under
chapter 48.46 RCW.
(8)(a) The taxes imposed by this section apply to a self-funded
multiple employer welfare arrangement only in the event that they are
not preempted by the employee retirement income security act of 1974,
as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq. The arrangements and the
commissioner shall initially request an advisory opinion from the
United States department of labor or obtain a declaratory ruling from
a federal court on the legality of imposing state premium taxes on
these arrangements. Once the legality of the taxes has been
determined, the multiple employer welfare arrangement certified by the
insurance commissioner must begin payment of these taxes.
(b) If there has not been a final determination of the legality of
these taxes, then beginning on the earlier of (i) the date the fourth
multiple employer welfare arrangement has been certified by the
insurance commissioner, or (ii) April 1, 2006, the arrangement shall
deposit the taxes imposed by this section into an interest bearing
escrow account maintained by the arrangement. Upon a final
determination that the taxes are not preempted by the employee
retirement income security act of 1974, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001
et seq., all funds in the interest bearing escrow account shall be
transferred to the state treasurer.
(9) The effect of transferring contracts for health care services
from one taxpayer to another taxpayer is to transfer the tax prepayment
obligation with respect to the contracts.
(10) On or before June 1st of each year, the commissioner shall
notify each taxpayer required to make prepayments in that year of the
amount of each prepayment and shall provide remittance forms to be used
by the taxpayer. However, a taxpayer's responsibility to make
prepayments is not affected by failure of the commissioner to send, or
the taxpayer to receive, the notice or forms.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.05.125 and 1998 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county public health account is created in the state
treasury. Funds deposited in the county public health account shall be
distributed by the state treasurer to each local public health
jurisdiction based upon amounts certified to it by the department of
community, trade, and economic development in consultation with the
Washington state association of counties. The account shall include
funds distributed under RCW ((82.44.110 and)) 82.14.200(8) and such
funds as are appropriated to the account from ((the health services
account under RCW 43.72.900,)) the public health services account under
RCW 43.72.902((,)) and such other funds as the legislature may
appropriate to it.
(2)(a) The director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall certify the amounts to be distributed to
each local public health jurisdiction using 1995 as the base year of
actual city contributions to local public health.
(b) Only if funds are available and in an amount no greater than
available funds under RCW 82.14.200(8), the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall adjust the amount certified under
(a) of this subsection to compensate for any annexation of an area with
fifty thousand residents or more to any city as a result of a petition
during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for any city that became newly
incorporated as a result of an election during calendar year 1994 or
1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the amount which
otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to the
annexation or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995
funding formula.
(c) The county treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city
contribution to the department. Funds in excess of the base shall be
distributed proportionately among the health jurisdictions based on
incorporated population figures as last determined by the office of
financial management.
(3) Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended
exclusively for local public health purposes.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.47.015 and 2008 c 217 s 99 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the basic health plan has been an
effective program in providing health coverage for uninsured residents.
Further, since 1993, substantial amounts of public funds have been
allocated for subsidized basic health plan enrollment.
(2) ((It is the intent of the legislature that the basic health
plan enrollment be expanded expeditiously, consistent with funds
available in the health services account, with the goal of two hundred
thousand adult subsidized basic health plan enrollees and one hundred
thirty thousand children covered through expanded medical assistance
services by June 30, 1997, with the priority of providing needed health
services to children in conjunction with other public programs.
(3))) Effective January 1, 1996, basic health plan enrollees whose
income is less than one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal
poverty level shall pay at least a ten-dollar premium share.
(((4))) (3) No later than July 1, 1996, the administrator shall
implement procedures whereby hospitals licensed under chapters 70.41
and 71.12 RCW, health carrier, rural health care facilities regulated
under chapter 70.175 RCW, and community and migrant health centers
funded under RCW 41.05.220, may expeditiously assist patients and their
families in applying for basic health plan or medical assistance
coverage, and in submitting such applications directly to the health
care authority or the department of social and health services. The
health care authority and the department of social and health services
shall make every effort to simplify and expedite the application and
enrollment process.
(((5))) (4) No later than July 1, 1996, the administrator shall
implement procedures whereby disability insurance producers, licensed
under chapter 48.17 RCW, may expeditiously assist patients and their
families in applying for basic health plan or medical assistance
coverage, and in submitting such applications directly to the health
care authority or the department of social and health services.
Insurance producers may receive a commission for each individual sale
of the basic health plan to anyone not signed up within the previous
five years and a commission for each group sale of the basic health
plan, if funding for this purpose is provided in a specific
appropriation to the health care authority. No commission shall be
provided upon a renewal. Commissions shall be determined based on the
estimated annual cost of the basic health plan, however, commissions
shall not result in a reduction in the premium amount paid to health
carriers. For purposes of this section "health carrier" is as defined
in RCW 48.43.005. The administrator may establish: (a) Minimum
educational requirements that must be completed by the insurance
producers; (b) an appointment process for insurance producers marketing
the basic health plan; or (c) standards for revocation of the
appointment of an insurance producer to submit applications for cause,
including untrustworthy or incompetent conduct or harm to the public.
The health care authority and the department of social and health
services shall make every effort to simplify and expedite the
application and enrollment process.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.09.053 and 2006 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services, in coordination
with the health care authority, shall by November 15th of each year
report to the legislature:
(a) The number of medical assistance recipients who: (i) Upon
enrollment or recertification had reported being employed, and
beginning with the 2008 report, the month and year they reported being
hired; or (ii) upon enrollment or recertification had reported being
the dependent of someone who was employed, and beginning with the 2008
report, the month and year they reported the employed person was hired.
For recipients identified under (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, the
department shall report the basis for their medical assistance
eligibility, including but not limited to family medical coverage,
transitional medical assistance, children's medical or aged or disabled
coverage; member months; and the total cost to the state for these
recipients, expressed as general fund-state((, health services
account)) and general fund-federal dollars. The information shall be
reported by employer (([size])) size for employers having more than
fifty employees as recipients or with dependents as recipients. This
information shall be provided for the preceding January and June of
that year.
(b) The following aggregated information: (i) The number of
employees who are recipients or with dependents as recipients by
private and governmental employers; (ii) the number of employees who
are recipients or with dependents as recipients by employer size for
employers with fifty or fewer employees, fifty-one to one hundred
employees, one hundred one to one thousand employees, one thousand one
to five thousand employees and more than five thousand employees; and
(iii) the number of employees who are recipients or with dependents as
recipients by industry type.
(([(2)])) (2) For each aggregated classification, the report will
include the number of hours worked, the number of department of social
and health services covered lives, and the total cost to the state for
these recipients. This information shall be for each quarter of the
preceding year.

Sec. 10 RCW 82.04.260 and 2008 c 296 s 1, 2008 c 217 s 100, and
2008 c 81 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities shall be equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the ((health services account created under RCW
43.72.900)) state general fund.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall, in the case of manufacturers, be equal
to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of
sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for
hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured and
the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case
of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business shall, in the case of extractors, be equal to the value of
products, including byproducts, extracted, or in the case of extractors
for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of products, including byproducts,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent
from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 11 RCW 82.24.028 and 2008 c 86 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three cents per
cigarette. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the ((health services account
created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month)) state general fund.

VIOLENCE REDUCTION AND DRUG ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 RCW 69.50.520 (Violence reduction and drug
enforcement account) and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 s 1107, 2005 c
514 s 202, 2004 c 276 s 912, 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 930, & 2002 c 371 s
920 are each repealed.

Sec. 13 RCW 9.41.110 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 416 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or
transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or
otherwise transfer, any pistol without being licensed as provided in
this section.
(2) No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or
transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or
otherwise transfer, any firearm other than a pistol without being
licensed as provided in this section.
(3) No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or
transfer, or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or
otherwise transfer, any ammunition without being licensed as provided
in this section.
(4) The duly constituted licensing authorities of any city, town,
or political subdivision of this state shall grant licenses in forms
prescribed by the director of licensing effective for not more than one
year from the date of issue permitting the licensee to sell firearms
within this state subject to the following conditions, for breach of
any of which the license shall be forfeited and the licensee subject to
punishment as provided in RCW 9.41.010 through 9.41.810. A licensing
authority shall forward a copy of each license granted to the
department of licensing. The department of licensing shall notify the
department of revenue of the name and address of each dealer licensed
under this section.
(5)(a) A licensing authority shall, within thirty days after the
filing of an application of any person for a dealer's license,
determine whether to grant the license. However, if the applicant does
not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington
state identification card, or has not been a resident of the state for
the previous consecutive ninety days, the licensing authority shall
have up to sixty days to determine whether to issue a license. No
person shall qualify for a license under this section without first
receiving a federal firearms license and undergoing fingerprinting and
a background check. In addition, no person ineligible to possess a
firearm under RCW 9.41.040 or ineligible for a concealed pistol license
under RCW 9.41.070 shall qualify for a dealer's license.
(b) A dealer shall require every employee who may sell a firearm in
the course of his or her employment to undergo fingerprinting and a
background check. An employee must be eligible to possess a firearm,
and must not have been convicted of a crime that would make the person
ineligible for a concealed pistol license, before being permitted to
sell a firearm. Every employee shall comply with requirements
concerning purchase applications and restrictions on delivery of
pistols that are applicable to dealers.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, the
business shall be carried on only in the building designated in the
license. For the purpose of this section, advertising firearms for
sale shall not be considered the carrying on of business.
(b) A dealer may conduct business temporarily at a location other
than the building designated in the license, if the temporary location
is within Washington state and is the location of a gun show sponsored
by a national, state, or local organization, or an affiliate of any
such organization, devoted to the collection, competitive use, or other
sporting use of firearms in the community. Nothing in this subsection
(6)(b) authorizes a dealer to conduct business in or from a motorized
or towed vehicle.
In conducting business temporarily at a location other than the
building designated in the license, the dealer shall comply with all
other requirements imposed on dealers by RCW 9.41.090, 9.41.100, and
9.41.110. The license of a dealer who fails to comply with the
requirements of RCW 9.41.080 and 9.41.090 and subsection (8) of this
section while conducting business at a temporary location shall be
revoked, and the dealer shall be permanently ineligible for a dealer's
license.
(7) The license or a copy thereof, certified by the issuing
authority, shall be displayed on the premises in the area where
firearms are sold, or at the temporary location, where it can easily be
read.
(8)(a) No pistol may be sold: (i) In violation of any provisions
of RCW 9.41.010 through 9.41.810; nor (ii) may a pistol be sold under
any circumstances unless the purchaser is personally known to the
dealer or shall present clear evidence of his or her identity.
(b) A dealer who sells or delivers any firearm in violation of RCW
9.41.080 is guilty of a class C felony. In addition to any other
penalty provided for by law, the dealer is subject to mandatory
permanent revocation of his or her dealer's license and permanent
ineligibility for a dealer's license.
(c) The license fee for pistols shall be one hundred twenty-five
dollars. The license fee for firearms other than pistols shall be one
hundred twenty-five dollars. The license fee for ammunition shall be
one hundred twenty-five dollars. Any dealer who obtains any license
under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section may also obtain the
remaining licenses without payment of any fee. The fees received under
this section shall be deposited in the ((account under RCW 69.50.520))
state general fund.
(9)(a) A true record in triplicate shall be made of every pistol
sold, in a book kept for the purpose, the form of which may be
prescribed by the director of licensing and shall be personally signed
by the purchaser and by the person effecting the sale, each in the
presence of the other, and shall contain the date of sale, the caliber,
make, model and manufacturer's number of the weapon, the name, address,
occupation, and place of birth of the purchaser and a statement signed
by the purchaser that he or she is not ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to
possess a firearm.
(b) One copy shall within six hours be sent by certified mail to
the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of
which the purchaser is a resident; the duplicate the dealer shall
within seven days send to the director of licensing; the triplicate the
dealer shall retain for six years.
(10) Subsections (2) through (9) of this section shall not apply to
sales at wholesale.
(11) The dealer's licenses authorized to be issued by this section
are general licenses covering all sales by the licensee within the
effective period of the licenses. The department shall provide a
single application form for dealer's licenses and a single license form
which shall indicate the type or types of licenses granted.
(12) Except as provided in RCW 9.41.090, every city, town, and
political subdivision of this state is prohibited from requiring the
purchaser to secure a permit to purchase or from requiring the dealer
to secure an individual permit for each sale.

Sec. 14 RCW 69.50.505 and 2008 c 6 s 631 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no
property right exists in them:
(a) All controlled substances which have been manufactured,
distributed, dispensed, acquired, or possessed in violation of this
chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, and all hazardous chemicals, as
defined in RCW 64.44.010, used or intended to be used in the
manufacture of controlled substances;
(b) All raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind which
are used, or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding,
processing, delivering, importing, or exporting any controlled
substance in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;
(c) All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container
for property described in (a) or (b) of this subsection;
(d) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels,
which are used, or intended for use, in any manner to facilitate the
sale, delivery, or receipt of property described in (a) or (b) of this
subsection, except that:
(i) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture
under this section unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy to a violation
of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW;
(ii) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have
been committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or consent;
(iii) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section if
used in the receipt of only an amount of marijuana for which possession
constitutes a misdemeanor under RCW 69.50.4014;
(iv) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission; and
(v) When the owner of a conveyance has been arrested under this
chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW the conveyance in which the
person is arrested may not be subject to forfeiture unless it is seized
or process is issued for its seizure within ten days of the owner's
arrest;
(e) All books, records, and research products and materials,
including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or
intended for use, in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or
69.52 RCW;
(f) All drug paraphernalia;
(g) All moneys, negotiable instruments, securities, or other
tangible or intangible property of value furnished or intended to be
furnished by any person in exchange for a controlled substance in
violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW, all tangible
or intangible personal property, proceeds, or assets acquired in whole
or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
and all moneys, negotiable instruments, and securities used or intended
to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41
or 69.52 RCW. A forfeiture of money, negotiable instruments,
securities, or other tangible or intangible property encumbered by a
bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured
party if, at the time the security interest was created, the secured
party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
No personal property may be forfeited under this subsection (1)(g), to
the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or
omission which that owner establishes was committed or omitted without
the owner's knowledge or consent; and
(h) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in
the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or
improvements which are being used with the knowledge of the owner for
the manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivery, importing, or
exporting of any controlled substance, or which have been acquired in
whole or in part with proceeds traceable to an exchange or series of
exchanges in violation of this chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW,
if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial
nexus exists between the commercial production or sale of the
controlled substance and the real property. However:
(i) No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection
(1)(h), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act
or omission committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent;
(ii) The bona fide gift of a controlled substance, legend drug, or
imitation controlled substance shall not result in the forfeiture of
real property;
(iii) The possession of marijuana shall not result in the
forfeiture of real property unless the marijuana is possessed for
commercial purposes, the amount possessed is five or more plants or one
pound or more of marijuana, and a substantial nexus exists between the
possession of marijuana and the real property. In such a case, the
intent of the offender shall be determined by the preponderance of the
evidence, including the offender's prior criminal history, the amount
of marijuana possessed by the offender, the sophistication of the
activity or equipment used by the offender, and other evidence which
demonstrates the offender's intent to engage in commercial activity;
(iv) The unlawful sale of marijuana or a legend drug shall not
result in the forfeiture of real property unless the sale was forty
grams or more in the case of marijuana or one hundred dollars or more
in the case of a legend drug, and a substantial nexus exists between
the unlawful sale and the real property; and
(v) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide
security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the secured party, at the time the security interest was created,
neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.
(2) Real or personal property subject to forfeiture under this
chapter may be seized by any board inspector or law enforcement officer
of this state upon process issued by any superior court having
jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property shall include
the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property
seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise
conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of
forfeiture is entered, whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real
property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to
any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu
of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of personal property
without process may be made if:
(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search
warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture
proceeding based upon this chapter;
(c) A board inspector or law enforcement officer has probable cause
to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to
health or safety; or
(d) The board inspector or law enforcement officer has probable
cause to believe that the property was used or is intended to be used
in violation of this chapter.
(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the
seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure
was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following
the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in
charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest
therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and
intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of
seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil
procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with
respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted
service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been
made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the
state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is
incarcerated within the state. Notice of seizure in the case of
property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by
filing a financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or
a certificate of title, shall be made by service upon the secured party
or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing
statement or the certificate of title. The notice of seizure in other
cases may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule
including but not limited to service by certified mail with return
receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon
mailing within the fifteen day period following the seizure.
(4) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in subsection (1)(d), (g), or (h) of this section
within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property
and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized shall be
deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of
a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed a violation giving
rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person
did not participate in the violation.
(5) If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in
writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of
items specified in subsection (1)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h)
of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of
personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the
person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be
heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief
law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law
enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a
state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be
before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an
administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that
any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court
of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter involving personal
property may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil
procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process
against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that
operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in
accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after
the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement
agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The
court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court
when the aggregate value of personal property is within the
jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the
seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW.
In all cases, the burden of proof is upon the law enforcement agency to
establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the property is
subject to forfeiture.
The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the
article or articles to the claimant upon a determination by the
administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present
lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession thereof of items
specified in subsection (1)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of this
section.
(6) In any proceeding to forfeit property under this title, where
the claimant substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees reasonably incurred by the claimant. In
addition, in a court hearing between two or more claimants to the
article or articles involved, the prevailing party is entitled to a
judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(7) When property is forfeited under this chapter the board or
seizing law enforcement agency may:
(a) Retain it for official use or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of this state release such property to such agency
for the exclusive use of enforcing the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and
which is not harmful to the public;
(c) Request the appropriate sheriff or director of public safety to
take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in
accordance with law; or
(d) Forward it to the drug enforcement administration for
disposition.
(8)(a) When property is forfeited, the seizing agency shall keep a
record indicating the identity of the prior owner, if known, a
description of the property, the disposition of the property, the value
of the property at the time of seizure, and the amount of proceeds
realized from disposition of the property.
(b) Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property
for at least seven years.
(c) Each seizing agency shall file a report including a copy of the
records of forfeited property with the state treasurer each calendar
quarter.
(d) The quarterly report need not include a record of forfeited
property that is still being held for use as evidence during the
investigation or prosecution of a case or during the appeal from a
conviction.
(9)(a) By January 31st of each year, each seizing agency shall
remit to the state treasurer an amount equal to ten percent of the net
proceeds of any property forfeited during the preceding calendar year.
Money remitted shall be deposited in the ((violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520)) state general fund.
(b) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the
forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of
satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is
subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after
deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions
paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid
landlord's claim for damages under subsection (15) of this section.
(c) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The
value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the
property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference
to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the
department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing
agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to
determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the
value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal.
The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal
property is zero.
(10) Forfeited property and net proceeds not required to be paid to
the state treasurer shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement
agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of controlled
substances related law enforcement activity. Money retained under this
section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.
(11) Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, III, IV, and
V that are possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in
violation of this chapter are contraband and shall be seized and
summarily forfeited to the state. Controlled substances listed in
Schedule I, II, III, IV, and V, which are seized or come into the
possession of the board, the owners of which are unknown, are
contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the board.
(12) Species of plants from which controlled substances in
Schedules I and II may be derived which have been planted or cultivated
in violation of this chapter, or of which the owners or cultivators are
unknown, or which are wild growths, may be seized and summarily
forfeited to the board.
(13) The failure, upon demand by a board inspector or law
enforcement officer, of the person in occupancy or in control of land
or premises upon which the species of plants are growing or being
stored to produce an appropriate registration or proof that he or she
is the holder thereof constitutes authority for the seizure and
forfeiture of the plants.
(14) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the
court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county
in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real
property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court
rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the
county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is
located.
(15) A landlord may assert a claim against proceeds from the sale
of assets seized and forfeited under subsection (7)(b) of this section,
only if:
(a) A law enforcement officer, while acting in his or her official
capacity, directly caused damage to the complaining landlord's property
while executing a search of a tenant's residence; and
(b) The landlord has applied any funds remaining in the tenant's
deposit, to which the landlord has a right under chapter 59.18 RCW, to
cover the damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer prior to
asserting a claim under the provisions of this section;
(i) Only if the funds applied under (b) of this subsection are
insufficient to satisfy the damage directly caused by a law enforcement
officer, may the landlord seek compensation for the damage by filing a
claim against the governmental entity under whose authority the law
enforcement agency operates within thirty days after the search;
(ii) Only if the governmental entity denies or fails to respond to
the landlord's claim within sixty days of the date of filing, may the
landlord collect damages under this subsection by filing within thirty
days of denial or the expiration of the sixty-day period, whichever
occurs first, a claim with the seizing law enforcement agency. The
seizing law enforcement agency must notify the landlord of the status
of the claim by the end of the thirty-day period. Nothing in this
section requires the claim to be paid by the end of the sixty-day or
thirty-day period.
(c) For any claim filed under (b) of this subsection, the law
enforcement agency shall pay the claim unless the agency provides
substantial proof that the landlord either:
(i) Knew or consented to actions of the tenant in violation of this
chapter or chapter 69.41 or 69.52 RCW; or
(ii) Failed to respond to a notification of the illegal activity,
provided by a law enforcement agency under RCW 59.18.075, within seven
days of receipt of notification of the illegal activity.
(16) The landlord's claim for damages under subsection (15) of this
section may not include a claim for loss of business and is limited to:
(a) Damage to tangible property and clean-up costs;
(b) The lesser of the cost of repair or fair market value of the
damage directly caused by a law enforcement officer;
(c) The proceeds from the sale of the specific tenant's property
seized and forfeited under subsection (7)(b) of this section; and
(d) The proceeds available after the seizing law enforcement agency
satisfies any bona fide security interest in the tenant's property and
costs related to sale of the tenant's property as provided by
subsection (9)(b) of this section.
(17) Subsections (15) and (16) of this section do not limit any
other rights a landlord may have against a tenant to collect for
damages. However, if a law enforcement agency satisfies a landlord's
claim under subsection (15) of this section, the rights the landlord
has against the tenant for damages directly caused by a law enforcement
officer under the terms of the landlord and tenant's contract are
subrogated to the law enforcement agency.

Sec. 15 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2008 c 329 s 918 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; and (c) during the
2007-2009 biennium, operation of the integrated crisis response and
intensive case management pilots contracted with the department of
social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, and each
biennium thereafter until June 30, 2009, the state treasurer shall
transfer two million nine hundred eighty-four thousand dollars from the
general fund into the violence reduction and drug enforcement account,
divided into eight quarterly payments. The amounts transferred
pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) shall be used solely for providing
drug and alcohol treatment services to offenders confined in a state
correctional facility who are assessed with an addiction or a substance
abuse problem that if not treated would result in addiction.
(c) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(c) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(c) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the sentencing guidelines commission, the Washington state
association of counties, the Washington state association of drug court
professionals, the superior court judges' association, the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the criminal
defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment providers,
and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary, shall
establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to
counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County
or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must
be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090 and treatment support services.
No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under subsections
(4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of counties
participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for treatment
support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).

Sec. 16 RCW 70.190.010 and 1996 c 132 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Administrative costs" means the costs associated with
procurement; payroll processing; personnel functions; management;
maintenance and operation of space and property; data processing and
computer services; accounting; budgeting; auditing; indirect costs; and
organizational planning, consultation, coordination, and training.
(2) "Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.
(3) "At-risk" children are children who engage in or are victims of
at-risk behaviors.
(4) "At-risk behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen
substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide
attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic
violence.
(5) "Community public health and safety networks" or "networks"
means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.
(6) "Comprehensive plan" means a two-year plan that examines
available resources and unmet needs for a county or multicounty area,
barriers that limit the effective use of resources, and a plan to
address these issues that is broadly supported by local residents.
(7) "Participating state agencies" means the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the department of social and
health services, the department of health, the employment security
department, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, and such other departments as may be specifically
designated by the governor.
(8) "Family policy council" or "council" means the superintendent
of public instruction, the secretary of social and health services, the
secretary of health, the commissioner of the employment security
department, and the director of the department of community, trade, and
economic development or their designees, one legislator from each
caucus of the senate and house of representatives, and one
representative of the governor.
(9) "Fiduciary interest" means (a) the right to compensation from
a health, educational, social service, or justice system organization
that receives public funds, or (b) budgetary or policy-making authority
for an organization listed in (a) of this subsection. A person who
acts solely in an advisory capacity and receives no compensation from
a health, educational, social service, or justice system organization,
and who has no budgetary or policy-making authority is deemed to have
no fiduciary interest in the organization.
(10) "Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and measurable
outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of at-risk
children and youth through reducing risk factors and increasing
protective factors.
(11) "Matching funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five
percent of the amount budgeted for a network. The network's matching
funds may be in-kind goods and services. Funding sources allowable for
match include appropriate federal or local levy funds, private
charitable funding, and other charitable giving. Basic education funds
shall not be used as a match. ((State general funds shall not be used
as a match for violence reduction and drug enforcement account funds
created under RCW 69.50.520.))
(12) "Policy development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.70.010.
(13) "Protective factors" means those factors determined by the
department of health to be empirically associated with behaviors that
contribute to socially acceptable and healthy nonviolent behaviors.
Protective factors include promulgation, identification, and acceptance
of community norms regarding appropriate behaviors in the area of
delinquency, early sexual activity, alcohol and substance abuse,
educational opportunities, employment opportunities, and absence of
crime.
(14) "Risk factors" means those factors determined by the
department of health to be empirically associated with at-risk
behaviors that contribute to violence.

Sec. 17 RCW 70.190.100 and 1998 c 245 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
The family policy council shall:
(1) Establish network boundaries no later than July 1, 1994. There
is a presumption that no county may be divided between two or more
community networks and no network shall have fewer than forty thousand
population. When approving multicounty networks, considering dividing
a county between networks, or creating a network with a population of
less than forty thousand, the council must consider: (a) Common
economic, geographic, and social interests; (b) historical and existing
shared governance; and (c) the size and location of population centers.
Individuals and groups within any area shall be given ample opportunity
to propose network boundaries in a manner designed to assure full
consideration of their expressed wishes;
(2) Develop a technical assistance and training program to assist
communities in creating and developing community networks and
comprehensive plans;
(3) Approve the structure, purpose, goals, plan, and performance
measurements of each community network;
(4) Identify all prevention and early intervention programs and
funds, including all programs ((funded under RCW 69.50.520, in addition
to the programs)) set forth in RCW 70.190.110, which could be
transferred, in all or part, to the community networks, and report
their findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature
regarding any appropriate program transfers by January 1 of each year;
(5) Reward community networks that show exceptional success as
provided in RCW 43.41.195;
(6) Seek every opportunity to maximize federal and other funding
that is consistent with the plans approved by the council for the
purpose and goals of this chapter;
(7) Review the state-funded out-of-home placement rate before the
end of each contract to determine whether the region has sufficiently
reduced the rate. If the council determines that there has not been a
sufficient reduction in the rate, it may reduce the immediately
succeeding grant to the network;
(8)(a) The council shall monitor the implementation of programs
contracted by participating state agencies by reviewing periodic
reports on the extent to which services were delivered to intended
populations, the quality of services, and the extent to which service
outcomes were achieved at the conclusion of service interventions.
This monitoring shall include provision for periodic feedback to
community networks;
(b) The legislature intends that this monitoring be used by the
Washington state institute for public policy, together with public
health data on at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors, to
produce an external evaluation of the effectiveness of the networks and
their programs. For this reason, and to conserve public funds, the
council shall not conduct or contract for the conduct of control group
studies, quasi-experimental design studies, or other analysis efforts
to attempt to determine the impact of network programs on at-risk
behaviors or risk and protective factors; and
(9) Review the implementation of chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.
The report shall use measurable performance standards to evaluate the
implementation.

Sec. 18 RCW 82.64.020 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 906 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A tax is imposed on each sale at wholesale of syrup in this
state. The rate of the tax shall be equal to one dollar per gallon.
Fractional amounts shall be taxed proportionally.
(2) A tax is imposed on each sale at retail of syrup in this state.
The rate of the tax shall be equal to the rate imposed under subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) Moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
((violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520))
state general fund.
(4) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the taxes imposed in this chapter.
The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the taxes imposed in
this chapter.

WATER QUALITY ACCOUNT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.146.030 (Water quality account -- Progress report) and
2007 c 522 s 955; and
(2) RCW 70.146.080 (Determination of tax receipts in water quality
account -- Transfer of sufficient moneys from general revenues) and 2007
c 522 s 956, 2005 c 518 s 941, 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 935, 1994 sp.s. c
6 s 902, 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 924, 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 923, & 1986 c 3 s 11.

Sec. 20 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2006 c 285 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of this
section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the time periods specified in subsection (4) of
this section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be
combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the time
periods specified in subsection (4) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsections (5) and (8) of this section.
Amendments may be considered more frequently than once per year under
the following circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan that does not modify the
comprehensive plan policies and designations applicable to the subarea;
(ii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iii) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget;
(iv) Until June 30, 2006, the designation of recreational lands
under RCW 36.70A.1701. A county amending its comprehensive plan
pursuant to this subsection (2)(a)(iv) may not do so more frequently
than every eighteen months; and
(v) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to
enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.031(2), provided that
amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation
program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a)
and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan
update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to
comment.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) The department shall establish a schedule for counties and
cities to take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter. Except as
provided in subsections (5) and (8) of this section, the schedule
established by the department shall provide for the reviews and
evaluations to be completed as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, and every seven years
thereafter, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, and every seven years
thereafter, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis, Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and
Skamania counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, and every seven years
thereafter, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, and every seven years
thereafter, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield,
Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille,
Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities
within those counties.
(5)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the time limits established in subsection (4) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) A county that is subject to a schedule established by the
department under subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and
meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this
section at any time within the thirty-six months following the date
established in the applicable schedule: The county has a population of
less than fifty thousand and has had its population increase by no more
than seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the date established
in the applicable schedule as of that date.
(c) A city that is subject to a schedule established by the
department under subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and
meets the following criteria may comply with the requirements of this
section at any time within the thirty-six months following the date
established in the applicable schedule: The city has a population of
no more than five thousand and has had its population increase by the
greater of either no more than one hundred persons or no more than
seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the date established in
the applicable schedule as of that date.
(d) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(6) A county or city subject to the time periods in subsection
(4)(a) of this section that, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the
county or city establishing a schedule for periodic review of its
comprehensive plan and development regulations, has conducted a review
and evaluation of its comprehensive plan and development regulations
and, on or after January 1, 2001, has taken action in response to that
review and evaluation shall be deemed to have conducted the first
review required by subsection (4)(a) of this section. Subsequent
review and evaluation by the county or city of its comprehensive plan
and development regulations shall be conducted in accordance with the
time periods established under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(7) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities: (a)
Complying with the schedules in this section; (b) demonstrating
substantial progress towards compliance with the schedules in this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas; or (c)
complying with the extension provisions of subsection (5)(b) or (c) of
this section may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees from ((those accounts)) the account established in RCW
43.155.050 ((and 70.146.030)). A county or city that is fewer than
twelve months out of compliance with the schedules in this section for
development regulations that protect critical areas is making
substantial progress towards compliance. Only those counties and
cities in compliance with the schedules in this section may receive
preference for grants or loans subject to the provisions of RCW
43.17.250.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) and (c) of this
section:
(a) Counties and cities required to satisfy the requirements of
this section according to the schedule established by subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section may comply with the requirements of this
section for development regulations that protect critical areas one
year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of
this section;
(b) Counties and cities complying with the requirements of this
section one year after the dates established in subsection (4)(b)
through (d) of this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements of
this section; and
(c) This subsection (8) applies only to the counties and cities
specified in subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section, and only to
the requirements of this section for development regulations that
protect critical areas that must be satisfied by December 1, 2005,
December 1, 2006, and December 1, 2007.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section and the
substantial progress provisions of subsections (7) and (10) of this
section, only those counties and cities complying with the schedule in
subsection (4) of this section, or the extension provisions of
subsection (5)(b) or (c) of this section, may receive preferences for
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from ((those accounts))
the account established in RCW 43.155.050 ((and 70.146.030)).
(10) Until December 1, 2005, and notwithstanding subsection (7) of
this section, a county or city subject to the time periods in
subsection (4)(a) of this section demonstrating substantial progress
towards compliance with the schedules in this section for its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations may receive
grants, loans, pledges, or financial guarantees from ((those accounts))
the account established in RCW 43.155.050 ((and 70.146.030)). A county
or city that is fewer than twelve months out of compliance with the
schedules in this section for its comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations is deemed to be making substantial progress
towards compliance.

Sec. 21 RCW 70.146.010 and 1986 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The long-range health and environmental goals for the state of
Washington require the protection of the state's surface and
underground waters for the health, safety, use, enjoyment, and economic
benefit of its people. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide
financial assistance to the state and to local governments for the
planning, design, acquisition, construction, and improvement of water
pollution control facilities and related activities in the achievement
of state and federal water pollution control requirements for the
protection of the state's waters.
It is the intent of the legislature that distribution of moneys for
water pollution control facilities under this chapter be made on an
equitable basis taking into consideration legal mandates, local effort,
ratepayer impacts, and past distributions of state and federal moneys
for water pollution control facilities.
It is the intent of this chapter that the cost of any water
pollution control facility attributable to increased or additional
capacity that exceeds one hundred ten percent of existing needs at the
time of application for assistance under this chapter shall be entirely
a local or private responsibility. It is the intent of this chapter
that industrial pretreatment ((be paid by industries and that the water
quality account shall not be used for such purposes)) shall be entirely
a local or private responsibility.

Sec. 22 RCW 70.146.020 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 920 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Account" means the water quality account in the state
treasury.
(2))) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(((3))) (2) "Eligible cost" means the cost of that portion of a
water pollution control facility that can be financed under this
chapter excluding any portion of a facility's cost attributable to
capacity that is in excess of that reasonably required to address one
hundred ten percent of the applicant's needs for water pollution
control existing at the time application is submitted for assistance
under this chapter.
(((4))) (3) "Water pollution control facility" or "facilities"
means any facilities or systems for the control, collection, storage,
treatment, disposal, or recycling of wastewater, including but not
limited to sanitary sewage, storm water, residential, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural wastes, which are causing water quality
degradation due to concentrations of conventional, nonconventional, or
toxic pollutants. Water pollution control facilities include all
equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and
improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such
purpose. Water pollution control facilities also include such
facilities, equipment, and collection systems as are necessary to
protect federally designated sole source aquifers.
(((5))) (4) "Water pollution control activities" means actions
taken by a public body for the following purposes: (a) To prevent or
mitigate pollution of underground water; (b) to control nonpoint
sources of water pollution; (c) to restore the water quality of fresh
water lakes; and (d) to maintain or improve water quality through the
use of water pollution control facilities or other means. During the
1995-1997 fiscal biennium, "water pollution control activities"
includes activities by state agencies to protect public drinking water
supplies and sources.
(((6))) (5) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any
agency, county, city or town, conservation district, other political
subdivision, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, and
those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal
government.
(((7))) (6) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other
alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any
waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color,
turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid,
gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the
state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters
harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or
welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural,
recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock,
wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life.
(((8))) (7) "Nonpoint source water pollution" means pollution that
enters any waters of the state from any dispersed water-based or land-use activities, including, but not limited to, atmospheric deposition,
surface water runoff from agricultural lands, urban areas, and forest
lands, subsurface or underground sources, and discharges from boats or
other marine vessels.
(((9))) (8) "Sole source aquifer" means the sole or principal
source of public drinking water for an area designated by the
administrator of the environmental protection agency pursuant to Public
Law 93-523, Sec. 1424(b).

Sec. 23 RCW 70.146.040 and 1986 c 3 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
No grant or loan made in this chapter for fiscal year 1987 shall be
construed to establish a precedent for levels of grants or loans made
((from the water quality account)) under this chapter thereafter.

Sec. 24 RCW 70.146.060 and 1987 c 527 s 1 and 1987 c 436 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((During the period from July 1, 1987, until June 30, 1995, the
following limitations shall apply to the department's total
distribution of funds appropriated from the water quality account:
(1) Not more than fifty percent for water pollution control
facilities which discharge directly into marine waters;
(2) Not more than twenty percent for water pollution control
activities that prevent or mitigate pollution of underground waters and
facilities that protect federally designated sole source aquifers with
at least two-thirds for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie Aquifer;
(3) Not more than ten percent for water pollution control
activities that protect freshwater lakes and rivers including but not
limited to Lake Chelan and the Yakima and Columbia rivers;
(4) Not more than ten percent for activities which control nonpoint
source water pollution;
(5) Ten percent and such sums as may be remaining from the
categories specified in subsections (1) through (4) of this section for
water pollution control activities or facilities as determined by the
department; and
(6) Two and one-half percent of the total amounts of moneys under
subsections (1) through (5) of this section from February 21, 1986,
until December 31, 1995, shall be appropriated biennially to the state
conservation commission for the purposes of this chapter. Not less
than ten percent of the moneys received by the state conservation
commission under the provisions of this section shall be expended on
research activities.
The distribution under this section shall not be required to be met
in any single fiscal year.))
Funds provided for facilities and activities under this chapter may
be used for payments to a service provider under a service agreement
pursuant to RCW 70.150.060. If funds are to be used for such payments,
the department may make periodic disbursements to a public body or may
make a single lump sum disbursement. Disbursements of funds with
respect to a facility owned or operated by a service provider shall be
equivalent in value to disbursements that would otherwise be made if
that facility were owned or operated by a public body. Payments under
this chapter for waste disposal and management facilities made to
public bodies entering into service agreements pursuant to RCW
70.150.060 shall not exceed amounts paid to public bodies not entering
into service agreements.

Sec. 25 RCW 70.146.075 and 1987 c 516 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology may enter into contracts with local
jurisdictions which provide for extended grant payments under which
eligible costs may be paid on an advanced or deferred basis.
(2) Extended grant payments shall be in equal annual payments, the
total of which does not exceed, on a net present value basis, fifty
percent of the total eligible cost of the project incurred at the time
of design and construction. The duration of such extended grant
payments shall be for a period not to exceed twenty years. The total
of federal and state grant moneys received for the eligible costs of
the project shall not exceed fifty percent of the eligible costs.
(3) Any moneys appropriated by the legislature ((from the water
quality account)) for the purposes of this section shall be first used
by the department of ecology to satisfy the conditions of the extended
grant payment contracts.

Sec. 26 RCW 82.24.027 and 2008 c 86 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied and there shall be collected by the
department of revenue from the persons mentioned in and in the manner
provided by this chapter, an additional tax upon the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes in an
amount equal to four-tenths of a cent per cigarette.
(2) The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited ((as
follows:
(a) For the period beginning July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2021,
into the water quality account under RCW 70.146.030; and
(b) For the period beginning July 1, 2021,)) in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 RCW 82.32.390 (Certain revenues to be
deposited in water quality account) and 1986 c 3 s 15 are each
repealed.

Sec. 28 RCW 90.71.370 and 2008 c 329 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2008, and by September 1st of each even-numbered
year beginning in 2010, the council shall provide to the governor and
the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives its recommendations for the funding necessary to
implement the action agenda in the succeeding biennium. The
recommendations shall:
(a) Identify the funding needed by action agenda element;
(b) Address funding responsibilities among local, state, and
federal governments, as well as nongovernmental funding; and
(c) Address funding needed to support the work of the partnership,
the panel, the ecosystem work group, and entities assisting in
coordinating local efforts to implement the plan.
(2) In the 2008 report required under subsection (1) of this
section, the council shall include recommendations for projected
funding needed through 2020 to implement the action agenda; funding
needs for science panel staff; identify methods to secure stable and
sufficient funding to meet these needs; and include proposals for new
sources of funding to be dedicated to Puget Sound protection and
recovery. In preparing the science panel staffing proposal, the
council shall consult with the panel.
(3) By November 1st of each odd-numbered year beginning in 2009,
the council shall produce a state of the Sound report that includes, at
a minimum:
(a) An assessment of progress by state and nonstate entities in
implementing the action agenda, including accomplishments in the use of
state funds for action agenda implementation;
(b) A description of actions by implementing entities that are
inconsistent with the action agenda and steps taken to remedy the
inconsistency;
(c) The comments by the panel on progress in implementing the plan,
as well as findings arising from the assessment and monitoring program;
(d) A review of citizen concerns provided to the partnership and
the disposition of those concerns;
(e) A review of the expenditures of funds to state agencies for the
implementation of programs affecting the protection and recovery of
Puget Sound, and an assessment of whether the use of the funds is
consistent with the action agenda; and
(f) An identification of all funds provided to the partnership, and
recommendations as to how future state expenditures for all entities,
including the partnership, could better match the priorities of the
action agenda.
(4)(a) The council shall review state programs that fund facilities
and activities that may contribute to action agenda implementation. By
November 1, 2009, the council shall provide initial recommendations
regarding program changes to the governor and appropriate fiscal and
policy committees of the senate and house of representatives. By
November 1, 2010, the council shall provide final recommendations
regarding program changes, including proposed legislation to implement
the recommendation, to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives.
(b) The review in this subsection shall be conducted with the
active assistance and collaboration of the agencies administering these
programs, and in consultation with local governments and other entities
receiving funding from these programs:
(i) ((The water quality account, chapter 70.146 RCW;
(ii))) The water pollution control revolving fund, chapter 90.50A
RCW;
(((iii))) (ii) The public works assistance account, chapter 43.155
RCW;
(((iv))) (iii) The aquatic lands enhancement account, RCW
79.105.150;
(((v))) (iv) The state toxics control account and local toxics
control account and clean-up program, chapter 70.105D RCW;
(((vi))) (v) The acquisition of habitat conservation and outdoor
recreation land, chapter 79A.15 RCW;
(((vii))) (vi) The salmon recovery funding board, RCW 77.85.110
through 77.85.150;
(((viii))) (vii) The community economic revitalization board,
chapter 43.160 RCW;
(((ix))) (viii) Other state financial assistance to water quality-related projects and activities; and
(((x))) (ix) Water quality financial assistance from federal
programs administered through state programs or provided directly to
local governments in the Puget Sound basin.
(c) The council's review shall include but not be limited to:
(i) Determining the level of funding and types of projects and
activities funded through the programs that contribute to
implementation of the action agenda;
(ii) Evaluating the procedures and criteria in each program for
determining which projects and activities to fund, and their
relationship to the goals and priorities of the action agenda;
(iii) Assessing methods for ensuring that the goals and priorities
of the action agenda are given priority when program funding decisions
are made regarding water quality-related projects and activities in the
Puget Sound basin and habitat-related projects and activities in the
Puget Sound basin;
(iv) Modifying funding criteria so that projects, programs, and
activities that are inconsistent with the action agenda are ineligible
for funding;
(v) Assessing ways to incorporate a strategic funding approach for
the action agenda within the outcome-focused performance measures
required by RCW 43.41.270 in administering natural resource-related and
environmentally based grant and loan programs.

APPLICABLE TO MORE THAN ONE ACCOUNT
Sec. 29 RCW 43.135.025 and 2005 c 72 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund and related
funds during any fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state
expenditure limit established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
43.135.035 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW
43.135.045(((4)(b))) (2)(b), the state treasurer shall not issue or
redeem any check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state
general fund or related fund expenditure for any fiscal year in excess
of the state expenditure limit established under this chapter. A
violation of this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290
and shall subject the state treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW
43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, the phrase "the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from
the state general fund and related funds, not including federal funds,
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, plus the fiscal growth
factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years.
(8) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(9) "Related fund" means the ((health services account, violence
reduction and drug enforcement account,)) public safety and education
account((, water quality account,)) or student achievement fund.

Sec. 30 RCW 66.24.210 and 2008 c 94 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production shall pay taxes imposed by this
section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors and the Washington state liquor control board within the
state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents
per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to
another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by
direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every
person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section shall on or
before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all
purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon
such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report
shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless
the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose
applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following
the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two
percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every
such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond to be
approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing
the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when
due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all
taxes are paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
domestic winery shall make monthly reports to the liquor control board
on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and
upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the ((violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW
69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month)) state
general fund.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the ((health services account
under RCW 43.72.900)) state general fund.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries shall
pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to
Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements
of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the
resident purchaser.

Sec. 31 RCW 66.24.290 and 2006 c 302 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board. Any certificate of approval holder authorized to act
as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 shall pay the taxes imposed by
this section.
(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor shall report all sales
to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall pay to the
board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and selling
the beer and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar and
thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees
within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled
and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in
gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons.
(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is
not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages.
(c) The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed
as follows: (i) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to
border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (ii) of the remaining moneys:
(A) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in the same manner
as under RCW 66.08.200; and (B) eighty percent shall be distributed to
incorporated cities and towns in the same manner as under RCW
66.08.210.
(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
brewery or microbrewery shall make monthly reports to the liquor
control board on beer purchased during the preceding calendar month in
the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the ((violence reduction and drug enforcement account
under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month))
state general fund.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the ((health services account
under RCW 43.72.900)) state general fund.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent
of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.
(5) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(6) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 32 RCW 82.08.150 and 2005 c 514 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent
of the selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply
to all such sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores
and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the
selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in ((the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month))
state general fund.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
three and four-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This additional
tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington state
liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the ((health services
account created under RCW 43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month)) state general fund.
(7)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and thirty-three cents per liter. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited ((by the twenty-fifth day of
the following month as follows:
(i) 97.5 percent into the general fund;
(ii) 2.3 percent into the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900; and
(iii) 0.2 percent into the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account created under RCW 69.50.520)) in the state general fund.
(8) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(9) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to
the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full
amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under this
section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by the
seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(10) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and "package"
shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

Sec. 33 RCW 82.24.020 and 2008 c 226 s 3 and 2008 c 86 s 301 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected as provided in
this chapter, a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling,
possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount equal to
one and fifteen one-hundredths cents per cigarette.
(2) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to five hundred twenty-five one-thousandths of a cent per
cigarette. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the ((violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month)) state general fund.
(3) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to two and five one-hundredths cents per cigarette. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the ((health services account created under RCW 43.72.900 by the
twenty-fifth day of the following month)) state general fund.
(4) Wholesalers subject to the payment of this tax may, if they
wish, absorb five one-hundredths cents per cigarette of the tax and not
pass it on to purchasers without being in violation of this section or
any other act relating to the sale or taxation of cigarettes.
(5) For purposes of this chapter, "possession" shall mean both (a)
physical possession by the purchaser and, (b) when cigarettes are being
transported to or held for the purchaser or his or her designee by a
person other than the purchaser, constructive possession by the
purchaser or his or her designee, which constructive possession shall
be deemed to occur at the location of the cigarettes being so
transported or held.
(6) In accordance with federal law and rules prescribed by the
department, an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe
may purchase cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization under the
jurisdiction of the member's tribe for the member's own use exempt from
the applicable taxes imposed by this chapter. Except as provided in
subsection (7) of this section, any person, who purchases cigarettes
from an Indian tribal organization and who is not an enrolled member of
the federally recognized Indian tribe within whose jurisdiction the
sale takes place, is not exempt from the applicable taxes imposed by
this chapter.
(7) If the state enters into a cigarette tax contract or agreement
with a federally recognized Indian tribe under chapter 43.06 RCW, the
terms of the contract or agreement shall take precedence over any
conflicting provisions of this chapter while the contract or agreement
is in effect.

Sec. 34 RCW 82.24.026 and 2008 c 86 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three cents per
cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section shall be deposited as
follows:
(a) ((21.7 percent shall be deposited into the health services
account.
(b) 2.8 percent shall be deposited into the general fund.
(c) 2.3 percent shall be deposited into the violence reduction and
drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520.
(d) 1.7 percent shall be deposited into the water quality account
under RCW 70.146.030.)) 28.5 percent shall be deposited into the state
general fund.
(((e))) (b) The remainder shall be deposited into the education
legacy trust account.

Sec. 35 RCW 82.26.020 and 2005 c 180 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax upon the
sale, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state
at the following rate:
(a) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of cigars, not
to exceed fifty cents per cigar; or
(b) Seventy-five percent of the taxable sales price of all tobacco
products that are not cigars.
(2) Taxes under this section shall be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited ((as
follows:
(a) Thirty-seven percent)) in the general fund((;
(b) Fifty percent in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900; and
(c) Thirteen percent in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030 for the period beginning July 1, 2005, through June 30,
2021, and in the general fund for the period beginning July 1, 2021)).

NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 Any residual balance of funds remaining in
the health services account, violence reduction and drug enforcement
account, and water quality account on the effective date of this
section shall be transferred to the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---