BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to:
(1) Provide objective information to students, parents, and
educators regarding available online learning opportunities, including
program and course content, how to register for programs and courses,
teacher qualifications, student-to-teacher ratios, prior course
completion rates, and other evaluative information;
(2) Create an approval process for multidistrict online course
providers;
(3) Enhance statewide equity of student access to high-quality
online learning opportunities; and
(4) Require school district boards of directors to develop policies
and procedures for student access to online learning opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) "Multidistrict online course provider"
means:
(a) A private organization or nonprofit organization that enters
into a contract with at least one school district, with the digital
learning commons, or both, to provide online courses or programs to K-12 students from more than one school district; and
(b) An individual school district that provides online courses or
programs to students who reside outside the geographic boundaries of
the school district. This does not include a school district online
learning program in which less than ten percent of the students
enrolled in the program are from other districts under the
interdistrict student transfer provisions of RCW 28A.225.225. In
addition, it does not include regional online learning programs that
are jointly developed and implemented by two or more school districts
or an educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative
program agreement that addresses, at minimum, how the districts will
share student full-time equivalency for state basic education funding
purposes and how categorical education programs, including special
education, will be provided to eligible students.
(2)(a) "Online course" means a course that:
(i) Is delivered primarily electronically using the internet or
other computer-based methods; and
(ii) Is taught primarily by a teacher from a remote location.
Students enrolled in the course may have access to the teacher
synchronously, asynchronously, or both.
(b) An online course may be delivered to students at school as part
of the regularly scheduled school day. An online course also may be
delivered to students, in whole or in part, independently from a
regular classroom schedule, but such course or courses must comply with
RCW 28A.150.262 to qualify for state basic education funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The superintendent of public instruction
shall:
(1)(a) In collaboration with the state board of education and with
the assistance of the digital learning commons, develop and implement
approval criteria and a process for approving multidistrict online
course providers and a process for monitoring and, if necessary,
rescinding the approval of individual courses offered by the provider;
and an appeals process. The approval process and criteria shall be
adopted by rule by November 1, 2009;
(b) When developing the approval criteria, the superintendent shall
consider the accreditation standards being developed for online
learning programs by the Northwest association of accredited schools
and the standards developed by the international association for K-12
online learning. In addition to other criteria, the approval criteria
shall include the degree of alignment with state academic standards,
guidelines for student-to-teacher ratios and require that all teachers
be certificated in accordance with Washington state law;
(c) Initial approval of course providers by the superintendent
shall be for two years. The superintendent shall develop a process for
the renewal of approvals and for rescinding approvals based on
noncompliance with approval requirements. The superintendent may
develop an abbreviated approval process for online course providers
that were approved by the digital learning commons before the effective
date of this section;
(d) The superintendent may charge multidistrict online course
providers a fee to process requests to be reviewed and approved;
(2) Enter into a multiyear contract with the digital learning
commons to carry out the duties in section 4 of this act if sufficient
funds are appropriated for this purpose;
(3) Develop model policies and procedures, in consultation with the
Washington state school directors' association, that may be used by
school district boards of directors in the development of the school
district guidelines required in section 5(1) of this act. The sample
policies and procedures shall be disseminated to school districts by
October 1, 2009;
(4) Submit by January 15th a report regarding online learning to
the state board of education, the governor, and the legislature. The
report shall cover the previous school year and include, but not be
limited to, student demographics, course enrollment data, aggregated
student course completion and passing rates, activities and outcomes of
course and provider approval reviews, and trainings provided to school
districts by the digital learning commons;
(5) By September 1, 2009, modify the school district guidelines for
providing course information to the superintendent of public
instruction in accordance with RCW 28A.300.500 and for purposes of the
standardized transcript to designate if the course was an online
course. Both the designation and the guidelines shall be required
beginning with the 2010-11 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 To the extent funds are appropriated, the
digital learning commons must:
(1) Develop and maintain a web site that provides objective
information for students, parents, and educators regarding online
learning opportunities offered by multidistrict online course providers
that have been approved by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. The web
site shall include information, or links to information, regarding the
online provider's overall instructional program, specific information
regarding the content of individual online courses, how to register for
online learning programs and courses, teacher qualifications, student-to-teacher ratios, prior course completion rates, and other evaluative
information. Information also shall be provided regarding the process
and criteria for approving online providers. The digital learning
commons may not charge school districts, students, or parents to access
information on or through its web site;
(2) Assist the superintendent of public instruction in developing
and implementing approval criteria and a process for approving
multidistrict online course providers and a process for monitoring and,
if necessary, rescinding the approval of individual courses offered by
the provider. After the approval criteria is adopted, the digital
learning commons shall review applications submitted by multidistrict
online course providers and within three months recommend to the
superintendent whether the provider should be approved;
(3) When reviewing multidistrict online course providers that offer
high school courses, the digital learning commons shall ensure that the
content of courses offered by the provider is eligible for high school
credit. However, final decisions regarding the awarding of high school
credit shall remain with the school district;
(4) Negotiate standard agreements with approved multidistrict
online course providers in order to provide programs and courses to
students in school districts. The purpose of the agreements is to
allow individual school districts, at the discretion of the school
district's board of directors, to offer the multidistrict online course
provider's courses to students in their school district. The
agreements may include central registration, billing, and reimbursement
through the digital learning commons;
(5) Provide technical assistance and support to school district
personnel in the development and implementation of online learning
programs in their school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 School district boards of directors shall:
(1) By June 1, 2010, develop policies and procedures for student
access to online courses and online learning programs. The policies
and procedures shall include, but not be limited to: Student
eligibility criteria; the types of online courses available to students
through the school district; the methods districts will use to support
student success, which may include a local advisor; when the school
district will, and will not, pay course fees and other costs; the
granting of high school credit; and a process for students and parents
or guardians to formally acknowledge any course taken for which no
credit is given. The policies and procedures shall be effective
beginning with the 2010-11 school year. School districts shall submit
their policies to the superintendent of public instruction by July 1,
2010. By December 1, 2010, the superintendent shall summarize the
school district policies regarding student access to online courses and
submit a report to the legislature;
(2) Provide students information regarding online courses that are
available through the school district, including those that are offered
through the digital learning commons. The information shall include
the types of information described in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) When providing course information to the superintendent of
public instruction in accordance with RCW 28A.300.500 and for purposes
of the standardized transcript, designate if the course was an online
course. The designation shall be required beginning with the 2010-11
school year; and
(4) When developing local or regional online learning programs,
make use of the approval criteria developed by the superintendent of
public instruction under section 4(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year,
school districts may claim state basic education funding, to the extent
otherwise allowed by state law, only for students enrolled in online
courses that are:
(a) Online courses offered by multidistrict online course providers
approved by the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) District-sponsored online learning programs if the program and
courses serve students who reside within the geographic boundaries of
the school district. This includes school district programs in which
less than ten percent of the program's students reside outside the
school district's geographic boundaries; and
(c) Regional online learning programs and courses that are jointly
developed and implemented by two or more school districts or an
educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative
program agreement.
(2) Criteria shall be established by the superintendent of public
instruction to allow online courses that have not been approved by the
superintendent to be eligible for state funding if the course is in a
subject matter in which no courses have been approved and, if it is a
high school course, the course meets Washington high school graduation
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter is intended to
diminish the rights of students to attend a nonresident school district
in accordance with RCW 28A.225.220 through 28A.225.230 for the purposes
of enrolling in online courses.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.150.262 and 2005 c 356 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Under RCW 28A.150.260, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the definition of a full-time equivalent student to
include students who receive instruction through ((digital programs.
"Digital programs" means electronically delivered learning that occurs
primarily away from the classroom.)) alternative learning experience
online programs. As used in this section, an "alternative learning
experience online program" is a set of online courses as defined in
section 1 of this act that is delivered to students in whole or in part
independently from a regular classroom schedule. The superintendent of
public instruction has the authority to adopt rules to implement the
revised definition beginning with the 2005-2007 biennium for school
districts claiming state funding for the programs. The rules shall
include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Defining a full-time equivalent student under RCW 28A.150.260
or part-time student under RCW 28A.150.350 based upon the district's
estimated average weekly hours of learning activity as identified in
the student's learning plan, as long as the student is found, through
monthly evaluation, to be making satisfactory progress; the rules shall
require districts providing programs under this section to nonresident
students to establish procedures that address, at a minimum, the
coordination of student counting for state funding so that no student
is counted for more than one full-time equivalent in the aggregate;
(2) Requiring the board of directors of a school district offering,
or contracting under RCW 28A.150.305 to offer, ((a digital)) an
alternative learning experience online program to adopt and annually
review written policies for each program and program provider and to
receive an annual report on its digital alternative learning experience
online programs from its staff;
(3) Requiring each school district offering or contracting to offer
((a digital)) an alternative learning experience online program to
report annually to the superintendent of public instruction on the
types of programs and course offerings, and number of students
participating;
(4) Requiring completion of a program self-evaluation;
(5) Requiring documentation of the district of the student's
physical residence;
(6) Requiring that supervision, monitoring, assessment, and
evaluation of the ((digital)) alternative learning experience online
program be provided by certificated instructional staff;
(7) Requiring each school district offering courses or programs to
identify the ratio of certificated instructional staff to full-time
equivalent students enrolled in such courses or programs, and to
include a description of their ratio as part of the reports required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section;
(8) Requiring reliable methods to verify a student is doing his or
her own work; the methods may include proctored examinations or
projects, including the use of web cams or other technologies.
"Proctored" means directly monitored by an adult authorized by the
school district;
(9) Requiring, for each student receiving instruction in ((a
digital)) an alternative learning experience online program, a learning
plan that includes a description of course objectives and information
on the requirements a student must meet to successfully complete the
program or courses. The rules shall allow course syllabi and other
additional information to be used to meet the requirement for a
learning plan;
(10) Requiring that the district assess the educational progress of
enrolled students at least annually, using, for full-time students, the
state assessment for the student's grade level and using any other
annual assessments required by the school district. Part-time students
shall also be assessed at least annually. However, part-time students
who are either receiving home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200
RCW or who are enrolled in an approved private school under chapter
28A.195 RCW are not required to participate in the assessments required
under chapter 28A.655 RCW. The rules shall address how students who
reside outside the geographic service area of the school district are
to be assessed;
(11) Requiring that each student enrolled in the program have
direct personal contact with certificated instructional staff at least
weekly until the student completes the course objectives or the
requirements in the learning plan. Direct personal contact is for the
purposes of instruction, review of assignments, testing, evaluation of
student progress, or other learning activities. Direct personal
contact may include the use of telephone, e-mail, instant messaging,
interactive video communication, or other means of digital
communication;
(12) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide ((digital)) alternative
learning experience online learning programs to receive accreditation
through the state accreditation program or through the regional
accreditation program;
(13) Requiring state-funded public schools or public school
programs whose primary purpose is to provide ((digital)) alternative
learning experience online learning to provide information to students
and parents on whether or not the courses or programs: Cover one or
more of the school district's learning goals or of the state's
essential academic learning requirements or whether they permit the
student to meet one or more of the state's or district's graduation
requirements; and
(14) Requiring that a school district that provides one or more
((digital)) alternative learning experience online courses to a student
provide the parent or guardian of the student, prior to the student's
enrollment, with a description of any difference between home-based
education as described in chapter 28A.200 RCW and the enrollment option
selected by the student. The parent or guardian shall sign
documentation attesting to his or her understanding of the difference
and the documentation shall be retained by the district and made
available for audit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---