BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW.
(2) Five additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application. These moneys must be distributed in
the following manner:
(a) Two dollars must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal
account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural
resources indicates that the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account, not including any transfer or appropriation of funds into the
account or funds deposited into the account collected under RCW
88.02.270, reaches one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the
collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following
fiscal year.
(b) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879.
(c) ((One dollar)) Seventy-five cents must be deposited into the
freshwater aquatic algae control account created in RCW 43.21A.667.
(d) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400.
(e) Twenty-five cents must be deposited in the saltwater algae
control account created in section 2 of this act.
(3) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140
shall be in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual
registration fee and the five-dollar fee created in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
(5) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of
one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals ((therefor)), for the
purpose of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more
or less than one year, the department may collect prorated annual
registration fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in
the registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year
in a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(6) When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
(7) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The saltwater algae control account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts designated for deposit to the account in RCW
88.02.050 must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
only be used as provided in this section.
(2) Funds in the saltwater algae control account may be
appropriated to the department to develop a saltwater aquatic algae
control grant program. Funds must be expended as grants to cities,
counties, tribes, special purpose districts, and state agencies for
capital and operational expenses used to manage and study excessive
saltwater algae with an emphasis on the periodic accumulation of sea
lettuce on Puget Sound beaches.
(3)(a) Grant awards may be made both for proactive investments in
saltwater algae research and control and for rapid response to emerging
incidents and immediate restoration following algal incidents. Grants
may either be awarded prospectively when intended for proactive
investments or as reimbursement for rapid response or immediate
restoration.
(b) The department shall allow potential grantees to contact the
department prior to investing in rapid response or immediate
restoration actions to ensure that the saltwater algae control account
has adequate funds to reimburse the rapid response and immediate
restoration actions. To facilitate both timely reimbursement and the
department's ability to provide assurances that reimbursement funding
can be provided, the department shall develop a process that allows
potential grantees to be screened and evaluated prior to a saltwater
algae incident.
(4) When appropriate, grant awards must be prioritized to benefit:
(a) Areas of marine waters with documented significant sea lettuce
growth;
(b) Potential grantees capable and willing to provide matching
funds either directly or through a third party; and
(c) Potential grantees that are Puget Sound partners as that term
is defined in RCW 90.71.010. However, the department shall give
preference only to Puget Sound partners in comparison to other entities
that are eligible to be included in the definition of Puget Sound
partner. Entities that are not eligible to be a Puget Sound partner
due to geographic location, composition, exclusion from the scope of
the Puget Sound action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership
under RCW 90.71.310, or for any other reason may not be given less
preferential treatment than Puget Sound partners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire June 30,
2012.

--- END ---