BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a statewide student assessment
system should improve and inform classroom instruction, support
accountability, and provide useful information to all levels of the
educational system, including students, parents, teachers, schools,
school districts, and the state. The legislature intends to redesign
the current statewide system, in accordance with the recommendations of
the Washington assessment of student learning legislative work group,
to:
(a) Include multiple assessment formats, including both formative
and summative, as necessary to provide information to help improve
instruction and inform accountability;
(b) Enable collection of data that allows both statewide and
nationwide comparisons of student learning and achievement; and
(c) Be balanced so that the information used to make significant
decisions that affect school accountability or student educational
progress includes many data points and does not rely on solely the
results of a single assessment.
(2) The legislature further finds that one component of the
assessment system should be instructionally supportive formative
assessments. The key design elements or characteristics of an
instructionally supportive assessment must:
(a) Be aligned to state standards in areas that are being assessed;
(b) Measure student growth and competency at multiple points
throughout the year in a manner that allows instructors to monitor
student progress and have the necessary trend data with which to
improve instruction;
(c) Provide rapid feedback;
(d) Link student growth with instructional elements in order to
gauge the effectiveness of educators and curricula;
(e) Provide tests that are appropriate to the skill level of the
student;
(f) Support instruction for students of all abilities, including
highly capable students and students with learning disabilities;
(g) Be culturally, linguistically, and cognitively relevant,
appropriate, and understandable to each student taking the assessment;
(h) Inform parents and draw parents into greater participation of
the student's study plan;
(i) Provide a way to analyze the assessment results relative to
characteristics of the student such as, but not limited to, English
language learners, gender, ethnicity, poverty, age, and disabilities;
(j) Strive to be computer-based and adaptive; and
(k) Engage students in their learning.
(3) The legislature further finds that a second component of the
assessment system should be a state-administered summative achievement
assessment that can be used as a check on the educational system in
order to guide state expectations for the instruction of children and
satisfy legislative demands for accountability. The key design
elements or characteristics of the state administered achievement
assessment must:
(a) Be aligned to state standards in areas that are being assessed;
(b) Maintain and increase academic rigor;
(c) Measure student learning growth over years; and
(d) Strengthen curriculum.
(4) The legislature further finds that a third component of the
assessment system should include classroom-based assessments, which may
be formative, summative, or both. Depending on their use, classroom-based assessments should have the same design elements and
characteristics described in this section for formative and summative
assessments.
(5) The legislature further finds that to sustain a strong and
viable assessment system, preservice and ongoing training should be
provided for teachers and administrators on the effective use of
different types of assessments.
(6) The legislature further finds that as the statewide data system
is developed, data should be collected for all state-required statewide
assessments to be used for accountability and to monitor overall
student achievement.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the state board of education, shall begin design and development of an
overall assessment system that meets the principles and characteristics
described in this section. In designing formative and summative
assessments, the superintendent shall solicit bids for the use of
computerized adaptive testing methodologies.
(8) Beginning December 1, 2009, and annually thereafter, the
superintendent and state board shall jointly report to the legislature
regarding the assessment system, including a cost analysis of any
changes and costs to expand availability and use of instructionally
supportive formative assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The superintendent of public instruction
shall:
(1) Revise the number of open-ended questions and extended
responses in the statewide achievement assessment in grades three
through eight and ten to reduce the cost and time of administering the
assessment while retaining validity and reliability of the assessment
and retaining assessment of critical thinking skills. By December 1,
2009, the superintendent shall report to the legislature regarding the
changes, including a cost analysis of the changes; and
(2) Revisit the alternative assessments, the appeals process,
including considering authorizing local school districts to determine
the outcome of an appeal by a student to demonstrate that he or she has
the level of understanding of a content area assessed on the Washington
assessment of student learning necessary to meet the state standard but
was unable to demonstrate that understanding on the assessment or an
alternative assessment, and the Washington alternative assessment
system portfolios for students with the most significant cognitive
disabilities. By December 1, 2009, the superintendent shall make
recommendations to the legislature for improvements.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3)(a) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the
exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a
student who meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and
mathematics content areas of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning or an objective alternative assessment shall earn a
certificate of academic achievement.
(b) After a determination is made by the state board of education
that the high school Washington assessment of student learning in the
content areas of mathematics and science is sufficiently reliable and
valid, with the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045, students must also meet the state standards on the
mathematics and science content areas of the Washington assessment of
student learning or an objective alternative assessment in order to
earn a certificate of academic achievement. The state board of
education may make a separate determination for the mathematics and the
science content areas of the assessment. The determination by the
state board of education must be adopted by rule by September 1st of
the freshman school year of the graduating class to which the
graduation requirement under subsection (2) of this section applies.
In making the determination, the state board of education shall obtain
information and conclusions from recognized, independent, national
assessment experts and other objective sources of expertise as the
board deems necessary.
(c) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under this subsection on the Washington
assessment of student learning or the approved objective alternative
assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic achievement.
(4) If a student does not successfully meet the state standards in
one or more content areas required for the certificate of academic
achievement, then the student may retake the assessment in the content
area up to four times at no cost to the student. If the student
successfully meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment
then the student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement.
Once objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section, a student may use the objective
alternative assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully
meets the state standards for that content area if the student has
taken the Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If
the student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(((4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.))
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the ((scholastic assessment test ())SAT(())) or the
((American college test ())ACT(())) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the ((preliminary scholastic assessment test ())PSAT(()))
may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section
for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard
for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of
education shall identify the score students must achieve on the
mathematics portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in
that content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) ((By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and
senate education committees shall obtain information and conclusions
from recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12))) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (((12))) (11).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.066 and 2008 c 163 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In consultation with the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop statewide end-of-course assessments for high school mathematics that measure student
achievement of the state mathematics standards. The superintendent
shall take steps to ensure that the language of the assessments is
responsive to a diverse student population. The superintendent shall
develop end-of-course assessments in algebra I, geometry, integrated
mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II((. The superintendent
shall make the algebra I and integrated mathematics I end-of-course
assessments available to school districts on an optional basis in the
2009-10 school year. The end-of-course assessments in algebra I,
geometry, integrated mathematics I, and integrated mathematics II)) and
the assessments shall be implemented statewide in the 2010-11 school
year.
(2) For the graduating ((class of 2013)) classes of 2013 and 2014
and for purposes of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061, a student may use: (a) Results from the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course assessment ((or));
(b) results from the integrated mathematics I end-of-course assessment
plus the integrated mathematics II end-of-course assessment ((may be
used)); or (c) results of the comprehensive mathematics assessment to
demonstrate that a student meets the state standard on the mathematics
content area of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of ((2014)) 2015 and for
purposes of the certificate of academic achievement under RCW
28A.655.061, the mathematics content area of the Washington assessment
of student learning shall be assessed using either the algebra I end-of-course assessment plus the geometry end-of-course assessment or the
integrated mathematics I end-of-course assessment plus the integrated
mathematics II end-of-course assessment. All of the objective
alternative assessments available to students under RCW 28A.655.061 and
28A.655.065 shall be available to any student who has taken the
sequence of end-of-course assessments once but does not meet the state
mathematics standard on the sequence of end-of-course assessments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall report at least
annually or more often if necessary to keep the education committees of
the legislature informed on each step of the development and
implementation process under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education
and the professional educator standards board, shall develop an
implementation plan and strategies to ensure that all students have the
opportunity to learn the new science standards. The plan must include
the following components:
(a) Strategies to help districts improve their alignment of
curriculum and teacher instruction to the new standards;
(b) Development of instructional models to help teachers; and
(c) Identification of effective intervention programs and
strategies for struggling students.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the state board of education, shall also determine
whether to use a comprehensive assessment or end-of-course assessments,
including the costs for developing and implementing these assessments,
for the high school assessment for students to demonstrate that they
have achieved proficiency on the state's science standards.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the governor and legislature by December 1, 2009, on the
implementation plan and the recommended method of assessment for
science.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.305.215 and 2008 c 274 s 2 and 2008 c 172 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The activities in this section revise and strengthen the state
learning standards that implement the goals of RCW 28A.150.210, known
as the essential academic learning requirements, and improve alignment
of school district curriculum to the standards.
(2) The state board of education shall be assisted in its work
under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section by: (a) An expert
national consultant in each of mathematics and science retained by the
state board; and (b) the mathematics and science advisory panels
created under RCW 28A.305.219, as appropriate, which shall provide
review and formal comment on proposed recommendations to the
superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education
on new revised standards and curricula.
(3) By September 30, 2007, the state board of education shall
recommend to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations in
mathematics. The recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of:
(i) Standards used in countries whose students demonstrate high
performance on the trends in international mathematics and science
study and the programme for international student assessment;
(ii) College readiness standards;
(iii) The national council of teachers of mathematics focal points
and the national assessment of educational progress content frameworks;
and
(iv) Standards used by three to five other states, including
California, and the nation of Singapore; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(4)(a) By February 29, 2008, the superintendent of public
instruction shall revise the essential academic learning requirements
and the grade level expectations for mathematics and present the
revised standards to the state board of education and the education
committees of the senate and the house of representatives as required
by RCW 28A.655.070(4).
(b) The state board of education shall direct an expert national
consultant in mathematics to:
(i) Analyze the February 2008 version of the revised standards,
including a comparison to exemplar standards previously reviewed under
this section;
(ii) Recommend specific language and content changes needed to
finalize the revised standards; and
(iii) Present findings and recommendations in a draft report to the
state board of education.
(c) By May 15, 2008, the state board of education shall review the
consultant's draft report, consult the mathematics advisory panel, hold
a public hearing to receive comment, and direct any subsequent
modifications to the consultant's report. After the modifications are
made, the state board of education shall forward the final report and
recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction for
implementation.
(d) By July 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall
revise the mathematics standards to conform precisely to and
incorporate each of the recommendations of the state board of education
under ((subsection (4)))(c) of this ((section)) subsection and submit
the revisions to the state board of education.
(e) By July 31, 2008, the state board of education shall either
approve adoption by the superintendent of public instruction of the
final revised standards as the essential academic learning requirements
and grade level expectations for mathematics, or develop a plan for
ensuring that the recommendations under ((subsection (4)))(c) of this
((section)) subsection are implemented so that final revised
mathematics standards can be adopted by September 25, 2008.
(5) By June 30, 2008, the state board of education shall recommend
to the superintendent of public instruction revised essential academic
learning requirements and grade level expectations in science. The
recommendations shall be based on:
(a) Considerations of clarity, rigor, content, depth, coherence
from grade to grade, specificity, accessibility, and measurability;
(b) Study of standards used by three to five other states and in
countries whose students demonstrate high performance on the trends in
international mathematics and science study and the programme for
international student assessment; and
(c) Consideration of information presented during public comment
periods.
(6) By December 1, 2008, the superintendent of public instruction
shall revise the essential academic learning requirements and the grade
level expectations for science and present the revised standards to the
state board of education and the education committees of the senate and
the house of representatives as required by RCW 28A.655.070(4). The
superintendent shall adopt the revised essential academic learning
requirements and grade level expectations unless otherwise directed by
the legislature during the 2009 legislative session.
(7)(a) Within six months after the standards under subsection (4)
of this section are adopted, the superintendent of public instruction
shall present to the state board of education recommendations for no
more than three basic mathematics curricula each for elementary,
middle, and high school grade spans.
(b) Within two months after the presentation of the recommended
curricula, the state board of education shall provide official comment
and recommendations to the superintendent of public instruction
regarding the recommended mathematics curricula. The superintendent of
public instruction shall make any changes based on the comment and
recommendations from the state board of education and adopt the
recommended curricula.
(c) By ((May 15)) June 30, 2009, the superintendent of public
instruction shall present to the state board of education
recommendations for no more than three basic science curricula each for
elementary((,)) and middle((, and high)) school grade spans and not
more than three recommendations for each of the major high school
courses within the following science domains: Earth and space science,
physical science, and life science.
(d) ((By June 30, 2009)) Within two months after the presentation
of the recommended curricula, the state board of education shall
provide official comment and recommendations to the superintendent of
public instruction regarding the recommended science curricula. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make any changes based on
the comment and recommendations from the state board of education and
adopt the recommended curricula.
(e) In selecting the recommended curricula under this subsection
(7), the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information
to the mathematics and science advisory panels created under RCW
28A.305.219, as appropriate, and seek the advice of the appropriate
panel regarding the curricula that shall be included in the
recommendations.
(f) The recommended curricula under this subsection (7) shall align
with the revised essential academic learning requirements and grade
level expectations. In addition to the recommended basic curricula,
appropriate diagnostic and supplemental materials shall be identified
as necessary to support each curricula.
(g) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose and availability
of the curricula, at least one of the curricula in each grade span and
in each of mathematics and science shall be available to schools and
parents online at no cost to the school or parent.
(8) By December 1, 2007, the state board of education shall revise
the high school graduation requirements under RCW 28A.230.090 to
include a minimum of three credits of mathematics, one of which may be
a career and technical course equivalent in mathematics, and prescribe
the mathematics content in the three required credits.
(9) Nothing in this section requires a school district to use one
of the recommended curricula under subsection (7) of this section.
However, the statewide accountability plan adopted by the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.130 shall recommend conditions under
which school districts should be required to use one of the recommended
curricula. The plan shall also describe the conditions for exception
to the curriculum requirement, such as the use of integrated academic
and career and technical education curriculum. Required use of the
recommended curricula as an intervention strategy must be authorized by
the legislature as required by RCW 28A.305.130(4)(e) before
implementation.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a
comprehensive survey of the mathematics curricula being used by school
districts at all grade levels and the textbook and curriculum
purchasing cycle of the districts and report the results of the survey
to the education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 6 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---