BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.03.020 and 2008 c 217 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of ascertaining its condition, or compliance with
this code, the commissioner may as often as he or she deems advisable
examine the accounts, records, documents, and transactions of:
(1) Any insurance producer, surplus line broker, adjuster, or title
insurance agent.
(2) Any person having a contract under which he or she enjoys in
fact the exclusive or dominant right to manage or control a stock or
mutual insurer.
(3) Any person holding the shares of capital stock or policyholder
proxies of a domestic insurer for the purpose of control of its
management either as voting trustee or otherwise.
(4) Any person engaged in or proposing to be engaged in or
assisting in the promotion or formation of a domestic insurer, or an
insurance holding corporation, or a stock corporation to finance a
domestic mutual insurer or the production of its business, or a
corporation to be attorney-in-fact for a domestic reciprocal insurer.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.14.010 and 2007 c 117 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall collect in advance the following fees:

(a) For filing charter documents:

(i) Original charter documents, bylaws
or record of organization of
insurers, or certified copies thereof,
required to be filed . . . . . . . . . . . . $250.00

(ii) Amended charter documents, or
certified copy thereof, other than
amendments of bylaws . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00

(iii) No additional charge or fee shall be
required for filing any of such
documents in the office of the
secretary of state.

(b) Certificate of authority:

(i) Issuance . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(ii) Renewal . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(c) Annual statement of insurer, filing . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(d) Organization or financing of domestic insurers and
affiliated corporations:

(i) Application for solicitation permit,
filing . . . . . . . . . . . . $100.00

(ii) Issuance of solicitation permit . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(e) Insurance producer licenses:

(i) License application . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

(ii) License renewal, every two years

. . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

(iii) Initial appointment and renewal of
appointment of each insurance
producer, every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(iv) Limited line insurance producer
license application and renewal,
every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(f) Title insurance agent licenses:

(i) License application . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) License renewal, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(g) Reinsurance intermediary licenses:

(i) Reinsurance intermediary-broker,
each year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) Reinsurance intermediary-
manager, each year . . . . . . . . . . . . $100.00

(((g)))
(h) Surplus line broker license application
and renewal, every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $200.00

(((h)))
(i) Adjusters' licenses:

(i) Independent adjuster, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) Public adjuster, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . .
$ 50.00

(((i)))
(j) Managing general agent appointment,
every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $200.00

(((j)))
(k) Examination for license, each examination:

All examinations, except examinations
administered by an independent
testing service, the fees for which are
to be approved by the commissioner
and collected directly by and retained
by such independent testing service

. . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(((k)))
(l) Miscellaneous services:

(i) Filing other documents . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(ii) Commissioner's certificate under
seal . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(iii) Copy of documents filed in the
commissioner's office, reasonable
charge therefor as determined by
the commissioner.

(2) All fees so collected shall be remitted by the commissioner to
the state treasurer not later than the first business day following,
and shall be placed to the credit of the general fund.
(a) Fees for examinations administered by an independent testing
service that are approved by the commissioner under subsection
(1)(((j))) (k) of this section shall be collected directly by the
independent testing service and retained by it.
(b) Fees for copies of documents filed in the commissioner's office
shall be remitted by the commissioner to the state treasurer not later
than the first business day following, and shall be placed to the
credit of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.15.070 and 2002 c 227 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any individual while a resident of this state, or any firm or any
corporation that has in its employ a qualified individual who is a
resident of this state and who is authorized to exercise the powers of
the firm or corporation, deemed by the commissioner to be competent and
trustworthy, and while maintaining an office at a designated location
in this state, may be licensed as a surplus line broker in accordance
with this section.
(1) Application to the commissioner for the license shall be made
on forms furnished by the commissioner. As part of, or in connection
with, this application, the applicant shall furnish information
concerning his or her identity, including fingerprints for submission
to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation,
and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this
information for a state and national criminal history background check;
personal history; experience; business records; purposes; and other
pertinent information, as the commissioner may reasonably require. If
in the process of verifying fingerprints, business records, or other
information, the commissioner's office incurs fees or charges from
another governmental agency or from a business firm, the amount of the
fees or charges shall be paid to the commissioner's office by the
applicant.
(2) ((The license shall expire if not timely renewed. Surplus line
brokers licenses shall be valid for the time period established by the
commissioner unless suspended or revoked at an earlier date.
(3) Prior to issuance of license the applicant shall file with the
commissioner)) Every surplus line broker licensed under this chapter
must maintain a bond in favor of the state of Washington in the penal
sum of twenty thousand dollars, with authorized corporate sureties
approved by the commissioner, conditioned that ((he or she)) the
licensee will conduct business under the license in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and that ((he or she)) the licensee will
promptly remit the taxes provided by RCW 48.15.120. The licensee shall
maintain such bond in force for as long as the license remains in
effect.
(((4) Every applicant for a surplus line broker's license or for
the renewal of a surplus line broker's license shall file with the
application or request for renewal a bond in favor of the people of the
state of Washington, executed by an authorized corporate surety
approved by the commissioner, in the amount of one hundred thousand
dollars and shall be the bonding requirement for new licensees. The
licensee shall maintain such bond in force while so licensed.)) (3)
Every surplus line broker licensed under this chapter must maintain in
force while so licensed a bond in favor of the people of the state of
Washington or a named insured such that the people of the state are
covered by the bond, executed by an authorized corporate surety
approved by the commissioner, in the amount of two thousand five
hundred dollars, or five percent of the premiums from placement of
coverage with surplus line insurers in the previous calendar year,
whichever is greater, but not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars
total aggregate liability. The bond may be continuous in form, and
total aggregate liability on the bond may be limited to the required
amount ((stated in)) of the bond. The bond shall be contingent on the
accounting by the surplus line broker to any person requesting ((such))
the broker to obtain insurance, for moneys or premiums collected in
connection therewith. A bond issued in accordance with RCW 48.17.250
or with this subsection will satisfy the requirements of both RCW
48.17.250 and this subsection if the limit of liability is not less
than the greater of the requirement of RCW 48.17.250 or the requirement
of this subsection.
(((5) Any bond issued pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this
section shall remain in force until the surety is released from
liability by the commissioner, or until the bond is canceled by the
surety. Without prejudice to any liability accrued prior to such
cancellation, the surety may cancel the bond upon thirty days' advance
notice in writing filed with the commissioner.
(6) If in the process of verifying fingerprints under subsection
(1) of this section, business records, or other information the
commissioner's office incurs fees or charges from another governmental
agency or from a business firm, the amount of the fees or charges shall
be paid to the commissioner's office by the applicant.
(7))) (4) Authorized surplus line brokers of a business entity may
meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section with a bond in
the name of the business entity, continuous in form, and in the amount
set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Surplus line brokers may meet the requirements of this section
with a bond in the name of an association. The association must have
been in existence for five years, have common membership, and have been
formed for a purpose other than obtaining a bond. An individual
surplus line broker remains responsible for assuring that a bond is in
effect and is for the correct amount.
(6) Members of an association may meet the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section with a bond in the name of the
association that is continuous in form and in the amounts set forth in
subsection (3) of this section for each participating member.
(7) The surety may cancel the bond and be released from further
liability thereunder upon thirty days' written notice in advance to the
principal. The cancellation does not affect any liability incurred or
accrued under the bond before the termination of the thirty-day period.
(8) Failure to have and maintain the bonds required under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section is grounds for revocation of a
license under RCW 48.15.140.
(9) If a party injured under the terms of the bond required under
subsection (3) of this section requests the surplus line broker to
provide the name of the surety and the bond number, the surplus line
broker must provide the information within three working days after
receiving the request.
(10) All records relating to the bonds required by this section
must be kept available and open to the inspection of the commissioner
at any business time.
(11) A surplus line broker's license expires if not timely renewed.
Surplus line broker licenses are valid for the time period established
by the commissioner unless suspended or revoked at an earlier date.
(12) Subject to the right of the commissioner to suspend, revoke,
or refuse to renew any surplus line broker's license as provided in
this title, the license may be renewed into another like period by
filing with the commissioner by any means acceptable to the
commissioner on or before the expiration date a request, by or on
behalf of the licensee, for the renewal accompanied by payment of the
renewal fee as specified in RCW 48.14.010.
(13) If the request and fee for renewal of a surplus line broker's
license are filed with the commissioner prior to expiration of the
existing license, the licensee may continue to act under the license,
unless sooner revoked or suspended, until the issuance of a renewal
license, or until the expiration of fifteen days after the commissioner
has refused to renew the license and has mailed notification of the
refusal to the licensee. If the request and fee for the license are
not received by the expiration date, the authority conferred by the
license ends on the expiration date.
(14) If the request for renewal of a surplus line broker's license
and payment of the fee are not received by the commissioner prior to
the expiration date, the applicant for renewal shall pay to the
commissioner in addition to the renewal fee, a surcharge as follows:
(a) For the first thirty days or part thereof of delinquency, the
surcharge is fifty percent of the renewal fee; and
(b) For the next thirty days or part thereof of delinquency, the
surcharge is one hundred percent of the renewal fee.
(15) If the request for renewal of a surplus line broker's license
and payment of the renewal fee are not received by the commissioner
after sixty days but prior to twelve months after the expiration date,
the application shall be for reinstatement of the license and the
applicant for reinstatement shall pay to the commissioner the license
fee and a surcharge of two hundred percent of the license fee.
(16) Subsections (14) and (15) of this section do not exempt any
person from any penalty provided by law for transacting business
without a valid and subsisting license.
(17) An individual surplus line broker who allows his or her
license to lapse may, within twelve months after the expiration date,
reinstate the same license without the necessity of passing a written
examination.
(18) For the purposes of this section, a "qualified individual" is
a natural person who has met all the requirements that must be met by
an individual surplus line broker.
(19) The commissioner may require any documents reasonably
necessary to verify the information contained in an application and
may, from time to time, require any licensed surplus line broker to
produce the information called for in an application for license.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.15.073 and 2001 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner may license as a surplus line broker a person
who is otherwise qualified under this code but who is not a resident of
this state, if by the laws of the state or province of his or her
residence or domicile a similar privilege is extended to residents of
this state.
(2) A person under subsection (1) of this section must meet the
same qualifications, other than residency, as any other person seeking
to be licensed as a surplus line broker under this chapter. A person
granted a nonresident surplus line broker's license must have all the
same responsibilities as any other surplus line broker and is subject
to the (a) commissioner's supervision as though resident in this state
and (b) rules adopted under this chapter.
(3) A nonresident surplus line broker's license: (a) Expires and
(b) is subject to the same renewal and fee requirements for renewal as
a resident surplus line broker licensed under RCW 48.15.070.
(4) Each licensed nonresident surplus line broker shall appoint the
commissioner as the surplus line broker's attorney to receive service
of legal process issued against the surplus line broker in this state
upon causes of action arising within this state. Service upon the
commissioner as attorney constitutes effective legal service upon the
surplus line broker.
(a) The appointment is irrevocable for as long as there could be
any cause of action against the surplus line broker arising out of the
surplus line broker's insurance transactions in this state.
(b) Duplicate copies of legal process against a surplus line broker
shall be served upon the commissioner either by a person competent to
serve a summons, or through registered mail. At the time of service
the plaintiff shall pay to the commissioner ten dollars, taxable as
costs in the action.
(c) Upon receiving service, the commissioner shall immediately send
one of the copies of the process, by registered mail with return
receipt requested, to the defendant surplus line broker at the surplus
line broker's last address of record with the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner shall keep a record of the day and hour of
service upon the commissioner of all legal process. Proceedings may
not be had against the defendant surplus line broker and the defendant
is not required to appear, plead, or answer until the expiration of
forty days after the date of service upon the commissioner.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.15.100 and 1955 c 303 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each licensed surplus line broker shall keep a full and true
record of each surplus line contract procured by him or her including
a copy of the daily report, if any, showing such of the following items
as may be applicable:
(a) Amount of the insurance;
(b) Gross premiums charged;
(c) Return premium paid, if any;
(d) Rate of premium charged upon the several items of property;
(e) Effective date of the contract, and the terms thereof;
(f) Name and address of the insurer;
(g) Name and address of the insured;
(h) Brief general description of property insured and where
located;
(i) Other information as may be required by the commissioner.
(2) All such records as to any particular transaction shall be kept
available and open to the inspection of the commissioner at any
business time during the five years next following the date of
completion of such transaction.
(3) For the purpose of ascertaining its condition, or compliance
with this title, the commissioner may as often as he or she deems
advisable, examine the accounts, records, documents, and transactions
of any surplus line broker as set forth in chapter 48.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A surplus line broker doing business under any name other than
the surplus line broker's legal name is required to register the name
in accordance with chapter 19.80 RCW and notify the commissioner before
using the assumed name.
(2) Every licensed surplus line broker shall have and maintain in
this state, or, if a nonresident surplus line broker, in this state or
in the state of the licensee's domicile, a place of business accessible
to the public. The place of business is where the surplus line broker
principally conducts transactions under that person's license. A
licensee maintaining more than one place of business in this state
shall obtain a duplicate license or licenses for each additional place,
and shall pay the full fee therefor.
(3) Any notice, order, or written communication from the
commissioner to a person licensed under this chapter which directly
affects the person's license shall be sent by mail to the person's last
address of record with the commissioner.
(4) The license or licenses of each surplus line broker shall be
displayed in a conspicuous place in that part of the place of business
which is customarily open to the public.
(5) If a surplus line broker is dealing directly with the insured
in any capacity, the surplus line broker must comply with the
disclosure requirements contained in RCW 48.17.270.
(6) Every surplus line broker or other person licensed under this
chapter shall promptly reply in writing to an inquiry of the
commissioner relative to the business of insurance. A timely response
is one that is received by the commissioner within fifteen business
days from receipt of the inquiry. Failure to make a timely response
constitutes a violation of this section.
(7) A surplus line broker shall report to the commissioner any
administrative action taken against the surplus line broker in another
jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this state within
thirty days of the final disposition of the matter. This report must
include a copy of the order, consent to order, or other relevant legal
documents.
(8) Within thirty days of the initial pretrial hearing date, a
surplus line broker shall report to the commissioner any criminal
prosecution of the surplus line broker taken in any jurisdiction. The
report must include a copy of the initial complaint filed, the order
resulting from the hearing, and any other relevant legal documents.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.15.140 and 2008 c 217 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commissioner may place on probation, revoke, suspend, or
refuse to renew any surplus line broker's license, or may levy a civil
penalty in accordance with RCW 48.17.560 or any combination of actions,
for any one or more of the following causes:
(a) If the surplus line broker fails to file the licensee's annual
statement or to remit the tax as required by this chapter; or
(b) If the surplus line broker fails to maintain an office in this
state, or to keep the records, or to allow the commissioner to examine
the licensee's records as required by this chapter; or
(c) For any of the causes for which an insurance producer's license
may be revoked under chapter 48.17 RCW.
(2) The commissioner may suspend or revoke any such license
whenever he or she deems suspension or revocation to be for the best
interests of the people of this state.
(3) The procedures provided by this code for the suspension or
revocation of insurance producers' licenses shall be applicable to
suspension or revocation of a surplus line broker's license.
(4) A surplus line broker whose license has been so revoked shall
not again be so licensed within one year thereafter, nor until any
fines or delinquent taxes owing by the formal licensee have been paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A surplus line broker shall not engage in any act prohibited by
RCW 48.05.465(2), 48.43.335(2), and chapter 48.30 RCW.
(2) A surplus line broker is entitled to the immunities granted
under RCW 48.43.105 and 48.50.070.
(3) The rights and prohibitions applicable to insurance producers
contained in RCW 48.30.260, 48.30.270, and 48.62.121 also apply to
surplus line brokers.
(4) The exemption for taxes and fees in RCW 48.62.151 does not
apply to surplus line brokers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A surplus line broker, its representative, or any person
licensed under this chapter involved in the procuring or issuance of an
insurance contract and who receives any funds representing premiums or
return premiums which belong to or should be paid to another person as
a result of or in connection with an insurance transaction is deemed to
have been received in the surplus line broker's fiduciary capacity and
shall:
(a) Report to the insurer the exact amount of consideration charged
as premium for the contract, and the amount shall likewise be shown in
the contract and in the records of the surplus line broker;
(b) Be promptly accounted for and paid to the insured, insurer, or
person entitled to the funds;
(c) Be accounted for and maintained in a separate account from all
other business and personal funds and not commingle or otherwise
combine premiums with any other moneys, except a surplus line broker
may commingle with premium funds any additional funds as the surplus
line broker may deem prudent for the purpose of advancing premiums,
establishing reserves for the paying of return premiums, or for any
contingencies as may arise in the surplus line broker's business of
receiving and transmitting premium or return premium funds.
(2) Each willful violation of this section constitutes a
misdemeanor.
(3) Any surplus line broker or other person licensed under this
chapter who, not being lawfully entitled thereto, diverts or
appropriates funds received in a fiduciary capacity or any portion
thereof to his or her own use, is guilty of theft under chapter 9A.56
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner shall immediately suspend the license or
certificate of a person issued under this chapter who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and
health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support
order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for
reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or
certificate shall be automatic upon the commissioner's receipt of a
release issued by the department of social and health services stating
that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
It is unlawful for any unauthorized person to remove, reproduce,
duplicate, or distribute in any form, any question used by the state of
Washington to determine the qualifications and competence of surplus
line brokers required by this title to be licensed. This section does
not prohibit an insurance education provider from creating and using
sample test questions in courses approved by the commissioner.
Any person violating this section is subject to penalties as
provided by RCW 48.01.080 and 48.15.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer this
chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 48.17.010 and 2007 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this ((chapter))
title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjuster" means any person who, for compensation as an
independent contractor or as an employee of an independent contractor,
or for fee or commission, investigates or reports to the adjuster's
principal relative to claims arising under insurance contracts, on
behalf solely of either the insurer or the insured. An attorney-at-law
who adjusts insurance losses from time to time incidental to the
practice of his or her profession, or an adjuster of marine losses, or
a salaried employee of an insurer or of a managing general agent, is
not deemed to be an "adjuster" for the purpose of this chapter.
(a) "Independent adjuster" means an adjuster representing the
interests of the insurer.
(b) "Public adjuster" means an adjuster employed by and
representing solely the financial interests of the insured named in the
policy.
(2) "Business entity" means a corporation, association,
partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership,
or other legal entity.
(3) "Home state" means the District of Columbia and any state or
territory of the United States or province of Canada in which an
insurance producer maintains the insurance producer's principal place
of residence or principal place of business, and is licensed to act as
an insurance producer.
(4) "Insurance education provider" means any insurer, health care
service contractor, health maintenance organization, professional
association, educational institution created by Washington statutes, or
vocational school licensed under Title 28C RCW, or independent
contractor to which the commissioner has granted authority to conduct
and certify completion of a course satisfying the insurance education
requirements of RCW 48.17.150.
(5) "Insurance producer" means a person required to be licensed
under the laws of this state to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance.
"Insurance producer" does not include title insurance agents as defined
in subsection (15) of this section or surplus line brokers licensed
under chapter 48.15 RCW.
(6) "Insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.01.050, and
includes a health care service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010
and a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(7) "License" means a document issued by the commissioner
authorizing a person to act as an insurance producer or title insurance
agent for the lines of authority specified in the document. The
license itself does not create any authority, actual, apparent, or
inherent, in the holder to represent or commit to an insurer.
(8) "Limited line credit insurance" includes credit life, credit
disability, credit property, credit unemployment, involuntary
unemployment, mortgage life, mortgage guaranty, mortgage disability,
automobile dealer gap insurance, and any other form of insurance
offered in connection with an extension of credit that is limited to
partially or wholly extinguishing the credit obligation that the
commissioner determines should be designated a form of limited line
credit insurance.
(9) "NAIC" means national association of insurance commissioners.
(10) "Negotiate" means the act of conferring directly with, or
offering advice directly to, a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a
particular contract of insurance concerning any of the substantive
benefits, terms, or conditions of the contract, provided that the
person engaged in that act either sells insurance or obtains insurance
from insurers for purchasers.
(11) "Person" means an individual or a business entity.
(12) "Sell" means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means,
for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurer.
(13) "Solicit" means attempting to sell insurance or asking or
urging a person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a
particular insurer.
(14) "Terminate" means the cancellation of the relationship between
an insurance producer and the insurer or the termination of an
insurance producer's authority to transact insurance.
(15) "Title insurance agent" means a business entity licensed under
the laws of this state and appointed by an authorized title insurance
company to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance on behalf of the title
insurance company.
(16) "Uniform business entity application" means the current
version of the NAIC uniform application for business entity insurance
license or registration for resident and nonresident business entities.
(17) "Uniform application" means the current version of the NAIC
uniform application for individual insurance producers for resident and
nonresident insurance producer licensing.

Sec. 14 RCW 48.17.060 and 2007 c 117 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance in this
state for any line or lines of insurance unless the person is licensed
for that line of authority in accordance with this chapter. A person
may not act as or hold himself or herself out to be an adjuster in this
state unless licensed by the commissioner or otherwise authorized to
act as an adjuster under this chapter.

Sec. 15 RCW 48.17.090 and 2007 c 117 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((A person)) An individual applying for a resident insurance
producer license shall make application to the commissioner on the
uniform application and declare under penalty of refusal, suspension,
or revocation of the license that the statements made in the
application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the
individual's knowledge and belief. As a part of or in connection with
the application, the individual applicant shall furnish information
concerning the applicant's identity, including fingerprints for
submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of
investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to
receive this information for a state and national criminal history
background check. If, in the process of verifying fingerprints,
business records, or other information, the commissioner's office
incurs fees or charges from another governmental agency or from a
business firm, the amount of the fees or charges shall be paid to the
commissioner's office by the applicant.
(2) Before approving the application, the commissioner shall find
that the individual:
(a) Is at least eighteen years of age;
(b) Has not committed any act that is a ground for denial,
suspension, or revocation set forth in RCW 48.17.530;
(c) Has completed a prelicensing course of study for the lines of
authority for which the person has applied;
(d) Has paid the fees set forth in RCW 48.14.010; and
(e) Has successfully passed the examinations for the lines of
authority for which the person has applied.
(3) A resident business entity acting as an insurance producer is
required to obtain an insurance producer license. Application shall be
made using the uniform business entity application, and the individual
signing the application shall declare under penalty of refusal,
suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made in
the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the
individual's knowledge and belief. Before approving the application,
the commissioner shall find that:
(a) The business entity has paid the fees set forth in RCW
48.14.010; ((and))
(b) The business entity has designated a licensed insurance
producer responsible for the business entity's compliance with the
insurance laws and rules of this state; and
(c) The business entity has not committed any act that is a ground
for denial, suspension, or revocation set forth in RCW 48.17.530.
(4) A resident business entity acting as a title insurance agent is
required to obtain a title insurance agent license. Application shall
be made to the commissioner on the uniform business entity application,
and the individual ((signing)) submitting the application shall declare
under penalty of refusal, suspension, or revocation of the license that
the statements made in the application are true, correct, and complete
to the best of the individual's knowledge and belief. Before approving
the application, the commissioner shall find that the business entity:
(a) Has paid the fees set forth in RCW 48.14.010;
(b) Maintains a lawfully established place of business in this
state ((or holds a corresponding license issued by the state of its
principal place of business, and has complied with the laws of this
state governing the admission of foreign corporations));
(c) Is empowered to be a title insurance agent under a members'
agreement, if a limited liability company, or by its articles of
incorporation;
(d) Is appointed as an agent by one or more authorized title
insurance companies; and
(e) Has complied with RCW 48.29.155 and 48.29.160.
(5) The commissioner may require any documents reasonably necessary
to verify the information contained in an application and may, from
time to time, require any licensed insurance producer((,)) or title
insurance agent((, or adjuster)) to produce the information called for
in an application for license.

Sec. 16 RCW 48.17.110 and 2007 c 117 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A resident individual applying for an insurance producer
license or an individual applying for an adjuster license shall pass a
written examination unless exempt under this section or RCW 48.17.175.
The examination shall test the knowledge of the individual concerning
the lines of authority for which application is made, the duties and
responsibilities of an insurance producer or adjuster, and the
insurance laws and rules of this state. Examinations required by this
section shall be developed and conducted under the rules prescribed by
the commissioner. The commissioner shall prepare, or approve, and make
available a manual specifying in general terms the subjects which may
be covered in any examination for a particular license.
(2) The following are exempt from the examination requirement:
(a) Applicants for licenses under RCW 48.17.170(1) (g), (h), and
(i), at the discretion of the commissioner;
(b) ((Applicants who within the two-year period next preceding date
of application have been licensed as a resident in this state under a
license requiring qualifications similar to qualifications required by
the license applied for, or who have successfully completed a course of
study recognized as a mark of distinction by the insurance industry,
and who are deemed by the commissioner to be fully qualified and
competent;
(c))) Applicants for an adjuster's license who for a period of one
year, a portion of which was in the year next preceding the date of
application, have been a full-time salaried employee of an insurer or
of a managing general agent to adjust, investigate, or report claims
arising under insurance contracts;
(((d))) (c) Applicants for a license as a nonresident adjuster who
are duly licensed in another state and who are deemed by the
commissioner to be fully qualified ((by past experience to deal in
ocean marine and related coverages)) and competent for a similar
license in this state.
(3) The commissioner may make arrangements, including contracting
with an outside testing service, for administering examinations.
(4) The commissioner may, at any time, require any licensed
insurance producer or adjuster to take and successfully pass an
examination testing the licensee's competence and qualifications as a
condition to the continuance or renewal of a license, if the licensee
has been guilty of violating this title, or has so conducted affairs
under an insurance license as to cause the commissioner to reasonably
desire further evidence of the licensee's qualifications.

Sec. 17 RCW 48.17.150 and 2007 c 117 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall by rule establish minimum continuing
education requirements for the renewal or reissuance of a license to an
insurance producer.
(2) The commissioner shall require that continuing education
courses will be made available on a statewide basis in order to ensure
that persons residing in all geographical areas of this state will have
a reasonable opportunity to attend such courses.
(((2))) (3) The continuing education requirements must be
appropriate to the license for the lines of authority specified in RCW
48.17.170 or by rule.
(((3) The continuing education requirements may be waived by the
commissioner for good cause shown.))

Sec. 18 RCW 48.17.160 and 2007 c 117 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An insurance producer or title insurance agent shall not act as
an agent of an insurer unless the insurance producer or title insurance
agent becomes an appointed agent of that insurer. An insurance
producer who is not acting as an agent of an insurer is not required to
become appointed.
(2) To appoint an insurance producer or title insurance agent as
its agent, the appointing insurer shall file, in a format approved by
the commissioner, a notice of appointment within fifteen days from the
date the agency contract is executed or ((when)) the first insurance
application is submitted, whichever is ((later)) earlier.
(3) Upon receipt of the notice of appointment, the commissioner
shall verify within a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty days, that
the insurance producer or title insurance agent is eligible for
appointment. If the insurance producer or title insurance agent is
determined to be ineligible for appointment, the commissioner shall
notify the insurer within ten days of the determination.
(4) An insurer shall pay an appointment fee, in the amount and
method of payment set forth in RCW 48.14.010, for each insurance
producer or title insurance agent appointed by the insurer.
(5) Contingent upon payment of the appointment renewal fee as set
forth in RCW 48.14.010, an appointment shall be effective until
terminated by the ((insurance company)) insurer, insurance producer, or
title insurance agent and notice has been given to the commissioner as
required by RCW 48.17.595.

Sec. 19 RCW 48.17.170 and 2007 c 117 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless denied licensure under RCW 48.17.530, persons who have
met the requirements of RCW 48.17.090 and 48.17.110 shall be issued an
insurance producer license. An insurance producer may receive a
license in one or more of the following lines of authority:
(a) "Life," which is insurance coverage on human lives, including
benefits of endowment and annuities, and may include benefits in the
event of death or dismemberment by accident and benefits for disability
income;
(b) "Disability," which is insurance coverage for accident, health,
and disability or sickness, bodily injury, or accidental death, and may
include benefits for disability income;
(c) "Property," which is insurance coverage for the direct or
consequential loss or damage to property of every kind;
(d) "Casualty," which is insurance coverage against legal
liability, including that for death, injury, or disability or damage to
real or personal property;
(e) "Variable life and variable annuity products," which is
insurance coverage provided under variable life insurance contracts,
variable annuities, or any other life insurance or annuity product that
reflects the investment experience of a separate account;
(f) "Personal lines," which is property and casualty insurance
coverage sold to individuals and families for primarily noncommercial
purposes;
(g) Limited lines:
(i) Surety;
(ii) Limited line credit insurance;
(iii) Travel;
(h) Specialty lines:
(i) Communications equipment or services;
(ii) Rental car; or
(i) Any other line of insurance permitted under state laws or
rules.
(2) Unless denied licensure under RCW 48.17.530, persons who have
met the requirements of RCW 48.17.090(4) shall be issued a title
insurance agent license.
(3) All insurance producers', title insurance agents', and
adjusters' licenses issued by the commissioner shall be valid for the
time period established by the commissioner unless suspended or revoked
at an earlier date.
(4) Subject to the right of the commissioner to suspend, revoke, or
refuse to renew any insurance producer's, title insurance agent's, or
adjuster's license as provided in this title, the license may be
renewed into another like period by filing with the commissioner by any
means acceptable to the commissioner on or before the expiration date
a request, by or on behalf of the licensee, for such renewal
accompanied by payment of the renewal fee as specified in RCW
48.14.010.
(5) If the request and fee for renewal of an insurance producer's,
title insurance agent's, or adjuster's license ((is)) are filed with
the commissioner prior to expiration of the existing license, the
licensee may continue to act under such license, unless sooner revoked
or suspended, until the issuance of a renewal license, or until the
expiration of fifteen days after the commissioner has refused to renew
the license and has mailed ((order)) notification of such refusal to
the licensee. ((Any request for renewal not so filed until after date
of expiration may be considered by the commissioner as an application
for a new license.)) If the request and fee for the license renewal are
not received by the expiration date, the authority conferred by the
license ends on the expiration date.
(6) ((For all licenses,)) If the request for renewal of an
insurance producer's, title insurance agent's, or adjuster's license
((or)) and payment of the fee ((is)) are not received by the
commissioner prior to the expiration date ((as required under
subsection (4) of this section)), the ((insurer or)) applicant for
renewal shall pay to the commissioner ((and the commissioner shall
collect)), in addition to the ((regular)) renewal fee, a surcharge as
follows:
(a) For the first thirty days or part thereof of delinquency, the
surcharge is fifty percent of the renewal fee; ((for all delinquencies
extending more than thirty days,))
(b) For the next thirty days or part thereof of delinquency, the
surcharge is one hundred percent of the renewal fee. ((A surcharge of
two hundred percent of the renewal fee is required for any delinquency
extending more than sixty days after the expiration date. This
subsection shall))
(7) If the request for renewal of an insurance producer's, title
insurance agent's, or adjuster's license and fee for the renewal are
received by the commissioner after sixty days but prior to twelve
months after the expiration date, the application is for reinstatement
of the license and the applicant for reinstatement must pay to the
commissioner the license fee and a surcharge of two hundred percent of
the license fee.
(8) Subsections (6) and (7) of this section do not exempt any
person from any penalty provided by law for transacting business
without a valid and subsisting license or appointment((, or affect the
commissioner's right, at his or her discretion, to consider such
delinquent application as one for a new license or appointment)).
(((7))) (9) An individual insurance producer, title insurance
agent, or adjuster who allows his or her license to lapse may, within
twelve months after the expiration date, reinstate the same license
without the necessity of passing a written examination.
(((8))) (10) A licensed insurance producer who is unable to comply
with license renewal procedures due to military service or some other
extenuating circumstance such as a long-term medical disability, may
request a waiver of those procedures. The producer may also request a
waiver of any examination requirement or any other fine or sanction
imposed for failure to comply with renewal procedures.
(((9))) (11) The license shall contain the licensee's name,
address, personal identification number, and the date of issuance,
lines of authority, expiration date, and any other information the
commissioner deems necessary.
(((10))) (12) Licensees shall inform the commissioner by any means
acceptable to the commissioner of a change of address within thirty
days of the change. Failure to timely inform the commissioner of a
change in legal name or address may result in a penalty under either
RCW 48.17.530 or 48.17.560, or both.

Sec. 20 RCW 48.17.173 and 2007 c 117 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless denied licensure under RCW 48.17.530, a nonresident
person shall receive a nonresident producer license for the line or
lines of authority under RCW 48.17.170 which is substantially
equivalent to the line or lines of authority granted to the nonresident
person in the person's home state if:
(a) The person is currently licensed as a resident and in good
standing in the person's home state;
(b) The person has submitted the proper request for licensure and
has paid the fees required by RCW 48.14.010;
(c) The person has submitted or transmitted to the commissioner
((the application for licensure that the person submitted to the
person's home state, or in lieu,)) a completed uniform application;
(d) The person's home state awards nonresident producer licenses to
residents of this state on the same basis; and
(e) ((The person)) A business entity, it has designated an
individual licensed insurance producer responsible for the business
entity's compliance with the insurance laws and rules of this state.
(2) An individual, as part of the request for licensure, ((has
furnished)) shall furnish information concerning the ((person's))
individual's identity, including fingerprints for submission to the
Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, and any
governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this information
for a state and national criminal history background check. If, in the
process of verifying fingerprints, business records, or other
information, the commissioner's office incurs fees or charges from
another governmental agency or from a business firm, the amount of the
fees or charges shall be paid to the commissioner's office by the
applicant.
(((2))) (3) A nonresident business entity acting as a title
insurance agent is required to obtain a title insurance agent license.
Application shall be made to the commissioner on the uniform business
entity application, and the individual submitting the application shall
declare under penalty of refusal, suspension, or revocation of the
license that the statements made in the application are true, correct,
and complete to the best of the individual's knowledge and belief.
Before approving the application, the commissioner must find that the
business entity:
(a) Has paid the fees set forth in RCW 48.14.010;
(b) Maintains a lawfully established place of business in its home
state and holds a corresponding license issued by the state of its
principal place of business, and has complied with the laws of this
state governing the admission of foreign corporations;
(c) Is empowered to be a title agent under a members' agreement, if
a limited liability company, or by its articles of incorporation;
(d) Is appointed as an agent by one or more authorized title
insurance companies; and
(e) Has complied with RCW 48.29.155 and 48.29.160.
(4) The commissioner shall waive any license application
requirements for a nonresident license applicant with a valid license
from the applicant's home state, except the requirements imposed by
this section, if the applicant's home state awards nonresident licenses
to residents of this state on the same basis.
(((3))) (5) A nonresident insurance producer's satisfaction of the
nonresident insurance producer's home state's continuing education
requirements for licensed insurance producers shall constitute
satisfaction of this state's continuing education requirements if the
nonresident producer's home state recognizes the satisfaction of its
continuing education requirements imposed upon producers from this
state on the same basis.
(((4))) (6) The commissioner shall waive the requirement for
providing fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol,
the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or
entity authorized to receive this information for a state and national
criminal history background check, if the person possesses a valid
insurance producer's or surplus line broker's license from the person's
home state and the person's home state requires submission of
information concerning a person's identity, including fingerprints for
the licensure of its resident insurance producers or surplus line
brokers, respectively.
(((5))) (7) The commissioner may verify the producer's licensing
status through the producer database maintained by the NAIC, its
affiliates, or subsidiaries.
(((6))) (8) A nonresident producer who moves from one state to
another state or a resident producer who moves from this state to
another state shall file a change of address and provide certification
from the new resident state within thirty days of the change of legal
residence. No fee or license application is required.
(((7) A person licensed as a surplus lines producer in the person's
home state and complying with the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section and chapter 48.15 RCW shall receive a nonresident surplus
line broker license under subsection (1) of this section.
(8))) (9) A person licensed as a limited line credit insurance or
other type of limited lines producer in the person's home state and who
complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall
receive a nonresident limited lines producer license, under subsection
(1) of this section, granting the same scope of authority as granted
under the license issued by the producer's home state. For the purpose
of this subsection, limited line insurance is any authority granted by
the home state which restricts the authority of the license to the
lines set out in RCW 48.17.170(1)(g).
(((9))) (10) Each licensed nonresident insurance producer or title
insurance agent shall appoint the commissioner as the insurance
producer's or title insurance agent's attorney to receive service of
legal process issued against the insurance producer or title insurance
agent in this state upon causes of action arising within this state.
Service upon the commissioner as attorney shall constitute effective
legal service upon the insurance producer or title insurance agent.
(a) The appointment shall be irrevocable for as long as there could
be any cause of action against the insurance producer or title
insurance agent arising out of the insurance producer's or title
insurance agent's insurance transactions in this state.
(b) Duplicate copies of such legal process against such insurance
producer or title insurance agent shall be served upon the commissioner
either by a person competent to serve a summons, or through registered
mail. At the time of such service the plaintiff shall pay to the
commissioner ten dollars, taxable as costs in the action.
(c) Upon receiving such service, the commissioner shall forthwith
send one of the copies of the process, by registered mail with return
receipt requested, to the defendant insurance producer or title
insurance agent at the insurance producer's or title insurance agent's
last address of record with the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner shall keep a record of the day and hour of
service upon the commissioner of all such legal process. No
proceedings shall be had against the defendant insurance producer or
title insurance agent, and the defendant shall not be required to
appear, plead, or answer until the expiration of forty days after the
date of service upon the commissioner.
(11) The commissioner may require any documents reasonably
necessary to verify the information contained in an application and
may, from time to time, require any licensed insurance producer or
title insurance agent to produce the information called for in an
application for license.

Sec. 21 RCW 48.17.250 and 2007 c 117 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every insurance producer licensed under this chapter on or
after July 1, 2009, who places insurance either directly or indirectly
with an insurer with which the insurance producer is not appointed as
an agent must maintain in force while so licensed a bond in favor of
the people of the state of Washington or a named insured such that the
people of Washington are covered by the bond, executed by an authorized
corporate surety approved by the commissioner, in the amount of two
thousand five hundred dollars, or five percent of the premiums brokered
in the previous calendar year, whichever is greater, but not to exceed
one hundred thousand dollars total aggregate liability. The bond may
be continuous in form, and total aggregate liability on the bond may be
limited to the required amount of the bond. The bond shall be
contingent on the accounting by the insurance producer to any person
requesting the insurance producer to obtain insurance, for moneys or
premiums collected in connection therewith.
(2) Authorized insurance producers of a business entity may meet
the requirements of this section with a bond in the name of the
business entity, continuous in form, and in the amounts set forth in
subsection (1) of this section. Insurance producers may meet the
requirements of this section with a bond in the name of an association.
The association must have been in existence for five years, have common
membership, and have been formed for a purpose other than obtaining a
bond. An individual insurance producer remains responsible for
assuring that a bond is in effect and is for the correct amount.
(3) The surety may cancel the bond and be released from further
liability thereunder upon thirty days' written notice in advance to the
principal. The cancellation does not affect any liability incurred or
accrued under the bond before the termination of the thirty-day period.
(4) The insurance producer's license may be revoked if the
insurance producer acts without a bond that is required under this
section.
(5) If a party injured under the terms of the bond requests the
insurance producer to provide the name of the surety and the bond
number, the insurance producer must provide the information within
three working days after receiving the request.
(6) Members of an association may meet the requirements of this
section ((for all of its members)) with a bond in the name of the
association that is continuous in form and in the amounts set forth in
subsection (1) of this section for each participating member.
(7) All records relating to the bond required by this section shall
be kept available and open to the inspection of the commissioner at any
business time.

Sec. 22 RCW 48.17.270 and 2007 c 117 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The sole relationship between an insurance producer and an
insurer as to which the insurance producer is appointed as an agent
shall, as to transactions arising during the existence of such agency
appointment, be that of insurer and agent.
(2) Unless the agency-insurer agreement provides to the contrary,
an insurance producer may receive the following compensation:
(a) A commission paid by the insurer;
(b) A fee paid by the insured; or
(c) A combination of commission paid by the insurer and a fee paid
by the insured from which an insurance producer may offset or reimburse
the insured for all or part of the fee.
(3) If the compensation received by an insurance producer who is
dealing directly with the insured includes a fee, for each policy, the
insurance producer must disclose in writing to the insured:
(a) The full amount of the fee paid by the insured;
(b) The full amount of any commission paid to the insurance
producer by the insurer, if one is received;
(c) An explanation of any offset or reimbursement of fees or
commissions as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section;
(d) When the insurance producer may receive additional commission,
notice that states the insurance producer:
(i) May receive additional commission in the form of future
incentive compensation from the insurer, including contingent
commissions and other awards and bonuses based on factors that
typically include the total sales volume, growth, profitability, and
retention of business placed by the insurance producer with the
insurer, and incentive compensation is only paid if the performance
criteria established in the agency-insurer agreement is met by the
insurance producer or the business entity with which the insurance
producer is affiliated; and
(ii) Will furnish to the insured or prospective insured specific
information relating to additional commission upon request; and
(e) The full name of the insurer that may pay any commission to the
insurance producer.
(4) Written disclosure of compensation as required by subsection
(3) of this section shall be provided by the insurance producer to the
insured prior to the sale of the policy.
(5) Written disclosure as required by subsection (3) of this
section must be signed by the insurance producer and the insured, and
the writing must be retained by the insurance producer for five years.
For the purposes of this section, written disclosure means the
insured's written consent obtained prior to the insured's purchase of
insurance. In the case of a purchase over the telephone or by
electronic means for which written consent cannot be reasonably
obtained, consent documented by the insurance producer shall be
acceptable.

Sec. 23 RCW 48.17.380 and 2007 c 117 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for a license to be an adjuster shall be made to
the commissioner upon forms furnished by the commissioner. As a part
of or in connection with the application, an individual applicant shall
furnish information concerning his or her identity, including
fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal
bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity
authorized to receive this information for a state and national
criminal history background check, personal history, experience,
business record, purposes, and other pertinent facts, as the
commissioner may reasonably require. If, in the process of verifying
fingerprints, business records, or other information, the
commissioner's office incurs fees or charges from another governmental
agency or from a business firm, the amount of the fees or charges must
be paid to the commissioner's office by the applicant.
(2) Any person willfully misrepresenting any fact required to be
disclosed in any application shall be liable to penalties as provided
by this code.
(3) The commissioner shall license as an adjuster only an
individual or business entity which has otherwise complied with this
code therefor and the individual or responsible officer of the business
entity has furnished evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the
individual or responsible officer of the business entity is qualified
as follows:
(((1))) (a) Is eighteen or more years of age((.));
(((2))) (b) Is a bona fide resident of this state, or is a resident
of a state which will permit residents of this state to act as
adjusters in such other state((.));
(((3))) (c) Is a trustworthy person((.));
(((4))) (d) Has had experience or special education or training
with reference to the handling of loss claims under insurance
contracts, of sufficient duration and extent reasonably to make the
individual or responsible officer of the business entity competent to
fulfill the responsibilities of an adjuster((.));
(((5))) (e) Has successfully passed any examination as required
under this chapter((.));
(((6))) (f) If for a public adjuster's license, has filed the bond
required by RCW 48.17.430.
(4) The commissioner may require any documents reasonably necessary
to verify the information contained in an application and may, from
time to time, require any licensed adjuster to produce the information
called for in an application for a license.

Sec. 24 RCW 48.17.565 and 2007 c 117 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
If an investigation of any insurance education provider culminates
in a finding by the commissioner or by any court of competent
jurisdiction, that the insurance education provider has failed to
comply with or has violated any statute or regulation pertaining to
insurance education, the insurance education provider shall pay the
expenses reasonably attributable and allocable to such investigation.
(1) The commissioner shall calculate such expenses and render a
bill therefor by registered mail to the insurance education provider.
Within thirty days after receipt of such bill, the insurance education
provider shall pay the full amount to the commissioner. The
commissioner shall transmit such payment to the state treasurer. The
state treasurer shall credit the payment to the office of the insurance
commissioner regulatory account, treating such payment as recovery of
a prior expenditure.
(2) In any action brought under this section, if the ((insurance))
commissioner prevails, the court may award to the office of the
commissioner all costs of the action, including a reasonable attorneys'
fee to be fixed by the court.

Sec. 25 RCW 48.30.260 and 2008 c 217 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every debtor or borrower, when property insurance of any kind
is required in connection with the debt or loan, shall have reasonable
opportunity and choice in the selection of the insurance producer,
surplus line broker, and insurer through whom such insurance is to be
placed; but only if the insurance is properly provided for the
protection of the creditor or lender, whether by policy or binder, not
later than at commencement of risk as to such property as respects such
creditor or lender, and in the case of renewal of insurance, only if
the renewal policy, or a proper binder therefor containing a brief
description of the coverage bound and the identity of the insurer in
which the coverage is bound, is delivered to the creditor or lender not
later than thirty days prior to the renewal date.
(2) Every person who lends money or extends credit and who solicits
insurance on real and personal property must explain to the borrower in
prominently displayed writing that the insurance related to such loan
or credit extension may be purchased from an insurer, surplus line
broker, or insurance producer of the borrower's choice, subject only to
the lender's right to reject a given insurer, surplus line broker, or
insurance producer as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(3) No person who lends money or extends credit may:
(a) Solicit insurance for the protection of property, after a
person indicates interest in securing a loan or credit extension, until
such person has received a commitment from the lender as to a loan or
credit extension;
(b) Unreasonably reject a contract of insurance furnished by the
borrower for the protection of the property securing the credit or
lien. A rejection shall not be deemed unreasonable if it is based on
reasonable standards, uniformly applied, relating to the extent of
coverage required and the financial soundness and the services of an
insurer. Such standards shall not discriminate against any particular
type of insurer, nor shall such standards call for rejection of an
insurance contract because the contract contains coverage in addition
to that required in the credit transaction;
(c) Require that any borrower, mortgagor, purchaser, insurer,
surplus line broker, or insurance producer pay a separate charge, in
connection with the handling of any contract of insurance required as
security for a loan, or pay a separate charge to substitute the
insurance policy of one insurer for that of another. This subsection
does not include the interest which may be charged on premium loans or
premium advancements in accordance with the terms of the loan or credit
document;
(d) Use or disclose, without the prior written consent of the
borrower, mortgagor, or purchaser taken at a time other than the making
of the loan or extension of credit, information relative to a contract
of insurance which is required by the credit transaction, for the
purpose of replacing such insurance;
(e) Require any procedures or conditions of duly licensed insurance
producers, surplus line brokers, or insurers not customarily required
of those insurance producers, surplus line brokers, or insurers
affiliated or in any way connected with the person who lends money or
extends credit; or
(f) Require property insurance in an amount in excess of the amount
which could reasonably be expected to be paid under the policy, or
combination of policies, in the event of a loss.
(4) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent a person who
lends money or extends credit from placing insurance on real or
personal property in the event the mortgagor, borrower, or purchaser
has failed to provide required insurance in accordance with the terms
of the loan or credit document.
(5) Nothing contained in this section shall apply to credit life or
credit disability insurance.

Sec. 26 RCW 48.30.270 and 2008 c 217 s 42 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No officer or employee of this state, or of any public agency,
public authority or public corporation except a public corporation or
public authority created pursuant to agreement or compact with another
state, and no person acting or purporting to act on behalf of such
officer or employee, or public agency or public authority or public
corporation, shall, with respect to any public building or construction
contract which is about to be, or which has been competitively bid,
require the bidder to make application to, or to furnish financial data
to, or to obtain or procure, any of the surety bonds or contracts of
insurance specified in connection with such contract, or specified by
any law, general, special or local, from a particular insurer, surplus
line broker, or insurance producer.
(2) No such officer or employee or any person, acting or purporting
to act on behalf of such officer or employee shall negotiate, make
application for, obtain or procure any of such surety bonds or
contracts of insurance, except contracts of insurance for builder's
risk or owner's protective liability, which can be obtained or procured
by the bidder, contractor or subcontractor.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent the exercise by
such officer or employee on behalf of the state or such public agency,
public authority, or public corporation of its right to approve the
form, sufficiency or manner or execution of the surety bonds or
contracts of insurance furnished by the insurer selected by the bidder
to underwrite such bonds, or contracts of insurance.
(4) Any provisions in any invitation for bids, or in any of the
contract documents, in conflict with this section are declared to be
contrary to the public policy of this state.
(5) A violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties
provided by RCW 48.01.080.
(6) This section shall not apply to public construction projects,
when the actual or estimated aggregate value of the project, exclusive
of insurance and surety costs, exceeds two hundred million dollars.
For purposes of applying the two hundred million dollar threshold set
forth in this subsection, the term "public construction project" means
a project that has a public owner and has phases, segments, or
component parts relating to a common geographic site or public
transportation system, but does not include the aggregation of
unrelated construction projects.
(7) The exclusions specified in subsection (6) of this section do
not apply to surety bonds.

Sec. 27 RCW 48.31.111 and 2008 c 217 s 43 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A delinquency proceeding may not be commenced under this
chapter by anyone other than the commissioner of this state, and no
court has jurisdiction to entertain a proceeding commenced by another
person.
(2) No court of this state has jurisdiction to entertain a
complaint praying for the dissolution, liquidation, rehabilitation,
sequestration, conservation, or receivership of an insurer, or praying
for an injunction or restraining order or other relief preliminary to,
incidental to, or relating to the proceedings, other than in accordance
with this chapter.
(3) In addition to other grounds for jurisdiction provided by the
law of this state, a court of this state having jurisdiction of the
subject matter has jurisdiction over a person served under the rules of
civil procedure or other applicable provisions of law in an action
brought by the receiver of a domestic insurer or an alien insurer
domiciled in this state:
(a) If the person served is an insurance producer, title insurance
agent, surplus line broker, or other person who has written policies of
insurance for or has acted in any manner on behalf of an insurer
against which a delinquency proceeding has been instituted, in an
action resulting from or incident to such a relationship with the
insurer;
(b) If the person served is a reinsurer who has entered into a
contract of reinsurance with an insurer against which a delinquency
proceeding has been instituted, or is an insurance producer of or for
the reinsurer, in an action on or incident to the reinsurance contract;
(c) If the person served is or has been an officer, director,
manager, trustee, organizer, promoter, or other person in a position of
comparable authority or influence over an insurer against which a
delinquency proceeding has been instituted, in an action resulting from
or incident to such a relationship with the insurer;
(d) If the person served is or was at the time of the institution
of the delinquency proceeding against the insurer holding assets in
which the receiver claims an interest on behalf of the insurer, in an
action concerning the assets; or
(e) If the person served is obligated to the insurer in any way, in
an action on or incident to the obligation.
(4) If the court on motion of a party finds that an action should
as a matter of substantial justice be tried in a forum outside this
state, the court may enter an appropriate order to stay further
proceedings on the action in this state.

Sec. 28 RCW 48.31.141 and 2008 c 217 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An insurance producer, title insurance agent, surplus line
broker, premium finance company, or any other person, other than the
policy owner or the insured, responsible for the payment of a premium
is obligated to pay any unpaid premium for the full policy term due the
insurer at the time of the declaration of insolvency, whether earned or
unearned, as shown on the records of the insurer. The liquidator also
has the right to recover from the person a part of an unearned premium
that represents commission of the person. Credits or setoffs or both
may not be allowed to an insurance producer, title insurance agent,
surplus line broker, or premium finance company for amounts advanced to
the insurer by the insurance producer, title insurance agent, surplus
line broker, or premium finance company on behalf of, but in the
absence of a payment by, the policy owner or the insured.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection, the insurance producer,
title insurance agent, surplus line broker, premium finance company, or
other person is not liable for uncollected unearned premium of the
insurer. A presumption exists that the premium as shown on the books
of the insurer is collected, and the burden is upon the insurance
producer, title insurance agent, surplus line broker, premium finance
company, or other person to demonstrate by a preponderance of the
evidence that the unearned premium was not actually collected. For
purposes of this subsection, "unearned premium" means that portion of
an insurance premium covering the unexpired term of the policy or the
unexpired period of the policy period.
(c) An insured is obligated to pay any unpaid earned premium due
the insurer at the time of the declaration of insolvency, as shown on
the records of the insurer.
(2) Upon a violation of this section, the commissioner may pursue
either one or both of the following courses of action:
(a) Suspend or revoke or refuse to renew the licenses of the
offending party or parties;
(b) Impose a penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each
violation.
(3) Before the commissioner may take an action as set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, he or she shall give written notice to
the person accused of violating the law, stating specifically the
nature of the alleged violation, and fixing a time and place, at least
ten days thereafter, when a hearing on the matter shall be held. After
the hearing, or upon failure of the accused to appear at the hearing,
the commissioner, if he or she finds a violation, shall impose those
penalties under subsection (2) of this section that he or she deems
advisable.
(4) When the commissioner takes action in any or all of the ways
set out in subsection (2) of this section, the party aggrieved has the
rights granted under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 29 RCW 48.62.121 and 2008 c 217 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No employee or official of a local government entity may
directly or indirectly receive anything of value for services rendered
in connection with the operation and management of a self-insurance
program other than the salary and benefits provided by his or her
employer or the reimbursement of expenses reasonably incurred in
furtherance of the operation or management of the program. No employee
or official of a local government entity may accept or solicit anything
of value for personal benefit or for the benefit of others under
circumstances in which it can be reasonably inferred that the
employee's or official's independence of judgment is impaired with
respect to the management and operation of the program.
(2)(a) No local government entity may participate in a joint self-insurance program in which local government entities do not retain
complete governing control. This prohibition does not apply to:
(i) Local government contribution to a self-insured employee health
and welfare benefits plan otherwise authorized and governed by state
statute;
(ii) Local government participation in a multistate joint program
where control is shared with local government entities from other
states; or
(iii) Local government contribution to a self-insured employee
health and welfare benefit trust in which the local government shares
governing control with their employees.
(b) If a local government self-insured health and welfare benefit
program, established by the local government as a trust, shares
governing control of the trust with its employees:
(i) The local government must maintain at least a fifty percent
voting control of the trust;
(ii) No more than one voting, nonemployee, union representative
selected by employees may serve as a trustee; and
(iii) The trust agreement must contain provisions for resolution of
any deadlock in the administration of the trust.
(3) Moneys made available and moneys expended by school districts
and educational service districts for self-insurance under this chapter
are subject to such rules of the superintendent of public instruction
as the superintendent may adopt governing budgeting and accounting.
However, the superintendent shall ensure that the rules are consistent
with those adopted by the state risk manager for the management and
operation of self-insurance programs.
(4) RCW 48.30.140, 48.30.150, 48.30.155, and 48.30.157 apply to the
use of insurance producers and surplus line brokers by local government
self-insurance programs.
(5) Every individual and joint local government self-insured health
and welfare benefits program that provides comprehensive coverage for
health care services shall include mandated benefits that the state
health care authority is required to provide under RCW 41.05.170 and
41.05.180. The state risk manager may adopt rules identifying the
mandated benefits.
(6) An employee health and welfare benefit program established as
a trust shall contain a provision that trust funds be expended only for
purposes of the trust consistent with statutes and rules governing the
local government or governments creating the trust.

Sec. 30 RCW 48.62.151 and 2008 c 217 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
A joint self-insurance program approved in accordance with this
chapter is exempt from insurance premium taxes, from fees assessed
under chapter 48.02 RCW, from chapters 48.32 and 48.32A RCW, from
business and occupations taxes imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW, and
from any assigned risk plan or joint underwriting association otherwise
required by law. This section does not apply to and no exemption is
provided for insurance companies issuing policies to cover program
risks, nor does it apply to or provide an exemption for third-party
administrators, surplus line brokers, or insurance producers serving
the self-insurance program.

Sec. 31 RCW 48.99.030 and 2008 c 217 s 84 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever under the laws of this state an ancillary receiver is
to be appointed in delinquency proceedings for an insurer not domiciled
in this state, the court shall appoint the commissioner as ancillary
receiver. The commissioner shall file a petition requesting the
appointment (a) if he or she finds that there are sufficient assets of
such insurer located in this state to justify the appointment of an
ancillary receiver, or (b) if ten or more persons resident in this
state having claims against such insurer file a petition with the
commissioner requesting the appointment of such ancillary receiver.
(2) The domiciliary receiver for the purpose of liquidating an
insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state, shall be vested by operation
of law with the title to all of the property, contracts, and rights of
action, and all of the books and records of the insurer located in this
state, and he or she shall have the immediate right to recover balances
due from local insurance producers and surplus line brokers and to
obtain possession of any books and records of the insurer found in this
state. He or she shall also be entitled to recover the other assets of
the insurer located in this state except that upon the appointment of
an ancillary receiver in this state, the ancillary receiver shall
during the ancillary receivership proceedings have the sole right to
recover such other assets. The ancillary receiver shall, as soon as
practicable, liquidate from their respective securities those special
deposit claims and secured claims which are proved and allowed in the
ancillary proceedings in this state, and shall pay the necessary
expenses of the proceedings. All remaining assets shall promptly
transfer to the domiciliary receiver. Subject to the foregoing
provisions the ancillary receiver and his or her deputies shall have
the same powers and be subject to the same duties with respect to the
administration of such assets, as a receiver of an insurer domiciled in
this state.
(3) The domiciliary receiver of an insurer domiciled in a
reciprocal state may sue in this state to recover any assets of such
insurer to which he or she may be entitled under the laws of this
state.

Sec. 32 RCW 48.135.010 and 2008 c 217 s 97 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Insurance fraud" means an act or omission committed by a
person who, knowingly, and with intent to defraud, commits, or conceals
any material information concerning, one or more of the following:
(a) Presenting, causing to be presented, or preparing with
knowledge or belief that it will be presented to or by an insurer
((or)), insurance producer, or surplus line broker, false information
as part of, in support of, or concerning a fact material to one or more
of the following:
(i) An application for the issuance or renewal of an insurance
policy;
(ii) The rating of an insurance policy or contract;
(iii) A claim for payment or benefit pursuant to an insurance
policy;
(iv) Premiums paid on an insurance policy;
(v) Payments made in accordance with the terms of an insurance
policy; or
(vi) The reinstatement of an insurance policy;
(b) Willful embezzlement, abstracting, purloining, or conversion of
moneys, funds, premiums, credits, or other property of an insurer or
person engaged in the business of insurance; or
(c) Attempting to commit, aiding or abetting in the commission of,
or conspiracy to commit the acts or omissions specified in this
subsection.
The definition of insurance fraud is for illustrative purposes only
under this chapter to describe the nature of the behavior to be
reported and investigated, and is not intended in any manner to create
or modify the definition of any existing criminal acts nor to create or
modify the burdens of proof in any criminal prosecution brought as a
result of an investigation under this chapter.
(2) "Insurer" means an insurance company authorized under chapter
48.05 RCW, a health care service contractor registered under chapter
48.44 RCW, and a health care maintenance organization registered under
chapter 48.46 RCW.

Sec. 33 RCW 51.12.020 and 2008 c 217 s 98 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following are the only employments which shall not be included
within the mandatory coverage of this title:
(1) Any person employed as a domestic servant in a private home by
an employer who has less than two employees regularly employed forty or
more hours a week in such employment.
(2) Any person employed to do gardening, maintenance, or repair, in
or about the private home of the employer. For the purposes of this
subsection, "maintenance" means the work of keeping in proper
condition, "repair" means to restore to sound condition after damage,
and "private home" means a person's place of residence.
(3) A person whose employment is not in the course of the trade,
business, or profession of his or her employer and is not in or about
the private home of the employer.
(4) Any person performing services in return for aid or sustenance
only, received from any religious or charitable organization.
(5) Sole proprietors or partners.
(6) Any child under eighteen years of age employed by his or her
parent or parents in agricultural activities on the family farm.
(7) Jockeys while participating in or preparing horses for race
meets licensed by the Washington horse racing commission pursuant to
chapter 67.16 RCW.
(8)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, any
bona fide officer of a corporation voluntarily elected or voluntarily
appointed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of
the corporation, who at all times during the period involved is also a
bona fide director, and who is also a shareholder of the corporation.
Only such officers who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation and whose primary responsibilities do not
include the performance of manual labor are included within this
subsection.
(b) Alternatively, a corporation that is not a "public company" as
defined in RCW 23B.01.400(24) may exempt eight or fewer bona fide
officers, who are voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in
accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
corporation and who exercise substantial control in the daily
management of the corporation, from coverage under this title without
regard to the officers' performance of manual labor if the exempted
officer is a shareholder of the corporation, or may exempt any number
of officers if all the exempted officers are related by blood within
the third degree or marriage. If a corporation that is not a "public
company" elects to be covered under subsection (8)(a) of this section,
the corporation's election must be made on a form prescribed by the
department and under such reasonable rules as the department may adopt.
(c) Determinations respecting the status of persons performing
services for a corporation shall be made, in part, by reference to
Title 23B RCW and to compliance by the corporation with its own
articles of incorporation and bylaws. For the purpose of determining
coverage under this title, substance shall control over form, and
mandatory coverage under this title shall extend to all workers of this
state, regardless of honorary titles conferred upon those actually
serving as workers.
(d) A corporation may elect to cover officers who are exempted by
this subsection in the manner provided by RCW 51.12.110.
(9) Services rendered by a musician or entertainer under a contract
with a purchaser of the services, for a specific engagement or
engagements when such musician or entertainer performs no other duties
for the purchaser and is not regularly and continuously employed by the
purchaser. A purchaser does not include the leader of a group or
recognized entity who employs other than on a casual basis musicians or
entertainers.
(10) Services performed by a newspaper carrier selling or
distributing newspapers on the street or from house to house.
(11) Services performed by an insurance producer, as defined in RCW
48.17.010(5), or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15
RCW.
(12) Services performed by a booth renter. However, a person
exempted under this subsection may elect coverage under RCW 51.32.030.
(13) Members of a limited liability company, if either:
(a) Management of the company is vested in its members, and the
members for whom exemption is sought would qualify for exemption under
subsection (5) of this section were the company a sole proprietorship
or partnership; or
(b) Management of the company is vested in one or more managers,
and the members for whom the exemption is sought are managers who would
qualify for exemption under subsection (8) of this section were the
company a corporation.

Sec. 34 RCW 82.04.260 and 2008 c 296 s 1, 2008 c 217 s 100, and
2008 c 81 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
shall be equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall, in the case of manufacturers, be equal
to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of
sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for
hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured and
the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case
of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business shall, in the case of extractors, be equal to the value of
products, including byproducts, extracted, or in the case of extractors
for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of products, including byproducts,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent
from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---