BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.07.160 and 1963 c 195 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is desirable for the general welfare and in particular for the
welfare of insurance beneficiaries, policyholders, claimants,
subscribers, and others that the business of domestic insurers be
continued notwithstanding the event of a local, state, or national
emergency. The purpose of this section ((and)), RCW 48.07.170 through
48.07.200, and section 6 of this act is to facilitate the continued
operation of domestic insurers in the event that a local, state, or
national emergency is ((caused by an attack on the United States which
is)) so disruptive of normal business and commerce ((in this state)) as
to make it impossible or impracticable for a domestic insurer to
conduct its business in accord with applicable provisions of law, its
bylaws, or its charter. When used in this section ((and)), RCW
48.07.170 through 48.07.200, and section 6 of this act the word
"insurer" ((includes a fraternal benefit society)) means the same as
defined in RCW 48.01.053.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.07.170 and 1963 c 195 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of directors of any domestic insurer may at any time
adopt emergency bylaws, subject to repeal or change by action of those
having power to adopt regular bylaws for such insurer, which shall be
operative during such a local, state, or national emergency and which
may, notwithstanding any different provisions of the regular bylaws, or
of the applicable statutes, or of such insurer's charter, make any
provision that may be reasonably necessary for the operation of such
insurer during the period of such emergency.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.07.180 and 1963 c 195 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event that the board of directors of a domestic insurer has
not adopted emergency bylaws, the following provisions shall become
effective upon the occurrence of such a local, state, or national
emergency as ((above)) described in this chapter:
(1) Three directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of business at all meetings of the board.
(2) Any vacancy in the board may be filled by a majority of the
remaining directors, though less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining
director.
(3) If there are no surviving directors, but at least three vice
presidents of such insurer survive, the three vice presidents with the
longest term of service shall be the directors and shall possess all of
the powers of the previous board of directors and such powers as are
granted ((herein)) in this chapter or by subsequently enacted
legislation. By majority vote, such emergency board of directors may
elect other directors. If there are not at least three surviving vice
presidents, the commissioner or duly designated person exercising the
powers of the commissioner shall appoint three persons as directors who
shall include any surviving vice presidents and who shall possess all
of the powers of the previous board of directors and such powers as are
granted ((herein)) in this chapter or by subsequently enacted
legislation, and these persons by majority vote may elect other
directors.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.07.190 and 1963 c 195 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any time the board of directors of a domestic insurer may, by
resolution, provide that in the event of such a local, state, or
national emergency and in the event of the death or incapacity of the
president, the secretary, or the treasurer of such insurer, such
officers, or any of them, shall be succeeded in the office by the
person named or described in a succession list adopted by the board of
directors. Such list may be on the basis of named persons or position
titles, shall establish the order of priority and may prescribe the
conditions under which the powers of the office shall be exercised.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.07.200 and 1963 c 195 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
At any time the board of directors of a domestic insurer may, by
resolution, provide that in the event of such a local, state, or
national emergency the principal office and place of business of such
insurer shall be at such location as is named or described in the
resolution. Such resolution may provide for alternate locations and
establish an order of preference.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.07 RCW
to read as follows:
Each domestic insurer must create and maintain a written business
continuity plan identifying procedures relating to a local, state, or
national emergency or significant business disruption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.07 RCW
to read as follows:
After considering relevant standards adopted by the national
association of insurance commissioners, other states, and other
regulatory authorities that regulate financial institutions, the
commissioner shall adopt, by rule, standards for insurers and insurance
producers to follow for business continuity planning.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2011.

--- END ---