BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every insurer issuing a homeowner, condominium unit owner,
residential tenant, and residential fire insurance policy that does not
cover damage caused by flood must notify the policyholder that the
policy does not cover damage caused by flood. The notice must also
inform the policyholder how to contact the national flood insurance
program ("NFIP") or one of the NFIP's agents. This notice must be
provided:
(a) At the time the policy is issued; and
(b) At the time the policy is renewed.
(2) The following language, when combined with current information
about how to contact the NFIP or its agent, satisfies the notice
requirements of this section:

"This policy does not cover damage to your property caused by
flooding. The federal government offers flood insurance through the
National Flood Insurance Program to residents of communities that
participate in its program. You can learn more about the National
Flood Insurance Program at www.floodsmart.gov or by calling (888) 379-9531."

(3) Nothing in this section invalidates a flood exclusion, or any
other exclusion, in an insurance policy subject to this section.

--- END ---