BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the development of
electric vehicle infrastructure to be a critical step in creating jobs,
fostering economic growth, reducing greenhouse gas emissions, and
stemming the effects of climate change in Washington state. Limited
driving distance between battery charges is a fundamental disadvantage
and obstacle to broad consumer adoption of vehicles powered by
electricity. In order to eliminate this fundamental disadvantage and
dramatically increase consumer acceptance and usage of electric
vehicles, it is essential that an infrastructure of convenient electric
vehicle charging opportunities be developed. The purpose of this act
is to encourage the transition to electric vehicle use and to expedite
the establishment of a convenient, cost-effective, electric vehicle
infrastructure that such a transition necessitates. The state's
success in encouraging this transition will serve as an economic
stimulus to the creation of short-term and long-term jobs as the entire
automobile industry and its associated direct and indirect jobs
transform over time from combustion to electric vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The assessed value of any property for purposes of taxes
collected under chapters 84.52 and 84.55 RCW must be determined without
regard to any electric vehicle infrastructure that may be installed
thereon.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Leasehold excise tax may not be imposed on leases to tenants of
public lands for purposes of installing, maintaining, and operating
electric vehicle infrastructure.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When the state and any local jurisdiction imposes a business
and occupation tax, there may be deducted from the basis of tax those
costs relating directly to the installation of electric vehicle
infrastructure incurred by businesses. The deduction may be taken
commencing in the year the costs are incurred and thereafter for each
of the following ten years, or until the deduction equals the amount of
such costs.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
electric vehicles or electric vehicle batteries or to the installation
of electric vehicle infrastructure and its installation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(3) For purposes of this section, "electric vehicle infrastructure"
means structures, labor, machinery, equipment, circuitry, and
electrical appliances necessary to support an electric vehicle,
including battery recharging stations and outlets and battery exchange
stations.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of electric vehicles or electric vehicle batteries or to the use of
electric vehicle infrastructure and its installation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(3) For purposes of this section, "electric vehicle infrastructure"
means structures, labor, machinery, equipment, circuitry, and
electrical appliances necessary to support an electric vehicle,
including battery recharging stations and outlets and battery exchange
stations.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied under the provisions of this chapter does not
apply to the sale of electric vehicles or electric vehicle batteries or
to the installation of electric vehicle infrastructure.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(3) For purposes of this section, "electric vehicle infrastructure"
means structures, labor, machinery, equipment, circuitry, and
electrical appliances necessary to support an electric vehicle,
including battery recharging stations and outlets and battery exchange
stations.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 79.13 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general provisions" to read as follows:
(1) The state and any local government, including any housing
authority, is authorized to lease land owned by such an entity to any
person for purposes of installing, maintaining, and operating an
electric vehicle charging facility or electric vehicle infrastructure,
for a term not in excess of fifty years, for rent of not less than one
dollar per year, and with such other terms as the public entity's
governing body determines in its sole discretion.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.19.648 and 2007 c 348 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2015, all state agencies and local government
subdivisions of the state, to the extent determined practicable by the
rules adopted by the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel.
(2) In order to phase in this transition, all state agencies and
local governmental subdivisions of the state, to the extent determined
practicable by the department of community, trade, and economic
development by rules adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required
to achieve fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles,
and construction equipment from electricity or biofuel in at least the
following stages:
(a) Ten percent by December 31, 2012;
(b) Twenty percent by December 31, 2013;
(c) Forty percent by December 31, 2014;
(d) Sixty percent by December 31, 2015; and
(e) One hundred percent by December 31, 2016.
(3) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington state
patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet are
replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or better
rolling resistance as the original tires.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install charging outlets to the specifications dictated by
the governing standards bodies capable of charging a fleet of all
electric vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance
facilities.
(2) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install charging outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each state-owned highway rest stop.
(3) By December 31, 2015, the state must install or lease space for
the installation of a battery exchange station capable of exchanging
and recharging removable battery sets for use in all electric vehicles
in appropriate state-owned highway rest stops.
(4) Electric vehicle charging outlets and infrastructure must
conform to rules adopted under section 24 of this act.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Municipal utilities under this chapter are encouraged to secure
the environmental benefits of all electric vehicle use by utilizing all
electric vehicles for their own vehicle fleets and by promoting the use
of all electric vehicles by others to take advantage of the
opportunities that electric vehicle use has for effectively storing
intermittent generation of electricity by renewable generating
resources, such as solar and wind, and for shifting recharge demands to
off-peak periods.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public utility districts under this chapter are encouraged to
secure the environmental benefits of all electric vehicle use by
utilizing all electric vehicles for their own vehicle fleets and by
promoting the use of all electric vehicles by others to take advantage
of the opportunities that electric vehicle use has for effectively
storing intermittent generation of electricity by renewable generating
resources, such as solar and wind, and for shifting recharge demands to
off-peak periods.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Investor-owned electric utilities under this chapter are
encouraged to secure the environmental benefits of all electric vehicle
use by utilizing all electric vehicles for their own vehicle fleets and
by promoting the use of all electric vehicles by others to take
advantage of battery recharge electric use and the opportunities that
electric vehicle use has for effectively storing intermittent
generation of electricity by renewable generating resources, such as
solar and wind, and for use of off-peak power.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that is a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid
vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18
RCW to read as follows:
The board shall:
(1) Facilitate collaboration among stakeholders to develop the
workforce needed to transform and support an electrified transportation
network and vehicle fleet;
(2) In collaboration with stakeholders, establish and maintain a
state strategic plan for ensuring an adequate supply of workers to
transform and support an electrified transportation network and vehicle
fleet in Washington state; and
(3) Report to the governor and legislature by December 31, 2010,
and annually thereafter, on progress on the state plan and make
additional recommendations as necessary.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.330.310 and 2008 c 14 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature establishes a comprehensive green economy jobs
growth initiative based on the goal of, by 2020, increasing the number
of green economy jobs to twenty-five thousand from the eight thousand
four hundred green economy jobs the state had in 2004.
(2) The department, in consultation with the employment security
department, the state workforce training and education coordinating
board, the state board ((of [for])) for community and technical
colleges, and the higher education coordinating board, shall develop a
defined list of terms, consistent with current workforce and economic
development terms, associated with green economy industries and jobs.
(3)(a) The employment security department, in consultation with the
department, the state workforce training and education coordinating
board, the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, Washington State University small
business development center, and the Washington State University
extension energy program, shall conduct labor market research to
analyze the current labor market and projected job growth in the green
economy, the current and projected recruitment and skill requirement of
green economy industry employers, the wage and benefits ranges of jobs
within green economy industries, and the education and training
requirements of entry-level and incumbent workers in those industries.
(b) The University of Washington business and economic development
center shall: Analyze the current opportunities for and participation
in the green economy by minority and women-owned business enterprises
in Washington; identify existing barriers to their successful
participation in the green economy; and develop strategies with
specific policy recommendations to improve their successful
participation in the green economy. The research may be informed by
the research of the Puget Sound regional council prosperity
partnership, as well as other entities. The University of Washington
business and economic development center shall report to the
appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate
on their research, analysis, and recommendations by December 1, 2008.
(4) Based on the findings from subsection (3) of this section, the
employment security department, in consultation with the department and
taking into account the requirements and goals of chapter 14, Laws of
2008 and other state clean energy and energy efficiency policies, shall
propose which industries will be considered high-demand green
industries, based on current and projected job creation and their
strategic importance to the development of the state's green economy.
The employment security department and the department shall take into
account which jobs within green economy industries will be considered
high-wage occupations and occupations that are part of career pathways
to the same, based on family-sustaining wage and benefits ranges.
These designations, and the results of the employment security
department's broader labor market research, shall inform the planning
and strategic direction of the department, the state workforce training
and education coordinating board, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating board.
(5) The department shall identify emerging technologies and
innovations that are likely to contribute to advancements in the green
economy, including the activities in designated innovation partnership
zones established in RCW 43.330.270.
(6) The department, consistent with the priorities established by
the state economic development commission, shall:
(a) Develop targeting criteria for existing investments, and make
recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives and
comprehensive strategies, to recruit, retain, and expand green economy
industries and small businesses; and
(b) Make recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives
and comprehensive strategies to stimulate research and development of
green technology and innovation, including designating innovation
partnership zones linked to the green economy.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "target populations" means
(a) entry-level or incumbent workers in high-demand green industries
who are in, or are preparing for, high-wage occupations; (b) dislocated
workers in declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage
occupations in high-demand green industries; (c) dislocated
agriculture, timber, or energy sector workers who may be retrained for
high-wage occupations in high-demand green industries; (d) eligible
veterans or national guard members; (e) disadvantaged populations; or
(f) anyone eligible to participate in the state opportunity grant
program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(8) The legislature directs the state workforce training and
education coordinating board to create and pilot green industry skill
panels. These panels shall consist of business representatives from
industry sectors related to clean energy, labor unions representing
workers in those industries or labor affiliates administering state-approved, joint apprenticeship programs or labor-management partnership
programs that train workers for these industries, state and local
veterans agencies, employer associations, educational institutions, and
local workforce development councils within the region that the panels
propose to operate, and other key stakeholders as determined by the
applicant. Any of these stakeholder organizations are eligible to
receive grants under this section and serve as the intermediary that
convenes and leads the panel. Panel applicants must provide labor
market and industry analysis that demonstrates high demand, or demand
of strategic importance to the development of the state's clean energy
economy as identified in this section, for high-wage occupations, or
occupations that are part of career pathways to the same, within the
relevant industry sector. The panel shall:
(a) Conduct labor market and industry analyses, in consultation
with the employment security department, and drawing on the findings of
its research when available;
(b) Plan strategies to meet the recruitment and training needs of
the industry and small businesses; and
(c) Leverage and align other public and private funding sources.
(9) The green industries jobs training account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys from the account must be utilized to supplement
the state opportunity grant program established under RCW 28B.50.271.
All receipts from appropriations directed to the account must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the activities identified in this subsection. The state board
for community and technical colleges, in consultation with the state
workforce training and education coordinating board, informed by the
research of the employment security department and the strategies
developed in this section, may authorize expenditures from the account.
The state board for community and technical colleges must distribute
grants from the account on a competitive basis.
(a)(i) Allowable uses of these grant funds, which should be used
when other public or private funds are insufficient or unavailable, may
include:
(A) Curriculum development;
(B) Transitional jobs strategies for dislocated workers in
declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage occupations in
green industries;
(C) Workforce education to target populations; and
(D) Adult basic and remedial education as necessary linked to
occupation skills training.
(ii) Allowable uses of these grant funds do not include student
assistance and support services available through the state opportunity
grant program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(b) Applicants eligible to receive these grants may be any
organization or a partnership of organizations that has demonstrated
expertise in:
(i) Implementing effective education and training programs that
meet industry demand; and
(ii) Recruiting and supporting, to successful completion of those
training programs carried out under these grants, the target
populations of workers.
(c) In awarding grants from the green industries jobs training
account, the state board for community and technical colleges shall
give priority to applicants that demonstrate the ability to:
(i) Use labor market and industry analysis developed by the
employment security department and green industry skill panels in the
design and delivery of the relevant education and training program, and
otherwise utilize strategies developed by green industry ((skills
[skill])) skill panels;
(ii) Leverage and align existing public programs and resources and
private resources toward the goal of recruiting, supporting, educating,
and training target populations of workers;
(iii) Work collaboratively with other relevant stakeholders in the
regional economy;
(iv) Link adult basic and remedial education, where necessary, with
occupation skills training;
(v) Involve employers and, where applicable, labor unions in the
determination of relevant skills and competencies and, where relevant,
the validation of career pathways; and
(vi) Ensure that supportive services, where necessary, are
integrated with education and training and are delivered by
organizations with direct access to and experience with the targeted
population of workers.
(10) Jobs created as a result of the need to transition to and
support an electrified transportation network and vehicle fleet under
this act are green economy jobs for the purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The state preempts the regulation of
electric vehicle infrastructure except as specified in section 21 of
this act, provided that local jurisdictions retain their traditional
regulatory permitting authority for administrative permit issuance,
such as electrical and building permits. The proprietary interests of
a local or state authority are not affected by this provision.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1) Counties with a population over five
hundred thousand must create an implementation schedule for local
jurisdictions, with a goal to have the county's private and public
parking spaces electric vehicle ready in at least the following stages:
(a) Two percent by December 31, 2013;
(b) Five percent by December 31, 2015; and
(c) Ten percent by December 31, 2018.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" means a
passenger vehicle that uses electricity as its primary source of power,
such as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The siting, permitting, and installation of electric vehicle
infrastructure are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c) except as indicated in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The siting, permitting, and construction of electric vehicle
battery exchange stations are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c) except to the extent that:
(a) The use or construction exceeds the maximum levels specified in
WAC 197-11-800(1)(c); or
(b) The use is in or over water or other critical areas.
(3) All state, regional, and local governmental entities, including
housing authorities, may use an environmental impact statement adopted
under section 22 of this act as an existing environmental document in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.21C.034.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All new state, regional, and local government and housing
authority construction, including construction of buildings to be
leased in whole or in part to a governmental entity, must to the extent
practicable include electric vehicle infrastructure in publicly
available parking and in government fleet vehicle parking. This
includes park and ride facilities. The department of general
administration, in conjunction with the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall adopt required ratios of charge spots to
parking based on the type of facility or building. These parking
spaces must be reserved for and exclusively used by electric vehicles.
New public universities and colleges, commercial passenger airports,
park and rides, ferry terminals, and any government agency site
associated with four hundred or more parking spaces must provide space
for an exchange station.
(2)(a) Governmental entities operating existing park and ride and
off-street parking facilities in counties with a population over five
hundred thousand shall to the extent practicable arrange for parking
spaces to be electric vehicle ready in at least the following stages:
(i) Two percent by December 31, 2013;
(ii) Five percent by December 31, 2015; and
(iii) Ten percent by December 31, 2018.
(b) Installation costs must to the extent practicable be paid by
electric vehicle system operators or by the infrastructure owner.
(3) All state, regional, and local governmental entities in
counties with a population over five hundred thousand shall to the
extent practicable arrange for installation of electric vehicle
infrastructure at existing government facilities. Governmental
entities shall require property owners to allow for electric vehicle
infrastructure retrofitting when the entity is leasing existing
facilities. The department of general administration, in conjunction
with the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
adopt required ratios of charge spots to parking based on the type of
facility or building. Existing public universities and colleges,
commercial passenger airports, park and rides, ferry terminals, and any
government agency site associated with four hundred or more parking
spaces must provide space for an exchange station.
(4) The state department of transportation shall allow construction
of large electric vehicle infrastructure, such as exchange and quick
charging stations in or adjacent to appropriate state highway rest
stops and weigh stations. Construction costs of exchange and quick
charging stations must be borne by an electric vehicle system operator
or the infrastructure owner.
(5) Local jurisdictions shall allow to the extent practicable an
electric vehicle system operator or the infrastructure owner to install
battery recharging stations or outlets in garages, on public streets,
on public sidewalks, and in on-site parking associated with municipal
buildings.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.
(c) "Electric vehicle system operator" means the entity controlling
the electric vehicle infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with rules adopted under section 24 of this act, all
new parking garages, parking lots, retail over twelve thousand square
feet, office buildings, multifamily housing, and single-family homes
must be constructed with the electric circuitry required to support
electric vehicle charging infrastructure for every parking space.
(2) Consistent with rules adopted under section 24 of this act,
additions or alterations above four thousand square feet to existing
retail space greater than twelve thousand square feet, or office
buildings, and addition of one or more units or alteration of more than
twenty-five percent of existing space in multifamily housing requires
retrofitting of the structure to include the electric circuitry
required to support electric vehicle infrastructure in a proportional
manner based on the ratio of associated parking to square footage. For
example, an alteration of fifty percent of square footage requires the
retrofitting of fifty percent of the structure's associated parking
spaces. Calculation of the number of parking spaces to be retrofitted
must be rounded up to the nearest whole number.
(3) Electric vehicle charging infrastructure must conform to rules
adopted under section 24 of this act.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.
(c) "Electric vehicle system operator" means the entity controlling
the electric vehicle infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Local jurisdictions in counties with population greater than
five hundred thousand must require as a condition of development that
all proposed new commercial and multifamily development with adjacent
on-street parking install appropriate circuitry to support electric
vehicle infrastructure in all adjacent spots and active charge spots in
ten percent of adjacent parking spaces that are directly related to the
vehicular transportation needs generated by the proposed development.
(2) Local jurisdictions in counties with population greater than
five hundred thousand must require as a condition of development that
all additions to commercial and multifamily development above four
thousand square feet with adjacent on-street parking install
appropriate circuitry to support electric vehicle infrastructure in all
adjacent spots and active charge spots in ten percent of adjacent
parking spaces that are directly related to the vehicular
transportation needs generated by the proposed development.
(3) By June 1, 2010, local jurisdictions in counties with
population greater than five hundred thousand shall allow battery
recharging stations as a permitted use and battery exchange stations as
a permitted use in all mixed-use and nonresidential zones. County or
city amendments of development regulations or comprehensive plans to
comply with this subsection are not subject to appeal by petition to
the growth management hearings board and are not subject to the
requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(4) Local jurisdictions are authorized to adopt incentive systems
to encourage the retrofitting of existing structures with the electric
circuitry required to support electric vehicle charging infrastructure.
Incentives may include transferable development rights for use in urban
growth areas. Any incentive program under this section must be
approved by the department of community, trade, and economic
development. Incentives may not be granted under this section after
December 31, 2020, but a local jurisdiction's incentive program may
allow for a validly granted incentive to be exercised after December
31, 2020.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Local jurisdictions in counties with population greater than
five hundred thousand must require as a condition of development that
all proposed new commercial and multifamily development with adjacent
on-street parking install appropriate circuitry to support electric
vehicle infrastructure in all adjacent spots and active charge spots in
ten percent of adjacent parking spaces that are directly related to the
vehicular transportation needs generated by the proposed development.
(2) Local jurisdictions in counties with population greater than
five hundred thousand must require as a condition of development that
all additions to commercial and multifamily development above four
thousand square feet with adjacent on-street parking install
appropriate circuitry to support electric vehicle infrastructure in all
adjacent spots and active charge spots in ten percent of adjacent
parking spaces that are directly related to the vehicular
transportation needs generated by the proposed development.
(3) By June 1, 2010, local jurisdictions in counties with
population greater than five hundred thousand shall allow battery
recharging stations as a permitted use and battery exchange stations as
a permitted use in all mixed-use and nonresidential zones. County or
city amendments of development regulations or comprehensive plans to
comply with this subsection are not subject to appeal by petition to
the growth management hearings board and are not subject to the
requirements of RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).
(4) Local jurisdictions are authorized to adopt incentive systems
to encourage the retrofitting of existing structures with the electric
circuitry required to support electric vehicle charging infrastructure.
Incentives may include transferable development rights for use in urban
growth areas. Any incentive program under this section must be
approved by the department of community, trade, and economic
development. Incentives may not be granted under this section after
December 31, 2020, but a local jurisdiction's incentive program may
allow for a validly granted incentive to be exercised after December
31, 2020.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide technical assistance to local governments in integrating
the provisions of this act into their existing zoning codes and other
development regulations.
(2) By December 31, 2009, the department of community, trade, and
economic development, pursuant to RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c), shall complete
a nonproject environmental impact statement addressing the impacts of
electric vehicle infrastructure that may be used by state agencies and
local governments, including housing authorities, in permitting,
installing, contracting for, or otherwise authorizing electric vehicle
infrastructure. This nonproject environmental impact statement is not
subject to legal challenge, administrative appeals, or judicial review.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide assistance to local jurisdictions in developing
incentives for retrofitting existing structures with the electric
circuitry required to support electric vehicle infrastructure as
authorized in this act.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state building code council shall adopt rules for electric
vehicle infrastructure. Rules adopted by the council must consider
applicable national and international standards.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle that uses
electricity as its primary source of power, such as a plug-in electric
vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle.
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1, 16, and 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---