BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16.076 and 2007 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall provide an opportunity for owners of
vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.0621 and vehicles licensed under
RCW 46.16.070 with a declared gross weight of ten thousand pounds or
less((,)) to make ((a)) the following voluntary donations ((of five
dollars)) at the time of initial or renewal registration((. The
donation must)):
(a) Five dollars or more to be deposited in the state parks renewal
and stewardship account established in RCW 79A.05.215 to be used for
the operation and maintenance of state parks;
(b) Five dollars or more to be deposited in the 4-H account
established in section 2 of this act to be used for life skills
education for young people from ages five through nineteen.
(2) This section applies to registrations due or to become due on
or after January 1, ((2008)) 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The 4-H account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from voluntary donations collected under RCW
46.16.076 must be deposited in the account. Only the state's
designated director of the 4-H program or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) Funds in the account must be disbursed for the purposes of
providing life skills education for young people from ages five through
nineteen.

--- END ---