BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
establish the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead pilot
stamp program to continue and, to the maximum extent possible, increase
recreational selective fishing opportunities on the Columbia river and
its tributaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall create and administer a Columbia river
recreational salmon and steelhead pilot stamp program. The program
must facilitate continued and, to the maximum extent possible, improved
recreational salmon and steelhead selective fishing opportunities on
the Columbia river and its tributaries by supplementing the resources
available to the department to carry out the scientific monitoring and
evaluation, data collection, permitting, reporting, enforcement, and
other activities necessary to provide such opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to a recreational license required under this
chapter, a Columbia river salmon and steelhead stamp or endorsement is
required in order for any person fifteen years of age or older to fish
recreationally for salmon or steelhead in the Columbia river and its
tributaries where these fisheries have been authorized by the
department. The cost for each stamp or endorsement is seven dollars
and fifty cents. The department shall deposit all receipts from stamp
or endorsement purchases into the Columbia river recreational salmon
and steelhead pilot stamp program account created in section 4 of this
act.
(2) For the purposes of this section and sections 2 and 4 through
6 of this act, the term "Columbia river" means the Columbia river from
a line across the Columbia river between Rocky Point in Washington and
Tongue Point in Oregon to the Chief Joseph dam.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead pilot stamp
program account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from Columbia river salmon and steelhead stamp or endorsement
purchases under section 3 of this act and gifts made for purposes of
the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead pilot stamp
program must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for purposes of the program created in section
2 of this act. Only the director or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall administer the Columbia river recreational
salmon and steelhead pilot stamp program in consultation with a
Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board. The
board shall serve in an advisory capacity to the department.
(2) The department shall solicit recommendations for membership on
the Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board from
recognized recreational fishing organizations of the Columbia river,
and the director or director's designee shall give deference to such
recommendations when selecting board members. In making these
selections, the director or director's designee shall seek to provide
equitable representation from the various geographic areas of the
Columbia river. The board must consist of no fewer than six and no
more than ten members at any one time.
(3) The Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers
board shall make annual recommendations to the department regarding
program expenditures. To the maximum extent possible, the board and
department shall seek to reach consensus regarding program activities
and expenditures. The director or the director's designee shall
provide the board with a written explanation when the department
expends funds from the Columbia river recreational salmon and steelhead
pilot stamp program account created in section 4 of this act in a
manner that differs substantially from board recommendations.
(4) Columbia river salmon and steelhead recreational anglers board
members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2014, the department and the Columbia river salmon
and steelhead recreational anglers board shall review the Columbia
river recreational salmon and steelhead pilot stamp program, prepare a
brief summary of the activities conducted under the program, and
provide this summary and a recommendation whether the program should be
continued to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act expire June
30, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 By September 1, 2009, the department of fish
and wildlife shall:
(1) Establish and make publicly available a list of tributaries to
the Columbia river where a Columbia river salmon and steelhead stamp or
endorsement is required to fish recreationally for salmon or steelhead
pursuant to section 3 of this act; and
(2) Elect between issuing stamps or issuing endorsements pursuant
to section 3 of this act. The department of fish and wildlife shall
proceed using the option that it determines will result in the least
administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Nothing in this act changes the allocation
of salmon or steelhead fisheries in the Columbia river and its
tributaries or the authorities or processes by which such allocations
are determined.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A Columbia river salmon and steelhead stamp
or endorsement is not subject to the additional ten percent transaction
fee on recreational licenses, permits, tags, stamps, or raffle tickets
to be charged during the 2009-2011 biennium under chapter . . .
(Substitute House Bill No. 1778), Laws of 2009 if it or a subsequent
version thereof becomes law.

--- END ---