BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.41.030 and 1996 c 254 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county assessor shall maintain an active and systematic
program of revaluation on a continuous basis, and shall establish a
revaluation schedule which will result in revaluation of all taxable
real property within the county at least once each four years and
physical inspection of all taxable real property within the county at
least once each six years. Each county assessor may disregard any
program of revaluation, if requested by a property owner, and change,
as appropriate, the valuation of real property upon the receipt of a
notice of decision received under RCW 36.70B.130((, 90.60.160,)) or
chapter 35.22, 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW pertaining to the value of
the real property.
(2) If a county that values property on a multiyear schedule has a
drop in overall real property values of ten percent or more in a single
year, properties that were valued during that year must be revalued
again the following year. In order to determine the drop in property
values, a county must use the market data as determined by the
Washington State University center for real estate research.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to property taxes levied
for collection in 2010.

--- END ---