BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.52.130 and 2008 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A certified abstract of the driving record shall be furnished
only to:
(a) The individual named in the abstract;
(b) An employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on
behalf of an employer or prospective employer, or a volunteer
organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or persons with mental or physical disabilities;
(c) An employee or agent of a transit authority checking
prospective volunteer vanpool drivers for insurance and risk management
needs;
(d) The insurance carrier that has insurance in effect covering the
employer or a prospective employer;
(e) The insurance carrier that has motor vehicle or life insurance
in effect covering the named individual;
(f) The insurance carrier to which the named individual has
applied;
(g) An alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by the
department of social and health services, to which the named individual
has applied or been assigned for evaluation or treatment;
(h) City and county prosecuting attorneys; or
(i) State colleges, universities, or agencies for employment and
risk management purposes; or units of local government authorized to
self-insure under RCW 48.62.031.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prevent a court
from providing a copy of the driver's abstract to the individual named
in the abstract, provided that the named individual has a pending case
in that court for a suspended license violation or an open infraction
or criminal case in that court that has resulted in the suspension of
the individual's driver's license. A pending case includes criminal
cases that have not reached a disposition by plea, stipulation, trial,
or amended charge. An open infraction or criminal case includes cases
on probation, payment agreement or subject to, or in collections.
Courts may charge a reasonable fee for production and copying of the
abstract for the individual.
(3) City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys may provide the
driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies
approved by the department of social and health services to which the
named individual has applied or been assigned for evaluation or
treatment.
(((3))) (4)(a) The director, upon proper request, shall furnish a
certified abstract covering the period of not more than the last three
years to insurance companies.
(b) The director may enter into a contractual agreement with an
insurance company or its agent for the limited purpose of reviewing the
driving records of existing policyholders for changes to the record
during specified periods of time. The department shall establish a fee
for this service, which must be deposited in the highway safety fund.
The fee for this service must be set at a level that will not result in
a net revenue loss to the state. Any information provided under this
subsection must be treated in the same manner and subject to the same
restrictions as certified abstracts.
(((4))) (5) Upon proper request, the director shall furnish a
certified abstract covering a period of not more than the last five
years to state approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies,
except that the certified abstract shall also include records of
alcohol-related offenses as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) covering a
period of not more than the last ten years.
(((5))) (6) Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full
driving record maintained by the department shall be furnished to a
city or county prosecuting attorney, to state-approved alcohol and drug
assessment or treatment agencies, to the individual named in the
abstract, to an employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on
behalf of an employer or prospective employer of the named individual,
or to a volunteer organization for which the named individual has
submitted an application for a position that could require the
transportation of children under eighteen years of age, adults over
sixty-five years of age, or persons with physical or mental
disabilities, or to an employee or agent of a transit authority
checking prospective volunteer vanpool drivers for insurance and risk
management needs.
(((6))) (7) The abstract, whenever possible, shall include:
(a) An enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person
was driving;
(b) The total number of vehicles involved;
(c) Whether the vehicles were legally parked or moving;
(d) Whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident;
(e) Whether the accident resulted in any fatality;
(f) Any reported convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that
an infraction was committed based upon a violation of any motor vehicle
law;
(g) The status of the person's driving privilege in this state; and
(h) Any reports of failure to appear in response to a traffic
citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction served upon
the named individual by an arresting officer.
(((7))) (8) Certified abstracts furnished to prosecutors and
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies shall also indicate
whether a recorded violation is an alcohol-related offense as defined
in RCW 46.01.260(2) that was originally charged as one of the alcohol-related offenses designated in RCW 46.01.260(2)(b)(i).
(((8))) (9) The abstract provided to the insurance company shall
exclude any information, except that related to the commission of
misdemeanors or felonies by the individual, pertaining to law
enforcement officers or firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or
any officer of the Washington state patrol, while driving official
vehicles in the performance of occupational duty. The abstract
provided to the insurance company shall include convictions for RCW
46.61.5249 and 46.61.525 except that the abstract shall report them
only as negligent driving without reference to whether they are for
first or second degree negligent driving. The abstract provided to the
insurance company shall exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW
10.05.060, except that if a person is removed from a deferred
prosecution under RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall show the deferred
prosecution as well as the removal.
(((9))) (10) The director shall collect for each abstract the sum
of ten dollars, fifty percent of which shall be deposited in the
highway safety fund and fifty percent of which must be deposited
according to RCW 46.68.038.
(((10))) (11) Any insurance company or its agent receiving the
certified abstract shall use it exclusively for its own underwriting
purposes and shall not divulge any of the information contained in it
to a third party. No policy of insurance may be canceled, nonrenewed,
denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of such information
unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault. No insurance
company or its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the
operation of commercial motor vehicles may use any information
contained in the abstract relative to any person's operation of motor
vehicles while not engaged in such employment, nor may any insurance
company or its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the
operation of noncommercial motor vehicles use any information contained
in the abstract relative to any person's operation of commercial motor
vehicles.
(((11))) (12) Any employer or prospective employer or an agent
acting on behalf of an employer or prospective employer, or a volunteer
organization for which the named individual has submitted an
application for a position that could require the transportation of
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or persons with physical or mental disabilities, receiving the
certified abstract shall use it exclusively for his or her own purpose
to determine whether the licensee should be permitted to operate a
commercial vehicle or school bus, or operate a vehicle for a volunteer
organization for purposes of transporting children under eighteen years
of age, adults over sixty-five years of age, or persons with physical
or mental disabilities, upon the public highways of this state and
shall not divulge any information contained in it to a third party.
(((12))) (13) Any employee or agent of a transit authority
receiving a certified abstract for its vanpool program shall use it
exclusively for determining whether the volunteer licensee meets those
insurance and risk management requirements necessary to drive a vanpool
vehicle. The transit authority may not divulge any information
contained in the abstract to a third party.
(((13))) (14) Any alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency
approved by the department of social and health services receiving the
certified abstract shall use it exclusively for the purpose of
assisting its employees in making a determination as to what level of
treatment, if any, is appropriate. The agency, or any of its
employees, shall not divulge any information contained in the abstract
to a third party.
(((14))) (15) Release of a certified abstract of the driving record
of an employee, prospective employee, or prospective volunteer requires
a statement signed by: (a) The employee, prospective employee, or
prospective volunteer that authorizes the release of the record, and
(b) the employer or volunteer organization attesting that the
information is necessary to determine whether the licensee should be
employed to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus, or operate a
vehicle for a volunteer organization for purposes of transporting
children under eighteen years of age, adults over sixty-five years of
age, or persons with physical or mental disabilities, upon the public
highways of this state. If the employer or prospective employer
authorizes an agent to obtain this information on their behalf, this
must be noted in the statement. This subsection does not apply to
entities identified in subsection (1)(i) of this section.
(((15))) (16) Any negligent violation of this section is a gross
misdemeanor.
(((16))) (17) Any intentional violation of this section is a class
C felony.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.01.260 and 1999 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
director, in his or her discretion, may destroy applications for
vehicle licenses, copies of vehicle licenses issued, applications for
drivers' licenses, copies of issued drivers' licenses, certificates of
title and registration or other documents, records or supporting papers
on file in his or her office which have been microfilmed or
photographed or are more than five years old. If the applications for
vehicle licenses are renewal applications, the director may destroy
such applications when the computer record thereof has been updated.
(2)(a) The director shall not destroy records of convictions or
adjudications of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, and 46.61.522, or
records of deferred prosecutions granted under RCW 10.05.120 and shall
maintain such records permanently on file.
(b) The director shall not, within fifteen years from the date of
conviction or adjudication, destroy records ((of the following:
(i) Convictions or adjudications of the following offenses: RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504; or
(ii))) if the offense was originally charged as one of the offenses
designated in (a) ((or (b)(i))) of this subsection, convictions or
adjudications of the following offenses: RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.5249
or any other violation that was originally charged as one of the
offenses designated in (a) ((or (b)(i))) of this subsection.
(c) For purposes of RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.130, offenses subject
to this subsection shall be considered "alcohol-related" offenses.

--- END ---