BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.465 and 2002 c 361 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish ((annual)) fees to collect
expenses for issuing and administering each class of permits under RCW
90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An initial fee schedule shall be
established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once every two
years. This fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of
date of issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. All fees
charged shall be based on factors relating to the complexity of permit
issuance and compliance and may be based on pollutant loading and
toxicity and be designed to encourage recycling and the reduction of
the quantity of pollutants. Fees shall be established in amounts to
fully recover and not to exceed expenses incurred by the department in
processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and
evaluating compliance with permits, conducting inspections, securing
laboratory analysis of samples taken during inspections, reviewing
plans and documents directly related to operations of permittees,
overseeing performance of delegated pretreatment programs, and
supporting the overhead expenses that are directly related to these
activities.
(2) The annual fee paid by a municipality, as defined in 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1362, for all domestic wastewater facility permits issued under
RCW 90.48.162 and 90.48.260 shall not exceed the total of a maximum of
((fifteen)) eighteen cents per month per residence or residential
equivalent contributing to the municipality's wastewater system.
(3) The department shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not
pay twice for the administrative expense of a permit. Accordingly,
administrative expenses for permits issued by a municipality under RCW
90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.
(4) In establishing fees, the department shall consider the
economic impact of fees on small dischargers and the economic impact of
fees on public entities required to obtain permits for storm water
runoff and shall provide appropriate adjustments.
(5) The fee for an individual permit issued for a dairy farm as
defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up
to one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for fiscal year 1999. The
fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under
chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to eight
hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may
rise in accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter
43.135 RCW.
(6) The fee for a general permit or an individual permit developed
solely as a result of the federal court of appeals decision in
Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent Irrigation District, 243 F.3rd 526 (9th Cir.
2001) is limited, until June 30, 2003, to a maximum of three hundred
dollars. Such a permit is required only, and as long as, the
interpretation of this court decision is not overturned or modified by
future court rulings, administrative rule making, or clarification of
scope by the United States environmental protection agency or
legislative action. In such a case the department shall take
appropriate action to rescind or modify these permits.
(7) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
water quality permit account hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for purposes of
administering permits under RCW 90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260.
(8) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the
use of moneys from the account to the legislature. The report will be
due December 31st of odd-numbered years. The report shall consist of
information on fees collected, actual expenses incurred, and
anticipated expenses for the current and following fiscal years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 INCREASING FEES. The department of ecology
is authorized to increase fees up to the fiscal growth factor for the
fiscal years 2010 and 2011, except that there may be no increase in
fees for fiscal years 2010 or 2011 for categories of dischargers whose
fees exceed the costs of managing their permits. The department of
ecology, with the advice of a national pollutant discharge elimination
system permit fee advisory committee, shall evaluate the existing fee
structure, including the current inequity of fees relative to permit
workload, and report its findings and recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 ANNUAL RULE REVISION. The department of
ecology is authorized to adjust the fee schedule annually through
December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act
are not any part of the law.

--- END ---