BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.290 and 1990 c 284 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To provide stability to children in out-of-home care, placement
selection shall be made with a view toward the fewest possible
placements for each child. If possible, the initial placement shall be
viewed as the only placement for the child. The use of short-term
interim placements of thirty days or less to protect the child's health
or safety while the placement of choice is being arranged is not a
violation of this principle.
(2) If a child has been previously placed in out-of-home care and
is subsequently returned to out-of-home care, the department shall give
preference to placement of the child with a relative as required in RCW
13.34.130. If, after due diligence by the department, an appropriate
relative cannot be located or is otherwise unavailable or
inappropriate, the department shall give preference to a foster family
home in which the child was previously placed, if the foster family
home is available and willing, is currently appropriate for the child's
needs, and the placement is in the best interest of the child.

--- END ---