BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.55.050 and 2008 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate
limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing
district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this
chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a
majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition
at a general election held within the district or at a special election
within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant
to this section shall be held not more than twelve months prior to the
date on which the proposed levy is to be made, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall
state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state the conditions,
if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed
before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in
levies for multiple consecutive years, up to six consecutive years,
during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be
used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding
year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate
proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must
state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining
a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the
same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may
be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections
for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The
title of each ballot measure must state the limited purposes for which
the proposed annual increases during the specified period of up to six
consecutive years shall be used((, and funds raised under the levy
shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes. For
purposes of this subsection, existing funds means the actual operating
expenditures for the calendar year in which the ballot measure is
approved by voters. Actual operating expenditures excludes lost
federal funds, lost or expired state grants or loans, extraordinary
events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions beyond the
control of the taxing district receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures)).
(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the
dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing
the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter,
unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under
this section will be used for this purpose.
(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:
(a) Use the dollar amount of a levy under subsection (1) of this
section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of
this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;
(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made
under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes
making redemption payments on bonds, the period for which the increased
levies are made shall not exceed nine years;
(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate
allowed for the district; or
(e) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.
(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot
measure under this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:
(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and
(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which
would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years
levies were made under the proposition.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.55.0101 and 2007 sp.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority
of a taxing district other than the state may provide for the use of a
limit factor under this chapter of one hundred one percent or less,
unless provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section. In
districts with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds of the members must approve an ordinance or resolution under
this section. In districts with more than four members, a majority
plus one vote must approve an ordinance or resolution under this
section. The new limit factor shall be effective for taxes collected
in the following year only.
(2) A taxing district imposing a levy under RCW 71.20.110,
73.08.080, and 84.34.230, or a permanent levy under RCW 84.52.069, as
of or after the effective date of this act, may provide for the use of
a limit factor under this chapter of the greater of one hundred one
percent or inflation.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.20.110 and 1988 c 176 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to provide additional funds for the coordination and
provision of community services for persons with developmental
disabilities or mental health services, the county governing authority
of each county in the state shall budget and levy, in addition to the
county general levy, annually a tax in a sum equal to the amount which
would be raised by a levy of two and one-half cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value against the taxable property in the county to
be used for ((such)) these purposes((: PROVIDED, That)). All or part
of the funds collected from the tax levied for the purposes of this
section may be transferred to the state of Washington, department of
social and health services, for the purpose of obtaining federal
matching funds to provide and coordinate community services for persons
with developmental disabilities and mental health services. In the
event a county elects to transfer ((such)) the tax funds to the state
for this purpose, the state shall grant these moneys and the additional
funds received as matching funds to service-providing community
agencies or community boards in the county which has made ((such)) the
transfer, ((pursuant to)) under the plan approved by the county, as
provided by chapters 71.24 and 71.28 RCW and by chapter 71A.14 RCW, all
as now or hereafter amended.
The ((amount of a)) levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular
property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter ((84.55)) 84.52
RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 73.08.080 and 2005 c 250 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority in each county shall budget and levy,
in addition to the county general levy and the taxes now levied by law,
a tax in a sum equal to the amount which would be raised by not less
than one and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars of assessed value,
and not greater than twenty-seven cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value against the taxable property of their respective
counties, to be levied and collected as now prescribed by law for the
assessment and collection of taxes, for the purpose of creating a
veterans' assistance fund. Expenditures from the veterans' assistance
fund, and interest earned on balances from the fund, may be used only
for:
(a) The veterans' assistance programs authorized by RCW 73.08.010;
(b) The burial or cremation of a deceased indigent veteran or
deceased family member of an indigent veteran as authorized by RCW
73.08.070; and
(c) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of
the fund as authorized by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) If the funds on deposit in the veterans' assistance fund, less
outstanding warrants, on the first Tuesday in September exceed the
expected yield of one and one-eighth cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value against the taxable property of the county, the county
legislative authority may levy a lesser amount. The direct and
indirect costs incurred in the administration of the veterans'
assistance fund shall be computed by the county auditor, or the chief
financial officer in a county operating under a charter, not less than
annually. Following the computation of these direct and indirect
costs, an amount equal to these costs may then be transferred from the
veterans' assistance fund to the county current expense fund.
(3) The ((amount of a)) levy allocated to the purposes specified in
this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular
property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter ((84.55)) 84.52
RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.52.069 and 2004 c 129 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "taxing district" means a county,
emergency medical service district, city or town, public hospital
district, urban emergency medical service district, regional fire
protection service authority, or fire protection district.
(2) A taxing district may impose additional regular property tax
levies in an amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars
of the assessed value of property in the taxing district. The tax
shall be imposed (a) each year for six consecutive years, (b) each year
for ten consecutive years, or (c) permanently. A tax levy under this
section must be specifically authorized by a majority of ((at least
three-fifths of the)) registered voters thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special election((, at
which election the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition
shall constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of the
total number of voters voting in such taxing district at the last
preceding general election when the number of registered voters voting
on the proposition does not exceed forty percent of the total number of
voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the registered
voters thereof voting on the proposition when the number of registered
voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty percent of the total
number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding
general election)). Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW
29A.36.210. A taxing district shall not submit to the voters at the
same election multiple propositions to impose a levy under this
section.
(3) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section
shall provide for separate accounting of expenditures of the revenues
generated by the levy. The taxing district shall maintain a statement
of the accounting which shall be updated at least every two years and
shall be available to the public upon request at no charge.
(4) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section
shall provide for a referendum procedure to apply to the ordinance or
resolution imposing the tax. This referendum procedure shall specify
that a referendum petition may be filed at any time with a filing
officer, as identified in the ordinance or resolution. Within ten
days, the filing officer shall confer with the petitioner concerning
form and style of the petition, issue the petition an identification
number, and secure an accurate, concise, and positive ballot title from
the designated local official. The petitioner shall have thirty days
in which to secure the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of
the registered voters of the taxing district, as of the last general
election, upon petition forms which contain the ballot title and the
full text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer shall
verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition and, if
sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, shall certify the
referendum measure to the next election within the taxing district if
one is to be held within one hundred eighty days from the date of
filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be
called for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330.
The referendum procedure provided in this subsection shall be
exclusive in all instances for any taxing district imposing the tax
under this section and shall supersede the procedures provided under
all other statutory or charter provisions for initiative or referendum
which might otherwise apply.
(5) Any tax imposed under this section shall be used only for the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical services,
including related personnel costs, training for such personnel, and
related equipment, supplies, vehicles and structures needed for the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical services.
(6) If a county levies a tax under this section, no taxing district
within the county may levy a tax under this section. If a regional
fire protection service authority imposes a tax under this section, no
other taxing district that is a participating fire protection
jurisdiction in the regional fire protection service authority may levy
a tax under this section. No other taxing district may levy a tax
under this section if another taxing district has levied a tax under
this section within its boundaries: PROVIDED, That if a county levies
less than fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of
property, then any other taxing district may levy a tax under this
section equal to the difference between the rate of the levy by the
county and fifty cents: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a taxing district
within a county levies this tax, and the voters of the county
subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then the amount of the
taxing district levy within the county shall be reduced, when the
combined levies exceed fifty cents. Whenever a tax is levied county-wide, the service shall, insofar as is feasible, be provided throughout
the county: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no county-wide levy proposal may be
placed on the ballot without the approval of the legislative authority
of each city exceeding fifty thousand population within the county:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section and RCW 36.32.480 shall not
prohibit any city or town from levying an annual excess levy to fund
emergency medical services: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if a county
proposes to impose tax levies under this section, no other ballot
proposition authorizing tax levies under this section by another taxing
district in the county may be placed before the voters at the same
election at which the county ballot proposition is placed: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any taxing district emergency medical service
levy that is limited in duration and that is authorized subsequent to
a county emergency medical service levy that is limited in duration,
shall expire concurrently with the county emergency medical service
levy.
(7) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax
levy authorized in this section.
(8) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (2) of this
section did not impose the maximum allowable levy amount authorized for
the taxing district under this section, any future increase up to the
maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically authorized by the
voters in accordance with subsection (2) of this section at a general
or special election.
(9) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first
levy imposed pursuant to this section following the approval of such
levy by the voters pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(10) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.52.043 and 2005 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; ((and)) (i) levies for developmental disabilities or mental
health services under RCW 71.20.110; (j) levies for veterans'
assistance under RCW 73.08.080; and (k) the portions of levies by fire
protection districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.125.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.52.010 and 2007 c 54 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
71.20.110, 73.08.080, 84.34.230, 84.52.069, and 84.52.105, the portion
of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, and 84.52.135, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The portion of the levy by a fire protection district that is
protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be reduced until the combined rate
no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 4, 6, and 7 of this act
apply to taxes levied for collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---