BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.04.345 and 2008 c 16 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No individual may assume or use the designation "certified
public accountant-inactive" or "CPA-inactive" or any other title,
designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card, or device
tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public
accountant-inactive or CPA-inactive unless the individual holds a
certificate. Individuals holding only a certificate may not practice
public accounting.
(2) No individual may hold himself or herself out to the public or
assume or use the designation "certified public accountant" or "CPA" or
any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card,
or device tending to indicate that the individual is a certified public
accountant or CPA unless the individual qualifies for the privileges
authorized by RCW 18.04.350(2) or holds a license under RCW 18.04.105
and 18.04.215.
(3) No firm with an office in this state may ((practice public
accounting in this state)) perform or offer to perform attest services
as defined in RCW 18.04.025(1) or compilation services as defined in
RCW 18.04.025(6) or assume or use the designation "certified public
accountant" or "CPA" or any other title, designation, words, letters,
abbreviation, sign, card, or device tending to indicate that the firm
is composed of certified public accountants or CPAs, unless the firm is
licensed under RCW 18.04.195 and all offices of the firm in this state
are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205. This subsection
does not limit the services permitted under RCW 18.04.350(10) by
persons not required to be licensed under this chapter.
(4) No firm may perform the services defined in RCW 18.04.025(1)
(a), (c), or (d) for a client with its home office in this state unless
the firm is licensed under RCW 18.04.195, renews the firm license as
required under RCW 18.04.215, and all offices of the firm in this state
are maintained and registered under RCW 18.04.205.
(5) No individual, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation offering public accounting services to the public may hold
himself, herself, or itself out to the public, or assume or use along,
or in connection with his, hers, or its name, or any other name the
title or designation "certified accountant," "chartered accountant,"
"licensed accountant," "licensed public accountant," "public
accountant," or any other title or designation likely to be confused
with "certified public accountant" or any of the abbreviations "CA,"
"LA," "LPA," or "PA," or similar abbreviations likely to be confused
with "CPA."
(6) No licensed firm may operate under an alias, a firm name,
title, or "DBA" that differs from the firm name that is registered with
the board.
(7) No individual with an office in this state may sign, affix, or
associate his or her name or any trade or assumed name used by the
individual in his or her business to any report prescribed by
professional standards unless the individual holds a license to
practice under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, a firm holds a license
under RCW 18.04.195, and all of the individual's offices in this state
are registered under RCW 18.04.205.
(8) No individual licensed in another state may sign, affix, or
associate a firm name to any report prescribed by professional
standards, or associate a firm name in conjunction with the title
certified public accountant, unless the individual:
(a) Qualifies for the practice privileges authorized by RCW
18.04.350(2); or
(b) Is licensed under RCW 18.04.105 and 18.04.215, and all of the
individual's offices in this state are maintained and registered under
RCW 18.04.205.
(9) No individual, partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation not holding a license to practice under RCW 18.04.105 and
18.04.215, or firm not licensed under RCW 18.04.195 or firm not
registering all of the firm's offices in this state under RCW
18.04.205, or not qualified for the practice privileges authorized by
RCW 18.04.350(2), may hold himself, herself, or itself out to the
public as an "auditor" with or without any other description or
designation by use of such word on any sign, card, letterhead, or in
any advertisement or directory.
(10) For purposes of this section, because individuals practicing
using practice privileges under RCW 18.04.350(2) are deemed
substantially equivalent to licensees under RCW 18.04.105 and
18.04.215, every word, term, or reference that includes the latter
shall be deemed to include the former, provided the conditions of such
practice privilege, as set forth in RCW 18.04.350 (4) and (5) are
maintained.
(11) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, it
is not a violation of this section for a firm that does not hold a
valid license under RCW 18.04.195 and that does not have an office in
this state to provide its professional services in this state so long
as it complies with the requirements of RCW 18.04.195(1)(b).

--- END ---