BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a victim of a crime or the victim's next of kin requests
notice under RCW 72.09.712 regarding a specific inmate, the department
shall advise the requester in writing of the possibility that part of
the sentence may be served by the inmate in a work release facility and
instruct the requester on how to submit input to the department
regarding the inmate's work release placement.
(2) When the department notifies a victim or the victim's next of
kin under RCW 72.09.712 of an offender's placement in work release, the
department shall also provide instruction on how to submit input
regarding the offender's work release placement.
(3) The department shall consider any input received from a victim
or the victim's next of kin under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
if the input is received at least seven days prior to the offender's
placement in work release. The department may consider any input from
a victim or the victim's next of kin under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section if the input is received less than seven days prior to the
offender's placement in work release. The department may alter its
placement decision based on any input considered under this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect August 1,
2009.

--- END ---