BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.34.205 and 1998 c 278 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
In accordance with RCW 35.42.010 through 35.42.220, a county with
a population of ((one million)) six hundred thousand or more may lease
space and provide for the leasing of such space through leases with an
option to purchase and the acquisition of buildings erected upon land
owned by the county upon the expiration of lease of such land. For the
purposes of this section, "building," as defined in RCW 35.42.020 shall
be construed to include any building or buildings used as part of, or
in connection with, the operation of the county. The authority
conferred by this section is in addition to and not in lieu of any
other provision authorizing counties to lease property.

--- END ---