BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Capital facilities plan" means a capital facilities plan
required under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(2) "Local government" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state, excluding school districts and
port districts.
(3) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads,
bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid
waste facilities, including recycling facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) County legislative authorities may
establish local public works assistance funds for the purpose of
funding public works projects located wholly or partially within the
county. Moneys may be deposited in local public works assistance funds
from existing revenue sources of the county.
(2) Moneys deposited in local public works assistance funds, and
interest earned on balances from the funds, may only be used:
(a) To make loans to the county and to other local governments for
funding public works projects as provided in this chapter; and
(b) For costs incurred in the administration of funds.
(3) No more than fifty percent of the moneys loaned from a fund in
a calendar year may be loaned to the county providing local public
works assistance funds. At least twenty-five percent of the moneys
anticipated to be loaned from a fund in a calendar year must be made
available for funding public works projects in cities or towns.
(4) No more than one percent of the average annual balance of a
county's fund, including interest earned on balances from the fund, may
be used annually for administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Counties, in consultation with cities
and towns within the county, may make loans to local governments from
funds established under section 2 of this act for the purpose of
assisting local governments in funding public works projects. Counties
may require terms and conditions and may charge rates of interest on
its loans as they deem necessary or convenient to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. Counties may not pledge any amount greater
than the sum of money in their local public works assistance fund plus
money to be received from the payment of the debt service on loans made
from that fund. Money received from local governments in repayment of
loans made under this chapter must be paid into the fund of the lending
county for uses consistent with this chapter.
(2) Prior to receiving moneys from a fund established under section
2 of this act, a local government applying for financial assistance
under this chapter must demonstrate to the lending county:
(a) Utilization of all local revenue sources that are reasonably
available for funding public works projects;
(b) Compliance with applicable requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW;
and
(c) Consistency between the proposed project and applicable capital
facilities plans.
(3) Counties may not make loans under this chapter prior to
completing the initial collaboration and prioritization requirements of
section 4(1) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) County legislative authorities utilizing
or providing money under this chapter must develop a prioritization
process for funding public works projects that gives priority to
projects necessary to address public health needs or substantial
environmental degradation, or increases existing capacity necessary to
accommodate projected population and employment growth. This
prioritization process must be:
(a) Completed collaboratively with public works directors of local
governments within the county;
(b) Documented in the form of written findings produced by the
county; and
(c) Revised periodically according to a schedule developed by the
county and the public works directors.
(2) In addition to the public health and environmental degradation
requirements under subsection (1) of this section, legislative
authorities providing funding to other local governments under this
chapter must consider, through a competitive application process, the
following factors in assigning a priority to and funding a project:
(a) Whether the local government applying for assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(c) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(d) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(e) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards;
(f) The number of additional housing units estimated to be achieved
by funding the project; and
(g) Other criteria the county legislative authority deems
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 County legislative authorities providing
funding for public works projects under this chapter must keep proper
records of accounts and are subject to audit by the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---