BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) It is the goal of the state that by 2020, ninety-five percent
of students must graduate from high school in four years.
(2) It is the goal of the state that by 2020, sixty percent of
youth who have dropped out of school must be reengaged in education and
be college and work ready.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2008 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-
based accountability system to improve student academic achievement;
provide leadership in the creation of a system that personalizes
education for each student and respects diverse cultures, abilities,
and learning styles; and promote achievement of the goals of RCW
28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by
law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board ((may establish school and school district
goals addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction
goals for students in grades seven through twelve)) shall establish
annual graduation rate targets for schools and school districts in
order to meet the graduation rate goal under section 1 of this act.
The targets shall reflect continuous and substantial improvement from
the prior year and shall ensure adequate progress is made for low-income and minority students. The board shall establish annual targets
for youth who have dropped out of school in order to meet the
reengagement goal under section 1 of this act. The board shall adopt
the goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) By December 1, 2009, the board shall, in consultation with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, make
recommendations to the legislature on a focused assistance program and
incentives for school districts to improve their high school graduation
rate;
(c) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and, for high
school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The
board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of
student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall
consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into
the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall
set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. The initial performance standards
and any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards
for the tenth grade assessment shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November
30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit
the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are
implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The
legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and
any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the
middle school level performance standards;
(((c))) (d) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify
successful schools and school districts and recommend to the
superintendent of public instruction schools and districts to be
recognized for two types of accomplishments, student achievement and
improvements in student achievement. Recognition for improvements in
student achievement shall include consideration of one or more of the
following accomplishments:
(i) An increase in the percent of students meeting standards. The
level of achievement required for recognition may be based on the
achievement goals established by the legislature and by the board under
(a) of this subsection;
(ii) Positive progress on an improvement index that measures
improvement in all levels of the assessment; and
(iii) Improvements despite challenges such as high levels of
mobility, poverty, English as a second language learners, and large
numbers of students in special populations as measured by either the
percent of students meeting the standard, or the improvement index.
When determining the baseline year or years for recognizing individual
schools, the board may use the assessment results from the initial
years the assessments were administered, if doing so with individual
schools would be appropriate;
(((d))) (e) Adopt objective, systematic criteria to identify
schools and school districts in need of assistance and those in which
significant numbers of students persistently fail to meet state
standards. In its deliberations, the board shall consider the use of
all statewide mandated criterion-referenced and norm-referenced
standardized tests;
(((e))) (f) Identify schools and school districts in which state
intervention measures will be needed and a range of appropriate
intervention strategies after the legislature has authorized a set of
intervention strategies. After the legislature has authorized a set of
intervention strategies, at the request of the board, the
superintendent shall intervene in the school or school district and
take corrective actions. This chapter does not provide additional
authority for the board or the superintendent of public instruction to
intervene in a school or school district;
(((f))) (g) Identify performance incentive systems that have
improved or have the potential to improve student achievement;
(((g))) (h) Annually review the assessment reporting system to
ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity,
especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(((h))) (i) Include in the biennial report required under RCW
28A.305.035, information on the progress that has been made in
achieving goals adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 3 RCW 28C.18.060 and 2008 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state
training system and private career schools and colleges, shall:
(1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's training system;
(2) Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the
needs of employers and the workforce for workforce education and
training;
(3) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the
state training system, and related state programs, and perform a
biennial assessment of the vocational education, training, and adult
basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify ongoing and
strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which employment,
training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services, and
public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach
to meet such needs;
(4) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, including but not limited to, goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state training system, and review
the state training system for consistency with the state comprehensive
plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management
and employment security department labor force, industry employment,
and occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based
outcome, net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of
employers as evidenced in formal employer surveys and other employer
input; and the needs of program participants and workers as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input from program participants and the
labor community;
(5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
review and make recommendations to the office of financial management
and the legislature on operating and capital facilities budget requests
for operating agencies of the state training system for purposes of
consistency with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training
and education;
(6) Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies
and components of the state training system at the state level and at
the regional level;
(7) Develop a consistent and reliable database on vocational
education enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements
from publicly funded vocational education programs in this state;
(8)(a) Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for
the operating agencies of the state training system in a format that is
accessible to use by the board. The board shall require a minimum of
common core data to be collected by each operating agency of the state
training system;
(b) Develop requirements for minimum common core data in
consultation with the office of financial management and the operating
agencies of the training system;
(9) Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the
operating agencies of the state training system, including, but not
limited to, the use of common survey instruments and procedures for
measuring perceptions of program participants and employers of program
participants, and monitor such program evaluation;
(10) Every two years administer scientifically based outcome
evaluations of the state training system, including, but not limited
to, surveys of program participants, surveys of employers of program
participants, and matches with employment security department payroll
and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training system;
(11) In cooperation with the employment security department,
provide for the improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in
occupational information and forecasts for use in training system
planning and evaluation. Improvements shall include, but not be
limited to, development of state-based occupational change factors
involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill
and training requirements by education level associated with current
and forecasted occupations;
(12) Provide for the development of common course description
formats, common reporting requirements, and common definitions for
operating agencies of the training system;
(13) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state
training system;
(14) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,
facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between
institutions of the state training system, and encourage articulation
agreements for programs encompassing two years of secondary workforce
education and two years of postsecondary workforce education;
(15) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,
facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between private
training institutions and institutions of the state training system;
(16) Develop policy objectives for the workforce investment act,
P.L. 105-220, or its successor; develop coordination criteria for
activities under the act with related programs and services provided by
state and local education and training agencies; and ensure that
entrepreneurial training opportunities are available through programs
of each local workforce investment board in the state;
(17) Make recommendations to the commission of student assessment,
the state board of education, and the superintendent of public
instruction, concerning basic skill competencies and essential core
competencies for K-12 education. Basic skills for this purpose shall
be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and critical thinking,
essential core competencies for this purpose shall be English, math,
science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking. The
board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning
secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic
education;
(18) Collaborate with other state agencies and organizations to
meet state graduation rate goals and help reduce the dropout rate, in
accordance with section 1 of this act;
(19) Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach
to businesses and potential program participants;
(((19))) (20) Facilitate the location of support services,
including but not limited to, child care, financial aid, career
counseling, and job placement services, for students and trainees at
institutions in the state training system, and advocate for support
services for trainees and students in the state training system;
(((20))) (21) Facilitate private sector assistance for the state
training system, including but not limited to: Financial assistance,
rotation of private and public personnel, and vocational counseling;
(((21))) (22) Facilitate the development of programs for school-to-work transition that combine classroom education and on-the-job
training, including entrepreneurial education and training, in
industries and occupations without a significant number of
apprenticeship programs;
(((22))) (23) Include in the planning requirements for local
workforce investment boards a requirement that the local workforce
investment boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered
through the one-stop system required under the workforce investment
act, P.L. 105-220, or its successor;
(((23))) (24) Encourage and assess progress for the equitable
representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities among the students, teachers, and administrators of the
state training system. Equitable, for this purpose, shall mean
substantially proportional to their percentage of the state population
in the geographic area served. This function of the board shall in no
way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for
representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities;
(((24))) (25) Participate in the planning and policy development of
governor set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended;
(((25))) (26) Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private
vocational schools, the job skills program, and the Washington award
for vocational excellence;
(((26))) (27) Allocate funding from the state job training trust
fund;
(((27))) (28) Work with the director of community, trade, and
economic development to ensure coordination between workforce training
priorities and that department's economic development and
entrepreneurial development efforts;
(((28))) (29) Conduct research into workforce development programs
designed to reduce the high unemployment rate among young people
between approximately eighteen and twenty-four years of age. In
consultation with the operating agencies, the board shall advise the
governor and legislature on policies and programs to alleviate the high
unemployment rate among young people. The research shall include
disaggregated demographic information and, to the extent possible,
income data for adult youth. The research shall also include a
comparison of the effectiveness of programs examined as a part of the
research conducted in this subsection in relation to the public
investment made in these programs in reducing unemployment of young
adults. The board shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 15, 2008, and every two years thereafter.
Where possible, the data reported to the legislative committees should
be reported in numbers and in percentages;
(((29))) (30) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.
The board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2004 c 275 s 57 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services. However,
technical colleges, and college districts containing only technical
colleges, shall maintain programs solely for occupational education,
basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long as a need exists,
technical colleges may continue those programs, activities, and
services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding May 17,
1991;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role
and mission. The master plan shall also contain measurable performance
indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such
changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Collaborate with other state agencies and organizations to
meet state graduation rate goals and help reduce the dropout rate, in
accordance with section 1 of this act;
(11) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(((11))) (12) Authorize the various community and technical
colleges to offer programs and courses in other districts when it
determines that such action is consistent with the purposes set forth
in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended;
(((12))) (13) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding
the sale of state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all
interest in any community and technical college real and personal
property, except such property as is received by a college district in
accordance with RCW 28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such
property is surplus or that such a sale or exchange is in the best
interests of the community and technical college system;
(((13))) (14) In order that the treasurer for the state board for
community and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW
28B.50.085 may make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor
warrants drawn by the state board providing for an initial advance on
July 1, 1982, of the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding
biennium from the state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four
percent of the average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium
expenditures for the state board for community and technical colleges
as certified by the office of financial management; and at the
conclusion of such initial month and for each succeeding month of any
biennium, the state treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and
reported monthly by the state board treasurer in accordance with
chapter 43.88 RCW: PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board
for actual expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium
shall be less the initial advance made in such biennium;
(((14))) (15) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (((12)))
(13) of this section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances,
devises, and bequests of real or personal property from private sources
as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the
terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and
technical college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or
expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof
according to the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to
govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and
income thereof;
(((15))) (16) The college board shall have the power of eminent
domain;
(((16))) (17) Provide general supervision over the state's
technical colleges. The president of each technical college shall
report directly to the director of the state board for community and
technical colleges, or the director's designee, until local control is
assumed by a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate, except
that a college president shall have authority over program decisions of
his or her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for
that college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on
March 1, 1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new
technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 50.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The employment security department shall collaborate with other
state agencies and organizations to meet state graduation rate goals
and help reduce the dropout rate, in accordance with section 1 of this
act.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.330.050 and 2005 c 136 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall be responsible for promoting community and
economic development within the state by assisting the state's
communities to increase the quality of life of their citizens and their
economic vitality, and by assisting the state's businesses to maintain
and increase their economic competitiveness, while maintaining a
healthy environment. Community and economic development efforts shall
include: Efforts to increase economic opportunity; local planning to
manage growth; the promotion and provision of affordable housing and
housing-related services; providing public infrastructure; business and
trade development; assisting firms and industrial sectors to increase
their competitiveness; fostering the development of minority and women-owned businesses; facilitating technology development, transfer, and
diffusion; community services and advocacy for low-income persons; and
public safety efforts. The department shall have the following general
functions and responsibilities:
(1) Provide advisory assistance to the governor, other state
agencies, and the legislature on community and economic development
matters and issues;
(2) Assist the governor in coordinating the activities of state
agencies that have an impact on local government and communities;
(3) Cooperate with the Washington state economic development
commission, the legislature, and the governor in the development and
implementation of strategic plans for the state's community and
economic development efforts;
(4) Solicit private and federal grants for economic and community
development programs and administer such programs in conjunction with
other programs assigned to the department by the governor or the
legislature;
(5) Cooperate with and provide technical and financial assistance
to local governments, businesses, and community-based organizations
serving the communities of the state for the purpose of aiding and
encouraging orderly, productive, and coordinated development of the
state, and, unless stipulated otherwise, give additional consideration
to local communities and individuals with the greatest relative need
and the fewest resources;
(6) Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in
interstate programs and assist cities, counties, municipal
corporations, governmental conferences or councils, and regional
planning commissions to participate with other states and provinces or
their subdivisions;
(7) Collaborate with other state agencies and organizations to meet
state graduation rate goals and help reduce the dropout rate, in
accordance with section 1 of this act;
(8) Hold public hearings and meetings to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;
(((8))) (9) Conduct research and analysis in furtherance of the
state's economic and community development efforts including
maintenance of current information on market, demographic, and economic
trends as they affect different industrial sectors, geographic regions,
and communities with special economic and social problems in the state;
and
(((9))) (10) Develop a schedule of fees for services where
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall collaborate with other state agencies and
organizations to meet state graduation rate goals and help reduce the
dropout rate, in accordance with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall collaborate with other state agencies and
organizations to meet state graduation rate goals and help reduce the
dropout rate, in accordance with section 1 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.190.100 and 1998 c 245 s 123 are each amended to
read as follows:
The family policy council shall:
(1) Establish network boundaries no later than July 1, 1994. There
is a presumption that no county may be divided between two or more
community networks and no network shall have fewer than forty thousand
population. When approving multicounty networks, considering dividing
a county between networks, or creating a network with a population of
less than forty thousand, the council must consider: (a) Common
economic, geographic, and social interests; (b) historical and existing
shared governance; and (c) the size and location of population centers.
Individuals and groups within any area shall be given ample opportunity
to propose network boundaries in a manner designed to assure full
consideration of their expressed wishes;
(2) Develop a technical assistance and training program to assist
communities in creating and developing community networks and
comprehensive plans;
(3) Approve the structure, purpose, goals, plan, and performance
measurements of each community network;
(4) Identify all prevention and early intervention programs and
funds, including all programs funded under RCW 69.50.520, in addition
to the programs set forth in RCW 70.190.110, which could be
transferred, in all or part, to the community networks, and report
their findings and recommendations to the governor and the legislature
regarding any appropriate program transfers by January 1 of each year;
(5) Reward community networks that show exceptional success as
provided in RCW 43.41.195;
(6) Seek every opportunity to maximize federal and other funding
that is consistent with the plans approved by the council for the
purpose and goals of this chapter;
(7) Review the state-funded out-of-home placement rate before the
end of each contract to determine whether the region has sufficiently
reduced the rate. If the council determines that there has not been a
sufficient reduction in the rate, it may reduce the immediately
succeeding grant to the network;
(8)(a) The council shall monitor the implementation of programs
contracted by participating state agencies by reviewing periodic
reports on the extent to which services were delivered to intended
populations, the quality of services, and the extent to which service
outcomes were achieved at the conclusion of service interventions.
This monitoring shall include provision for periodic feedback to
community networks;
(b) The legislature intends that this monitoring be used by the
Washington state institute for public policy, together with public
health data on at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors, to
produce an external evaluation of the effectiveness of the networks and
their programs. For this reason, and to conserve public funds, the
council shall not conduct or contract for the conduct of control group
studies, quasi-experimental design studies, or other analysis efforts
to attempt to determine the impact of network programs on at-risk
behaviors or risk and protective factors; ((and))
(9) Review the implementation of chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.
The report shall use measurable performance standards to evaluate the
implementation; and
(10) Collaborate with other state agencies and organizations to
meet state graduation rate goals and help reduce the dropout rate, in
accordance with section 1 of this act.

--- END ---