BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.24.060 and 2001 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every gas company and every interstate gas pipeline company
subject to inspection or enforcement by the commission shall pay an
annual pipeline safety fee to the commission. The pipeline safety fees
received by the commission shall be deposited in the pipeline safety
account created in RCW 81.88.050.
(b) The aggregate amount of fees set shall be sufficient to recover
the reasonable costs of administering the pipeline safety program,
taking into account federal funds used to offset the costs. The fees
established under this section shall be designed to generate revenue
not exceeding appropriated levels of funding for the current fiscal
year. At a minimum, the fees established under this section shall be
sufficient to adequately fund pipeline inspection personnel, the timely
review of pipeline safety and integrity plans, the timely development
of spill response plans, the timely development of accurate maps of
pipeline locations, participation in federal pipeline safety efforts to
the extent allowed by law, and the staffing of the citizens committee
on pipeline safety.
(c) Increases in the aggregate amount of fees over the immediately
preceding fiscal year are subject to the requirements of RCW
43.135.055.
(2) The commission shall by rule establish the methodology it will
use to set the appropriate fee for each entity subject to this section.
The methodology shall provide for an equitable distribution of program
costs among all entities subject to the fee. The fee methodology shall
provide for:
(a) Direct assignment of average costs associated with annual
standard inspections, including the average number of inspection days
per year. In establishing these directly assignable costs, the
commission shall consider the requirements and guidelines of the
federal government, state safety standards, and good engineering
((practice[s])) practices; and
(b) A uniform and equitable means of estimating and allocating
costs of other duties relating to inspecting pipelines for safety that
are not directly assignable, including but not limited to design review
and construction inspections, specialized inspections, incident
investigations, geographic mapping system design and maintenance, and
administrative support.
(3) The commission shall require reports from those entities
subject to this section in the form and at such time as necessary to
set the fees. After considering the reports supplied by the entities,
the commission shall set the amount of the fee payable by each entity
by general order entered before ((July 1st of each year)) a date
established by rule.
(4) For companies subject to RCW 80.24.010, the commission shall
collect the pipeline safety fee as part of the fee specified in RCW
80.24.010. The commission shall allocate the moneys collected under
RCW 80.24.010 between the pipeline safety program and for other
regulatory purposes. The commission shall adopt rules that assure that
fee moneys related to the pipeline safety program are maintained
separately from other moneys collected by the commission under this
chapter.
(5) Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after its
due date must include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
Delinquent fees accrue interest at the rate of one percent per month.
(6) The commission shall keep accurate records of the costs
incurred in administering its gas pipeline safety program, and the
records are open to inspection by interested parties. The records and
data upon which the commission's determination is made shall be prima
facie correct in any proceeding to challenge the reasonableness or
correctness of any order of the commission fixing fees and distributing
regulatory expenses.
(7) If any entity seeks to contest the imposition of a fee imposed
under this section, that entity shall pay the fee and request a refund
within six months of the due date for the payment by filing a petition
for a refund with the commission. The commission shall establish by
rule procedures for handling refund petitions and may delegate the
decisions on refund petitions to the secretary of the commission.
(8) After establishing the fee methodology by rule as required in
subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall create a
regulatory incentive program for pipeline safety programs in
collaboration with the citizens committee on pipeline safety. The
regulatory incentive program created by the commission shall not shift
costs among companies paying pipeline safety fees and shall not
decrease revenue to pipeline safety programs. ((The regulatory
incentive program shall not be implemented until after the review
conducted according to RCW 81.88.150.))

Sec. 2 RCW 81.24.090 and 2001 c 238 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Every hazardous liquid pipeline company as defined in RCW
81.88.010 shall pay an annual pipeline safety fee to the commission.
The pipeline safety fees received by the commission shall be deposited
in the pipeline safety account created in RCW 81.88.050.
(b) The aggregate amount of fees set shall be sufficient to recover
the reasonable costs of administering the pipeline safety program,
taking into account federal funds used to offset the costs. The fees
established under this section shall be designed to generate revenue
not exceeding appropriated levels of funding for the current fiscal
year. At a minimum, the fees established under this section shall be
sufficient to adequately fund pipeline inspection personnel, the timely
review of pipeline safety and integrity plans, the timely development
of spill response plans, the timely development of accurate maps of
pipeline locations, participation in federal pipeline safety efforts to
the extent allowed by law, and the staffing of the citizens committee
on pipeline safety.
(c) Increases in the aggregate amount of fees over the immediately
preceding fiscal year are subject to the requirements of RCW
43.135.055.
(2) The commission shall by rule establish the methodology it will
use to set the appropriate fee for each entity subject to this section.
The methodology shall provide for an equitable distribution of program
costs among all entities subject to the fee. The fee methodology shall
provide for:
(a) Direct assignment of average costs associated with annual
standard inspections, including the average number of inspection days
per year. In establishing these directly assignable costs, the
commission shall consider the requirements and guidelines of the
federal government, state safety standards, and good engineering
((practice[s])) practices; and
(b) A uniform and equitable means of estimating and allocating
costs of other duties relating to inspecting pipelines for safety that
are not directly assignable, including but not limited to design review
and construction inspections, specialized inspections, incident
investigations, geographic mapping system design and maintenance, and
administrative support.
(3) The commission shall require reports from those entities
subject to this section in the form and at such time as necessary to
set the fees. After considering the reports supplied by the entities,
the commission shall set the amount of the fee payable by each entity
by general order entered before ((July 1st of each year)) a date
established by rule.
(4) For companies subject to RCW 81.24.010, the commission shall
collect the pipeline safety fee as part of the fee specified in RCW
81.24.010. The commission shall allocate the moneys collected under
RCW 81.24.010 between the pipeline safety program and for other
regulatory purposes. The commission shall adopt rules that assure that
fee moneys related to the pipeline safety program are maintained
separately from other moneys collected by the commission under this
chapter.
(5) Any payment of the fee imposed by this section made after its
due date must include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
Delinquent fees accrue interest at the rate of one percent per month.
(6) The commission shall keep accurate records of the costs
incurred in administering its hazardous liquid pipeline safety program,
and the records are open to inspection by interested parties. The
records and data upon which the commission's determination is made
shall be prima facie correct in any proceeding to challenge the
reasonableness or correctness of any order of the commission fixing
fees and distributing regulatory expenses.
(7) If any entity seeks to contest the imposition of a fee imposed
under this section, that entity shall pay the fee and request a refund
within six months of the due date for the payment by filing a petition
for a refund with the commission. The commission shall establish by
rule procedures for handling refund petitions and may delegate the
decisions on refund petitions to the secretary of the commission.
(8) After establishing the fee methodology by rule as required in
subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall create a
regulatory incentive program for pipeline safety programs in
collaboration with the citizens committee on pipeline safety. The
regulatory incentive program created by the commission shall not shift
costs among companies paying pipeline safety fees and shall not
decrease revenue to pipeline safety programs. ((The regulatory
incentive program shall not be implemented until after the review
conducted according to RCW 81.88.150.))

--- END ---