BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to clarify that
parents who share custody of their child or children equally pursuant
to a parenting plan are each obligated to advise the other parent if
there is an intent to relocate. The legislature recognizes that a
different result was created by the court of appeals' decision in
Spring v. Spring and the purpose of this act is to prevent a similar
result in such circumstances by requiring that a notice of intent to
relocate be given in all circumstances in which a parent intends to
relocate.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.09.410 and 2000 c 21 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 26.09.405
through 26.09.560 and 26.09.260 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Court order" means a temporary or permanent parenting plan,
custody order, visitation order, or other order governing the residence
of a child under this title.
(2) "Relocate" means a change in ((principal)) residence either
permanently or for a protracted period of time.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.09.430 and 2000 c 21 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 26.09.460, a person ((with whom the child
resides a majority of the time)) including a parent shall notify every
other person, including the other parent, entitled to residential time
or visitation with the child under a court order if the person or
parent intends to relocate. Notice shall be given as prescribed in RCW
26.09.440 and 26.09.450.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.09.480 and 2000 c 21 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A party objecting to the intended relocation of the child or
the relocating parent's proposed revised residential schedule shall do
so by filing the objection with the court and serving the objection on
the relocating party and all other persons entitled by court order to
residential time or visitation with the child by means of personal
service or mailing by any form of mail requiring a return receipt to
the relocating party at the address designated for service on the
notice of intended relocation and to other parties requiring notice at
their mailing address. The objection must be filed and served,
including a three-day waiting period if the objection is served by
mail, within thirty days of receipt of the notice of intended
relocation of the child. The objection shall be in the form of: (a)
A petition for modification of the parenting plan pursuant to
relocation; or (b) other court proceeding adequate to provide grounds
for relief.
(2) Unless the special circumstances described in RCW 26.09.460
apply, the person intending to relocate the child shall not, without a
court order, change the ((principal)) residence of the child during the
period in which a party may object. The order required under this
subsection may be obtained ex parte. If the objecting party notes a
court hearing to prevent the relocation of the child for a date not
more than fifteen days following timely service of an objection to
relocation, the party intending to relocate the child shall not change
the ((principal)) residence of the child pending the hearing unless the
special circumstances described in RCW 26.09.460(3) apply.
(3) The administrator for the courts shall develop a standard form,
separate from existing dissolution or modification forms, for use in
filing an objection to relocation of the child or objection of the
relocating person's proposed revised residential schedule.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is to be applied retroactively to
all parenting plans which are in effect as of the effective date of
this act. This section does not grant the right to reopen any matter
under chapter 26.09 RCW where relocation has already occurred, unless
it is a new instance of relocation that has arisen on or after the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---