BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9A.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
is guilty of the crime of abandonment of a dependent person in the
fourth degree if:
(a) The person is the parent of a child, a person entrusted with
the physical custody of a child or other dependent person, a person who
has assumed the responsibility to provide to a dependent person the
basic necessities of life, or a person employed to provide to the child
or other dependent person any of the basic necessities of life; and
(b) The person with criminal negligence, abandons the child or
other dependent person; and
(c) As a result of being abandoned, the child or other dependent
person suffers risk of bodily injury.
(2) A parent of a newborn who transfers the newborn to a qualified
person at an appropriate location pursuant to RCW 13.34.360 is not
subject to criminal liability under this section.
(3) Abandonment of a dependent person in the fourth degree is a
misdemeanor.

--- END ---