BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature
to establish, in addition to other remedies or rights of appeal of any
person under state law, an independent, impartial state office, readily
available to the public and accountable to the legislature. The office
shall be empowered to investigate the acts of state administrative
agencies and to recommend appropriate changes toward the goals of
safeguarding the rights of persons and of achieving higher levels of
competency, efficiency, and justice in the administration of state
laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be known and
cited as the Washington citizen advocate act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrative act" means any action, decision, adjudication,
failure to act, omission, rule, interpretation, recommendation, policy,
practice, or procedure of any agency.
(2) "Agency" means any department, organization, board, commission,
council, bureau, administrative tribunal, facility, public institution
of higher education, or other governmental entity of the state
government, any person who is providing services to individuals under
contract with a state agency, and any official, officer, administrative
hearing examiner, or employee of the state, whether elected or
appointed, acting or purporting to act by reason of connection with the
state, except:
(a) Any judge and the judge's staff;
(b) The legislature, its members, its committees and its employees;
(c) The governor and the governor's personal staff;
(d) Local agencies, locally elected officials and their personal
staff including a county, city, school district, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district,
or any other political subdivision of the state; and
(e) Any multistate governmental entity.
(3) "Person" means any individual, aggregate of individuals,
corporation, partnership, or unincorporated association.
(4) "Record" means all records, documents, books, papers, files,
photographs, microfilms, sound recordings, video recordings, magnetic
storage media, computer data, and all other materials, regardless of
physical form or characteristics, relating to the conduct of government
or the performance of any governmental or proprietary function
prepared, owned, used, or retained by or on behalf of any agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CITIZEN ADVOCATE--OFFICE CREATED. There is
hereby created an office within the legislative branch to be known as
the citizen advocate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 NOMINATION--APPOINTMENT. (1) When there is
a vacancy in the office of the citizen advocate, or within twelve
months before the expiration of the term of office, a citizen advocate
selection committee shall be convened. The committee shall consist of
nine members to be selected as follows:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, two from each
major caucus, and four members of the senate, two from each major
caucus, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives
and the president of the senate, respectively; and
(b) One member appointed by the governor.
(2) The appointing officers shall appoint the members of the
committee when a vacancy occurs in the office of citizen advocate. The
committee shall receive applications and nominate by a majority vote
one candidate for citizen advocate according to its adopted procedures.
(3) The appointment of the citizen advocate from this nomination is
made by passage of a bill on a roll call vote of sixty percent vote of
the membership of each house of the legislature. Membership on the
citizen advocate selection committee expires when the appointment is
approved.
(4) If the bill for appointment fails to receive the required sixty
percent vote, the committee shall reconvene with its same membership to
nominate another candidate by majority vote. The committee may not
renominate the same candidate.
(5) Meetings of the committee are subject to the open public
meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, open to the public except for meetings
to interview candidates and to make preliminary choices among the
candidates. The meeting held to vote for the nominee shall be open to
the public.
(6) The identity of all candidates shall be public.
(7) Each member of the committee shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240. The nonlegislative member shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the committee in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The legislative members
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
44.04.120.
(8) The committee shall receive staff support from the house office
of program research and senate committee services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 QUALIFICATIONS. (1) The citizen advocate
shall be a person of recognized judgment, objectivity, and integrity
who is well-equipped to analyze problems of law, administration, and
public policy.
(2) No person while serving as citizen advocate may:
(a) Be actively involved in political party activities or publicly
endorse, solicit funds for, or make contributions to political parties
or candidates for elective office;
(b) Be a candidate for or hold any other elective or appointive
public office; or
(c) Engage in any other occupation, business, or profession likely
to detract from the full-time performance of his or her duties as
citizen advocate or to result in a conflict of interest or an
appearance of impropriety or partiality.
(3) A person may not submit an application for citizen advocate
while serving as a member of the Washington legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 TERM OF OFFICE. The citizen advocate shall
serve for a term of six years and until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified. He or she may be reappointed for additional
terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 REMOVAL--VACANCY. (1) The removal of the
citizen advocate is made by passage of a bill on a roll call vote of
two-thirds vote of the membership of each house of the legislature.
The legislature may remove the citizen advocate from office only for
mental or physical incapacity to perform the duties of the office,
neglect of duty, or upon conviction of willful misconduct or
malfeasance in office. The reasons for removal, if requested, shall be
provided in writing to the citizen advocate at least one week before
passage of the bill in either house of the legislature.
(2) If the position of citizen advocate becomes vacant for any
reason, the chief deputy citizen advocate shall serve as acting citizen
advocate until a citizen advocate has been appointed for a full term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 COMPENSATION. The citizen advocate shall
receive a salary and benefits that are equivalent to that received by
a superior court judge. The salary of the citizen advocate shall not
be diminished during the citizen advocate's term of office, unless by
general law applying to all salaried officers of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 ORGANIZATION OF OFFICE. (1) The citizen
advocate shall:
(a) Select, employ, and fix the salary of the chief deputy citizen
advocate;
(b) Select, employ, and fix the salary of an issue-specific deputy
citizen advocate who shall be fully dedicated to children's and family
issues and who shall be responsible for coordinating the transition
from the existing family and children's ombudsman office to the new
office of the citizen advocate;
(c) For at least the first three years of operation, select,
employ, and fix the salary of an issue-specific deputy citizen advocate
who shall be at least half-time dedicated to education issues and who
shall be responsible for coordinating the transition from the existing
education ombudsmen office to the new office of the citizen advocate;
and
(d) Have the authority to select, employ, and fix the salaries of
such other officers and employees as the citizen advocate may deem
necessary to discharge the office of the citizen advocate's
responsibilities under this chapter. Salaries shall be approved by the
legislature and fixed within the amount available by appropriation.
All officers and employees shall serve at the citizen advocate's
pleasure and are exempt from the provisions of the state civil service
law, chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) The citizen advocate may delegate to staff members any
authority, power, or duty except the power of delegation and the
citizen advocate's duty to make any report under this chapter.
However, the citizen advocate may authorize the chief deputy citizen
advocate to act in the citizen advocate's stead in the event of
illness, absence, leave, or disability, or when, in the citizen
advocate's sole discretion, an appearance of impropriety or partiality
or a conflict of interest prevents the citizen advocate from
discharging his or her duty in a particular matter.
(3) The citizen advocate and his or her staff are entitled to
participate in any employee benefit or retirement plan available to
state employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 POWERS. The office of the citizen
advocate's powers and duties include but are not limited to the
following:
(1) To investigate, on complaint or on the citizen advocate's own
initiative, any administrative act of an agency, without regard to the
finality of the administrative act, however this authority to
investigate does not apply to those complaints that fall under the
jurisdiction of chapter 42.40 RCW and must be reported to the state
auditor;
(2) To undertake, participate in, or cooperate with persons and
agencies in conferences, inquiries, meetings, or studies that might
improve the functioning of agencies or lessen the risks that
objectionable administrative acts will occur;
(3) To make such inquiries and obtain such assistance and
information from any agency or person as the citizen advocate requires
for the discharge of the citizen advocate's duties. Agencies shall not
restrict the citizen advocate's access to agency personnel;
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, to have
access to and to examine and copy, without payment of a fee, any agency
records, including records that are confidential under state law.
Confidential documents provided to the office of the citizen advocate
by other agencies shall continue to maintain their confidential status.
The citizen advocate shall not disclose confidential records and is
subject to the same penalties as the legal custodian of the records for
any unlawful or unauthorized disclosure. This right to access and
examine records does not apply to the following:
(a) Those records in which the custodian can demonstrate that the
examination of the record would violate federal law or result in the
denial of federal funds to the agency;
(b) Sealed court records without a subpoena;
(c) Active criminal investigation records without a subpoena,
except that the names of officers involved in the investigation and the
cause of the investigation shall be released unless it is information
in records subject to (d) of this subsection;
(d) Those records that could lead to the identity of a confidential
police informant; and
(e) Attorney work product and communications that are protected
under attorney-client privilege without a subpoena;
(5) To enter and inspect without prior notice the premises of any
agency;
(6) To subpoena any person to appear, to give sworn testimony, or
to produce documentary or other evidence that is reasonably relevant to
the matters under investigation;
(7) To maintain confidential any matter related to complaints and
investigations, including the identities of the complainants and
witnesses, except as the citizen advocate deems necessary to discharge
the citizen advocate's duties and except as required by RCW 42.40.040;
(8) To bring suit in the appropriate state court to enforce this
chapter;
(9) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules required for the discharge
of the citizen advocate's duties, including procedures for receiving
and processing complaints, conducting investigations, and reporting
findings, conclusions, and recommendations; and
(10) To prepare and administer a budget for the office of the
citizen advocate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 COMPLAINTS--INVESTIGATION. (1) The citizen
advocate shall conduct a suitable investigation of a complaint that is
an appropriate subject for investigation, except as provided by
subsection (2) of this section. An appropriate subject for
investigation by the citizen advocate includes any administrative act
that the citizen advocate believes might be:
(a) Contrary to law or rule;
(b) Based on mistaken facts or irrelevant considerations;
(c) Unsupported by an adequate statement of reasons;
(d) Performed in an inefficient manner;
(e) Unreasonable, unfair, or otherwise objectionable, even though
in accordance with law; or
(f) Otherwise erroneous.
(2) The citizen advocate in the citizen advocate's discretion may
decide not to investigate because:
(a) The complainant could reasonably be expected to use another
remedy or channel;
(b) The complaint is trivial, frivolous, vexatious, or not made in
good faith;
(c) The complaint has been delayed too long to justify present
examination;
(d) The complainant is not personally aggrieved by the subject
matter of the complaint;
(e) Resources are insufficient for adequate investigation; or
(f) Other complaints are more worthy of attention.
(3) The citizen advocate's declining to investigate a complaint
does not bar the citizen advocate from proceeding on his or her own
initiative to investigate an administrative act whether or not included
in the complaint.
(4) An individual need not exhaust other administrative remedies
before filing a complaint with the citizen advocate.
(5) The citizen advocate may not levy any fees for the submission
or investigation of complaints.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 COMPLAINANT'S RIGHTS. (1) After the
citizen advocate has decided whether or not to investigate a complaint,
the citizen advocate shall inform the complainant in writing of the
decision.
(2) The citizen advocate shall, if requested in writing by the
complainant, report the status of his or her investigation to the
complainant in writing.
(3) After investigation of a complaint, the citizen advocate shall
inform the complainant of his or her conclusion or recommendation in
writing and, if appropriate, any action taken or to be taken by the
agency involved.
(4) A letter to the citizen advocate from a person held in custody,
including by detention, incarceration, or hospitalization by an agency,
shall be forwarded immediately, unopened, to the citizen advocate. A
letter from the citizen advocate to such person shall be immediately
delivered, unopened, to the person. Telephone and personal contacts
between the citizen advocate and a person in custody shall not be
prohibited or monitored.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 AGENCY RIGHTS. Before formally issuing a
conclusion or recommendation that is significantly critical or adverse
to an agency, the citizen advocate shall have consulted with that
agency and permitted the agency reasonable opportunity to reply. If
the citizen advocate makes a conclusion or recommendation available to
the agency in order to facilitate a reply, the conclusion or
recommendation is confidential and is not subject to public disclosure
under chapter 42.56 RCW. The conclusion or recommendation may not be
disclosed to the public by the agency unless the citizen advocate
releases it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 PROCEDURE AFTER INVESTIGATION. (1) After
investigation, the citizen advocate shall state any conclusions,
recommendations, and reasons therefor to the agency if the citizen
advocate is of the opinion that an agency should consider the matter
further; modify or cancel an act; alter a rule, practice, or ruling;
explain more fully the act in question; rectify an omission; or take
any other action. If the citizen advocate so requests, the agency
shall, within the time specified, inform the citizen advocate about the
action taken on recommendations or the reasons for not complying with
them.
(2) After a reasonable period of time has elapsed, the citizen
advocate may issue his or her conclusions or recommendations to the
legislature, the governor, a grand jury, the public, or any other
appropriate authority. The citizen advocate shall include any brief
statement the agency may provide if an opportunity to reply is required
by this chapter.
(3) If the citizen advocate believes that an action has been
dictated by laws whose results are unfair or otherwise objectionable
and could be revised by legislative action, the citizen advocate shall
notify the legislature and the agency of the desirable statutory
change.
(4) If the citizen advocate believes that any agency official or
employee has acted in a manner warranting criminal or disciplinary
proceedings, the citizen advocate shall refer the matter to the
appropriate authorities without notice to that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 REPORTS. (1) The citizen advocate may
issue special or general interim reports at his or her discretion to
the governor, the legislature, the public, or agencies.
(2) The citizen advocate shall annually report on his or her
activities to the governor, the legislature, the public, and, in the
citizen advocate's discretion, agencies. The annual report shall
include at a minimum:
(a) The number of complaints received;
(b) The number of complaints investigated;
(c) The number of complaints that have been resolved;
(d) The number of complaints that still involve ongoing
investigations; and
(e) The number of complaints dismissed.
(3) The information in subsection (2) of this section shall be
reported both as statewide numbers as well as broken down by agency.
Additional details for complaints that are dismissed shall be provided
in the report, such as the type of complaint and the reason the
complaint was dismissed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 CITIZEN ADVOCATE--IMMUNITIES. (1) The
substantive content of any finding, conclusion, recommendation, or
report of the citizen advocate or member of the citizen advocate's
staff shall not be reviewable in any court.
(2) The citizen advocate and the citizen advocate's staff have the
same immunities from civil and criminal liabilities as a judge of this
state.
(3) The citizen advocate and the citizen advocate's staff shall not
be compelled to testify or produce evidence in any judicial or
administrative proceeding with respect to any matter involving the
exercise of their official duties except as may be necessary to enforce
this chapter.
(4) Records and files maintained by the office of the citizen
advocate that are related to complaints taken by the office of the
citizen advocate or related to investigations conducted by the office
of the citizen advocate are not subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW, except that any currently serving member of the
legislature may require disclosure of any matter and shall have
complete access to the records and files of the citizen advocate upon
written request to view such records or files. The request must
include the reason for the request and must be signed by the legislator
making the request. The legislator must agree in the request to keep
the information viewed confidential except to the extent the
information is part of the reason to remove the citizen advocate under
the provisions of section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 WITNESSES' PRIVILEGES. Any person who
provides information under this chapter may be accompanied and advised
by counsel of his or her choice and shall be paid the same fees and
travel allowances and accorded the same privileges and immunities as
witnesses whose attendance has been required in superior court.
However, a representative of an agency providing information under this
chapter during business hours is not entitled to receive such fees and
allowances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 OBSTRUCTION. Any person who willfully
obstructs or hinders the proper and lawful actions of the citizen
advocate or the citizen advocate's staff, or willfully misleads or
attempts to mislead the citizen advocate or his or her staff in the
citizen advocate's inquiries, is guilty of official misconduct under
RCW 9A.80.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 REPRISALS PROHIBITED. (1) No person who
files a complaint or participates in any investigation or proceeding
under this chapter may be subject to any penalties, sanctions, or
restrictions in connection with his or her employment or be denied any
right, privilege, or benefit because of such action.
(2) A person who alleges a violation of this section may bring a
civil action for appropriate injunctive relief, actual damages, and
punitive damages. Punitive damages may not exceed ten thousand
dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 CONSTRUCTION. The provisions of this
chapter are in addition to and do not in any manner limit or affect any
other provisions of law under which any remedy or right of appeal is
provided for any person, or any procedure is provided for the inquiry
into or investigation of any matter. The powers conferred on the
citizen advocate may be exercised notwithstanding any provision of law
to the effect that any administrative action shall be final or
unappealable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 CITIZEN ADVOCATE ADMINISTRATIVE ACCOUNT.
(1) The citizen advocate administrative account is created in the state
treasury. The account is to be used solely for the payment of the
operating costs of the office of the citizen advocate. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account shall not exceed one-third of the
operating costs of the office in any fiscal biennium. The account
shall be financed through annual premiums assessed to state agencies
under the jurisdiction of the office.
(a) For the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the annual premium assessed
to each state agency shall be based solely on the appropriation from
the account, prorated on the basis of the number of full-time
equivalent employees of each agency, as determined by the office of
financial management.
(b) For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the annual premium of each
agency under the jurisdiction of the office shall be based on the
prorated share of the workload of the office related to each agency, as
determined by the citizen advocate. To avoid significant fluctuations
in the agency premiums, the workload data used to prorate the annual
premiums shall be based on a three-year rolling average, to the extent
that such data are available, and no agency premium may be increased by
more than twenty percent in any fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) No later than January 1, 2011, the
office of the citizen advocate shall review the powers and duties of
the mental health ombudsman created by RCW 71.24.350 and based on that
review make recommendations to the legislature regarding the continued
existence of the mental health ombudsman office including whether the
statute should be repealed and the duties assumed by the citizen
advocate. The citizen advocate shall consider both governmental
efficiency as well as adequacy of service to citizens in developing its
recommendations.
(2) No later than January 1, 2011, the office of the citizen
advocate shall review the powers and duties of the office of family and
children's ombudsman as authorized by chapter 43.06A RCW and based on
that review:
(a) Make finding as to whether any of the powers and duties listed
in RCW 43.06A.030 are not powers and duties that the office of the
citizen advocate is authorized to engage in; and
(b) For each power or duty the citizen advocate does not have
authority to engage in, make a recommendation to the legislature as to
whether the citizen advocate should have that authority.
(3) No later than January 1, 2012, the office of the citizen
advocate shall review the powers and duties of the long-term care
ombudsman created by chapter 43.190 RCW and based on that review make
recommendations to the legislature regarding the continued existence of
the long-term care ombudsman office as a separate office or whether the
office should be incorporated into the citizen advocate. The citizen
advocate shall consider both governmental efficiency as well as
adequacy of service to citizens in developing its recommendations and
shall consider any relevant federal requirements or implications
related to incorporating the long-term care ombudsman into the office
of the citizen advocate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Records and files maintained by the office of the citizen
advocate that are related to complaints taken by the office of the
citizen advocate or related to investigations conducted by the office
of the citizen advocate are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.
(2) Conclusions or recommendations made available to an agency
under section 14 of this act are exempt from disclosure under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) The office of the ombudsman for workers
of industrial insurance self-insured employers, as established in
chapter 51.14 RCW, is hereby abolished.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the
ombudsman for workers of industrial insurance self-insured employers
shall be delivered to the custody of the office of the citizen
advocate. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the office of the ombudsman for
workers of industrial insurance self-insured employers shall be made
available to the office of the citizen advocate. All funds, credits,
or other assets held by the office of the ombudsman for workers of
industrial insurance self-insured employers shall be assigned to the
office of the citizen advocate.
(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the ombudsman for
workers of industrial insurance self-insured employers shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
office of the citizen advocate.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the office of the
ombudsman for workers of industrial insurance self-insured employers
shall be continued and acted upon by the office of the citizen advocate
in the discretion of and to the extent it is within the authority of
the citizen advocate. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the office of the
citizen advocate.
(4) The abolition of the office of the ombudsman for workers of
industrial insurance self-insured employers shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 (1) Effective July 10, 2010, the office of
the education ombudsman, as established in chapter 43.06B RCW, is
hereby abolished.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the
education ombudsman shall be delivered to the custody of the office of
the citizen advocate. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the office of the
education ombudsman shall be made available to the office of the
citizen advocate. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the
office of the education ombudsman shall be assigned to the office of
the citizen advocate.
(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the education
ombudsman shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the office of the citizen advocate.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the office of the
education ombudsman shall be continued and acted upon by the office of
the citizen advocate in the discretion of and to the extent it is
within the authority of the citizen advocate. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the office of the citizen advocate.
(4) The abolition of the office of the education ombudsman shall
not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date
of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 (1) Effective July 10, 2010, the special
education ombudsman program located within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is hereby abolished.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the special education
ombudsman program shall be delivered to the custody of the office of
the citizen advocate. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the special education
ombudsman program shall be made available to the office of the citizen
advocate. All funds, credits, or other assets dedicated to the special
education ombudsman program shall be assigned to the office of the
citizen advocate.
(b) Any appropriations made to the special education ombudsman
program shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the office of the citizen advocate.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the special education
ombudsman program shall be continued and acted upon by the office of
the citizen advocate in the discretion of and to the extent it is
within the authority of the citizen advocate. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the office of the citizen advocate.
(4) The elimination of the special education ombudsman program
shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective
date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) Effective July 10, 2011, the office of
the family and children's ombudsman, as established in chapter 43.06A
RCW is hereby abolished. All references to the ombudsman or the office
of the family and children's ombudsman in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the citizen advocate or the
office of the citizen advocate.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the office of the
family and children's ombudsman shall be delivered to the custody of
the office of the citizen advocate. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
office of the family and children's ombudsman shall be made available
to the office of the citizen advocate. All funds, credits, or other
assets held by the office of the family and children's ombudsman shall
be assigned to the office of the citizen advocate.
(b) Any appropriations made to the office of the family and
children's ombudsman shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the office of the citizen advocate.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the office of the
family and children's ombudsman shall be continued and acted upon by
the office of the citizen advocate to the extent it is within the
authority of the citizen advocate. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
office of the citizen advocate.
(4) The abolition of the office of the family and children's
ombudsman shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the
effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public
employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 29 RCW 42.40.020 and 2008 c 266 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall
have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.
(2) "Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in
any department or agency of state government.
(3) "Good faith" means the individual providing the information or
report of improper governmental activity has a reasonable basis in fact
for reporting or providing the information. An individual who
knowingly provides or reports, or who reasonably ought to know he or
she is providing or reporting, malicious, false, or frivolous
information, or information that is provided with reckless disregard
for the truth, or who knowingly omits relevant information is not
acting in good faith.
(4) "Gross mismanagement" means the exercise of management
responsibilities in a manner grossly deviating from the standard of
care or competence that a reasonable person would observe in the same
situation.
(5) "Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow
funds to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating
from the standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would
observe in the same situation.
(6)(a) "Improper governmental action" means any action by an
employee undertaken in the performance of the employee's official
duties:
(i) Which is a gross waste of public funds or resources as defined
in this section;
(ii) Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the
violation is not merely technical or of a minimum nature;
(iii) Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public
health or safety;
(iv) Which is gross mismanagement; or
(v) Which prevents the dissemination of scientific opinion or
alters technical findings without scientifically valid justification,
unless state law or a common law privilege prohibits disclosure. This
provision is not meant to preclude the discretion of agency management
to adopt a particular scientific opinion or technical finding from
among differing opinions or technical findings to the exclusion of
other scientific opinions or technical findings. Nothing in this
subsection prevents or impairs a state agency's or public official's
ability to manage its public resources or its employees in the
performance of their official job duties. This subsection does not
apply to de minimis, technical disagreements that are not relevant for
otherwise improper governmental activity. Nothing in this provision
requires the auditor to contract or consult with external experts
regarding the scientific validity, invalidity, or justification of a
finding or opinion.
(b) "Improper governmental action" does not include personnel
actions, for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to
employee grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers,
assignments, reassignments, reinstatements, restorations,
reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals,
suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, claims of
discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in
RCW 42.40.030.
(7) "Public official" means the attorney general's designee or
designees; the director, or equivalent thereof in the agency where the
employee works; an appropriate number of individuals designated to
receive whistleblower reports by the head of each agency; the office of
the citizen advocate; or the executive ethics board.
(8) "Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious
injury, illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is
a gross deviation from the standard of care or competence which a
reasonable person would observe in the same situation.
(9) "Use of official authority or influence" includes threatening,
taking, directing others to take, recommending, processing, or
approving any personnel action such as an appointment, promotion,
transfer, assignment including but not limited to duties and office
location, reassignment, reinstatement, restoration, reemployment,
performance evaluation, determining any material changes in pay,
provision of training or benefits, tolerance of a hostile work
environment, or any adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other
disciplinary action.
(10)(a) "Whistleblower" means:
(i) An employee who in good faith reports alleged improper
governmental action to the auditor or other public official, as defined
in subsection (7) of this section, initiating an investigation by the
auditor under RCW 42.40.040; or
(ii) An employee who is perceived by the employer as reporting,
whether they did or not, alleged improper governmental action to the
auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of this
section, initiating an investigation by the auditor under RCW
42.40.040.
(b) For purposes of the provisions of this chapter and chapter
49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and retaliatory action, the term
"whistleblower" also means:
(i) An employee who in good faith provides information to the
auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of this
section, in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 and an
employee who is believed to have reported asserted improper
governmental action to the auditor or other public official, as defined
in subsection (7) of this section, or to have provided information to
the auditor or other public official, as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040
but who, in fact, has not reported such action or provided such
information; or
(ii) An employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting
review or provides information to the rules review committee, and an
employee who is believed to have identified rules warranting review or
provided information to the rules review committee but who, in fact,
has not done so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 51.14.300 (Ombudsman office created -- Appointment -- Open and
competitive contracting) and 2007 c 281 s 1;
(2) RCW 51.14.310 (Ombudsman -- Term of office -- Removal -- Vacancies)
and 2007 c 281 s 2;
(3) RCW 51.14.320 (Ombudsman -- Training or experience
qualifications) and 2007 c 281 s 3;
(4) RCW 51.14.330 (Ombudsman office -- Staffing level) and 2007 c 281
s 4;
(5) RCW 51.14.340 (Ombudsman office -- Powers and duties) and 2007 c
281 s 5;
(6) RCW 51.14.350 (Ombudsman office -- Referral procedures--Department response to referred complaints) and 2007 c 281 s 6;
(7) RCW 51.14.360 (Ombudsman liability -- Discriminatory,
disciplinary, or retaliatory actions -- Communications privileged and
confidential -- Testimony) and 2007 c 281 s 7;
(8) RCW 51.14.370 (Confidentiality of ombudsman records and files--Disclosure prohibited -- Exception) and 2007 c 281 s 8;
(9) RCW 51.14.380 (Explaining ombudsman program -- Posters and
brochures) and 2007 c 281 s 9;
(10) RCW 51.14.390 (Ombudsman office -- Funding) and 2007 c 281 s 10;
and
(11) RCW 51.14.400 (Ombudsman -- Annual report to governor) and 2007
c 281 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1,
2010:
(1) RCW 43.06B.010 (Office created -- Purposes -- Appointment -- Regional
education ombudsmen) and 2006 c 116 s 3;
(2) RCW 43.06B.020 (Powers and duties) and 2008 c 165 s 2 & 2006 c
116 s 4;
(3) RCW 43.06B.030 (Liability for good faith performance--Privileged communications) and 2006 c 116 s 5;
(4) RCW 43.06B.040 (Confidentiality) and 2006 c 116 s 6; and
(5) RCW 43.06B.050 (Annual reports) and 2006 c 116 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1,
2011:
(1) RCW 43.06A.010 (Office created -- Purpose) and 1996 c 131 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.06A.020 (Ombudsman -- Appointment, term of office) and
1998 c 288 s 7 & 1996 c 131 s 3;
(3) RCW 43.06A.030 (Duties) and 1996 c 131 s 4;
(4) RCW 43.06A.050 (Confidentiality) and 2005 c 274 s 294 & 1996 c
131 s 6;
(5) RCW 43.06A.060 (Admissibility of evidence -- Testimony regarding
official duties) and 1998 c 288 s 1;
(6) RCW 43.06A.070 (Release of identifying information) and 1998 c
288 s 2;
(7) RCW 43.06A.080 (Inapplicability of privilege in RCW 43.06A.060)
and 1998 c 288 s 3;
(8) RCW 43.06A.085 (Liability for good faith performance--Privileged communications) and 1999 c 390 s 7;
(9) RCW 43.06A.090 (Report of conduct warranting criminal or
disciplinary proceedings) and 1998 c 288 s 4;
(10) RCW 43.06A.100 (Communication with children in custody of
department of social and health services -- Access to information in
possession or control of department or state institutions) and 2008 c
211 s 3 & 1999 c 390 s 5;
(11) RCW 43.06A.110 (Child fatality review recommendations -- Annual
report) and 2008 c 211 s 2; and
(12) RCW 43.06A.900 (Construction) and 1998 c 288 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 Captions used in this chapter are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Sections 1 through 23, 28, and 33 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

--- END ---