BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
ECONOMIC STIMULUS FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that President
Barack Obama and the 111th Congress have enacted the American Recovery
and Reinvestment Act of 2009 in an effort to stimulate the American
economy, create and save jobs, and speed recovery from one of the
deepest economic recessions in recent history. The investment of
federal funds will help alleviate some of the economic burdens the
states face, and create jobs for the unemployed. The act includes $492
million in federal transportation funding for Washington state and
local highway projects and $179 million for local transit agency
improvement projects. In addition, the act includes over $11 billion
in new funding for competitive national grant programs for highways of
regional significance, ferries, and rail priorities. The legislature
also finds that Washington state is well positioned to deliver
infrastructure projects in one hundred twenty days, as is required for
at least half of the state's share of federal stimulus highway funds,
and expects to receive additional funds that other states are unable to
use in this time frame. The legislature further finds that the state's
work to date on projects funded through the "nickel" and
"transportation partnership" funding acts mean that many regionally
significant projects are poised to compete well for nationally
available funds.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to revitalize
Washington's economy and reduce the state's unemployment rate by
quickly putting people to work around the state on projects that
promote safety, relieve traffic congestion, and preserve long-term
investments that will provide benefits into the future. Such projects
will be constructed quickly and will generate a significant number of
jobs, thereby strengthening Washington's economy and its families
seeking work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--AMERICAN RECOVERY AND REINVESTMENT ACT OF 2009.
Motor Vehicle Account--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,400,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The entire appropriation in this section is provided solely for
the projects and amounts listed in ARRA Washington State Project LEAP
document 2009, as developed on February 24, 2009. Funds under this
section may be reallocated among projects shown in the document to the
extent that the department finds it necessary for the purposes of
facilitating completion of the projects with the highest priority or to
maintain maximum federal funds eligibility.
(2) To achieve the legislative objectives provided in section 1(2)
of this act with respect to highway projects, it is the intent of the
legislature that the appropriation in this section be used for:
Transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects and
transportation partnership account (TPA) projects that would have
otherwise been delayed due to decreased revenues, so as to advance
project completion dates similar to those envisioned in the enacted
2008 legislative list of projects; projects that preserve or
rehabilitate Washington state highways and roads; and projects that
modify roadway alignments and conditions to create safer roads for the
traveling public.
(3)(a) The department of transportation shall obligate at least
fifty percent of the funds no later than one hundred twenty days after
surface transportation program funds under the American Recovery and
Reinvestment Act of 2009 have been apportioned to the states;
(b) The department shall obligate all funds no later than one year
after surface transportation program funds under the American Recovery
and Reinvestment Act of 2009 have been apportioned to the states;
(c) The department shall place the first priority for allocating
funds on those projects listed as "First Tier" projects on ARRA
Washington State Project LEAP document 2009, as developed on February
24, 2009. The department shall place the second priority on projects
listed as "Second Tier" projects on the document; and
(d) Within each tier of projects on ARRA Washington State Project
LEAP document 2009, as developed on February 24, 2009, the department
shall place the highest priority for allocating funds on the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) projects and
transportation partnership account (TPA) projects listed to advance
their completion. The department shall prioritize funding for other
projects within the tier according to how soon the contract for the
project could be awarded.
(4) By June 30, 2009, the department of transportation shall report
to the legislative standing committees on transportation and the office
of financial management on the status of federal stimulus funds
including, but not limited to, identifying the projects shown in ARRA
Washington State Project LEAP document 2009, as developed on February
24, 2009, for which federal stimulus funding has already been
obligated, the amount of federal recovery funds estimated to be
obligated to the projects, and the completion status of each project.
Subsequent status reports are due to the legislative standing
committees on transportation and the office of financial management on
August 31, 2009, and December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If the department of transportation receives
additional funding pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009, including funding redistributed from other states, the
department shall apply such funds to projects on ARRA Washington State
Project LEAP document 2009, as developed on February 24, 2009, as
prioritized by section 2(3) (c) and (d) of this act. If funds are in
excess of the amounts shown on ARRA Washington State Project LEAP
document 2009, as developed on February 24, 2009, additional funds must
be applied to improvement, preservation, ferries, and rail capital
projects identified in the LEAP transportation documents in the enacted
2009-11 omnibus transportation appropriations act. However, if the
funds may not be used for any of the purposes enumerated in this
section, then the department may program the funds for other
transportation-related activities. The department shall notify the
legislative standing committees on transportation and the office of
financial management of the amount of funds received and the projects
receiving funding through this process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 To the extent practicable, the department of
transportation shall apply to the competitive grant programs created by
the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 for all
transportation modes including, but not limited to, rail, projects of
regional significance, and ferries, as well as other grant programs
created by the act that may provide funding for transportation-related
activities. Concurrent with the submission of these applications, the
department of transportation shall report on these applications to the
legislative standing committees on transportation and the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 For the distribution of funds that are
suballocated within the state pursuant to the American Recovery and
Reinvestment Act of 2009 to areas of the state outside of the
transportation management areas, the department of transportation shall
convene a local oversight and accountability panel, which shall include
representation from, at a minimum, the associations of Washington
cities and counties, the Washington public ports association, and the
transportation improvement board. The panel, chaired by the executive
director of the transportation improvement board, shall ensure rapid
project delivery and accountability for funds. The panel shall proceed
with an expedited statewide process utilizing the metropolitan planning
organization and county lead agency prioritized listing of local
projects. The department shall monitor the projects selected to
receive stimulus funding to ensure that Washington state is successful
in obligating all of its funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are for the
period ending June 30, 2011.

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 101 2008 c 121 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($434,000))
$433,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of $22,000 may be expended to
pay the department of personnel for conducting the 2007 salary survey.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- OPERATING
Sec. 201 2008 c 121 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,605,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,845,000))
$15,844,000
School Zone Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,376,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,826,000))
$21,825,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $76,000 of the school zone safety
account--state appropriation is provided solely for contracting with
the office of the superintendent of public instruction (OSPI) to
conduct pilot programs in three school districts for road safety
education and training for children, in order to teach children safe
walking, bicycling, and transit use behavior. The pilot projects shall
be conducted during the 2008-09 academic year, and shall be modeled
after a program and curriculum successfully implemented in the Spokane
school district. Funds are provided for curriculum resources, bicycle
purchases, teacher training, other essential services and equipment,
and OSPI administrative expenses which may include contracting out
pilot program administration. The participating school districts shall
be located as follows: One in Grant county, one in Island county, and
one in Kitsap county. The OSPI shall evaluate the pilot programs, and
report to the transportation committees of the legislature no later
than December 1, 2009, on the outcomes of the pilot programs. The
report shall include a survey identifying barriers to, interest in, and
the likelihood of students traveling by biking, walking, or transit
both prior to and following completion of the pilot program.

Sec. 202 2008 c 121 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,058,000))
$2,057,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,388,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,346,000))
$4,345,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $481,000 of the county arterial
preservation account--state appropriation is provided solely for
continued development and implementation of a maintenance management
system to manage county transportation assets.

Sec. 203 2008 c 121 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,778,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,780,000))
$1,779,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,558,000))
$3,557,000

Sec. 204 2008 c 121 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,513,000))
$2,512,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,063,000))
$3,062,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($750,000)) $950,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is for establishing a work group to implement Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2358 (regarding state ferries) and review
other matters relating to Washington state ferries. The cochairs of
the committee shall establish the work group comprising committee
members or their designees, an appointee by the governor, and other
stakeholders as appointed by the cochairs, to assist in the committee's
work. The work group shall report on its tasks to the transportation
committees of the legislature by December 2008. The work group is
tasked with the following:
(a) Implementing the recommendations of Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 2358 (regarding state ferries). As directed by Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2358, the committee work group shall
participate in and provide a review of the following:
(i) The Washington transportation commission's development and
interpretation of a survey of ferry customers;
(ii) The department of transportation's analysis and
reestablishment of vehicle level of service standards. In
reestablishing the standards, consideration must be given to whether
boat wait is the appropriate measure;
(iii) The department's development of pricing policy proposals. In
developing these policies, the policy, in effect on some routes, of
collecting fares in only one direction must be evaluated to determine
whether one-way fare pricing best serves the ferry system;
(iv) The department's development of operational strategies;
(v) The department's development of terminal design standards; and
(vi) The department's development of a long-range capital plan;
(b) Reviewing the following Washington state ferry programs:
(i) Ridership demand forecast;
(ii) Updated life cycle cost model, as directed by Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2358;
(iii) Administrative operating costs, nonlabor and nonfuel
operating costs, Eagle Harbor maintenance facility program and
maintenance costs, administrative and systemwide capital costs, and
vessel preservation costs; and
(iv) The Washington state ferries' proposed capital cost allocation
plan methodology, as described in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2358;
(c) Making recommendations regarding:
(i) The most efficient timing and sizing of future vessel
acquisitions beyond those currently authorized by the legislature.
Vessel acquisition recommendations must be based on the ridership
projections, level of service standards, and operational and pricing
strategies reviewed by the committee and must include the impact of
those recommendations on the timing and size of terminal capital
investments and the state ferries' long range operating and capital
finance plans; and
(ii) Capital financing strategies for consideration in the 2009
legislative session. This work must include confirming the
department's estimate of future capital requirements based on a long
range capital plan and must include the department's development of a
plan for codevelopment and public private partnership opportunities at
public ferry terminals; and
(d) Evaluate the capital cost allocation plan methodology developed
by the department to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2358.
(2) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$250,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
are for the continuing implementation of chapter 514, Laws of 2007.
(3) $300,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is for implementing Substitute House Bill No. 1694
(coordinated transportation). If Substitute House Bill No. 1694 is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $150,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the Puget Sound regional council to conduct a pilot program for
multimodal concurrency analysis. This pilot program will analyze total
trip needs for a regional growth center based on adopted land use
plans, identify the number of trips which can be accommodated by
planned roadway, transit service, and nonmotorized investments, and
identify gaps for trips that cannot be served and strategies to fill
those gaps. The purpose of this pilot is to demonstrate how this type
of multimodal concurrency analysis can be used to broaden and
strengthen local concurrency programs.
(5) $236,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for a comprehensive analysis, as stated in Senate Bill No. 5689, of
mid-term and long-term transportation funding mechanisms and methods.
Elements of the study will include existing data and trends, policy
objectives, performance and evaluation criteria, incremental transition
strategies, and possibly, scaled testing. Baseline data and methods
assessment must be concluded by December 31, 2009. Performance
criteria must be developed by June 30, 2010, and recommended planning
level alternative funding strategies must be completed by December 31,
2010.

Sec. 205 2008 c 121 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,322,000))
$2,321,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $112,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,434,000))
$2,433,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the commission to conduct a survey of ferry
customers as described in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358.
Development and interpretation of the survey must be done with
participation of the joint transportation committee work group
established in section 205(1) of this act.
(2) The commission shall conduct a planning grade tolling study
that is based on the recommended policies in the commission's
comprehensive tolling study submitted September 20, 2006.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium,
the transportation commission shall establish, periodically review,
and, if necessary, modify a schedule of toll charges applicable to the
state route 167 high-occupancy toll lane pilot project, as required by
RCW 47.56.403.
(4) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 2007-09 fiscal biennium,
the transportation commission shall periodically review, and, if
necessary, modify the schedule of toll charges applicable to the Tacoma
Narrows bridge, taking into consideration the recommendations of the
citizen advisory committee created by RCW 47.46.091.
(5) $205,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of potential revenue sources for the
Washington state ferry system. The study must model and assess the
revenue generating potentials of feasible alternative funding sources.
The revenue forecasting models must be dynamic and ownership of these
models must be retained by the commission. The commission shall
develop revenue source recommendations that will generate revenue equal
to or greater than the funding level identified by the ferries finance
study of the joint transportation committee referenced in section 205
of this act, and shall report its recommendations to the transportation
committees of the legislature by November 15, 2008.

Sec. 206 2008 c 121 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($226,924,000))
$220,920,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,602,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($237,936,000))
$231,932,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Washington state patrol officers engaged in off-duty uniformed
employment providing traffic control services to the department of
transportation or other state agencies may use state patrol vehicles
for the purpose of that employment, subject to guidelines adopted by
the chief of the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol
shall be reimbursed for the use of the vehicle at the prevailing state
employee rate for mileage and hours of usage, subject to guidelines
developed by the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) In addition to the user fees, the patrol shall transfer into
the state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account under RCW
43.79.470 no more than the amount of appropriated state patrol highway
account and general fund funding necessary to cover the costs for the
patrol's use of the aircraft. The state patrol highway account and
general fund -- state funds shall be transferred proportionately in
accordance with a cost allocation that differentiates between highway
traffic enforcement services and general policing purposes.
(3) The patrol shall not account for or record locally provided DUI
cost reimbursement payments as expenditure credits to the state patrol
highway account. The patrol shall report the amount of expected
locally provided DUI cost reimbursements to the governor and
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
September 30th of each year.
(4) (($1,662,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (commercial vehicle enforcement). If Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5))) During the 2007-2009 biennium, the Washington state patrol
shall continue to perform traffic accident investigations on Thurston,
Mason, and Lewis county roads when requested to do so by the respective
county; however, the counties shall conduct traffic accident
investigations on county roads beginning July 1, 2009.
(((6) $100,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1417 (health benefits for surviving dependents). If
Substitute House Bill No. 1417 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $3,300,000)) (5) $1,832,767 of the state patrol highway
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the salaries and
benefits associated with accretion in the number of troopers employed
above 1,158 authorized commissioned troopers, or solely for training
new cadets; however, the amount provided in this subsection is
contingent on the Washington state patrol submitting a 2009-11 budget
request that fully funds field force operations without reliance on a
projected vacancy rate. The Washington state patrol shall perform a
study with a final report due to the legislative transportation
committees by December 1, 2008, on the advantages and disadvantages of
staffing the commercial vehicle enforcement section with commissioned
officers instead of commercial vehicle enforcement officers.
(8) By July 1, 2008, the Washington state patrol shall assign six
additional troopers to the Monroe detachment from among troopers
requesting transfer to Monroe or graduating cadet classes.

Sec. 207 2008 c 121 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,552,000))
$1,535,000

Sec. 208 2008 c 121 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL -- TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU
State Patrol Highway Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,726,000))
$98,873,000
State Patrol Highway Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,008,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,734,000))
$100,881,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The Washington state patrol shall work with the risk management
division in the office of financial management in compiling the
Washington state patrol's data for establishing the agency's risk
management insurance premiums to the tort claims account. The office
of financial management and the Washington state patrol shall submit a
report to the legislative transportation committees by December 31st of
each year on the number of claims, estimated claims to be paid, method
of calculation, and the adjustment in the premium.
(2) (($9,981,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
automobile fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(3) $7,461,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of pursuit vehicles.
(4) $6,328,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for
vehicle repair and maintenance costs of vehicles used for highway
purposes.
(5) $384,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely for the
purchase of mission vehicles used for highway purposes in the
commercial vehicle and traffic investigation sections of the Washington
state patrol.
(6))) The Washington state patrol may submit information technology
related requests for funding only if the patrol has coordinated with
the department of information services as required by section 602 of
this act.
(((7))) (3) $630,000 of the total appropriation is provided solely
for the ongoing software maintenance and technical support for the
digital microwave system. The Washington state patrol shall coordinate
with the other members of the Washington state interoperability
executive committee to ensure compatibility between emergency
communication systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to 2007 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL. The appropriations to the Washington
state patrol in chapter 121, Laws of 2008 and this act must be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified in this act. However,
after May 1, 2009, unless specifically prohibited, the state patrol may
transfer state patrol highway account--state appropriations for the
2007-2009 fiscal biennium between operating programs after approval by
the director of financial management. However, the state patrol shall
not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified
purpose. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this section.

Sec. 210 2008 c 121 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
Marine Fuel Tax Refund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
Motorcycle Safety Education Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,898,000))
$3,865,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($830,000))
$819,000
Highway Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($145,444,000))
$144,531,000
Highway Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $233,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($78,235,000))
$77,030,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,372,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,354,000
Department of Licensing Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,639,000))
$3,115,000
Washington State Patrol Highway Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($237,182,000))
$233,496,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($2,941,000)) $2,933,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1267 (modifying commercial driver's license
requirements). If Substitute House Bill No. 1267 is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The
department shall informally report to the legislature by December 1,
2008, with measurable data indicating the department's progress in
meeting its goal of improving public safety by improving the quality of
the commercial driver's license testing process.
(2) (($716,000)) $663,000 of the motorcycle safety education
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5273 (modifying motorcycle driver's license
endorsement and education provisions). If Senate Bill No. 5273 is not
enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(3)(a) (($12,422,000)) $10,685,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the
processing costs of issuing enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards.
(b) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection, up to
$1,000,000 is for a statewide educational campaign, which must include
coordination with existing public and private entities, to inform the
Washington public of the benefits of the new enhanced drivers' licenses
and identicards. Funds may be spent on educational campaigns only
after the caseload for enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards falls
below levels that can be reasonably processed by the department within
the appropriation provided by this subsection. $300,000 of the
$1,000,000 is for the department to partner with cross-border tourism
businesses to create an educational campaign.
(c) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection,
(($10,722,000)) $8,985,000 is provided solely for costs associated with
providing enhanced driver's license processing at 14 licensing services
offices.
(d) Of the amount provided in (a) of this subsection, $700,000 is
provided solely for costs associated with extending hours beyond
current regular business hours at the 14 licensing service offices that
provide enhanced driver's license processing services.
(4) (($91,000)) $6,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation and (($152,000)) $10,000 of the highway safety account--
state appropriation are provided solely for contracting with the office
of the attorney general to investigate criminal activity uncovered in
the course of the agency's licensing and regulatory activities.
Funding is provided for the 2008 fiscal year. The department may
request funding for the 2009 fiscal year if the request is submitted
with measurable data indicating the department's progress in meeting
its goal of increased prosecution of illegal activity.
(5) $350,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs associated with the systems development
of the interface that will allow insurance carriers and their agents
real time, online access to drivers' records. If Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5937 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(6) (($1,145,000)) $625,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 1304 (modifying commercial motor vehicle
carrier provisions). If Substitute House Bill No. 1304 is not enacted
by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The department may submit information technology related
requests for funding only if the department has coordinated with the
department of information services as required by section 602 of this
act.
(8) (($116,000)) $81,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to prepare draft
legislation that streamlines title and registration statutes to
specifically address apparent conflicts, fee distribution, and other
relevant issues that are revenue neutral and which do not change
legislative policy. The department shall submit the draft legislation
to the transportation committees of the legislature by the end of the
biennium.
(9) $246,000 of the department of licensing services account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 3029 (secure vehicle licensing system). If Substitute
House Bill No. 3029 is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $200,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6885 (driving
record abstracts). If Senate Bill No. 6885 is not enacted by June 30,
2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) (($417,000)) $413,000 of the highway safety account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 3254 (ignition interlock drivers'
license). If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 3254 is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $100,000 of the department of licensing services
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2817 (contaminated
vehicles). If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2817 is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(13) The department shall investigate instituting a program whereby
individual registered vehicle owners may have license plates tested for
reflectivity to determine whether the department's requirement that the
license plates be replaced after seven years can be waived for that
particular set of license plates.
(14)(a) By November 1, 2009, the department of licensing, in
consultation with the department of revenue, must analyze and plan for
the transfer, by July 1, 2010, of the administration of fuel taxes
imposed under chapters 82.36, 82.38, 82.41, and 82.42 RCW and other
provisions of law from the department of licensing to the department of
revenue. By November 1, 2009, the departments must report findings and
recommendations to the governor and the transportation and fiscal
committees of the legislature.
(b) The analysis and planning directed under this subsection must
include, but is not limited to, the following:
(i) Outreach to and solicitation of comment from parties affected
by the fuel taxes, including taxpayers, industry associations, state
and federal agencies, and Indian tribes, and from the transportation
and fiscal committees of the legislature;
(ii) Identification and analysis of relevant factors including, but
not limited to:
(A) Taxpayer reporting and payment processes;
(B) The international fuel tax agreement and the international
registration program;
(C) Computer systems;
(D) Best management practices and efficiencies;
(E) Costs; and
(F) Personnel matters;
(iii) Development of recommended actions to accomplish the
transfer; and
(iv) An implementation plan and schedule.
(c) The report must include draft legislation that transfers
administration to the department of revenue on July 1, 2010, and amends
existing law as needed.

Sec. 211 2008 c 121 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY -- PROGRAM
C
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,892,000))
$5,142,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($67,710,000))
$66,850,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,096,000))
$856,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,143,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,337,000))
$4,587,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($89,541,000))
$86,941,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall consult with the office of financial
management and the department of information services to ensure that
(a) the department's current and future system development is
consistent with the overall direction of other key state systems; and
(b) when possible, use or develop common statewide information systems
to encourage coordination and integration of information used by the
department and other state agencies and to avoid duplication.
(2) The department shall provide updated information on six project
milestones for all active projects, funded in part or in whole with
2005 transportation partnership account funds or 2003 nickel account
funds, on a quarterly basis in the transportation executive information
system (TEIS). The department shall also provide updated information
on six project milestones for projects, funded with preexisting funds
and that are agreed to by the legislature, office of financial
management, and the department, on a quarterly basis in TEIS.
(3) (($3,300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for preliminary work needed to transition the
department to the state government network. In collaboration with the
department of information services the department shall complete an
inventory of the current network infrastructure, develop an
implementation plan for transition to the state government network,
improve security, and initiate connection to the state government
network.
(4))) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation,
(($5,892,000)) $5,142,000 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and (($5,337,000)) $4,587,000 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are
provided solely for the department to develop a project management and
reporting system which is a collection of integrated tools for capital
construction project managers to use to perform all the necessary tasks
associated with project management. The department shall integrate
commercial off-the-shelf software with existing department systems and
enhanced approaches to data management to provide web-based access for
multi-level reporting and improved business workflows and reporting.
Beginning September 1, 2007, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the
department shall report to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature on the status of the
development and integration of the system. The first report shall
include a detailed work plan for the development and integration of the
system including timelines and budget milestones. At a minimum the
ensuing reports shall indicate the status of the work as it compares to
the work plan, any discrepancies, and proposed adjustments necessary to
bring the project back on schedule or budget if necessary.
(((5))) (4) The department may submit information technology
related requests for funding only if the department has coordinated
with the department of information services as required by section 602
of this act.
(((6))) (5) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the critical application
assessment implementation project. The department shall submit a
progress report on the critical application assessment implementation
project to the house of representatives and senate transportation
committees on or before December 1, 2007, and December 1, 2008, with a
final report on or before June 30, 2009.

Sec. 212 2008 c 121 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- AVIATION -- PROGRAM F
Aeronautics Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,866,000))
$7,659,000
Aeronautics Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $631,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,647,000))
$10,440,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The entire multimodal transportation
account -- state appropriation and (($400,000)) $350,000 of the
aeronautics account--state appropriation are provided solely for the
aviation planning council as provided for in RCW 47.68.410.

Sec. 213 2008 c 121 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT -- PROGRAM H
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,275,000))
$51,925,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,869,000))
$57,519,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $2,422,000 of the transportation
partnership account appropriation and $2,422,000 of the transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are provided solely
for consultant contracts to assist the department in the delivery of
the capital construction program by identifying improvements to program
delivery, program management, project controls, program and project
monitoring, forecasting, and reporting. The consultants shall work
with the department of information services in the development of the
project management and reporting system.
The consultants shall provide an updated copy of the capital
construction strategic plan to the legislative transportation
committees and to the office of financial management on June 30, 2008,
and each year thereafter.
The department shall coordinate its work with other budget and
performance efforts, including Roadmap, the findings of the critical
applications modernization and integration strategies study, including
proposed next steps, and the priorities of government process.
The department shall report to the transportation committees of the
house of representatives and senate, and the office of financial
management, by December 31, 2007, on the implementation status of
recommended capital budgeting and reporting options. Options must
include: Reporting against legislatively-established project
identification numbers and may include recommendations for reporting
against other appropriate project groupings; measures for reporting
progress, timeliness, and cost which create an incentive for the
department to manage effectively and report its progress in a
transparent manner; and criteria and process for transfers of funds
among projects.

Sec. 214 2008 c 121 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE -- PROGRAM M
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($331,342,000))
$350,553,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$25,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,797,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($342,139,000))
$381,350,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If portions of the appropriations in this section are required
to fund maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by
federal emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides,
supplemental appropriations must be requested to restore state funding
for ongoing maintenance activities.
(2) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
federal moneys received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall
place an equal amount of the motor vehicle account -- state into
unallotted status. This exchange shall not affect the amount of
funding available for snow and ice removal.
(3) The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any
private or local funds received for reimbursements of third party
damages that are in excess of the motor vehicle account -- private/local
appropriation.
(4) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided for unanticipated federal funds that may be received during
the 2007-09 biennium. Upon receipt of the funds, the department shall
provide a report on the use of the funds to the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management.
(5) Funding is provided for maintenance on the state system to
deliver service level targets as listed in LEAP Transportation Document
2007-C, as developed April 20, 2007. In delivering the program and
aiming for these targets, the department should concentrate on the
following areas:
(a) Eliminating the number of activities delivered in the "f" level
of service at the region level; and
(b) Evaluating, analyzing, and potentially redistributing resources
within and among regions to provide greater consistency in delivering
the program statewide and in achieving overall level of service
targets.
(6) The department may work with the department of corrections to
utilize corrections crews for the purposes of litter pickup on state
highways.
(7) $650,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for increased asphalt costs.
(8) The department shall prepare a comprehensive listing of
maintenance backlogs and related costs and report to the office of
financial management and the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 31, 2008.
(9) (($76,026,000)) $92,526,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is for snow and ice related expenses, within which ((is
a)) are one-time increases of (($3,250,000)) $17,250,000 provided
solely for extraordinary snow and ice removal expenses and $2,500,000
provided solely for winter storm damage repair costs incurred during
the winters of 2007-08 and 2008-09.

Sec. 215 2008 c 121 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA,
AND RESEARCH -- PROGRAM T
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,757,000))
$27,264,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,163,000))
$18,932,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,760,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,809,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,589,000))
$50,865,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,559,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for costs incurred for the 2007 regional transportation
investment district election.
(2) $800,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a transportation demand management
program, developed by the Whatcom council of governments, to further
reduce drive-alone trips and maximize the use of sustainable
transportation choices. The community-based program must focus on all
trips, not only commute trips, by providing education, assistance, and
incentives to four target audiences: (a) Large work sites; (b)
employees of businesses in downtown areas; (c) school children; and (d)
residents of Bellingham.
(3) (($320,000)) $77,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation and (($128,000)) $47,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely for development of a freight
database to help guide freight investment decisions and track project
effectiveness. The database will be based on truck movement tracked
through geographic information system technology. TransNow will
contribute an additional $192,000 in federal funds which are not
appropriated in the transportation budget. The department shall work
with the freight mobility strategic investment board to implement this
project.
(4) By December 1, 2008, the department shall require confirmation
from jurisdictions that plan under the growth management act, chapter
36.70A RCW, and that receive state transportation funding under this
act, that the jurisdictions have adopted standards for access
permitting on state highways that meet or exceed department standards
in accordance with RCW 47.50.030. The objective of this subsection is
to encourage local governments, through the receipt of state
transportation funding, to adhere to best practices in access control
applicable to development activity significantly impacting state
transportation facilities. By January 1, 2009, the department shall
submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
detailing the progress of the local jurisdictions in adopting the
highway access permitting standards.
(5) (($150,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for the costs to develop an electronic map-based
computer application that will enable law enforcement officers and
others to more easily locate collisions and other incidents in the
field.
(6))) The department shall add a position within the freight
systems division to provide expertise regarding the trucking aspects of
the state's freight system.
(((7))) (6) The department shall evaluate the feasibility of
developing a freight corridor bypass from Everett to Gold Bar on US 2,
including a connection to SR 522. US 2 is an important freight
corridor, and is an alternative route for I-90. Congestion, safety
issues, and flooding concerns have all contributed to the need for
major improvements to the corridor. The evaluation shall consider the
use of toll lanes for the project. The department must report to the
transportation committees of the legislature by December 1, 2007, on
its analysis and recommendations regarding the benefit of a freight
corridor and the potential use of freight toll lanes to improve safety
and congestion in the corridor.
(((8))) (7) The department shall work with the department of
ecology, the county road administration board, and the transportation
improvement board to develop model procedures and municipal and state
rules in regard to maximizing the use of recycled asphalt on road
construction and preservation projects. The department shall report to
the joint transportation committee by December 1, 2008, with
recommendations on increasing the use of recycled asphalt at the state
and local level.
(((9))) (8) $140,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided solely for a full-time employee to
develop vehicle miles traveled and other greenhouse gas emissions
benchmarks as described in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2815. If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2815 is not
enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((10))) (9) $80,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely to study the feasibility of a new
interchange on interstate 5 between the city of Rochester and Harrison
Avenue.
(((11))) (10) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely to support the commuter
rail study between eastern Snohomish county and eastern King county as
defined in Substitute House Bill No. 3224. Funds are provided to the
Puget Sound regional council for one time only. If Substitute House
Bill No. 3224 is not enacted by June 30, 2008, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 216 2008 c 121 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,102,000))
$60,507,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,761,000))
$61,166,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($36,665,000)) $29,958,000 of the motor vehicle fund -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the liabilities attributable to
the department of transportation. The office of financial management
must provide a detailed accounting of the revenues and expenditures of
the self-insurance fund to the transportation committees of the
legislature on December 31st and June 30th of each year.
(2) Payments in this section represent charges from other state
agencies to the department of transportation.
(a) FOR PAYMENT OF OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
DIVISION OF RISK MANAGEMENT FEES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,520,000
(b) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE
AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,153,000
(c) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED
MAIL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,859,000
(d) FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,593,000
(e) FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY
PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,665,000))
$29,958,000
(f) FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,838,000
(g) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $677,000
(h) FOR OFFICE OF MINORITIES AND WOMEN BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,042,000
(i) FOR USE OF FINANCIAL SYSTEMS PROVIDED BY
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,266,000
(j) FOR POLICY ASSISTANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . (($945,000))
$944,000
(k) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,045,000
(l) FOR LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDED BY THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE FOR THE SECOND PHASE OF THE BOLDT
LITIGATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($158,000))
$271,000
(3) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the purposes of settling all claims that were found
against the state in the verdict and judgment issued in the case of
Marable v. Nitchman (WSF), United States District Court, Western
District of Washington, Cause No. 05-01270MJP.

Sec. 217 2008 c 121 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM
V
Regional Mobility Grant Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,000,000))
$12,732,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,601,000))
$80,583,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,582,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $659,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,842,000))
$96,556,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a grant program for special needs
transportation provided by transit agencies and nonprofit providers of
transportation.
(a) $5,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of special needs
transportation. Grants for nonprofit providers shall be based on need,
including the availability of other providers of service in the area,
efforts to coordinate trips among providers and riders, and the cost
effectiveness of trips provided.
(b) $19,500,000 of the amount provided in this subsection is
provided solely for grants to transit agencies to transport persons
with special transportation needs. To receive a grant, the transit
agency must have a maintenance of effort for special needs
transportation that is no less than the previous year's maintenance of
effort for special needs transportation. Grants for transit agencies
shall be prorated based on the amount expended for demand response
service and route deviated service in calendar year 2005 as reported in
the "Summary of Public Transportation - 2005" published by the
department of transportation. No transit agency may receive more than
thirty percent of these distributions.
(2) Funds are provided for the rural mobility grant program as
follows:
(a) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for those transit systems
serving small cities and rural areas as identified in the Summary of
Public Transportation - 2005 published by the department of
transportation. Noncompetitive grants must be distributed to the
transit systems serving small cities and rural areas in a manner
similar to past disparity equalization programs.
(b) $8,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely to providers of rural mobility service
in areas not served or underserved by transit agencies through a
competitive grant process.
(3) $8,600,000 of the multimodal transportation account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a vanpool grant program for: (a)
Public transit agencies to add vanpools; and (b) incentives for
employers to increase employee vanpool use. The grant program for
public transit agencies will cover capital costs only; no operating
costs for public transit agencies are eligible for funding under this
grant program. No additional employees may be hired from the funds
provided in this section for the vanpool grant program, and supplanting
of transit funds currently funding vanpools is not allowed. Additional
criteria for selecting grants must include leveraging funds other than
state funds.
(4) (($40,000,000)) $12,732,000 of the regional mobility grant
program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
regional mobility grant projects identified on the LEAP Transportation
Document 2007-B as developed April 20, 2007. The department shall
review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report
activity on the project within one year of the grant award, shall be
reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be
terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when
projects have been completed, and any remaining funds available to the
office of transit mobility shall be used only to fund projects on the
LEAP Transportation Document 2007-B as developed April 20, 2007. The
department shall provide annual status reports on December 15, 2007,
and December 15, 2008, to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature regarding the projects
receiving the grants.
(5) (($17,168,087)) $12,150,087 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is reappropriated and provided solely for
the regional mobility grant projects identified on the LEAP
Transportation Document 2006-D, regional mobility grant program
projects as developed March 8, 2006. The department shall continue to
review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. The department shall promptly close out grants when projects
have been completed, and any remaining funds available to the office of
transit mobility shall be used only to fund projects on the LEAP
Transportation Document 2007-B as developed April 20, 2007, or the LEAP
Transportation Document 2006-D as developed March 8, 2006.
(6) $200,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to study and then
develop pilot programs aimed at addressing commute trip reduction
strategies for K-12 students and for college and university students.
The department shall submit to the legislature by January 1, 2009, a
summary of the program results and recommendations for future student
commute trip reduction strategies. The pilot programs are described as
follows:
(a) The department shall consider approaches, including mobility
education, to reducing and removing traffic congestion in front of
schools by changing travel behavior for elementary, middle, and high
school students and their parents; and
(b) The department shall design a program that includes student
employment options as part of the pilot program applicable to college
and university students.
(7) $2,400,000 of the multimodal account--state appropriation is
provided solely for establishing growth and transportation efficiency
centers (GTEC). Funds are appropriated for one time only. The
department shall provide in its annual report to the legislature an
evaluation of the GTEC concept and recommendations on future funding
levels.
(8) $381,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1694 (reauthorizing the agency council on coordinated
transportation). If Substitute House Bill No. 1694 is not enacted by
June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $504,000 of the multimodal transportation account--private/local appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5084 (updating rail transit safety plans). If
Senate Bill No. 5084 is not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $60,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for low-income car ownership programs.
The department shall collaborate with interested regional
transportation planning organizations and metropolitan planning
organizations to determine the effectiveness of the programs at
providing transportation solutions for low-income persons who depend
upon cars to travel to their places of employment.
(11) $1,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for additional funding for the trip
reduction performance program, including telework enhancement projects.
Funds are appropriated for one time only.
(12) $2,309,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the tri-county connection service
for Island, Skagit, and Whatcom transit agencies.
(13) $150,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely as a grant for a telework pilot
project to be developed, administered, and monitored by the Kitsap
regional coordinating council. Funds are appropriated for one time
only. The primary purposes of the pilot project are to educate
employers about telecommuting, develop telework policies and resources
for employers, and reduce traffic congestion by encouraging teleworking
in the workplace. As part of the pilot project, the council shall
recruit public and private sector employer participants throughout the
county, identify telework sites, develop an employer's toolkit
consisting of teleworking resources, and create a telecommuting
template that may be applied in other communities. The council shall
submit to the legislature by July 1, 2009, a summary of the program
results and any recommendations for future telework strategies.

Sec. 218 2008 c 121 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- MARINE -- PROGRAM X
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($426,761,000))
$442,663,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,914,000))
$3,035,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($428,675,000))
$445,698,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($90,299,000)) $96,443,000 of the Puget Sound ferry
operations--state appropriation is provided solely for auto ferry
vessel operating fuel in the 2007-2009 biennium.
(2) The Washington state ferries must work with the department's
information technology division to implement an electronic fare system,
including the integration of the regional fare coordination system
(smart card). Each December and June, semiannual updates must be
provided to the transportation committees of the legislature concerning
the status of implementing and completing this project, with updates
concluding the first December after full project implementation.
(3) The Washington state ferries shall continue to provide service
to Sidney, British Columbia.
(4) $1,914,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely to provide passenger-only ferry
service. The ferry system shall continue passenger-only ferry service
from Vashon Island to Seattle through June 30, 2008. Ferry system
management shall continue to implement its agreement with the
inlandboatmen's union of the pacific and the international organization
of masters, mates and pilots providing for part-time passenger-only
work schedules.
(5) (($932,000)) $674,000 of the Puget Sound ferries operations
account--state appropriation is provided solely for compliance with
department of ecology rules regarding the transfer of oil on or near
state waters. Funding for compliance with on-board fueling rules is
provided for the 2008 fiscal year. The department may request funding
for the 2009 fiscal year if the request is submitted with an
alternative compliance plan filed with the department of ecology, as
allowed by rule.
(6) (($1,116,000)) $1,006,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations
account--state appropriation is provided solely for ferry security
operations necessary to comply with the ferry security plan submitted
by the Washington state ferry system to the United States coast guard.
The department shall track security costs and expenditures. Ferry
security operations costs shall not be included as part of the
operational costs that are used to calculate farebox recovery.
(7) $378,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely to meet the United States coast guard
requirements for appropriate rest hours between shifts for vessel crews
on the Bainbridge to Seattle and Edmonds to Kingston ferry routes.
(8) $694,000 of the Puget Sound ferries operating account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementing Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2358 as follows:
(a) The department shall allow the joint transportation committee
work group established in section 205(1) of this act to participate in
the following elements as they are described in Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2358:
(i) Development and implementation of a survey of ferry customers;
(ii) Analysis and reestablishment of vehicle level of service
standards. In reestablishing the standards, consideration shall be
given to whether boat wait is the appropriate measure. The level of
service standard shall be reestablished in conjunction with or after
the survey has been implemented;
(iii) Development of pricing policy proposals. In developing these
policies, the policies, in effect on some routes, of collecting fares
in only one direction shall be evaluated to determine whether one-way
fare pricing best serves the ferry system. The pricing policy
proposals must be developed in conjunction with or after the survey has
been implemented;
(iv) Development of operational strategies. The operational
strategies shall be reestablished in conjunction with the survey or
after the survey has been implemented;
(v) Development of terminal design standards. The terminal design
standards shall be finalized after the provisions of subsections (a)(i)
through (iv) and subsection (b) of this section have been developed and
reviewed by the joint transportation committee; and
(vi) Development of a capital plan. The capital plan shall be
finalized after terminal design standards have been developed by the
department and reviewed by the joint transportation committee.
(b) The department shall develop a ridership demand forecast that
shall be used in the development of a long-range capital plan. If more
than one forecast is developed they must be reconciled.
(c) The department shall update the life cycle cost model to meet
the requirements of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2358 no later
than August 1, 2007.
(d) The department shall develop a cost allocation methodology
proposal to meet the requirements described in Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 2358. The proposal shall be completed and presented to
the joint transportation committee no later than August 1, 2007.
(9) $200,000 of the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the initial acquisition of
transportation worker identification credentials required by the United
States department of homeland security for unescorted access to secure
areas of ferries and terminals.
(10) The legislature finds that a rigorous incident investigation
process is an essential component of marine safety. The department is
directed to review its accident and incident investigation procedures
and report the results of its review with any proposals for changes to
the legislature by November 1, 2008.
(11) The department shall allow the use, by two separate drivers,
of fare media allowing for multiple discounted vehicle trips aboard
Washington state ferries vessels.
(((13))) (12) While developing fare and pricing policy proposals,
the department may consider the desirability of reasonable fares for
persons using the ferry system to commute daily to work and other
frequent users who live in ferry-dependent communities.

Sec. 219 2008 c 121 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y--OPERATING
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,010,000))
$35,096,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall publish a final long-range plan for Amtrak
Cascades by September 30, 2007. By December 31, 2008, the department
shall submit to the office of financial management and the
transportation committees of the legislature a midrange plan for Amtrak
Cascades that identifies specific steps the department would propose to
achieve additional service beyond current levels.
(2)(a) (($29,091,000)) $28,577,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the Amtrak service
contract and Talgo maintenance contract associated with providing and
maintaining the state-supported passenger rail service. Upon
completion of the rail platform project in the city of Stanwood, the
department shall provide daily Amtrak Cascades service to the city.
(b) The department shall negotiate with Amtrak and Burlington
Northern Santa Fe to adjust the Amtrak Cascades schedule to leave
Bellingham at a significantly earlier hour.
(c) When Amtrak Cascades expands the second roundtrip between
Vancouver, B.C. and Seattle, the department shall negotiate for the
second roundtrip to leave Bellingham southbound no later than 8:30 a.m.
(3) No Amtrak Cascade runs may be eliminated.
(4) $40,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the produce railcar program. The
department is encouraged to implement the produce railcar program by
maximizing private investment.
(5) The department shall begin planning for a third roundtrip
Cascades train between Seattle and Vancouver, B.C. by 2010.

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES -- CAPITAL
Sec. 301 2008 c 121 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Rural Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,000,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,370,000))
$1,555,000
County Arterial Preservation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,641,000))
$31,541,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,011,000))
$97,096,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($2,370,000)) $1,555,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation may be used for county ferry projects as set forth in RCW
47.56.725(4).
(2) The appropriations contained in this section include funding to
counties to assist them in efforts to recover from ((winter storm and
flood damage)) federally declared emergencies, by providing
capitalization advances and local match for federal emergency funding
as determined by the county road administration board. The county road
administration board shall specifically identify any such selected
projects and shall include information concerning them in its next
annual report to the legislature.

Sec. 302 2008 c 121 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Small City Pavement and Sidewalk Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($126,600,000))
$106,600,000
Transportation Improvement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,143,000))
$77,495,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($219,643,000))
$189,995,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation improvement account -- state appropriation
includes up to $7,143,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized
in RCW 47.26.500.
(2) The urban arterial trust account--state appropriation includes
up to $15,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
Substitute House Bill No. 2394. If Substitute House Bill No. 2394 is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.))

Sec. 303 2008 c 121 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS) -- CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,255,000))
$6,265,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $584,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for statewide administration.
(2) $803,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for regional minor projects.
(3) $568,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for the Olympic region headquarters property payments.
(4) By September 1, 2007, the department shall submit to the
transportation committees of the legislature predesign plans, developed
using the office of financial management's predesign process, for all
facility replacement projects to be proposed in the facilities 2008
budget proposal.
(5) $1,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for site acquisition for the Tri-cities area maintenance facility.
(6) $2,700,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
for site acquisition for the Vancouver light industrial facility.
(7) The department shall work with the office of financial
management and staff of the transportation committees of the
legislature to develop a statewide inventory of all department-owned
surplus property that is suitable for development for department
facilities or that should be sold. By December 1, 2008, the department
shall report to the joint transportation committee on the findings of
this study.
(8) $10,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely for reconstruction of the Wandermere facility that was
destroyed in the 2008-09 winter storms.

Sec. 304 2008 c 121 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- IMPROVEMENTS -- PROGRAM I
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,109,593,000))
$900,809,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,210,000))
$67,416,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($457,580,000))
$538,126,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,487,000))
$65,902,000
Special Category C Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,125,000))
$29,772,000
((Multimodal Transportation Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,100,000))
Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,277,000))
$26,045,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,147,529,000))
$1,052,094,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($208,000))
$189,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,014,109,000))
$2,680,353,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by ((fund,))
project((, and amount)) in LEAP Transportation Document 2008-1, Highway
Improvement Program (I) as developed March 10, 2008. ((However,
limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may
occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.)) Federal funds
may be transferred between programs I and P.
(2) The department shall not commence construction on any part of
the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project until a
record of decision has been reached providing reasonable assurance that
project impacts will be avoided, minimized, or mitigated as much as
practicable to protect against further adverse impacts on neighborhood
environmental quality as a result of repairs and improvements made to
the state route 520 bridge and its connecting roadways, and that any
such impacts will be addressed through engineering design choices,
mitigation measures, or a combination of both. The requirements of
this section shall not apply to off-site pontoon construction
supporting the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV
project.
(3) Within the amounts provided in this section, (($1,895,000))
$11,363 of the transportation partnership account--state appropriation,
(($2,147,000)) $505,099 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation, and (($10,331,000)) $11,031,179 of the transportation
2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are for project
109040T as identified in the LEAP transportation document referenced in
subsection (1) of this section: I-90/Two Way Transit-Transit and HOV
Improvements - Stage 1. Expenditure of the funds on construction is
contingent upon revising the access plan for Mercer Island traffic such
that Mercer Island traffic will have access to the outer roadway high
occupancy vehicle (HOV) lanes during the period of operation of such
lanes following the removal of Mercer Island traffic from the center
roadway and prior to conversion of the outer roadway HOV lanes to high
occupancy toll (HOT) lanes. Sound transit may only have access to the
center lanes when alternative R8A is complete.
(4) The Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account -- state appropriation
includes up to (($18,000,000)) $26,045,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
(5) The funding described in this section includes (($36,693,000))
$46,693,000 of the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation ((and $208,000)), $188,357 of the freight mobility
multimodal account--state appropriation, and $20,000 of the motor
vehicle account--private/local appropriation, which are for the SR 519
project identified as project number 851902A in the LEAP Transportation
Document referenced in subsection (1) of this section. The total
project is expected to cost no more than (($74,400,000)) $84,467,000
including (($10,610,000)) $10,792,000 in contributions from project
partners, including Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad.
(6) To promote and support community-specific noise reduction
solutions, the department shall:
(a) Prepare a draft directive that establishes how each community's
priorities and concerns may be identified and addressed in order to
allow consideration of a community's preferred methods of advanced
visual shielding and aesthetic screening, for the purpose of improving
the noise environment of major state roadway projects in locations that
do not meet the criteria for standard noise barriers. The intent is
for these provisions to be supportable by existing project budgets.
The directive shall also include direction on the coordination and
selection of visual and aesthetic options with local communities. The
draft directive shall be provided to the standing transportation
committees of the legislature by January 2008; and
(b) Pilot the draft directive established in (a) of this subsection
in two locations along major state roadways. If practicable, the
department should begin work on the pilot projects while the directive
is being developed. One pilot project shall be located in Clark county
on a significant capacity improvement project. The second pilot
project shall be located in urban King county, which shall be on a
corridor highway project through mixed land use areas that is nearing
or under construction. The department shall provide a written report
to the standing transportation committees of the legislature on the
findings of the Clark county pilot project by January 2009, and the
King county pilot project by January 2010. Based on results of the
pilot projects, the department shall update its design manual,
environmental procedures, or other appropriate documents to incorporate
the directive.
(7) If the "Green Highway" provisions of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1303 (cleaner energy) are enacted, the
department shall erect signs on the interstate highways included in
those provisions noting that these interstates have been designated
"Washington Green Highways."
(8) If on the I-405/I-90 to SE 8th Street Widening project the
department finds that there is an alternative investment to preserve
reliable rail accessibility to major manufacturing sites within the
I-405 corridor that are less expensive than replacing the Wilburton
Tunnel, the department may enter into the necessary agreements to
implement that alternative provided that costs remain within the
approved project budget.
(9) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan
Way Viaduct projects.
(10) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation and
$226,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely for an inland pacific hub study to develop an inland
corridor for the movement of freight and goods to and through eastern
Washington; and $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR3/SR16 corridor study to
plan and prioritize state and local improvements needed over the next
10-20 years to support safety, capacity development, and economic
development within the corridor.
(11) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each active project funded in part or
whole by the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) or the
transportation partnership account. Funding provided at a programmatic
level for transportation partnership account and transportation 2003
account (nickel account) projects relating to bridge rail, guard rail,
fish passage barrier removal, and roadside safety projects should be
reported on a programmatic basis. Projects within this programmatic
level funding should be completed on a priority basis and scoped to be
completed within the current programmatic budget. Other projects may
be reported on a programmatic basis. The department shall work with
the office of financial management and the transportation committees of
the legislature to agree on report formatting and elements. Elements
shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and
costs. The department shall also provide the information required
under this subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation
executive information systems (TEIS).
(12) The department shall apply for the competitive portion of
federal transit administration funds for eligible transit-related costs
of the SR 520 bridge replacement and HOV project. The federal funds
described in this subsection shall not include those federal transit
administration funds distributed by formula.
(13) Funding provided by this act for the Alaskan Way Viaduct
project shall not be spent for preliminary engineering, design, right-of-way acquisition, or construction on the project if completion of the
project would more likely than not reduce the capacity of the facility.
Capacity shall be measured by including the consideration of the
efficient movement of people and goods on the facility.
(14) The governor shall convene a collaborative process involving
key leaders to determine the final project design for the Alaskan Way
Viaduct.
(a) The process shall be guided by the following common principles:
Public safety must be maintained; the final project shall meet both
capacity and mobility needs; and taxpayer dollars must be spent
responsibly.
(b) The state's project expenditures shall not exceed
$2,800,000,000.
(c) A final design decision shall be made by December 31, 2008.
(15) During the 2007-09 biennium, the department shall proceed with
a series of projects on the Alaskan Way Viaduct that are common to any
design alternative. Those projects include relocation of two
electrical transmission lines, Battery Street tunnel upgrades, seismic
upgrades from Lenora to the Battery Street tunnel, viaduct removal from
Holgate to King Street, and development of transit enhancements and
other improvements to mitigate congestion during construction.
(16) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $874,610,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.861.
(17) The transportation partnership account--state appropriation
includes up to $900,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.873.
(18) The special category C account--state appropriation includes
up to $21,497,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
Substitute House Bill No. 2394. If Substitute House Bill No. 2394 is
not enacted by June 30, 2007, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(19) $4,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for cost increases on the SR 304/Bremerton tunnel
project.
(20) $2,071,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
is provided solely for initial design and right of way work on a new
southbound SR 509 to eastbound SR 518 freeway-to-freeway elevated ramp.
(21) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
to the SR 543/I-5 to Canadian border project is provided solely for
retaining wall facia improvements.
(22) (($950,000)) $846,700 of the motor vehicle account--federal
appropriation and (($24,000)) $17,280 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation are provided solely for the Westview
school noise wall.
(23) (($1,600,000)) $1,567,600 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for two noise walls on SR 161 in King
county.
(24) (($20,000)) $10,640 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation and (($280,000)) $252,300 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely for interchange design and
planning work on US 12 at A street and tank farm road.
(25) The funding described in this section includes (($19,939,000))
$19,928,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation, (($29,000)) $26,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, (($308,000)) $6,747,000 of the motor vehicle account--private/local appropriation, and (($17,900,000)) $17,821,000 of the
motor vehicle account--federal appropriation for the I-5/Columbia river
crossing/Vancouver project. The funding described in this subsection
includes up to $15,000,000 awarded to Washington and Oregon jointly
through the U.S. department of transportation corridors of the future
program in the 2007 federal highway authority discretionary fund
allocations.
(26) The department shall study any outstanding issues, including
financial issues that may apply to the I-5/Columbia river
crossing/Vancouver project. The department's efforts must include an
analysis of current bi-state efforts in planning, coordination, and
funding for the project; opportunities for the joining of state and
local government agencies and the private sector in a strong
partnership that contributes to the completion of the project; and
opportunities to work with the congressional delegations of Oregon and
Washington to provide federal funding and other assistance that will
advance this project of national and regional significance.
(27) (($1,500,000)) $1,928,232 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation ((and $4,908,000)), $2,611,000 of the
transportation partnership account--state appropriation, and $14,682 of
the transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation
are provided solely for project 109040Q as identified in the LEAP
transportation document in subsection (1) of this section:
I-90/Two-Way Transit-Transit and HOV Improvements, Stages 2 and 3. Of
these amounts, up to $550,000 of the transportation partnership
account--state appropriation is to provide funding for an independent
technical review, overseen by the joint transportation committee, of
light rail impacts on the Interstate 90 - Homer Hadley Floating Bridge.
The technical review shall complement sound transit's current and
planned engineering design work to expand light rail in the central
Puget Sound region. The department shall coordinate its work with
sound transit and seek contributions from sound transit for the review.
(28) (($1,400,000)) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for safety improvements on US Highway
2 between Monroe and Gold Bar. Additional project funding of
(($8,600,000)) $9,200,000 is assumed in the 2009-2011 biennium,
bringing the total project funding to $10,000,000. This high priority
safety project will provide safety enhancements on US Highway 2 between
Gold Bar and Monroe, such as a passing lane or interchange/turning lane
improvements. The department shall seek input from the US Highway 2
safety coalition to select projects that will help reduce fatalities on
this corridor.
(29) (($2,267,000)) $1,663,700 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation, (($218,500)) $234,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation, and $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle
account--private/local appropriation are provided solely for installing
centerline rumble strips and related improvements on US Highway 2
between Monroe and Sultan. The section of US Highway 2 from Monroe to
Deception Creek has a high frequency of centerline crossover
collisions. By installing centerline rumble strips, the project will
reduce the risk of crossover collisions. This project will also place
shoulder rumble strips between Monroe and Sultan.
(30) (($1,500,000)) $688,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the SR 28/E End of the George
Sellar bridge (202802V) for the purpose of funding a pedestrian tunnel
connection. This funding is provided in anticipation of a federal
grant specific to this project, which, if received, must be used to
reimburse the state funding provided in this subsection.
(31) For the period of preconstruction tolling on the state route
520 bridge, the department shall develop improvements of traffic flow
from the eastern Lake Washington shoreline to 108th avenue northeast in
Bellevue including:
(a) Near-term, low-cost enhancements which relocate the high-occupancy vehicle lanes to the inside of the alignment; and
(b) A plan for an accelerated improvement project for the
construction of median flyer stops, reconfiguration of interchanges,
addition of direct access ramps, community enhancement lids, and
pedestrian/bike path connections.
The department shall report to the joint transportation committee by
September 1, 2008, on the short-term low-cost improvement plans and
include in their budget submittal to the office of financial management
a proposal for the accelerated improvement project.

Sec. 305 2008 c 121 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- PRESERVATION -- PROGRAM P
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($181,666,000))
$181,316,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,540,000))
$94,784,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($463,338,000))
$462,427,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,138,000))
$19,049,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,136,000))
$15,399,000
Puyallup Tribal Settlement Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,500,000))
$6,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($773,318,000))
$778,975,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
transportation 2003 account (nickel account) appropriation and the
entire transportation partnership account appropriation are provided
solely for the projects and activities as listed by ((fund,))
project((, and amount)) in LEAP Transportation Document 2008-1, Highway
Preservation Program (P) as developed March 10, 2008. ((However,
limited transfers of specific line-item project appropriations may
occur between projects for those amounts listed subject to the
conditions and limitations in section 603 of this act.)) Federal funds
may be transferred between programs I and P.
(2) $287,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $11,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the department to determine the most cost efficient
way to replace the current Keller ferry. Options reviewed shall not
include an expansion of the current capacity of the Keller ferry.
(3) $5,308,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of settling all
identified and potential claims from the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe
related to the construction of a graving dock facility on the graving
dock property. In the matter of Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe et al v.
State et al, Thurston county superior court, cause no. 05-2-01595-8,
the Lower Elwha Klallam Tribe and the state of Washington entered into
a settlement agreement that settles all claims related to graving dock
property and associated construction and releases the state from all
claims related to the construction of the graving dock facilities. The
expenditure of this appropriation is contingent on the conditions and
limitations set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(a) $2,000,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the benefit of the Lower Elwha
Klallam Tribe to be disbursed by the department in accordance with
terms and conditions of the settlement agreement.
(b) $3,308,000 of the transportation partnership account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the department's remediation work
on the graving dock property in accordance with the terms and
conditions of the settlement agreement.
(4) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Programs I and P,
including, but not limited to, the SR 518, SR 519, SR 520, and Alaskan
Way Viaduct projects.
(5) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each active project funded in part or
whole by the transportation 2003 account (nickel account) or the
transportation partnership account. Funding provided at a programmatic
level for transportation partnership account projects relating to
seismic bridges should be reported on a programmatic basis. Projects
within this programmatic level funding should be completed on a
priority basis and scoped to be completed within the current
programmatic budget. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic
basis. The department shall work with the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature to
agree on report formatting and elements. Elements shall include, but
not be limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department
shall also provide the information required under this subsection on a
quarterly basis via the transportation executive information systems
(TEIS).
(6) The department of transportation shall continue to implement
the lowest life cycle cost planning approach to pavement management
throughout the state to encourage the most effective and efficient use
of pavement preservation funds. Emphasis should be placed on
increasing the number of roads addressed on time and reducing the
number of roads past due.
(7) $13,257,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation
and $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation are
for expenditures on damaged state roads due to flooding, mudslides,
rock fall, or other unforeseen events.
(8) (($188,000)) $213,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation, (($28,749,000)) $52,930,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation, and (($105,653,000)) $117,544,000 of
the transportation partnership account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the Hood Canal bridge project.
(9) (($12,500,000)) $6,000,000 of the Puyallup tribal settlement
account--state appropriation is provided solely for mitigation costs
associated with the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge demolition. The
department may negotiate with the city of Tacoma for the purpose of
transferring ownership of the Murray Morgan/11th Street Bridge to the
city. If the city agrees to accept ownership of the bridge, the
department may use the Puyallup tribal settlement account appropriation
and other appropriated funds for bridge rehabilitation, bridge
replacement, bridge demolition, and related mitigation. In no event
shall the department's participation exceed $39,953,000. No funds may
be expended unless the city of Tacoma agrees to take ownership of the
bridge in its entirety and provides that the payment of these funds
extinguishes any real or implied agreements regarding future bridge
expenditures.
(10) Within the amounts provided in this section, $190,000 of the
motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for
rehabilitation of the SR 532/84th Ave NW bridge deck. It is the intent
of the legislature that an additional $1,510,000 will be provided in
the 2009-11 omnibus transportation appropriations act to complete this
project.

Sec. 306 2008 c 121 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q--CAPITAL
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,462,000))
$7,588,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,951,000))
$14,809,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,487,000))
$22,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The motor vehicle account--state
appropriation includes (($8,959,335)) $7,085,335 provided solely for
state matching funds for federally selected competitive grant or
congressional earmark projects. These moneys shall be placed into
reserve status until such time as federal funds are secured that
require a state match.

Sec. 307 2008 c 121 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION -- PROGRAM W
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($142,250,000))
$105,182,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,259,000))
$40,174,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,089,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,100,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,469,000))
$38,402,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($253,167,000))
$189,947,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($36,500,000)) $27,380,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for
project 944470A as identified in the LEAP Transportation Document 2008-1, Ferries Construction Program (W) as developed March 10, 2008, for
the construction of ((three)) one marine vessel((s)) to replace the
steel electric auto ferry vessels. The document includes a total of
(($84,500,000)) $76,930,000 for ((these)) this replacement vessel((s)).
(2) (($21,460,823)) $17,812,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation, $4,100,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation, $5,410,000 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation,
(($4,490,000)) $1,002,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction
account--federal appropriation, and $2,089,000 of the Puget Sound
capital construction account--private/local appropriation are provided
solely for the terminal projects listed:
(a) Anacortes ferry terminal - utilities work; ((right-of-way
purchase for a holding area during construction;)) and completion of
design and permitting on the terminal building, pick-up and drop-off
sites, and pedestrian and bicycle facilities;
(b) Bainbridge Island ferry terminal - environmental planning and
a traffic signalization project in the vicinity of SR 305 Harborview
drive;
(c) Bremerton ferry terminal - overhead loading control system and
moving the terminal agent's office;
(d) Clinton ferry terminal - septic system replacement;
(e) Edmonds ferry terminal - right-of-way acquisition costs,
federal match requirements, and removal of Unocal Pier;
(f) Friday Harbor ferry terminal - parking resurfacing;
(g) Keystone and Port Townsend ferry terminals - route
environmental planning;
(h) Kingston ferry terminal - transfer span retrofit and overhead
vehicle holding control system modifications;
(i) Mukilteo ferry terminal - right-of-way acquisition,
archaeological studies, environmental planning, and additional vehicle
holding;
(j) Orcas ferry terminal - dolphin replacement;
(k) Port Townsend ferry terminal - wingwall replacement((, interim
holding, tie-up slip,)) and initial reservation system;
(l) Seattle ferry terminal - environmental planning, coordination
with local jurisdictions, coordination with highway projects, and
contractor payment for automated re-entry gates;
(m) Southworth ferry terminal - ((federal grant to)) conduct
preliminary studies and planning for a ((2nd operating)) second slip;
and
(n) Vashon Island and Seattle ferry terminals - modify the
passenger-only facilities.
(3) (($46,020,666)) $31,036,000 of the transportation 2003 account
(nickel account)--state appropriation and $3,750,000 of the Puget Sound
capital construction account--federal appropriation are provided solely
for the procurement of up to three 144-vehicle auto-passenger ferry
vessels.
(4) (($18,716,000)) $5,867,000 of the Puget Sound capital
construction account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
Eagle Harbor maintenance facility preservation project. These funds
may not be used for relocating any warehouses not currently on the
Eagle Harbor site.
(5) The department shall research an asset management system to
improve Washington state ferries' management of capital assets and the
department's ability to estimate future preservation needs. The
department shall report its findings regarding a new asset management
system to the governor and the transportation committees of the
legislature no later than January 15, 2008.
(6) The department shall sell the M.V. Chinook and M.V. Snohomish
passenger-only fast ferries as soon as practicable and deposit the
proceeds of the sales into the passenger ferry account created in RCW
47.60.645. Once the department ceases to provide passenger-only ferry
service, the department shall sell the M.V. Kalama and M.V. Skagit
passenger-only ferries and deposit the proceeds of the sales into the
passenger ferry account created in RCW 47.60.645.
(7) The department shall, on a quarterly basis beginning July 1,
2007, provide to the office of financial management and the legislature
reports providing the status on each project listed in this section and
in the project lists submitted pursuant to this act and on any
additional projects for which the department has expended funds during
the 2007-09 fiscal biennium. Elements shall include, but not be
limited to, project scope, schedule, and costs. The department shall
also provide the information required under this subsection via the
transportation executive information systems (TEIS).
(8) $1,105,000 of the Puget Sound capital construction
account--state appropriation and (($8,038,000)) $1,956,000 of the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state appropriation are
provided solely for a dolphin replacement project at the Vashon Island
ferry terminal. The department shall submit a predesign study to the
joint transportation committee before beginning design or construction
of this project.
(9) The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($105,000,000)) $68,000,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead-time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.
(10) The department shall review the costs and benefits of
continued use of the primavera scheduling system in the Washington
state ferries marine division and include that review with its 2009-2011 budget submittal.
(11) The department shall review staffing in its capital
engineering divisions to ensure core competency in, and a focus on,
terminal and vessel preservation, with staffing sufficient to implement
the preservation program in the capital plan. Until the completion of
the capital plan, the department shall maintain capital staffing levels
at or below the level of staffing on January 1, 2008.
(12) The department shall sell, be in the process of selling, or
otherwise dispose of the four steel electric auto-ferry vessels in the
most cost effective way practicable no later than June 1, 2008.

Sec. 308 2008 c 121 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- RAIL -- PROGRAM Y -- CAPITAL
((Essential Rail Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000))
Transportation Infrastructure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,713,000))
$1,580,000
((Transportation Infrastructure Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $787,000))
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($165,512,000))
$104,564,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,906,000))
$20,165,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,659,000))
$363,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($205,077,000))
$126,672,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Except as provided otherwise in this section, the entire
appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects and
activities as listed by ((fund,)) project((, and amount)) in LEAP
Transportation Document 2008-1, Rail Capital Program (Y) as developed
March 10, 2008. ((However, limited transfers of specific line-item
project appropriations may occur between projects for those amounts
listed subject to the conditions and limitations in section 603 of this
act.))
(b) Within the amounts provided in this section, (($1,713,000))
$1,080,000 of the transportation infrastructure account--state
appropriation ((and $787,000 of the transportation infrastructure
account--federal appropriation are)) is for low-interest loans for rail
capital projects through the freight rail investment bank program. The
department shall issue a call for projects based upon the legislative
priorities specified in subsection (7)(a) of this section. Application
must be received by the department by October 1, 2008. By November 1,
2008, the department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended
projects to the office of financial management and the transportation
committees of the legislature. The department shall award low-interest
loans to the port of Moses Lake in the amount of (($213,000)) $150,000,
and based upon the prioritized list of rail capital projects most
recently submitted to the legislature pursuant to this subsection, as
follows: Port of Benton County ($250,000); Port of Everett ($250,000);
((Central Terminals, LLC ($250,000);)) Tacoma Rail--Maintenance
Facility ($250,000); ((NW Container Service ($250,000); Port of
Chehalis ($250,000); Ballard Terminal Railroad ($250,000); Eastern
Washington Gateway Railroad ($36,875);)) Spokane County ((($250,000)))
($150,000); Tacoma Rail--Locomotive Idling ((($250,000))) ($30,000).
(c) Within the amounts provided in this section, $2,561,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is for statewide
- emergent freight rail assistance projects as listed in LEAP
Transportation Document 2008-1, Rail Capital Program (Y) as developed
March 10, 2008. ((However, the department shall perform a cost/benefit
analysis of the projects according to the legislative priorities
specified in subsection (7)(a) of this section, and shall give priority
to the following projects: Rail - Tacoma rail yard switching upgrades
($500,000); Rail - Port of Ephrata spur rehabilitation ($127,000); Rail
- Lewis and Clark rail improvements ($1,100,000); Rail - Port of Grays
Harbor rail access improvements ($543,000); and Rail - Port of Longview
rail loop construction ($291,000). If the relative cost of any of the
six projects identified in this subsection (1)(c) is not substantially
less than the public benefits to be derived from the project, then the
department shall not assign the funds to the project, and instead shall
use those funds toward those projects identified by the department in
the attachments to the "Washington State Department of Transportation
FREIGHT RAIL ASSISTANCE FUNDING PROGRAM: 2007-2009 Prioritized Project
List and Program Update" dated December 2006 for which the proportion
of public benefits to be gained compared to the cost of the project is
greatest.))
(d) Within the amounts provided in this section, $339,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is for rescoping
and completion of required environmental documents for the Kelso to
Martin's Bluff - 3rd Mainline and Storage Tracks project. The rescoped
project may include funds that are committed to the project by local or
private funding partners. However, the rescoped project must be
capable of being completed with not more than $49,470,000 in future
state funding, inclusive of inflation costs. Subject to this funding
constraint, the rescoped project must maximize capacity improvements
along the rail mainline.
(e) Within the amounts provided in this section, $3,600,000 of the
multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is for work
items on the Palouse River and Coulee City Railroad lines.
(2) The multimodal transportation account--state appropriation
includes up to (($144,500,000)) $91,000,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.867.
(3) The department is directed to seek the use of unprogrammed
federal rail crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in Program Y, including, but
not limited to the "Tacoma -- bypass of Pt. Defiance" project.
(4) If new federal funding for freight or passenger rail is
received, the department shall consult with the transportation
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management
prior to spending the funds on existing or additional projects.
(5) The department shall sell any ancillary property, acquired when
the state purchased the right-of-ways to the PCC rail line system, to
a lessee of the ancillary property who is willing to pay fair market
value for the property. The department shall deposit the proceeds from
the sale of ancillary property into the transportation infrastructure
account.
(6)(a) The department shall develop and implement the
benefit/impact evaluation methodology recommended in the statewide rail
capacity and needs study finalized in December 2006. The
benefit/impact evaluation methodology shall be developed using the
following priorities, in order of relative importance:
(i) Economic, safety, or environmental advantages of freight
movement by rail compared to alternative modes;
(ii) Self-sustaining economic development that creates family-wage
jobs;
(iii) Preservation of transportation corridors that would otherwise
be lost;
(iv) Increased access to efficient and cost-effective transport to
market for Washington's agricultural and industrial products;
(v) Better integration and cooperation within the regional,
national, and international systems of freight distribution; and
(vi) Mitigation of impacts of increased rail traffic on
communities.
(b) The department shall convene a work group to collaborate on the
development of the benefit/impact analysis method to be used in the
evaluation. The work group must include, at a minimum, the freight
mobility strategic investment board, the department of agriculture, and
representatives from the various users and modes of the state's rail
system.
(c) The department shall use the benefit/impact analysis and
priorities in (a) of this subsection when submitting requests for state
funding for rail projects. The department shall develop a standardized
format for submitting requests for state funding for rail projects that
includes an explanation of the analysis undertaken, and the conclusions
derived from the analysis.
(d) The department and the freight mobility strategic investment
board shall collaborate to submit a report to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
September 1, 2008, listing proposed freight highway and rail projects.
The report must describe the analysis used for selecting such projects,
as required by this act for the department and as required by chapter
47.06A RCW for the board. When developing its list of proposed freight
highway and rail projects, the freight mobility strategic investment
board shall use the priorities identified in (a) of this subsection to
the greatest extent possible.
(7) The department shall apply at the earliest possible date for
grants, pursuant to the new competitive intercity rail grant program
announced by the federal railroad administration on February 19, 2008,
for any projects that may qualify for such federal grants and are
currently identified on the project list referenced in subsection
(1)(a) of this section.
(8) Up to $8,500,000 of any underexpenditures of state funding
designated on the project list referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this
section for the "Vancouver-Rail Bypass and W 39th Street Bridge"
project may be used to upgrade, to class 2 condition, track owned by
Clark county between Vancouver and Battle Ground.
(9) Up to $400,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is contingent upon the port of Chehalis submitting a full
copy of the FEMA application packet to the department in order to
assist the department in verifying the scope of the repairs and the
rail transportation value of the project identified on the project list
referenced in subsection (1)(a) of this section as "Port of
Chehalis-Track Rehabilitation" (F01002A).
(10) $500,000 of the transportation infrastructure account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to any intergovernmental
entity or local rail district to which the department of transportation
assigns the management and oversight responsibility for the business
and economic development elements of existing operating leases on the
Palouse River and Coulee City (PCC) rail lines. The PCC rail line
system is made up of the CW, P&L, and PV Hooper rail lines. Business
and economic development elements include such items as levels of
service and business operating plans, but shall not include the state's
oversight of railroad regulatory compliance, rail infrastructure
condition, or real property management issues. The PCC rail system
must be managed in a self-sustaining manner and best efforts shall be
used to ensure that it does not require state capital or operating
subsidy beyond the level of state funding expended on it to date. The
assignment of the stated responsibilities to an intergovernmental
entity or rail district shall be on such terms and conditions as the
department of transportation and the intergovernmental entity or rail
district mutually agree. The grant funds may be used only to refurbish
the rail lines. It is the intent of the legislature to make the funds
appropriated in this section available as grants to an
intergovernmental entity or local rail district for the purposes stated
in this section at least until June 30, 2012, and to reappropriate as
necessary any portion of the appropriation in this section that is not
used by June 30, 2009.

Sec. 309 2008 c 121 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION -- LOCAL PROGRAMS -- PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Infrastructure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
Highway Infrastructure Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
Freight Mobility Investment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,378,000))
$5,630,000
Transportation Partnership Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,906,000))
$2,543,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,870,000))
$7,545,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,823,000))
$30,916,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,750,000))
$4,848,000
Freight Mobility Multimodal Account--
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,755,000))
$750,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,224,000))
$3,520,000
Multimodal Transportation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,134,000))
$17,517,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account) -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,721,000))
$2,012,000
Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$2,879,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($158,870,000))
$79,969,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, provide status
reports to the legislature on the delivery of projects as outlined in
the project lists incorporated in this section. For projects funded by
new revenue in the 2003 and 2005 transportation packages, reporting
elements shall include, but not be limited to, project scope, schedule,
and costs. Other projects may be reported on a programmatic basis.
The department shall also provide the information required under this
subsection on a quarterly basis via the transportation executive
information system (TEIS).
(2) (($8,500,000)) $2,879,000 of the passenger ferry account--state
appropriation is provided solely for near and long-term costs of
capital improvements in a business plan approved by the governor for
passenger ferry service.
(3) The department shall seek the use of unprogrammed federal rail
crossing funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to state funds
for eligible costs of projects in local programs, program Z capital.
(4) The department shall apply for surface transportation program
(STP) enhancement funds to be expended in lieu of or in addition to
state funds for eligible costs of projects in local programs, program
Z capital.
(5) Federal funds may be transferred from program Z to programs I
and P and state funds shall be transferred from programs I and P to
program Z to replace those federal funds in a dollar-for-dollar match.
Fund transfers authorized under this subsection shall not affect
project prioritization status. Appropriations shall initially be
allotted as appropriated in this act. The department may not transfer
funds as authorized under this subsection without approval of the
office of financial management. The department shall submit a report
on those projects receiving fund transfers to the office of financial
management and the transportation committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2007, and December 1, 2008.
(6) The city of Winthrop may utilize a design-build process for the
Winthrop bike path project. Of the amount appropriated in this section
for this project, $500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is contingent upon the state receiving from the
city of Winthrop $500,000 in federal funds awarded to the city of
Winthrop by its local planning organization.
(7) (($11,591,224)) $4,052,968 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation((, $8,640,239 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation,)) and (($4,000,000)) $3,412,837 of the
motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are provided solely for
the pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects and safe routes to
schools program projects identified in the LEAP Transportation Document
2007-A, pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects and safe routes
to schools program projects as developed April 20, 2007. Projects must
be allocated funding based on order of priority. The department shall
review all projects receiving grant awards under this program at least
semiannually to determine whether the projects are making satisfactory
progress. Any project that has been awarded funds, but does not report
activity on the project within one year of the grant award, shall be
reviewed by the department to determine whether the grant should be
terminated. The department shall promptly close out grants when
projects have been completed, and identify where unused grant funds
remain because actual project costs were lower than estimated in the
grant award.
(8) ((Up to a maximum of $5,000,000 of the multimodal
transportation account--state appropriation and up to a maximum of
$2,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
reappropriated for the pedestrian and bicycle safety program projects
and safe routes to schools program projects identified in the LEAP
transportation document 2006-B, pedestrian and bicycle safety program
projects and safe routes to schools program projects as developed March
8, 2006. Projects must be allocated funding based on order of
priority. The department shall review all projects receiving grant
awards under this program at least semiannually to determine whether
the projects are making satisfactory progress. Any project that has
been awarded funds, but does not report activity on the project within
one year of the grant award, shall be reviewed by the department to
determine whether the grant should be terminated. The department shall
promptly close out grants when projects have been completed, and
identify where unused grant funds remain because actual project costs
were lower than estimated in the grant award.
(9))) $3,500,000 of the multimodal transportation account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for the Museum of Flight pedestrian
bridge safety project.
(((10) $250,000)) (9) $100,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the icicle rail
station in Leavenworth.
(((11))) (10) $1,500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Union Gap city road project.
(((12))) (11) $250,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the Saltwater state park bridge
project and off-site traffic control costs.
(((13))) (12) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation and (($4,688,000)) $5,374,000 of the motor vehicle
account--federal appropriation are provided solely for the coal creek
parkway project.
(((14) $250,000)) (13) $150,790 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation is provided solely for a streetcar
feasibility study in downtown Spokane.
(((15))) (14) $500,000 of the motor vehicle account--((federal))
state appropriation is provided solely for slide repairs completed
during 2007 and 2008 at or in the vicinity of marine view drive bridge
on Marine View Drive and on Des Moines Memorial Drive in Des Moines.
(((16) $1,100,000)) (15) $225,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely for local road improvements that
connect to the I-82 valley mall boulevard project (5082010). ((Planned
funding of an additional $2,000,000 shall be made available to this
project in the 2009-11 biennium.
(17) $2,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for completion of the riverside avenue extension
project in the city of Spokane.
(18))) It is the intent of the legislature that an additional
$2,875,000 will be provided in the 2009-11 omnibus transportation
appropriations act to complete this project.
(16) For the 2007-09 project appropriations, unless otherwise
provided in this act, the director of financial management may
authorize a transfer of appropriation authority between projects
managed by the freight mobility strategic investment board, in order
for the board to manage project spending and efficiently deliver all
projects in the respective program.

TRANSFERS AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Sec. 401 2008 c 121 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND
DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND TRANSPORTATION FUND
REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($544,061,000))
$515,861,000
Ferry Bond Retirement Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,380,000
Transportation Improvement Board Bond Retirement
Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,822,000))
$26,462,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,059,000))
$8,248,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,823,000))
$2,223,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($457,000))
$301,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($675,000))
$337,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,003,000))
$2,503,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,000
Special Category C Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($99,000))
$78,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($626,560,000))
$593,574,000

Sec. 402 2008 c 121 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND
FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($243,000))
$369,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,000))
$49,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($90,000))
$55,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($267,000))
$406,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000
Special Category C Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($717,000))
$935,000

Sec. 403 2008 c 121 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Reappropriation:
For transfer to the Tacoma Narrows Toll Bridge
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,133,000))
$12,717,000

The department of transportation is authorized to sell up to
(($18,000,000)) $12,717,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for
the Tacoma Narrows bridge project. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds
shall be deposited into the motor vehicle account. The department of
transportation shall inform the treasurer of the amount to be
deposited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 A new section is added to 2007 c 518
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR MVFT BONDS AND TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation: For
transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,000,000))
$66,200,000

The state treasurer is authorized to sell up to (($105,000,000))
$66,200,000 in bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843 for vessel and
terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long lead-time
materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries.

Sec. 405 2008 c 121 s 404 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
Motor Vehicle Account Appropriation for
motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to cities
and counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($501,783,827))
$491,628,000

Sec. 406 2008 c 121 s 405 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle fuel tax
refunds and statutory transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($902,982,000))
$854,291,000

Sec. 407 2008 c 121 s 406 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING -- TRANSFERS
Motor Vehicle Account -- State
Appropriation: For motor vehicle
fuel tax refunds and transfers . . . . . . . . . . . . (($445,345,000))
$480,666,000

Sec. 408 2008 c 121 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS
(1) Recreational Vehicle Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,505,000
(2) License Plate Technology Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal
Transportation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(3) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the High-Occupancy Toll Lanes Operations--
State Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(4) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,000,000))
$4,000,000
(5) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound
Ferry Operations Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,000,000))
$89,000,000
(6) Advanced Right-of-Way Revolving Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,000,000))
$24,000,000
(7) Waste Tire Removal Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
(8) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(9) ((Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation
Infrastructure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
(10))) Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,500,000))
$14,000,000
(((11) Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Small City Pavement and Sidewalk
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000))
(10) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the State Patrol Highway
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
(11) Motorcycle Safety Education Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Multimodal
Transportation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
(12) Department of Licensing Services Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor Vehicle
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
(13) Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Special Category C Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
(14) Passenger Ferry Account--State Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal Transportation
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,121,000
(15) Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Puget Sound Capital
Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(16) Transportation Partnership Account--State
Appropriation: For transfer to the Transportation 2003
Account (Nickel Account)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000
(17) Miscellaneous Transportation Programs
Account--State Appropriation: For transfer to the Motor
Vehicle Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
The transfers identified in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: The amount transferred in
subsection (3) of this section may be spent only on "highway purposes"
as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the Washington
state Constitution.

MISCELLANEOUS 2007-09 BIENNIUM
Sec. 501 2008 c 121 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR--INSURANCE ACCOUNTING SYSTEM
Aeronautics Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $338,000
Puget Sound Capital Construction Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000
Transportation Partnership Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $882,000
Puget Sound Ferry Operating Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $294,000
Urban Arterial Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Transportation Improvement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Department of Licensing Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Multimodal Transportation Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000
Tacoma Narrows Bridge Toll Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,852,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section fund
various state transportation agencies to support the state insurance
accounting system. ((From the applicable accounts, the office of
financial management shall reduce allotments to the respective agencies
by an amount that conforms with the insurance accounting system special
appropriations enacted in the 2008 supplemental omnibus appropriations
act, Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2687 (chapter . . ., Laws of
2008). The allotment reductions under this section shall be placed in
reserve status and remain unexpended.)) The appropriations in this
section are provided solely for expenditure into the health care
authority administrative account.

Sec. 502 RCW 46.68.065 and 2001 c 285 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created the motorcycle safety education account in
the highway safety fund of the state treasury, to the credit of which
shall be deposited all moneys directed by law to be credited thereto.
All expenses incurred by the director of the department of licensing in
administering RCW 46.20.505 through 46.20.520 shall be borne by
appropriations from this account, and moneys deposited into this
account shall be used only for the purposes authorized in RCW 46.20.505
through 46.20.520. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the motorcycle safety education account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 503 RCW 46.68.220 and 1992 c 216 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of licensing services account is created in the
motor vehicle fund. All receipts from service fees received under RCW
46.01.140(4)(b) shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for information and service delivery systems
for the department, and for reimbursement of county licensing
activities. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the department of licensing services account such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 504 RCW 47.60.645 and 2008 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby established in the transportation fund the
passenger ferry account. Money in the account shall be used for
operating or capital grants for ferry systems as provided in chapters
36.54, 36.57A, and 53.08 RCW. Moneys in the account shall be expended
with legislative appropriation. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the passenger ferry account such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 A new section is added to chapter 46.68
RCW to read as follows:
During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the transportation partnership account to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account) such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the transportation partnership account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 2007 c 518 s 108 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 2008 c 121 s 604 and 2007 c 518 s 713
(uncodified) are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 6, 35
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
AMERICAN RECOVERY AND REINVESTMENT ACT OF 2009 . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
AVIATION--PROGRAM F . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES--PROGRAM U . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY--PROGRAM C . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
MARINE--PROGRAM X . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
PROGRAM DELIVERY MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT--PROGRAM H . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
RAIL--PROGRAM Y--CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 52
RAIL--PROGRAM Y--OPERATING . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
TRAFFIC OPERATIONS -- PROGRAM Q -- CAPITAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
JOINT TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR--INSURANCE ACCOUNTING SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
STATE TREASURER
ADMINISTRATIVE TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 61, 62
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 7, 36
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
TECHNICAL SERVICES BUREAU . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
--- END ---