BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
account for a student's entire high school academic history by
implementing an assessment system that evaluates a student's readiness
to graduate based on multiple measures. This method recognizes all of
the state's graduation requirements, considers the academic impact and
benefit of each, and puts all in proper perspective. It honors a well-rounded, rigorous, and challenging educational experience that prepares
students for a changing and complex twenty-first century. It
recognizes that while all students can learn at high levels, each
student is unique in his or her learning style. Students demonstrate
competencies through their own strengths, learning styles, and
different formats, and academically develop at different rates over
time. In this system, the academic standards expected to be mastered
remain constant but the time and manner by which a student demonstrates
those standards can change. This system upholds all of the state's
four learning goals throughout a student's high school tenure. It
provides the opportunity for students to develop, grasp, and
demonstrate many learning objectives, including those beyond the tenth
grade.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the class of 2010, every student shall have the
opportunity to graduate with a high school diploma by obtaining a set
weighted graduation score, as established by the state board of
education, in relation to his or her performance in the entire multiple
measures high school assessment system, as calculated under subsection
(2) of this section. To qualify for graduation, a student must
complete each of the five components in the high school assessment
system. A student who graduates using this multiple measures approach
does not receive a certificate of academic achievement or certificate
of individual achievement. The multiple measures high school
assessment system is comprised of the following five components:
(a) Computation of the average grade point for those courses
required for graduation as determined by the state board of education;
(b) Computation of the average grade point for those courses
required locally for graduation;
(c) Completion of the high school and beyond plan;
(d) Completion of a culminating project; and
(e) Student scores on the assessments or alternative assessments
established under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045.
(2)(a) Each component shall be evaluated using a four-point grading
system and each component shall be assigned a different percentage
weight for purposes of calculating the student's weighted graduation
score. The purpose of the differently weighted components is to allow
a high score on certain components to offset lower scores on other
components. The state board of education shall establish:
(i) The weighted average graduation score, on a scale of one to
four, that is necessary for a student to graduate;
(ii) Guidelines for schools on how to establish the point values to
be assigned to each of the five components of the high school
assessment system; and
(iii) Guidelines to assist schools in understanding how to
calculate the weighted graduation score.
(b) In creating the guidelines, the state board of education shall
use the minimum criteria in this subsection (2)(b) but may establish
additional requirements for each component:
(i) For the components in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this
section, students must attain a minimum achievement of a passing grade
on every course required for graduation in order to receive a numerical
score. The components in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section
shall, in total, have a forty percent weight of the whole on a one
hundred percent scale.
(ii) Students must take the Washington assessment of student
learning at least once. The score for the component in subsection
(1)(e) of this section shall have a forty percent weight of the whole
on a one hundred percent scale.
(iii) The components in subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section
shall each have a ten percent weight of the whole on a one hundred
percent scale.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but ((need)) is
not ((be)) limited to the Washington assessment of student learning,
opportunities for a student to retake the content areas of the
assessment in which the student was not successful, and if approved by
the legislature pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or
more objective alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate
achievement of state academic standards. The objective alternative
assessments for each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the
skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the
Washington assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement ((shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and)) is evidence that the students have successfully
met the state standard in the content areas included in the
certificate. With the exception of students satisfying the provisions
of section 2 of this act, RCW 28A.155.045, or 28A.655.0611, acquisition
of the certificate is required for graduation from a public high school
but is not the only requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the scholastic assessment test (SAT) or the American
college test (ACT) may be used as an objective alternative assessment
under this section for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded
the state standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The
state board of education shall identify the scores students must
achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT to meet or exceed the
state standard in the relevant content area on the Washington
assessment of student learning. The state board of education shall
identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After the first scores
are established, the state board may increase but not decrease the
scores required for students to meet or exceed the state standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the preliminary scholastic assessment test (PSAT) may be
used as an objective alternative assessment under this section for
demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard for
the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of education
shall identify the score students must achieve on the mathematics
portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in that
content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.655.0611 and 2007 c 354 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the students meeting the requirements of section
2 of this act, beginning with the graduating class of 2008 and through
no later than the graduating class of 2012, students may graduate from
high school without earning a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement if they:
(a) Have not successfully met the mathematics standard on the high
school Washington assessment of student learning, an approved objective
alternative assessment, or an alternate assessment developed for
eligible special education students;
(b) Have successfully met the state standard in the other content
areas required for a certificate under RCW 28A.655.061 or 28A.155.045;
(c) Have met all other state and school district graduation
requirements; and
(d)(i) For the graduating class of 2008, successfully earn one
additional high school mathematics credit or career and technical
course equivalent, including courses offered at skill centers, after
the student's eleventh grade year intended to increase the student's
mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the mathematics
standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment of student
learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics assessment at
least once annually until graduation; and
(ii) For the remaining graduating classes under this section,
successfully earn two additional mathematics credits or career and
technical course equivalent, including courses offered at skill
centers, after the student's tenth grade year intended to increase the
student's mathematics proficiency toward meeting or exceeding the
mathematics standards assessed on the high school Washington assessment
of student learning and continue to take the appropriate mathematics
assessment at least once annually until graduation.
(2) The state board of education may adopt a rule that ends the
application of this section with a graduating class before the
graduating class of 2012, if the state board of education adopts the
rule by September 1st of the freshman school year of the graduating
class to which the provisions of this section no longer apply. The
state board of education's authority under this section does not alter
the requirement that any change in performance standards for the tenth
grade assessment must comply with RCW 28A.305.130.
(3) This section expires August 31, 2013.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.155.045 and 2007 c 354 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, students served under
this chapter, who are not appropriately assessed by the high school
Washington assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061, even with
accommodations, may earn a certificate of individual achievement. The
certificate may be earned using multiple ways to demonstrate skills and
abilities commensurate with their individual education programs. The
determination of whether the high school assessment system is
appropriate shall be made by the student's individual education program
team. Except as provided in RCW 28A.655.0611 or section 2 of this act,
for these students, the certificate of individual achievement is
required for graduation from a public high school, but need not be the
only requirement for graduation. When measures other than the high
school assessment system as defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used, the
measures shall be in agreement with the appropriate educational
opportunity provided for the student as required by this chapter. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop the guidelines for
determining which students should not be required to participate in the
high school assessment system and which types of assessments are
appropriate to use.
When measures other than the high school assessment system as
defined in RCW 28A.655.061 are used for high school graduation
purposes, the student's high school transcript shall note whether that
student has earned a certificate of individual achievement.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny a student the
right to participation in the high school assessment system as defined
in RCW 28A.655.061, and, upon successfully meeting the high school
standard, receipt of the certificate of academic achievement.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2006 c 114 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) Students must meet the certificate of academic achievement
requirements under RCW 28A.655.061 ((or)), the certificate of
individual achievement requirements under RCW 28A.155.045 ((are
required for graduation)), or the requirements of the multiple measures
high school assessment system as established in section 2 of this act
in order to graduate from a public high school ((but)). These are not
the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of
education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board. The
state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements for students
enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and technical
education programs, particularly those programs that lead to a
certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized. The
purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in these
programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of academic
achievement, complete the program and earn the program's certificate or
credential, and complete other state and local graduation requirements.
The board shall ((reports [report])) report its findings and
recommendations for additional flexibility in graduation requirements,
if necessary, to the legislature by December 1, 2007.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---