BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW
to read as follows:
A condominium association is not required to follow the
requirements under RCW 64.34.380 through 64.34.390 if:
(1) The association has ten or fewer condominium owners; and
(2) Two-thirds of the owners agree to exempt the association from
RCW 64.34.380 through 64.34.390.

--- END ---