BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any action based on any act or omission occurring on or
after the effective date of this section, an employer is not subject to
liability or penalty for the failure of the employer to pay minimum
wages or overtime compensation under this title if the employer
establishes that the act or omission complained of was in good faith
conformity with and reliance on:
(a) A rule related to any wage payment requirement;
(b) A written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice,
determination, or interpretation of the director; or
(c) An interpretive or administrative policy issued by the
department.
(2) The defense described in subsection (1) of this section, if
established, is a bar to the action, notwithstanding that after the act
or omission, the order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice,
determination, or interpretation, or interpretive or administrative
policy of the department is modified or rescinded or is determined by
judicial authority to be invalid or of no legal effect.

--- END ---