BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The parties to a claim may enter into a final settlement
agreement at any time once the worker has reached maximum medical
improvement as provided in this section with respect to one or more
claims under this title. All final settlement agreements must be
approved by the board of industrial insurance appeals. The final
settlement agreement may:
(i) Bind the parties with regard to any or all aspects of a claim,
including but not limited to allowance or rejection of a claim,
monetary payment, vocational services, claim closure, and claim
reopening under RCW 51.32.160; and
(ii) Not subject any employer who is not a signatory to the
agreement to any responsibility or burden under any claim.
(b) For purposes of this section, "parties" means:
(i) For a self-insured claim, the worker and the employer; and
(ii) For a state fund claim, the worker, the employer, and the
department of labor and industries. If the employer participates in a
retrospective rating plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, the retrospective
rating group, through its administrator, is also a party.
(c) A final settlement agreement entered into under this section
must be signed by the parties or their representatives and must clearly
state that the parties agree to the terms of the final settlement
agreement. Unless one of the parties revokes consent to the agreement,
as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the final settlement
agreement becomes final and binding thirty days after approval of the
agreement by the board of industrial insurance appeals.
(d) A final settlement agreement that has become final and binding
as provided in this section is binding on the department and on all
parties to the agreement as to its terms and the injuries and
occupational diseases to which the final settlement applies. A final
settlement agreement that has become final and binding is not subject
to appeal.
(2)(a) If a worker is not represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a final settlement agreement, the parties must forward a copy
of the signed settlement agreement to the board with a request for a
conference with a settlement officer. Unless one of the parties
requests a later date, the settlement officer must convene a conference
within fourteen days after receipt of the request for the limited
purpose of receiving the final settlement agreement of the parties,
explaining to the worker the benefits generally available under this
title, and explaining that a final settlement agreement may alter the
benefits payable on a claim. In no event may a settlement officer
render legal advice to any party.
(b) Before approving the settlement agreement, the settlement
officer shall ensure that the worker has an adequate understanding of
the settlement proposal and its consequences to the worker.
(c) The settlement officer may reject a settlement agreement only
if the officer finds the parties have not entered into the agreement
knowingly and willingly. Within seven days after the conference, the
settlement officer shall issue an order allowing or rejecting the final
settlement agreement. There is no appeal from the settlement officer's
decision.
(d) If the settlement officer issues an order allowing the final
settlement agreement, the order shall be submitted to the board.
(3) If a worker is represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a final settlement agreement, the parties may submit the
agreement directly to the board without the conference described in
this section.
(4) Upon receiving the final settlement agreement, the board shall
approve the agreement within thirty working days of receipt unless it
finds that the parties have not entered into the agreement knowingly
and willingly. If the board approves the agreement, it shall provide
notice to the department of the binding terms of the agreement and
provide for placement of the agreement in the applicable claim files.
(5) A party may revoke consent to the final settlement agreement by
providing written notice to the other parties and the board within
thirty days after the date the agreement is approved by the board.
(6) To the extent the worker is entitled to temporary total
disability or permanent total disability benefits while a final
settlement agreement is being negotiated, or during the revocation
period of an agreement, the benefits must be paid until the agreement
becomes final.
(7) If the parties have provided in a final settlement agreement
that a claim is not subject to reopening pursuant to RCW 51.32.160, any
application to reopen the claim must be denied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall develop and maintain a registry system by
which it records final settlement agreements entered into between the
parties. This information is available to employers at appropriate
times as determined by the department in rule, but an employer may not
consider a prior settlement agreement when making hiring decisions or
as a condition of employment.

--- END ---