BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.04.025 and 2008 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each loan made to a resident of this state by a licensee is
subject to the authority and restrictions of this chapter, unless such
loan is made under the authority of chapter 63.14 RCW.
(2) This chapter shall not apply to any person doing business under
and as permitted by any law of this state or of the United States
relating to banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan or
building and loan associations, or credit unions, nor to any
pawnbroking business lawfully transacted under and as permitted by any
law of this state regulating pawnbrokers, nor to any loan of credit
made pursuant to a credit card plan.
(3) This chapter does not apply to nonprofit housing organizations
or persons making loans, or loans made, under housing programs that are
funded in whole or in part by federal, state, or private programs if
the primary purpose of the programs is to assist low-income borrowers
with purchasing or repairing housing or the development of housing for
low-income Washington state residents.

--- END ---