BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.310 and 2007 c 146 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual is "unemployed" in any week during which the
individual performs no services and with respect to which no
remuneration is payable to the individual, or in any week of less than
full time work, if the remuneration payable to the individual with
respect to such week is less than one and one-third times the
individual's weekly benefit amount plus five dollars. The commissioner
shall prescribe regulations applicable to unemployed individuals making
such distinctions in the procedures as to such types of unemployment as
the commissioner deems necessary.
(2) An individual is not "unemployed" during any week which falls
totally within a period during which the individual, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement or individual employment contract, is
employed full time in accordance with a definition of full time
contained in the agreement or contract, and for which compensation for
full time work is payable. This subsection may not be applied
retroactively to an individual who had no guarantee of work at the
start of such period and subsequently is provided additional work by
the employer.
(3) An officer of a corporation who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, or a corporate officer who is a
family member of an officer who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, whose claim for benefits is based
on any wages with that corporation, is:
(a) Not "unemployed" in any week during the individual's term of
office or ownership in the corporation, even if wages are not being
paid;
(b) "Unemployed" in any week:
(i) Upon dissolution of the corporation or if the officer
permanently resigns or is permanently removed from their appointment
and responsibilities with that corporation in accordance with its
articles of incorporation or bylaws; or
(ii) In which the individual is unemployed as defined in subsection
(1) of this section and performs services as a corporate officer for
fewer than twenty-five hours in each quarter of a base year during
which the individual is primarily employed by another employer.
As used in this section, "family member" means persons who are
members of a family by blood or marriage as parents, stepparents,
grandparents, spouses, children, brothers, sisters, stepchildren,
adopted children, or grandchildren.

--- END ---