BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.157.005 and 1997 c 369 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature declares that certain ((industrial)) investments,
such as investments for industrial development, environmental
improvement, and innovation activities, merit special designation and
treatment by governmental bodies when they are proposed. Such
investments bolster the economies of their locale and impact the
economy of the state as a whole. It is the intention of the
legislature to recognize ((industrial)) projects of statewide
significance and to encourage local governments and state agencies to
expedite their completion.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.157.010 and 2004 c 275 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.76.210,
28C.18.080, 43.21A.350, ((47.06.030,)) and 90.58.100 ((and an
industrial)):
(a) A project of statewide significance is: (i) A border crossing
project that involves both private and public investments carried out
in conjunction with adjacent states or provinces; (ii) a development
project that will provide a net environmental benefit; (iii) a
development project in furtherance of the commercialization of
innovations; or (iv) a private industrial development with private
capital investment in manufacturing or research and development;
(b) To "expedite" means to speed up the progress of or to
facilitate in a manner beyond the normal practice.
(2) To qualify as ((an industrial)) a project of statewide
significance: (a) The project must be completed after January 1,
((1997)) 2009; (b) the applicant must submit an application for
designation as ((an industrial)) a project of statewide significance to
the department of community, trade, and economic development; and (c)
the project must have:
(i) In counties with a population of less than or equal to twenty
thousand, a capital investment of ((twenty)) five million dollars;
(ii) In counties with a population of greater than twenty thousand
but no more than fifty thousand, a capital investment of ((fifty)) ten
million dollars;
(iii) In counties with a population of greater than fifty thousand
but no more than one hundred thousand, a capital investment of ((one
hundred)) fifteen million dollars;
(iv) In counties with a population of greater than one hundred
thousand but no more than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of
((two hundred)) twenty million dollars;
(v) In counties with a population of greater than two hundred
thousand but no more than four hundred thousand, a capital investment
of ((four hundred)) thirty million dollars;
(vi) In counties with a population of greater than four hundred
thousand but no more than one million, a capital investment of ((six
hundred)) forty million dollars;
(vii) In counties with a population of greater than one million, a
capital investment of ((one billion)) fifty million dollars;
(viii) In rural counties ((with fewer than one hundred persons per
square mile as determined annually by the office of financial
management and published by the department of revenue effective for the
period July 1st through June 30th)) as defined by RCW 82.14.370,
projected full-time employment positions after completion of
construction of fifty or greater;
(ix) In counties ((with one hundred or more persons per square mile
as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th)) other than rural counties as defined by RCW
82.14.370, projected full-time employment positions after completion of
construction of one hundred or greater; or
(x) Been designated by the director of community, trade, and
economic development as ((an industrial)) a project of statewide
significance either because: (A) ((Because the county in which the
project is to be located is a distressed county and)) The economic
circumstances of the county merit the additional assistance such
designation will bring; ((or)) (B) ((because)) the impact on a region
due to the size and complexity of the project merits such designation;
(C) the project resulted from or is in furtherance of innovation
activities at a public research institution in the state or is in or
resulted from innovation activities within an innovation partnership
zone; or (D) the project will provide a net environmental benefit as
evidenced by plans for design and construction under green building
standards or other environmental criteria established by the director.
Designation under this subsection (2)(c)(x) will only be made after
consultation on the availability of staff resources of the office of
regulatory assistance.
(((2))) (3) The term manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned
it in RCW ((82.61.010)) 82.62.010.
(((3))) (4) The term research and development shall have the
meaning assigned it in RCW ((82.61.010)) 82.62.010.
(((4))) (5) The term applicant means a person applying to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for
designation of a development project as ((an industrial)) a project of
statewide significance.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.157.020 and 2003 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Counties and cities with projects designated as ((industrial))
projects of statewide significance within their jurisdictions shall
enter into an agreement with the office of ((permit)) regulatory
assistance and the project managers of ((industrial)) projects of
statewide significance for expediting the completion of ((industrial))
projects of statewide significance. The agreement shall require:
(1) Expedited permit processing for the design and construction of
the project;
(2) Expedited environmental review processing;
(3) Expedited processing of requests for street, right-of-way, or
easement vacations necessary for the construction of the project;
((and))
(4) Participation of local officials on the team assembled under
the requirements of RCW 43.157.030(2)(b); and
(5) Such other actions or items as are deemed necessary by the
office of ((permit)) regulatory assistance for the design and
construction of the project.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.157.030 and 2003 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall:
(a) Develop an application for designation of development projects
as ((industrial)) projects of statewide significance. The application
must be accompanied by a letter of approval from the legislative
authority of any jurisdiction that will have the proposed
((industrial)) project of statewide significance within its boundaries.
No designation of a project as ((an industrial)) a project of statewide
significance shall be made without such letter of approval. The letter
of approval must state that the jurisdiction joins in the request for
the designation of the project as one of statewide significance and has
or will hire the professional staff that will be required to expedite
the processes necessary to the completion of ((an industrial)) a
project of statewide significance. The development project proponents
may provide the funding necessary for the jurisdiction to hire the
professional staff that will be required to so expedite. The
application shall contain information regarding the location of the
project, the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior
year, estimated new employment related to the project, estimated wages
of employees related to the project, estimated time schedules for
completion and operation, and other information required by the
department; and
(b) Certify ((that the)) any project that meets or will meet the
requirements of RCW 43.157.010 ((regarding designation)) as ((an
industrial)) a project of statewide significance.
(2) The office of ((permit)) regulatory assistance shall assign a
project facilitator or coordinator to each ((industrial)) project of
statewide significance to: (a) Assist in the scoping and coordinating
functions provided for in chapter 43.42 RCW; (b) assemble a team of
state and local government and private officials to help meet the
planning, permitting, and development needs of each project, which team
shall include those responsible for planning, permitting and licensing,
infrastructure development, workforce development services including
higher education, transportation services, and the provision of
utilities; and (c) work with each team member to expedite their actions
in furtherance of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---