BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed in an amount equal to the amount of contributions made to the
Washington technology center, or to funds controlled by the Washington
technology center, for research and technology development grants.
(2) The credit under this section must be earned, and claimed
against taxes due under this chapter, for the tax reporting period in
which the contribution was made by the person claiming credit under
this section. The credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under
this chapter for the tax reporting period. Unused credit may be
carried over and used in subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds
may be granted for credits under this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "Washington technology
center" means the Washington technology center created in chapter
28B.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who has made contributions to the Washington technology
center, or to funds controlled by the Washington technology center, for
the purpose of research and technology development grants is allowed a
credit against taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to the
amount of any such contributions made in any fiscal year. The credit
must be taken in the form and manner required by the department. The
credit may not exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this
chapter. Refunds may not be granted in the place of credits.

--- END ---