BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Counties planning under RCW 36.70A.070 must have completed the
economic development element of their comprehensive plan by June 30,
2010, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter. In
designating associate development organizations under RCW 43.330.080,
counties planning under RCW 36.70A.070 may direct that state resources
available to the associate development organization shall be used by
the associate development organization to complete the countywide
economic development plan as set out in RCW 43.330.080(2)(c) and the
economic development element of the county comprehensive plan as set
out in RCW 36.70A.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.080 and 2007 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall contract with county-designated associate
development organizations to increase the support for and coordination
of community and economic development services in communities or
regional areas. The organizations contracted with in each community or
regional area shall be broadly representative of community and economic
interests. The organization shall be capable of identifying key
economic and community development problems, developing appropriate
solutions, and mobilizing broad support for recommended initiatives.
The contracting organization shall work with and include local
governments, local chambers of commerce, workforce development
councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private,
public, or nonprofit community and economic development groups. The
scope of services delivered under these contracts shall include two
broad areas of work:
(1) Direct assistance, including business planning, to companies
who need support to stay in business, expand, or relocate to Washington
from out of state or other countries. Assistance includes:
(a) Working with the appropriate partners, including but not
limited to, local governments, workforce development organizations,
port districts, community colleges and higher education institutions,
export assistance providers, the Washington manufacturing services, the
Washington state quality award((,)) council, small business assistance
programs, and other federal, state, and local programs to facilitate
the alignment of planning efforts and the seamless delivery of business
support services in the county;
(b) Providing information, via web sites and other methods, on
state and local permitting processes, tax issues, tax incentives,
customized training and job skills training programs, and other
essential information for operating, expanding, or locating a business
in Washington;
(c) Marketing Washington and local areas as excellent locations to
expand or relocate a business and positioning Washington as a globally
competitive place to grow business, which may include developing and
executing regional plans to attract companies from out of state;
(d) Working with businesses on site location and selection
assistance;
(e) Providing business retention and expansion services, including
business outreach and monitoring efforts to identify and address
challenges and opportunities faced by businesses; and
(f) ((Participate [Participating])) Participating in economic
development system-wide discussions regarding gaps in business start-up
assistance in Washington and, working with state and local partners,
developing programs to address the gaps; and
(2) Support for regional economic research and regional planning
efforts to implement target industry strategies and other economic
development strategies that support increased living standards and
increase foreign direct investment throughout Washington. Activities
include:
(a) Participation in regional planning efforts involving combined
strategies around workforce development and economic development
policies and programs. The contracting organization shall participate
with the state board for community and technical colleges as created in
RCW 28B.50.050, and any community and technical colleges in providing
for the coordination of job skills training within its region;
(b) Collecting and reporting data as specified by the contract with
the department for statewide systemic analysis. The department shall
consult with the Washington state economic development commission in
the establishment of such uniform data as is needed to conduct a
statewide systemic analysis of the state's economic development
programs and expenditures. In cooperation with other local, regional,
and state planning efforts, contracting organizations may provide
insight into the needs of target industry clusters, business expansion
plans, early detection of potential relocations or layoffs, training
needs, and other appropriate economic information;
(c) In conjunction with other governmental jurisdictions and
institutions, ((participate)) taking the lead in the development of a
countywide economic development plan, which may serve as the economic
development element of a county's comprehensive plan, consistent with
the state comprehensive plan for economic development developed by the
Washington state economic development commission.

--- END ---