BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington health care discount plan organization act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The purposes of this chapter are to promote
the public interest by establishing standards for discount plan
organizations, to protect consumers from unfair or deceptive marketing,
sales, or enrollment practices, and to facilitate consumer
understanding of the role and function of discount plan organizations
in providing discounts on charges for health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means a person that directly, or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with, the person specified.
(2) "Commissioner" means the Washington state insurance
commissioner.
(3)(a) "Control" or "controlled by" or "under common control with"
means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether
through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a
commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise,
unless the power is the result of an official position with or
corporate office held by the person.
(b) Control exists when any person, directly or indirectly, owns,
controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing
ten percent or more of the voting securities of any other person. A
presumption of control may be rebutted by a showing made in the manner
provided by RCW 48.31B.005(2) and 48.31B.025(11) that control does not
exist in fact. The commissioner may determine, after furnishing all
persons in interest notice and opportunity to be heard and making
specific findings of fact to support the determination, that control
exists in fact, notwithstanding the absence of a presumption to that
effect.
(4)(a) "Discount plan" means a business arrangement or contract in
which a person or organization, in exchange for fees, dues, charges, or
other consideration, provides or purports to provide discounts to its
members on charges by providers for health care services.
(b) "Discount plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that does not charge a membership or other fee to use
the plan's discount card;
(ii) A patient access program as defined in this chapter;
(iii) A medicare prescription drug plan as defined in this chapter;
or
(iv) A discount plan offered by a health carrier authorized under
chapter 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW.
(5)(a) "Discount plan organization" means a person that, in
exchange for fees, dues, charges, or other consideration, provides or
purports to provide access to discounts to its members on charges by
providers for health care services. "Discount plan organization" also
means a person or organization that contracts with providers, provider
networks, or other discount plan organizations to offer discounts on
health care services to its members. This term also includes all
persons that determine the charge to or other consideration paid by
members.
(b) "Discount plan organization" does not mean:
(i) Pharmacy benefit managers;
(ii) Health care provider networks, when the network's only
involvement in discount plans is contracting with the plan to provide
discounts to the plan's members;
(iii) Marketers who market the discount plans of discount plan
organizations which are licensed under to this chapter as long as all
written communications of the marketer in connection with a discount
plan clearly identify the licensed discount plan organization as the
responsible entity; or
(iv) Health carriers, if the discount on health care services is
offered by a health carrier authorized under chapter 48.20, 48.21,
48.44, or 48.46 RCW.
(6) "Health care facility" or "facility" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005(15).
(7) "Health care provider" or "provider" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005(16).
(8) "Health care provider network," "provider network," or
"network" means any network of health care providers, including any
person or entity that negotiates directly or indirectly with a discount
plan organization on behalf of more than one provider to provide health
care services to members.
(9) "Health care services" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005(17).
(10) "Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005(18).
(11) "Marketer" means a person or entity that markets, promotes,
sells, or distributes a discount plan, including a contracted marketing
organization and a private label entity that places its name on and
markets or distributes a discount plan pursuant to a marketing
agreement with a discount plan organization.
(12) "Medicare prescription drug plan" means a plan that provides
a medicare part D prescription drug benefit in accordance with the
requirements of the federal medicare prescription drug improvement and
modernization act of 2003.
(13) "Member" means any individual who pays fees, dues, charges, or
other consideration for the right to receive the benefits of a discount
plan, but does not include any individual who enrolls in a patient
access program.
(14) "Patient access program" means a voluntary program sponsored
by a pharmaceutical manufacturer, or a consortium of pharmaceutical
manufacturers, that provides free or discounted health care products
for no additional consideration directly to low-income or uninsured
individuals either through a discount card or direct shipment.
(15) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a governmental
entity, a partnership, an association, a joint venture, a joint stock
company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, any similar entity,
or any combination of the persons listed in this subsection.
(16)(a) "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a person that performs
pharmacy benefit management for a covered entity.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, a "covered entity" means an
insurer, a health care service contractor, a health maintenance
organization, or a multiple employer welfare arrangement licensed,
certified, or registered under the provisions of this title. "Covered
entity" also means a health program administered by the state as a
provider of health coverage, a single employer that provides health
coverage to its employees, or a labor union that provides health
coverage to its members as part of a collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) This chapter applies to all discount
plans and all discount plan organizations doing business in or from
this state or that affect subjects located wholly or in part or to be
performed within this state, and all persons having to do with this
business.
(2) A discount plan organization that is a health carrier with a
license, certificate of authority, or registration under RCW 48.05.030
or chapter 48.31C RCW:
(a) Is not required to obtain a license under section 5 of this
act, except that any of its affiliates that operate as a discount plan
organization in this state must obtain a license under section 5 of
this act and comply with all other provisions of this chapter;
(b) Is required to comply with sections 9 through 12 of this act
and report, in the form and manner as the commissioner may require, any
of the information described in section 14(2) (b), (c), or (d) of this
act that is not otherwise already reported; and
(c) Is subject to sections 16 and 17 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Before conducting discount plan business
to which this chapter applies, a person shall obtain a license from the
commissioner to operate as a discount plan organization.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each
application for a license to operate as a discount plan organization:
(a) Must be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and verified
by an officer or authorized representative of the applicant; and
(b) Must demonstrate, set forth, or be accompanied by the
following:
(i) The two hundred fifty dollar application fee, which must be
deposited into the general fund;
(ii) A copy of the organization documents of the applicant, such as
the articles of incorporation, including all amendments;
(iii) A copy of the applicant's bylaws or other enabling documents
that establish organizational structure;
(iv) The applicant's federal identification number, business
address, and mailing address;
(v)(A) A list of names, addresses, official positions, and
biographical information of the individuals who are responsible for
conducting the applicant's affairs, including all members of the board
of directors, board of trustees, executive committee, or other
governing board or committee, the officers, contracted management
company personnel, and any person or entity owning or having the right
to acquire ten percent or more of the voting securities of the
applicant; and
(B) A disclosure in the listing of the extent and nature of any
contracts or arrangements between any individual who is responsible for
conducting the applicant's affairs and the discount plan organization,
including all possible conflicts of interest;
(vi) A complete biographical statement, on forms prescribed by the
commissioner, with respect to each individual identified under (b)(v)
of this subsection;
(vii) A statement generally describing the applicant, its
facilities and personnel, and the health care services for which a
discount will be made available under the discount plan;
(viii) A copy of the form of all contracts made or to be made
between the applicant and any health care providers or health care
provider networks regarding the provision of health care services to
members and discounts to be made available to members;
(ix) A copy of the form of any contract made or arrangement to be
made between the applicant and any individual listed in (b)(v) of this
subsection;
(x) A list identifying by name, address, telephone number, and e-mail address all persons who will market each discount plan offered by
the applicant. If the person who will market a discount plan is an
entity, only the entity must be identified. This list must be
maintained and updated within sixty days of any change in the
information. An updated list must be sent to the commissioner as part
of the discount plan organization's renewal application under (b)(vii)
of this subsection;
(xi) A copy of the form of any contract made or to be made between
the applicant and any person, corporation, partnership, or other entity
for the performance on the applicant's behalf of any function,
including marketing, administration, enrollment, and subcontracting for
the provision of health care services to members and discounts to be
made available to members;
(xii) A copy of the applicant's most recent financial statements
audited by an independent certified public accountant, except that,
subject to the approval of the commissioner, an applicant that is an
affiliate of a parent entity that is publicly traded and that prepares
audited financial statements reflecting the consolidated operations of
the parent entity may submit the audited financial statement of the
parent entity and a written guaranty that the minimum capital
requirements required under section 6 of this act will be met by the
parent entity instead of the audited financial statement of the
applicant;
(xiii) A description of the proposed methods of marketing
including, but not limited to, describing the use of marketers, use of
the internet, sales by telephone, electronic mail, or facsimile
machine, and use of salespersons to market the discount plan benefits;
(xiv) A description of the member complaint procedures which must
be established and maintained by the applicant;
(xv) The name and address of the applicant's Washington statutory
agent for service of process, notice, or demand or, if not domiciled in
this state, a power of attorney duly executed by the applicant,
appointing the commissioner and duly authorized deputies as the true
and lawful attorney of the applicant in and for this state upon whom
all law process in any legal action or proceeding against the discount
plan organization on a cause of action arising in this state may be
served; and
(xvi) Any other information the commissioner may reasonably
require.
(3)(a) Upon application to and approval by the commissioner and
payment of the applicable fees, a discount plan organization that holds
a current license or other form of authority from another state to
operate as a discount plan organization, at the commissioner's
discretion, may not be required to submit the information required
under subsection (2) of this section in order to obtain a license under
this section if the commissioner is satisfied that the other state's
requirements, at a minimum, are equivalent to those required under
subsection (2) of this section or the commissioner is satisfied that
the other state's requirements are sufficient to protect the interests
of the residents of this state.
(b) Whenever the discount plan organization loses its license or
other form of authority in that other state to operate as a discount
plan organization, or is the subject of any disciplinary administrative
proceeding related to the organization's operating as a discount plan
organization in that other state, the discount plan organization shall
immediately notify the commissioner.
(4) After the receipt of an application filed under subsection (2)
or (3) of this section, the commissioner shall review the application
and notify the applicant of any deficiencies in the application.
(5)(a) Within ninety days after the date of receipt of a completed
application, the commissioner shall:
(i) Issue a license if the commissioner is satisfied that the
applicant has met the following:
(A) The applicant has fulfilled the requirements of this section
and the minimum capital requirements in accordance with section 6 of
this act; and
(B) The persons who own, control, and manage the applicant are
competent and trustworthy and possess managerial experience that would
make the proposed operation of the discount plan organization
beneficial to discount plan members; or
(ii) Disapprove the application and state the grounds for
disapproval.
(b) In making a determination under (a) of this subsection, the
commissioner may consider, for example, whether the applicant or an
officer or manager of the applicant: (i) Is not financially
responsible; (ii) does not have adequate expertise or experience to
operate a medical discount plan organization; or (iii) is not of good
character. Among the factors that the commissioner may consider in
making the determination is whether the applicant or an affiliate or a
business formerly owned or managed by the applicant or an officer or
manager of the applicant has had a previous application for a license,
or other authority, to operate as any entity regulated by the
commissioner denied, revoked, suspended, or terminated for cause, or is
under investigation for or has been found in violation of a statute or
regulation in another jurisdiction within the previous five years.
(6) Prior to licensure by the commissioner, each discount plan
organization shall establish an internet web site in order to conform
to the requirements of section 10(2) of this act.
(7)(a) A license is effective for one year, unless prior to its
expiration the license is renewed in accordance with this subsection or
suspended or revoked in accordance with subsection (8) of this section.
(b) At least ninety days before a license expires, the discount
plan organization shall submit:
(i) A renewal application form; and
(ii) A two hundred dollar renewal application fee for deposit into
the general fund.
(c) The commissioner shall renew the license of each holder that
meets the requirements of this chapter and pays the appropriate renewal
fee required.
(8)(a) The commissioner may suspend the authority of a discount
plan organization to enroll new members or refuse to renew or revoke a
discount plan organization's license if the commissioner finds that any
of the following conditions exist:
(i) The discount plan organization is not operating in compliance
with this chapter;
(ii) The discount plan organization does not have the minimum net
worth as required under section 6 of this act;
(iii) The discount plan organization has advertised, merchandised,
or attempted to merchandise its services in such a manner as to
misrepresent its services or capacity for service or has engaged in
deceptive, misleading, or unfair practices with respect to advertising
or merchandising;
(iv) The discount plan organization is not fulfilling its
obligations as a discount plan organization; or
(v) The continued operation of the discount plan organization would
be hazardous to its members.
(b) If the commissioner has cause to believe that grounds for the
nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license exists, the
commissioner shall notify the discount plan organization in writing
specifically stating the grounds for the refusal to renew or suspension
or revocation and may also pursue a hearing on the matter under chapter
48.04 RCW.
(c) When the license of a discount plan organization is nonrenewed,
surrendered, or revoked, the discount plan organization shall
immediately upon the effective date of the order of revocation or, in
the case of a nonrenewal, the date of expiration of the license, stop
any further advertising, solicitation, collecting of fees, or renewal
of contracts, and proceed to wind up its affairs transacted under the
license.
(d)(i) When the commissioner suspends a discount plan
organization's authority to enroll new members, the suspension order
must specify the period during which the suspension is to be in effect
and the conditions, if any, that must be met by the discount plan
organization prior to reinstatement of its license to enroll members.
(ii) The commissioner may rescind or modify the order of suspension
prior to the expiration of the suspension period.
(iii) The license of a discount plan organization may not be
reinstated unless requested by the discount plan organization. The
commissioner shall not grant the request for reinstatement if the
commissioner finds that the circumstances for which the suspension
occurred still exist or are likely to recur.
(9) Each licensed discount plan organization shall notify the
commissioner immediately whenever the discount plan organization's
license, or other form of authority to operate as a discount plan
organization in another state, is suspended, revoked, or nonrenewed in
that state.
(10) A health care provider who provides discounts to his or her
own patients without any cost or fee of any kind to the patient is not
required to obtain and maintain a license under this chapter as a
discount plan organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Except under subsection (3) of this
section, before the commissioner issues a license to any person
required to obtain a license under section 5 of this act, the person
seeking to operate a discount plan organization must have a net worth
of at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(2) At all times, except under subsection (3) of this section, each
discount plan organization must maintain a net worth of at least one
hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(3) By rule of the commissioner, the amounts in subsections (1) and
(2) of this section may be adjusted annually for inflation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Each licensed discount plan organization
shall continuously maintain in force a surety bond in its own name in
an amount not less than thirty-five thousand dollars to be used in the
discretion of the commissioner to protect the financial interest of
Washington members. The bond must be issued by an insurance company
licensed to do business in this state.
(2) In lieu of the bond specified in subsection (1) of this
section, a licensed discount plan organization may deposit and maintain
deposited with the commissioner, or at the discretion of the
commissioner, with any organization or trustee acceptable to the
commissioner through which a custodial or controlled account is
utilized, cash, securities, or any combination of these or other
measures that are acceptable to the commissioner which always have a
market value of not less than thirty-five thousand dollars.
(3) All income from a deposit made under subsection (2) of this
section is an asset of the discount plan organization.
(4) Except for the commissioner, the assets or securities held in
this state as a deposit under subsection (1) or (2) of this section are
not subject to levy by a judgment creditor or other claimant of the
discount plan organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The commissioner may conduct
investigations to determine whether any person has violated any
provision of this chapter and may, if the commissioner has a reason to
believe that the discount plan organization is not complying with the
requirements of this chapter, examine the business and affairs of any
discount plan organization.
(2) An examination conducted under subsection (1) of this section
must be performed in accordance with chapter 48.03 RCW, except that RCW
48.03.060 (1) and (2) shall not be applicable to the examination of
persons registered under this chapter.
(3) The commissioner may:
(a) Order any discount plan organization or applicant that operates
a discount plan organization to produce any records, books, files,
advertising, and solicitation materials or other information; and
(b) Gather evidence and take statements under oath to determine
whether the discount plan organization or applicant is in violation of
the law or is acting contrary to the public interest.
(4) The discount plan organization or applicant that is the subject
of the examination or investigation shall pay the expenses incurred in
conducting the examination or investigation. Failure by the discount
plan organization or applicant to pay the expenses is grounds for
denial or revocation of a license to operate as a discount plan
organization.
(5) All discount plan organizations or applicants that are subject
to examinations, investigations, or annual reporting requirements under
this chapter shall maintain detailed books and records of the
following:
(a) Records documenting all Washington transactions, showing all
funds received and all funds disbursed to Washington members,
prospective members, providers, and provider networks;
(b) All contracts or agreements with providers of the services
under a discount plan offered in Washington or sold to Washington
residents; and
(c) Telephone scripts for marketing activities to which this
chapter applies.
The discount plan organization shall maintain the books and records
described in this section, in addition to the books and records
required to be maintained under section 10 of this act, for a period of
at least two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A discount plan organization may charge
a periodic charge as well as a reasonable one-time processing fee of no
more than thirty dollars for a discount plan, or such other amount as
established by rule, but may not require payment of these or any other
charges or fees by direct debit from a banking, credit, or debit card
account unless that method of payment is clearly and conspicuously
disclosed to the prospective member. All charges and fees must be
provided in writing to the member when the member first joins the plan.
(2) When a marketer or discount plan organization solicits a
discount plan in conjunction with any other product, all charges that
a member or prospective member must pay for each discount plan must be
provided in writing as a separate item to the member or prospective
member, unless the entire amount of the periodic charge which includes
the periodic discount plan charge will be refunded if the member
cancels his or her membership in the discount plan organization within
the first thirty days after the date of receipt of the written
documents for the discount plan as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.
(3)(a)(i) If a member cancels his or her membership in the discount
plan organization within the first thirty days after the date of
receipt of the written documents for the discount plan described in
section 12(4) of this act, the member must receive a reimbursement of
all periodic charges upon return of the discount plan card to the
discount plan organization.
(ii)(A) Cancellation occurs when notice of cancellation is given to
the discount plan organization.
(B) Notice of cancellation is given when delivered by hand or
deposited in a mailbox, properly addressed and postage prepaid to the
mailing address of the discount plan organization, or e-mailed to the
e-mail address of the discount plan organization.
(iii) A discount plan organization shall return in full any
periodic charge charged or collected after the member has given the
discount plan organization notice of cancellation.
(b) If the discount plan organization cancels a membership for any
reason other than nonpayment of charges by the member, the discount
plan organization shall make a pro rata reimbursement of all periodic
charges to the member.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1)(a) A discount plan organization shall
have a written health care provider agreement with all health care
providers for whose health care services it provides access to a
discount to its members. The written health care provider agreement
may be entered into directly with the health care provider or
indirectly with a health care provider network to which the health care
provider belongs.
(b) A health care provider agreement between a discount plan
organization and a health care provider must provide the following:
(i) A list of the health care services and products to be provided
at a discount;
(ii) The amount or amounts of the discounts or, alternatively, a
fee schedule that reflects the health care provider's discounted rates;
and
(iii) That the health care provider may not charge members more
than the discounted rates.
(c) A health care provider agreement between a discount plan
organization and a health care provider network must require that the
health care provider network have written agreements with its health
care providers that:
(i) Contain the provisions described in (b) of this subsection;
(ii) Authorize the health care provider network to contract with
the discount plan organization on behalf of the health care provider;
and
(iii) Require the health care provider network to maintain an
up-to-date list of its contracted health care providers and to provide
the list on a monthly basis to the discount plan organization.
(d) A health care provider agreement between a discount plan
organization and an entity that contracts with a health care provider
network must require that the entity, in its contract with the health
care provider network, require the health care provider network to have
written agreements with its health care providers that comply with (c)
of this subsection.
(e) The discount plan organization shall maintain a copy of each
health care provider agreement into which it has entered and shall
promptly furnish a copy of each agreement to the commissioner when
requested.
(2)(a) Each discount plan organization shall maintain on an
internet web site a list of the names and addresses of the health care
providers with which it has a current provider agreement directly or
through a health care provider network. This list must be updated
every thirty days. The internet web site address must be prominently
displayed on all of its advertisements, marketing materials, brochures,
and discount plan cards.
(b) This subsection applies to those health care providers with
which the discount plan organization has a current provider agreement
directly as well as those health care providers that are members of a
health care provider network with which the discount plan organization
has a current provider agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A discount plan organization may market
its products directly to consumers or contract with marketers for the
distribution of its discount plans.
(2)(a) The discount plan organization shall have an executed
written agreement with a marketer prior to the marketer's marketing,
promoting, selling, or distributing the discount plan organization's
discount plans.
(b) The agreement between the discount plan organization and the
marketer must prohibit the marketer from using advertising, marketing
materials, brochures, and discount plan cards without first having the
discount plan organization's approval in writing.
(c) The discount plan organization is bound by and responsible for
the activities of a marketer that are within the scope of the
marketer's agency relationship with the organization.
(3) A discount plan organization shall approve in writing all
advertisements, marketing materials, brochures, and discount cards used
by marketers to market, promote, sell, or distribute the discount plan
prior to their use.
(4) Upon request, a discount plan organization shall submit to the
commissioner all advertising, marketing materials, and brochures used
or to be used in connection with the organization's discount plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1)(a) All advertisements, marketing
efforts, promotions, marketing materials, discount plan documents,
brochures, discount plan cards, and any other communications of a
discount plan organization provided to prospective members and members
must be truthful and not misleading in fact or in implication.
(b) Any advertisement, marketing material, discount plan document,
brochure, discount plan card, or other communication is misleading in
fact or in implication if it has a capacity or tendency to mislead or
deceive based on the overall impression that it may reasonably be
expected to create within the segment of the public to which it is
directed.
(c) A discount plan organization shall conduct its business in its
own legal name and all written communications from a discount plan to
regulators and consumers must prominently display the discount plan
organization's full legal name.
(2) A discount plan organization shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or as a disclaimer
of any relationship between discount plan benefits and insurance, or as
a description of an insurance product connected with a discount plan,
use in its advertisements, marketing efforts, promotions, marketing
materials, discount plan documents, brochures, and discount plan cards
the term "insurance";
(b) Describe or characterize the discount plan as being insurance
whenever a discount plan is bundled with an insured product and the
insurance benefits are incidental to the discount plan benefits;
(c) Use in its advertisements, marketing efforts, promotions,
marketing materials, discount plan documents, brochures, and discount
plan cards words or phrases that are commonly associated with the
business of insurance, such as the terms "health plan," "coverage,"
"copay," "copayments," "deductible," "preexisting conditions,"
"guaranteed issue," "premium," "PPO," "preferred provider
organization," or similar terms, in a manner that could reasonably
mislead an individual into believing that the discount plan is health
insurance;
(d) Use language in its advertisements, marketing efforts,
promotions, marketing material, discount plan documents, brochures, and
discount plan cards with respect to being licensed by the insurance
commissioner's office in a manner that could reasonably mislead an
individual into believing that the discount plan is insurance or has
been endorsed by the insurance commissioner's office;
(e) Make misleading, deceptive, or fraudulent representations
regarding the discount or range of discounts offered by the discount
plan or the access to any range of discounts offered by the discount
plan;
(f) Have restrictions on access to discount plan providers
including, except for hospital services, waiting periods and
notification periods; or
(g) Pay health care providers any fees for health care services or
collect or accept money from a member to pay a health care provider for
health care services provided under the discount plan, unless the
discount plan organization has an active certificate of authority or
registration in Washington.
(3)(a) Each discount plan organization shall make the following
general disclosures in not less than twelve-point type on the first
content page of any advertisements, marketing materials, or brochures
made available to the public relating to a discount plan, along with
any enrollment forms given to a prospective member:
(i) That the plan is a discount plan and is not insurance coverage;
(ii) If true, that the range of discounts for health care services
provided under the plan will vary depending on the type of health care
provider and health care service received;
(iii) That the discount plan organization does not make payments to
providers for the health care services received under the discount
plan, unless the discount plan organization has an active certificate
of authority or registration, as described in subsection (2)(g) of this
section;
(iv) That the plan member is obligated to pay for all health care
services, but will receive the stated discount from those health care
providers that have a current provider agreement with the discount plan
organization; and
(v) The toll-free telephone number and internet web site address
for the licensed discount plan organization for prospective members and
members to obtain additional information about and assistance with the
discount plan and up-to-date lists of health care providers
participating in the discount plan.
(b) If the initial contact with a prospective member is by
telephone, the disclosures required under (a) of this subsection must
be made orally and included in the initial written materials that
describe the benefits under the discount plan provided to the
prospective or new member.
(4)(a) In addition to the general disclosures required under
subsection (3) of this section, each discount plan organization shall
send to:
(i) Each prospective member, at their request, information that
describes the terms and conditions of the discount plan, including any
limitations or restrictions on the refund of any processing fees or
periodic charges associated with the discount plan. The written
materials presented must not be dependent upon the requestor first
making any form of payment or enrolling in the plan; and
(ii) Each new member, within fourteen calendar days of enrollment,
written documents that contain all terms and conditions of the discount
plan.
(b) The written documents required under (a)(ii) of this subsection
must be clear and include the following information:
(i) The name of the member;
(ii) The benefits to be provided under the discount plan;
(iii) Any processing fees and periodic charges associated with the
discount plan, including any limitations or restrictions on the refund
of any processing fees and periodic charges;
(iv) The mode of payment of any processing fees and periodic
charges, such as monthly or quarterly, and procedures for changing the
mode of payment;
(v) Any limitations, exclusions, or exceptions regarding the
receipt of discount plan benefits;
(vi) Any waiting periods for receiving discounts on hospital
services under the discount plan;
(vii) Procedures for obtaining discounts under the discount plan,
such as requiring members to contact the discount plan organization to
make an appointment with a health care provider on the member's behalf;
(viii) Cancellation procedures, including information on the
member's thirty-day cancellation rights and refund requirements and
procedures for obtaining refunds;
(ix) Renewal, termination, and cancellation terms and conditions;
(x) Procedures for adding new members to a family discount plan, if
applicable;
(xi) Procedures for filing complaints under the discount plan
organization's complaint system and information that, if the member
remains dissatisfied after completing the organization's complaint
system, the plan member may contact the office of the insurance
commissioner; and
(xii) The name, telephone number, internet web site address, and
mailing address of the licensed discount plan organization or other
entity where the member can make inquiries about the plan, or send
cancellation notices and file complaints.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Each discount plan organization shall
provide the commissioner at least thirty days' advance notice of any
change in the discount plan organization's name, address, principal
business address, mailing address, toll-free telephone number, or
internet web site address.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) If the information required in
subsection (2) of this section is not provided at the time of renewal
of a license under section 5 of this act, a discount plan organization
shall file an annual report with the commissioner in the form
prescribed by the commissioner no later than March 31st of the
following year.
(2) The annual report must be filed with the commissioner,
accompanied by the twenty dollar annual reporting fee to be deposited
into the general fund. The annual report must include:
(a) Audited financial statements prepared in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles certified by an independent
certified public accountant, including the organization's balance
sheet, income statement, and statement of changes in cash flow for the
preceding year. However, subject to the approval of the commissioner,
an organization that is an affiliate of a parent entity that is
publicly traded and that prepares audited financial statements
reflecting the consolidated operations of the parent entity may submit
the audited financial statement of the parent entity and a written
guaranty that the minimum capital requirements required under section
6 of this act will be met by the parent entity instead of the audited
financial statement of the organization;
(b) If different from the initial application for a license, or at
the time of renewal of a license, or the last annual report, as
appropriate, a list of the names and residence addresses of all persons
responsible for the conduct of the organization's affairs, together
with a disclosure of the extent and nature of any contracts or
arrangements with these persons and the discount plan organization,
including any possible conflicts of interest;
(c) The number of current members the discount plan organization
has in the state; and
(d) Any other information relating to the performance of the
discount plan organization that may be required by the commissioner.
(3) Any discount plan organization that fails to file an annual
report in the form and within the time required by this section is
subject to the following:
(a) Monetary penalties of:
(i) Up to five hundred dollars each day for the first ten days
during which the violation continues; and
(ii) Up to one thousand dollars each day after the first ten days
during which the violation continues; and
(b) Upon notice by the commissioner, loss, suspension, or
revocation of its license and authority to enroll new members or to do
business in this state while the violation continues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Each discount plan organization shall
designate and provide the commissioner with the name, address, and
telephone number of the organization's compliance officer responsible
for ensuring compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) In lieu of or in addition to suspending
or revoking a discount plan organization's license under section 5(8)
of this act, whenever the commissioner has cause to believe that any
person is violating or is about to violate any provision of this
chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter or any order of the
commissioner, the commissioner may:
(a) Issue a cease and desist order; and
(b) After hearing or with the consent of the discount plan
organization and in addition to or in lieu of the suspension,
revocation, or refusal to renew any license, impose a monetary penalty
of not less than one hundred dollars for each violation and not more
than ten thousand dollars for each violation.
(2) A person that willfully operates as or aids and abets another
operating as a discount plan organization in violation of section 5(1)
of this act commits insurance fraud and is subject to RCW 48.15.020 and
48.15.023, as if the unlicensed discount plan organization were an
unauthorized insurer, and the fees, dues, charges, or other
consideration collected from the members by the unlicensed discount
plan organization or marketer were insurance premiums.
(3) A person that collects fees for purported membership in a
discount plan but willfully fails to provide the promised benefits
commits a theft and upon conviction is subject to the provisions of
Title 9A RCW. In addition, upon conviction, the person shall pay
restitution to persons aggrieved by the violation of this chapter.
(4) Any person damaged by acts that violate this chapter may
maintain an action for the recovery of damages caused by that act or
acts.
(a) An action for violation of this section may be brought:
(i) In the county where the plaintiff resides;
(ii) In the county where the plaintiff conducts business; or
(iii) In the county where the discount plan was sold, marketed,
promoted, advertised, or otherwise distributed.
(b) The acceptance or use of any discount plan or discount plan
card does not operate as a waiver of any civil, criminal, or
administrative claim that may be asserted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 (1)(a) In addition to the penalties and
other enforcement provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may seek
both temporary and permanent injunctive relief when:
(i) A discount plan is being operated by a person or entity that is
not licensed under this chapter; or
(ii) Any person, entity, or discount plan organization has engaged
in any activity prohibited by this chapter or any rule adopted under
this chapter.
(b) The venue for any court proceeding brought under this section
is Thurston county.
(2) The commissioner's authority to seek injunctive relief is not
conditioned on having conducted any proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The commissioner may adopt rules to
implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Any person, organization, or entity that
has engaged in a discount plan business to which this chapter applies,
and has done so on or before the effective date of this section, has
six months following the effective date of this section to submit a
substantially complete application for a license as provided in section
5 of this act and to otherwise come into compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 20 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---