BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Early identification and treatment of problems such as language
delay, mental retardation, learning disabilities, and emotional and
behavioral problems can prevent these conditions from becoming costly
and intractable issues later.
(2) Research indicates that health care providers who use
standardized developmental screening and assessment tools can more
readily identify children at risk for developmental delay.
(3) Research indicates that reliance on clinical impressions or
developmental milestone reviews alone leads to significantly fewer
children receiving timely and appropriate intervention. Physician
surveillance during physical exams detected fewer than thirty percent
of developmental delays compared to over seventy percent of delays
detected by formal screening tests.
(4) Developmental screening identifies children with delays at a
more treatable time when they can be referred to early intervention
programs. Children involved with early intervention programs are more
likely to live independently, graduate from high school, and save
society significant long-term expenses.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.520 and 2007 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The term "medical assistance" may include the following care
and services: (a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital
services; (c) other laboratory and X-ray services; (d) nursing facility
services; (e) physicians' services, which shall include prescribed
medication and instruction on birth control devices; (f) medical care,
or any other type of remedial care as may be established by the
secretary; (g) home health care services; (h) private duty nursing
services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and occupational therapy
and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and prosthetic
devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases
of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select;
(l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice
services; (n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and
rehabilitative services; and (o) like services when furnished to a
child by a school district in a manner consistent with the requirements
of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, the department may
not cut off any prescription medications, oxygen supplies, respiratory
services, or other life-sustaining medical services or supplies.
"Medical assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law,
shall not include routine foot care, or dental services delivered by
any health care provider, that are not mandated by Title XIX of the
social security act unless there is a specific appropriation for these
services.
(2) The department shall amend the state plan for medical
assistance under Title XIX of the federal social security act to
include personal care services, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.170(f), in
the categorically needy program.
(3) The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such
administrative rules as are necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal
care services are provided to eligible persons in conformance with
federal regulations.
(a) These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility
indexed according to the requirements of the social security act
providing for medicaid eligibility.
(b) The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical
condition requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care
for clients requiring health-related consultation for assessment and
service planning may be reviewed by a nurse.
(c) The department shall determine by rule which clients have a
health-related assessment or service planning need requiring registered
nurse consultation or review. This definition may include clients that
meet indicators or protocols for review, consultation, or visit.
(4) The department shall design and implement a means to assess the
level of functional disability of persons eligible for personal care
services under this section. The personal care services benefit shall
be provided to the extent funding is available according to the
assessed level of functional disability. Any reductions in services
made necessary for funding reasons should be accomplished in a manner
that assures that priority for maintaining services is given to persons
with the greatest need as determined by the assessment of functional
disability.
(5) Effective July 1, 1989, the department shall offer hospice
services in accordance with available funds.
(6) For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and
disability services administration of the department, the department
shall contract with area agencies on aging:
(a) To provide case management services to individuals receiving
Title XIX personal care services in their own home; and
(b) To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or
other home and community services as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 in home
or in other settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this
section:
(i) Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive
Title XIX personal care services or other home and community services
as defined in RCW 74.39A.009; and
(ii) Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are
receiving such services in their own home.
(7) In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter
into or satisfactorily fulfill a contract or an individual consumer's
need for case management services will be met through an alternative
delivery system, the department is authorized to:
(a) Obtain the services through competitive bid; and
(b) Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can
be found.
(8) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, effective July 1, 2007, the department may offer
medicare part D prescription drug copayment coverage to full benefit
dual eligible beneficiaries.
(9) Effective July 1, 2011, the department shall select
developmental screening tools consistent with nationally accepted
pediatric guidelines and, within funds specifically appropriated for
this purpose, reimburse family physicians and pediatricians, in
addition to psychologists, using such tools to conduct developmental
screenings of children. The department shall also recommend a schedule
for administering these developmental screens consistent with
nationally accepted pediatric guidelines.

--- END ---