BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 57.08.005 and 2007 c 31 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district shall have the following powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands,
property and property rights, and all water and water rights, both
within and without the district, necessary for its purposes. The right
of eminent domain shall be exercised in the same manner and by the same
procedure as provided for cities and towns, insofar as consistent with
this title, except that all assessment or reassessment rolls to be
prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or commissioners
appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the district, and
the duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the
county treasurer;
(2) To lease real or personal property necessary for its purposes
for a term of years for which that leased property may reasonably be
needed;
(3) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
supply waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and
any other persons, both within and without the district, with an ample
supply of water for all uses and purposes public and private with full
authority to regulate and control the use, content, distribution, and
price thereof in such a manner as is not in conflict with general law
and may construct, acquire, or own buildings and other necessary
district facilities. Where a customer connected to the district's
system uses the water on an intermittent or transient basis, a district
may charge for providing water service to such a customer, regardless
of the amount of water, if any, used by the customer. District
waterworks may include facilities which result in combined water supply
and electric generation, if the electricity generated thereby is a
byproduct of the water supply system. That electricity may be used by
the district or sold to any entity authorized by law to use or
distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a byproduct when the
electrical generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of water
supply. For such purposes, a district may take, condemn and purchase,
acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake, river or
watercourse, or any underflowing water, and by means of aqueducts or
pipeline conduct the same throughout the district and any city or town
therein and carry it along and upon public highways, roads, and
streets, within and without such district. For the purpose of
constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines, dams, or waterworks or
other necessary structures in storing and retaining water or for any
other lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds and shores up to
the high water mark of any such lake, river, or other watercourse, and
may acquire by purchase or condemnation such property or property
rights or privileges as may be necessary to protect its water supply
from pollution. For the purposes of waterworks which include
facilities for the generation of electricity as a byproduct, nothing in
this section may be construed to authorize a district to condemn
electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire
such rights or facilities without the consent of the owner;
(4) To purchase and take water from any municipal corporation,
private person, or entity. A district contiguous to Canada may
contract with a Canadian corporation for the purchase of water and for
the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply of waterworks to
furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and residents of Canada
with an ample supply of water under the terms approved by the board of
commissioners;
(5) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of sewers for the purpose of furnishing the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of sewers for all uses and purposes, public and
private, including but not limited to on-site sewage disposal
facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems, on-site sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance
services for private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs that are directly related to the
sewerage facilities and programs operated by a district, other
facilities, programs, and systems for the collection, interception,
treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for the control of pollution
from wastewater with full authority to regulate the use and operation
thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this chapter, after
July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector,
trained owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a
program approved by the state board of health or by a local health
officer. Sewage facilities may include facilities which result in
combined sewage disposal or treatment and electric or methane gas
generation, except that the electricity or methane gas generated
thereby is a byproduct of the system of sewers. Such electricity or
methane gas may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity or methane gas.
Electricity and methane gas are deemed byproducts when the electrical
or methane gas generation is subordinate to the primary purpose of
sewage disposal or treatment. The district may also sell surplus
methane gas, which may be produced as a byproduct. For such purposes
a district may conduct sewage throughout the district and throughout
other political subdivisions within the district, and construct and lay
sewer pipe along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within
and without the district, and condemn and purchase or acquire land and
rights-of-way necessary for such sewer pipe. A district may erect
sewage treatment plants within or without the district, and may
acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties or privileges
necessary to be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and
also other areas of land from pollution from its sewers or its sewage
treatment plant. For the purposes of sewage facilities which include
facilities that result in combined sewage disposal or treatment and
electric generation where the electric generation is a byproduct,
nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or
facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or
to acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the owners;
(6) The authority to construct, condemn and purchase, add to,
maintain, and operate systems of reclaimed water as authorized by
chapter 90.46 RCW for the purpose of furnishing the district and the
inhabitants thereof with reclaimed water for all authorized uses and
purposes, public and private, including with full authority to regulate
the use and operation thereof and the service rates to be charged. In
compliance with other sections of this chapter, a district may also
provide reclaimed water services to persons outside the district;
(7)(a) To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and
operate systems of drainage for the benefit and use of the district,
the inhabitants thereof, and persons outside the district with an
adequate system of drainage, including but not limited to facilities
and systems for the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal
of storm or surface waters, and for the protection, preservation, and
rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, and drainage
facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full authority
to regulate the use and operation thereof and, except as provided in
(b) of this subsection, the service rates to be charged.
(b) The rate a district may charge under this section for storm or
surface water sewer systems or the portion of the rate allocable to the
storm or surface water sewer system of combined sanitary sewage and
storm or surface water sewer systems shall be reduced by a minimum of
ten percent for any new or remodeled commercial building that utilizes
a permissive rainwater harvesting system. Rainwater harvesting systems
shall be properly sized to utilize the available roof surface of the
building. The jurisdiction shall consider rate reductions in excess of
ten percent dependent upon the amount of rainwater harvested.
(c) Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage
facilities may include facilities which result in combined drainage
facilities and electric generation, except that the electricity
generated thereby is a byproduct of the drainage system. Such
electricity may be used by the district or sold to any entity
authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity is deemed a
byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such
purposes, a district may conduct storm or surface water throughout the
district and throughout other political subdivisions within the
district, construct and lay drainage pipe and culverts along and upon
public highways, roads, and streets, within and without the district,
and condemn and purchase or acquire land and rights-of-way necessary
for such drainage systems. A district may provide or erect facilities
and improvements for the treatment and disposal of storm or surface
water within or without the district, and may acquire, by purchase or
condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to be had to protect
any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of land from
pollution from storm or surface waters. For the purposes of drainage
facilities which include facilities that also generate electricity as
a byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a
district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution
rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute
electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the
consent of the owners;
(((7))) (8) To construct, condemn, acquire, and own buildings and
other necessary district facilities;
(((8))) (9) To compel all property owners within the district
located within an area served by the district's system of sewers to
connect their private drain and sewer systems with the district's
system under such penalty as the commissioners shall prescribe by
resolution. The district may for such purpose enter upon private
property and connect the private drains or sewers with the district
system and the cost thereof shall be charged against the property owner
and shall be a lien upon property served;
(((9))) (10) Where a district contains within its borders, abuts,
or is located adjacent to any lake, stream, groundwater as defined by
RCW 90.44.035, or other waterway within the state of Washington, to
provide for the reduction, minimization, or elimination of pollutants
from those waters in accordance with the district's comprehensive plan,
and to issue general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement
district bonds, or utility local improvement bonds for the purpose of
paying all or any part of the cost of reducing, minimizing, or
eliminating the pollutants from these waters;
(((10))) (11) Subject to subsection (((6))) (7) of this section, to
fix rates and charges for water, sewer, reclaimed water, and drain
service supplied and to charge property owners seeking to connect to
the district's systems, as a condition to granting the right to so
connect, in addition to the cost of the connection, such reasonable
connection charge as the board of commissioners shall determine to be
proper in order that those property owners shall bear their equitable
share of the cost of the system. For the purposes of calculating a
connection charge, the board of commissioners shall determine the pro
rata share of the cost of existing facilities and facilities planned
for construction within the next ten years and contained in an adopted
comprehensive plan and other costs borne by the district which are
directly attributable to the improvements required by property owners
seeking to connect to the system. The cost of existing facilities
shall not include those portions of the system which have been donated
or which have been paid for by grants. The connection charge may
include interest charges applied from the date of construction of the
system until the connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years,
whichever is shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of interest
applicable to the district at the time of construction or major
rehabilitation of the system, or at the time of installation of the
lines to which the property owner is seeking to connect. In lieu of
requiring the installation of permanent local facilities not planned
for construction by the district, a district may permit connection to
the water and/or sewer systems through temporary facilities installed
at the property owner's expense, provided the property owner pays a
connection charge consistent with the provisions of this chapter and
agrees, in the future, to connect to permanent facilities when they are
installed; or a district may permit connection to the water and/or
sewer systems through temporary facilities and collect from property
owners so connecting a proportionate share of the estimated cost of
future local facilities needed to serve the property, as determined by
the district. The amount collected, including interest at a rate
commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to the district at
the time of construction of the temporary facilities, shall be held for
contribution to the construction of the permanent local facilities by
other developers or the district. The amount collected shall be deemed
full satisfaction of the proportionate share of the actual cost of
construction of the permanent local facilities. If the permanent local
facilities are not constructed within fifteen years of the date of
payment, the amount collected, including any accrued interest, shall be
returned to the property owner, according to the records of the county
auditor on the date of return. If the amount collected is returned to
the property owner, and permanent local facilities capable of serving
the property are constructed thereafter, the property owner at the time
of construction of such permanent local facilities shall pay a
proportionate share of the cost of such permanent local facilities, in
addition to reasonable connection charges and other charges authorized
by this section. A district may permit payment of the cost of
connection and the reasonable connection charge to be paid with
interest in installments over a period not exceeding fifteen years.
The county treasurer may charge and collect a fee of three dollars for
each year for the treasurer's services. Those fees shall be a charge
to be included as part of each annual installment, and shall be
credited to the county current expense fund by the county treasurer.
Revenues from connection charges excluding permit fees are to be
considered payments in aid of construction as defined by department of
revenue rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
A water-sewer district shall not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using water-sewer district employees unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to the
water-sewer district's sewerage system, and the on-site system
represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity
and public property, including the state of Washington and state
property, shall be subject to rates and charges for sewer, water, storm
water control, drainage, and street lighting facilities to the same
extent private persons and private property are subject to those rates
and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting those rates and
charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream
improvements or donation of property;
(((11))) (12) To contract with individuals, associations and
corporations, the state of Washington, and the United States;
(((12))) (13) To employ such persons as are needed to carry out the
district's purposes and fix salaries and any bond requirements for
those employees;
(((13))) (14) To contract for the provision of engineering, legal,
and other professional services as in the board of commissioner's
discretion is necessary in carrying out their duties;
(((14))) (15) To sue and be sued;
(((15))) (16) To loan and borrow funds and to issue bonds and
instruments evidencing indebtedness under chapter 57.20 RCW and other
applicable laws;
(((16))) (17) To transfer funds, real or personal property,
property interests, or services subject to RCW 57.08.015;
(((17))) (18) To levy taxes in accordance with this chapter and
chapters 57.04 and 57.20 RCW;
(((18))) (19) To provide for making local improvements and to levy
and collect special assessments on property benefitted thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof in accordance with chapter
57.16 RCW;
(((19))) (20) To establish street lighting systems under RCW
57.08.060;
(((20))) (21) To exercise such other powers as are granted to
water-sewer districts by this title or other applicable laws; and
(((21))) (22) To exercise any of the powers granted to cities and
counties with respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance,
operation of, and fixing rates and charges for waterworks and systems
of sewerage and drainage.

Sec. 2 RCW 57.08.044 and 1999 c 153 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A district may enter into contracts with any county, city, town, or
any other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, or with any private
person or corporation, for the acquisition, ownership, use, and
operation of any property, facilities, or services, within or without
the district, and necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of
the district. A district may provide water, reclaimed water, sewer,
drainage, or street lighting services to property owners in areas
within or without the limits of the district, except that if the area
to be served is located within another existing district duly
authorized to exercise district powers in that area, then water,
reclaimed water, sewer, drainage, or street lighting service may not be
so provided by contract or otherwise without the consent by resolution
of the board of commissioners of that other district.

Sec. 3 RCW 57.08.047 and 1999 c 153 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provision of water, reclaimed water, sewer, or drainage service
beyond the boundaries of a special purpose district or city may be
subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter
36.93 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 57.16.010 and 1997 c 447 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before ordering any improvements or submitting to vote any
proposition for incurring any indebtedness, the district commissioners
shall adopt a general comprehensive plan for the type or types of
facilities the district proposes to provide. A district may prepare a
separate general comprehensive plan for each of these services and
other services that districts are permitted to provide, or the district
may combine any or all of its comprehensive plans into a single general
comprehensive plan.
(1) For a general comprehensive plan of a water supply system, the
commissioners shall investigate the several portions and sections of
the district for the purpose of determining the present and reasonably
foreseeable future needs thereof; shall examine and investigate,
determine, and select a water supply or water supplies for such
district suitable and adequate for present and reasonably foreseeable
future needs thereof; and shall consider and determine a general system
or plan for acquiring such water supply or water supplies, and the
lands, waters, and water rights and easements necessary therefor, and
for retaining and storing any such waters, and erecting dams,
reservoirs, aqueducts, and pipe lines to convey the same throughout
such district. There may be included as part of the system the
installation of fire hydrants at suitable places throughout the
district. The commissioners shall determine a general comprehensive
plan for distributing such water throughout such portion of the
district as may then reasonably be served by means of subsidiary
aqueducts and pipe lines, and a long-term plan for financing the
planned projects and the method of distributing the cost and expense
thereof, including the creation of local improvement districts or
utility local improvement districts, and shall determine whether the
whole or part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or
general obligation bonds.
(2) For a general comprehensive plan for a sewer system, the
commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and select a general comprehensive plan for a sewer system for
the district suitable and adequate for present and reasonably
foreseeable future needs thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall
provide for treatment plants and other methods and services, if any,
for the prevention, control, and reduction of water pollution and for
the treatment and disposal of sewage and industrial and other liquid
wastes now produced or which may reasonably be expected to be produced
within the district and shall, for such portions of the district as may
then reasonably be served, provide for the acquisition or construction
and installation of laterals, trunk sewers, intercepting sewers,
syphons, pumping stations or other sewage collection facilities, septic
tanks, septic tank systems or drainfields, and systems for the
transmission and treatment of wastewater. The general comprehensive
plan shall provide a long-term plan for financing the planned projects
and the method of distributing the cost and expense of the sewer system
and services, including the creation of local improvement districts or
utility local improvement districts; and provide whether the whole or
some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or
general obligation bonds.
(3) For a general comprehensive plan for a reclaimed water system,
the commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and select a general comprehensive plan for a reclaimed water
system for the district suitable and adequate for present and
reasonably foreseeable future needs thereof. The general comprehensive
plan must provide for treatment plants or the use of existing treatment
plants and other methods and services, if any, for reclaiming water and
must, for such portions of the district as may then reasonably be
served, provide for a general system or plan for acquiring the lands
and easements necessary therefor, including retaining and storing
reclaimed water, and for the acquisition or construction and
installation of mains, transmission mains, pumping stations, hydrants,
or other facilities and systems for the reclamation and transmission of
reclaimed water throughout such district for such uses, public and
private, as authorized by law. The general comprehensive plan must
provide a long- term plan for financing the planned projects and the
method of distributing the cost and expense of the reclaimed water
system and services, including the creation of local improvement
districts or utility local improvement districts; and provide whether
the whole or some part of the cost and expenses must be paid from
revenue or general obligation bonds.
(4) For a general comprehensive plan for a drainage system, the
commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and adopt a general comprehensive plan for a drainage system
for the district suitable and adequate for present and future needs
thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a system to
collect, treat, and dispose of storm water or surface waters, including
use of natural systems and the construction or provision of culverts,
storm water pipes, ponds, and other systems. The general comprehensive
plan shall provide for a long-term plan for financing the planned
projects and provide for a method of distributing the cost and expense
of the drainage system, including local improvement districts or
utility local improvement districts, and provide whether the whole or
some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or
general obligation bonds.
(((4))) (5) For a general comprehensive plan for street lighting,
the commissioners shall investigate all portions and sections of the
district and adopt a general comprehensive plan for street lighting for
the district suitable and adequate for present and future needs
thereof. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a system or
systems of street lighting, provide for a long-term plan for financing
the planned projects, and provide for a method of distributing the cost
and expense of the street lighting system, including local improvement
districts or utility local improvement districts, and provide whether
the whole or some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from
revenue or general obligation bonds.
(((5))) (6) The commissioners may employ such engineering and legal
service as in their discretion is necessary in carrying out their
duties.
(((6))) (7) Any general comprehensive plan or plans shall be
adopted by resolution and submitted to an engineer designated by the
legislative authority of the county in which fifty-one percent or more
of the area of the district is located, and to the director of health
of the county in which the district or any portion thereof is located,
and must be approved in writing by the engineer and director of health,
except that a comprehensive plan relating to street lighting shall not
be submitted to or approved by the director of health. The general
comprehensive plan shall be approved, conditionally approved, or
rejected by the director of health and by the designated engineer
within sixty days of their respective receipt of the plan. However,
this sixty-day time limitation may be extended by the director of
health or engineer for up to an additional sixty days if sufficient
time is not available to review adequately the general comprehensive
plans.
Before becoming effective, the general comprehensive plan shall
also be submitted to, and approved by resolution of, the legislative
authority of every county within whose boundaries all or a portion of
the district lies. The general comprehensive plan shall be approved,
conditionally approved, or rejected by each of the county legislative
authorities pursuant to the criteria in RCW 57.02.040 for approving the
formation, reorganization, annexation, consolidation, or merger of
districts. The resolution, ordinance, or motion of the legislative
body that rejects the comprehensive plan or a part thereof shall
specifically state in what particular the comprehensive plan or part
thereof rejected fails to meet these criteria. The general
comprehensive plan shall not provide for the extension or location of
facilities that are inconsistent with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.110. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a county from
rejecting a proposed plan because it is in conflict with the criteria
in RCW 57.02.040. Each general comprehensive plan shall be deemed
approved if the county legislative authority fails to reject or
conditionally approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's
submission to the county legislative authority or within thirty days of
a hearing on the plan when the hearing is held within ninety days of
submission to the county legislative authority. However, a county
legislative authority may extend this ninety-day time limitation by up
to an additional ninety days where a finding is made that ninety days
is insufficient to review adequately the general comprehensive plan.
In addition, the commissioners and the county legislative authority may
mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines in this section.
If the district includes portions or all of one or more cities or
towns, the general comprehensive plan shall be submitted also to, and
approved by resolution of, the legislative authorities of the cities
and towns before becoming effective. The general comprehensive plan
shall be deemed approved by the city or town legislative authority if
the city or town legislative authority fails to reject or conditionally
approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's submission to the
city or town or within thirty days of a hearing on the plan when the
hearing is held within ninety days of submission to the county
legislative authority. However, a city or town legislative authority
may extend this time limitation by up to an additional ninety days
where a finding is made that insufficient time exists to adequately
review the general comprehensive plan within these time limitations.
In addition, the commissioners and the city or town legislative
authority may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines in this
section.
Before becoming effective, the general comprehensive plan shall be
approved by any state agency whose approval may be required by
applicable law. Before becoming effective, any amendment to,
alteration of, or addition to, a general comprehensive plan shall also
be subject to such approval as if it were a new general comprehensive
plan. However, only if the amendment, alteration, or addition affects
a particular city or town, shall the amendment, alteration, or addition
be subject to approval by such particular city or town governing body.

--- END ---