BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) By the effective date of this act, the
health care authority, in coordination with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall convene a work group to
develop a strategy to reduce the cost of providing health benefits for
K-12 employees.
(2) The health care authority shall invite representatives from the
following organizations to participate in the work group:
(a) Representatives of school districts;
(b) Representatives of educational service districts;
(c) Representatives of labor organizations representing K-12
employees;
(d) Representatives of health carriers;
(e) Members of the house of representatives and the senate; and
(f) Representatives of other relevant entities as the health care
authority may deem appropriate.
(3) By December 15, 2009, the health care authority shall report
the findings of the work group to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature. The report must include recommendations
for changes to the processes for funding and procurement of health
benefits for K-12 employees. The options investigated by the work
group must include the centralized provision of health benefits for K-12 employees by the health care authority.
(4) By January 1, 2010, the health care authority shall submit to
the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature proposed
legislation to implement such findings of the work group as the
administrator of the health care authority may deem appropriate.

--- END ---