BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to assure the uninterrupted and dedicated service of
employees employed by employees of operators of certain commercial
nuclear plants, the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470,
41.56.480, and 41.56.490 shall apply to the operating and maintenance
employees of a joint operating agency as defined in RCW 43.52.250 who
are employed at a commercial nuclear power plant operating under a site
certificate issued under chapter 80.50 RCW, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) In making its determination, the arbitration panel shall take
into consideration the following factors:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) A comparison of the wages, benefits, hours of work, and working
conditions of the personnel involved in the proceeding with those of
like personnel in relevant Washington labor markets. For
classifications not found in Washington, the comparison shall be made
with similar personnel in the states of California and Arizona, taking
into account the relative differences in the cost of living;
(d) Economic indices, fiscal constraints, relative differences in
the cost of living, and similar factors determined by the arbitration
panel to be pertinent to the case;
(e) Other factors, not confined to the factors under (a) through
(d) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally taken into
consideration in the determination of wages, benefits, hours of work,
and working conditions.

--- END ---