BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A regional transportation corridor
authority may be established by the governing body described in section
2 of this act, within a county with a population greater than one
million five hundred thousand and any adjoining counties with a
population greater than five hundred thousand, to provide for a
comprehensive and integrated corridor-based multimodal regional
transportation system within a defined transportation corridor. The
first regional transportation corridor authority established after the
effective date of this act must serve the following transportation
corridor: State route number 520 and Interstate 90, between Interstate
5 and Interstate 405, but not including Interstate 5 and Interstate
405.
(2) The taxing district boundaries of the first authority
established after the effective date of this act must include the
entire area of the corridor described in subsection (1) of this section
and the entire area of any incorporated city within a five-mile radius
of that corridor. The taxing district boundaries of subsequent
authorities must include the entire area of the corridor defined by the
authority under section 2(2) of this act and the entire area of any
incorporated city within a five-mile radius of that corridor.
(3) A regional transportation corridor authority is a quasi-municipal corporation and independent taxing authority within the
meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution.
(4) A regional transportation corridor authority constitutes a body
corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may be conferred by
statute including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees,
staff, and services; to enter into contracts; to acquire, hold, and
dispose of real and personal property; and to sue and be sued. Public
works contract limits applicable to the county in which the authority
is located apply to the authority.
(5) A regional transportation corridor authority may exercise the
power of eminent domain to obtain property for its authorized purposes
in the same manner as authorized for the county in which the authority
is located.
(6) A regional transportation corridor authority may be dissolved
by a majority vote of the governing body when all obligations under any
general obligation bonds issued by the authority have been discharged
and any other contractual obligations of the authority have either been
discharged or assumed by another governmental entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The governing body of the first regional
transportation corridor authority established after the effective date
of this act consists of the following members:
(a) The mayor of the most populous incorporated city within the
most populous county described in section 1(1) of this act;
(b) One member chosen by all of the other incorporated cities
located within a five-mile radius of the corridor described in section
1(1) of this act on a proportional basis based on population;
(c) The county executive representing the county in which the
corridor is located;
(d) The executive director of the regional transportation planning
organization serving the corridor area; and
(e) The secretary of transportation.
(2) Subsequent regional transportation corridor authorities may be
established, with the establishment to include a definition of the
transportation corridor to be served by the authority. If established,
the authority will be governed by the following:
(a) The mayor of the most populous incorporated city within the
proposed corridor to be served by the authority;
(b) One member chosen by all of the other incorporated cities
located within a five-mile radius of the proposed corridor to be served
by the authority on a proportional basis based on population;
(c) The county executive representing the county in which the
corridor is located;
(d) The executive director of the regional transportation planning
organization serving the corridor area; and
(e) The secretary of transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A regional transportation corridor
authority shall:
(a) Prepare, adopt, and submit to regional voters a comprehensive
and integrated corridor-based multimodal corridor management and
investment plan that plans, prioritizes, manages, and finances
transportation improvements that will serve the corridor, and amend the
plan to meet changed conditions and requirements. The transportation
improvements included in the plan may include both highway and public
transportation projects and services. The plan must also identify
which funding sources, as authorized under this chapter, will be
levied, imposed, or otherwise authorized to carry out the
transportation improvements identified in the plan. In implementing
the plan, or exercising its authority under this section, the authority
may: Levy, impose, collect, and spend taxes, fees, and charges;
authorize and set tolls, including variable pricing, consistent with
state tolling policies; receive and spend state, federal, and private
funds; and lend and grant funds to public transportation agencies,
cities, counties, other local governments, and the department for the
purposes of planning, designing, constructing, operating, or
maintaining transportation improvements within the corridor, including
public transportation;
(b) In conjunction with the regional transportation planning
organization serving the area within the authority boundaries, the
department and all transit agencies serving the corridor: Conduct
comprehensive and integrated corridor-based multimodal transportation
planning and prioritization activities that will improve the mobility
of people and goods in the corridor; reduce transportation congestion;
improve security and safety; coordinate and integrate transportation
and land use planning, including multimodal transportation improvements
and strategies that comply with the transportation concurrency
requirements under RCW 36.70A.070(6) and 36.70A.108; improve modal
connectivity; and generally assist in providing an efficient regional
transportation system. The transportation planning and prioritization
activities must provide for, wherever feasible, transportation
demand/capacity management, pricing coordination, mass transit, and
coordinated transportation governance. Corridor planning should
include the full range of strategies available that most efficiently
move people and goods consistent with the region's land use goals
including, without limitation: Demand management tools, such as
congestion pricing, parking pricing, and trip reduction incentives;
high capacity transit expansion; increased local transit; investments
in regionally significant bicycle paths and pedestrian connections; and
expanded roadway capacity; and
(c) Prioritize all state transportation improvements within the
corridor and the order in which state transportation funds for
transportation improvements within the corridor are expended, and
receive state funds, and control the disbursement of those funds, for
transportation improvements within the corridor. The department, and
appropriate local and regional jurisdictions, shall negotiate with the
regional transportation corridor authority to assist the authority in
accomplishing the requirements of this subsection (1)(c).
(2) An initial corridor management and investment plan must be
placed on a general election ballot for voter approval. If a majority
of the voters within the authority boundaries voting on the plan vote
in favor of it, the authority may implement measures contained in the
plan. The ballot title must reference the plan. The authority may
submit subsequent plans for voter approval at general or special
elections that the authority determines as appropriate.
(3) Before a corridor management and investment plan may be
submitted to the voters, the authority shall develop project
performance measures and benchmarks designed to assure that project
delivery occurs in a timely and efficient manner and satisfies the
project criteria as outlined in the plan.
(4) Before adoption, approval, or amendment of a corridor
management and investment plan, the authority shall hold at least one
public hearing to allow citizens, public agencies, freight shippers,
providers of freight and public transportation services,
representatives of pedestrian walkway and bicycle facility users,
representatives for individuals with disabilities, and agencies for
safety/security operations a reasonable opportunity to be involved in
the transportation planning process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A regional transportation corridor authority
may, as part of a corridor management and investment plan, recommend
the imposition or authorization of some or all of the following revenue
sources, which a regional transportation corridor authority may levy,
impose, or authorize if contained in a plan approved by the voters
under section 3 of this act:
(1) A local motor vehicle excise tax under section 6 of this act;
and
(2) Vehicle tolls and demand management charges on transportation
improvements within the corridor, if the following conditions are met:
(a) The corridor management and investment plan must identify the
facilities that may be tolled;
(b) The tolls or charges must generate revenues for the corridor
system to optimize predictable traffic flow, reduce congestion in the
corridor, and support alternative transportation options within the
corridor;
(c) The tolls or charges must be consistent with tolling policies
adopted by the legislature or the state transportation commission;
(d) The revenues are used only to support the transportation
improvements identified in a corridor management and investment plan
adopted by an authority under section 3 of this act; and
(e) Unless otherwise specified by law or by contract between the
authority and the department, the department shall administer the
collection of vehicle rates, tolls, and charges on designated
facilities, which must, if required by the department, be compatible
with statewide standards and protocols for intermodal and interfacility
charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) To carry out the purposes of this
chapter, a regional transportation corridor authority may issue general
obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any other
outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to
one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property within
the authority. A regional transportation corridor authority may also
issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with
any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an
amount equal to five percent of the value of the taxable property
within the authority when authorized by the voters of the authority
pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution. For the
purposes of this subsection, "value of the taxable property" has the
same meaning as in RCW 39.36.015.
(2) General obligation bonds with a maturity in excess of forty
years must not be issued. The governing body of the regional
transportation corridor authority shall by resolution determine for
each general obligation bond issued the amount, date, terms,
conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or
rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration
privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions,
if any, covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and
interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration
may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of
recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are
issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the
requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be affected by the
surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or
the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may
be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding general obligation
bonds may be issued in the same manner as general obligation bonds are
issued.
(3) Whenever general obligation bonds are issued to fund specific
projects or enterprises that generate revenues, charges, user fees, or
special assessments, the regional transportation corridor authority may
specifically pledge all or a portion of the revenues, charges, user
fees, or special assessments to refund the general obligation bonds.
The regional transportation corridor authority may also pledge any
other revenues that may be available to the authority.
(4) In addition to general obligation bonds, a regional
transportation corridor authority may issue revenue bonds to be issued
and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A regional transportation corridor authority may, with voter
approval, impose a local surcharge of not more than eight-tenths of one
percent of the value on vehicles registered to a person residing within
the authority. A surcharge may not be imposed on vehicles subject to
fees under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six
thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
(2) An authority imposing a surcharge under this section shall
contract, before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance
imposing a surcharge, for the administration and collection of the
surcharge with the department of licensing, which shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent
of the taxes, for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department.
(3) The surcharge under this section must be administered in
accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 2006. The surcharge or a change
to the surcharge must take effect no sooner than seventy-five days
after the department of licensing receives notice of the surcharge or
change to the surcharge, and must take effect only on the first day of
January, April, July, or October. Unless waived by the department of
licensing, notice includes providing the department of licensing with
digital mapping and legal descriptions of areas in which the surcharge
will be collected.
(4) The proceeds of the surcharge under this section must be used
only to support the transportation improvements identified in a
corridor management and investment plan adopted by an authority under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The joint transportation committee shall
conduct a study of the feasibility, and stakeholder interest level, in
allowing other regions of the state to establish regional
transportation corridor authorities, including in Spokane and Clark
counties. The committee, in conducting the study, must consult with
appropriate local and regional stakeholders, including applicable
counties, cities, transit agencies, and regional transportation
planning organizations. The final report of the study, including
recommendations, must be submitted to the transportation committees of
the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the motor vehicle account to
the joint transportation committee for the purposes of section 7 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

--- END ---