BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The telemedicine program shall include health care professional
oversight and intervention as appropriate and must still meet the
criteria of medically necessary for a telemedicine visit. The services
delivered through telemedicine are subject to reimbursement policies
adopted by rule of the department after consultation with home health
care service providers. Home health care services delivered through
telemedicine are covered by and reimbursed under the state's medicaid
payment program.
(2)(a) The department shall establish the reimbursement rate for
home health care services delivered by a home health agency licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW through telemedicine that are otherwise
eligible for reimbursement under the medical assistance program.
(b) The reimbursement rate must be comparable to the rate currently
paid for a home health visit.
(c) Reimbursement is not provided for purchase or lease of
telemedicine equipment.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the scope
of practice of any home health care services provider or authorize the
delivery of home health care services in a setting or manner not
otherwise authorized by law.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "telemedicine" means the use
of telemonitoring to enhance the delivery of certain home health
medical services, through the electronic transfer of medical data, or
the provision of certain education related to health care services
using audio, video, or data communication in lieu of a face-to-face
visit.

--- END ---