BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that increasing rates
of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus are a threat to the
public health. The legislature further finds that methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus poses a particular threat to patients
in hospital intensive care units and undergoing certain surgeries.
Measurement of rates of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus in
patients in intensive care units can serve as a useful indicator of the
effectiveness of hospital infection control practices. The public
health may be improved by a uniform strategy of risk assessment and
screening for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus for all
patients in hospital intensive care units.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.056 and 2007 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Admission" means within seventy-two hours for all patients
expected to stay longer than seventy-two hours in an intensive care
unit.
(b) "Discharge" means patients who are discharged from the
intensive care unit after staying more than seventy-two hours.
(c) "Health care-associated infection" means a localized or
systemic condition that results from adverse reaction to the presence
of an infectious agent or its toxins and that was not present or
incubating at the time of admission to the hospital.
(((b))) (d) "Hospital" means a health care facility licensed under
chapter 70.41 RCW.
(e) "Intensive care unit" means adult and pediatric, but not
neonatal, intensive care units.
(f) "Screen" means using a nasal swab tested by standard culture or
advanced technologies to detect the presence or absence of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus.
(2)(a) A hospital shall collect data related to health
care-associated infections as required under this subsection (2) on the
following:
(i) Beginning July 1, 2008, central line-associated bloodstream
infection in the intensive care unit;
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2009, ventilator-associated pneumonia;
and
(iii) Beginning January 1, 2010, surgical site infection for the
following procedures:
(A) Deep sternal wound for cardiac surgery, including coronary
artery bypass graft;
(B) Total hip and knee replacement surgery; and
(C) Hysterectomy, abdominal and vaginal.
(b) Until required otherwise under (c) of this subsection, a
hospital must routinely collect and submit the data required to be
collected under (a) of this subsection to the national healthcare
safety network of the United States centers for disease control and
prevention in accordance with national healthcare safety network
definitions, methods, requirements, and procedures.
(c)(i) With respect to any of the health care-associated infection
measures for which reporting is required under (a) of this subsection,
the department must, by rule, require hospitals to collect and submit
the data to the centers for medicare and medicaid services according to
the definitions, methods, requirements, and procedures of the hospital
compare program, or its successor, instead of to the national
healthcare safety network, if the department determines that:
(A) The measure is available for reporting under the hospital
compare program, or its successor, under substantially the same
definition; and
(B) Reporting under this subsection (2)(c) will provide
substantially the same information to the public.
(ii) If the department determines that reporting of a measure must
be conducted under this subsection (2)(c), the department must adopt
rules to implement such reporting. The department's rules must require
reporting to the centers for medicare and medicaid services as soon as
practicable, but not more than one hundred twenty days, after the
centers for medicare and medicaid services allow hospitals to report
the respective measure to the hospital compare program, or its
successor. However, if the centers for medicare and medicaid services
allow infection rates to be reported using the centers for disease
control and prevention's national healthcare safety network, the
department's rules must require reporting that reduces the burden of
data reporting and minimizes changes that hospitals must make to
accommodate requirements for reporting.
(d) Data collection and submission required under this subsection
(2) must be overseen by a qualified individual with the appropriate
level of skill and knowledge to oversee data collection and submission.
(e)(i) A hospital must release to the department, or grant the
department access to, its hospital-specific information contained in
the reports submitted under this subsection (2), as requested by the
department.
(ii) The hospital reports obtained by the department under this
subsection (2), and any of the information contained in them, are not
subject to discovery by subpoena or admissible as evidence in a civil
proceeding, and are not subject to public disclosure as provided in RCW
42.56.360.
(3) A hospital methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus risk
assessment and surveillance program is established as follows:
(a) Hospitals shall conduct methicillin-resistant staphylococcus
aureus risk assessment and surveillance as recommended in the
compendium of strategies to prevent health care-associated infections
in intensive care units and report to the department as follows:
(i) For three months beginning April 1st of each year, screen all
patients for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus on admission
and discharge from each intensive care unit. However, if a hospital
operates more than two intensive care units it must complete its
screening for at least two intensive care units during the three months
beginning April 1st, and the hospital may elect to screen intensive
care unit patients in the additional units during three months
beginning July 1st of each year. Hospitals are not required to screen
patients known to have a medical history of methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus, but must include those patients as positive in
the admission rate for purposes of the report required by (a)(ii) of
this subsection.
(ii) At the conclusion of the screening period in (a)(i) of this
subsection hospitals shall report to the department: (A) The number of
patients screened on admission to an intensive care unit, (B) the
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus rate among patients
screened on admission to the intensive care unit, (C) the number of
patients screened on discharge from the intensive care unit, and (D)
the methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus rate among patients
screened on discharge from the intensive care unit.
(iii)(a) The difference in rates between admission and discharge
must be identified in the report as the hospital transmission rate.
(b) The combined methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus rate
among patients who have a previous medical history of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus and who test positive on admission to
an intensive care unit shall be identified in the report as the
community acquired rate.
(c) If the results of the methicillin-resistant staphylococcus
aureus intensive care unit surveillance described under (a) of this
subsection show a hospital transmission rate of two cases or five
percent of intensive care unit admissions, whichever is greater, the
hospital shall continue screening intensive care unit patients on
admission and on discharge and report to the department quarterly
information on the numbers of patients screened on admission to the
intensive care unit, the methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus
rate among patients screened on admission to the intensive care unit,
the number of patients screened on discharge from the intensive care
unit, and the methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus rate among
patients screened on discharge from the intensive care unit until the
hospital transmission rate is less than two cases or five percent of
intensive care unit admissions, whichever is greater for two
consecutive quarters.
(d) Hospitals not required to conduct ongoing intensive care unit
patient screening and reporting under (a) of this subsection may
voluntarily screen intensive care unit patients for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus on an ongoing basis and submit data to
the department.
(e) Hospitals shall ensure that any inpatient under the care of a
physician or other practitioner at the hospital who receives a positive
screening result for methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus is
informed of the result. Hospitals shall provide any patient who is
notified of a positive methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus
screening result with (i) education and counseling regarding the
recommended treatment for his or her condition, including possible
nontreatment and (ii) information about how the patient can prevent the
spread of methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus and safely
interact with family members and members of the public.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Provide oversight of the health care-associated infection
reporting program established in this section;
(b) By January 1, 2011, submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature based on the recommendations of the
advisory committee established in subsection (((5))) (6) of this
section for additional reporting requirements related to health care-associated infections, considering the methodologies and practices of
the United States centers for disease control and prevention, the
centers for medicare and medicaid services, the joint commission, the
national quality forum, the institute for healthcare improvement, and
other relevant organizations;
(c) Delete, by rule, the reporting of categories that the
department determines are no longer necessary to protect public health
and safety;
(d) By December 1, 2009, and by each December 1st thereafter,
prepare and publish a report on the department's web site that compares
the health care-associated infection rates at individual hospitals in
the state using the data reported in the previous calendar year
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The department may update
the reports quarterly. In developing a methodology for the report and
determining its contents, the department shall consider the
recommendations of the advisory committee established in subsection
(((5))) (6) of this section. The report is subject to the following:
(i) The report must disclose data in a format that does not release
health information about any individual patient; and
(ii) The report must not include data if the department determines
that a data set is too small or possesses other characteristics that
make it otherwise unrepresentative of a hospital's particular ability
to achieve a specific outcome; and
(e) Evaluate, on a regular basis, the quality and accuracy of
health care-associated infection reporting required under subsection
(2) of this section and the data collection, analysis, and reporting
methodologies.
(((4))) (5) The department may respond to requests for data and
other information from the data required to be reported under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, at the requestor's expense,
for special studies and analysis consistent with requirements for
confidentiality of patient records.
(((5))) (6)(a) The department shall establish an advisory committee
which may include members representing infection control professionals
and epidemiologists, licensed health care providers, nursing staff,
organizations that represent health care providers and facilities,
health maintenance organizations, health care payers and consumers, and
the department. The advisory committee shall make recommendations to
assist the department in carrying out its responsibilities under this
section, including making recommendations on allowing a hospital to
review and verify data to be released in the report and on excluding
from the report selected data from certified critical access hospitals.
(b) In developing its recommendations, the advisory committee shall
consider methodologies and practices related to health care-associated
infections of the United States centers for disease control and
prevention, the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the joint
commission, the national quality forum, the institute for healthcare
improvement, and other relevant organizations.
(((6))) (7) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to carry
out its responsibilities under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.58 RCW
to read as follows:
In completing a certificate of death in compliance with this
chapter, a physician, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse
practitioner must note the presence of methicillin-resistant
staphylococcus aureus, if it is a cause or contributing factor in the
patient's death.

--- END ---