BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that there is
a critical shortage of primary care physicians in the state especially
in rural areas. Primary care physicians operate as the entry point
into the health care system and as such play a vital role in improving
quality and controlling the costs of health care. It is the
legislature's intent to create incentives for medical school students
to choose primary care practice for their medical careers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Conditional tuition waiver" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a primary care
physician in this state.
(2) "Eligible student" means a resident student, as defined in RCW
28B.15.012, who is registered for at least six credit hours or the
equivalent, is making satisfactory academic progress as defined by the
university, has declared primary care medicine for his or her major,
and has a declared intention to practice primary care medicine in the
state of Washington.
(3) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to practice
primary care medicine in the state of Washington in lieu of monetary
repayment.
(4) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional tuition waiver under this chapter.
(5) "Primary care," for the purposes of the conditional tuition
waiver program established in section 3 of this act, means a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW who is specifically trained for family
practice medicine and skilled in comprehensive first contact and
continuing care for persons with any undiagnosed sign, symptom, or
health concern not limited by problem origin, organ system, or
diagnosis. Primary care includes health promotion, disease prevention,
health maintenance, counseling, patient education, and diagnosis and
treatment of acute and chronic illness, in a variety of health care
settings. Primary care is performed and managed by a personal
physician often collaborating with other health professionals and using
consultation or referral as appropriate.
(6) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(7) "University" means the University of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM ESTABLISHED. The primary care
physician conditional tuition waiver program is established. The
program shall be administered by the university. In administering the
program, the university has the following powers and duties:
(1) To adopt necessary rules and guidelines;
(2) To publicize the program;
(3) To collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their obligations under this chapter; and
(4) To solicit and accept grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 SELECTION OF PARTICIPANTS--PROCESS. (1) The
university shall select participants based on the application process
conducted by the university.
(2) The university shall create a standard process for medical
school students to declare their intention to be primary care
physicians for the purposes of participating in the primary care
physician conditional tuition waiver program. Applicants accepted into
the program must provide the university with a signed contract
accepting the terms of the program.
(3) Students who comply with subsection (2) of this section may be
awarded conditional tuition waivers under this chapter, subject to
available funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 CONTINUED ELIGIBILITY. To remain an
eligible student and receive continuing disbursements under the
program, a participant must be considered by the university to be
making satisfactory academic progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 AWARD OF TUITION WAIVERS--AMOUNT--DURATION.
The amount of the conditional tuition waiver awarded an individual may
not exceed the amount of resident tuition and fees at the university
incurred by an eligible student and approved by the university.
Participants are eligible to receive conditional tuition waivers for a
maximum of four years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 REPAYMENT OBLIGATION--RULES. (1) A
participant in the conditional tuition waiver program incurs an
obligation to repay the tuition waiver, with interest, unless he or she
is employed as a primary care physician in Washington state for two
years for every one year of tuition received, under rules adopted by
the university.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined annually by the
university.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the university. The
payments of principal and interest shall accrue quarterly commencing
six months from the date the participant completes or discontinues the
course of study, including any internship or residency in primary care
medicine. Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by
the university.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant is employed
as a primary care physician in this state until the entire repayment
obligation is satisfied. Should the participant cease to be employed
as a primary care physician in this state before the participant's
repayment obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion
of the principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and
continue until the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation
is satisfied.
(5) The university is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The university is responsible to forgive all or parts of
such repayments under the criteria established in this section and
shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the university as administrator is entitled, that
are paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
used to cover the costs of granting the conditional tuition waivers,
maintaining necessary records, and making collections under subsection
(5) of this section. The university shall maintain accurate records of
these costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs
shall be used to grant conditional tuition waivers to eligible
students.
(7) The university shall adopt rules to define the terms of
repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2008 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 10 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 10 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; ((and))
(s) RCW 28B.70.050; and
(t) Section 4 of this act.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540;
(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and
(d) RCW 28B.15.621(3).
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The University of Washington shall provide medical school students
with information about the growth of patient and family-centered
primary care medical homes throughout the state as a desirable and
important strategy to improve quality of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20
RCW to read as follows:
The University of Washington - family medicine residency network
will make every reasonable effort to work with community physicians to
establish additional accredited new sites in underserved Washington to
train primary care professionals, including physicians in family
medicine, internal medicine, or pediatrics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each
added to chapter 28B.15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---