BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.46.010 and 2006 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agricultural industrial process water" means water that has
been used for the purpose of agricultural processing and has been
adequately and reliably treated, so that as a result of that treatment,
it is suitable for other agricultural water use.
(2) "Agricultural processing" means the processing of crops or milk
to produce a product primarily for wholesale or retail sale for human
or animal consumption, including but not limited to potato, fruit,
vegetable, and grain processing.
(3) "Agricultural water use" means the use of water for irrigation
and other uses related to the production of agricultural products.
These uses include, but are not limited to, construction, operation,
and maintenance of agricultural facilities and livestock operations at
farms, ranches, dairies, and nurseries. Examples of these uses
include, but are not limited to, dust control, temperature control, and
fire control.
(4) (("Beneficial use" means the use of reclaimed water, that has
been transported from the point of production to the point of use
without an intervening discharge to the waters of the state, for a
beneficial purpose.
(5))) "Constructed beneficial use wetlands" means those wetlands
intentionally constructed on nonwetland sites to produce or ((replace))
create natural wetland functions and values. ((Constructed beneficial
use wetlands are considered "waters of the state."
(6))) (5) "Constructed treatment wetlands" means ((those wetlands))
wetland-like impoundments intentionally constructed on nonwetland sites
and managed for the primary purpose of ((polishing)) further treatment
or retention of reclaimed water ((or aesthetics)) as distinct from
creating natural wetland functions and values. ((Constructed treatment
wetlands are considered part of the collection and treatment system and
are not considered "waters of the state."
(7))) (6) "Direct groundwater recharge" means the controlled
subsurface addition of water directly ((to the groundwater basin that
results in the replenishment of)) into groundwater for the purpose of
replenishing groundwater.
(((8))) (7) "Greywater or gray water" means ((wastewater having the
consistency and strength of residential)) domestic type ((wastewater.
Greywater includes wastewater)) flows from bathtubs, showers, bathroom
sinks, washing machines, dishwashers, and kitchen or utility sinks((,
showers, and laundry fixtures, but)). Gray water does not include flow
from a toilet or urinal ((waters)).
(((9) "Groundwater recharge)) (8) "State drinking water contaminant
criteria" means the contaminant criteria found in the drinking water
quality standards adopted by the state board of health pursuant to
chapter 43.20 RCW and the department of health pursuant to chapter
70.119A RCW.
(((10))) (9) "Industrial reuse water" means water that has been
used for the purpose of industrial processing and has been adequately
and reliably treated so that, as a result of that treatment, it is
suitable for other uses.
(((11))) (10) "Land application" means use of reclaimed water as
permitted under this chapter for the purpose of irrigation or watering
of landscape ((enhancement for residential, business, and governmental
purposes)) vegetation.
(((12))) (11) "Person" means any state, individual, public or
private corporation, political subdivision, governmental subdivision,
governmental agency, municipality, copartnership, association, firm,
trust estate, or any other legal entity whatever.
(((13))) (12) "Planned groundwater recharge project" means any
reclaimed water project designed for the purpose of recharging
groundwater((, via direct recharge or surface percolation)).
(((14))) (13) "Reclaimed water" means ((effluent)) water derived in
any part from ((sewage from a)) wastewater ((treatment system)) with a
domestic wastewater component that has been adequately and reliably
treated, so that ((as a result of that treatment, it is suitable for a
beneficial use or a controlled use that would not otherwise occur and
is no longer considered wastewater.
(15) "Reclamation criteria" means the criteria set forth in the
water reclamation and reuse interim standards and subsequent revisions
adopted by the department of ecology and the department of health)) it
can be used for beneficial purposes. Reclaimed water is not considered
a wastewater.
(14) "Wastewater" means water-carried wastes from residences,
buildings, industrial and commercial establishments, or other places,
together with such groundwater infiltration and inflow as may be
present.
(((16) "Sewage")) (15) "Domestic wastewater" means ((water-carried
human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial and commercial
establishments, or other places, together with such groundwater
infiltration, surface waters, or industrial wastewater as may be
present)) wastewater from greywater, toilet, or urinal sources.
(((17))) (16) "Streamflow or surface water augmentation" means the
((discharge)) intentional use of reclaimed water ((to)) for rivers and
streams of the state or other surface water bodies, ((but not
wetlands)) for the purpose of increasing volumes.
(((18))) (17) "Surface percolation" means the controlled
application of water to the ground surface or to unsaturated soil for
the purpose of replenishing groundwater.
(((19))) (18) "User" means any person who uses reclaimed water.
(((20) "Wastewater" means water and wastes discharged from homes,
businesses, and industry to the sewer system.
(21))) (19) "Wetland or wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted to life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and
similar areas. Wetlands regulated under this chapter shall be
delineated in accordance with the manual adopted by the department of
ecology pursuant to RCW 90.58.380.
(20) "Lead agency" means either the department of health or the
department of ecology that has been designated by rule as the agency
that will coordinate, review, issue, and enforce a reclaimed water
permit issued under this chapter.
(21) "Nonlead agency" means either the department of health or the
department of ecology, whichever is not the lead agency for purposes of
this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.46.015 and 2006 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the
department of health, adopt rules for reclaimed water use consistent
with this chapter. The rules must address all aspects of reclaimed
water use, including commercial and industrial uses, land applications,
direct groundwater recharge, wetland discharge, surface percolation,
constructed wetlands, and streamflow or surface water augmentation.
The department of health shall, in coordination with the department of
ecology, adopt rules for greywater reuse. The rules must also
designate whether the department of ecology or the department of health
will be the lead ((permitting or regulatory)) agency responsible for a
particular aspect of reclaimed water use. In developing the rules, the
departments of health and ecology shall amend or rescind any existing
rules on reclaimed water in conflict with the new rules.
(2) All rules required to be adopted pursuant to this section must
be completed no later than December 31, 2010, although the department
of ecology is encouraged to adopt the final rules as soon as possible.
(3) The department of ecology must consult with the advisory
committee created under RCW 90.46.050 in all aspects of rule
development required under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.46.040 and 2006 c 279 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a))) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with
the department of health, adopt a single set of standards, procedures,
and guidelines, on or before August 1, 1993, for land applications of
reclaimed water.
(((b))) (2) Standards adopted under this section are superseded by
any rules adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to RCW
90.46.015 as they relate to the land application of reclaimed water.
(((2) A permit is required for any land application of reclaimed
water. The department of ecology may issue a reclaimed water permit
under chapter 90.48 RCW to the generator of reclaimed water who may
then distribute the water, subject to provisions in the permit
governing the location, rate, water quality, and purpose of use. The
department of ecology shall not issue more than one permit for any
individual land application of reclaimed water to a single generator.
(3) In cases where the department of ecology determines, in land
applications of reclaimed water, that a significant risk to the public
health exists, the department shall refer the application to the
department of health for review and consultation and the department of
health may require fees appropriate for review and consultation from
the applicant pursuant to RCW 43.70.250.
(4) A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be
issued only to:
(a) A municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity;
(b) A private utility as defined under RCW 36.94.010; or
(c) The holder of a waste discharge permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW.
(5) The authority and duties created in this section are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law. Nothing
in this section limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.
(6) Before deciding whether to issue a permit under this section to
a private utility, the department of ecology may require information
that is reasonable and necessary to determine whether the private
utility has the financial and other resources to ensure the
reliability, continuity, and supervision of the reclaimed water
facility.))

Sec. 4 RCW 90.46.080 and 2006 c 279 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reclaimed water
may be beneficially used for surface percolation provided the reclaimed
water meets the ((groundwater recharge)) state drinking water
contaminant criteria as measured in groundwater beneath or down
gradient of the recharge project site, and has been incorporated into
a sewer or water comprehensive plan, as applicable, adopted by the
applicable local government and approved by the department of health or
department of ecology as applicable.
(2) If the state ((groundwater recharge)) drinking water
contaminant criteria ((as defined by RCW 90.46.010)) do not contain a
standard for a constituent or contaminant, the department of ecology
shall establish a discharge limit consistent with the goals of this
chapter, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, reclaimed water
that does not meet the ((groundwater recharge)) state drinking water
contaminant criteria may be beneficially used for surface percolation
where the department of ecology, in consultation with the department of
health, has specifically authorized such use at such lower standard.
(4) The provisions of this section are superseded by any rules
adopted by the department of ecology pursuant to RCW 90.46.015 as they
relate to surface percolation.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.46.120 and 2007 c 445 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that is reclaiming
water with a permit issued under this chapter has the exclusive right
to any reclaimed water generated by the wastewater treatment facility.
Use, distribution, storage, and the recovery from ((aquifer)) storage
of reclaimed water ((by the owner of the wastewater treatment
facility)) permitted under this chapter is exempt from the permit
requirements of RCW 90.03.250 and 90.44.060, provided that a permit for
recovery of reclaimed water from aquifer storage ((and recovery)) shall
be reviewed under the standards established under RCW 90.03.370(2) for
aquifer storage and recovery projects. Revenues derived from the
reclaimed water facility shall be used only to offset the cost of
operation of the wastewater utility fund or other applicable source of
systemwide funding.
(2) If the proposed use ((or uses)) of reclaimed water ((are
intended)) is to augment or replace potable water supplies or to create
the potential for the development of an additional new potable water
((supplies, such use or uses shall be considered in the development of
any regional water supply plan or plans addressing potable water supply
service by multiple water purveyors. Such water supply plans include
plans developed by multiple jurisdictions under the relevant provisions
of chapters 43.20, 70.116, 90.44, and 90.82 RCW, and the water supply
provisions under the utility element of chapter 36.70A RCW. The method
by which such plans are approved shall remain unchanged. The owner of
a wastewater treatment facility that proposes to reclaim water shall be
included as a participant in the development of such regional water
supply plan or plans)) supply, then regional water supply plans, or any
other potable water supply plans prepared by multiple water purveyors,
must consider the proposed use of the reclaimed water as they are
developed or updated.
(a) Regional water supply plans include those adopted under state
board of health laws (chapter 43.20 RCW), the public water system
coordination act of 1977 (chapter 70.116 RCW), groundwater protection
laws (chapter 90.44 RCW), and the watershed planning act (chapter 90.82
RCW).
(b) The requirement to consider the use of reclaimed water does not
change the plan approval process established under these statutes.
(c) When regional water supply plans are being developed, the
owners of wastewater treatment facilities that produce or propose to
produce reclaimed water for use within the planning area must be
included in the planning process.
(3) ((Where opportunities for the use of reclaimed water exist
within the period of time addressed by a water system plan, a water
supply plan, or a coordinated water system plan developed)) When
reclaimed water is available or is proposed for use under a water
supply or wastewater plan developed under chapter((s)) 43.20, 70.116,
90.44, ((and)) 90.48, or 90.82 RCW((, and the water supply provisions
under the utility element of chapter 36.70A RCW,)) these plans must be
((developed and)) coordinated to ensure that opportunities for
reclaimed water are evaluated. The requirements of this subsection (3)
do not apply to water system plans developed under chapter 43.20 RCW
for utilities serving less than one thousand service connections.
(4) The provisions of any plan for reclaimed water, developed under
the authorities in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, should be
included by a city, town, or county in reviewing provisions for water
supplies in a proposed short plat, short subdivision, or subdivision
under chapter 58.17 RCW, where reclaimed water supplies may be proposed
for nonpotable purposes in the short plat, short subdivision, or
subdivision.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.48.465 and 2002 c 361 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish annual fees to collect expenses
for issuing and administering each class of permits under RCW
90.48.160, 90.48.162, and 90.48.260. An initial fee schedule shall be
established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once every two
years. This fee schedule shall apply to all permits, regardless of
date of issuance, and fees shall be assessed prospectively. All fees
charged shall be based on factors relating to the complexity of permit
issuance and compliance and may be based on pollutant loading and
toxicity and be designed to encourage recycling and the reduction of
the quantity of pollutants. Fees shall be established in amounts to
fully recover and not to exceed expenses incurred by the department in
processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and
evaluating compliance with permits, conducting inspections, securing
laboratory analysis of samples taken during inspections, reviewing
plans and documents directly related to operations of permittees,
overseeing performance of delegated pretreatment programs, and
supporting the overhead expenses that are directly related to these
activities.
(2) The annual fee paid by a municipality, as defined in 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1362, for all domestic wastewater facility permits issued under
RCW 90.48.162 and 90.48.260 shall not exceed the total of a maximum of
fifteen cents per month per residence or residential equivalent
contributing to the municipality's wastewater system.
(3) The department shall ensure that indirect dischargers do not
pay twice for the administrative expense of a permit. Accordingly,
administrative expenses for permits issued by a municipality under RCW
90.48.165 are not recoverable by the department.
(4) In establishing fees, the department shall consider the
economic impact of fees on small dischargers and the economic impact of
fees on public entities required to obtain permits for storm water
runoff and shall provide appropriate adjustments.
(5) The fee for an individual permit issued for a dairy farm as
defined under chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up
to one thousand two hundred fourteen dollars for fiscal year 1999. The
fee for a general permit issued for a dairy farm as defined under
chapter 90.64 RCW shall be fifty cents per animal unit up to eight
hundred fifty dollars for fiscal year 1999. Thereafter, these fees may
rise in accordance with the fiscal growth factor as provided in chapter
43.135 RCW.
(6) The fee for a general permit or an individual permit developed
solely as a result of the federal court of appeals decision in
Headwaters, Inc. v. Talent Irrigation District, 243 F.3rd 526 (9th Cir.
2001) is limited, until June 30, 2003, to a maximum of three hundred
dollars. Such a permit is required only, and as long as, the
interpretation of this court decision is not overturned or modified by
future court rulings, administrative rule making, or clarification of
scope by the United States environmental protection agency or
legislative action. In such a case the department shall take
appropriate action to rescind or modify these permits.
(7) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the
water quality permit account hereby created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be appropriated only for purposes of
administering permits under section 9 of this act, RCW 90.48.160,
90.48.162, and 90.48.260.
(8) The department shall present a biennial progress report on the
use of moneys from the account to the legislature. The report will be
due December 31st of odd-numbered years. The report shall consist of
information on fees collected, actual expenses incurred, and
anticipated expenses for the current and following fiscal years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 LEAD AGENCY DUTIES. (1) The department of
ecology and the department of health shall have authority to carry out
all the provisions of this chapter including, but not limited to,
permitting and enforcement. Only the department of ecology or the
department of health may act as a lead agency for purposes of this
chapter and will be established as such by rule. Enforcement of a
permit issued under this chapter shall be at the sole discretion of the
lead agency that issued the permit.
(2) All permit applications shall be referred to the nonlead agency
for review and consultation. The nonlead agency may choose to limit
the scope of its review.
(3) The authority and duties created in this chapter are in
addition to any authority and duties already provided in law. Nothing
in this chapter limits the powers of the state or any political
subdivision to exercise such authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 VIOLATIONS--INJUNCTIONS AND LEGAL
PROCEEDINGS AUTHORIZED. The lead agency, with the assistance of the
attorney general, is authorized to bring any appropriate action at law
or in equity, including action for injunctive relief, as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The lead agency
may bring the action in the superior court of the county in which the
violation occurred or in the superior court of Thurston county. The
court may award reasonable attorneys' fees for the cost of the attorney
general's office in representing the lead agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 OPERATING PERMIT REQUIRED. (1) Any person
proposing to generate any type of reclaimed water for a use regulated
under this chapter shall obtain a permit from the lead agency prior to
distribution or use of that water. The permittee may then distribute
and use the water, subject to the provisions in the permit. The permit
must include provisions that protect human health and the environment.
At a minimum, the permit must:
(a) Assure adequate and reliable treatment; and
(b) Govern the water quality, location, rate, and purpose of use.
(2) A permit under this chapter may be issued only to:
(a) A municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity;
(b) A private utility as defined in RCW 36.94.010;
(c) The holder of a waste disposal permit issued under chapter
90.48 RCW; or
(d) The owner of an agricultural processing facility that is
generating agricultural industrial process water for agricultural use,
or the owner of an industrial facility that is generating industrial
process water for reuse.
(3) Before deciding whether to issue a permit under this section to
a private utility, the lead agency may require information that is
reasonable and necessary to determine whether the private utility has
the financial and other resources to ensure the reliability,
continuity, and supervision of the reclaimed water facility.
(4) Permits shall be issued for a fixed term specified by the rules
adopted under RCW 90.46.015. A permittee shall apply for permit
renewal prior to the end of the term. The rules adopted under RCW
90.46.015 shall specify the process of renewal, modification, change of
ownership, suspension, and termination.
(5) The lead agency may deny an application for a permit or modify,
suspend, or revoke a permit for good cause, including but not limited
to, any case in which it finds that the permit was obtained by fraud or
misrepresentation, or there is or has been a failure, refusal, or
inability to comply with the requirements of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter.
(6) The lead agency shall provide for adequate public notice and
opportunity for review and comment on all initial permit applications
and renewal applications. Methods for providing notice may include
electronic mail, posting on the lead agency's internet site,
publication in a local newspaper, press releases, mailings, or other
means of notification the lead agency determines appropriate. The lead
agency shall also publicize notice of final permitting decisions.
(7) Any person aggrieved by a permitting decision has the right to
an adjudicative proceeding. An adjudicative proceeding conducted under
this subsection is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. For any permit
decision for which the department of ecology is the lead agency under
this chapter, any appeal shall be in accordance with chapter 43.21B
RCW. For any permit decision for which department of health is the
lead agency under this chapter, any application for an adjudicative
proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the
action, include a copy of the decision, be served on and received by
the department of health within twenty-eight days of receipt of notice
of the final decision, and be served in a manner that shows proof of
receipt.
(8) Permit requirements for the distribution and use of greywater
will be established in rules adopted by the department of health under
RCW 90.46.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 AUTHORITY TO ENTER PREMISES--SEARCH
WARRANTS. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this
subsection, the lead agency or its designee shall have the right to
enter and inspect any property related to the purpose of the permit,
public or private, at reasonable times with prior notification in order
to determine compliance with laws and rules administered by the lead
agency. During such inspections, the lead agency shall have free and
unimpeded access to all data, facilities, and property involved in the
generation, distribution, and use of reclaimed water.
(b) The lead agency or its designee need not give prior
notification to enter property under (a) of this subsection if the
purpose of the entry is to ensure compliance by the permittee with a
prior order of the lead agency or if the lead agency or its designee
has reasonable cause to believe there is a violation of the law that
poses a serious threat to public health and safety or the environment.
(2) The lead agency or its designee may apply for an administrative
search warrant to a court of competent jurisdiction and an
administrative search warrant may issue where:
(a) The lead agency has attempted an inspection under this chapter
and access has been actually or constructively denied; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this
chapter or rules adopted under this chapter is occurring or has
occurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 PLANS, REPORTS, AND PROPOSED METHODS OF
OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE TO BE SUBMITTED TO DEPARTMENTS. All required
feasibility studies, planning documents, engineering reports, and plans
and specifications for the construction of new reclaimed water,
agricultural industrial process water, and industrial reuse water
facilities, including generation, distribution, and use facilities, or
for improvements or extensions to existing facilities, and the proposed
method of future operation and maintenance of said facility or
facilities, shall be submitted to and be approved by the lead agency,
before construction thereof may begin. No approval shall be given
until the lead agency is satisfied that the plans, reports, and
specifications and the methods of operation and maintenance submitted
are adequate to protect the quality of the water for the intended use
as provided for in this chapter and are adequate to protect public
health and safety as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 NOTICE OF DETERMINATION THAT VIOLATION HAS
OR WILL OCCUR--REPORT OF COMPLIANCE WITH DETERMINATION--ORDER OR
DIRECTIVE TO BE ISSUED--NOTICE. (1) When, in the opinion of the lead
agency, a person violates or creates a substantial potential to violate
this chapter, the lead agency shall notify the person of its
determination by registered mail. The determination shall not
constitute an appealable order or directive. Within thirty days from
the receipt of notice of such determination, the person shall file with
the lead agency a full report stating what steps have been and are
being taken to comply with the determination of the lead agency. After
the full report is filed or after the thirty days have elapsed, the
lead agency may issue the order or directive as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, shall notify the person by registered mail,
and shall inform the person of the process for requesting an
adjudicative hearing.
(2) When it appears to the lead agency that water quality
conditions or other conditions exist which require immediate action to
protect human health and safety or the environment, the lead agency may
issue a written order to the person or persons responsible without
first issuing a notice of determination pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section. An order or directive issued pursuant to this subsection
shall be served by registered mail or personally upon any person to
whom it is directed, and shall inform the person or persons responsible
of the process for requesting an adjudicative hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 PENALTY. Any person found guilty of
willfully violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or any final
written orders or directive of the lead agency or a court in pursuance
thereof, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof
shall be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars and costs of
prosecution, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than
one year, or both, in the discretion of the court. Each day upon which
a willful violation of the provisions of this chapter occurs may be
deemed a separate and additional violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 VIOLATIONS--CIVIL PENALTY--PROCEDURE. (1)
Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080, 43.05.100,
43.05.110, and 43.05.150, any person who:
(a) Generates any reclaimed water for a use regulated under this
chapter and distributes or uses that water without a permit;
(b) Violates the terms or conditions of a permit issued under this
chapter; or
(c) Violates rules or orders adopted or issued pursuant to this
chapter,
shall incur, in addition to any other penalty as provided by law, a
penalty in an amount of up to ten thousand dollars per day for every
violation. Each violation shall be a separate and distinct offense,
and in case of a continuing violation, every day's continuance shall be
a separate and distinct violation. Every act of commission or omission
which procures, aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered a
violation under the provisions of this section and subject to the
penalty herein provided for. The penalty amount shall be set in
consideration of the previous history of the violator and the severity
of the violation's impact on public health, the environment, or both,
in addition to other relevant factors.
(2) A penalty imposed by a final administrative order is due upon
service of the final administrative order. A person who fails to pay
a penalty assessed by a final administrative order within thirty days
of service of the final administrative order shall pay, in addition to
the amount of the penalty, interest at the rate of one percent of the
unpaid balance of the assessed penalty for each month or part of a
month that the penalty remains unpaid, commencing within the month in
which the notice of penalty was served, and reasonable attorneys' fees
as are incurred if civil enforcement of the final administrative order
is required to collect penalty.
(3) A person who institutes proceedings for judicial review of a
final administrative order assessing a civil penalty under this chapter
shall place the full amount of the penalty in an interest bearing
account in the registry of the reviewing court. At the conclusion of
the proceeding the court shall, as appropriate, enter a judgment on
behalf of the lead agency and order that the judgment be satisfied to
the extent possible from moneys paid into the registry of the court or
shall enter a judgment in favor of the person appealing the penalty
assessment and order return of the moneys paid into the registry of the
court together with accrued interest to the person appealing. The
judgment may award reasonable attorneys' fees for the cost of the
attorney general's office in representing the lead agency.
(4) If no appeal is taken from a final administrative order
assessing a civil penalty under this chapter, the lead agency may file
a certified copy of the final administrative order with the clerk of
the superior court in which the person resides, or in Thurston county,
and the clerk shall enter judgment in the name of the lead agency and
in the amount of the penalty assessed in the final administrative
order.
(5) When the penalty herein provided for is imposed by the
department of ecology, it shall be imposed pursuant to the procedures
set forth in RCW 43.21B.300. All penalties imposed by the department
of ecology pursuant to RCW 43.21B.300 shall be deposited into the state
treasury and credited to the general fund.
(6) When the penalty is imposed by the department of health, it
shall be imposed pursuant to the procedures set forth in RCW 43.70.095.
All receipts from penalties shall be deposited into the health
reclaimed water account. The department of health shall use revenue
derived from penalties only to provide training and technical
assistance to reclaimed water system owners and operators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 APPLICATION OF ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE LAW
TO RULE MAKING AND ADJUDICATIVE PROCEEDINGS. The provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, apply to all rule making
and adjudicative proceedings authorized by or arising under the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, section 14 of this act,
90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, section 12 of this act, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.21B.300 and 2007 c 147 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, section 14 of this act,
90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 and chapter 90.76 RCW shall be
imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return
receipt requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the
penalty from the department or the local air authority, describing the
violation with reasonable particularity. Within thirty days after the
notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in
writing to the department or the authority for the remission or
mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the
department or authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever
terms the department or the authority in its discretion deems proper.
The department or the authority may ascertain the facts regarding all
such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it
may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a
demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of
information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the
appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or
authority thirty days after the date of receipt by the person penalized
of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after the date of
receipt of the notice of disposition of the application for relief from
penalty.
(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:
(a) Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;
(b) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on
application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or
(c) Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the
hearings board if the penalty is appealed.
(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney
general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to
recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior
court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in
which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and
rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.
(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury
and credited to the general fund except those penalties imposed
pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, which shall be credited to the reclamation
account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the
disposition of which shall be governed by that provision, RCW
70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account created by RCW 70.105.180, RCW 90.56.330, which
shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW
90.48.390, and RCW 90.76.080, which shall be credited to the
underground storage tank account created by RCW 90.76.100.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.21B.310 and 2004 c 204 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), any order issued by the
department or local air authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.211, 70.94.332,
70.105.095, 43.27A.190, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, section 12 of this act,
or 90.48.120(2) or any provision enacted after July 26, 1987, or any
permit, certificate, or license issued by the department may be
appealed to the pollution control hearings board if the appeal is filed
with the board and served on the department or authority within thirty
days after the date of receipt of the order. Except as provided under
chapter 70.105D RCW and RCW 90.03.210(2), this is the exclusive means
of appeal of such an order.
(2) The department or the authority in its discretion may stay the
effectiveness of an order during the pendency of such an appeal.
(3) At any time during the pendency of an appeal of such an order
to the board, the appellant may apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the
hearings board for a stay of the order or for the removal thereof.
(4) Any appeal must contain the following in accordance with the
rules of the hearings board:
(a) The appellant's name and address;
(b) The date and docket number of the order, permit, or license
appealed;
(c) A description of the substance of the order, permit, or license
that is the subject of the appeal;
(d) A clear, separate, and concise statement of every error alleged
to have been committed;
(e) A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the requester
relies to sustain his or her statements of error; and
(f) A statement setting forth the relief sought.
(5) Upon failure to comply with any final order of the department,
the attorney general, on request of the department, may bring an action
in the superior court of the county where the violation occurred or the
potential violation is about to occur to obtain such relief as
necessary, including injunctive relief, to insure compliance with the
order. The air authorities may bring similar actions to enforce their
orders.
(6) An appealable decision or order shall be identified as such and
shall contain a conspicuous notice to the recipient that it may be
appealed only by filing an appeal with the hearings board and serving
it on the department within thirty days of the date of receipt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 90.46.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 7 through 15 of this act are each
added to chapter 90.46 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 RCW 90.46.060 (Enforcement powers--Secretary of health) and 1992 c 204 s 7 are each repealed.

--- END ---