BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When a material error occurs in a local voters' pamphlet, the
election officer shall:
(a)(i) Send a notice of correction to a local publication that is
estimated to circulate to ninety percent of the active voters affected
by the material error; or
(ii) If there are no publications that meet the circulation
requirement, send a letter to the active voters affected by the
material error stating the correction; and
(b) Post a correction of the material error on the election
officer's web site if one is available.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Active voter" has the same meaning as in RCW 29A.08.615.
(b) "Active voters affected by the material error" means active
voters who are qualified to vote on the candidate or issue where the
material error occurred.
(c) "Material error" means anything that pertains to the nature or
character of a candidate's identity or anything that would
substantially change the meaning of a proposed measure.

--- END ---