BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are car
rental agreements entered into between car rental companies and their
customers that include fees in addition to the rental rate and taxes.
It is the intent of the legislature that such fees be clearly and
separately stated in such agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A rental car company may include separately stated surcharges,
fees, or charges in a rental agreement, which may include, but may not
be in any way limited to, vehicle license cost recovery fees, airport-related recovery fees, all applicable taxes, and government surcharges.
(2) If a rental car company includes a vehicle license cost
recovery fee as a separately stated charge in a rental transaction, the
amount of the fee must represent the rental car company's good faith
estimate of the rental car company's average daily charge as calculated
by the rental car company to recover its actual total annual rental car
titling, registration, plating, and inspection costs in the state of
Washington.
(3) If the total amount of the vehicle license cost recovery fees
collected by a rental car company under this section in any calendar
year exceeds the rental car company's actual costs in the state of
Washington to license, title, register, and plate rental cars and to
have such rental cars inspected for that calendar year, the rental car
company shall do both of the following:
(a) Retain the excess amount; and
(b) Adjust the estimated average per vehicle titling, licensing,
plating, inspecting, and registration charge for the following calendar
year by a corresponding amount.
(4) Nothing in this section prevents a rental car company from
making adjustments to the vehicle license cost recovery fee during the
calendar year.
(5) The following definition applies to this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise: "Vehicle license cost recovery
fee" means a charge that may be separately stated and charged on the
rental contract in a car rental transaction originating in Washington
state to recover costs incurred in the state of Washington by a rental
car company to license, title, register, plate, and inspect rental
cars.

--- END ---