BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.08.290 and 2005 c 450 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The city-county assistance account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from real estate excise tax disbursements
provided under RCW 82.45.060 ((shall)) must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
provided in this section.
(2) Funds deposited in the city-county assistance account ((shall))
must be distributed equally to the cities and counties.
(3)(a) Funds distributed to counties ((shall)) must, to the extent
possible, increase the sum of revenues ((received)) under RCW
82.14.030(1) and streamlined sales tax mitigation funds received by
each county to the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or:
(i) For a county with an unincorporated population of one hundred
thousand or less, seventy percent of the statewide weighted average per
capita level of sales and use tax revenues ((collected)) received under
RCW 82.14.030(1) ((for)) with respect to taxable activity in the
unincorporated areas of all counties imposing the sales and use tax
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year, for
certifications before October 1, 2009, or the previous fiscal year, for
certifications on and after October 1, 2009; and
(ii) For a county with an unincorporated population of more than
one hundred thousand, sixty-five percent of the statewide weighted
average per capita level of sales and use tax revenues ((collected))
received under RCW 82.14.030(1) ((for)) with respect to taxable
activity in the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing the sales
and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar
year, for certifications before October 1, 2009, or the previous fiscal
year, for certifications on and after October 1, 2009.
(b) For each county with an unincorporated population of fifteen
thousand or less, the county ((shall)) must receive the greater of the
amount in (a) of this subsection or the amount received in local
government assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws of
2004.
(c) For each county with an unincorporated population of more than
fifteen thousand and less than twenty-two thousand, the county
((shall)) must receive in calendar year 2006 and 2007 the greater of
the amount provided in (a) of this subsection or the amount received in
local government assistance provided by section 716, chapter 276, Laws
of 2004.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all counties
as otherwise determined under this subsection ((shall)) must be ratably
reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds ((shall))
must be divided ratably based upon unincorporated population among
those counties receiving funds under this subsection and imposing the
tax ((collected)) authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum
rate.
(4)(a) For each city with a population of five thousand or less
with a per capita assessed property value less than twice the statewide
average per capita assessed property value for all cities for the
calendar year previous to the certification under subsection (6) of
this section, the city ((shall)) must receive the greater of the
following three amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the sum of revenues
((collected)) under RCW 82.14.030(1) and streamlined sales tax
mitigation funds received by a city up to fifty-five percent of the
statewide weighted average per capita level of sales and use tax
revenues ((collected)) received under RCW 82.14.030(1) ((for)) with
respect to taxable activity in all cities imposing the sales and use
tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year,
for certifications before October 1, 2009, or the previous fiscal year,
for certifications on and after October 1, 2009.
(ii) The amount received in local government assistance provided
for fiscal year 2005 by section 721, chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp.
sess.
(iii) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(b) For each city with a population of more than five thousand with
a per capita assessed property value less than the statewide average
per capita assessed property value for all cities for the calendar year
previous to the certification under subsection (6) of this section, the
city ((shall)) must receive the greater of the following ((three)) two
amounts:
(i) An amount necessary to increase the sum of revenues
((collected)) under RCW 82.14.030(1) and streamlined sales tax
mitigation funds received by a city up to fifty percent of the
statewide weighted average per capita level of sales and use tax
revenues ((collected)) received under RCW 82.14.030(1) ((for)) with
respect to taxable activity in all cities imposing the sales and use
tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) in the previous calendar year,
for certifications before October 1, 2009, or the previous fiscal year,
for certifications on and after October 1, 2009.
(ii) ((For calendar year 2006 and 2007, the amount received in
local government assistance provided for fiscal year 2005 by section
721, chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.
(iii))) For a city with a per capita assessed property value less
than fifty-five percent of the statewide average per capita assessed
property value for all cities, an amount determined by subtracting the
city's per capita assessed property value from fifty-five percent of
the statewide average per capita assessed property value, dividing that
amount by one thousand, and multiplying the result by the city's
population.
(c) No city may receive an amount greater than one hundred thousand
dollars a year under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) To the extent that revenues are insufficient to fund the
distributions under this subsection, the distributions of all cities as
otherwise determined under this subsection ((shall)) must be ratably
reduced.
(e) To the extent that revenues exceed the amounts needed to fund
the distributions under this subsection, the excess funds ((shall))
must be divided ratably based upon population among those cities
receiving funds under this subsection and imposing the tax collected
under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.
(f) This subsection only applies to cities incorporated ((prior
to)) before August 1, 2005.
(5) The two hundred fifty thousand dollar amount in subsection (3)
of this section and the one hundred thousand dollar amount in
subsection (4) of this section ((shall)) must be increased each year
beginning in calendar year 2006 by inflation as defined in RCW
84.55.005, as determined by the department of revenue.
(6)(a) Distributions under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
((shall)) must be made quarterly beginning on October 1, 2005, based on
population as last determined by the office of financial management.
The department of revenue ((shall)) must certify the amounts to be
distributed under this section ((to)) by the state treasurer. The
certification ((shall)) must be made by October 1, 2005, for the
October 1, 2005, distribution and the January 1, 2006, distribution,
based on calendar year 2004 ((collections)) department of revenue
distributions of sales and use taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).
The certification ((shall)) must be made by March 1, 2006, for
distributions beginning April 1, 2006, ((and)) by March ((1st of every
year thereafter)) 1, 2007, for distributions beginning April 1, 2007,
and by March 1, 2008, for distributions beginning April 1, 2008. The
March 1st certification ((shall)) must be used for distributions
occurring on April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of the year of
certification and on January 1st of the year following certification.
(b) By March 1, 2009, the department of revenue must certify the
amounts to be distributed under this section on April 1, 2009, July 1,
2009, and October 1, 2009. The certification must be based on calendar
year 2008 department of revenue distributions of sales and use taxes
authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1), and the population as last
determined by the office of financial management.
(c) By October 1, 2009, the department of revenue must certify the
amounts to be distributed under this section on January 1, 2010, April
1, 2010, July 1, 2010, and October 1, 2010. The certification must be
based on department of revenue distributions in fiscal year 2009 of
sales and use taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1), streamlined
sales tax mitigation data for mitigation distributions authorized under
RCW 82.14.495 made December 2008 through September 2009, and population
as last determined by the office of financial management.
(d) By September 1, 2010, and September 1st of every year
thereafter, the department of revenue must make available a preliminary
certification of the amounts to be distributed under this section on
January 1st, April 1st, July 1st, and October 1st of the year
immediately following certification. By October 1, 2010, and October
1st of every year thereafter, the department must finalize the
certification. Once finalized, no changes may be made to the
certification for any reason. Certifications must be based on
distributions of sales and use taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1)
made by the department of revenue in the fiscal year that ended during
the calendar year of certification, streamlined sales tax mitigation
data for mitigation distributions authorized under RCW 82.14.495 made
in the fiscal year that ended during the calendar year of
certification, and population as last determined by the office of
financial management.
(7) All distributions to local governments from the city-county
assistance account constitute increases in state distributions of
revenue to political subdivisions for purposes of state reimbursement
for the costs of new programs and increases in service levels under RCW
43.135.060, including any claims or litigation pending against the
state on or after January 1, 2005.
(8) As used in this section, "streamlined sales tax mitigation
funds" means an amount determined by the department of revenue equal to
the actual mitigation distribution amount under RCW 82.14.495 received
by a jurisdiction in four consecutive calendar quarters, less the
mitigation distribution amount that would have been received by the
jurisdiction during the same four calendar quarters had mitigation been
calculated without the local sales tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1). If the difference is a negative amount or if a
jurisdiction does not receive any mitigation distribution during the
applicable four calendar quarters, then "streamlined sales tax
mitigation funds" is zero.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively to March 1, 2009.

--- END ---