BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Every health plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents under this chapter that (1) provides coverage for cancer
chemotherapy treatment, (2) is not subject to Title 48 RCW, and (3) is
established or renewed beginning January 1, 2010, must cover orally
administered anticancer medication used to kill or slow the growth of
cancerous cells on a basis not less favorable than intravenously
administered or injected cancer medications, including copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Every disability insurance policy issued or renewed beginning
January 1, 2010, that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy
treatment must cover orally administered anticancer medication used to
kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less
favorable than intravenously administered or injected cancer
medications, including copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Every group disability insurance policy issued or renewed beginning
January 1, 2010, that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy
treatment must cover orally administered anticancer medication used to
kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less
favorable than intravenously administered or injected cancer
medications, including copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Every health plan issued or renewed by a member beginning January
1, 2010, that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must
cover orally administered anticancer medication used to kill or slow
the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less favorable than
intravenously administered or injected cancer medications, including
copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2010, every person or entity regulated under
RCW 48.42.010 that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment
must cover orally administered anticancer medication used to kill or
slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less favorable than
intravenously administered or injected cancer medications, including
copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Every health plan issued or renewed beginning January 1, 2010, that
provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must cover orally
administered anticancer medication used to kill or slow the growth of
cancerous cells on a basis not less favorable than intravenously
administered or injected cancer medications, including copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Every health care service contract issued or renewed beginning
January 1, 2010, that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy
treatment must cover orally administered anticancer medication used to
kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less
favorable than intravenously administered or injected cancer
medications, including copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW
to read as follows:
Every health maintenance agreement issued or renewed beginning
January 1, 2010, that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy
treatment must cover orally administered anticancer medication used to
kill or slow the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less
favorable than intravenously administered or injected cancer
medications, including copayments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
Every schedule of benefits established or renewed beginning January
1, 2010, that provides coverage for cancer chemotherapy treatment must
cover orally administered anticancer medication used to kill or slow
the growth of cancerous cells on a basis not less favorable than
intravenously administered or injected cancer medications, including
copayments.

--- END ---