BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.270 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.
(1) "School district employee benefit plan" means the overall plan
used by the district for distributing fringe benefit subsidies to
employees, including the method of determining employee coverage and
the amount of employer contributions, as well as the characteristics of
benefit providers and the specific benefits or coverage offered. It
shall not include coverage offered to district employees for which
there is no contribution from public funds.
(2) "Fringe benefit" does not include liability coverage, old-age
survivors' insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation,
retirement benefits under the Washington state retirement system, or
payment for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210.
(3) "Basic benefits" are determined through local bargaining and
are limited to medical, dental, vision, group term life, ((and)) group
long-term disability insurance coverage, health reimbursement
arrangements, and health savings accounts.
(4) "Benefit providers" include insurers, third party claims
administrators, direct providers of employee fringe benefits, health
maintenance organizations, health care service contractors, and the
Washington state health care authority or any plan offered by the
authority.
(5) "Group term life insurance coverage" means term life insurance
coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time employees in a
bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group employees.
(6) "Group long-term disability insurance coverage" means long-term
disability insurance coverage provided for, at a minimum, all full-time
employees in a bargaining unit or all full-time nonbargaining group
employees.
(7) "Health reimbursement arrangement" means a medical plan as
defined by internal revenue service revenue ruling 2002-41.
(8) "Health savings account" means a medical plan as defined by 26
U.S.C. Sec. 223.

--- END ---