BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Contaminated storm water runoff is a
major water pollution problem in the state. It impacts rivers,
aquifers, lakes, and streams across Washington. Addressing storm water
is one of the Puget Sound partnership's top strategic priorities for
Puget Sound recovery.
(2) The storm water problem is a function of both increased runoff
due to impervious surfaces and to the toxic substances that pollute the
runoff.
(3) Petroleum is the single largest contributor to storm water
pollution. Contamination from petroleum products in surface water
runoff accounts for ninety percent of the pollution load in Puget
Sound. Storm water carries between six million three hundred thousand
and eight million gallons of petroleum into Puget Sound every year.
(4) Petroleum and petroleum byproducts pollute storm water through
a multitude of diverse and diffuse pathways. Combustion of gasoline,
diesel, residual fuel oil, and other petroleum products emit pollutants
such as hydrocarbons, polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons, zinc, and
arsenic, which then disperse and depose on the ground. Petroleum-based
chemicals leach from substances such as paving asphalt and roofing
materials. Oil and grease drip from vehicles and equipment onto roads
and parking lots. When rainwater flows across impervious surfaces,
these contaminants are mobilized and transported to water bodies.
(5) The federal government and the state of Washington have
identified remediation to storm water runoff through national pollutant
discharge elimination system phase I and II requirements for the state
and local jurisdictions. In addition, impacts from polluted storm
water may be mitigated through retrofit projects for existing
infrastructure.
(6) Current funding for addressing the direct effects of polluted
storm water is insufficient to meet existing needs. That funding is
raised largely by local governments and is disproportionately born by
fees levied on individual developers and property owners.
(7) It is the intent of the legislature to impose a burden offset
charge, a regulatory fee on entities that cause petroleum products to
be present in the state, in order to allocate and recover the
proportional costs of the public programs necessary to address the
negative impacts from this substance on the state's waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The water pollution account is created in the state treasury.
All fees collected under section 3 of this act must be deposited in the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for mitigating and
preventing pollution by petroleum products of surface water runoff.
(2) Forty percent of the moneys from the account must be allocated
through a competitive grant process to local governments to fund
capital projects that address petroleum contamination of storm water
through the implementation of the national pollutant discharge
elimination system programs permitted under this chapter. To be
eligible, local governments must provide fifty percent of project costs
from other nonstate fund sources.
(3) Forty percent of the moneys from the account must be allocated
through a competitive grant process open to local governments for
retrofit projects that address petroleum contamination of storm water.
The moneys must be prioritized for low-impact development retrofit
projects, but moneys may be awarded for other retrofit projects if the
site does not lend itself to low-impact development techniques. In
order to qualify for funding, project proponents must demonstrate the
following:
(a) Clear and substantial ecological or water quality benefits; and
(b) The project is an identified priority based on an analysis of
needs throughout the jurisdiction, basin, or watershed.
(4) Twenty percent of the money from the account must be allocated
by the department to projects under subsection (2) or (3) of this
section and must be allocated to the highest priority projects based
upon ecological and water quality benefits determined by the
department. For projects qualifying under this subsection, moneys may
be allocated to meet the matching requirements under subsection (2) of
this section to jurisdictions that demonstrate economic hardship in
meeting the matching requirement.
(5) The department shall develop criteria for administering the
program and ranking projects for funding. In developing these
criteria, the department shall consult with the Puget Sound
partnership. The department shall endeavor to distribute the moneys
within each geographic region of the state in proportion to the
severity of impacts on the state's waters from petroleum contamination.
(6) Administration of the grant program must be paid for out of the
water pollution account and no more than one percent of the moneys from
the account may be used to administer the grant program.
(7) The department shall initiate the grant application process by
December 30, 2009.
(8) By December 1, 2014, the department shall report to the
legislature on the progress of the program and the adequacy of the
percentage allocations specified in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of
this section.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Low impact development" means storm water source reduction
techniques applied at the parcel and subdivision level that emphasizes
conservation and use of on-site natural features integrated with
engineered, small-scale hydrologic controls to more closely mimic
predevelopment hydrologic functions.
(b) "Retrofit" means the redesign and construction of storm water
management systems for existing development at the parcel or
subdivision level.
(c) "Capital project" means the capital project, including the
construction and associated costs, described in capital budget
instructions issued by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective July 1, 2009, a fee is imposed on the first
possession of petroleum products that contribute to storm water
pollution for the purpose of offsetting the harm caused by petroleum
pollution of storm water in this state. The fee is one dollar and
fifty cents per barrel of petroleum product that contributes to storm
water pollution.
(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the
water pollution account created in section 2 of this act and applied
solely for the pollution prevention and mitigation purposes permitted
under that section.
(3) The fee must be collected by the department. The department
may enter into agreements with other state agencies to facilitate the
most efficient collection system.
(4) It is the intent of this section to impose a fee only once for
petroleum products that contribute to storm water pollution that are
possessed in this state. Accordingly, the fee is imposed on the first
possession of such products. The fee is not imposed on the possession
of small amounts of petroleum products that is first possessed by a
consumer or by a retailer for the purpose of sale to ultimate
consumers.
(5) Petroleum products exported from or sold for export from the
state are not subject to the fee imposed under this section.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Petroleum products that contribute to storm water pollution"
means asphalt and road oil, lubricants, motor gasoline, and residual
fuel oil, and any other petroleum substance that the department
determines contributes to storm water pollution in the state. The term
does not include crude oil, aviation gasoline, jet fuel, home heating
oil, or red dyed diesel used for agricultural purposes.
(b) "Possession" means the act of taking control of the petroleum
product located within this state, whether the person taking control
does so by bringing, receiving, creating, or extracting the petroleum
product in this state, and includes both actual and constructive
possession. "Actual possession" occurs when the person with control
obtains physical possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the
person with control does not obtain physical possession. "Control"
means the power to sell or use the petroleum product or to authorize
the sale or use by another.

--- END ---