BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
COMPETENCY EVALUATION AND RESTORATION
Sec. 101 RCW 10.77.060 and 2004 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever ((a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity, or)) there is reason to doubt ((his or her)) a defendant's
competency, the court on its own motion or on the motion of any party
shall ((either appoint or)) request the secretary to designate ((at
least two)) a qualified expert((s)) or professional person((s, one of
whom shall be approved by the prosecuting attorney, to examine and
report upon the mental condition)) to evaluate the competency of the
defendant. The signed order of the court shall serve as authority for
the ((experts)) evaluator to be given access to all records held by any
mental health, medical, educational, or correctional facility that
relate to the present or past mental, emotional, or physical condition
of the defendant. ((At least one of the experts or professional
persons appointed shall be a developmental disabilities professional if
the court is advised by any party that the defendant may be
developmentally disabled. Upon agreement of the parties, the court may
designate one expert or professional person to conduct the examination
and report on the mental condition of the defendant. For purposes of
the examination, the court may order the defendant committed to))
(b) If the defendant is being held in a jail or detention facility,
the court shall order the evaluation to take place in the jail or
detention facility. The order shall state that the defendant may be
transported to a state hospital or other ((suitably)) secure ((public
or private)) mental health facility ((for a period of time necessary to
complete the examination, but not to exceed fifteen days from the time
of admission to the facility. If the defendant is being held in jail
or other detention facility, upon agreement of the parties, the court
may direct that the examination be conducted at the jail or other
detention facility.
(b) When a defendant is ordered to be committed for inpatient
examination under this subsection (1), the court may delay granting
bail until the defendant has been evaluated for competency or sanity
and appears before the court. Following the evaluation, in determining
bail the court shall consider: (i) Recommendations of the expert or
professional persons regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or
diminished capacity; (ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of
one or more violent acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously
been acquitted by reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether
it is reasonably likely the defendant will fail to appear for a future
court hearing; and (v) whether the defendant is a threat to public
safety)) at the request of the evaluator, if the evaluator determines
that such action is necessary in order to complete an accurate
evaluation of the defendant. This request shall be provided in writing
to the jail or detention facility, court, and representatives of both
parties, and the reason for the request shall be documented in the
evaluation report. No further order of the court shall be necessary to
effectuate transportation of the defendant under this subsection.
(c) The prosecutor shall send a copy of the order for evaluation to
the secretary and a copy of the charging document, certification of
probable cause, police report, and a summary of the defendant's
criminal history. These documents shall be provided as soon as
possible, and no later than three business days after the order is
signed. The court or either party may provide additional information
to the secretary which it reasonably deems to be of assistance to the
evaluation, unless such action would infringe upon ethical duties.
(d) The report of an evaluation of a defendant who is being held in
custody at a jail or detention facility shall be completed within
twenty-one days from the time of receipt by the secretary of the
documents specified in (c) of this subsection, unless transportation of
the defendant to a hospital or secure mental health facility is
necessary under (b) of this subsection, in which case the secretary
shall authorize transportation of the defendant as soon as possible,
and within seven days of the request. A defendant transported under
(b) of this subsection may be admitted to a hospital or secure mental
health facility for only the length of time necessary to complete an
evaluation, and for no longer than fifteen days.
(e) If at any point the evaluator becomes aware that the defendant
may have a developmental disability, or if it appears that the
characteristics of developmental disability may be a significant factor
in the defendant's ability to participate in the criminal proceeding,
the evaluation shall be performed by or in consultation with a
developmental disabilities professional.
(f) For good cause, the court may extend the time period for
completion of an evaluation. Remedies for failure to meet time
limitations under this section are limited to those specified in
section 109(2) of this act.
(g) Upon agreement by the parties, the court may appoint a
qualified expert or professional person to evaluate the competency of
the defendant instead of requesting the secretary to designate an
evaluator. Only an evaluator designated by the secretary may request
that the defendant be transported to a state hospital for evaluation
under (b) of this subsection.
(2) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the ((examination)) evaluation authorized by subsection (1) of
this section, and that the defendant shall have access to all
information obtained by the ((court appointed experts or professional
persons)) evaluator. The defendant's expert or professional person
shall have the right to file his or her own report following the
guidelines of subsection (3) of this section. If the defendant is
indigent, the court shall upon the request of the defendant assist him
or her in obtaining an expert or professional person.
(3) The report of the ((examination)) evaluation shall include the
following:
(a) A description of the nature of the ((examination)) evaluation;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) ((If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or
is developmentally disabled,)) An opinion as to competency;
(d) ((If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely
on the defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030, an opinion as to
the defendant's sanity at the time of the act;
(e) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the capacity of
the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is an element of
the offense charged;
(f))) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a ((county)) designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05
RCW((, and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial
danger to other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless
kept under further control by the court or other persons or
institutions)).
(4) The secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and
necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 102 RCW 10.77.065 and 2008 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a)(i) ((The facility conducting the evaluation)) An evaluator
appointed under RCW 10.77.060 or an expert or professional person
appointed under section 106 of this act shall provide ((its)) a report
and recommendation to the court in which the criminal proceeding is
pending. A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to
the designated mental health professional, the prosecuting attorney,
the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local
correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is
no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(ii) of this
subsection. Upon request, the ((facility)) secretary shall also
provide copies of any source documents relevant to the evaluation to
the designated mental health professional. The report and
recommendation shall be provided not less than twenty-four hours
preceding the transfer of the defendant to the correctional facility in
the county in which the criminal proceeding is pending.
(ii) If there is no professional person at the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a
professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with
the regional support network, a professional person at the regional
support network to receive the report and recommendation.
(iii) When a defendant is transferred to ((the facility conducting
the)) a hospital or other secure facility for an evaluation, or upon
commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility must notify the evaluator or
the facility conducting the evaluation of the name of the professional
person, or person designated under (a)(ii) of this subsection to
receive the report and recommendation.
(b) If the ((facility concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the
person should be kept under further control, an evaluation shall be
conducted of such person)) report of an evaluation performed under RCW
10.77.060, 10.77.084(5), or section 106 of this act recommends that a
defendant in custody should be evaluated by a designated mental health
professional under chapter 71.05 RCW((.)), the court shall order an
evaluation be conducted ((by the appropriate designated mental health
professional: (i))) prior to the individual's release from confinement
((for such person who is convicted, if sentenced to confinement for
twenty-four months or less; (ii) for any person who is acquitted; or
(iii) for any person: (A) Whose charges are dismissed pursuant to RCW
10.77.086(4); or (B) whose nonfelony charges are dismissed)) following
any conviction, dismissal, or acquittal, unless the individual is
sentenced to confinement for more than twenty-four months.
(2) ((The)) A designated mental health professional conducting an
evaluation under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall ((provide
written notification)) notify the persons identified in subsection
(1)(a) of this section within twenty-four hours ((of the results of the
determination)) as to whether ((to commence proceedings)) detention was
initiated under chapter 71.05 RCW. ((The notification shall be
provided to the persons identified in subsection (1)(a) of this
section.))
(3) The ((prosecuting attorney)) petitioner in a proceeding
initiated under subsection (2) of this section shall provide a copy of
the results of ((any proceedings commenced by the designated mental
health professional under subsection (2) of this section to the
facility conducting the evaluation under this chapter)) the proceeding
to the secretary.
(4) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled,
obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this
chapter may ((also)) be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the
entry of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with
any order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

Sec. 103 RCW 10.77.084 and 2007 c 375 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If at any time during the pendency of an action and prior to
judgment the court finds, following a report ((as provided in)) under
RCW 10.77.060 or section 106 of this act, a defendant is incompetent,
the court shall order the proceedings against the defendant be stayed
except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The court shall
order the defendant to undergo a period of treatment for restoration of
competency within the time limits established by RCW 10.77.086 and
10.77.088 and the requirements of this section.
(b) ((A defendant found incompetent shall be evaluated at the
direction of the secretary and a determination made whether the
defendant is an individual with a developmental disability. Such
evaluation and determination shall be accomplished as soon as possible
following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the
secretary.
(i) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant shall have the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation shall
be sent to the program.
(A) The program shall be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(B) The program shall be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and shall be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(C) The program shall provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(ii) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(iii) The department may establish admission priorities in the
event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.
(c))) At the end of ((the mental health treatment and)) a
competency restoration period ordered under (a) of this subsection, or
at any time a professional person determines competency has been, or is
unlikely to be, restored, the defendant shall be returned to court for
a hearing. If, after notice and hearing, the court finds that
competency has been restored, the stay entered under (a) of this
subsection shall be lifted. ((If competency has not been restored, the
proceedings shall be dismissed.)) If the court ((concludes)) finds
that competency has not been restored, but that further treatment
within the time limit((s)) established by RCW 10.77.086 ((or
10.77.088)) is likely to restore competency, the court may order
((that)) the defendant to undergo an additional period of treatment for
purposes of competency restoration ((be continued. Such treatment may
not extend beyond the combination of time provided for in RCW 10.77.086
or 10.77.088)).
(((d))) (c) If at any time ((during the proceeding)) the court
finds, following notice and hearing, ((a)) that the defendant is not
competent and is either not likely to regain competency, or no current
or further period of competency restoration treatment is allowable
under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088, the ((proceedings shall be
dismissed)) court shall dismiss the charges without prejudice and ((the
defendant shall be evaluated for civil commitment proceedings)) enter
one of the following orders:
(i) If the charge was a felony, and was a serious offense as
defined by RCW 10.77.092, the court shall detain the defendant and
order the defendant to be transferred to a state hospital or other
suitably secure mental health facility for purpose of evaluation under
chapter 71.05 RCW.
(ii) If the charge was a nonfelony, and was a serious offense as
defined by RCW 10.77.092, and the defendant was in custody and not on
conditional release at the time of dismissal, the court may detain the
defendant and order the defendant to be transferred to an evaluation
and treatment facility for the purpose of evaluation under chapter
71.05 RCW. The defendant may be detained in jail for no longer than
three days, excluding holidays, prior to transfer or release, and
subsequently may be detained by the evaluation and treatment facility
for up to seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays, prior to the filing of a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The secretary may consent to receive the defendant at a state hospital
in lieu of transfer to an evaluation and treatment facility. The
defendant may be screened prior to transfer to determine whether civil
commitment criteria are met.
(iii) If the charge was not a serious offense as defined by RCW
10.77.092, or if the charge was a nonfelony and the defendant was on
conditional release at the time of dismissal, the court may order the
defendant to undergo an evaluation by a designated mental health
professional, and shall do so if required by RCW 10.77.065(1)(b). A
defendant who is in custody, or who refuses to cooperate with the
evaluation, may be detained in custody for up to twelve hours for this
evaluation.
(d) Notwithstanding any other limitations, a defendant who has
multiple criminal charges may undergo competency restoration treatment
for all charges for the longest time period allowable for any of the
charges.
(2) If the defendant is referred to the designated mental health
professional for consideration of ((initial)) detention ((proceedings))
under chapter 71.05 RCW ((pursuant to this chapter)), the designated
mental health professional shall provide ((prompt written))
notification of ((the results of the determination whether to commence
initial detention proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW and)) whether the
((person)) defendant was detained according to RCW 10.77.065(2). ((The
notification shall be provided to the court in which the criminal
action was pending, the prosecutor, the defense attorney in the
criminal action, and the facility that evaluated the defendant for
competency.))
(3) ((The fact)) A finding that the defendant is ((unfit to
proceed)) not competent does not preclude any pretrial proceedings
which do not require the personal participation of the defendant.
(4) A defendant receiving medication for either physical or mental
problems shall not be prohibited from standing trial, if the medication
either enables the defendant to understand the proceedings against him
or her and to assist in his or her own defense, or does not disable him
or her from so understanding and assisting in his or her own defense.
(5) At or before the conclusion of any ((commitment)) competency
restoration period provided for by ((this section)) RCW 10.77.086 or
10.77.088, the facility providing evaluation and treatment shall
provide to the court a written report ((of examination)) which meets
the requirements of RCW 10.77.060(3).

Sec. 104 RCW 10.77.086 and 2007 c 375 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) If ((the)) a defendant is charged with a felony and
determined to be incompetent((,)):
(1) Until ((he or she)) the defendant has regained the competency
necessary to understand the proceedings against him or her and assist
in his or her own defense, or has been determined to be unlikely to
regain competency ((pursuant to RCW 10.77.084(1)(c))), but in any event
for a period of no longer than ninety days, the court((:
(a))) shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary
who shall place such defendant in an appropriate facility ((of the
department)) for evaluation and treatment((; or
(b) May alternatively order the defendant to undergo evaluation and
treatment at some other facility as determined by the department, or
under the guidance and control of a professional person)).
(2) On or before expiration of the initial ((ninety-day)) period of
commitment under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary shall
provide the court and the parties with a report in accordance with RCW
10.77.060(3). The secretary shall return the defendant to court
((shall conduct)) for a hearing, at which ((it)) the court shall
determine by a preponderance of the evidence whether or not the
defendant is incompetent as provided by RCW 10.77.084(1)(b).
(3) If, following a hearing under subsection (2) of this section,
the court finds ((by a preponderance of the evidence)) that ((a)) the
defendant ((charged with a felony is)) remains incompetent, the court
((shall have the option of extending the)) may order ((of commitment or
alternative)) a second period of competency restoration treatment for
an additional ((ninety-day)) period((, but)) of up to ninety days.
(a) If a second period of competency restoration treatment would
cause the defendant to be held in custody for a longer period than the
defendant would have been likely to spend in custody if the defendant
were convicted and sentenced to the top of the defendant's standard
sentencing range, the court shall not order a second period of
competency restoration treatment unless it finds by a preponderance of
the evidence following a hearing that further competency restoration
treatment is in the public interest due to particular circumstances
related to the nature or impact of the alleged offense, or the criminal
or treatment history of the defendant.
(b) If treatment is extended, the court must at the time of
extension set a date for a prompt hearing to determine the defendant's
competency before the expiration of the second ninety-day period. The
defendant, the defendant's attorney, or the prosecutor has the right to
demand that the hearing be before a jury.
(c) No extension shall be ordered for a second ninety-day period,
nor for any subsequent period as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, if the defendant's incompetence has been determined by the
secretary to be solely the result of a developmental disability which
is such that competence is not reasonably likely to be regained during
an extension.
(4) ((For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the
expiration of the second ninety-day period or at the end of the first
ninety-day period, in the case of a defendant with a developmental
disability, if the jury or court finds that the defendant is
incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice, and
either civil commitment proceedings shall be instituted or the court
shall order the release of the defendant. The criminal charges shall
not be dismissed)) If the court or jury finds that the defendant
remains incompetent following a second period of competency restoration
treatment under subsection (3) of this section, the court may order a
third and final period of competency restoration treatment only if the
court or jury finds that: (a) The defendant (i) is a substantial
danger to other persons; or (ii) presents a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security; and
(b) there is a substantial probability that the defendant will regain
competency within a reasonable period of time. In the event that the
court or jury makes such a finding, the court may extend the period of
commitment for up to an additional six months. A third period of
competency restoration treatment shall not be ordered if the
allegations against the defendant do not include one or more charges
which are serious offenses as defined by RCW 10.77.092.

Sec. 105 RCW 10.77.088 and 2007 c 375 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1)(a))) If ((the)) a defendant is charged with a nonfelony
((crime which)) and determined to be incompetent:
(1) If at least one of the charges is a serious offense as
((identified in)) defined by RCW 10.77.092 ((and found by the court to
be not competent)), then the court shall order the secretary to place
the defendant:
(((i))) (a) At a secure mental health facility in the custody of
the department or an agency designated by the department for mental
health treatment and restoration of competency. The placement shall
not exceed fourteen days in addition to any unused time of the
evaluation under RCW 10.77.060(1)(d). The court shall compute this
total period and include its computation in the order. The fourteen-day period plus any unused time of the evaluation under RCW
10.77.060(1)(d) shall be considered to include only the time the
defendant is actually at the facility and shall be in addition to
reasonable time for transport to or from the facility; or
(((ii))) (b) On conditional release for up to ninety days for
mental health treatment and restoration of competency((; or
(iii) Any combination of this subsection.
(b)(i) If the proceedings are dismissed under RCW 10.77.084 and the
defendant was on conditional release at the time of dismissal, the
court shall order the designated mental health professional within that
county to evaluate the defendant pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW. The
evaluation may be conducted in any location chosen by the professional.
(ii) If the defendant was in custody and not on conditional release
at the time of dismissal, the defendant shall be detained and sent to
an evaluation and treatment facility for up to seventy-two hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, for evaluation for purposes
of filing a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. The seventy-two-hour
period shall commence upon the next nonholiday weekday following the
court order and shall run to the end of the last nonholiday weekday
within the seventy-two-hour period)).
(2) If the defendant is charged with a nonfelony ((crime)) that is
not a serious offense as defined in RCW 10.77.092((:
The court may stay or dismiss proceedings and detain the defendant
for sufficient time to allow the designated mental health professional
to evaluate the defendant and consider initial detention proceedings
under chapter 71.05 RCW. The court must give notice to all parties at
least twenty-four hours before the dismissal of any proceeding under
this subsection, and provide an opportunity for a hearing on whether to
dismiss the proceedings)), the court shall not order competency
restoration treatment, and shall instead enter an order under RCW
10.77.084(1)(c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to chapter 10.77
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity, or has advised the court or a party of his or her intention
to rely upon a defense of diminished capacity and endorsed an expert
witness who will testify in support of a diminished capacity defense,
the court, on motion of the prosecuting attorney, shall either appoint
or request the secretary to designate a qualified expert or
professional person to evaluate and report upon the mental condition of
the defendant. The signed order of the court shall serve as authority
for the evaluator to be given access to all records held by any mental
health, medical, educational, or correctional facility that relate to
the present or past mental, emotional, or physical condition of the
defendant.
(b) The court shall not order the secretary to perform an
evaluation under this section for reasons other than those specified in
(a) of this subsection.
(c) A defendant who is transported to a state hospital or other
suitably secure mental health facility for an evaluation under this
section may be admitted for only the length of time necessary to
complete the evaluation, and for no longer than fifteen days.
(d) The prosecutor shall send the order for evaluation to the
secretary along with a copy of the charging document, certification of
probable cause, police report, and a summary of the defendant's
criminal history. The court or either party may provide additional
information to the secretary which it reasonably deems to be of
assistance to the evaluation, unless such action would infringe upon
ethical duties.
(2) The report of the evaluation shall include the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the evaluation;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) An opinion as to competency;
(d) An opinion as to the defendant's sanity at the time of the act;
(e) An opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial danger
to other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of committing
criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under
further control by the court or other persons or institutions;
(f) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the capacity of
the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is an element of
the offense charged;
(g) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a designated mental health professional for civil commitment under
chapter 71.05 RCW prior to release from custody.
(3) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the evaluation authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
and that the defendant shall have access to all information obtained by
the evaluator. The defendant's expert or professional person has the
right to file his or her own report following the guidelines of
subsection (2) of this section. If the defendant is indigent, the
court shall upon the request of the defendant assist him or her in
obtaining an expert or professional person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 10.77
RCW to read as follows:
Statements made by a defendant during a competency evaluation,
competency hearing, or competency restoration treatment shall not be
admissible in the state's case in chief. After the state's case in
chief, those statements may be admissible according to the rules of
evidence if a mental defense such as insanity or diminished capacity is
asserted or to impeach testimony by the defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 10.77
RCW to read as follows:
Any defendant placed in the custody of the secretary for competency
restoration treatment shall be evaluated at the direction of the
secretary as soon as possible and a determination made whether the
defendant is an individual with a developmental disability.
(1) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant has the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation shall
be sent to the program.
(a) The program shall be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(b) The program shall be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and shall be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(c) The program shall provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(2) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(3) The department may establish admission priorities in the event
that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A new section is added to chapter 10.77
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a jail or detention center receives notice of a
request or order requiring transfer of a defendant to a state hospital
or other medical facility under RCW 10.77.060 or 10.77.084, the jail or
detention center shall provide all medical information in its
possession necessary for the admission of the defendant to the
secretary within three days. The secretary shall not be responsible
under subsection (2) of this section for unreasonable delays in
transmission of medical information.
(2) If the secretary fails to conduct or complete a competency
evaluation within the time limits prescribed by RCW 10.77.060(1)(d),
the court may conduct a show cause hearing upon the motion of any party
to determine why the evaluation was not conducted or completed within
the allotted time. An order to show cause shall be set forth in
writing and shall be served upon the secretary. If the court finds
that time limits were exceeded by the secretary without good cause, it
may set a fixed time for the completion of the evaluation and may order
the secretary to reimburse expenses to the jail for any excess days at
a rate of ninety dollars per day. The hearing may include review of a
corrective action plan entered under section 110(7) of this act.
Failure to conduct or complete a competency evaluation within time
limitations shall not be cause for dismissal of criminal charges.
(3) A jail is not civilly liable for delays by the secretary in
providing competency evaluation services under RCW 10.77.060, or for
the release of an individual from custody according to the requirements
of RCW 10.77.084.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 A new section is added to chapter 10.77
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall report annually to the legislature beginning
October 1, 2010, concerning the waiting period for competency
evaluations and competency restoration treatment during the past state
fiscal year.
The report shall include:
(1) The number of competency evaluation referrals received, grouped
by state hospital catchment;
(2) The average waiting period for competency evaluations,
presented on a monthly basis, and grouped by state hospital catchment.
The department shall separate competency evaluations which occur
entirely in a jail or detention center from other competency
evaluations. The waiting period measured shall be from the time the
secretary receives the order for evaluation and other documents
identified in RCW 10.77.060(1)(c) to the time of distribution of the
evaluation report;
(3) The average waiting period for competency evaluations,
presented on an annual basis, and itemized by county. The evaluations
shall be separated and measured as in subsection (2) of this section;
(4) The average waiting period for inpatient competency
restoration, presented on a monthly basis, and grouped by state
hospital catchment. The waiting period measured shall be from the time
the secretary receives the restoration referral to the time the
defendant is transported to the state hospital, but shall not include
any delay solely attributable to a failure by a jail or detention
center to provide information required by section 109(1) of this act;
(5) The number of competency restoration treatment referrals
received on an annual basis, grouped by state hospital catchment. This
information shall be separated into nonfelony referrals, first ninety-day felony referrals, second ninety-day felony referrals, and final one
hundred eighty-day felony referrals. The report shall include average
length of stay information and the percentage of successful outcomes at
each stage;
(6) The number of hearings held pursuant to section 109(2) of this
act during the reporting period, grouped by state hospital catchment;
and
(7) If the data indicates that the department has failed to comply
with the time limits prescribed by RCW 10.77.060(1)(d) and 10.77.220,
a description of a corrective action plan entered by the department to
bring the department into compliance with these sections.
The department may include any additional information or
subgroupings in the report that it determines to be appropriate.

PART II
TECHNICAL CHANGES
Sec. 201 RCW 10.77.163 and 2008 c 213 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before a person committed under this chapter is permitted
temporarily to leave a treatment facility for any period of time
without constant accompaniment by facility staff, the superintendent,
professional person in charge of a treatment facility, or his or her
professional designee shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney
of any county to which the person is released and the prosecuting
attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the
committed person were dismissed, of the decision conditionally to
release the person. The notice shall be provided at least forty-five
days before the anticipated release and shall describe the conditions
under which the release is to occur.
(2) In addition to the notice required by subsection (1) of this
section, the superintendent of each state institution designated for
the custody, care, and treatment of persons committed under this
chapter shall notify appropriate law enforcement agencies through the
state patrol communications network of the furloughs of persons
committed under RCW ((10.77.086)) 10.77.084(1)(c) or 10.77.110.
Notification shall be made at least thirty days before the furlough,
and shall include the name of the person, the place to which the person
has permission to go, and the dates and times during which the person
will be on furlough.
(3) Upon receiving notice that a person committed under this
chapter is being temporarily released under subsection (1) of this
section, the prosecuting attorney may seek a temporary restraining
order to prevent the release of the person on the grounds that the
person is dangerous to self or others.
(4) The notice requirements contained in this section shall not
apply to emergency medical furloughs.
(5) The existence of the notice requirements contained in this
section shall not require any extension of the release date in the
event the release plan changes after notification.
(6) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those
provided in RCW 10.77.205.

Sec. 202 RCW 71.05.280 and 2008 c 213 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive
treatment, a person may be confined for further treatment pursuant to
RCW 71.05.320 if:
(1) Such person after having been taken into custody for evaluation
and treatment has threatened, attempted, or inflicted: (a) Physical
harm upon the person of another or himself or herself, or substantial
damage upon the property of another, and (b) as a result of mental
disorder presents a likelihood of serious harm; or
(2) Such person was taken into custody as a result of conduct in
which he or she attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another or himself or herself, or substantial damage upon the property
of others, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder, a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(3) Such person has been determined to be incompetent and criminal
charges have been dismissed pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4)))
10.77.084(1)(c), and has committed acts constituting a felony, and as
a result of a mental disorder, presents a substantial likelihood of
repeating similar acts. In any proceeding pursuant to this subsection
it shall not be necessary to show intent, willfulness, or state of mind
as an element of the crime; or
(4) Such person is gravely disabled.

Sec. 203 RCW 71.05.290 and 2008 c 213 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) At any time during a person's fourteen day intensive treatment
period, the professional person in charge of a treatment facility or
his or her professional designee or the designated mental health
professional may petition the superior court for an order requiring
such person to undergo an additional period of treatment. Such
petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280.
(2) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need
for further confinement and shall be supported by affidavits signed by
two examining physicians, or by one examining physician and examining
mental health professional. The affidavits shall describe in detail
the behavior of the detained person which supports the petition and
shall explain what, if any, less restrictive treatments which are
alternatives to detention are available to such person, and shall state
the willingness of the affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent
judicial proceedings under this chapter.
(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to
RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c), then the professional person in
charge of the treatment facility or his or her professional designee or
the designated mental health professional may directly file a petition
for one hundred eighty day treatment under RCW 71.05.280(3). No
petition for initial detention or fourteen day detention is required
before such a petition may be filed.

Sec. 204 RCW 71.05.300 and 2008 c 213 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The petition for ninety day treatment shall be filed with the
clerk of the superior court at least three days before expiration of
the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment. At the time of filing
such petition, the clerk shall set a time for the person to come before
the court on the next judicial day after the day of filing unless such
appearance is waived by the person's attorney, and the clerk shall
notify the designated mental health professional. The designated
mental health professional shall immediately notify the person
detained, his or her attorney, if any, and his or her guardian or
conservator, if any, the prosecuting attorney, and the regional support
network administrator, and provide a copy of the petition to such
persons as soon as possible. The regional support network
administrator or designee may review the petition and may appear and
testify at the full hearing on the petition.
(2) At the time set for appearance the detained person shall be
brought before the court, unless such appearance has been waived and
the court shall advise him or her of his or her right to be represented
by an attorney and of his or her right to a jury trial. If the
detained person is not represented by an attorney, or is indigent or is
unwilling to retain an attorney, the court shall immediately appoint an
attorney to represent him or her. The court shall, if requested,
appoint a reasonably available licensed physician, psychologist, or
psychiatrist, designated by the detained person to examine and testify
on behalf of the detained person.
(3) The court may, if requested, also appoint a professional person
as defined in RCW 71.05.020 to seek less restrictive alternative
courses of treatment and to testify on behalf of the detained person.
In the case of a person with a developmental disability who has been
determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4)))
10.77.084(1)(c), then the appointed professional person under this
section shall be a developmental disabilities professional.
(4) The court shall also set a date for a full hearing on the
petition as provided in RCW 71.05.310.

Sec. 205 RCW 71.05.320 and 2008 c 213 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven and that the best interests of the person or
others will not be served by a less restrictive treatment which is an
alternative to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the
custody of the department or to a facility certified for ninety day
treatment by the department for a further period of intensive treatment
not to exceed ninety days from the date of judgment: PROVIDED, That
(a) If the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3) are the basis of
commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to but not exceed
one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment in a facility
certified for one hundred eighty day treatment by the department.
(b) If the committed person has a developmental disability and has
been determined incompetent pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4)))
10.77.084(1)(c), and the best interests of the person or others will
not be served by a less-restrictive treatment which is an alternative
to detention, the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the
department or to a facility certified for one hundred eighty-day
treatment by the department. When appropriate and subject to available
funds, treatment and training of such persons must be provided in a
program specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons
with developmental disabilities. A person so committed shall receive
habilitation services pursuant to an individualized service plan
specifically developed to treat the behavior which was the subject of
the criminal proceedings. The treatment program shall be administered
by developmental disabilities professionals and others trained
specifically in the needs of persons with developmental disabilities.
The department may limit admissions to this specialized program in
order to ensure that expenditures for services do not exceed amounts
appropriated by the legislature and allocated by the department for
such services. The department may establish admission priorities in
the event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by
the department. An order for treatment less restrictive than
involuntary detention may include conditions, and if such conditions
are not adhered to, the designated mental health professional or
developmental disabilities professional may order the person
apprehended under the terms and conditions of RCW 71.05.340.
(2) If the court or jury finds that grounds set forth in RCW
71.05.280 have been proven, but finds that treatment less restrictive
than detention will be in the best interest of the person or others,
then the court shall remand him or her to the custody of the department
or to a facility certified for ninety day treatment by the department
or to a less restrictive alternative for a further period of less
restrictive treatment not to exceed ninety days from the date of
judgment: PROVIDED, That if the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280(3)
are the basis of commitment, then the period of treatment may be up to
but not exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of judgment.
(3) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the
expiration of the period of commitment imposed under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section unless the superintendent or professional person in
charge of the facility in which he or she is confined, or in the event
of a less restrictive alternative, the designated mental health
professional or developmental disabilities professional, files a new
petition for involuntary treatment on the grounds that the committed
person;
(a) During the current period of court ordered treatment: (i) Has
threatened, attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of
another, or substantial damage upon the property of another, and (ii)
as a result of mental disorder or developmental disability presents a
likelihood of serious harm; or
(b) Was taken into custody as a result of conduct in which he or
she attempted or inflicted serious physical harm upon the person of
another, and continues to present, as a result of mental disorder or
developmental disability a likelihood of serious harm; or
(c) Is in custody pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) and as a result of
mental disorder or developmental disability presents a substantial
likelihood of repeating similar acts considering the charged criminal
behavior, life history, progress in treatment, and the public safety;
or
(d) Continues to be gravely disabled.
If the conduct required to be proven in (b) and (c) of this
subsection was found by a judge or jury in a prior trial under this
chapter, it shall not be necessary to reprove that element. Such new
petition for involuntary treatment shall be filed and heard in the
superior court of the county of the facility which is filing the new
petition for involuntary treatment unless good cause is shown for a
change of venue. The cost of the proceedings shall be borne by the
state.
The hearing shall be held as provided in RCW 71.05.310, and if the
court or jury finds that the grounds for additional confinement as set
forth in this subsection are present, the court may order the committed
person returned for an additional period of treatment not to exceed one
hundred eighty days from the date of judgment. At the end of the one
hundred eighty day period of commitment, the committed person shall be
released unless a petition for another one hundred eighty day period of
continued treatment is filed and heard in the same manner as provided
in this subsection. Successive one hundred eighty day commitments are
permissible on the same grounds and pursuant to the same procedures as
the original one hundred eighty day commitment.
(4) No person committed as provided in this section may be detained
unless a valid order of commitment is in effect. No order of
commitment can exceed one hundred eighty days in length.

Sec. 206 RCW 71.05.425 and 2008 c 213 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the
earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before
conditional release, final release, authorized leave under RCW
71.05.325(2), or transfer to a facility other than a state mental
hospital, the superintendent shall send written notice of conditional
release, release, authorized leave, or transfer of a person committed
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex,
violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4)))
10.77.084(1)(c) to the following:
(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside; and
(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside.
(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be
sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing
about a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c):
(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
that was dismissed pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c)
preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) or the
victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings; and
(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the
notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by
the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under
this chapter.
(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection
shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.
(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection
will not require any extension of the release date in the event the
release plan changes after notification.
(2) If a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c)
following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c) escapes, the
superintendent shall immediately notify, by the most reasonable and
expedient means available, the chief of police of the city and the
sheriff of the county in which the person resided immediately before
the person's arrest. If previously requested, the superintendent shall
also notify the witnesses and the victim of the sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4)))
10.77.084(1)(c) preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(3) or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide.
In addition, the secretary shall also notify appropriate parties
pursuant to RCW 71.05.390(18). If the person is recaptured, the
superintendent shall send notice to the persons designated in this
subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working
days after the department learns of such recapture.
(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.
(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this
chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and
children;
(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

Sec. 207 RCW 71.09.025 and 2008 c 213 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) When it appears that a person may meet the criteria of a
sexually violent predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020(16), the agency
with jurisdiction shall refer the person in writing to the prosecuting
attorney of the county where that person was charged, three months
prior to:
(i) The anticipated release from total confinement of a person who
has been convicted of a sexually violent offense;
(ii) The anticipated release from total confinement of a person
found to have committed a sexually violent offense as a juvenile;
(iii) Release of a person who has been charged with a sexually
violent offense and who has been determined to be incompetent to stand
trial pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c); or
(iv) Release of a person who has been found not guilty by reason of
insanity of a sexually violent offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.020(3).
(b) The agency shall provide the prosecutor with all relevant
information including but not limited to the following information:
(i) A complete copy of the institutional records compiled by the
department of corrections relating to the person, and any such out-of-state department of corrections' records, if available;
(ii) A complete copy, if applicable, of any file compiled by the
indeterminate sentence review board relating to the person;
(iii) All records relating to the psychological or psychiatric
evaluation and/or treatment of the person;
(iv) A current record of all prior arrests and convictions, and
full police case reports relating to those arrests and convictions; and
(v) A current mental health evaluation or mental health records
review.
(2) This section applies to acts committed before, on, or after
March 26, 1992.
(3) The agency, its employees, and officials shall be immune from
liability for any good-faith conduct under this section.
(4) As used in this section, "agency with jurisdiction" means that
agency with the authority to direct the release of a person serving a
sentence or term of confinement and includes the department of
corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, and the
department of social and health services.

Sec. 208 RCW 71.09.030 and 2008 c 213 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
When it appears that: (1) A person who at any time previously has
been convicted of a sexually violent offense is about to be released
from total confinement on, before, or after July 1, 1990; (2) a person
found to have committed a sexually violent offense as a juvenile is
about to be released from total confinement on, before, or after July
1, 1990; (3) a person who has been charged with a sexually violent
offense and who has been determined to be incompetent to stand trial is
about to be released, or has been released on, before, or after July 1,
1990, pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c); (4) a person
who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of a sexually
violent offense is about to be released, or has been released on,
before, or after July 1, 1990, pursuant to RCW 10.77.020(3), 10.77.110
(1) or (3), or 10.77.150; or (5) a person who at any time previously
has been convicted of a sexually violent offense and has since been
released from total confinement and has committed a recent overt act;
and it appears that the person may be a sexually violent predator, the
prosecuting attorney of the county where the person was convicted or
charged or the attorney general if requested by the prosecuting
attorney may file a petition alleging that the person is a "sexually
violent predator" and stating sufficient facts to support such
allegation.

Sec. 209 RCW 71.09.060 and 2008 c 213 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The court or jury shall determine whether, beyond a reasonable
doubt, the person is a sexually violent predator. In determining
whether or not the person would be likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility, the fact
finder may consider only placement conditions and voluntary treatment
options that would exist for the person if unconditionally released
from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. The
community protection program under RCW 71A.12.230 may not be considered
as a placement condition or treatment option available to the person if
unconditionally released from detention on a sexually violent predator
petition. When the determination is made by a jury, the verdict must
be unanimous.
If, on the date that the petition is filed, the person was living
in the community after release from custody, the state must also prove
beyond a reasonable doubt that the person had committed a recent overt
act. If the state alleges that the prior sexually violent offense that
forms the basis for the petition for commitment was an act that was
sexually motivated as provided in RCW 71.09.020(15)(c), the state must
prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the alleged sexually violent act
was sexually motivated as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
If the court or jury determines that the person is a sexually
violent predator, the person shall be committed to the custody of the
department of social and health services for placement in a secure
facility operated by the department of social and health services for
control, care, and treatment until such time as: (a) The person's
condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition
of a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative as set forth in RCW 71.09.092 is in the best
interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would
adequately protect the community.
If the court or unanimous jury decides that the state has not met
its burden of proving that the person is a sexually violent predator,
the court shall direct the person's release.
If the jury is unable to reach a unanimous verdict, the court shall
declare a mistrial and set a retrial within forty-five days of the date
of the mistrial unless the prosecuting agency earlier moves to dismiss
the petition. The retrial may be continued upon the request of either
party accompanied by a showing of good cause, or by the court on its
own motion in the due administration of justice provided that the
respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. In no event may the
person be released from confinement prior to retrial or dismissal of
the case.
(2) If the person charged with a sexually violent offense has been
found incompetent to stand trial, and is about to (([be])) be or has
been released pursuant to RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c), and his
or her commitment is sought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
the court shall first hear evidence and determine whether the person
did commit the act or acts charged if the court did not enter a finding
prior to dismissal under RCW ((10.77.086(4))) 10.77.084(1)(c) that the
person committed the act or acts charged. The hearing on this issue
must comply with all the procedures specified in this section. In
addition, the rules of evidence applicable in criminal cases shall
apply, and all constitutional rights available to defendants at
criminal trials, other than the right not to be tried while
incompetent, shall apply. After hearing evidence on this issue, the
court shall make specific findings on whether the person did commit the
act or acts charged, the extent to which the person's incompetence or
developmental disability affected the outcome of the hearing, including
its effect on the person's ability to consult with and assist counsel
and to testify on his or her own behalf, the extent to which the
evidence could be reconstructed without the assistance of the person,
and the strength of the prosecution's case. If, after the conclusion
of the hearing on this issue, the court finds, beyond a reasonable
doubt, that the person did commit the act or acts charged, it shall
enter a final order, appealable by the person, on that issue, and may
proceed to consider whether the person should be committed pursuant to
this section.
(3) The state shall comply with RCW 10.77.220 while confining the
person pursuant to this chapter, except that during all court
proceedings the person shall be detained in a secure facility. The
department shall not place the person, even temporarily, in a facility
on the grounds of any state mental facility or regional habilitation
center because these institutions are insufficiently secure for this
population.
(4) A court has jurisdiction to order a less restrictive
alternative placement only after a hearing ordered pursuant to RCW
71.09.090 following initial commitment under this section and in accord
with the provisions of this chapter.

PART III
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---