BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All agency employees must answer completely and honestly any
request of the legislature in furtherance of a legislative
investigative or oversight purpose.
(2) As used in this section, "agency" has the meaning in RCW
34.05.010.

--- END ---