BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any standing tree on real property located in an urban growth
area boundary is exempt from property taxation, if the taxpayer
provided the county assessor documentation on the value of the tree or
trees as required in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The value of any standing tree or trees must be determined by
a certified arborist at the election of, and cost to, the taxpayer.
(3) If the taxpayer elects to provide documentation, as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, on the value of any standing tree or
trees on the property to the county assessor, the county assessor must
include the exempt value of the standing tree or trees as part of the
appraisal and the assessor must continue to reduce the value of the
real property within an urban growth area boundary consistent with the
exempt value of any standing trees on the property.

--- END ---