BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of state is authorized to approve a program that
allows service voters and overseas voters to cast a ballot over the
internet. The program must be secure, and must protect the secrecy of
the ballot.
In reviewing appropriate programs, the secretary of state will
consider programs based on open source platforms, phased
implementation, and alternative funding sources.
The program allowing service and overseas voters to vote over the
internet is exempt from chapter 29A.12 RCW.

--- END ---