BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.55.100 and 2002 c 279 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of impoundment the registered tow truck operator
providing the towing service shall give immediate notification, by
telephone or radio, to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction who
shall maintain a log of such reports. A law enforcement agency, or a
private communication center acting on behalf of a law enforcement
agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the impoundment, provide to
a requesting operator the name ((and)), address, and telephone number
of the legal and registered owners of the vehicle, and the registered
owner of any personal property registered or titled with the department
that is attached to or contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the
vehicle identification number, and any other necessary, pertinent
information. The initial notice of impoundment shall be followed by a
written or electronic facsimile notice within twenty-four hours. In
the case of a vehicle from another state, time requirements of this
subsection do not apply until the requesting law enforcement agency in
this state receives the information.
(2) The operator shall immediately send an abandoned vehicle report
to the department for any vehicle, and for any items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, that are in the
operator's possession after the one hundred twenty hour abandonment
period. Such report need not be sent when the impoundment is pursuant
to a writ, court order, or police hold that is not a suspended license
impound. The owner notification and abandonment process shall be
initiated by the registered tow truck operator immediately following
notification by a court or law enforcement officer that the writ, court
order, or police hold that is not a suspended license impound is no
longer in effect.
(3) Following the submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the
department shall provide the registered tow truck operator with owner
information, including name, address, and telephone number, within
seventy-two hours.
(4) Within fourteen days of the sale of an abandoned vehicle at
public auction, the towing operator shall send a copy of the abandoned
vehicle report showing the disposition of the abandoned vehicle and any
other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department to the department. The vehicle buyer information sent to
the department on the abandoned vehicle report relieves the previous
owner of the vehicle from any civil or criminal liability for the
operation of the vehicle from the date of sale thereafter and transfers
full liability for the vehicle to the buyer. By January 1, 2003, the
department shall create a system enabling tow truck operators the
option of sending the portion of the abandoned vehicle report that
contains the vehicle's buyer information to the department
electronically.
(5) If the operator sends an abandoned vehicle report to the
department and the department finds no owner information, an operator
may proceed with an inspection of the vehicle and any other items of
personal property registered or titled with the department to determine
whether owner identification is within the vehicle.
(6) If the operator finds no owner identification, the operator
shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency, which
shall search the vehicle and any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department for the vehicle identification
number or other appropriate identification numbers and check the
necessary records to determine the vehicle's or other property's
owners.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.55.110 and 2002 c 279 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding
towing operator shall notify the legal and registered owners of the
impoundment of the unauthorized vehicle and the owners of any other
items of personal property registered or titled with the department.
The notification shall be sent by first-class mail within twenty-four
hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and legal
owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, as provided by the
law enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of
the person or agency authorizing the impound. The notification shall
include the name of the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone
number. The notice shall also include the location, time of the
impound, and by whose authority the vehicle was impounded. The notice
shall also include the written notice of the right of redemption and
opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of the impoundment
pursuant to RCW 46.55.120. If the notification is returned to the
operator as undeliverable or returned to the sender for any other
reason, the operator must make a good faith attempt to notify the legal
and registered owners using the telephone number provided by the
department. At a minimum, the operator must attempt to contact the
owners during regular business hours at least three times during a
forty-eight hour period and maintain a log of these attempts.
(2) In addition, if a suspended license impound has been ordered,
the notice must state the length of the impound, the requirement of the
posting of a security deposit to ensure payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, notification that if the security deposit
is not posted the vehicle will immediately be processed and sold at
auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set out in RCW
46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs of removal, towing,
and storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of any
penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption. The notice must
also state that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the
vehicle at the abandoned vehicle auction, if held.
(3) In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, within twenty-four
hours after receiving information on the owners from the department
through the abandoned vehicle report, the tow truck operator shall send
by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a notice of custody
and sale to the legal and registered owners and of the penalties for
the traffic infraction littering -- abandoned vehicle. If the notice is
returned to the operator as undeliverable or returned to the sender for
any other reason, or the return receipt is not returned, the operator
must make a good faith attempt to notify the legal and registered
owners using the telephone number provided by the department. At a
minimum, the operator must attempt to contact the owners during regular
business hours at least three times during a forty-eight hour period
and maintain a log of these attempts.
(4) If the date on which a notice required by subsection (3) of
this section is to be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal
holiday, the notice may be mailed on the next day that is neither a
Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal holiday.
(5) No notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an
impounded vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department, if the vehicle or personal property has
been redeemed.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.55.120 and 2004 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department that are impounded by registered tow truck
operators pursuant to RCW 46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140
may be redeemed only under the following circumstances:
(a) Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized
in writing by the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person
who is determined and verified by the operator to have the permission
of the registered owner of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, or one who has
purchased a vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled
with the department from the registered owner who produces proof of
ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because
the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be
released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including
paying all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact
that the hold was ordered by a government agency. If the department's
records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation of RCW
46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past five years, the
vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written direction of
the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because
the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered
the vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency
may issue a written order to release pursuant to a provision of an
applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing release on
the basis of the following:
(i) Economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the operator,
taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record; or
(ii) The owner of the vehicle was not the driver, the owner did not
know that the driver's license was suspended or revoked, and the owner
has not received a prior release under this subsection or RCW
46.55.113(3).
In order to avoid discriminatory application, other than for the
reasons for release set forth in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, an
agency shall, under a provision of an applicable state agency rule or
local ordinance, deny release in all other circumstances without
discretion.
If a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of
RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty
days at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded. However, if the department's records show that the operator
has been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a
similar local ordinance within the past five years, the vehicle may be
held at the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle
impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days if the
operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW
46.20.342, the vehicle may not be released until a person eligible to
redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements of
(e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and
storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a
government agency.
(b) If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license
impound, a person who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the
period of impound shall within five days of the impound at the request
of the tow truck operator pay a security deposit to the tow truck
operator of not more than one-half of the applicable impound storage
rate for each day of the proposed suspended license impound. The tow
truck operator shall credit this amount against the final bill for
removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit.
If the person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security
deposit or provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator,
the tow truck operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as
an abandoned vehicle within the normal time limits set out in RCW
46.55.130(1). The security deposit required by this section may be
paid and must be accepted at any time up to twenty-four hours before
the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle as abandoned. The
registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at the
auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the
highest bidder who is not the registered owner.
(c) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business
may immediately redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound.
(d) Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer
or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem
or lawfully repossess a vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of
removal, towing, and storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held
for a suspended license impound. A motor vehicle dealer or lender with
a perfected security interest in the vehicle may not knowingly and
intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to repossess
and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision
does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with
chapter 62A.9A RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor
under RCW 62A.9A-623. If the debtor is the registered owner of the
vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9A
RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof from
the impounding authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines,
penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of
the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment
must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor
tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good
faith on an order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a
vehicle held under a suspended license impound.
(e) The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or
titled with the department shall be released upon the presentation to
any person having custody of the vehicle of commercially reasonable
tender sufficient to cover the costs of towing, storage, or other
services rendered during the course of towing, removing, impounding, or
storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for the amount of any
security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In addition, if a
vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation
of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.345 and was being operated by the registered
owner when it was impounded under local ordinance or agency rule, it
must not be released to any person until the registered owner
establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded or the
court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures
owed by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators
are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from
the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall
include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards issued by
financial institutions, or personal checks drawn on Washington state
branches of financial institutions if accompanied by two pieces of
valid identification, one of which may be required by the operator to
have a photograph. If the towing firm cannot determine through the
customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented
check would be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the
towing firm may refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops
payment on a personal check or credit card, or does not make
restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes insufficient
due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service
pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing
firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section
shall be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and
storage fees, plus costs and reasonable attorney's fees.
(2)(a) The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person
who seeks to redeem an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, written notice of the right
of redemption and opportunity for a hearing, which notice shall be
accompanied by a form to be used for requesting a hearing, the name of
the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy of the towing
and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall maintain
a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.
(b) Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this
section has a right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for
the jurisdiction in which the vehicle was impounded to contest the
validity of the impoundment or the amount of towing and storage
charges. The district court has jurisdiction to determine the issues
involving all impoundments including those authorized by the state or
its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine the
issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided
for that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within
ten days of the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection
(2)(a) of this section and ((more than five days)) before the date of
the auction. At the time of the filing of the hearing request, the
petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a filing fee in the same amount
required for the filing of a suit in district court. If the hearing
request is not received by the court within the ten-day period, the
right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall
proceed to hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.
(3)(a) The court, within five days after the request for a hearing,
shall notify the registered tow truck operator, the person requesting
the hearing if not the owner, the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, and the person or agency authorizing the impound in
writing of the hearing date and time.
(b) At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing
may produce any relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing,
or storage fees charged were not proper. The court may consider a
written report made under oath by the officer who authorized the
impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal appearance at the
hearing.
(c) At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine
whether the impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees
charged were in compliance with the posted rates, and who is
responsible for payment of the fees. The court may not adjust fees or
charges that are in compliance with the posted or contracted rates.
(d) If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing,
and storage fees as permitted under this chapter together with court
costs shall be assessed against the person or persons requesting the
hearing, unless the operator did not have a signed and valid
impoundment authorization from a private property owner or an
authorized agent.
(e) If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this
chapter, then the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other
item of personal property registered or titled with the department
shall bear no impoundment, towing, or storage fees, and any security
shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and the person or
agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any towing,
storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck
operator against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the
impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court
shall enter judgment in favor of the registered and legal owners of the
vehicle, or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, for the amount of the filing fee required by law for
the impound hearing petition as well as reasonable damages for loss of
the use of the vehicle during the time the same was impounded against
the person or agency authorizing the impound. However, if an
impoundment arising from an alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or
46.20.345 is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
law enforcement officer directing the impoundment and the government
employing the officer are not liable for damages if the officer relied
in good faith and without gross negligence on the records of the
department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle had a
suspended or revoked driver's license. If any judgment entered is not
paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of its entry, the court
shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant
in any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may
be made by registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may be
made by affidavit of the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry
of the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO: . . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you in the
. . . . . . Court located at . . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled . . . . . ., Case No.
. . . . YOU ARE FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs
will be awarded against you under RCW . . . if the judgment is
not paid within 15 days of the date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature . . . . . . . . . .
Typed name and address
of party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within
fifteen days of receipt of the return receipt from the certified
mailing of the notice of custody and sale or within fifteen days of the
operator's final attempt to contact the owner by telephone as required
by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with
all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130.
A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with the
department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction
upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.55.130 and 2006 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, after the expiration of fifteen days from either the date
((of)) the operator received the return receipt from the mailing of the
notice of custody and sale or the date of the operator's final attempt
to contact the owner by telephone as required in RCW 46.55.110(3) ((to
the registered and legal owners)), the vehicle remains unclaimed and
has not been listed as a stolen vehicle, or a suspended license impound
has been directed, but no security paid under RCW 46.55.120, then the
registered tow truck operator having custody of the vehicle shall
conduct a sale of the vehicle at public auction after having first
published a notice of the date, place, and time of the auction, and a
method to contact the tow truck operator conducting the auction such as
a telephone number, electronic mail address, or web site, in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the vehicle is
located not less than three days and no more than ten days before the
date of the auction. For the purposes of this section, a newspaper of
general circulation may be a commercial, widely circulated, free,
classified advertisement circular not affiliated with the registered
tow truck operator and the notice may be listed in a classification
delineating "auctions" or similar language designed to attract
potential bidders to the auction. The notice shall contain a
notification that a public viewing period will be available before the
auction and the length of the viewing period. The auction shall be
held during daylight hours of a normal business day. The viewing
period must be one hour if twenty-five or fewer vehicles are to be
auctioned, two hours if more than twenty-five and fewer than fifty
vehicles are to be auctioned, and three hours if fifty or more vehicles
are to be auctioned.
(2) The following procedures are required in any public auction of
such abandoned vehicles:
(a) The auction shall be held in such a manner that all persons
present are given an equal time and opportunity to bid;
(b) All bidders must be present at the time of auction unless they
have submitted to the registered tow truck operator, who may or may not
choose to use the preauction bid method, a written bid on a specific
vehicle. Written bids may be submitted up to five days before the
auction and shall clearly state which vehicle is being bid upon, the
amount of the bid, and who is submitting the bid;
(c) The open bid process, including all written bids, shall be used
so that everyone knows the dollar value that must be exceeded;
(d) The highest two bids received shall be recorded in written form
and shall include the name, address, and telephone number of each such
bidder;
(e) In case the high bidder defaults, the next bidder has the right
to purchase the vehicle for the amount of his or her bid;
(f) The successful bidder shall apply for title within fifteen
days;
(g) The registered tow truck operator shall post a copy of the
auction procedure at the bidding site. If the bidding site is
different from the licensed office location, the operator shall post a
clearly visible sign at the office location that describes in detail
where the auction will be held. At the bidding site a copy of the
newspaper advertisement that lists the vehicles for sale shall be
posted;
(h) All surplus moneys derived from the auction after satisfaction
of the registered tow truck operator's lien shall be remitted within
thirty days to the department for deposit in the state motor vehicle
fund. A report identifying the vehicles resulting in any surplus shall
accompany the remitted funds. If the director subsequently receives a
valid claim from the registered vehicle owner of record as determined
by the department within one year from the date of the auction, the
surplus moneys shall be remitted to such owner;
(i) If an operator receives no bid, or if the operator is the
successful bidder at auction, the operator shall, within forty-five
days, sell the vehicle to a licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or
scrap processor by use of the abandoned vehicle report-affidavit of
sale, or the operator shall apply for title to the vehicle.
(3) A tow truck operator may refuse to accept a bid at an abandoned
vehicle auction under this section for any reason in the operator's
posted operating procedures and for any of the following reasons: (a)
The bidder is currently indebted to the operator; (b) the operator has
knowledge that the bidder has previously abandoned vehicles purchased
at auction; or (c) the bidder has purchased, at auction, more than four
vehicles in the last calendar year without obtaining title to any or
all of the vehicles. In no case may an operator hold a vehicle for
longer than ninety days without holding an auction on the vehicle,
except for vehicles that are under a police or judicial hold.
(4)(a) In no case may the accumulation of storage charges exceed
fifteen days from the date of receipt of the information by the
operator from the department as provided by RCW 46.55.110(3).
(b) The failure of the registered tow truck operator to comply with
the time limits provided in this chapter limits the accumulation of
storage charges to five days except where delay is unavoidable.
Providing incorrect or incomplete identifying information to the
department in the abandoned vehicle report shall be considered a
failure to comply with these time limits if correct information is
available. However, storage charges begin to accrue again on the date
the correct and complete information is provided to the department by
the registered tow truck operator.
(5) The registered owner of a vehicle that has been sold at auction
may bring a cause of action against and recover damages from the tow
truck operator if the impoundment was improper or the operator failed
to comply with the notice provisions required under RCW 46.55.110(3).
A registered owner whose claim is successful is not liable for any
towing, storage, or other charges.

--- END ---