BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The purpose of this chapter is to
provide a framework within which guaranteed asset protection waivers
are defined and may be offered within this state.
(2) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) An insurance policy offered by an insurer under this title; or
(b) A federally regulated financial institution operating under 12
C.F.R. Part 37 of the office of the comptroller of the currency
regulations or credit unions operating under 12 C.F.R. 721.3(g) of the
national credit union administration regulations, or state regulated
banks, credit unions, and financial institutions operating pursuant to
chapter 63.14 RCW.
(3) Guaranteed asset protection waivers are governed under this
chapter and are exempt from all other provisions of this title, except
RCW 48.02.060 and 48.02.080, chapter 48.04 RCW, and as provided in this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means a person, other than an insurer or
creditor that performs administrative or operational functions pursuant
to guaranteed asset protection waiver programs.
(2) "Borrower" means a debtor, retail buyer, or lessee, under a
finance agreement, or a person who receives a loan or enters into a
retail installment contract to purchase or lease a motor vehicle or
vessel under chapter 63.14 RCW.
(3) "Creditor" means:
(a) The lender in a loan or credit transaction;
(b) The lessor in a lease transaction;
(c) Any retail seller of motor vehicles that provides credit to
retail buyers of motor vehicles provided the seller complies with this
chapter;
(d) The seller in commercial retail installment transactions; or
(e) The assignees of any creditor under this subsection to whom the
credit obligation is payable.
(4) "Finance agreement" means a loan, lease, or retail installment
sales contract for the purchase or lease of a motor vehicle.
(5) "Free look period" means the period of time from the effective
date of the waiver until the date the borrower may cancel the waiver
without penalty, fees, or costs to the borrower. This period of time
must not be shorter than thirty days.
(6) "Guaranteed asset protection waiver" or "waiver" means a
contractual agreement wherein a creditor agrees for a separate charge
to cancel or waive all or part of amounts due that creditor on a
borrower's finance agreement with that creditor in the event of a total
physical damage loss or unrecovered theft of the motor vehicle, which
agreement must be part of, or a separate addendum to, the finance
agreement.
(7) "Insurer" means an insurance company licensed, registered, or
otherwise authorized to do business under the insurance laws of this
state.
(8) "Motor vehicle" means self-propelled or towed vehicles designed
for personal or commercial use, including but not limited to
automobiles, trucks, motorcycles, recreational vehicles, all-terrain
vehicles, snowmobiles, campers, boats, personal watercraft, and
motorcycle, boat, camper, and personal watercraft trailers.
(9) "Motor vehicle dealer" has the same meaning as "vehicle dealer"
in RCW 46.70.011.
(10) "Person" includes an individual, company, association,
organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, and every form
of legal entity.
(11) "Retail buyer" means a person who buys or agrees to buy a
motor vehicle or obtain motor vehicle services or agrees to have motor
vehicle services rendered or furnished from a retail seller.
(12) "Retail seller" means a person engaged in the business of
selling motor vehicles or motor vehicle services to retail buyers.
(13) "Unregistered marketers" means persons who offer for sale and
sell guaranteed asset protection waivers who are not registered under
this chapter and who are not otherwise exempt under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter applies only to guaranteed
asset protection waivers for financing of motor vehicles as described
in this chapter. Any person or entity must register with the
commissioner before marketing, offering for sale, or selling a
guaranteed asset protection waiver, and before acting as an obligor for
a guaranteed asset protection waiver in this state. However, a retail
seller of motor vehicles that assigns all guaranteed asset protection
waiver agreements within twenty days of the agreements' effective date,
or an insurer authorized to transact such insurance business in this
state, is not required to register pursuant to this section.
(2) No person may market, offer for sale, or sell a guaranteed
asset protection waiver, or act as an obligor on a guaranteed asset
protection waiver in this state without a registration as provided in
this chapter, except as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The application for registration must include the following:
(a) The applicant's name, address, and telephone number;
(b) The identities of the applicant's executive officers or other
officers directly responsible for the waiver business;
(c) An application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, which shall be
deposited into the guaranteed asset protection waiver account;
(d) A copy filed by the applicant with the commissioner of the
waivers the applicant intends to offer in this state;
(e) A list of all unregistered marketers of guaranteed asset
protection waivers on which the applicant will be the obligor;
(f) Such additional information as the commissioner may reasonably
require.
(4) Once registered, the applicant shall keep the information
required for registration current by reporting changes within thirty
days after the end of the month in which the change occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Waivers may be offered, sold, or
provided to borrowers in this state in compliance with this chapter.
(2) Waivers may, at the option of the creditor, be sold for a
single payment or may be offered with a monthly or periodic payment
option.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any cost to the
borrower for a guaranteed asset protection waiver entered into in
compliance with the truth in lending act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.)
and its implementing regulations, as amended, must be separately stated
and is not to be considered a finance charge or interest.
(4) A retail seller must insure its waiver obligations under a
contractual liability or other insurance policy issued by an insurer
authorized to transact such insurance in this state. A creditor, other
than a retail seller, may insure its waiver obligations under a
contractual liability policy or other such policy issued by an insurer
authorized to transact such insurance in this state. Any such
insurance policy may be directly obtained by a creditor or retail
seller, or may be procured by an administrator, to cover a creditor's
or retail seller's obligations. However, retail sellers that are
lessors on motor vehicles are not required to insure obligations
related to waivers on the leased vehicles.
(5) The waiver remains a part of the finance agreement upon the
assignment, sale, or transfer of the finance agreement by the creditor.
(6) Neither the extension of credit, the term of credit, nor the
term of the related motor vehicle sale or lease may be conditioned upon
the purchase of a waiver.
(7) Any creditor that offers a waiver must report the sale of, and
forward funds received on, all waivers to the designated party, if any,
as prescribed in any applicable administrative services agreement,
contractual liability policy, other insurance policy, or other
specified program documents.
(8) Funds received or held by a creditor or administrator and
belonging to an insurer, creditor, or administrator, under the terms of
a written agreement, must be held by that creditor or administrator in
a fiduciary capacity.
(9) If the guaranteed asset protection waiver is assigned, the name
and address of the assignee must be mailed to the borrower within
thirty days of the assignment. If at any time the name and address
provided to the borrower by the initial creditor are no longer the
valid point of contact to apply for waiver benefits, written notice
will be mailed to the borrower within thirty days of the change stating
the new name and address of the person or entity the borrower should
contact to apply for waiver benefits. No waiver may be assigned to an
entity that is not registered pursuant to this chapter, unless such
entity is exempt from registration or unless the commissioner
specifically authorizes such assignment.
(10) No person shall knowingly make, publish, or disseminate any
false, deceptive, or misleading representation or advertising in the
conduct of, or relative to, waiver business. Nor shall any person
make, issue, or circulate, or cause to be made, issued, or circulated
any misrepresentation of the terms or benefits of any waiver.
(11) A person or entity engaged in the guaranteed asset protection
waiver business in this state may not refuse to sell or issue any
guaranteed asset protection waiver because of the sex, marital status,
or sexual orientation as defined in RCW 49.60.040, or the presence of
any sensory, mental, or physical disability of the borrower or
prospective borrower. The type of benefits, or any term, rate,
condition, or type of coverage may not be restricted, modified,
excluded, increased, or reduced on the basis of the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability of the borrower or prospective
borrower.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Contractual liability or other insurance
policies insuring waivers must state the obligation of the insurer to
reimburse or pay to the creditor any sums the creditor is legally
obligated to waive under the waivers issued by the creditor and
purchased or held by the borrower. Contractual liability insurance or
other insurance policies insuring waivers must not be purchased by the
creditor as part of, or a rider to, vendor single-interest or
collateral protection coverages as defined in RCW 48.22.110(4).
(2) Coverage under a contractual liability or other insurance
policy insuring a waiver must also cover any subsequent assignee upon
the assignment, sale, or transfer of the finance agreement.
(3) Coverage under a contractual liability or other insurance
policy insuring a waiver must remain in effect unless canceled or
terminated in compliance with applicable insurance laws of this state.
(4) The cancellation or termination of a contractual liability or
other insurance policy must not reduce the insurer's responsibility for
waivers issued by the creditor prior to the date of cancellation or
termination and for which a premium has been received by the insurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Guaranteed asset protection waivers must
disclose, as applicable, in writing and in clear, understandable
language that is easy to read, the following:
(1) The name and address of the initial creditor and the borrower
at the time of sale, and the identity of any administrator if different
from the creditor;
(2) The purchase price and the terms of the waiver, including
without limitation, the requirements for protection, conditions, or
exclusions associated with the waiver;
(3) That the borrower may cancel the waiver within a free look
period as specified in the waiver, and will be entitled to a full
refund of the purchase price, so long as no benefits have been
provided; or in the event benefits have been provided, the borrower may
receive a full or partial refund pursuant to the terms of the waiver;
(4) The procedure the borrower must follow, if any, to obtain
waiver benefits under the terms and conditions of the waiver, including
a telephone number and address where the borrower may apply for waiver
benefits;
(5) Whether or not the waiver is cancellable after the free look
period and the conditions under which it may be canceled or terminated
including the procedures for requesting any refund due;
(6) That in order to receive any refund due in the event of a
borrower's cancellation of the waiver agreement or early termination of
the finance agreement after the free look period of the waiver, the
borrower, in accordance with terms of the waiver, must provide a
written request to cancel to the creditor, administrator, or such other
party, within ninety days of the occurrence of the event terminating
the finance agreement;
(7) The methodology for calculating any refund of the unearned
purchase price of the waiver due, in the event of cancellation of the
waiver or early termination of the finance agreement;
(8) That any refund of the purchase price for a waiver that was
included in the financing of the motor vehicle or vessel may be applied
by the creditor as a reduction of the overall amount owed under the
finance agreement, rather than applying the refund strictly to the
purchase price of the waiver. This disclosure must be conspicuously
presented prior to the purchase of the waiver;
(9) That neither the extension of credit, the terms of the credit,
nor the terms of the related motor vehicle sale or lease, may be
conditioned upon the purchase of the waiver;
(10) That the guaranteed asset protection waiver is not credit
insurance, nor does it eliminate the borrower's obligation to insure
the motor vehicle as provided by laws of this state. Purchasing a
guaranteed asset protection waiver does not eliminate the borrower's
rights and obligations under the vendor single-interest and collateral
protection coverage laws of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Guaranteed asset protection waiver
agreements may be cancellable or noncancellable after the free look
period. Waivers must provide that if a borrower cancels a waiver
within the free look period, the borrower will be entitled to a full
refund of the purchase price, so long as no benefits have been
provided; or in the event benefits have been provided, the borrower may
receive a full or partial refund pursuant to the terms of the waiver.
(2) In the event of a borrower's cancellation of the waiver or
early termination of the finance agreement, after the agreement has
been in effect beyond the free look period, the borrower may be
entitled to a refund of any unearned portion of the purchase price of
the waiver unless the waiver provides otherwise. In order to receive
a refund, the borrower, in accordance with any applicable terms of the
waiver, must provide a written request to the creditor, administrator,
or other party, within ninety days of the event terminating the finance
agreement.
(3) If the cancellation of a waiver occurs as a result of a default
under the finance agreement or the repossession of the motor vehicle
associated with the finance agreement, any refund due may be paid
directly to the creditor or administrator and applied as set forth in
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Any cancellation refund under this section may be applied by
the creditor as a reduction of the overall amount owed under the
finance agreement, if the cost of the guaranteed asset protection
waiver was included in the financing of the motor vehicle or vessel.
(5) Disclosure of how the refund may be applied by the creditor or
administrator must be made in accordance with the provisions of section
6(8) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The commissioner may, subject to chapter
48.04 RCW, take action that is necessary or appropriate to enforce this
chapter and to protect guaranteed asset protection waiver holders in
this state, which includes:
(a) Suspending, revoking, or refusing to issue the registration of
a person or entity if the registrant fails to comply with any provision
of this chapter or fails to comply with any proper order or rule of the
commissioner; and
(b) After hearing or with the consent of the registrant, and in
addition to or in lieu of the suspension, revocation, or refusal to
issue any registration, imposing a penalty of not more than two hundred
dollars for each violation of this chapter.
(2) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Any person who markets, offers for sale
or sells a guaranteed asset protection waiver, or acts as an obligor
for a guaranteed asset protection waiver without a registration is
acting in violation of this section and is subject to the provisions of
section 8 of this act. In addition, any person who knowingly violates
this section is guilty of a class B felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(2) Any criminal penalty imposed under this section is in addition
to, and not in lieu of, any other civil or administrative penalty or
sanction otherwise authorized under state law.
(3) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person has
violated this section, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty of
not more than twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation, after
providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with
chapter 48.04 RCW. Upon failure to pay this civil penalty when due,
the attorney general may bring a civil action on behalf of the
commissioner to recover the unpaid penalty.
(4) A person or entity that should have been registered at the time
of the sale of a waiver who was not so registered pursuant to this
chapter is personally liable for performance of the waiver. Any waiver
sold by a person or entity that should have been registered at the time
of the sale is voidable, except at the instance of the person or entity
who sold the waiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The guaranteed asset protection waiver
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The fees and
fines collected under this chapter must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used to implement, administer, and
enforce this chapter. Only the commissioner or the commissioner's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is applicable to all guaranteed
asset protection waiver agreements entered into on or after January 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

--- END ---