BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.090 and 2007 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who is injured in his or her business or property by a
violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede
to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may
bring a civil action in ((the)) superior court to enjoin further
violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or
both, together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable
attorney's fee((, and)). In addition, the court may, in its
discretion, increase the award of damages ((to)) by an amount not to
exceed three times the actual damages sustained: PROVIDED, That such
increased damage award for violation of RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed
((ten)) fifty thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such person may
bring a civil action in the district court to recover his or her actual
damages, except for damages which exceed the amount specified in RCW
3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorney's
fees. The district court may, in its discretion, increase the award of
damages to an amount ((not more than)) up to three times the actual
damages sustained, but such increased damage award shall not exceed
((the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020)) fifty thousand dollars. For
the purpose of this section, "person" ((shall)) includes the counties,
municipalities, and all political subdivisions of this state.
Whenever the state of Washington is injured, directly or
indirectly, by reason of a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue therefor in ((the)) superior court
to recover the actual damages sustained by it, whether direct or
indirect, and to recover the costs of the suit including a reasonable
attorney's fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.86 RCW
to read as follows:
In a private action in which an unfair or deceptive act or practice
is alleged under RCW 19.86.020, a claimant may establish that the act
or practice is injurious to the public interest because it:
(1) Violates a statute which incorporates this chapter;
(2) Violates a statute which contains a specific legislative
declaration of public interest impact; or
(3)(a) Injured other persons; (b) had the capacity to injure other
persons; or (c) has the capacity to injure other persons.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.86.080 and 2007 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the
state, or as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in the state,
against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act herein
prohibited or declared to be unlawful; and the prevailing party may, in
the discretion of the court, recover the costs of said action including
a reasonable attorney's fee. Actions brought by the attorney general
are presumed to involve an act or practice injurious to the public
interest.
(2) The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may
be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of
any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful.
(3) Upon a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, the court may also make such additional orders or judgments
as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired, regardless of
whether such person purchased or transacted for goods or services
directly with the defendant or indirectly through resellers. The court
shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in an action
pursuant to this subsection any amount that duplicates amounts that
have been awarded for the same violation. The court should consider
consolidation or coordination with other related actions, to the extent
practicable, to avoid duplicate recovery.

--- END ---