BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition with the department by any water
right claimant, the department may commence a limited adjudication of
water rights to determine the rights of one or a limited number of the
total potential claimants to water from a source in circumstances where
the issues requiring determination of water do not affect every water
right holder in a given basin. The department may not join as a party
an Indian tribe or the United States or any of its agencies or
departments in a limited adjudication.
(2) Any water right claimant may, pursuant to superior court rules,
move:
(a) To intervene in a limited adjudication of claims to such a
water source; or
(b) When joined as a party in a limited adjudication, to join
another party, or to dismiss the adjudication for failure to join an
indispensable party.
(3) The judgment in a limited adjudication is binding upon the
parties, but is not binding on any person or entity who was not a party
to a limited adjudication. As between the parties to the limited
adjudication, the judgment in a limited adjudication is admissible as
prima facie evidence of the existence and conditions of the right. A
decree in a limited adjudication may be superseded in a subsequent
general adjudication, but the parties to the limited adjudication may
not raise issues or claims that were decided in the prior proceeding.
As between parties to a limited adjudication, a water master may rely
on such a determination in dividing, regulating, and controlling the
use of water under RCW 90.03.070.
(4) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by court rules,
the procedures applicable to a general adjudication described in this
chapter are applicable to a limited adjudication.
(5) For purposes of this section, the term "water right claimant"
means any person who:
(a) Claims a right to divert or withdraw water from a water source;
or
(b) Makes a permanent transfer of a water right to the state trust
water program and who retains a beneficial interest in such a water
right.
(6) For purposes of this section, a water right claimant does not
include the department.
(7) Prior to filing a limited adjudication under this section the
department shall:
(a) Notify and consult with affected state agencies, local
governments, and Indian tribes;
(b) Publish notice of its intent to file a limited adjudication on
the same day of each week for two consecutive weeks in a legal
newspaper of general circulation in the area where the property that is
the subject of the action is located; and
(c) Post notice of its intent to file a limited adjudication on the
department's web site prior to the date of the last newspaper
publication that is required in (b) of this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.110 and 1987 c 109 s 72 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition with the department by a planning
unit or by one or more persons claiming the right to ((divert)) any
waters within the state or when, after investigation, in the judgment
of the department, the ((interest of the public will be subserved by a
determination of the rights thereto, it shall be the duty of the
department to)) public interest will be served by a determination of
the rights thereto, an adjudication is needed for effective water
management, the department will determine whether the public interest
would be served by a determination of the rights to the waters. The
department, in consultation with the administrative office of the
courts, will determine whether sufficient resources are available to
the department, and to the superior court in which an adjudication may
be filed, to conduct an adjudication in addition to discharging other
duties. If the department determines an adjudication is needed, the
department shall prepare a statement of the facts, together with a plan
or map of the locality under investigation, and file such statement and
plan or map in the superior court of the county in which said water is
situated, or, in case such water flows or is situated in more than one
county, in the county which the department shall determine to be the
most convenient to the parties interested therein. Such a statement
shall ((contain substantially the following matter, to wit:
(1) The names of all known persons claiming the right to divert
said water, the right to the diversion of which is sought to be
determined, and
(2) A brief statement of the facts in relation to such water, and
the necessity for a determination of the rights thereto)):
(a) For a limited adjudication, identify each person or entity
whose right to water the department seeks to determine;
(b) For a general adjudication, either (i) identify each person or
entity owning real property situated within the area to be adjudicated
but outside the boundaries of a city, town, or special purpose district
that provides water to property within its service area; (ii) identify
all known persons claiming a right to the water sought to be
determined; or (iii) identify both; and
(c) Include a brief statement of the facts in relation to such
water, and the necessity for a determination of the rights thereto.
(2) Prior to filing a general adjudication under this chapter, the
department shall:
(a) Consult with the administrative office of the courts to
determine whether sufficient judicial resources are available to
commence and to prosecute the adjudication in a timely manner; and
(b) Report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on the
estimated budget needs for the court and the department to conduct the
adjudication.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.120 and 1987 c 109 s 73 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of the statement and map as provided in RCW
90.03.110 the judge of such superior court shall make an order
directing summons to be issued, and fixing the return day thereof,
which shall be not less than sixty nor more than ninety days, after the
making of such order: PROVIDED, That for good cause, the court, at the
request of the department, may modify said time period.
(2) A summons issued under this section shall ((thereupon)) be
issued out of said superior court, signed and attested by the clerk
thereof, in the name of the state of Washington, as plaintiff, against
all known persons ((claiming the right to divert the water involved and
also all persons unknown claiming the right to divert the water
involved, which said)) identified by the department under RCW
90.03.110. The summons shall contain a brief statement of the objects
and purpose of the proceedings and shall require the defendants to
appear on the return day thereof, and make and file a statement of
claim to, or interest in, the water involved and a statement that
unless they appear at the time and place fixed and assert such right,
judgment will be entered determining their rights according to the
evidence: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any persons claiming the right to
((the use of)) water by virtue of a contract with claimant to the right
to divert the same, shall not be necessary parties to the proceeding.
(3) To the extent consistent with court rules and subject to the
availability of funds provided either by direct appropriation or funded
by the department through the administrative office of the courts for
this specific adjudicative proceeding, the court is encouraged to
conduct the water rights adjudication employing innovative practices
and technologies appropriate to large scale and complex cases, such as:
(a) Electronic filing of documents, including notice and claims; (b)
appearance via teleconferencing; (c) prefiling of testimony; and (d)
other practices and technologies consistent with court rules and
emerging technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A judge in a limited or general water right adjudication filed
under this chapter may be partially or fully disqualified from hearing
the adjudication. Partial disqualification means disqualification from
hearing specified claims. Full disqualification means disqualification
from hearing any aspect of the adjudication.
(a) A judge is partially disqualified when the judge's impartiality
might reasonably be questioned and the apparent or actual partiality is
limited to specified claims.
(b) A judge is fully disqualified when the judge's impartiality
might reasonably be questioned and the apparent or actual partiality
extends beyond limited claims such that the judge should not hear any
part of the adjudication.
(2) A judge may recuse himself or herself under this section or a
party may file a motion for disqualification. A motion for
disqualification must state whether the remedy being sought is full or
partial disqualification.
(3)(a) For parties who are named in the original pleadings, a
motion for disqualification is timely if it is filed before the judge
issues a discretionary order or ruling in the limited or general
adjudication.
(b) For a party who is joined in the adjudication after the
original pleadings have been filed, a motion for disqualification is
timely if it is filed (i) within thirty days of being joined in the
adjudication; or (ii) after the joinder of the party and before the
judge issues a discretionary order or ruling relating to the joined
party, whichever occurs first.
(c) When a motion for disqualification is untimely filed under this
subsection (3), the motion will be granted only when necessary to
correct a substantial injustice.
(d) For purposes of this section, "discretionary order or ruling"
has the same meaning as "order or ruling involving discretion" in RCW
4.12.050.
(4) A party filing a motion for disqualification under this section
has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the
judge should be disqualified under the standards of subsection (1) of
this section.
(5) The motion for disqualification may not be heard by the judge
against whom the motion is filed. Subject to this limitation, the
court may assign the disqualification motion to any superior court
judge of the judicial district in which the limited or general
adjudication was filed or to a visiting superior court judge under RCW
2.56.040.
(6) Except as stated in subsection (3)(d) of this section, RCW
4.12.040 and 4.12.050, which otherwise govern the disqualification of
superior court judges, do not apply to limited or general water right
adjudications filed under this chapter. The standards set forth in RCW
2.28.030, which govern the disqualification of judicial officers
generally, may be grounds for disqualification under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon expiration of the filing period established under RCW
90.03.120(2), the department shall file a motion for default against
defendants who have been served but who have failed to file an
adjudication claim under RCW 90.03.140. When a party served by summons
fails to file a claim, it must be presumed that the party either has no
valid claim to water or waters being adjudicated or the party has since
abandoned a preexisting right or claim to the water. A party in
default may file a late claim under the same circumstances the party
could respond or defend under court rules on default judgments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
If an adjudication claim is for a use for which a statement of
claim was required to be filed under chapter 90.14 RCW and no such
claim was filed, the department may move that the adjudication claim be
denied. The court shall grant the department's motion unless the
claimant shows good cause why the motion should not be granted.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.03.130 and 1987 c 109 s 74 are each amended to read
as follows:
Service of said summons shall be made in the same manner and with
the same force and effect as service of summons in civil actions
commenced in the superior courts of the state: PROVIDED, That ((for
good cause, the court, at the request of the department, as an
alternative to personal service, may authorize service of summons to
be)) as an alternative to personal service, service may be made by
certified mail, with return receipt signed and dated by defendant, a
spouse of a defendant, or another person authorized to accept service.
If the defendants, or either of them, cannot be found within the state
of Washington, of which the return of the sheriff of the county in
which the proceeding is pending or the failure to sign a receipt for
certified mail shall be prima facie evidence, upon the filing of an
affidavit by the department, or its attorney, in conformity with the
statute relative to the service of summons by publication in civil
actions, such service may be made by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which such proceeding is pending,
and also publication of said summons in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county in which any portion of the water is
situated, once a week for six consecutive weeks (six publications).
((In cases where personal service can be had, such summons shall be
served at least twenty days before the return day thereof.)) The
summons by publication shall state that ((statements of)) adjudication
claims must be filed within ((twenty)) sixty days after the last
publication or before the return date, whichever is later. In cases
where personal service or service by certified mail is had, summons
must be served at least sixty days before the return day thereof. For
summons by certified mail, completion of service occurs upon the date
of receipt by the defendant.
Personal service of summons may be made by department of ecology
employees for actions pertaining to water rights.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.03.140 and 1987 c 109 s 75 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or before the ((return day of such summons, each defendant
shall file in the office of the clerk of said court a statement, and
therewith a copy thereof for the department, containing substantially
the following:
(1) The name and post office address of defendant.
(2) The full nature of the right, or use, on which the claim is
based.
(3) The time of initiation of such right and commencement of such
use.
(4) The date of beginning and completion of construction.
(5) The dimensions and capacity of all ditches existing at the time
of making said statement.
(6) The amount of land under irrigation and the maximum quantity of
water used thereon prior to the date of said statement and if for
power, or other purposes, the maximum quantity of water used prior to
date of said statement.
(7) The legal description of the land upon which said water has
been, or may be, put to beneficial use, and the legal description of
the subdivision of land on which the point of diversion is located.
Such statement)) date specified in the summons, each defendant
shall file with the clerk of the superior court an adjudication claim
on a form and in a manner provided by the department, and mail or
electronically mail a copy to the department. The adjudication claim
must contain substantially the following, except that when the legal
basis for the claimed right is a federally reserved right, the
information must be filed only as applicable:
(a) The name, mailing address, and telephone contact number of each
defendant on the claim, and e-mail address, if available;
(b) The purpose or purposes of use of the water and the annual and
instantaneous quantities of water put to beneficial use;
(c) For each use, the date the first steps were taken under the law
to put the water to beneficial use;
(d) The date of beginning and completion of the construction of
wells, ditches, or other works to put the water to use;
(e) The maximum amount of land ever under irrigation and the
maximum annual and instantaneous quantities of water ever used thereon
prior to the date of the statement and if for power, or other purposes,
the maximum annual and instantaneous quantities of water ever used
prior to the date of the adjudication claim;
(f) The dates between which water is used annually;
(g) If located outside the boundaries of a city, town, or special
purpose district that provides water to property within its service
area, the legal description and county tax parcel number of the land
upon which the water as presently claimed has been, or may be, put to
beneficial use;
(h) The legal description and county tax parcel number of the
subdivision of land on which the point of diversion or withdrawal is
located as well as land survey and geographic positioning coordinates
of the same if available;
(i) Whether a right to surface or groundwater, or both, is claimed
and the source of the surface water and the location and depth of all
wells;
(j) The legal basis for the claimed right;
(k) Whether a statement of claim relating to the water right was
filed under chapter 90.14 RCW or whether a declaration relating to the
water right was filed under chapter 90.44 RCW and, if so, the claim or
declaration number, and whether the right is documented by a permit or
certificate and, if so, the permit number or certificate number. When
the source is a well, the well log number must be provided, when
available;
(l) The amount of land and the annual and instantaneous quantities
of water used thereon, or used for power or other purposes, that the
defendant claims as a present right.
(2) The adjudicated claim shall be verified on oath by the
defendant, and in the discretion of the court may be amended. The
department shall furnish the form for the adjudication claim. A
claimant may file an adjudication claim electronically if authorized
under state and local court rules. The department may assist claimants
in their effort by making the department's pertinent records and
information accessible electronically or by other means and through
conferring with claimants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Within the date set by the court for filing evidence, each claimant
shall file with the court evidence to support the claimant's
adjudication claims. The court is encouraged to set a date for filing
evidence that is reasonable and fair in expediting the adjudication.
The evidence may include, without limitation, permits or certificates
of water right, statements of claim made under chapter 90.14 RCW,
deeds, documents related to issuance of a land patent, aerial
photographs, decrees of previous water rights adjudications, crop
records, records of livestock purchases and sales, records of power
use, metering records, declarations containing testimonial evidence,
records of diversion, withdrawal or storage and delivery by irrigation
districts or ditch companies, and any other evidence to support that a
water right was obtained and was not thereafter abandoned or
relinquished. The evidence filed may include matters that are outside
the original adjudication claim filed, and within the date set by the
court for filing evidence, the claimant may amend the adjudication
claim to conform to the evidence filed. Thereafter, except for good
cause shown, a claimant may not file additional evidence to support the
claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
Within one hundred twenty days after the date set by the court for
filing an adjudication claim, unless the time period is extended by the
court, each claimant shall file with the court evidence to support the
claimant's adjudication claims. The evidence may include, without
limitation, permits or certificates of water right, statements of claim
made under chapter 90.14 RCW, deeds, aerial photographs, decrees of
previous water rights adjudications, crop records, records of livestock
purchases and sales, records of power use, metering records,
declarations containing testimonial evidence, records of diversion,
withdrawal or storage and delivery by irrigation districts or ditch
companies, and any other evidence to support that a water right was
obtained and was not thereafter abandoned or relinquished. Thereafter,
except for good cause shown, a claimant may not file additional
evidence to support the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the receipt of adjudication claims and the filing of
claimants' evidence, the department shall conduct a preliminary
investigation for the purpose of examining:
(a) The uses of the subject waters by and any physical works in
connection with the persons to whom the general or limited adjudication
applies; and
(b) The uses for which a statement of claim has been filed under
chapter 90.14 RCW or for which the department has a permit or
certificate of water right on record.
(2)(a) The examination may include, as the department deems
appropriate:
(i) An estimation of the amount of water that is reasonably
necessary to accomplish various beneficial uses within the area;
(ii) The measurement of stream flows;
(iii) The measurement of any diversion or withdrawal rates;
(iv) An estimation of storage capacity and the amount of water
stored;
(v) The types and numbers of stock watered;
(vi) The number of residences served;
(vii) The location and size of any irrigated land areas; and
(viii) Any other information pertinent to the determination of
water rights in an adjudication under this chapter.
(b) The department may also take other necessary steps and gather
other data and information as may be essential to the proper
understanding of the water uses and associated rights of the affected
water users, including review of each claimant's adjudication claim and
evidence the claimant filed to support the claim. The claimants and
the department are encouraged to confer as may be beneficial to clarify
the factual and legal basis for the claim. To the extent consistent
with court rules, the court may deem it appropriate to encourage
claimants and the department to work closely together to reach
agreement on a claimed water right that may result in timely settlement
of water rights, reduced costs for the parties, greater equity and
general public service, and better information that may be used for
overall water management.
(3) The department shall file with the court the department's
report of findings as to each adjudication claim filed timely under RCW
90.03.140. The department may divide its report of findings into two
or more segments, covering particular drainages, uses, or other
appropriate bases for dividing the report on adjudication claims.
Based on the evidence filed by claimants and the department's report of
findings, the department shall file with the superior court either or
both of the following motions:
(a) A motion for a partial decree in favor of all stated claims
under RCW 90.03.140 that the department finds to be substantiated with
factual evidence; or
(b) A motion seeking determination of contested claims before the
court.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.03.160 and 1989 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon ((the completion of the service of summons as hereinbefore
provided, the superior court in which said proceeding is pending shall
make an order referring said proceeding to the department to take
testimony by its duly authorized designee, as referee, and the designee
shall report to and file with the superior court of the county in which
such cause is pending a transcript of such testimony for adjudication
thereon by such court. The superior court may, in any complex case
with more than one thousand named defendants, including the United
States, retain for hearing and further processing such portions of the
proceeding as pertain to a discrete class or classes of defendants or
claims of water rights if the court determines that: (1) Resolution of
claims of such classes appear to involve significant issues of law,
either procedural or substantive; and (2) such a retention will both
expedite the conclusion of the case and reduce the overall expenditures
of the plaintiff, defendants, and the court)) filing of the
department's motion or motions under section 11(3) of this act, any
party with a claim filed under RCW 90.03.140 for the appropriation of
water or waters of the subject adjudication may file and serve a
response to the department's motion or motions within the time set by
the court for such a response. Objections must include specific
information in regard to the particular disposition against which the
objection is being made. Objections must also state the underlying
basis of the objection being made, including general information about
the forms of evidence that support the objection. Any party may file
testimony with the court and serve it on other parties. If a party
intends to cross-examine a claimant or witness based on another party's
prefiled testimony, the party intending to cross-examine shall file a
notice of intent to cross-examine no later than fifteen days in advance
of the hearing. If no notice of intent to cross-examine based on the
prefiled testimony is given, then the claimant or witness is not
required to appear at the hearing. Any party may present evidence in
support of or in response to an objection.
(2) The superior court may appoint a referee or other judicial
officer to assist the court.
(3) The superior court may adopt special rules of procedure for an
adjudication of water rights under this chapter. The rules of
procedure for a superior court apply to an adjudication of water rights
under this chapter unless superseded by special rules of the court
under this subsection. The superior court is encouraged to consider
entering, after notice and hearing and as the court determines
appropriate, pretrial orders from an adjudication commenced on October
12, 1977.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that early settlement of contested claims
is needed for a fair and efficient adjudication of water rights.
Therefore, the department and other parties should identify
opportunities for settlement. To the extent consistent with court
rules, the court as it deems beneficial is encouraged to urge as many
parties to the adjudication as possible to reach timely agreement on
claimed water rights in a manner that limits costs to the public,
claimants, counties, courts, and the department. Further, at
appropriate times throughout the process the court as it deems
beneficial is encouraged to direct parties to utilize alternative
methods of dispute resolution, including informal meetings,
negotiation, mediation, or other methods to reach agreement on disputed
claims.
(2) Any time after the filing of all claims under RCW 90.03.140,
the department or another party may move the superior court to allow
parties to meet for settlement discussions for a set length of time,
either before an appointed mediator or without a mediator. For good
cause shown, the court may extend the length of time for settlement
discussions. The costs of mediation must be equitably borne by the
parties to the mediation. If the department and a claimant reach
agreement on settlement, the department shall file a motion to approve
the settlement pursuant to section 11(3)(a) of this act and shall
disclose the terms of the settlement to other parties to the
adjudication. The court shall conduct a hearing prior to approving a
settlement and any party to the adjudication may object or offer
modifications to the settlement.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.03.180 and 1995 c 292 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
At the time of filing the ((statement)) adjudication claim as
provided in RCW 90.03.140, each defendant, except the United States or
an Indian tribe under 43 U.S.C. Sec. 666, shall pay to the clerk of the
superior court a fee as set under RCW ((36.18.020)) 36.18.016.

Sec. 15 RCW 90.03.200 and 1988 c 202 s 91 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the ((filing of the evidence and the report of the department,
any interested party may, on or before five days prior to the date of
said hearing, file exceptions to such report in writing and such
exception shall set forth the grounds therefor and a copy thereof shall
be served personally or by registered mail upon all parties who have
appeared in the proceeding. If no exceptions be filed, the court shall
enter a decree determining the rights of the parties according to the
evidence and the report of the department, whether such parties have
appeared therein or not. If exceptions are filed the action shall
proceed as in case of reference of a suit in equity and the court may
in its discretion take further evidence or, if necessary, remand the
case for such further evidence to be taken by the department's
designee, and may require further report by him. Costs, not including
taxable attorneys fees, may be allowed or not; if allowed, may be
apportioned among the parties in the discretion of the court)) court's
determination of all issues, the court shall issue a final decree and
provide notice of the decree to all parties. The final decree must
order each party whose rights have been confirmed, except the United
States or an Indian tribe under 43 U.S.C. Sec. 666, to pay the
department the fees required by RCW 90.03.470(10) and any other
applicable fee schedule within ninety days after the department sends
notice to the party under RCW 90.03.240. Appellate review of the
decree shall be in the same manner as in other cases in equity, except
that review must be sought within sixty days from the entry thereof.

Sec. 16 RCW 90.03.210 and 2001 c 220 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the pendency of such adjudication proceedings prior to
judgment or upon review by an appellate court, the stream or other
water involved shall be regulated or partially regulated according to
the schedule of rights specified in the department's report upon an
order of the court authorizing such regulation: PROVIDED, Any
interested party may file a bond and obtain an order staying the
regulation of said stream as to him, in which case the court shall make
such order regarding the regulation of the stream or other water as he
may deem just. The bond shall be filed within five days following the
service of notice of appeal in an amount to be fixed by the court and
with sureties satisfactory to the court, conditioned to perform the
judgment of the court.
(2) Any appeal of a decision of the department on an application to
change or transfer a water right subject to ((a general)) an
adjudication that is being litigated actively ((and was commenced
before October 13, 1977,)) shall be conducted as follows:
(a) The appeal shall be filed with the court conducting the
adjudication and served under RCW 34.05.542(3). The content of the
notice of appeal shall conform to RCW 34.05.546. Standing to appeal
shall be based on the requirements of RCW 34.05.530 and is not limited
to parties to the adjudication.
(b) If the appeal includes a challenge to the portion of the
department's decision that pertains to tentative determinations of the
validity and extent of the water right, review of those tentative
determinations shall be conducted by the court consistent with the
provisions of RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that the review
shall be de novo.
(c) If the appeal includes a challenge to any portion of the
department's decision other than the tentative determinations of the
validity and extent of the right, the court must certify to the
pollution control hearings board for review and decision those portions
of the department's decision. Review by the pollution control hearings
board shall be conducted consistent with chapter 43.21B RCW and the
board's implementing regulations, except that the requirements for
filing, service, and content of the notice of appeal shall be governed
by (a) of this subsection. Any party to an appeal may move the court
to certify portions of the appeal to the pollution control hearings
board, but the appellant must file a motion for certification no later
than ninety days after the appeal is filed under this section.
(d) Appeals shall be scheduled to afford all parties full
opportunity to participate before the superior court and the pollution
control hearings board.
(e) Any person wishing to appeal the decision of the board made
under (c) of this subsection shall seek review of the decision in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, except that the petition for review
must be filed with the superior court conducting the adjudication.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or modify
any treaty or other federal rights of an Indian tribe, or the rights of
any federal agency or other person or entity arising under federal law.
Nothing in this section is intended or shall be construed as affecting
or modifying any existing right of a federally recognized Indian tribe
to protect from impairment its federally reserved water rights in
federal court.

Sec. 17 RCW 90.03.240 and 1987 c 109 s 82 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon the court's final determination of the rights to ((the
diversion of)) water ((it shall be the duty of)), the department ((to))
shall issue to each person entitled to ((the diversion of)) a water
right by such a determination, a certificate ((under his official
seal)) of adjudicated water right, setting forth the name and ((post
office)) mailing address of record with the court of such person; the
priority and purpose of the right; the period during which said right
may be exercised, the point of diversion or withdrawal, and the place
of use; the land to which said water right is appurtenant ((and when
applicable)); the maximum ((quantity)) annual and instantaneous
quantities of water allowed; and specific provisions or limitations or
both under which the water right has been confirmed.
The department shall provide notice to the water right holder that
the certificate has been prepared for issuance and that fees for the
issuance of the certificate are due in accordance with RCW 90.03.470
and any other applicable fee schedule. If the water right holder fails
to submit the required fees within one year from the date the notice
was issued by the department, the department may move the court for
sanctions for violation of the court's order in the final decree
requiring payment.

Sec. 18 RCW 90.03.243 and 1982 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The expenses incurred by the state in a proceeding to determine
rights to water initiated under RCW 90.03.110 or 90.44.220 or upon
appeal of such a determination shall be borne by the state. Subject to
the availability of state funding provided either by direct
appropriation or funded by the department through the administrative
office of the courts for this specific purpose, the county in which an
adjudication is being held must be provided the extraordinary costs
imposed on the superior court of that county due to the adjudication.

Sec. 19 RCW 90.44.220 and 1987 c 109 s 119 are each amended to
read as follows:
((In its discretion or upon the application of any party claiming
right to the withdrawal and use of public groundwater, the department
may file a petition)) Upon the filing of a petition with the department
by a planning unit or by one or more persons claiming a right to any
waters within the state or when, after investigation, in the judgment
of the department, the public interest will be served by a
determination of the rights thereto, the department shall file a
petition to conduct a limited or general adjudication with the superior
court of the county for the determination of the rights of
appropriators of any particular groundwater body and all the provisions
of RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.240 ((as heretofore amended)) and
sections 1, 4 through 6, 9 through 11, and 13 of this act, shall govern
and apply to the adjudication and determination of such groundwater
body and to the ownership thereof. Hereafter, in any proceedings for
the limited or general adjudication and determination of water rights--either rights to the use of surface water or to the use of groundwater,
or both -- pursuant to chapter 90.03 RCW ((as heretofore amended)), all
or part of the appropriators of groundwater or of surface water in the
particular basin or area may be included as parties to such
adjudication, as ((pertinent)) set forth in chapter 90.03 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) ((Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.)) Appeals
of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and 90.44.220.
(d) Appeals of decisions by the department to administer or enforce
a final adjudication decree if a superior court has retained
jurisdiction to administer or enforce such a decree.
(e) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e))) (f) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in
chapter 43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Except as provided in RCW 43.21B.110, this
act applies only to adjudications initiated after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 90.03.170 (Determination of water rights -- Hearing -- Notice--Prior rights preserved) and 1987 c 109 s 77 & 1917 c 117 s 20; and
(2) RCW 90.03.190 (Determination of water rights -- Transcript of
testimony -- Filing -- Notice of hearing) and 1987 c 109 s 78 & 1917 c 117
s 22.

--- END ---