BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state acupuncture quality assurance commission
is established, consisting of nine members appointed by the governor to
four-year terms, and including seven practicing acupuncturists and two
public members. No member may serve more than two consecutive full
terms. Members of the commission hold office until their successors
are appointed. The governor may appoint the initial members of the
commission to staggered terms of from one to four years. Thereafter,
all members shall be appointed to full four-year terms. The governor
may consider persons who are recommended for appointment by
acupuncturist associations of this state.
(2) Members of the commission must be citizens of the United States
and residents of this state. Members must have been licensed
acupuncturists for a period of five years before appointment and may
not hold licenses in other health care professions other than
acupuncture. Public members of the commission may not be a member of
any other health care licensing board or commission, have a fiduciary
obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated under this
chapter, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of
health services under this chapter.
(3) The commission shall elect officers each year including, but
not limited to, a chair and a vice-chair. Meetings of the commission
are open to the public, except that the commission may hold executive
sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The secretary
shall furnish secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as required
by the commission.
(4) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5)(a) A majority of the commission members appointed and serving
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business. The
affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is
required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass
a measure.
(b) Commission members may participate remotely in a commission
meeting by means of a telephone or similar communications equipment
when it is otherwise difficult or impossible for the member to attend
in person if:
(i) The member participating remotely can be identified when
speaking;
(ii) All participants are able to hear each other at the same time;
and
(iii) Members of the public attending the meeting are able to hear
any member of the board who speaks at the meeting, including the member
participating remotely.
(c) The commission shall notify the governor when any commission
member has missed three consecutive meetings of the full commission.
(6) The commission may appoint members of panels of at least three
members. A quorum for transaction of any business by a panel is a
minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is
required to transact business delegated to it by the commission.
(7) Members of the commission are immune from suit in an action,
civil or criminal, based upon the commission's disciplinary proceedings
or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the
commission.
(8) The commission may adopt such rules as are consistent with this
chapter as may be deemed necessary and proper to carry out the purposes
of this chapter.
(9) The governor may remove a member of the commission for neglect
of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office. Whenever
the governor is satisfied that a member of the commission has been
guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in
office, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement
of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the
secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the order of removal
and statement of causes by certified mail to the last known post office
address of the member. If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the
governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the remainder of the
unexpired term.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.06.010 and 1995 c 323 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following terms in this chapter shall have the meanings set
forth in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Acupuncture" means a health care service based on an Oriental
system of medical theory utilizing Oriental diagnosis and treatment to
promote health and treat organic or functional disorders by treating
specific acupuncture points or meridians. Acupuncture includes the
following techniques:
(a) Use of acupuncture needles to stimulate acupuncture points and
meridians;
(b) Use of electrical, mechanical, or magnetic devices to stimulate
acupuncture points and meridians;
(c) Moxibustion;
(d) Acupressure;
(e) Cupping;
(f) Dermal friction technique;
(g) Infra-red;
(h) Sonopuncture;
(i) Laserpuncture;
(j) Point injection therapy (aquapuncture); and
(k) Dietary advice based on Oriental medical theory provided in
conjunction with techniques under (a) through (j) of this subsection.
(2) "Acupuncturist" means a person licensed under this chapter.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state acupuncture quality
assurance commission created in section 1 of this act.
(4) "Department" means the department of health.
(((4))) (5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.06.020 and 1995 c 323 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No one may hold themselves out to the public as an
acupuncturist or licensed acupuncturist or any derivative thereof which
is intended to or is likely to lead the public to believe such a person
is an acupuncturist or licensed acupuncturist unless licensed as
provided for in this chapter.
(2) A person may not practice acupuncture if the person is not
licensed under this chapter.
(3) No one may use any configuration of letters after their name
(including Ac.) which indicates a degree or formal training in
acupuncture unless licensed as provided for in this chapter.
(4) The ((secretary)) commission may by rule proscribe or regulate
advertising and other forms of patient solicitation which are likely to
mislead or deceive the public as to whether someone is licensed under
this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.06.045 and 1995 c 323 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice by an individual credentialed under the laws of
this state and performing services within such individual's authorized
scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an
educational program approved by the ((secretary)) commission, and whose
performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction
or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of
the instructor;
(4) The practice of acupuncture by any person credentialed to
perform acupuncture in any other jurisdiction where such person is
doing so in the course of regular instruction of a school of
acupuncture approved by the ((secretary)) commission or in an
educational seminar by a professional organization of acupuncture,
provided that in the latter case, the practice is supervised directly
by a person licensed under this chapter or licensed under any other
healing art whose scope of practice includes acupuncture.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.06.050 and 2004 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person seeking to be examined shall present to the
((secretary)) commission at least forty-five days before the
commencement of the examination:
(1) A written application on a form or forms provided by the
((secretary)) commission setting forth under affidavit such information
as the ((secretary)) commission may require; and
(2) Proof that the candidate has:
(a) Successfully completed a course, approved by the ((secretary))
commission, of didactic training in basic sciences and acupuncture over
a minimum period of two academic years. The training shall include
such subjects as anatomy, physiology, microbiology, biochemistry,
pathology, hygiene, and a survey of western clinical sciences. The
basic science classes must be equivalent to those offered at the
collegiate level. However, if the applicant is a licensed chiropractor
under chapter 18.25 RCW or a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A
RCW, the requirements of this subsection relating to basic sciences may
be reduced by up to one year depending upon the extent of the
candidate's qualifications as determined under rules adopted by the
((secretary)) commission;
(b) Successfully completed five hundred hours of clinical training
in acupuncture that is approved by the ((secretary)) commission.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.06.060 and 1991 c 3 s 8 are each amended to read as
follows:
The ((department)) commission shall consider for approval any
school, program, apprenticeship, or tutorial which meets the
requirements outlined in this chapter and provides the training
required under RCW 18.06.050. Clinical and didactic training may be
approved as separate programs or as a joint program. The process for
approval shall be established by the ((secretary)) commission by rule.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.06.070 and 1991 c 3 s 9 are each amended to read as
follows:
No applicant may be permitted to take an examination under this
chapter until the ((secretary)) commission has approved his or her
application and the applicant has paid an examination fee as prescribed
under RCW 43.70.250. The examination fee shall accompany the
application.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.06.080 and 1995 c 323 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) commission is hereby authorized and empowered
to execute the provisions of this chapter and shall offer examinations
in acupuncture at least twice a year at such times and places as the
((secretary)) commission may select. The examination shall be a
written examination and may include a practical examination.
(2) The ((secretary)) commission shall develop or approve a
licensure examination in the subjects that the ((secretary)) commission
determines are within the scope of and commensurate with the work
performed by licensed acupuncturists and shall include but not
necessarily be limited to anatomy, physiology, microbiology,
biochemistry, pathology, hygiene, and acupuncture. All application
papers shall be deposited with the ((secretary)) commission and there
retained for at least one year, when they may be destroyed.
(3) If the examination is successfully passed, the ((secretary))
commission shall confer on such candidate the title of Licensed
Acupuncturist.
(4) The ((secretary)) commission may appoint members of the
profession to serve in an ad hoc advisory capacity to the ((secretary))
commission in carrying out this chapter. The members will serve for
designated times and provide advice on matters specifically identified
and requested by the ((secretary)) commission. The members shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.040 and 43.03.060.
(5) The ((secretary)) commission, ad hoc committee members, or
individuals acting in their behalf are immune from suit in a civil
action based on any certification or disciplinary proceedings or other
official acts performed in the course of their duties.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.06.110 and 1995 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
disciplining of license holders under this chapter. The ((secretary))
commission shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.06.130 and 2003 c 53 s 121 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((secretary)) commission shall develop a form to be used by
an acupuncturist to inform the patient of the acupuncturist's scope of
practice and qualifications. All license holders shall bring the form
to the attention of the patients in whatever manner the ((secretary))
commission, by rule, provides.
(2) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.06.140 and 2003 c 53 s 122 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every licensed acupuncturist shall develop a written plan for
consultation, emergency transfer, and referral to other health care
practitioners operating within the scope of their authorized practices.
The written plan shall be submitted with the initial application for
licensure as well as annually thereafter with the license renewal fee
to the department. The department may withhold licensure or renewal of
licensure if the plan fails to meet the standards contained in rules
adopted by the ((secretary)) commission.
(2) When the acupuncturist sees patients with potentially serious
disorders such as cardiac conditions, acute abdominal symptoms, and
such other conditions, the acupuncturist shall immediately request a
consultation or recent written diagnosis from a physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW. In the event that the patient with
the disorder refuses to authorize such consultation or provide a recent
diagnosis from such physician, acupuncture treatment shall not be
continued.
(3) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.06.160 and 1991 c 3 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((secretary)) commission shall adopt rules in the manner
provided by chapter 34.05 RCW as are necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.06.190 and 1995 c 323 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((secretary)) commission may license a person without
examination if such person is credentialed as an acupuncturist in
another jurisdiction if, in the ((secretary's)) commission's judgment,
the requirements of that jurisdiction are equivalent to or greater than
those of Washington state.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.130.040 and 2009 c 2 s 16 (Initiative Measure No.
1029) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;
(iii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iv) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(v) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(vi) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vii) ((Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
(viii))) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(((ix))) (viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under
chapter 18.89 RCW;
(((x))) (ix) Persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(((xi))) (x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, marriage
and family therapists, and social workers under chapter 18.225 RCW;
(((xii))) (xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under
chapter 18.52C RCW;
(((xiii))) (xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under
chapter 18.88A RCW;
(((xiv))) (xiii) Health care assistants certified under chapter
18.135 RCW;
(((xv))) (xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter
18.138 RCW;
(((xvi))) (xv) Chemical dependency professionals certified under
chapter 18.205 RCW;
(((xvii))) (xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified
affiliate sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter
18.155 RCW;
(((xviii))) (xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter
18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;
(((xix))) (xviii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(((xx))) (xix) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter
18.200 RCW;
(((xxi))) (xx) Surgical technologists registered under chapter
18.215 RCW;
(((xxii))) (xxi) Recreational therapists;
(((xxiii))) (xxii) Animal massage practitioners certified under
chapter 18.240 RCW;
(((xxiv))) (xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250
RCW; and
(((xxv))) (xxiv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B
RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW; ((and))
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The Washington state acupuncture quality assurance commission.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---