BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.112 and 2005 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A primary is a first stage in the public process by which
voters elect candidates to public office.
(2) Whenever candidates for a partisan office are to be elected,
the general election must be preceded by a primary conducted under this
chapter. The primary shall be conducted using the ranked choice voting
format described in chapter 29A.53 RCW. Based upon votes cast at the
primary, after one candidate has received a majority of the votes
during a counting stage, the ((top)) two candidates with the largest
number of votes will be certified as qualified to appear on the general
election ballot, unless only one candidate qualifies as provided in RCW
29A.36.170.
(3) For partisan office, if a candidate has expressed a party or
independent preference on the declaration of candidacy, then that
preference will be shown after the name of the candidate on the primary
and general election ballots by appropriate abbreviation as set forth
in rules of the secretary of state. A candidate may express no party
or independent preference. Any party or independent preferences are
shown for the information of voters only and may in no way limit the
options available to voters.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.52.141 and 2004 c 271 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
Instructions for voting a consolidated ballot or a physically
separate ballot, whichever is applicable, together with instructions
for completing the ballot using the ranked choice voting procedure,
must appear, at the very least, in:
(1) Any primary voters' pamphlet prepared by the secretary of state
or a local government if a partisan office will appear on the ballot;
(2) Instructions that accompany any partisan primary ballot;
(3) Any notice of a partisan primary published in compliance with
RCW 29A.52.311;
(4) A sample ballot prepared by a county auditor under RCW
29A.36.151 for a partisan primary;
(5) The web site of the office of the secretary of state and any
existing web site of a county auditor's office; and
(6) Every polling place.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.52.161 and 2004 c 271 s 144 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to mean that a voter may
cast more than one vote for candidates for a given office. For the
purposes of ranked choice voting, votes cast on a single ballot for
different candidates for an office constitute a single vote.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.52.210 and 2003 c 111 s 1305 are each amended to
read as follows:
All city and town primaries shall be nonpartisan. Primaries for
special purpose districts, except those districts that require
ownership of property within the district as a prerequisite to voting,
shall be nonpartisan. City, town, and district primaries shall be held
as provided in RCW ((29A.04.310)) 29A.04.311.
The purpose of this section is to establish the holding of a
primary, subject to the exemptions in RCW 29A.52.220, as a uniform
procedural requirement to the holding of city, town, and district
elections. These provisions supersede any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different election
requirements.
All primaries conducted under this section shall use the ranked
choice voting procedures described in chapter 29A.53 RCW. Based upon
votes cast at the primary, after one candidate has received a majority
of the votes during a counting stage, the two candidates with the
largest number of votes will be certified as qualified to appear on the
general election ballot.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.52.220 and 2005 c 153 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No primary may be held for any single position in any city,
town, district, or district court, as required by RCW 29A.52.210, if,
after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw, there are no
more than two candidates filed for the position. The county auditor
shall, as soon as possible, notify all the candidates so affected that
the office for which they filed will not appear on the primary ballot.
(2) ((No primary may be held for nonpartisan offices in any first-class city if the city:
(a) Is a qualifying city that has been certified to participate in
the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020; and
(b) Is conducting an election using the instant runoff voting
method for the pilot project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020.
(c) This subsection (2) expires July 1, 2013.
(3))) No primary may be held for the office of commissioner of a
park and recreation district or for the office of cemetery district
commissioner.
(((4))) (3) Names of candidates for offices that do not appear on
the primary ballot shall be printed upon the general election ballot in
the manner specified by RCW 29A.36.131.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.53.010 and 2005 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to
examine the use of a voting system that requires all victorious
candidates to be elected with a majority vote rather than a plurality
of effective votes, and that allows voters to designate secondary and
other preferences for potential tabulation if their first choice
candidate does not receive a majority of the votes cast. The
legislature recognizes that the system known as ((instant runoff))
ranked choice voting achieves these purposes.
(2) The legislature wishes to examine whether voter interest and
participation in elections will increase when instant ((runoff voting))
ranked choice, a voting method that promotes additional voter choices
and a more meaningful recognition of all voter selections, is used to
elect nonpartisan candidates. The legislature declares that it is in
the interest of participatory democracy for voters to be given the
opportunity to vote for their first choice candidate while still making
effective secondary choices among the remaining candidates.
(3) The legislature therefore intends to authorize a limited pilot
project to study the effects of using instant ((runoff voting)) ranked
choice as a local option for nonpartisan offices in any qualifying
city.
(4) Any county qualifying for implementation of a ranked choice
voting pilot project for its general election need not conduct a
primary for the offices being determined by ranked choice voting.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.53.020 and 2005 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature intends to establish ((an instant runoff)) a ranked
choice voting pilot project to be completed by willing state and local
election administrators in full partnership and cooperation.
If the county auditor of a county containing any city that has
demonstrated support for ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting, as
provided by subsection (1)(((c)))(b) of this section, provides written
notification of pilot project participation to the secretary of state
((by January 1, 2007)), the secretary of state shall conduct a pilot
project to examine the use of ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting
as a local option for nonpartisan offices in any qualifying city in
that county. Following the timely receipt by the secretary of state of
the written notification, the pilot project must begin by August 1,
((2008)) 2010, and conclude no later than July 1, 2013.
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, a qualifying city must:
(a) Be classified as a first-class city as defined by chapter 35.22
RCW; and
(b) ((Have a population greater than one hundred forty thousand and
less than two hundred thousand as of July 24, 2005, as determined by
the office of financial management; and
(c))) Have demonstrated support for ((instant runoff)) ranked
choice voting by approving a city charter amendment authorizing the
city council to use ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting for the
election of city officers.
(2)(a) Following the timely receipt by the secretary of state of a
notification of participation from a county auditor, and in accordance
with the provisions of this section, the secretary of state shall
certify at least one city in that county to qualify and participate in
the pilot project. Only a qualifying city or cities certified for
participation by the secretary of state may participate in the pilot
project.
(b) The county auditor of a county containing a qualifying and
certified city who has submitted a timely notification of participation
shall participate in the pilot project.
(3) Elections conducted under the ((instant runoff)) ranked choice
voting method for the pilot project must comply with this chapter and
may be held only on the dates specified by RCW 29A.04.330(1).
(4) For the purpose of implementing this chapter, the secretary of
state shall develop and adopt:
(a) Rules governing the conduct of ((instant runoff)) ranked choice
voting elections; and
(b) A pilot project timeline. The secretary of state may consult
with appropriate local officials to develop this timeline. The
timeline is subject to review and modification by the secretary of
state, as necessary.
(5) All election equipment and related processes shall be certified
by the secretary of state before an election may be conducted under the
((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting method.
(6) The secretary of state shall submit a report of findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2013, that
includes, but is not limited to:
(a) An assessment of all elections conducted using the ((instant
runoff)) ranked choice voting method;
(b) Recommendations for statutory, rule, and local voting
procedural modifications that would be required prior to implementing
((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting as a permanent alternative
election method for special and general elections;
(c) An inventory of available election equipment necessary for
conducting elections under the ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting
method, including costs associated with the equipment; and
(d) Any recommendations from any city legislative body or county
auditor participating in this pilot project.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.53.030 and 2005 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Candidates who remain" means all candidates who have not been
eliminated at a previous stage.
(2) "Choice" means an indication on a ballot of a voter's ranking
of candidates for any single office according to the voter's
preference.
(3) "Continuing ballot" means a ballot that is not exhausted.
(4) "Exhausted ballot" means a ballot on which all indicated
choices have become votes for the candidates so designated or when the
ballot contains only choices for eliminated candidates.
(5) (("Instant runoff)) "Ranked choice voting" means a system of
voting in which voters may designate as many as three candidates for
the same office in order of preference by indicating a first choice, a
second choice, and a third choice.
(6) "Last place candidate" means a candidate who has received the
fewest votes among the candidates who remain at any stage. Two or more
candidates simultaneously become last place candidates when their
combined votes are equal to or fewer than all votes for the candidate
with the third highest vote total.
(7) "Next choice" means the highest ranked choice for a remaining
candidate that has not become a vote at a previous stage.
(8) "Remaining candidate" means a candidate who has not been
eliminated.
(9) "Stage" or "stage in the counting" means a step in the counting
process during which votes for all remaining candidates are tabulated
for the purpose of determining whether a candidate has achieved a
majority of the votes cast for a particular office, and, absent a
majority, which candidate or candidates must be eliminated.
(10) "Vote" means a ballot choice that is counted toward election
of a candidate. Except as provided by RCW 29A.53.050 and 29A.53.060,
all first choices are votes. Lower ranked choices are potential votes
that may, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, be
credited to and become votes for a candidate.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.53.040 and 2005 c 153 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
To the extent they are not inconsistent with this chapter, the laws
governing elections apply to the pilot project on ((instant runoff))
ranked choice voting authorized by this chapter. The authority of a
city meeting the criteria of RCW 29A.53.020 and 29A.53.070 to
participate in an election conducted under the ((instant runoff))
ranked choice voting method expires on July 1, 2013.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.53.050 and 2005 c 153 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following provisions, subject to the conditions of RCW
29A.53.060, govern how votes for candidates for each office shall be
tabulated under the ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting method:
(1) All first choice votes cast for the office shall be tabulated
in the first counting stage. If, following this first counting stage,
a candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the office, that
candidate is deemed elected to the office and counting ends;
(2) If no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the
office during the first counting stage, the second counting stage
begins by eliminating the last place candidate for that office. On
ballots that indicate a first choice preference for the eliminated
candidate, the second choice preferences are counted as votes for the
candidates so designated. If, following this second counting stage, a
candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the office, that
candidate is deemed elected to the office and counting ends;
(3) If, following the second counting stage, no candidate receives
a majority of the votes cast for the office, the third counting stage
begins by eliminating the last place candidate for that office. On
ballots that indicate a first choice preference for the eliminated
candidate, the next choice preferences are counted as votes for the
candidates so designated. If, following this third counting stage, a
candidate receives a majority of votes cast for the office, that
candidate is deemed elected to the office and counting ends;
(4) If, following the third counting stage, no candidate receives
a majority of the votes cast for the office, the counting process
provided by subsection (3) of this section continues in succession
until either a candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for the
office or all but one candidate has been eliminated. In accordance
with the provisions of this subsection, a candidate who receives either
a majority of the votes cast for the office or who is the sole
remaining candidate shall be deemed elected to the office; and
(5) If at any stage in the counting process there are two or more
last place candidates for the office, these candidates must be
eliminated simultaneously. On ballots that indicate a first choice
preference for the eliminated candidates, the next choice preferences
shall be counted as votes for the candidates so designated.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.53.070 and 2005 c 153 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with the provisions of RCW 29A.53.020, the
legislative body of a qualifying city may, for a specific election or
elections, adopt ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting as the method
for electing candidates for all nonpartisan city offices.
(2)(a) After adoption of ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting by
the legislative body of a qualifying city for a specific election or
elections as provided for by subsection (1) of this section, the city
shall, before conducting an election using the ((instant runoff))
ranked choice voting method, notify the county auditor and the
secretary of state of its intent to hold such an election.
(b) If the county auditor notifies the city that existing election
equipment of the county is insufficient for conducting an election
under the ((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting method, the city and
the auditor shall negotiate an agreement for the purchase of any new
equipment specifically required for this election method. Nothing in
this subsection precludes the auditor from canvassing the returns of
((an instant runoff)) a ranked choice voting election by hand.
(3) The date of any election conducted under the ((instant runoff))
ranked choice voting method must be consistent with the timeline
required by RCW 29A.53.020.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.53.080 and 2005 c 153 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Ballots for elections conducted under the ((instant runoff)) ranked
choice voting method should be clear and easily understood. Sample
ballots illustrating voting procedures must be posted in or near voting
booths and included within instruction packets for absentee ballots.
Directions provided to voters must conform substantially to the
following specifications:

"You may choose a maximum of three candidates for each
office in order of preference. Indicate your first choice
designation by marking the number "1" beside a candidate's name
(or by marking in the column labeled "First Choice"). Indicate
your second choice designation by marking the number "2" beside
a candidate's name (or by marking in the column labeled "Second
Choice"). Indicate your third choice designation by marking
the number "3" beside a candidate's name (or by marking in the
column labeled "Third Choice"). You are not required to choose
more than one candidate for each office. Designating two or
more candidates in order of preference will not affect your
first choice designation. Do not mark the same designation
number beside more than one candidate or put more than one mark
in each column for the office on which you are voting. Do not
skip designation numbers."

Sec. 13 RCW 29A.53.090 and 2005 c 153 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
Participating state and local election officials may provide for
voting directions and the design, processing, and tabulation of
((instant runoff)) ranked choice voting ballots used in the pilot
project authorized by RCW 29A.53.020. State and local actions must be
consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
Election officials should provide voters with a ballot that has a
distinctive design, format, or layout for offices to which ((instant
runoff)) ranked choice voting applies. Ballot sections for contests
that have fewer than three candidates for the same office, however, may
differ from ballot sections for which the ((instant runoff)) ranked
choice voting method applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 29A.53.900 (Expiration date) and 2005
c 153 s 13 are each repealed.

--- END ---