BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
provide faculty and college excellence for Washington citizens by
increasing the number of full-time, tenured academic employee positions
at community and technical colleges and by enabling academic employees
who hold part-time positions to have greater assurance of continuing
employment. Promoting faculty and college excellence will result in
better educational opportunities for our students, our communities, and
our economy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the goal of the legislature that over the next several
years, community and technical colleges increase the numbers of full-time tenured positions on their campuses. This goal is best
accomplished by allowing the colleges to convert assignments currently
held by nontenured academic employees to assignments held by full-time,
tenured or tenure-track academic employees. This will require careful,
strategic planning between the colleges, the state board for community
and technical colleges, and the legislature. Therefore, it is the
intent of the legislature to develop a planning process through which
the colleges and board suggest a long-term strategic plan and timeline
for faculty conversions.
(2) By October 1, 2010, each community and technical college, in
close collaboration with the exclusive bargaining representative for
faculty, shall create a conversion plan to increase the number of full-time tenured faculty positions. The goal of the plan shall be to have
seventy-five percent of state-funded classes taught by full-time
tenured positions by 2015.
(3)(a) In its plan, the college shall state how it intends to meet
its goal by, but not limited to, creating opportunities for adjunct
faculty to attain full-time positions or converting classes or
assignments left vacant by attrition. The plan should not include
discharging currently employed part-time or nontenure-track faculty who
have taught in the college for three or more years.
(b) Each community and technical college shall submit the plan by
October 1, 2010, and every two years thereafter until 2015, to the
state board for community and technical colleges. The plans submitted
in 2012 and 2014 shall include updated cost information related to
faculty conversions and information on colleges' progress in increasing
the percentage of full-time tenure-track teaching assignments.
(c) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
report to the higher education committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2010, and every two years thereafter until 2015, regarding
updated faculty conversion cost information and information regarding
the colleges' progress in increasing the percentage of full-time,
tenure or tenure-track academic employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each community and technical college shall establish a process,
subject to collective bargaining, under which part-time and full-time
nontenured faculty members, after successful completion of an
evaluation period, receive timely notice of and priority consideration,
consistent with other institutional and state policies, for academic
employment assignments for which they are qualified in their discipline
in coming academic terms.
(2) Each community and technical college shall create, subject to
collective bargaining, a process for ensuring that qualified internal
applicants receive priority consideration for attaining a tenure-track
position when one becomes available such as, but not limited to prior
notification of job openings before they are posted outside of the
institution or a job interview for positions where minimum requirements
have been met.
(3) The processes in this section shall be consistent with
institutional and state affirmative action and other personnel
policies.

--- END ---