BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.104.015 and 1999 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "High capacity transportation corridor area" means a quasi-municipal corporation and independent taxing authority within the
meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, created by a transit agency governing body.
(2) "High capacity transportation system" means a system of public
transportation services within an urbanized region operating
principally on exclusive rights-of-way, and the supporting services and
facilities necessary to implement such a system, including interim
express services and high occupancy vehicle lanes, which taken as a
whole, provides a substantially higher level of passenger capacity,
speed, and service frequency than traditional public transportation
systems operating principally in general purpose roadways.
(((2))) (3) "Rail fixed guideway system" means a light, heavy, or
rapid rail system, monorail, inclined plane, funicular, trolley, or
other fixed rail guideway component of a high capacity transportation
system that is not regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration, or
its successor. "Rail fixed guideway system" does not mean elevators,
moving sidewalks or stairs, and vehicles suspended from aerial cables,
unless they are an integral component of a station served by a rail
fixed guideway system.
(((3))) (4) "Regional transit system" means a high capacity
transportation system under the jurisdiction of one or more transit
agencies except where a regional transit authority created under
chapter 81.112 RCW exists, in which case "regional transit system"
means the high capacity transportation system under the jurisdiction of
a regional transit authority.
(((4))) (5) "Transit agency" means city-owned transit systems,
county transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations,
and public transportation benefit areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A governing body of a transit agency in a county that has a
population of more than four hundred thousand and that adjoins a state
boundary may establish one or more high capacity transportation
corridor areas within all or a portion of the boundaries of the transit
agency establishing the high capacity transportation corridor area. A
high capacity transportation corridor area may include all or a portion
of a city or town as long as all or a portion of the city or town
boundaries are within the boundaries of the establishing transit
agency. The members of the transit agency governing body proposing to
establish the high capacity transportation corridor area, acting ex
officio and independently, shall constitute the governing body of the
high capacity transportation corridor area.
(2) A high capacity transportation corridor area may establish,
finance, and provide a high capacity transportation system within its
boundaries in the same manner as authorized for transit agencies under
this chapter. However, any combined tax rates imposed under this
chapter within the boundaries of the transit agency establishing a high
capacity transportation corridor area or areas may not exceed the
maximum rates authorized under RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and
81.104.170.
(3) A high capacity transportation corridor area constitutes a body
corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may be conferred by
statute including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees,
staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to acquire, hold, and
dispose of real and personal property, and to sue and be sued. Public
works contract limits applicable to the transit agency that established
the high capacity transportation corridor area apply to the area.
(4) A high capacity transportation corridor area may exercise the
power of eminent domain to obtain property for its authorized purposes
in the same manner as authorized for the transit agency that
established the area.
(5) A high capacity transportation corridor area may be dissolved
by a majority vote of the governing body when all obligations under any
general obligation bonds issued by the high capacity transportation
corridor area have been discharged and any other contractual
obligations of the high capacity transportation corridor area have
either been discharged or assumed by another governmental entity.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.104.150 and 1992 c 101 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, high capacity transportation corridor areas, and
regional transit authorities may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters and if approved may impose an excise tax of up to two
dollars per month per employee on all employers located within the
((agency's)) applicable jurisdiction, measured by the number of
full-time equivalent employees, solely for the purpose of providing
high capacity transportation service. The rate of tax shall be
approved by the voters. This tax may not be imposed by: (1) A transit
agency or high capacity transportation corridor area when the county
within which it is located is imposing an excise tax pursuant to RCW
81.100.030; or (2) a regional transit authority when any county within
the authority's boundaries is imposing an excise tax pursuant to RCW
81.100.030. The agency or high capacity transportation corridor area
imposing the tax authorized in this section may provide for exemptions
from the tax to such educational, cultural, health, charitable, or
religious organizations as it deems appropriate.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.104.160 and 2003 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agency and high capacity transportation corridor area may impose
a sales and use tax solely for the purpose of providing high capacity
transportation service, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW
82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within the ((agency's)) applicable
jurisdiction that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 2.172 percent. The base
of the tax shall be the selling price in the case of a sales tax or the
rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a use tax.
Any motor vehicle excise tax previously imposed under the
provisions of RCW 81.104.160(1) shall be repealed, terminated and
expire on December 5, 2002.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, high capacity transportation corridor areas, and
regional transit authorities may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters and if approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter, solely for the purpose of providing high capacity
transportation service.
The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to
the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing
district. The maximum rate of such tax shall be approved by the voters
and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price (in the case of
a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax).
The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not exceed
nine-tenths of one percent in any county that imposes a tax under RCW
82.14.340, or within a regional transit authority if any county within
the authority imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340. The exemptions in RCW
82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the state portion of the sales and use
tax and do not extend to the tax authorized in this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 81.104.180 and 1992 c 101 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, high capacity transportation corridor areas, and
regional transit authorities are authorized to pledge revenues from the
employer tax authorized by RCW 81.104.150, the ((special motor vehicle
excise tax)) taxes authorized by RCW 81.104.160, and the sales and use
tax authorized by RCW 81.104.170, to retire bonds issued solely for the
purpose of providing high capacity transportation service.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.104.190 and 1992 c 101 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, high capacity transportation corridor areas, and
regional transit systems may contract with the state department of
revenue or other appropriate entities for administration and collection
of any tax authorized by RCW 81.104.150, 81.104.160, and 81.104.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, a high capacity
transportation corridor area may issue general obligation bonds, not to
exceed an amount, together with any other outstanding nonvoter-approved
general obligation indebtedness, equal to one and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property within the area, as the term "value
of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015. A high capacity
transportation corridor area may also issue general obligation bonds
for capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general
obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to five percent
of the value of the taxable property within the area, as the term
"value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when
authorized by the voters of the area pursuant to Article VIII, section
6 of the state Constitution.
(2) General obligation bonds with a maturity in excess of forty
years shall not be issued. The governing body of the high capacity
transportation corridor area shall by resolution determine for each
general obligation bond issue the amount, date, terms, conditions,
denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates,
maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges,
manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions, if any,
covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and
interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration
may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of
recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are
issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the
requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be effected by the
surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or
the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may
be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding general obligation
bonds may be issued in the same manner as general obligation bonds are
issued.
(3) Whenever general obligation bonds are issued to fund specific
projects or enterprises that generate revenues, charges, user fees, or
special assessments, the high capacity transportation corridor area may
specifically pledge all or a portion of the revenues, charges, user
fees, or special assessments to refund the general obligation bonds.
The high capacity transportation corridor area may also pledge any
other revenues that may be available to the area.
(4) In addition to general obligation bonds, a high capacity
transportation corridor area may issue revenue bonds to be issued and
sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

--- END ---