BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.080 and 2007 c 114 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set
by the board:
(a) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school
employees, retired or disabled employees of county, municipal, or other
political subdivisions, or retired or disabled employees of tribal
governments covered by this chapter may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts after retirement or disablement;
(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately
upon separation from employment;
(c) Surviving spouses and dependent children of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty and surviving spouses and
dependent children of law enforcement officers and firefighters who are
totally disabled in the line of duty and receiving a retirement
allowance as provided under RCW 41.26.470(8) may participate in health
insurance ((plans and contracts));
(d) Law enforcement officers and firefighters who are totally
disabled in the line of duty and receiving a retirement allowance as
provided under RCW 41.26.470(8) and their dependents may participate in
health insurance.
(2) Rates charged surviving spouses of emergency service personnel
killed in the line of duty, law enforcement officers and firefighters
who are totally disabled in the line of duty and receiving a retirement
allowance as provided under RCW 41.26.470(8) and their dependents,
retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or
dependent children who are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare
shall be based on the experience of the community rated risk pool
established under RCW 41.05.022.
(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty, law enforcement officers and
firefighters who are totally disabled in the line of duty and receiving
a retirement allowance as provided under RCW 41.26.470(8) and their
dependents, retired or disabled employees, separated employees,
spouses, or children who are eligible for parts A and B of medicare
shall be calculated from a separate experience risk pool comprised only
of individuals eligible for parts A and B of medicare; however, the
premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees
shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW
41.05.085.
(4) Surviving spouses and dependent children of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty, law enforcement officers and
firefighters who are totally disabled in the line of duty and receiving
a retirement allowance as provided under RCW 41.26.470(8) and their
dependents, and retired or disabled and separated employees shall be
responsible for payment of premium rates developed by the authority
which shall include the cost to the authority of providing health
insurance ((coverage)) including any amounts necessary for reserves and
administration in accordance with this chapter. These self pay rates
will be established based on a separate rate for the employee, the
spouse, and the children.
(5) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this
section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature
whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.195 and 2007 c 114 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or rules or
procedures adopted by the authority, the authority shall make available
to retired or disabled employees who are enrolled in parts A and B of
medicare one or more medicare supplemental insurance policies that
conform to the requirements of chapter 48.66 RCW. The policies shall
be chosen in consultation with the public employees' benefits board.
These policies shall be made available to retired or disabled state
employees; retired or disabled school district employees; retired
employees of county, municipal, or other political subdivisions or
retired employees of tribal governments eligible for coverage available
under the authority; ((or)) surviving spouses of emergency service
personnel killed in the line of duty; or law enforcement officers and
firefighters who are totally disabled in the line of duty and receiving
a retirement allowance as provided under RCW 41.26.470(8) or their
dependents.

--- END ---