BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.540 and 2006 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may enact
or expand affordable housing incentive programs providing for the
development of low-income housing units through development regulations
or conditions on rezoning or permit decisions, or both, on one or more
of the following types of development: Residential; commercial;
industrial; or mixed-use. An affordable housing incentive program may
include, but is not limited to, one or more of the following:
(i) Density bonuses within the urban growth area;
(ii) Height and bulk bonuses;
(iii) Fee waivers or exemptions;
(iv) Parking reductions; or
(v) Expedited permitting((, conditioned on provision of low-income
housing units; or
(vi) Mixed use projects)).
(b) The city or county may enact or expand such programs whether or
not the programs may impose a tax, fee, or charge on the development or
construction of property.
(c) If a developer chooses not to participate in an optional
affordable housing incentive program adopted and authorized under this
section, a city, county, or town may not condition, deny, or delay the
issuance of a permit or development approval that is consistent with
zoning and development standards on the subject property absent
incentive provisions of this program.
(2) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section shall comply with the following:
(a) The incentives or bonuses shall provide for the
((construction)) development of low-income housing units;
(b) Jurisdictions shall establish standards for low-income renter
or owner occupancy housing, including income guidelines consistent with
local housing needs, to assist low-income households that cannot afford
market-rate housing. Low-income households are defined for renter and
owner occupancy program purposes as follows:
(i) Rental housing units to be developed shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of fifty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size; ((and))
(ii) Owner occupancy housing units shall be affordable to and
occupied by households with an income of eighty percent or less of the
county median family income, adjusted for family size. The legislative
authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a public hearing, may
establish lower income levels((.)); and
(iii) The legislative authority of a jurisdiction, after holding a
public hearing, may also establish higher income levels for rental
housing or for owner occupancy housing upon finding that higher income
levels are needed to address local housing market conditions. The
higher income level for rental housing may not exceed eighty percent of
the county area median family income. The higher income level for
owner occupancy housing may not exceed one hundred percent of the
county area median family income. These established higher income
levels ((must be)) are considered "low-income" for the purposes of this
section;
(c) The jurisdiction shall establish a maximum rent level or sales
price for each low-income housing unit developed under the terms of a
program and may adjust these levels or prices based on the average size
of the household expected to occupy the unit. For renter-occupied
housing units, the total housing costs, including basic utilities as
determined by the jurisdiction, may not exceed thirty percent of the
income limit for the low-income housing unit;
(d) Where a developer is utilizing a housing incentive program
authorized under this section to develop market rate housing, and is
developing low-income housing to satisfy the requirements of the
housing incentive program, the low-income housing units shall be
provided in a range of sizes comparable to those units that are
available to other residents. To the extent practicable, the number of
bedrooms in low-income units must be in the same proportion as the
number of bedrooms in units within the entire ((building)) development.
The low-income units shall generally be distributed throughout the
((building, except that units may be provided in an adjacent building.
The low-income units shall)) development and have substantially the
same functionality as the other units in the ((building or buildings))
development;
(e) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable housing
incentive program shall be committed to continuing affordability for at
least fifty years. A local government, however, may accept payments in
lieu of continuing affordability. The program shall include measures
to enforce continuing affordability and income standards applicable to
low-income units constructed under this section that may include, but
are not limited to, covenants, options, or other agreements to be
executed and recorded by owners and developers;
(f) Programs authorized under subsection (1) of this section may
apply to part or all of a jurisdiction and different standards may be
applied to different areas within a jurisdiction or to different types
of development. Programs authorized under this section may be modified
to meet local needs and may include provisions not expressly provided
in this section or RCW 82.02.020; ((and))
(g) Low-income housing units developed under an affordable housing
incentive program are encouraged to be provided within ((market-rate
housing)) developments for which a bonus or incentive is provided.
However, programs may allow units to be provided in ((an adjacent)) a
building ((and)) located in the general area of the development for
which a bonus or incentive is provided; and
(h) Affordable housing incentive programs may allow a payment((s))
of money or property in lieu of low-income housing units if the
((payment equals)) jurisdiction determines that the payment achieves a
result equal to or better than providing the affordable housing on-site, as long as the payment does not exceed the approximate cost of
developing the same number and quality of housing units that would
otherwise be developed. Any city or county shall use these funds or
property to support the development of low-income housing, including
support provided through loans or grants to public or private owners or
developers of housing.
(3) Affordable housing incentive programs enacted or expanded under
this section may be applied within the jurisdiction to address the need
for increased residential development, consistent with local growth
management and housing policies, as follows:
(a) The jurisdiction shall identify certain land use designations
within a geographic area where increased residential development will
assist in achieving local growth management and housing policies;
(b) The jurisdiction shall provide increased residential
development capacity through zoning changes, bonus densities, height
and bulk increases, parking reductions, or other regulatory changes or
other incentives;
(c) The jurisdiction shall determine that increased residential
development capacity or other incentives can be achieved within the
identified area, subject to consideration of other regulatory controls
on development; and
(d) The jurisdiction may establish a minimum amount of affordable
housing that must be provided by all residential developments being
built under the revised regulations, consistent with the requirements
of this section.

--- END ---