BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.50.100 and 2003 c 105 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.
(2) Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall
be released only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.
(3) Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care
agency may be released to other participants in the juvenile justice or
care system only when an investigation or case involving the juvenile
in question is being pursued by the other participant or when that
other participant is assigned the responsibility of supervising the
juvenile. Records covered under this section and maintained by the
juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of the agency may
be entered in the statewide judicial information system. However,
truancy records associated with a juvenile who has no other case
history, and records of a juvenile's parents who have no other case
history, shall be removed from the judicial information system when the
juvenile is no longer subject to the compulsory attendance laws in
chapter 28A.225 RCW. A county clerk is not liable for unauthorized
release of this data by persons or agencies not in his or her employ or
otherwise subject to his or her control, nor is the county clerk liable
for inaccurate or incomplete information collected from litigants or
other persons required to provide identifying data pursuant to this
section.
(4) Subject to (a) of this subsection, the department of social and
health services may release information retained in the course of
conducting child protective services investigations to a family or
juvenile court hearing a petition for custody under chapter 26.10 RCW.
(a) Information that may be released shall be limited to
information regarding investigations in which: (i) The juvenile was an
alleged victim of abandonment or abuse or neglect; or (ii) the
petitioner for custody of the juvenile, or any individual aged sixteen
or older residing in the petitioner's household, is the subject of a
founded or currently pending child protective services investigation
made by the department subsequent to October 1, 1998.
(b) Additional information may only be released with the written
consent of the subject of the investigation and the juvenile alleged to
be the victim of abandonment or abuse and neglect, or the parent,
custodian, guardian, or personal representative of the juvenile, or by
court order obtained with notice to all interested parties.
(5) Any disclosure of records or information by the department of
social and health services pursuant to this section shall not be deemed
a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege attached to the records or
information by operation of any state or federal statute or regulation,
and any recipient of such records or information shall maintain it in
such a manner as to comply with such state and federal statutes and
regulations and to protect against unauthorized disclosure.
(6) A contracting agency or service provider of the department of
social and health services that provides counseling, psychological,
psychiatric, or medical services may release to the office of the
family and children's ombudsman information or records relating to
services provided to a juvenile who is dependent under chapter 13.34
RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian of the juvenile, or
of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of thirteen years,
unless such release is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.
(7) A juvenile, his or her parent((s)), guardian, or custodian, the
juvenile's attorney and the juvenile's parent's, guardian's, or
custodian's attorney, shall, upon request, be given access to all
records and information collected or retained by a juvenile justice or
care agency which pertain to the juvenile except:
(a) If it is determined by the agency that release of this
information is likely to cause severe psychological or physical harm to
the juvenile or his or her parents the agency may withhold the
information subject to other order of the court((: PROVIDED, That)).
If the court determines that limited release of the information is
appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the release
of the information; or
(b) If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile
justice or care agency in connection with the provision of
counseling((, psychological, psychiatric,)) or medical services to the
juvenile, when the services have been sought voluntarily by the
juvenile, and the juvenile has a legal right to receive those services
without the consent of any person or agency, then the information or
record may not be disclosed to the juvenile's parent((s)), guardian, or
custodian without the informed consent of the juvenile unless otherwise
authorized by law, except that a parent, guardian, or custodian must be
given access to information or records pertaining to the mental health
treatment of the juvenile, unless the information or record is withheld
under (a) of this subsection; or
(c) That the department of social and health services may delete
the name and identifying information regarding persons or organizations
who have reported alleged child abuse or neglect.
(8) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any records
following an agency determination under subsection (7) of this section
may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access to the records.
The court shall grant the motion unless it finds access may not be
permitted according to the standards found in subsection (7)(a) and (b)
of this section.
(9) The person making a motion under subsection (8) of this section
shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the
original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the
motion.
(10) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to
a proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a termination of
the parent-child relationship and any party's counsel and the guardian
ad litem of any party, shall have access to the records of any natural
or adoptive child of the parent, subject to the limitations in
subsection (7) of this section. A party denied access to records may
request judicial review of the denial. If the party prevails, he or
she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and an amount not less
than five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars for each day
the records were wrongfully denied.
(11) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined
in RCW 26.44.020(((12))) (1) may be disclosed to a child-placing
agency, private adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.010 and 1998 c 296 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter to assure that minors in need of
mental health care and treatment receive an appropriate continuum of
culturally relevant care and treatment, including prevention and early
intervention, self-directed care, parent-directed care, and involuntary
treatment. To facilitate the continuum of care and treatment to minors
in out-of-home placements, all divisions of the department that provide
mental health services to minors shall jointly plan and deliver those
services.
It is also the purpose of this chapter to protect the rights of
minors against needless hospitalization and deprivations of liberty and
to enable treatment decisions to be made in response to clinical needs
in accordance with sound professional judgment. The mental health care
and treatment providers shall encourage the use of voluntary services
and, whenever clinically appropriate, the providers shall offer less
restrictive alternatives to inpatient treatment. Additionally, all
mental health care and treatment providers shall assure that minors'
parents are given an opportunity to participate in the treatment
decisions for their minor children, and to receive information about
their children's treatment which does not threaten the safety of the
children or conflict with other applicable laws. The mental health
care and treatment providers shall, to the extent possible, offer
services that involve minors' parents or family.
It is also the purpose of this chapter to assure the ability of
parents to exercise reasonable, compassionate care and control of their
minor children when there is a medical necessity for treatment and
without the requirement of filing a petition under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.34.510 and 1998 c 296 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator of the treatment facility shall provide notice to
the parents of a minor when the minor is voluntarily admitted to
inpatient treatment under RCW 71.34.500. The notice shall be in the
form most likely to reach the parent within twenty-four hours of the
minor's voluntary admission and shall advise the parent: (1) That the
minor has been admitted to inpatient treatment; (2) of the location and
telephone number of the facility providing such treatment; (3) of the
name of a professional person on the staff of the facility providing
treatment who is designated to discuss the minor's need for inpatient
treatment with the parent; and (4) of the medical necessity for
admission. The treatment facility shall provide information to the
parents concerning the treatment of the minor consistent with RCW
13.50.100(7)(b).

--- END ---