BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.12.161 and 2007 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The individual and family services program for individuals
eligible to receive services under this title is established. This
program replaces family support opportunities, traditional family
support, and the flexible family support pilot program. The department
shall transfer funding associated with these existing family support
programs to the individual and family services program and shall
operate the program within available funding. The services provided
under the individual and family services program shall be funded by
state funding without benefit of federal match.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.
The rules shall provide:
(a) That eligibility to receive services in the individual and
family services program be determined solely by an assessment of
individual need;
(b) For service priority levels to be developed that specify a
maximum amount of dollars for each person per level per year;
(c) That the dollar caps for each service priority level be
adjusted by the vendor rate increases authorized by the legislature;
and
(d) That the following services be available under the program:
(i) Respite care;
(ii) Therapies;
(iii) Architectural and vehicular modifications;
(iv) Equipment and supplies;
(v) Specialized nutrition and clothing;
(vi) Excess medical costs not covered by another source;
(vii) Copays for medical and therapeutic services;
(viii) Transportation;
(ix) Training;
(x) Counseling;
(xi) Behavior management;
(xii) Parent/sibling education;
(xiii) Recreational opportunities; and
(xiv) Community services grants.
(3) In addition to services provided for the service priority
levels under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department
shall provide for:
(a) One-time exceptional needs and emergency needs for individuals
and families not receiving individual and family services annual grants
to assist individuals and families who experience a short-term crisis;
and
(b) Respite services based on the department's assessment for a
((parent)) family member who resides with and is the primary care
provider who provides personal care in the home to ((his or her)) an
adult ((son or daughter)) with developmental disabilities.
(4) If a person has more complex needs, a family is experiencing a
more prolonged crisis, or it is determined a person needs additional
services, the department shall assess the individual to determine if
placement in a waiver program would be appropriate.

--- END ---