BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Manufactured/mobile homes provide a significant source of
homeownership opportunities for Washington state residents. However,
the increasing number of closures and conversions to other uses of
manufactured housing communities and mobile home parks, combined with
low vacancy rates in existing parks and communities and the extremely
high cost of moving homes when these parks and communities close, make
this type of affordable housing option increasingly insecure for the
tenants who reside in these parks and communities.
(2) Many tenants who reside in these parks and communities are
senior citizens or low-income households and are, therefore, the
residents most in need of reasonable security or permanency in the
siting of their home because of the adverse impacts on the health,
safety, and welfare of tenants forced to move due to closure or
conversion to another use of the manufactured housing community or
mobile home park.
(3) Manufactured/mobile home tenants have a reasonable expectation
of long-term security when they move their home into a community or
park. Some tenants have been forced to relocate due to a closure or
conversion soon after the tenant has moved into the community or park.
The legislature finds that unless a park owner sells the park to
resident homeowners or another entity with the purpose of preservation
or justly compensates the homeowners for the loss of their homes, a
minimum notification period of eighteen months before the closure or
conversion of a community or park is a reasonable balancing of the
rights and interests of both community and park owners and the
manufactured/mobile home owners.
(4) Given the effort and expense involved in moving a
manufactured/mobile home and the imbalance of economic power in this
type of landlord-tenant relationship, it is the intent of the
legislature to provide an opportunity for manufactured/mobile home
tenants to remain in manufactured housing communities and mobile home
parks for at least eighteen months.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.060 and 2006 c 296 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any manufactured/mobile home space tenancy regardless of the
term, shall be based upon a written rental agreement, signed by the
parties, which shall contain:
(a) The terms for the payment of rent, including time and place,
and any additional charges to be paid by the tenant. Additional
charges that occur less frequently than monthly shall be itemized in a
billing to the tenant;
(b) Reasonable rules for guest parking which shall be clearly
stated;
(c) The rules and regulations of the park;
(d) The name and address of the person who is the landlord, and if
such person does not reside in the state there shall also be designated
by name and address a person who resides in the county where the mobile
home park is located who is authorized to act as agent for the purposes
of service of notices and process. If no designation is made of a
person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are to
be made shall be considered the agent;
(e) The name and address of any party who has a secured interest in
the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(f) A forwarding address of the tenant or the name and address of
a person who would likely know the whereabouts of the tenant in the
event of an emergency or an abandonment of the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model;
(g)(i) A covenant by the landlord that, except for acts or events
beyond the control of the landlord, the mobile home park will not be
converted to a land use that will prevent the space that is the subject
of the lease from continuing to be used for its intended use for a
period of three years after the beginning of the term of the rental
agreement;
(ii) A rental agreement may, in the alternative, contain a
statement that: "The park may be sold or otherwise transferred at any
time with the result that subsequent owners may close the mobile home
park or manufactured housing community, or that the landlord may close
the park at any time after the required eighteen-month closure notice
as provided in RCW 59.20.080." The covenant or statement required by
this subsection must: (A) Appear in print that is in bold face and is
larger than the other text of the rental agreement; (B) be set off by
means of a box, blank space, or comparable visual device; and (C) be
located directly above the tenant's signature on the rental
agreement((.));
(h) A copy of a closure notice, as required in RCW 59.20.080, if
such notice is in effect;
(i) The terms and conditions under which any deposit or portion
thereof may be withheld by the landlord upon termination of the rental
agreement if any moneys are paid to the landlord by the tenant as a
deposit or as security for performance of the tenant's obligations in
a rental agreement;
(((i))) (j) A listing of the utilities, services, and facilities
which will be available to the tenant during the tenancy and the nature
of the fees, if any, to be charged;
(((j))) (k) A description of the boundaries of a
manufactured/mobile home space sufficient to inform the tenant of the
exact location of the tenant's space in relation to other tenants'
spaces;
(((k))) (l) A statement of the current zoning of the land on which
the mobile home park or manufactured housing community is located; and
(((l))) (m) A statement of the expiration date of any conditional
use, temporary use, or other land use permit subject to a fixed
expiration date that is necessary for the continued use of the land as
a mobile home park.
(2) Any rental agreement executed between the landlord and tenant
shall not contain any provision:
(a) Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guest parking
unless a violation of the rules for guest parking occurs: PROVIDED,
That a fee may be charged for guest parking which covers an extended
period of time as defined in the rental agreement;
(b) Which authorizes the towing or impounding of a vehicle except
upon notice to the owner thereof or the tenant whose guest is the owner
of the vehicle;
(c) Which allows the landlord to alter the due date for rent
payment or increase the rent: (i) During the term of the rental
agreement if the term is less than one year, or (ii) more frequently
than annually if the term is for one year or more: PROVIDED, That a
rental agreement may include an escalation clause for a pro rata share
of any increase in the mobile home park's or manufactured housing
community's real property taxes or utility assessments or charges, over
the base taxes or utility assessments or charges of the year in which
the rental agreement took effect, if the clause also provides for a pro
rata reduction in rent or other charges in the event of a reduction in
real property taxes or utility assessments or charges, below the base
year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a rental agreement for a term exceeding
one year may provide for annual increases in rent in specified amounts
or by a formula specified in such agreement;
(d) By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego rights or
remedies under this chapter;
(e) Allowing the landlord to charge an "entrance fee" or an "exit
fee." However, an entrance fee may be charged as part of a continuing
care contract as defined in RCW 70.38.025;
(f) Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guests:
PROVIDED, That a landlord may establish rules charging for guests who
remain on the premises for more than fifteen days in any sixty-day
period;
(g) By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego homestead rights
provided by chapter 6.13 RCW. This subsection shall not prohibit such
waiver after a default in rent so long as such waiver is in writing
signed by the husband and wife or by an unmarried claimant and in
consideration of the landlord's agreement not to terminate the tenancy
for a period of time specified in the waiver if the landlord would be
otherwise entitled to terminate the tenancy under this chapter; or
(h) By which, at the time the rental agreement is entered into, the
landlord and tenant agree to the selection of a particular arbitrator.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.20.080 and 2003 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a
tenant or the occupancy of an occupant, of whatever duration except for
one or more of the following reasons:
(a) Substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations of
the rules of the mobile home park as established by the landlord at the
inception of the tenancy or as assumed subsequently with the consent of
the tenant or for violation of the tenant's duties as provided in RCW
59.20.140. The tenant shall be given written notice to cease the rule
violation immediately. The notice shall state that failure to cease
the violation of the rule or any subsequent violation of that or any
other rule shall result in termination of the tenancy, and that the
tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen days: PROVIDED, That
for a periodic violation the notice shall also specify that repetition
of the same violation shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in the case of a violation of a "material change" in park rules
with respect to pets, tenants with minor children living with them, or
recreational facilities, the tenant shall be given written notice under
this chapter of a six month period in which to comply or vacate;
(b) Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental
agreement, upon five days written notice to pay rent and/or other
charges or to vacate;
(c) Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which
threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the other mobile home park
or manufactured housing community tenants. The tenant shall be given
written notice of a fifteen day period in which to vacate;
(d) Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances and state
laws and regulations relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park models or mobile home, manufactured homes, or park model living
within a reasonable time after the tenant's receipt of notice of such
noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency;
(e) Change of land use of the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community including, but not limited to, conversion to a use
other than for mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models or
conversion of the mobile home park or manufactured housing community to
a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park subdivision:
PROVIDED, That the landlord shall give the tenants ((twelve months'))
eighteen months' notice, which may be referred to as a closure notice
meeting the requirements of RCW 59.21.030, in advance of the effective
date of such change((, except that for the period of six months
following April 28, 1989, the landlord shall give the tenants eighteen
months' notice in advance of the proposed effective date of such
change)). The eighteen-month closure notice requirement does not apply
if:
(i) The mobile home park or manufactured housing community has been
acquired for or is under imminent threat of condemnation;
(ii) The mobile home park or manufactured housing community is sold
to an organization comprised of park or community tenants, to a
nonprofit organization, to a local government, or to a housing
authority for the purpose of preserving the park or community; or
(iii) The landlord compensates the tenants for the loss of their
homes at their assessed value prior to a change of use or sale of the
property;
(f) Engaging in "criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means a
criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a
tenant or occupant under this subsection need not produce evidence of
a criminal conviction, even if the alleged misconduct constitutes a
criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement agency of criminal
activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for
an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the seizure of
illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity and
is grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that
any tenant or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130
is grounds for eviction under this subsection. If criminal activity is
alleged to be a basis of termination, the park owner may proceed
directly to an unlawful detainer action;
(g) The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material
misstatement that induced the park owner to approve the tenant as a
resident of the park, and the park owner discovers and acts upon the
misstatement within one year of the time the resident began paying
rent;
(h) If the landlord serves a tenant three fifteen-day notices
within a twelve-month period to comply or vacate for failure to comply
with the material terms of the rental agreement or park rules. The
applicable twelve-month period shall commence on the date of the first
violation;
(i) Failure of the tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon
tenants by applicable provisions of municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, including this chapter. The
landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately.
The notice must state that failure to comply will result in termination
of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within
fifteen days;
(j) The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying
conduct upon the park premises that results in the destruction of the
rights of others to the peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises.
The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply
immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result
in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the
premises within fifteen days;
(k) The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to cease the conduct that
constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must state that failure
to cease the conduct will result in termination of the tenancy and that
the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;
(l) Any other substantial just cause that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice
must state that failure to comply will result in termination of the
tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen
days; or
(m) Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental
agreement three or more times in a twelve-month period, commencing with
the date of the first violation, after service of a five-day notice to
comply or vacate.
(2) Within five days of a notice of eviction as required by
subsection (1)(a) of this section, the landlord and tenant shall submit
any dispute to mediation. The parties may agree in writing to
mediation by an independent third party or through industry mediation
procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then mediation shall be
through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed upon both
parties to participate in the mediation process in good faith for a
period of ten days for an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this
section. It is a defense to an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of
this section that a landlord did not participate in the mediation
process in good faith.
(3) Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of
recreational vehicles, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, from mobile home
parks. This chapter governs the eviction of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, park models, and recreational vehicles used as a primary
residence from a mobile home park.

Sec. 4 RCW 59.21.030 and 2006 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The closure notice required by RCW 59.20.080 before park
closure or conversion of the park((, whether twelve months or longer,))
shall be given to the director and all tenants in writing, and posted
at all park entrances.
(2) The closure notice required under RCW 59.20.080 must be in
substantially the following form:

"CLOSURE NOTICE TO TENANTS

NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN on the . . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., of
a conversion of this mobile home park or manufactured housing community
to a use other than for mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park
models, or of a conversion of the mobile home park or manufactured
housing community to a mobile home park cooperative or a mobile home
park subdivision. This change of use shall become effective on the
. . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., which shall be the date eighteen
months after the date this closure notice is given.

PARK OR COMMUNITY MANAGEMENT OR OWNERSHIP INFORMATION:
For information during the period preceding the effective change of
use of this mobile home park or manufactured housing community on the
. . . . day of . . . ., . . . ., contact:
Name:
Address:
Telephone:

PURCHASER INFORMATION, if applicable:
Contact information for the purchaser of the mobile home park or
manufactured housing community property consists of the following:
Name:
Address:
Telephone:

PARK PURCHASE BY TENANT ORGANIZATIONS, if applicable:
The owner of this mobile home park or manufactured housing
community is willing to entertain an offer of purchase by an
organization or group consisting of park or community tenants or a not-for-profit agency designated by the tenants. Tenants should contact
the park owner or park management with such an offer. For assistance
in forming an organization to purchase the park or community and for
possible financial resources to assist with such a purchase, contact
the Office of Mobile Home Affairs within the Department of Community,
Trade, and Economic Development.

RELOCATION ASSISTANCE RESOURCES:
For information about the availability of relocation assistance,
contact the Office of Mobile Home Affairs within the Department of
Community, Trade, and Economic Development."

(3) The closure notice required by RCW 59.20.080 must also meet the
following requirements:
(a) A copy of the closure notice must be provided with all ((month-to-month)) rental agreements signed after the original park closure
notice date as required under RCW 59.20.060;
(b) Notice to the director must include: (i) A good faith estimate
of the timetable for removal of the mobile homes; (ii) the reason for
closure; and (iii) a list of the names and mailing addresses of the
current registered park tenants. Notice required under this subsection
must be sent to the director within ten business days of the date
notice was given to all tenants as required by RCW 59.20.080; and
(c) Notice must be recorded in the office of the county auditor for
the county where the mobile home park is located.
(((2))) (4) The department must mail every tenant an application
and information on relocation assistance within ten business days of
receipt of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 59.20.073 and 2003 c 127 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any rental agreement shall be assignable by the tenant to any
person to whom he or she sells or transfers title to the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model.
(2) A tenant who sells a mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model within a park must provide the buyer with a copy of any closure
notice provided by a landlord, as required under RCW 59.20.080, at
least seven days in advance of the intended sale and transfer.
(3) A tenant who sells a mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model within a park shall notify the landlord in writing of the date of
the intended sale and transfer of the rental agreement at least fifteen
days in advance of such intended transfer and shall notify the buyer in
writing of the provisions of this section. The tenant shall verify in
writing to the landlord payment of all taxes, rent, and reasonable
expenses due on the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and
mobile home lot.
(((3))) (4) The landlord shall notify the selling tenant, in
writing, of a refusal to permit transfer of the rental agreement at
least seven days in advance of such intended transfer.
(((4))) (5) The landlord may require the mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model to meet applicable fire and safety standards if a
state or local agency responsible for the enforcement of fire and
safety standards has issued a notice of violation of those standards to
the tenant and those violations remain uncorrected. Upon correction of
the violation to the satisfaction of the state or local agency
responsible for the enforcement of that notice of violation, the
landlord's refusal to permit the transfer is deemed withdrawn.
(((5))) (6) The landlord shall approve or disapprove of the
assignment of a rental agreement on the same basis that the landlord
approves or disapproves of any new tenant, and any disapproval shall be
in writing. Consent to an assignment shall not be unreasonably
withheld.
(((6))) (7) Failure to notify the landlord in writing, as required
under subsection (((2))) (3) of this section; or failure of the new
tenant to make a good faith attempt to arrange an interview with the
landlord to discuss assignment of the rental agreement; or failure of
the current or new tenant to obtain written approval of the landlord
for assignment of the rental agreement, shall be grounds for
disapproval of such transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---