BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students at the
elementary level must have the opportunity to participate in daily
recess. The legislature also finds that recess provides children with
unstructured time to engage in physical activity that helps to develop
healthy minds and bodies. As childhood obesity rates rise, it is
important to ensure that children have the time for physical activity.
Insufficient physical activity and excessive calories consumed is well-known as a critical factor for this alarming increase in overweight and
obese children. As Washington state strives to be the healthiest state
in the nation, we must continue to encourage our children to engage in
physical activity so they can develop a healthy mind and body.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall collaborate with the statewide parent-teacher
organization to conduct and report the results of a survey of
Washington elementary schools to determine the current availability of
recess for elementary students and the perceptions of the importance of
recess in Washington elementary schools. The survey shall include, but
not be limited to, the following inquiries:
(a) How much time does the elementary school devote for recess each
day?
(b) Whether the amount of time devoted to recess has decreased or
increased and why?
(c) Is recess a structured or unstructured activity at the school?
(d) How is recess provided during inclement weather?
(e) If recess is part of the scheduled day at your school, may an
individual teacher keep a student from participating in recess for
academic or discipline reasons?
(f) Do you believe that recess is a necessary part of the school
day?
(2) By December 1, 2009, the responses to the survey shall be
aggregated and reported to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.

--- END ---