BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.297 and 2005 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that small technology-based firms are the
source of approximately one-half of the economy's major innovations.
The legislature further finds that economic development in the state is
increasingly driven by innovative firms and that it is in the interest
of the state to:
(a) Increase participation by Washington state small businesses in
the federal small business innovation research program by assisting
them in becoming small business innovation research program grant
recipients((.
The legislature further finds that many small business innovators
lack the grant-writing skills necessary to prepare a successful small
business innovation research program proposal, and the federal program
that funded grant-writing assistance has stopped operations. Nearly
fifty percent of small businesses trained under the federal program won
grants compared to less than ten percent of those that did not receive
training));
(b) Increase the number of innovative firms that understand and
engage in the technology commercialization process by providing
information resources and technical assistance in accessing new
technologies;
(c) Increase funding for product development and production by
providing information on available finance options and facilitating the
matching of investors with innovative entrepreneurs; and
(d) Coordinate these commercialization, assistance, and information
functions through existing statewide organizations and reinforce
collaboration among the network of the state's research, economic
development, and technology assistance organizations for this purpose.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business innovation research program" means the program,
enacted pursuant to the small business innovation development act of
1982, P.L. 97-219, that provided funds to small businesses to conduct
innovative research having commercial application.
(b) "Small business" means a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, or individual, operating a business for profit, with
two hundred fifty employees or fewer, including employees employed in
a subsidiary or affiliated corporation, that otherwise meets the
requirements of the federal small business innovation research program.
(3) To the extent funds are appropriated for these purposes, the
Washington technology center shall provide or contract for the
provision of the following in conjunction with the state's public
universities and colleges, private and federal research laboratories,
and local and regional economic development and technology assistance
organizations:
(a) Establish a small business innovation research and assistance
program, including a proposal review process, to train and assist
Washington small businesses to win phase I federal small business
innovation research program awards and federal technology innovation
program awards. (((a))) In operating the program, the Washington
technology center shall give priority to first-time small business
innovation research program applicants, new businesses, and firms with
fewer than ten employees((.));
(b) Develop and disseminate a guide to the technology
commercialization process in the research and academic institutions in
the state;
(c) Develop a recommendation on how to integrate and provide a
common access mechanism to databases of technologies and inventions
developed in the state by the state's research institutions;
(d) Offer training on the provision of commercialization assistance
to technical assistance providers at the state's small business
development centers, economic development councils, chambers of
commerce, industry cluster associations, the Washington manufacturing
service, and private consulting firms;
(e) Develop a funding resource guide, offer workshops on how to
access financing for commercializing new technologies, provide
opportunities for novice investors to learn about investing in
technology-based companies, host events to connect entrepreneurs and
investors, and maintain an interactive web site accessible by
researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors; and
(f) Report on the impact of commercialization activities at
Washington research institutions on an annual basis.
(4) The Washington technology center may charge a fee for ((this))
its services.
(5) The investing in innovation account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Funds may be directed to the account from
federal, state, and private sources. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the purposes of this section, carrying out the
investing in innovation grants program established under RCW
70.210.030, and other innovation and commercialization purposes
consistent with the federal, state, or private, and other funding
guidelines that apply to the funds deposited in the account. Only the
executive director of the Washington technology center or the executive
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.20.289 and 2003 c 403 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The technology center shall be administered by the board of
directors of the technology center.
(2) The board shall consist of the following members: Fourteen
members from among individuals who are associated with or employed by
technology-based industries and have broad business experience and an
understanding of high technology; eight members from the state's
universities with graduate science and engineering programs; the
executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and
Technology Institute or his or her designated representative; the
provost of the University of Washington or his or her designated
representative; the provost of the Washington State University or his
or her designated representative; and the director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development or his or her designated
representative. The term of office for each board member, excluding
the executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and
Technology Institute, the provost of the University of Washington, the
provost of the Washington State University, and the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, shall be
three years. The executive director of the technology center shall be
an ex officio, nonvoting member of the board. The board shall meet at
least quarterly. Board members shall be appointed by the governor
based on the recommendations of the existing board of the technology
center, and the research universities. The governor shall stagger the
terms of the first group of appointees to ensure the long term
continuity of the board.
(3) The duties of the board include:
(a) Developing the general operating policies for the technology
center;
(b) Appointing the executive director of the technology center;
(c) Approving the annual operating budget of the technology center;
(d) Establishing priorities for the selection and funding of
research projects that guarantee the greatest potential return on the
state's investment;
(e) Approving and allocating funding for research projects
conducted by the technology center, based on the recommendations of the
advisory committees for each of the research centers;
(f) In cooperation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, developing a biennial work plan and five-year
strategic plan for the technology center that are consistent with the
statewide technology development and commercialization goals;
(g) Coordinating with the University of Washington, Washington
State University, and other participating institutions of higher
education in the development of training, research, and development
programs to be conducted at the technology center that shall be
targeted to meet industrial needs;
(h) Assisting the department of community, trade, and economic
development in the department's efforts to develop state science and
technology public policies and coordinate publicly funded programs;
(i) Performing the duties required under chapter 70.210 RCW
relating to the investing in innovation grants program;
(j) Reviewing annual progress reports on funded research projects
that are prepared by the advisory committees for each of the research
centers; and
(k) Providing an annual report to the governor and the legislature
detailing the activities and performance of the technology center((;
and
(l) Submitting annually to the department of community, trade, and
economic development)) including an updated strategic plan and a
statement of performance measured against the mission, roles, and
contractual obligations of the technology center.
(4) The Washington technology center shall have the authority to
accept gifts, grants, donations, sponsorships, or contributions from
any federal, state, or local government agency or program or any
private source and expend the same for any activity consistent with its
duties and purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.20.293 and 1995 c 399 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department of community, trade, and economic development
shall contract with the)) University of Washington shall contract with
the Washington technology center for the expenditure of state-appropriated funds for the operation of the ((Washington technology))
center. ((The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide guidance to the technology center regarding expenditure
of state-appropriated funds and the development of the center's
strategic plan. The director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall not withhold funds appropriated for the
technology center if the technology center complies with the provisions
of its contract with the department of community, trade, and economic
development.)) The ((department)) University of Washington shall be
responsible to the legislature for the contractual performance of the
center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1,
2011.

--- END ---