BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Lifelong learning accounts are portable
employee-owned and employer-matched savings accounts dedicated to
covering the cost of tuition, fees, books, supplies, and equipment for
working adults seeking education and training to improve their position
in the workforce. The legislature finds that lifelong learning
accounts allow employers and workers to coinvest in their futures. The
legislature further finds that, combined with free career advising,
lifelong learning accounts can make a significant difference in the
lives of workers and their families, as well as for employers in need
of well-trained workers. The legislature intends to facilitate the
creating of lifelong learning accounts for workers in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish a state lifelong learning account
steering committee. The steering committee shall consist of
representatives from: (a) The association of Washington business; (b)
the higher education coordinating board; (c) the state board for
community and technical colleges; (d) the department of community,
trade, and economic development; (e) the Washington state hospital
association; (f) the Northwest career colleges federation; (g) the
Pacific mountain workforce development council; (h) the state and
regional AFL-CIO and SEIU; and (i) other business and labor
representatives.
(2) The steering committee shall: (a) Develop a policy framework
to establish a statewide lifelong learning account program; (b)
identify technical and budget issues along with recommendations on how
to resolve them; (c) study methods for continuing outreach to workers,
employers, and foundations, willing to participate in and fund lifelong
learning accounts; (d) explore career advising options including online
tools; and (e) design a performance accountability system.
(3) The steering committee shall receive staff and logistical
support from the board.
(4) The steering committee shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010, and every two years
thereafter, regarding the numbers and characteristics of participating
workers and employers, the status of outreach efforts, and other
appropriate performance outcome measures identified by the steering
committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The board may solicit, accept, receive, and administer federal
funds or private funds, in trust or otherwise, and contract with
foundations or with for-profit or nonprofit organizations to support
the establishment of the state lifelong learning account program.

--- END ---