BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.160 and 2007 c 372 s 2 and 2007 c 101 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to infractions issued under RCW
46.61.690 for toll collection evasion.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer
from issuing a notice of traffic infraction to a person in control of
a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a),
(b), or (c).
(3) Toll collection systems include manual cash collection,
electronic toll collection, and photo enforcement systems.
(4) "Electronic toll collection system" means a system of
collecting tolls or charges that is capable of charging the account of
the toll patron the appropriate toll or charge by electronic
transmission from the motor vehicle to the toll collection system,
which information is used to charge the appropriate toll or charge to
the patron's account.
(5) "Photo enforcement system" means a vehicle sensor installed to
work in conjunction with an electronic toll collection system that
automatically produces one or more photographs, one or more
microphotographs, a videotape, or other recorded images of a vehicle
operated in violation of an infraction under this chapter.
(6) The use of a toll collection system is subject to the following
requirements:
(a) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow
an open standard for automatic vehicle identification transponders used
for electronic toll collection to be compatible with other electronic
payment devices or transponders from the Washington state ferry system,
other public transportation systems, or other toll collection systems
to the extent that technology permits. The rules must also allow for
multiple vendors providing electronic payment devices or transponders
as technology permits.
(b) The department of transportation may not sell, distribute, or
make available in any way, the names and addresses of electronic toll
collection system account holders.
(7) The use of a photo enforcement system for issuance of notices
of infraction is subject to the following requirements:
(a) Photo enforcement systems may take photographs, digital
photographs, microphotographs, videotapes, or other recorded images of
the vehicle and vehicle license plate only.
(b) A notice of infraction must be mailed to the registered owner
of the vehicle or to the renter of a vehicle within sixty days of the
violation. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of
infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof,
based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images produced by a photo enforcement system, stating
the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or
facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is
admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this chapter.
The photographs, digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or
other recorded images evidencing the violation must be available for
inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate
the liability for the infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs,
digital photographs, microphotographs, videotape, or other recorded
images prepared under this chapter are for the exclusive use of the
tolling agency and law enforcement in the discharge of duties under
this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in a
court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding
relates to a violation under this chapter. No photograph, digital
photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image may be
used for any purpose other than enforcement of violations under this
chapter nor retained longer than necessary to enforce this chapter or
verify that tolls are paid.
(d) All locations where a photo enforcement system is used must be
clearly marked by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to
a driver that he or she is entering a zone where traffic laws are
enforced by a photo enforcement system.
(8) Infractions detected through the use of photo enforcement
systems are not part of the registered owner's driving record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the
use of photo enforcement systems under this section shall be processed
in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes
of RCW ((3.46.120,)) 3.50.100, 35.20.220, 46.16.216, and 46.20.270(3).
(9) The penalty for an infraction detected through the use of a
photo enforcement system shall be forty dollars plus an additional toll
penalty. The toll penalty is equal to three times the cash toll for a
standard passenger car during peak hours. ((Any reduction in the total
penalty imposed shall be made proportionally between the forty-dollar
penalty and the toll penalty.)) The toll penalty may not be reduced.
The court shall remit the toll penalty to the department of
transportation or a private entity under contract with the department
of transportation for deposit in the statewide account in which tolls
are deposited for the tolling facility at which the violation occurred.
If the driver is found not to have committed an infraction under this
section, the driver shall pay the toll due at the time the photograph
was taken.
(10) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business the department of transportation or a law enforcement agency
shall, before a notice of infraction being issued under this section,
provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of
infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car
business does not, within eighteen days of the mailing of the written
notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or
(c) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the rental car
business may pay the applicable toll and fee.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction.

--- END ---