BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Part I.
Radio and TV Broadcasting
Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under
another section of this chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers; (5) representing and performing services for fire or casualty
insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent
((licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310)); (6) radio and
television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional
advertising computed as a standard deduction ((based on the national
average thereof as annually reported by the Federal Communications
Commission)), which the department must publish by rule every fifth
year by September 30th, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW
82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under
another section of this chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers; (5) representing and performing services for fire or casualty
insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent
((licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310)); (6) radio and
television broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional
advertising computed as a standard deduction ((based on the national
average thereof as annually reported by the Federal Communications
Commission)), which the department must publish by rule every fifth
year by September 30th, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW
82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
For the standard deduction in RCW 82.04.280(6), the department must
study radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national
and regional advertising to establish the standard deduction computed
as a ratio of the network, national and regional advertising revenue to
the total advertising revenue of the radio or television station
expressed as a percentage. The department must complete the study
using the best available information. This study must be completed by
August 1, 2009, and the standard deduction must be published by rule by
December 1, 2009. The study must be repeated every fifth year
thereafter by March 30th and the rule must be published every fifth
year by September 30th.

Part II.
Nonprofit Property Tax Exemptions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature recognizes the rich
and diverse traditions represented by Washington's nonprofit homes for
the sick or infirm and nonprofit hospitals for the sick and the value
they provide to the residents and communities they serve as well as the
employees who provide loving compassionate care.
(2) The legislature finds requiring uniform and public reporting of
community benefit is one way these facilities can continue to
demonstrate the value provided in a manner consistent with the values
of transparency and public accountability. Further, the legislature
finds that Washington should adopt national standards for reporting of
community benefits for nonprofit hospitals and nonprofit homes for the
sick or infirm.

Sec. 202 RCW 84.36.840 and 2007 c 111 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to determine whether organizations, associations,
corporations, or institutions, except those exempted under RCW
84.36.020 and 84.36.030, are exempt from property taxes, and before the
exemption ((shall be)) is allowed for any year, the superintendent or
manager or other proper officer of the organization, association,
corporation, or institution claiming exemption from taxation ((shall))
must file with the department of revenue a statement certifying that
the income and the receipts thereof, including donations to it, have
been applied to the actual expenses of operating and maintaining it, or
for its capital expenditures, and to no other purpose. This report
((shall)) must also include a statement of the receipts and
disbursements of the exempt organization, association, corporation, or
institution.
(2) Educational institutions claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050
((shall)) must also file a list of all property claimed to be exempt,
the purpose for which it is used, the revenue derived from it for the
preceding year, the use to which the revenue was applied, the number of
students who attended the school or college, the total revenues of the
institution with the source from which they were derived, and the
purposes to which the revenues were applied, listing the items of such
revenues and expenditures in detail.
(3) Nonprofit homes for the sick or infirm and nonprofit hospitals
for the sick claiming exemptions under RCW 84.36.040(1) (d) and (e)
must also file on an annual basis no later than June 30th of each year,
with the department of revenue a community benefit report for the
preceding year. Community benefits include, but are not limited to:
Community health improvement services; health professions education;
subsidized health services; research; financial and in-kind
contributions; community-building activities; community benefit
operations; and charity care, including unreimbursed costs of indigent
government sponsored programs and medicaid shortfall. Nonprofit
hospitals for the sick must file a copy of the federal income tax form
990 "Schedule H" with the department to report data on community
benefits, including charity care. Nonprofit homes for the sick or
infirm must file a report on community benefits, including charity
care, on a standardized form developed by the department. The
standardized form must provide the same or similar relevant data as
required for the federal income tax form 990 "Schedule H" to report
data on community benefits, including charity care. Reports filed
under this subsection must be submitted electronically to the
department by June 30, 2010, for community benefits provided during
calendar year 2009, and by June 30th in each subsequent year
thereafter. The department must provide electronic notice of the
filing due date by May 31st of each year. The department may waive the
requirement to file reports electronically for good cause shown. If
the report is not received by the filing deadline, the exemption must
be removed. However, the department must allow a reasonable extension
of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or before the
required filing date and for good cause shown therein.
(4) The reports required under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section may be submitted electronically, in a format provided or
approved by the department, or mailed to the department. The reports
((shall)) must be submitted on or before March 31st of each year. The
department ((shall)) must remove the tax exemption from the property of
any organization, association, corporation, or institution that does
not file the required report with the department on or before the due
date. However, the department ((shall)) must allow a reasonable
extension of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or
before the required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

Part III.
Tax Exemption Repeals
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 RCW 84.36.130 (Airport property in this
state for smaller airports belonging to municipalities of adjoining
states) and 1998 c 201 s 1 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.130 are each repealed.

Part IV.
Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

Sec. 402 2006 c 300 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) ((This act and)) Section 102, chapter . . ., Laws of 2009
(section 102 of this act), section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and
commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip
fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) ((This act)) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first
day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a
significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined
by the director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide notice of
the effective date of this act to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the
department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not
take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the
department ((shall)) must make a determination that ((this act))
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that
would have been otherwise due ((shall be)) are deemed deferred taxes
and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax
under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under section
2 or 5 through 10 ((of this act)), chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 (1) Section 103 of this act is necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009.
(2) Section 102 of this act takes effect if the contingency in
section 402 of this act occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Section 101 of this act expires on the
date that section 102 of this act takes effect.

--- END ---