BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, ((the family leave insurance account,))
the food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit
and vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition
propensity account, and the reading achievement account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.44.033 and 2007 c 357 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be, in the office of the state treasurer, a fund to be
known and designated as the "supplemental pension fund". The director
shall be the administrator thereof. The fund shall be used for the
sole purposes of making the additional payments therefrom prescribed in
this title ((and the loans therefrom authorized in RCW 49.86.190)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 49.86.005 (Findings) and 2007 c 357 s 1;
(2) RCW 49.86.010 (Definitions) and 2007 c 357 s 3;
(3) RCW 49.86.020 (Family leave insurance program) and 2007 c 357
s 4;
(4) RCW 49.86.030 (Eligibility for benefits) and 2007 c 357 s 5;
(5) RCW 49.86.040 (Disqualification from benefits) and 2007 c 357
s 6;
(6) RCW 49.86.050 (Duration of benefits -- Payment of benefits) and
2007 c 357 s 7;
(7) RCW 49.86.060 (Amount of benefits) and 2007 c 357 s 8;
(8) RCW 49.86.070 (Federal income tax) and 2007 c 357 s 9;
(9) RCW 49.86.080 (Erroneous payments -- Payments induced by willful
misrepresentation -- Claim rejected after payments) and 2007 c 357 s 10;
(10) RCW 49.86.090 (Leave and employment protection) and 2007 c 357
s 11;
(11) RCW 49.86.100 (Employment by same employer) and 2007 c 357 s
12;
(12) RCW 49.86.110 (Elective coverage) and 2007 c 357 s 13;
(13) RCW 49.86.120 (Appeals) and 2007 c 357 s 14;
(14) RCW 49.86.130 (Prohibited acts -- Discrimination -- Enforcement)
and 2007 c 357 s 15;
(15) RCW 49.86.140 (Coordination of leave) and 2007 c 357 s 16;
(16) RCW 49.86.150 (Continuing entitlement or contractual rights--Not created) and 2007 c 357 s 17;
(17) RCW 49.86.160 (Rules) and 2007 c 357 s 18;
(18) RCW 49.86.170 (Family leave insurance account) and 2007 c 357
s 19;
(19) RCW 49.86.180 (Family leave insurance account funds--Investment) and 2007 c 357 s 20;
(20) RCW 49.86.190 (Initial program administration -- Loans) and 2007
c 357 s 22;
(21) RCW 49.86.200 (Authority to contract) and 2007 c 357 s 24;
(22) RCW 49.86.210 (Reports) and 2007 c 357 s 26;
(23) RCW 49.86.900 (Severability -- 2007 c 357) and 2007 c 357 s 27;
(24) RCW 49.86.901 (Captions not law -- 2007 c 357) and 2007 c 357 s
28; and
(25) RCW 49.86.902 (Effective dates -- 2007 c 357) and 2007 c 357 s
30.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The code reviser shall alphabetize the
accounts and funds in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---