BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that in chapter 14,
Laws of 2008, the legislature established greenhouse gas emission
reduction limits for Washington state, including a reduction of overall
emissions by 2020 to emission levels in 1990, a reduction by 2035 to
levels twenty-five percent below 1990 levels, and by 2050 a further
reduction below 1990 levels. Based upon estimated 2006 emission levels
in Washington, this will require a reduction from present emission
levels of over twenty-five percent in the next eleven years. The
legislature further finds that state government activities are a
significant source of emissions, and that state government should meet
targets for reducing emissions from its buildings, vehicles, and all
operations that demonstrate that these reductions are achievable, cost-effective, and will help to promote innovative energy efficiency
technologies and practices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All state agencies shall meet the statewide greenhouse gas
emission limits established in RCW 70.235.020 to achieve the following,
using the estimates and strategy established in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section:
(a) By July 1, 2020, reduce emissions by fifteen percent from 2005
emission levels;
(b) By 2035, reduce emissions to twenty-five percent below 2005
levels; and
(c) By 2050, reduce emissions to the greater reduction of fifty
percent below 2005 levels, or seventy percent below the expected state
government emissions that year.
(2)(a) By June 30, 2010, all state agencies shall report estimates
of emissions for 2005 to the department, including 2009 levels of
emissions, and projected emissions through 2035.
(b) State agencies required to report under RCW 70.94.151 must
estimate emissions from methodologies recommended by the department and
must be based on actual operation of those agencies. Agencies not
required to report under RCW 70.94.151 shall derive emissions estimates
using an emissions calculator provided by the department.
(3) By June 30, 2011, each state agency shall submit to the
department a strategy to meet the requirements in subsection (1) of
this section. The strategy must address employee travel activities,
teleconferencing alternatives, and include existing and proposed
actions, a timeline for reductions, and recommendations for budgetary
and other incentives to reduce emissions, especially from employee
business travel.
(4) By October 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2012,
each state agency shall report to the department the actions taken to
meet the emission reduction targets under the strategy for the
preceding fiscal biennium. The department may authorize the department
of general administration to report on behalf of any state agency
having fewer than five hundred full-time equivalent employees at any
time during the reporting period. The department shall cooperate with
the department of general administration and the department of
community, trade, and economic development to develop consolidated
reporting methodologies that incorporate emission reduction actions
taken across all or substantially all state agencies.
(5) All state agencies shall cooperate in providing information to
the department, the department of general administration, and the
department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall develop an emissions calculator to assist
state agencies in estimating aggregate emissions as well as in
estimating the relative emissions from different ways in carrying out
activities.
(2) The department may use data such as totals of building space
occupied, energy purchases and generation, motor vehicle fuel purchases
and total mileage driven, and other reasonable sources of data to make
these estimates. The estimates may be derived from a single
methodology using these or other factors, except that for the top ten
state agencies in occupied building space and vehicle miles driven, the
estimates must be based upon the actual and projected operations of
those agencies. The estimates may be adjusted, and reasonable
estimates derived, when agencies have been created since 1990 or
functions reorganized among state agencies since 1990. The estimates
may incorporate projected emissions reductions that also affect state
agencies under the program authorized in RCW 70.235.020 and other
existing policies that will result in emissions reductions.
(3) By December 31st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2010,
the department shall report to the governor and to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives the total state
agencies' emissions of greenhouse gases for 2005 and the preceding two
years and actions taken to meet the emissions reduction targets.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.565 and 2005 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of general administration shall establish a
motor vehicle transportation service which is hereby empowered to:
(((1))) (a) Provide suitable motor vehicle transportation services
to any state agency on either a temporary or permanent basis upon
requisition from a state agency and upon such demonstration of need as
the department may require;
(((2))) (b) Provide motor pools for the use of state agencies
located in the Olympia area and such additional motor pools at other
locations in the state as may be necessary to provide economic,
efficient, and effective motor vehicle transportation services to state
agencies. Such additional motor pools may be under either the direct
control of the department or under the supervision of another state
agency by agreement with the department;
(((3))) (c) Establish an equitable schedule of rental and mileage
charges to agencies for motor vehicle transportation services furnished
which shall be designed to provide funds to cover replacement of
vehicles, the purchase of additional vehicles, and to recover the
actual total costs of motor pool operations including but not limited
to vehicle operation expense, depreciation expense, overhead, and
nonrecoverable collision or other damage to vehicles; and
(((4))) (d) Establish guidelines, procedures, and standards for
fleet operations that other state agencies and institutions of higher
education may adopt. The guidelines, procedures, and standards shall
be consistent with and carry out the objectives of any general policies
adopted by the office of financial management under RCW 43.41.130.
(2) The department of general administration shall phase in fuel
economy standards for motor pools in direct control of the department
or under the supervision of another state agency. The motor pools must
reach an average fuel economy of thirty-six miles per gallon by June 1,
2015. Motor pools refer to passenger vehicles, including passenger
vans and sport utility vehicles. Passenger vehicles are exempt if
used: (a) By the Washington state patrol; or (b) for natural resource
management in a fifty percent off-pavement capacity.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.41.130 and 1982 c 163 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director of financial management, after consultation with other
interested or affected state agencies, shall establish overall policies
governing the acquisition, operation, management, maintenance, repair,
and disposal of, all passenger motor vehicles owned or operated by any
state agency. Such policies shall include but not be limited to a
definition of what constitutes authorized use of a state owned or
controlled passenger motor vehicle and other motor vehicles on official
state business. The definition shall include, but not be limited to,
the use of state-owned motor vehicles for commuter ride sharing so long
as the entire capital depreciation and operational expense of the
commuter ride-sharing arrangement is paid by the commuters. Any use
other than such defined use shall be considered as personal use. By
June 15, 2010, the director of financial management, in consultation
with the department of general administration and the department of
transportation, shall develop policies to direct state agencies to
reduce fuel consumption and emissions from all classes of vehicles.
((Such policies shall also include the widest possible use of
gasohol and cost-effective alternative fuels in all motor vehicles
owned or operated by any state agency. As used in this section,
"gasohol" means motor vehicle fuel which contains more than nine and
one-half percent alcohol by volume.))
The director of financial management, in establishing policies for
passenger vehicles owned or operated by any state agency, shall require
all agency motor vehicle pools and agencies with a fleet of ten
vehicles or greater to achieve an average fuel economy standard of
thirty-six miles per gallon by June 1, 2015. Motor pools and fleets
refer to passenger vehicles, including passenger vans and sport utility
vehicles. Passenger vehicles are exempt if used: (1) By the
Washington state patrol; or (2) for natural resource management in a
fifty percent off-pavement capacity.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.19.675 and 2001 c 214 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For each state-owned facility greater than ten thousand square
feet that has not had an energy audit completed in the past five years,
the director of general administration, or the agency responsible for
the facility if other than the department of general administration,
shall conduct an energy audit of that facility. This energy audit may
be conducted by contract or by other arrangement, including appropriate
agency staff. Performance-based contracting shall be the preferred
method for implementing and completing energy audits. ((For each
state-owned facility, the energy consumption surveys shall be completed
no later than October 1, 2001, and the walk-through surveys shall be
completed no later than July 1, 2002.))
(2)(a) The director of general administration shall develop a
schedule for conducting and completing state agency energy audits. All
energy audits must be completed by December 1, 2013.
(b) The director of general administration shall develop procedures
to ensure that consistent methods for energy benchmarks are used when
conducting energy audits.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.19.680 and 2001 c 214 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of each walk-through survey required by RCW
43.19.675, the director of general administration or the agency
responsible for the facility if other than the department of general
administration shall implement energy conservation maintenance and
operation procedures that may be identified for any state-owned
facility. These procedures shall be implemented as soon as possible
but not later than twelve months after the walk-through survey.
(2) If a walk-through survey has identified potentially cost-effective energy conservation measures, the agency responsible for the
facility shall undertake an investment grade audit of the facility.
Investment grade audits shall be completed no later than December 1,
((2002)) 2013. Installation of cost-effective energy conservation
measures recommended in the investment grade audit shall be completed
no later than June 30, ((2004)) 2016.
(3) ((For each biennium until all measures are installed,)) The
director of general administration shall report to the governor and the
legislature ((installation progress, [and])) on the progress of energy
audits, development of energy benchmarks, and energy efficiency
measures planned for installation during the ensuing biennium. This
report shall be submitted by December 31, ((2004)) 2014, or at the end
of the following year whichever immediately precedes the capital budget
adoption, and ((every two years thereafter until all measures are
installed)) a final report by December 31, 2016.
(4) Agencies may contract with energy service companies as
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW for energy audits and implementation
of cost-effective energy conservation measures. State agencies must
complete an energy audit prior to or as part of a request for state
funds on any energy efficiency project for an agency-owned or leased
facility. The department shall provide technically qualified personnel
to the responsible agency upon request. The department shall recover
a fee for this service.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.41.170 and 1989 c 11 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management shall ((ensure that)) require
state agencies to perform energy audits as required under RCW
43.19.675. To the extent possible through the budget process ((shall
allow)), state agencies implementing energy conservation ((to))
measures as identified under RCW 43.19.680 may retain the resulting
cost savings for other purposes, including further energy conservation.

Sec. 9 RCW 39.35D.010 and 2005 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that public buildings can be built and
renovated using high-performance methods that save money, improve
school performance, and make workers more productive. High-performance
public buildings are proven to increase student test scores, reduce
worker absenteeism, and cut energy and utility costs.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that state-owned buildings
and schools be improved by adopting recognized standards for high-performance public buildings, reducing energy consumption, and allowing
flexible methods and choices in how to achieve those standards and
reductions. The legislature also intends that public agencies and
public school districts shall document costs and savings to monitor
this program and ensure that economic, community, and environmental
goals are achieved each year, and that an independent performance
review be conducted to evaluate this program and determine the extent
to which the results intended by this chapter are being met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act shall be in effect only to the
extent that funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of
this act.

--- END ---