BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that carbon
monoxide poses a serious threat. According to national statistics from
the centers for disease control, carbon monoxide kills more than five
hundred people and accounts for an estimated twenty thousand emergency
department visits annually. Specifically, Washington state has
experienced the dire effects of carbon monoxide poisoning. In the
storms that struck Washington in December 2006, it was estimated that
over one thousand people in the state were seen at hospital emergency
rooms with symptoms of carbon monoxide poisoning, and eight people
reportedly died of carbon monoxide exposure. It is the intent of the
legislature to implement policies to prevent similar tragedies from
occurring in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By July 1, 2010, the building code council shall adopt rules
requiring that all buildings classified as residential occupancies, as
defined in the state building code in chapter 51-54 WAC, be equipped
with carbon monoxide alarms.
(2) The building code council may phase in the carbon monoxide
alarm requirements on a schedule that it determines reasonable,
provided that the rules require that by January 1, 2011, all newly
constructed buildings classified as residential occupancies will be
equipped with carbon monoxide alarms, and all other buildings
classified as residential occupancies will be equipped with carbon
monoxide alarms by January 1, 2013.
(3) The building code council may exempt categories of buildings
classified as residential occupancies if it determines that requiring
carbon monoxide alarms are unnecessary to protect the health and
welfare of the occupants.
(4) The rules adopted by the building code council under this
section must (a) consider applicable nationally accepted standards and
(b) require that the maintenance of a carbon monoxide alarm in a
building where a tenancy exists, including the replacement of
batteries, is the responsibility of the tenant, who shall maintain the
alarm as specified by the manufacturer.

--- END ---