BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Commercial forestry produces jobs and
revenue while also providing clean water and air, wildlife habitat,
open space, and carbon storage. Maintaining a base of forest lands
that can be utilized for commercial forestry is of utmost importance
for the state.
As the population of the state increases, forest lands are
converted to residential, suburban, and urban uses. The encroachment
of these other uses into neighboring forest lands often makes it more
difficult for forest landowners to continue practicing commercial
forestry. It is the legislature's intent that a forest landowner's
right to practice commercial forestry in a manner consistent with the
state forest practices laws be protected and preserved.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.48.305 and 2007 c 331 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
agricultural activities conducted on farmland and forest practices, if
consistent with good agricultural and forest practices and established
prior to surrounding nonagricultural and nonforestry activities, are
presumed to be reasonable and shall not be found to constitute a
nuisance unless the activity or practice has a substantial adverse
effect on public health and safety.
((If those)) (2) Agricultural activities and forest practices
((are)) undertaken in conformity with all applicable laws and rules((,
they)) are presumed to be good agricultural and forest practices not
adversely affecting the public health and safety for purposes of this
section and RCW 7.48.300. An agricultural activity that is in
conformity with such laws and rules shall not be restricted as to the
hours of the day or day or days of the week during which it may be
conducted.
(3) The act of owning land upon which a growing crop of trees is
located, even if the tree growth is being managed passively and even if
the owner does not indicate the land's status as a working forest, is
considered to be a forest practice occurring on the land if the crop of
trees is located on land that is capable of supporting a merchantable
stand of timber that is not being actively used for a use that is
incompatible with timber growing. If the growing of trees has been
established prior to surrounding nonforestry activities, then the act
of tree growth is considered a necessary part of any other subsequent
stages of forest practices necessary to bring a crop of trees from its
planting to final harvest and is included in the provisions of this
section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall affect or impair any right to sue
for damages.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.48.310 and 2007 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in)) For the purposes of RCW 7.48.305 only:
(1) "Agricultural activity" means a condition or activity which
occurs on a farm in connection with the commercial production of farm
products and includes, but is not limited to, marketed produce at
roadside stands or farm markets; noise; odors; dust; fumes; operation
of machinery and irrigation pumps; movement, including, but not limited
to, use of current county road ditches, streams, rivers, canals, and
drains, and use of water for agricultural activities; ground and aerial
application of seed, fertilizers, conditioners, and plant protection
products; keeping of bees for production of agricultural or apicultural
products; employment and use of labor; roadway movement of equipment
and livestock; protection from damage by wildlife; prevention of
trespass; construction and maintenance of buildings, fences, roads,
bridges, ponds, drains, waterways, and similar features and maintenance
of streambanks and watercourses; and conversion from one agricultural
activity to another, including a change in the type of plant-related
farm product being produced. The term includes use of new practices
and equipment consistent with technological development within the
agricultural industry.
(2) "Farm" means the land, buildings, freshwater ponds, freshwater
culturing and growing facilities, and machinery used in the commercial
production of farm products.
(3) "Farmland" means land or freshwater ponds devoted primarily to
the production, for commercial purposes, of livestock, freshwater
aquacultural, or other farm products.
(4) "Farm product" means those plants and animals useful to humans
and includes, but is not limited to, forages and sod crops, dairy and
dairy products, poultry and poultry products, livestock, including
breeding, grazing, and recreational equine use, fruits, vegetables,
flowers, seeds, grasses, trees, freshwater fish and fish products,
apiaries and apiary products, equine and other similar products, or any
other product which incorporates the use of food, feed, fiber, or fur.
(5) "Forest practice" means (("forest practice" as defined in RCW
76.09.020)) any activity conducted on or directly pertaining to forest
land, as that term is defined in RCW 76.09.020, and relating to
growing, harvesting, or processing timber. The term "forest practices"
includes, but is not limited to, road and trail construction, final and
intermediate harvesting, precommercial thinning, reforestation,
fertilization, prevention and suppression of diseases and insects,
salvage of trees, brush control, and owning land where trees may
passively grow until one of the preceding activities is deemed timely
by the owner.

--- END ---