BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.12.187 and 2003 c 401 s 3 and 2003 c 146 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter shall not be construed to interfere with, impede,
or in any way diminish the right of employees to bargain collectively
with their employers through representatives of their own choosing
concerning wages or standards or conditions of employment. However,
rules adopted under this chapter regarding appropriate rest and meal
periods as applied to employees in the construction trades may be
superseded by a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under the
national labor relations act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq., if the terms
of the collective bargaining agreement covering such employees
specifically require rest and meal periods and prescribe requirements
concerning those rest and meal periods.
(2) Employees of public employers may enter into collective
bargaining contracts, labor/management agreements, or other mutually
agreed to employment agreements that specifically vary from or
supersede, in part or in total, rules adopted under this chapter
regarding appropriate rest and meal periods.
(3) Employees of health care facilities as those terms are defined
in RCW 49.28.130 may enter into collective bargaining contracts,
labor/management agreements, or other mutually agreed to employment
agreements that specifically vary from or supersede, in part or in
total, rules adopted under this chapter regarding appropriate rest and
meal periods.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.28.130 and 2002 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.28.140 and 49.28.150 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Employee" means a person who is (a) a licensed practical nurse
or a registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a surgical
technologist registered under chapter 18.215 RCW, a radiologic
technologist certified under chapter 18.84 RCW, a diagnostic medical
sonographer who produces ultrasonic recordings of internal organs for
use by physicians, or a cardiovascular technologist or technician who
conducts tests on pulmonary or cardiovascular systems of patients for
diagnostic purposes; and (b) employed by a health care facility ((who
is)), involved in direct patient care activities or clinical services,
and receives an hourly wage.
(2) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, state institution, political subdivision of the state, or
person or group of persons, acting directly or indirectly in the
interest of a health care facility.
(3) "Health care facility" means the following facilities, or any
part of the facility, that operates on a twenty-four hours per day,
seven days per week basis: Hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW,
hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, rural health care
facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, and psychiatric hospitals
licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, and includes such facilities if owned
and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state. If a nursing home regulated under chapter 18.51 RCW or a home
health agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW is operating under the
license of a health care facility, the nursing home or home health
agency is considered part of the health care facility for the purposes
of this subsection.
(4) "Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour
period not to exceed twelve hours in a twenty-four hour period or
eighty hours in a consecutive fourteen-day period.
(5) "On-call time" means time spent by an employee who is not
working on the premises of the place of employment but who is
compensated for availability or who, as a condition of employment, has
agreed to be available to return to the premises of the place of
employment on short notice if the need arises.
(6) "Reasonable efforts" means that the employer, to the extent
reasonably possible, does all of the following but is unable to obtain
staffing coverage:
(a) Seeks individuals to volunteer to work extra time from all
available qualified staff who are working;
(b) Contacts qualified employees who have made themselves available
to work extra time;
(c) Seeks the use of per diem staff; and
(d) Seeks personnel from a contracted temporary agency when such
staffing is permitted by law or an applicable collective bargaining
agreement, and when the employer regularly uses a contracted temporary
agency.
(7) "Unforeseeable emergent circumstance" means (a) any unforeseen
declared national, state, or municipal emergency; (b) when a health
care facility disaster plan is activated; or (c) any unforeseen
disaster or other catastrophic event which substantially affects or
increases the need for health care services.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.28.140 and 2002 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No employee of a health care facility may be required to work
overtime. Attempts to compel or force employees to work overtime are
contrary to public policy, and any such requirement contained in a
contract, agreement, or understanding is void.
(2) The acceptance by any employee of overtime is strictly
voluntary, and the refusal of an employee to accept such overtime work
is not grounds for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any other
penalty, threat of reports for discipline, or employment decision
adverse to the employee.
(3) This section does not apply to overtime work that occurs:
(a) Because of any unforeseeable emergent circumstance;
(b) Because of prescheduled on-call time. Prescheduled on-call
time must only be used for unanticipated and immediate patient care
emergencies. Prescheduled on-call time may not be used to fill chronic
or foreseeable staff shortages. The employer shall document reasonable
efforts to obtain staffing to avoid prescheduled on-call time;
(c) When the employer documents that the employer has used
reasonable efforts to obtain staffing. An employer has not used
reasonable efforts if overtime work is used to fill vacancies resulting
from chronic staff shortages; or
(d) When an employee is required to work overtime to complete a
patient care procedure already in progress where the absence of the
employee could have an adverse effect on the patient. The employer may
not schedule nonemergency procedures that would require overtime.

--- END ---