BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.477 and 1995 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless allowed by rule((,)) under chapter 34.05 RCW, a person
shall not cause or allow any of the following materials to be burned in
any residential solid fuel burning device:
(a) Garbage;
(b) Treated wood;
(c) Plastics;
(d) Rubber products;
(e) Animals;
(f) Asphaltic products;
(g) Waste petroleum products;
(h) Paints; or
(i) Any substance, other than properly seasoned fuel wood, which
normally emits dense smoke or obnoxious odors.
(2) ((For the sole purpose of a contingency measure to meet the
requirements of)) To achieve and maintain attainment in areas of
nonattainment for fine particulates in accordance with section
172(((c)(9))) of the federal clean air act, a local air pollution
control authority or the department may, after meeting requirements in
subsection (3) of this section, prohibit the use of solid fuel burning
devices, except:
(a) Fireplaces as defined in RCW 70.94.453(3)((,));
(b) Wood stoves meeting the standards set forth in RCW
((70.94.457)) 70.94.473(1)(b); or
(c) Pellet stoves ((either certified or issued an exemption by the
United States environmental protection agency in accordance with Title
40, Part 60 of the code of federal regulations, if the United States
environmental protection agency, in consultation with)).
(3) Prior to prohibiting the use of solid fuel burning devices
under subsection (2) of this section, the department ((and)) or the
local air pollution control authority ((makes)) must:
(a) Seek input from any city, county, or jurisdictional health
department affected by the proposal to prohibit the use of solid fuel
burning devices; and
(b) Make written findings that:
(((a))) (i) The area ((has failed to make reasonable further
progress or attain or maintain a national ambient air quality
standard)) is designated as an area of nonattainment for fine
particulate matter by the United States environmental protection
agency, or is in maintenance status under that designation; ((and
(b))) (ii) Emissions from solid fuel burning devices ((from a
particular geographic)) in the area are a major contributing factor
((to such failure to make reasonable further progress or attain or
maintain a)) for violating the national ambient air quality standard
for fine particulates; and
(iii) The area has an adequately funded program to assist low-income households to secure an adequate source of heat, which may
include wood stoves meeting the requirements of RCW 70.94.453(2).
(4) When a local air pollution control authority or the department
prohibits the use of solid fuel burning devices as authorized by this
section, the cities, counties, and jurisdictional health departments
serving the area shall cooperate with the local air pollution control
authority to implement the prohibition.
(5) A prohibition issued by a local air pollution control authority
or the department under this ((subsection)) section shall not apply to
a person in a residence or commercial establishment that does not have
an adequate source of heat without burning wood.
(6) As used in this section, "jurisdictional health department"
means a city, county, city-county, or district public health
department.

--- END ---