BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
PROVIDING UNIFORMITY IN TAX INCENTIVE ACCOUNTABILITY PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that
accountability and effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax
policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources, the legislature needs information on how a tax
preference is used. In recent years, the legislature has enacted or
extended numerous tax preferences that require the reporting of
information to the department of revenue. Although there are many
similarities in the requirements, and only two distinct accountability
documents, there is a lack of uniformity in the information reported,
penalties for failure to file, due dates, filing extensions, and filing
requirements. Greater uniformity in the data reported is necessary to
adequately compare tax preference programs. The legislature intends to
create two sets of uniform reporting requirements that apply to the
existing tax preferences and can be used in future legislation granting
additional tax preferences.
(2) The legislative fiscal committees or the department of revenue
are required to study many of the existing tax preferences and report
to the legislature at least once. Because chapter 43.136 RCW now
requires the joint legislative audit and review committee, with support
from the department of revenue, to comprehensively review most tax
preferences every ten years and provide a report to the legislature, a
number of redundant studies by the legislative fiscal committees and
the department of revenue have been eliminated. However, the
department of revenue will continue to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category and report the statistics to the legislature
each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
survey under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department.
(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the survey is
due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a
person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a
survey under this section.
(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey
must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by April 30th of
each of the seven succeeding calendar years.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax preference was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter
82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at
the investment project.
(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452,
the survey must also include the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with the research and development activities for which the
credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned,
and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply
to this subsection (2)(d).
(e) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax preference claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax preference claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in subsection
(5) of this section. If the amount of the tax preference claimed as
reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or
otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax
returns or other information known to the department, the amount
actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but
fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey
or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due. If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, twelve
and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
report under this section must file a complete annual report with the
department. The report is due by April 30th of the year following any
calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax
preference that requires a report under this section. The department
may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference
was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage,
and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year
that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names
of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year
that the tax preference was claimed.
(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by
RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW
82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must
indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this
state during the time period covered by the report.
(d) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax
preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails
to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department must declare the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed
at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(5) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.04.240 and 2003 c 149 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other
provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case of
manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product manufactured,
or, in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. For
the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon
crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound
semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (2) must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.
(c) This subsection (2) expires twelve years after the effective
date of this act.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.04.2404 and 2006 c 84 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing or processing for hire semiconductor materials, as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall))
is, in the case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, ((be))
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor
wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) This section expires ((twelve years after)) December 1,
((2006)) 2018.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.04.250 and 2008 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
(3)(a) Upon every person classified by the federal aviation
administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated
repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business
of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.04.260 and 2008 c 296 s 1, 2008 c 217 s 100, and
2008 c 81 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such
sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) ((Alcohol fuel or)) Wood biomass fuel((,)) as ((those terms
are)) defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax
with respect to the business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
((alcohol fuel or)) wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds
derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities ((shall be)) is equal
to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection ((shall be)) are exempt from payment of taxes
imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject
to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state ((shall)) must be determined in accordance with the methods
of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995,
and 1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection
((shall)) must be deposited in the health services account created
under RCW 43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case of manufacturers,
((be)) equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross
proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, ((be)) equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through ((the later of))
June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case
of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product manufactured
and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the
case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((eligible for)) reporting under the tax rate ((under)) provided
in this subsection (11) must ((report as required)) file a complete
annual report with the department under ((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103
of this act.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business ((shall)) is, in the case of extractors, ((be)) equal to the
value of products, including byproducts, extracted, or in the case of
extractors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall)) is, in the
case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of products, including
byproducts, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be))
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of
0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling
standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where
the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the
date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for
the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or
after severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under section
102 of this act.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.04.2909 and 2006 c 182 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing aluminum; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is,
in the case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904
percent.
(2) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of aluminum
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the aluminum multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2012.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.04.294 and 2007 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case
of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent.
(2) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules and manufactured by the seller, or
of solar grade silicon manufactured by the seller to be used
exclusively in components of such systems((, manufactured by that
person)); as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the solar grade
silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(b) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(c) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(d) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(4) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 110 RCW 82.04.426 and 2003 c 149 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.04.240(2) does not apply to any
person in respect to the manufacturing of semiconductor microchips.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Manufacturing semiconductor microchips" means taking raw
polished semiconductor wafers and embedding integrated circuits on the
wafers using processes such as masking, etching, and diffusion; and
(b) "Integrated circuit" means a set of microminiaturized,
electronic circuits.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) This section expires nine years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 111 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2006 c 354 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the value of products
or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or
(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the
seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the
ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person
taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve
records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the
goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of
business out of this state.
(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 112 RCW 82.04.4268 and 2006 c 354 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the value of products
or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing dairy products; or
(b) Selling manufactured dairy products to purchasers who transport
in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A
person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state.
(2) "Dairy products" means dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein.
(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 113 RCW 82.04.4269 and 2006 c 354 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the
gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing seafood products that remain in a raw, raw
frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by
that person; or
(b) Selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw
frozen, or raw salted state to purchasers who transport in the ordinary
course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an
exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state.
(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 114 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit ((shall be)) is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, ((shall)) must be claimed against taxes
due for the same calendar year in which the qualified research and
development expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for
each calendar year ((shall)) may not exceed the lesser of two million
dollars or the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department ((shall)) must declare the taxes against which the
credit was claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department
((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against
which the credit was claimed. Interest ((shall)) must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and ((shall)) accrues
until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section that
is disallowed as a result of this section may be claimed by the person
who performed the qualified research and development subject to the
limitations set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(6)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b))) A person claiming the credit ((shall)) provided in this
section must file a complete annual survey with the department under
section 102 of this act. ((The survey is due by March 31st following
any year in which a credit is claimed. The department may extend the
due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of the
tax credit claimed, the qualified research and development expenditures
during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the taxable
amount during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the
number of new products or research projects by general classification,
the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the
research and development activities for which a credit was claimed, and
whether the credit has been assigned under subsection (3) of this
section and who assigned the credit. The survey shall also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (6)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported on the
survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's
tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(7) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The
department shall report these statistics to the legislature each year
by September 1st.
(8) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of
the program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(9))) (7) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((10))) (8) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 115 RCW 82.04.4461 and 2008 c 81 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a)(i) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit
is allowed for each person for qualified aerospace product development.
For a person who is a manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, credit may be earned for
expenditures occurring after December 1, 2003. For all other persons,
credit may be earned only for expenditures occurring after June 30,
2008.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "commercial airplane" and
"component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, any credits earned under this section must
be accrued and carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2005.
These carryover credits may be used at any time thereafter, and may be
carried over until used. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a
credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified aerospace
product development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of
1.5 percent.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section the
credit ((shall)) must be ((taken)) claimed against taxes due for the
same calendar year in which the qualified aerospace product development
expenditures are incurred. Credit earned on or after July 1, 2005, may
not be carried over. The credit for each calendar year ((shall)) may
not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
calendar year. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person claiming the credit ((shall)) must file a form
prescribed by the department that ((shall)) must include the amount of
the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated aerospace product
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during the calendar year
for which the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Aerospace product" has the meaning given in RCW 82.08.975.
(b) "Aerospace product development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of an
aerospace product or of a product line, model, or model derivative of
an aerospace product, including prototype development, testing, and
certification. The term includes the discovery of technological
information, the translating of technological information into new or
improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, or inventions, and
the adaptation of existing products and models into new products or new
models, or derivatives of products or models. The term does not
include manufacturing activities or other production-oriented
activities, however the term does include tool design and engineering
design for the manufacturing process. The term does not include
surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market
research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service,
computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas
such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(c) "Qualified aerospace product development" means aerospace
product development performed within this state.
(d) "Qualified aerospace product development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits,
supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified
aerospace product development by a person claiming the credit provided
in this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person or
to the state and any of its departments and institutions, other than a
public educational or research institution to conduct qualified
aerospace product development. The term does not include capital costs
and overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable
property.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's tax
returns during the year in which the credit is claimed, less any
taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(6) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section must file a
complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under ((RCW
82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 116 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2008 c 81 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the
buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings
constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings
are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and
(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with
respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon
which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for
aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling specifically
designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their
components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not within
the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2) and are((: (I)
Engaged in manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components; or (II)))
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(11)(b), or 82.04.250(3); or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used
exclusively for aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
their components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not
within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (2) and are((: (I)
Engaged in manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components; or (II)))
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(11)(b), or 82.04.250(3); and
(b) An amount equal to:
(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(11)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;
(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(11)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or
(C) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
((82.04.0250(3) [82.04.250(3)])) 82.04.250(3) or 82.04.290(3), on
computer hardware, computer peripherals, and software exempt under RCW
82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and acquired after June 30, 2008.
(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit
under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property
taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.
(((I))) (A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(11) (a) or (b) on
the applicable business activities of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling specifically
designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes.
(((II))) (B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing
classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(((III))) (C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of
the fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable
amount required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar
year before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is
earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for
calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(11) for manufacturing was not in effect during the full
calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under this
section is earned.
(((IV))) (D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this
subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the
fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.
(((V))) (E) As used in (((III))) (C) of this subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(((C))), "returns" means the tax returns for which the tax
imposed under this chapter is reported to the department.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4461.
(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW
82.08.975.
(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but
may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section must file a
complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under ((RCW
82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 117 RCW 82.04.448 and 2003 c 149 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under RCW 82.04.240(2) for
persons engaged in the business of manufacturing semiconductor
materials. For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2)(a) The credit under this section ((shall)) equals three
thousand dollars for each employment position used in manufacturing
production that takes place in a new building exempt from sales and use
tax under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965. A credit is earned for the
calendar year a person fills a position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to eight years. Those positions that are not
filled for the entire year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit
if filled less than six months, and the entire credit if filled more
than six months.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at a new building that qualifies for the
exemption from sales and use tax under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation,
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the person is eligible for credit for employment at the
existing building and new building, with the limitation that the
combined eligible employment not exceed full employment at the new
building. "Full employment" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.965.
The credit may not be earned until the commencement of commercial
production, as that term is used in RCW 82.08.965.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall))
must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be)) is retroactive to the date the tax
credit was taken, and ((shall)) accrues until the taxes for which a
credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section must
file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act.
(6) Credits may be ((taken)) claimed after twelve years after the
effective date of this act, for those buildings at which commercial
production began before twelve years after the effective date of this
act, subject to all of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this
section.
(7) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 118 RCW 82.04.4481 and 2006 c 182 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all property taxes paid during the calendar year on
property owned by a direct service industrial customer and reasonably
necessary for the purposes of an aluminum smelter.
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section is
subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned
during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against
taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried
over a second year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax
liability before new credits. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for property
taxes levied for collection in 2012 and thereafter.
(4) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual report with the department under section 103 of this
act.

Sec. 119 RCW 82.04.4483 and 2004 c 25 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
computer software or programming, as those terms are defined in this
section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any new qualifying
employment positions created as a result of the relocation but is not
eligible to receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the
other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the new qualified
employment position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section shall equal one thousand
dollars for each new qualified employment position created after
January 1, 2004, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the
calendar year the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally
a credit is earned for each year the position is maintained over the
subsequent consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet
the definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled.
If the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Participants who claimed credit under RCW 82.04.4456 for
qualified employment positions created before December 31, 2003, are
eligible to earn credit for each year the position is maintained over
the subsequent consecutive years, for up to four years, which four
years include any years claimed under RCW 82.04.4456. Those persons
who did not receive a credit under RCW 82.04.4456 before December 31,
2003, are not eligible to earn credit for qualified employment
positions created before December 31, 2003.
(c) Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new qualified
employment positions created on or after January 1, 2004. New
qualified employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is
a sole proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one
employee position and this type of business is eligible to receive
credit for one position.
(d) If a position is filled before July 1st, the position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, the position is eligible for half of the credit
for that calendar year.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall))
must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be assessed)) applies retroactively to the
date the tax credit was taken, and ((shall accrue)) accrues until the
taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
a credit under this chapter for information technology help desk
services conducted from a rural county. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(9) A person ((taking)) claiming a tax credit((s)) under this
section ((shall make an)) must file a complete annual ((report to))
survey with the department under section 102 of this act. ((The report
shall be in a letter form and shall include the following information:
Number of positions for which credit is being claimed, type of position
for which credit is being claimed, type of activity in which the person
is engaged in the county, how long the person has been located in the
county, and taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be
filed by January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during
the previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the
loss of eligibility under this section. However, the department,
through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not
filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.))
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Computer software" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215
after June 30, 2004, and includes "software" as defined in RCW
82.04.215 before July 1, 2004.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(c) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of computer software, as that term is defined in this
chapter, and that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as
a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(d) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of computer software
or programming.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of computer software or manufacturing of
computer software. This excludes administrative, professional,
service, executive, and other similar positions. If an employee is
either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the
employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the
employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a
week.
(f) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, 2011.
(12) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 120 RCW 82.04.4484 and 2004 c 25 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of providing
information technology help desk services to third parties.
(2) To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be
conducted from a rural county.
(3) The amount of the tax credit for persons engaged in the
activity of providing information technology help desk services in
rural counties ((shall be)) is equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing
the services from the rural county. In order to qualify for the credit
under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of rural
county at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. These records include information relating to
description of activity engaged in a rural county by the person.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department
((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall))
must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be assessed)) retroactively to the date the
tax credit was taken, and ((shall)) will accrue until the taxes for
which a credit has been used are repaid.
(6) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(7) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the credit is available to the successor only if the
eligibility conditions of this section are met.
(8) A person ((taking)) claiming a tax credit((s)) under this
section ((shall make an)) must file a complete annual ((report to))
survey with the department under section 102 of this act. ((The report
shall be in a letter form and shall include the following information:
Type of activity in which the person is engaged in the county, number
of employees in the rural county, how long the person has been located
in the county, and taxpayer name and registration number. The report
must be filed by January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed
during the previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in
the loss of eligibility under this section. However, the department,
through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not
filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.))
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:
(i) Software and hardware maintenance;
(ii) Software and hardware diagnostics and troubleshooting;
(iii) Software and hardware installation;
(iv) Software and hardware repair;
(v) Software and hardware information and training; and
(vi) Software and hardware upgrade.
(b) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 121 RCW 82.04.449 and 2006 c 112 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington customized employment
training program created in RCW 28B.67.020. The credit allowed under
this section is equal to fifty percent of the value of a participant's
payments to the employment training finance account created in RCW
28B.67.030. If a participant in the program does not meet the
qualifications in RCW 28B.67.020(2)(b)(ii), the participant must remit
to the department the value of any credits taken plus interest. The
credit earned by a participant in one calendar year may be carried over
to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year.
No credit may be allowed for repayment of training allowances received
from the Washington customized employment training program on or after
July 1, 2016.
(2) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of this
act.

Sec. 122 RCW 82.08.805 and 2006 c 182 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for tangible
personal property used at an aluminum smelter, tangible personal
property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of
buildings or other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and
services rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or
tangible personal property, is eligible for an exemption from the state
share of the tax in the form of a credit, as provided in this section.
A person claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then take a
credit equal to the state share of retail sales tax paid under RCW
82.08.020. The person ((shall)) must submit information, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed
and the amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) A person claiming the tax preference provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2012.

Sec. 123 RCW 82.08.965 and 2003 c 149 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
constructing of new buildings used for the manufacturing of
semiconductor materials, to sales of tangible personal property that
will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings
during the course of the constructing, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing,
building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the manufacturer or processor
for hire must meet the following requirements for an eight-year period,
such period beginning the day the new building commences commercial
production, or a portion of tax otherwise due ((shall)) will be
immediately due and payable pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The manufacturer or processor for hire must maintain at least
seventy-five percent of full employment at the new building for which
the exemption under this section is claimed.
(b) Before commencing commercial production at a new facility the
manufacturer or processor for hire must meet with the department to
review projected employment levels in the new buildings. The
department, using information provided by the taxpayer, ((shall)) must
make a determination of the number of positions that would be filled at
full employment. This number ((shall)) must be used throughout the
eight-year period to determine whether any tax is to be repaid. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the manufacturer or processor for hire ((shall)) must
maintain seventy-five percent of full employment at the manufacturing
site overall.
(d) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section must file a
complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act.
(3) If the employment requirement is not met for any one calendar
year, one-eighth of the exempt sales and use taxes ((shall)) will be
due and payable by April 1st of the following year. The department
((shall)) must assess interest to the date the tax was imposed, but not
penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not eligible.
(4) The exemption applies to new buildings, or parts of buildings,
that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of semiconductor
materials, including the storage of raw materials and finished product.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the new
building are completed and production for sale has begun; and
(b) "Full employment" is the number of positions required for full
capacity production at the new building, for positions such as line
workers, engineers, and technicians.
(c) "Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.240(2).
(6) No exemption may be taken after twelve years after the
effective date of this act, however all of the eligibility criteria and
limitations are applicable to any exemptions claimed before that date.
(7) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 124 RCW 82.08.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for
hire in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor
materials" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404.
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.5351)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires ((twelve years after)) December 1,
((2006)) 2018.

Sec. 125 RCW 82.08.970 and 2003 c 149 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for
hire in the manufacturing of semiconductor materials. This exemption
is limited to gases and chemicals used in the manufacturing process to
grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on
the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the manufacturing process, or uses of gases and
chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such
processing takes place. For the purposes of this section,
"semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.240(2).
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 126 RCW 82.08.980 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
constructing of new buildings by a manufacturer engaged in the
manufacturing of superefficient airplanes or by a port district, to be
leased to a manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing of superefficient
airplanes, to sales of tangible personal property that will be
incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings during the
course of the constructing, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section, however in order to qualify under this section before starting
construction the port district must have entered into an agreement with
the manufacturer to build such a facility. A person ((taking))
claiming the exemption under this section is subject to all the
requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must file
a complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under
((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(3) The exemption in this section applies to buildings, or parts of
buildings, that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of
superefficient airplanes, including buildings used for the storage of
raw materials and finished product.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "superefficient airplane" has
the meaning given in RCW 82.32.550.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 127 RCW 82.12.022 and 2006 c 182 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from)) A
use tax is levied on every person in this state ((a use tax)) for the
privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas within this state as
a consumer.
(2) The tax ((shall)) must be levied and collected in an amount
equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by
the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution
businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does
not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas
distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(7) in transporting
the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are
subject to tax under that chapter.
(3) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other
means than through a pipeline.
(4) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to
the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas
for which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(5)(a) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to
the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that
term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2012.
(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5)
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(6) There ((shall be)) is a credit against the tax levied under
this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by
another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought
under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect
to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(7) The use tax ((hereby)) imposed ((shall)) in this section must
be paid by the consumer to the department.
(8) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who
delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the
department. Such report ((shall)) must contain the volume of gas
delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other
information as the department ((shall)) may require by rule.
(9) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384,
Laws of 1989.

Sec. 128 RCW 82.12.805 and 2006 c 182 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under RCW 82.12.020 for tangible
personal property used at an aluminum smelter, or for tangible personal
property that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of
buildings or other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and
services rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or
tangible personal property, is eligible for an exemption from the state
share of the tax in the form of a credit, as provided in this section.
The amount of the credit ((shall be)) equals ((to)) the state share of
use tax computed to be due under RCW 82.12.020. The person ((shall))
must submit information, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or
acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the amount of
exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2012.

Sec. 129 RCW 82.12.965 and 2003 c 149 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings used for the manufacturing of
semiconductor materials during the course of constructing such
buildings or to labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
during the course of constructing, building fixtures not otherwise
eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
RCW 82.08.965 apply to this section, including the filing of a complete
annual report with the department under section 103 of this act.
(3) No exemption may be taken twelve years after the effective date
of this act, however all of the eligibility criteria and limitations
are applicable to any exemptions claimed before that date.
(4) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 130 RCW 82.12.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404.
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.5351)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires ((twelve years after)) December 1,
((2006)) 2018.

Sec. 131 RCW 82.12.970 and 2003 c 149 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the manufacturing of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the manufacturing process to
grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on
the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the manufacturing process, or uses of gases and
chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such
processing takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor
materials" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 132 RCW 82.12.980 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings by a manufacturer engaged in
the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes or owned by a port
district and to be leased to a manufacturer engaged in the
manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, during the course of
constructing such buildings, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
RCW 82.08.980 apply to this section, including the filing of a complete
annual report with the department under section 103 of this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 133 RCW 82.16.0421 and 2004 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business" means a person
who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average megawatts
of electricity per month in a chlor-alkali electrolytic process to
split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water to make
chlorine and sodium hydroxide. A "chlor-alkali electrolytic processing
business" does not include direct service industrial customers or their
subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power from the
Bonneville power administration as of June 10, 2004.
(b) "Sodium chlorate electrolytic processing business" means a
person who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average
megawatts of electricity per month in a sodium chlorate electrolytic
process to split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water
to make sodium chlorate and hydrogen. A "sodium chlorate electrolytic
processing business" does not include direct service industrial
customers or their subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power
from the Bonneville power administration as of June 10, 2004.
(2) Effective July 1, 2004, the tax levied under this chapter does
not apply to sales of electricity made by a light and power business to
a chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business or a sodium chlorate
electrolytic processing business for the electrolytic process if the
contract for sale of electricity to the business contains the following
terms:
(a) The electricity to be used in the electrolytic process is
separately metered from the electricity used for general operations of
the business;
(b) The price charged for the electricity used in the electrolytic
process will be reduced by an amount equal to the tax exemption
available to the light and power business under this section; and
(c) Disallowance of all or part of the exemption under this section
is a breach of contract and the damages to be paid by the chlor-alkali
electrolytic processing business or the sodium chlorate electrolytic
processing business are the amount of the tax exemption disallowed.
(3) The exemption provided for in this section does not apply to
amounts received from the remarketing or resale of electricity
originally obtained by contract for the electrolytic process.
(4) In order to claim an exemption under this section, the chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business or the sodium chlorate
electrolytic processing business must provide the light and power
business with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed
by the department.
(5) A person receiving the benefit of the exemption provided in
this section must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.
(6)(a) This section does not apply to sales of electricity made
after December 31, 2010.
(b) This section expires June 30, 2011.

Sec. 134 RCW 82.29A.137 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) All leasehold interests in port district facilities exempt from
tax under RCW 82.08.980 or 82.12.980 and used by a manufacturer engaged
in the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, as defined in RCW
82.32.550, are exempt from tax under this chapter. A person ((taking))
claiming the credit under RCW 82.04.4463 is not eligible for the
exemption under this section.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section must file
a complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under
((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 135 RCW 82.32.590 and 2008 c 81 s 13 and 2008 c 15 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under section 102 of this act or annual report under
((RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.650, 82.32.630, 82.32.610,
82.82.020, or 82.74.040)) section 103 of this act by the due date was
the result of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the
department ((shall)) must extend the time for filing the survey or
report. Such extension ((shall)) must be for a period of thirty days
from the date the department issues its written notification to the
taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under this section. The
department may grant additional extensions as it deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
((shall)) must be guided by rules adopted by the department for the
waiver or cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely
payment of any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer.

Sec. 136 RCW 82.32.600 and 2008 c 81 s 14 and 2008 c 15 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
((RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.545, 82.32.610, 82.32.630,
82.82.020, or 82.74.040)) section 102 or 103 of this act must
electronically file with the department all surveys, reports, returns,
and any other forms or information the department requires in an
electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As used
in this section, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

Sec. 137 RCW 82.60.020 and 2006 c 142 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an integral
part, or investment projects which have already received deferrals
under this chapter.
(5) "Initiation of construction" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.63.010.
(6) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(((6))) (7) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW
82.04.120. "Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the
production of computer software, and other computer-related services,
the activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories, and the conditioning of vegetable
seeds.
(((7))) (8) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(((8))) (9) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the
purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for
manufacturing and research and development activities, including plant
offices and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw
material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an
integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for
manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used
partly for manufacturing or research and development and partly for
other purposes, the applicable tax deferral ((shall)) must be
determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(((9))) (10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent
full-time employee employed in the eligible investment project during
the entire tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time
position that is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The
term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred
fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours
a year.
(((10))) (11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new
industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities
that are an integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research
and development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment"
includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory
equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and
moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(((11))) (12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun. As used in
this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or
sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of
the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 138 RCW 82.60.070 and 2004 c 25 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b))) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this
chapter ((after June 30, 1994, shall)) must file a complete ((an))
annual survey with the department under section 102 of this act. If
the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as
provided in RCW 82.60.020(4), the lessee ((shall agree to)) must file
a complete ((the)) annual survey, and the applicant is not required to
file a complete ((the)) annual survey. ((The survey is due by March
31st of the year following the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
complete and the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey shall
include the amount of tax deferred, the number of new products or
research projects by general classification, and the number of
trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at the
investment project. The survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(f))) (b) The department ((shall also)) must use the information
reported on the annual survey required by this section to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department
((shall)) must report to the legislature by December 1, 2009. The
report ((shall)) must measure the effect of the program on job
creation, the number of jobs created for residents of eligible areas,
company growth, the introduction of new products, the diversification
of the state's economy, growth in research and development investment,
the movement of firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into
the state, and such other factors as the department selects.
(2)(((a))) If, on the basis of a survey under ((this)) section 102
of this act or other information, the department finds that an
investment project is not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter,
the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for the project ((shall be))
is immediately due.
(((b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under subsection (1) of this section by the date due,
twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax shall be immediately
due. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee
as provided in RCW 82.60.020(4), the lessee shall be responsible for
payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.))
(3) ((Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section,
deferred taxes need not be repaid on machinery and equipment for lumber
and wood products industries, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, of the type which qualifies for exemption under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 to the extent the taxes have not been repaid
before July 1, 1995)) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under
subsection (2) of this section because the department has found that an
investment project is not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter
is no longer required to file annual surveys under section 102 of this
act beginning on the date an investment project is used for
nonqualifying purposes.
(4) Notwithstanding any other ((subsection)) provision of this
section or section 102 of this act, deferred taxes on the following
need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 139 RCW 82.63.020 and 2004 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of construction of, or acquisition of equipment
or machinery for the investment project. The application ((shall))
must be made to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application ((shall)) must contain information
regarding the location of the investment project, the applicant's
average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual
new employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of
employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time
schedules for completion and operation, and other information required
by the department. The department ((shall)) must rule on the
application within sixty days.
(2)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for)) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes under
this chapter ((shall agree to)) must file a complete ((an)) annual
survey with the department under section 102 of this act. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
RCW 82.63.010(7), the lessee ((shall agree to)) must file a complete
((the)) annual survey, and the applicant is not required to
((complete)) file the annual survey. ((The survey is due by March 31st
of the year following the calendar year in which the investment project
is certified by the department as having been operationally complete
and the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey shall include the
amount of tax deferred, the number of new products or research projects
by general classification, and the number of trademarks, patents, and
copyrights associated with activities at the investment project. The
survey shall also include the following information for employment
positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(4))) (3) The department ((shall)) must use the information
reported on the annual survey required by this section to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department
((shall)) must report to the legislature by December 1, 2009, and
December 1, 2013. The reports ((shall)) must measure the effect of the
program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(4) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW 82.63.045
because the department has found that an investment project is used for
purposes other than research and development performed within this
state in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials,
biotechnology, electronic device technology, and environmental
technology is no longer required to file annual surveys under section
102 of this act beginning on the date an investment project is used for
nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 140 RCW 82.63.045 and 2004 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.63.020))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is used for purposes other than qualified
research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any time
during the calendar year in which the investment project is certified
by the department as having been operationally completed, or at any
time during any of the seven succeeding calendar years, a portion of
deferred taxes ((shall be)) is immediately due according to the
following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) ((If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.63.020 by the date due, 12.5 percent of
the deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee shall be responsible for payment to the extent the lessee
has received the economic benefit.
(c) If an investment project is used for purposes other than
qualified research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any
time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified as having been operationally complete and the recipient of
the deferral fails to complete the annual survey due under RCW
82.63.020, the portion of deferred taxes immediately due is the amount
on the schedule in (a) of this subsection.)) If the economic benefits
of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee ((shall be)) is responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3) The department ((shall)) must assess interest at the rate
provided for delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the
date of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished
by insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section or section 102
of this act, deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 141 RCW 82.74.040 and 2006 c 354 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b))) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this
chapter ((shall)) must file a complete ((an)) annual survey with the
department under section 102 of this act. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.74.010(6),
the lessee ((shall)) must file a complete ((the)) annual survey, and
the applicant is not required to ((complete)) file the annual survey.
((The survey is due by March 31st of the year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
having been operationally complete and each of the seven succeeding
calendar years. The department may extend the due date for timely
filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of tax deferred. The
survey shall also include the following information for employment
positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax deferral taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(f) The department shall also use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2011. The report shall
measure the effect of the program on job creation, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.
(2)(a) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under subsection (1) of this section by the date due or
any extension under RCW 82.32.590, twelve and one-half percent of the
deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of the
deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.74.010(6), the
lessee shall be responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has
received the economic benefit. The department shall assess interest,
but not penalties, on the amounts due under this section. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, and shall accrue until the amounts due are repaid.
(b))) (2) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW
82.74.050(2) because the department has found that an investment
project is used for purposes other than fresh fruit and vegetable
processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing,
cold storage warehousing, or research and development is no longer
required to file annual surveys under ((this)) section 102 of this act
beginning on the date an investment project is used for nonqualifying
purposes.

Sec. 142 RCW 82.74.050 and 2006 c 354 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.74.040))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is used for purposes other than fresh fruit and
vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product
manufacturing, cold storage warehousing, or research and development at
any time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as having been operationally completed, or
at any time during any of the seven succeeding calendar years, a
portion of deferred taxes ((shall be)) is immediately due according to
the following schedule:

Year in which nonqualifying use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee
as provided in RCW 82.74.010(6), the lessee is responsible for payment
to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3) The department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not
penalties, on the deferred taxes under subsection (2) of this section.
The interest ((shall)) must be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date of
deferral, and ((shall)) will accrue until the deferred taxes are
repaid. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section or section 102
of this act, deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 A new section is added to chapter 82.75
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this
chapter must file a complete annual survey with the department under
section 102 of this act. If the economic benefits of the deferral are
passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.75.010(5), the lessee must
file a complete annual survey, and the applicant is not required to
file the annual survey.
(2) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW
82.75.040(2) because the department has found that an investment
project is used for purposes other than qualified biotechnology product
manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities is no longer
required to file annual surveys under section 102 of this act beginning
on the date an investment project is used for nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 144 RCW 82.75.010 and 2006 c 178 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Biotechnology" means a technology based on the science of
biology, microbiology, molecular biology, cellular biology,
biochemistry, or biophysics, or any combination of these, and includes,
but is not limited to, recombinant DNA techniques, genetics and genetic
engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living
organisms, or parts of organisms.
(3) "Biotechnology product" means any virus, therapeutic serum,
antibody, protein, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine, blood, blood component or
derivative, allergenic product, or analogous product produced through
the application of biotechnology that is used in the prevention,
treatment, or cure of diseases or injuries to humans.
(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in
qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including
labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and
construction of the project.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under ((RCW 82.32.645)) section 143 of this act; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" ((shall apply)) applies separately to each phase.
(7) "Manufacturing" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.120.
(8) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or
related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is
designed or developed and:
(a) Recognized in the national formulary, or the United States
pharmacopeia, or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease, or in the cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other conditions in
human beings or other animals; or
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
man or other animals, and which does not achieve any of its primary
intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body of man
or other animals and which is not dependent upon being metabolized for
the achievement of any of its principal intended purposes.
(9) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for biotechnology
product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities,
including plant offices, commercial laboratories for process
development, quality assurance and quality control, and warehouses or
other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if
the facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
plant, or laboratory used for biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing. If a building is used partly for
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing and
partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral ((shall)) must
be determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

Sec. 145 RCW 82.75.020 and 2006 c 178 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be made
((and approved)) before initiation of the construction of the
investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery. The
application ((shall)) must be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application ((shall)) must
contain information regarding the location of the investment project,
the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department ((shall)) must
rule on the application within sixty days.

Sec. 146 RCW 82.75.040 and 2006 c 178 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and ((RCW
82.32.645)) section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter
need not be repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.32.645))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is used for purposes other than qualified
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing
activities at any time during the calendar year in which the eligible
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes ((shall be)) is
immediately due and payable according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) ((If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.32.645 by the date due, the amount of
deferred tax specified in RCW 82.32.645(6) shall be immediately due and
payable.)) If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a
lessee as provided in RCW 82.75.010, the lessee is responsible for
payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3) For a violation of subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
department ((shall)) must assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral. The debt for deferred taxes ((shall)) will not be
extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer
of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is
transferred, subject to the successor meeting the eligibility
requirements of this chapter, for the remaining periods of the
deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section or section 102
of this act, deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 147 RCW 82.82.020 and 2008 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter can be
made at any time prior to completion of construction of a qualified
building or buildings, but tax liability incurred prior to the
department's receipt of an application may not be deferred. The
application must be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application must contain information
regarding the location of the investment project, the applicant's
average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual
new employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of
employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time
schedules for completion and operation, and other information required
by the department. The department must rule on the application within
sixty days.
(2)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for deferral of taxes under this chapter must agree
to complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of the deferral
are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.82.010(5), the lessee must
agree to complete the annual survey and the applicant is not required
to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the
year following the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as having been operationally complete and
the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey must include the
amount of tax deferred. The survey must also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department must use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department must
report to the legislature by December 1, 2014, and December 1, 2018.
The reports must measure the effect of the program on job creation, the
number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects. If fewer than three
deferrals are granted under this chapter, the department may not report
statistical information.
(4))) Applications for deferral of taxes under this section may not
be made after December 31, 2020.
(3) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes under this chapter must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a
lessee as provided in RCW 82.82.010(5), the lessee must file a complete
annual survey, and the applicant is not required to file the annual
survey.
(4) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW 82.82.040
because the department has found that an investment project is no
longer an eligible investment project is no longer required to file
annual surveys under section 102 of this act beginning on the date an
investment project is used for nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 148 RCW 82.82.040 and 2008 c 15 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.82.020))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is no longer an "eligible investment project"
under RCW 82.82.010 at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes are immediately
due according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) ((If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.82.020 by the date due, twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due.)) If the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW
82.82.010(5), the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit.
(((c) If an investment project is meeting the requirement of RCW
82.82.010(5) at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified as having been operationally complete
and the recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual survey
due under RCW 82.82.020, the portion of deferred taxes immediately due
is the amount on the schedule in (a) of this subsection. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
RCW 82.82.010(5), the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent
the lessee has received the economic benefit.))
(3) The department must assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, but not penalties,
retroactively to the date of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes
will not be extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the
recipient. Transfer of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The
deferral is transferred, subject to the successor meeting the
eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the remaining periods of
the deferral.

Sec. 149 RCW 84.36.645 and 2003 c 149 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 used in manufacturing semiconductor materials at a building
exempt from sales and use tax and in compliance with the employment
requirement under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965 are ((tax)) exempt from
property taxation. "Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2) A person seeking this exemption must make application to the
county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) A person ((receiving)) claiming an exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report ((in the manner prescribed in RCW
82.32.535)) with the department under section 103 of this act.
(4) This section is effective for taxes levied for collection one
year after the effective date of this act and thereafter.
(5) This section expires December 31st of the year occurring twelve
years after the effective date of this act, for taxes levied for
collection in the following year.

Sec. 150 RCW 84.36.655 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2005, all buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property of a lessee of a port district eligible
under RCW 82.08.980 and 82.12.980, used exclusively in manufacturing
superefficient airplanes, are exempt from property taxation. A person
taking the credit under RCW 82.04.4463 is not eligible for the
exemption under this section. For the purposes of this section,
"superefficient airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in
RCW 82.32.550.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section must file
a complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under
((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(3) Claims for exemption authorized by this section ((shall)) must
be filed with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department
and furnished by the assessor. The assessor ((shall)) must verify and
approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified and in
accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after December
31, 2023. The department may adopt rules, under the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(4) This section applies to taxes levied for collection in 2006 and
thereafter.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.32.535 (Annual report by semiconductor businesses) and
2003 c 149 s 11;
(2) RCW 82.32.5351 (Annual report by semiconductor businesses--Report to legislature) and 2006 c 84 s 5;
(3) RCW 82.32.545 (Annual report for airplane manufacturing tax
preferences) and 2008 c 283 s 2, 2008 c 81 s 10, 2007 c 54 s 19, & 2003
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 16;
(4) RCW 82.32.560 (Electrolytic processing business tax exemption--Annual report) and 2004 c 240 s 2;
(5) RCW 82.32.570 (Smelter tax incentives -- Goals -- Annual report)
and 2006 c 182 s 6 & 2004 c 24 s 14;
(6) RCW 82.32.610 (Annual survey for fruit and vegetable business
tax incentive -- Report to legislature) and 2006 c 354 s 5 & 2005 c 513
s 3;
(7) RCW 82.32.620 (Annual report for tax incentives under RCW
82.04.294) and 2005 c 301 s 4;
(8) RCW 82.32.630 (Annual survey for timber tax incentives) and
2007 c 48 s 6 & 2006 c 300 s 9;
(9) RCW 82.32.645 (Annual survey for biotechnology and medical
device manufacturing business tax incentive -- Report to legislature) and
2006 c 178 s 8;
(10) RCW 82.32.650 (Annual survey -- Customized employment training--Report to legislature) and 2006 c 112 s 6;
(11) RCW 82.16.140 (Renewable energy system cost recovery -- Report
to legislature) and 2005 c 300 s 5; and
(12) 2005 c 301 s 5 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 The repeals in section 151 of this act do
not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the statutes repealed or under any rule or order adopted
under those statutes, nor do they affect any proceeding instituted
under those statutes.

PART II
CONFIDENTIALITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 35.102
RCW to read as follows:
A city that imposes a business and occupation tax may by ordinance
provide that return or tax information is confidential, privileged, and
subject to disclosure in the manner provided by RCW 82.32.330.

Sec. 202 RCW 42.56.230 and 2008 c 200 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, ((or)) 84.40.340, or any
ordinance authorized under section 201 of this act; or (b) violate the
taxpayer's right to privacy or result in unfair competitive
disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law; and
(5) Documents and related materials and scanned images of documents
and related materials used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.16.120 and 2007 c 111 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, or local governmental entity, not in
the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, may
apply to the light and power business serving the situs of the system,
each fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost
recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated
electricity renewable energy system installed on its property that is
not interconnected to the electric distribution system. No incentive
may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after
June 30, 2014.
(2) When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for the
incentive allowed under this section, the applicant ((shall)) must
submit to the department of revenue and to the climate and rural energy
development center at the Washington State University, established
under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form and manner prescribed
by the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue ((shall)) must notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(((m))) (l).
(4)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the incentive
((shall)) must be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system ((shall)) must
notify the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW
82.32.330(3)(((m))) (l).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments ((shall)) must keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records ((shall)) must be open for examination at any
time upon notice by the light and power business that made the payment
or by the department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and ((shall)) must add thereto interest on the
amount. Interest ((shall)) must be assessed in the manner that the
department assesses interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(5) The investment cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen
cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the
amount authorized for credit to the participating light and power
business. For the purposes of this section, the rate paid for the
investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by the following
factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(6) No individual, household, business, or local governmental
entity is eligible for incentives for more than two thousand dollars
per year.
(7) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive exceed
the amount of funds available for credit to the participating light and
power business, the incentive payments ((shall)) must be reduced
proportionately.
(8) The climate and rural energy development center at Washington
State University energy program may establish guidelines and standards
for technologies that are identified as Washington manufactured and
therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(9) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy system
belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the light
and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.32.330 and 2008 c 81 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense: PROVIDED, That data, material, or
documents that do not disclose information related to a specific or
identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this
section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter
((shall)) requires any person possessing data, material, or documents
made confidential and privileged by this section to delete information
from such data, material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information ((shall be)) are confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
or chapter 83.100 RCW is a party in the proceeding; ((or))
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding; or
(iii) Brought by the department under RCW 18.27.040 or 19.28.071;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director ((shall)) prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person: PROVIDED, That tax information not received from the
taxpayer ((shall)) must not be so disclosed if the director determines
that such disclosure would compromise any investigation or litigation
by any federal, state, or local government agency in connection with
the civil or criminal liability of the taxpayer or another person, or
that such disclosure would identify a confidential informant, or that
such disclosure is contrary to any agreement entered into by the
department that provides for the reciprocal exchange of information
with other government agencies which agreement requires confidentiality
with respect to such information unless such information is required to
be disclosed to the taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer ((with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and)) against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department ((shall not be))
is not required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer((: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii))) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue for the payment of
a warrant that has not been filed and is making payments upon such
deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness within twelve
months;
(d) ((Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e))) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(((f))) (e) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(((g))) (f) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be
audited and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(((h))) (g) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a
peace officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting
attorney, for official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in
response to a search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless
the disclosure is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace
officer or county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax
information may disclose that return or tax information only for use in
the investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(((i))) (h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the
proper officer of the internal revenue service of the United States,
the Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(((j))) (i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the
United States Department of Justice, including the Bureau of Alcohol,
Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives ((within the Department of Justice)),
the Department of Defense, the Immigration and Customs Enforcement and
the Customs and Border Protection agencies of the United States
Department of Homeland Security, the United States Coast Guard ((of the
United States)), the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau of the
United States Department of Treasury, and the United States Department
of Transportation, or any authorized representative ((thereof)) of
these federal agencies, for official purposes;
(((k))) (j) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a
written determination designated by the director as a precedent
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410;
(((l))) (k) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with
other tax information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business
address, mailing address, revenue tax registration numbers, North
American industry classification system or standard industrial
classification code of a taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing
of business. This subsection ((shall)) must not be construed as giving
authority to the department to give, sell, or provide access to any
list of taxpayers for any commercial purpose;
(((m))) (l) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(((n))) (m) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United
States department of agriculture for the limited purpose of
investigating food stamp fraud by retailers;
(((o))) (n) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company,
or title company, in connection with specific real property that is the
subject of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the
department for a filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real
property;
(((p))) (o) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has
asserted liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax
information pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to
which the person has succeeded;
(((q))) (p) Disclosing ((such return or tax information)) real
estate excise tax affidavit forms filed under RCW 82.45.150 in the
possession of the department ((relating to the administration or
enforcement of the real estate excise tax imposed under chapter 82.45
RCW)), including ((information)) real estate excise tax affidavit forms
regarding transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to tax; ((or
(r))) (q) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of
sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for
which relief is granted;
(r) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability under RCW 83.100.120 return or tax information pertaining to
that person's liability for tax under chapter 83.100 RCW; or
(s) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the
streamlined sales tax governing board for official board purposes.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department ((shall)) must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence ((shall)) must
clearly identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
The department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court ((shall)) may limit or deny the request
of the department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department ((shall)) must reimburse reasonable expenses for
the production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person
in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(((f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n))) (e),
(f), (g), (h), (i), or (m) of this section, who discloses any such
return or tax information to another person not entitled to knowledge
of such return or tax information under the provisions of this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor. If the person guilty of such violation is
an officer or employee of the state, such person ((shall)) must forfeit
such office or employment and ((shall be)) is incapable of holding any
public office or employment in this state for a period of two years
thereafter.

Sec. 205 RCW 82.32.480 and 2001 c 314 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The forest products commission, created pursuant to chapter 15.100
RCW, constitutes a state agency for purposes of applying the exemption
contained in RCW 82.32.330(3)(((f))) (e) for the disclosure of taxpayer
information by the department. Disclosure of return or tax information
may be made only to employees of the commission and not to commission
members. Employees are authorized to use this information in
accordance with RCW 15.100.100(4). Employees are subject to all civil
and criminal penalties provided under RCW 82.32.330 for disclosures
made to another person not entitled under the provisions of this
section or RCW 15.100.100 to knowledge of such information.

Sec. 206 RCW 82.60.100 and 1987 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Applications, reports, and any other information received by the
department under this chapter ((shall)), except applications not
approved by the department, are not ((be)) confidential and ((shall
be)) are subject to disclosure.

Sec. 207 RCW 82.62.080 and 1987 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Applications, reports, and any other information received by the
department under this chapter ((shall)), except applications not
approved by the department, are not ((be)) confidential and ((shall
be)) are subject to disclosure.

Sec. 208 RCW 82.63.070 and 2004 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Applications ((received)) approved by the department under this
chapter are not confidential and are subject to disclosure.

Sec. 209 RCW 82.74.070 and 2005 c 513 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
Applications ((received)) approved by the department under this
chapter are not confidential and are subject to disclosure.

Sec. 210 RCW 82.75.060 and 2006 c 178 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Applications ((received)) approved by the department under this
chapter are not confidential and are subject to disclosure.

Sec. 211 RCW 83.100.210 and 2005 c 516 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force
and application with respect to the taxes imposed under this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise: RCW 82.32.110,
82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, and 82.32.340. The
definitions in this chapter have full force and application with
respect to the application of chapter 82.32 RCW to this chapter unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(2) The department may enter into closing agreements as provided in
RCW 82.32.350 and 82.32.360.

PART III
CLARIFICATIONS AND TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
Sec. 301 RCW 39.100.050 and 2007 c 266 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A local government that creates a benefit zone and has received
approval from the department under RCW 82.32.700 to impose the local
option sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.465 may use annually
any excess local excise taxes received by it from taxable activity
within the benefit zone to finance public improvement costs associated
with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by hospital
benefit zone financing. The use of excess local excise taxes must
cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated
to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any participating taxing
authority is authorized to allocate excess local excise taxes to the
local government as long as the local government has received approval
from the department under RCW 82.32.700 to impose the local option
sales and use tax authorized in RCW 82.14.465. The legislature
declares that it is a proper purpose of a local government or
participating taxing authority to allocate excess local excise taxes
for purposes of financing public improvements under this chapter.
(2) A local government ((shall)) must provide the department
accurate information describing the geographical boundaries of the
benefit zone at least seventy-five days before the effective date of
the ordinance creating the benefit zone. The local government
((shall)) must ensure that the boundary information provided to the
department is kept current.
(3) The department ((shall)) must provide the necessary information
to calculate excess local excise taxes to each local government that
has provided boundary information to the department as provided in this
section and that has received approval from the department under RCW
82.32.700 to impose the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.465.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Base year" means the calendar year immediately following the
creation of a benefit zone.
(b) "Excess local excise taxes" means the amount of local excise
taxes received by the local government during the measurement year from
taxable activity within the benefit zone over and above the amount of
local excise taxes received by the local government during the base
year from taxable activity within the benefit zone. However, if a
local government creates the benefit zone and reasonably determines
that no activity subject to tax under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
occurred in the twelve months immediately preceding the creation of the
benefit zone within the boundaries of the area that became the benefit
zone, "excess local excise taxes" means the entire amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
creation of the benefit zone and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter.
(c) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the hospital benefit zone is
approved by the department, except that if a local government reduces
the rate of such tax after the ((revenue development area)) hospital
benefit zone was approved, "local excise taxes" means the local
revenues derived from the imposition of the sales and use taxes
authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the lower tax rate.
(d) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure the amount of excess state
excise taxes and excess local excise taxes required to be used to
finance public improvement costs associated with public improvements
financed in whole or in part by hospital benefit zone financing.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.36.440 and 2003 c 350 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise,
privilege, or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing,
selling, or distributing motor vehicle fuel, and no city, town, county,
township or other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state
((shall)) may levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured by the
sale, receipt, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except as
provided in chapter 82.80 RCW and RCW 82.47.020.
(2) This section does not apply to any tax imposed by the state.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.38.280 and 2003 c 350 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise,
privilege, or occupational tax upon the business of manufacturing,
selling, or distributing special fuel, and no city, town, county,
township or other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state
((shall)) may levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured by the
sale, receipt, distribution, or use of special fuel, except as provided
in chapter 82.80 RCW and RCW 82.47.020.
(2) This section does not apply to any tax imposed by the state.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.04.050 and 2007 c 54 s 4 and 2007 c 6 s 1004 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(((a))) (i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible
personal property in the regular course of business without intervening
use by such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a
regional transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for
resale; or
(((b))) (ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(((c))) (iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property
purchased in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal
property or substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or
component or is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose
of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through
contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(((d))) (iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property
purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in
producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property
is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an
ingredient of ferrosilicon; or
(((e))) (v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. ((The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908)); or
(((f))) (vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2)
and (7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" ((shall)) includes
the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed
and/or for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and ((shall)) also includes the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting
the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but ((shall)) does not include the charge made
for janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" ((shall)) means those cleaning and caretaking
services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it ((shall)) must be presumed
that the occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one
month or more constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a
mere license to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this
subsection, it ((shall)) must be presumed that the sale of and charge
made for the furnishing of lodging for a continuous period of one month
or more to a person is a rental or lease of real property and not a
mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this
subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection ((shall)) may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this
section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) may be construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" ((shall)) includes
the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional
services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees,
admission, and other service emoluments however designated, received by
persons engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term ((shall)) also includes:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term ((shall)) does not include the renting or leasing of
tangible personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose
of sublease or subrent.
(5) The term ((shall)) also includes the providing of "competitive
telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary
services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term ((shall)) also includes the sale of prewritten
computer software other than a sale to a person who presents a resale
certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery
to the end user, but ((shall)) does not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term ((shall)) also includes the sale of or charge made for
an extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term ((shall)) does not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing,
or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(9) The term ((shall)) also does not include sales of chemical
sprays or washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of
fruit for the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor
((shall)) does it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer,
agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and
spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal
conservation reserve program, the environmental quality incentives
program, the wetlands reserve program, and the wildlife habitat
incentives program, or their successors administered by the United
States department of agriculture; (b) farmers for the purpose of
producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c) farmers acting
under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with an
organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to
produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or
leases.
(10) The term ((shall)) does not include the sale of or charge made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing,
repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor ((shall)) does the
term include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of
land and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
((shall)) does the term include the sale of services or charges made
for cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(11) The term ((shall)) does not include the sale of or charge made
for labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to
agreements providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed
guideway equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient
of the labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit
agency, as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.04.3651 and 1999 c 358 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received from
fundraising activities by nonprofit organizations, as defined in
subsection (2) of this section, ((for fund-raising activities)) and
libraries as defined in RCW 27.12.010.
(2) As used in this section, a "nonprofit organization" means:
(a) An organization exempt from tax under section 501(c) (3), (4),
or (10) of the federal internal revenue code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)
(3), (4), or (10));
(b) A nonprofit organization that would qualify under (a) of this
subsection except that it is not organized as a nonprofit corporation;
or
(c) A nonprofit organization that meets all of the following
criteria:
(i) The members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees of
the organization do not receive any part of the organization's gross
income, except as payment for services rendered;
(ii) The compensation received by any person for services rendered
to the organization does not exceed an amount reasonable under the
circumstances; and
(iii) The activities of the organization do not include a
substantial amount of political activity, including but not limited to
influencing legislation and participation in any campaign on behalf of
any candidate for political office.
(3) As used in this section, the term "fund-raising activity" means
soliciting or accepting contributions of money or other property or
activities involving the anticipated exchange of goods or services for
money between the soliciting organization and the organization or
person solicited, for the purpose of furthering the goals of the
nonprofit organization. "Fund-raising activity" does not include the
operation of a regular place of business in which sales are made during
regular hours such as a bookstore, thrift shop, restaurant, or similar
business or the operation of a regular place of business from which
services are provided or performed during regular hours such as the
provision of retail, personal, or professional services. The sale of
used books, used videos, used sound recordings, or similar used
information products in a library, as defined in RCW 27.12.010, is not
the operation of a regular place of business for the purposes of this
section, if the proceeds of the sales are used to support the library.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.08.02573 and 1998 c 336 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to a sale made by a
nonprofit organization or a library, if the gross income from the sale
is exempt under RCW 82.04.3651.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2007 c 135 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales to nonresidents of this state of tangible personal property for
use outside this state when the purchaser (a) is a bona fide resident
of a state or possession or Province of Canada other than the state of
Washington and such state, possession, or Province of Canada does not
impose a retail sales tax or use tax of three percent or more or, if
imposing such a tax, permits Washington residents exemption from
otherwise taxable sales by reason of their residence, and (b) agrees,
when requested, to grant the department of revenue access to such
records and other forms of verification at his or her place of
residence to assure that such purchases are not first used
substantially in the state of Washington.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller
during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge
for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident
purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately
stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly
stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no
((separately)) publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's
cost for the tangible personal property. However, the exemption
provided by this section does not apply if tangible personal property
is installed by the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the
seller makes a single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible
personal property and service. All of the requirements in subsections
(1) and (3) through (6) of this section apply to this subsection.
(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must display proof of his or her current
nonresident status as provided in this section.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status ((shall
include)) includes one piece of identification such as a valid driver's
license from the jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is
claimed or a valid identification card which has a photograph of the
holder and is issued by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification
under this subsection (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address
and have as one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in
that out-of-state jurisdiction.
(4) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax exempt
retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales to
nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales tax
collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor ((shall)) must, in good faith, examine the proof of
nonresidence, determine whether the proof is acceptable under
subsection (3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each
nontaxable sale which ((shall)) must show the type of proof accepted,
including any identification numbers where appropriate, and the
expiration date, if any.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the
offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, ((shall be)) is liable for
the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred
dollars or the tax due on such purchases.
(6)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax to a
person who does not hold valid identification establishing out-of-state
residency, and any vendor who fails to maintain records of sales to
nonresidents as provided in this section, ((shall be)) is personally
liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, ((shall be))
is liable for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of
one thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both
the purchaser and the vendor ((shall be)) are liable for any penalties
and interest assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2004 c 153 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or any other
provision of this chapter, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall))
does not apply to sales of food and food ingredients other than
prepared food, soft drinks, and dietary supplements. (("Food and food
ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid,
frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or
chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional
value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, or dietary supplements.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(iii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(B) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(b) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(i) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(ii) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(iii) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(d) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(3))) (2) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary,
the exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
((shall apply)) applies to the sale of food and food ingredients that
are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6); or
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, ((disabled persons))
individuals with disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.
(((4))) (3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the
retail sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under
RCW 82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a
vending machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes of RCW
82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) This subsection (((4))) (3) does not apply to ((hot)) sales of
the following items through a vending machine: (i) Soft drinks; (ii)
dietary supplements; and (iii) prepared food ((and food ingredients,
other than)). The exclusion for prepared food in this subsection
(3)(b)(iii) does not apply to food and food ingredients ((which)) not
meeting the definition of prepared food and that are heated after they
have been dispensed from the vending machine.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (((4))) (3), the
requirements that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the
amount of tax be stated as a separate item are waived.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(b)"Food and food ingredients" means substances, whether in liquid,
concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold
for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or
nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does not include:
(i) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(ii) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(c)(i) "Prepared food" means:
(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(d) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.08.865 and 2007 c 443 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel, or aircraft fuel, to a farm fuel user for
((nonhighway use)) agricultural purposes. This exemption applies to a
fuel blend if all of the component fuels of the blend would otherwise
be exempt under this subsection if the component fuels were sold as
separate products. This exemption is available only if the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. ((Fuel used for space or water heating
for human habitation is not exempt under this section.))
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.04.213 and this subsection apply to
this section.
(a)(i) "Agricultural purposes" means the performance of activities
directly related to the growing, raising, or producing of agricultural
products.
(ii) "Agricultural purposes" does not include: (A) Heating space for
human habitation or water for human consumption; or (B) Transporting on
public roads individuals, agricultural products, farm machinery or
equipment, or other tangible personal property, except when the
transportation is incidental to transportation on private property and
the fuel used for such transportation is not subject to tax under
chapter 82.38 RCW.
(b) "Aircraft fuel" is defined as provided in RCW 82.42.010.
(((b))) (c) "Biodiesel fuel" is defined as provided in RCW
19.112.010.
(((c))) (d) "Diesel fuel" is defined as provided in 26 U.S.C. 4083,
as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2006.
(((d))) (e) "Farm fuel user" means: (i) A farmer; or (ii) a person
who provides horticultural services for farmers, such as soil
preparation services, crop cultivation services, and crop harvesting
services.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.12.035 and 2007 c 6 s 1203 are each amended to
read as follows:
A credit ((shall be)) is allowed against the taxes imposed by this
chapter upon the use of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
or services taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), in the state
of Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his or her
bailor or donor has paid a legally imposed retail sales or use tax with
respect to such property, extended warranty, or service to any other
state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, any
political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof((, prior to the use of
such property, extended warranty, or service in Washington)).

Sec. 311 RCW 82.12.040 and 2005 c 514 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
((shall)) must obtain from the department a certificate of
registration, and ((shall)) must, at the time of making sales of
tangible personal property, extended warranties, or sales of any
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (3)(a), or
making transfers of either possession or title, or both, of tangible
personal property for use in this state, collect from the purchasers or
transferees the tax imposed under this chapter. The tax to be
collected under this section ((shall)) must be in an amount equal to
the purchase price multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the purposes of this chapter, the
phrase "maintains in this state a place of business" ((shall)) includes
the solicitation of sales and/or taking of orders by sales agents or
traveling representatives. For the purposes of this chapter, "engages
in business activity within this state" includes every activity which
is sufficient under the Constitution of the United States for this
state to require collection of tax under this chapter. The department
((shall)) must in rules specify activities which constitute engaging in
business activity within this state, and ((shall)) must keep the rules
current with future court interpretations of the Constitution of the
United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, extended warranties, or
sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a)
or (3)(a), of his or her principals for use in this state, ((shall))
must, at the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the
tax imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that
purpose ((shall be)) is deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter ((shall be))
is deemed to be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the
department and any retailer who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to the retailer's own use or to any use other than the
payment of the tax provided herein to the extent that the money
required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date
as prescribed ((shall be)) is guilty of a misdemeanor. In case any
seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or having collected the
tax, fails to pay the same to the department in the manner prescribed,
whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the
result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller
((shall)) is nevertheless, ((be)) personally liable to the state for
the amount of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the buyer in
good faith a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter ((shall be)) is guilty of
a misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if the person would have been obligated to collect retail
sales tax on the sale absent a specific exemption provided in chapter
82.08 RCW, and there is no corresponding use tax exemption in this
chapter. Nothing in this section may be construed as relieving
purchasers from liability for reporting and remitting the tax due under
this chapter directly to the department.

Sec. 312 RCW 82.12.865 and 2007 c 443 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
((nonhighway)) use of diesel fuel, biodiesel fuel, or aircraft fuel, by
a farm fuel user for agricultural purposes. This exemption applies to
a fuel blend if all of the component fuels of the blend would otherwise
be exempt under this subsection if the component fuels were acquired as
separate products. ((Fuel used for space or water heating for human
habitation is not exempt under this section.))
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.865 apply to this section.

Sec. 313 RCW 82.80.120 and 2006 c 311 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030;
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW, subject to the conditions of this section, may levy
additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
district. The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a
majority of the voters within the district boundaries. Vehicles paying
an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise taxes are subject to
the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to other motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section will be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the
district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a district ((shall)) must contract with the
department of ((licensing)) revenue for the administration and
collection of the taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage
amount, not to exceed one percent of the taxes imposed under this
section, will be deposited into the local tax administration account
created in the custody of the state treasurer. The department of
((licensing)) revenue may spend money from this account, upon
appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes imposed under
this section.
(7) The state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute monthly to the
district levying the tax as part of the regional transportation
investment district plan, after the deductions for payments and
expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax in this section if
a member county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or 82.80.110.

Sec. 314 RCW 83.100.040 and 2005 c 516 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A tax in an amount computed as provided in this section is
imposed on every transfer of property located in Washington. For the
purposes of this section, any intangible property owned by a resident
is located in Washington.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the amount of
tax is the amount provided in the following table:

If Washington Taxable

The amount of Tax Equals
Of Washington
Taxable Estate Value
Greater than

Estate is at least But Less Than Initial Tax Amount Plus Tax Rate %

$0 $1,000,000 $0 10.00% $0

$1,000,000 $2,000,000 $100,000 14.00% $1,000,000

$2,000,000 $3,000,000 $240,000 15.00% $2,000,000

$3,000,000 $4,000,000 $390,000 16.00% $3,000,000

$4,000,000 $6,000,000 $550,000 17.00% $4,000,000

$6,000,000 $7,000,000 $890,000 18.00% $6,000,000

$7,000,000 $9,000,000 $1,070,000 18.50% $7,000,000

((Above))
$9,000,000 $1,440,000 19.00% ((Above))
$9,000,000

(b) If any property in the decedent's estate is located outside of
Washington, the amount of tax is the amount determined in (a) of this
subsection multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is
the value of the property located in Washington. The denominator of
the fraction is the value of the decedent's gross estate. Property
qualifying for a deduction under RCW 83.100.046 ((shall)) must be
excluded from the numerator and denominator of the fraction.
(3) The tax imposed under this section is a stand-alone estate tax
that incorporates only those provisions of the internal revenue code as
amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2005, that do not conflict with
the provisions of this chapter. The tax imposed under this chapter is
independent of any federal estate tax obligation and is not affected by
termination of the federal estate tax.

Sec. 315 RCW 83.100.046 and 2005 c 514 s 1201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of determining the Washington taxable estate,
a deduction is allowed from the federal taxable estate for:
(a) The value of qualified real property reduced by any amounts
allowable as a deduction in respect of the qualified real property
((and tangible personal property)) under section 2053(a)(4) of the
internal revenue code, if the decedent was at the time of his or her
death a citizen or resident of the United States.
(b) The value of any tangible personal property used by the
decedent or a member of the decedent's family for a qualified use on
the date of the decedent's death, reduced by any amounts allowable as
a deduction in respect of the tangible personal property under section
2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code, if all of the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(A) of this section are met and the decedent was
at the time of his or her death a citizen or resident of the United
States.
(c) The value of real property that is not deductible under (a) of
this subsection solely by reason of subsection (10)(f)(i)(B) of this
section, reduced by any amounts allowable as a deduction in respect of
the ((qualified)) real property ((and tangible personal property))
under section 2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code, if the
requirements of subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section are met with
respect to the property and the decedent was at the time of his or her
death a citizen or resident of the United States.
(2) Property ((shall)) will be considered to have been acquired
from or to have passed from the decedent if:
(a) The property is so considered under section 1014(b) of the
internal revenue code;
(b) The property is acquired by any person from the estate; or
(c) The property is acquired by any person from a trust, to the
extent the property is includible in the gross estate of the decedent.
(3) If the decedent and the decedent's surviving spouse at any time
held qualified real property as community property, the interest of the
surviving spouse in the property ((shall)) must be taken into account
under this section to the extent necessary to provide a result under
this section with respect to the property which is consistent with the
result which would have obtained under this section if the property had
not been community property.
(4) In the case of any qualified woodland, the value of trees
growing on the woodland may be deducted if otherwise qualified under
this section.
(5) If property is qualified real property with respect to a
decedent, hereinafter in this subsection referred to as the "first
decedent," and the property was acquired from or passed from the first
decedent to the surviving spouse of the first decedent, active
management of the farm by the surviving spouse ((shall)) must be
treated as material participation by the surviving spouse in the
operation of the farm.
(6) Property owned indirectly by the decedent may qualify for a
deduction under this section if owned through an interest in a
corporation, partnership, or trust as the terms corporation,
partnership, or trust are used in section 2032A(g) of the internal
revenue code. In order to qualify for a deduction under this
subsection, the interest, in addition to meeting the other tests for
qualification under this section, must qualify under section 6166(b)(1)
of the internal revenue code as an interest in a closely held business
on the date of the decedent's death and for sufficient other time,
combined with periods of direct ownership, to equal at least five years
of the eight-year period preceding the death.
(7)(a) If, on the date of the decedent's death, the requirements of
subsection (10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section with respect to the
decedent for any property are not met, and the decedent (i) was
receiving old age benefits under Title II of the social security act
for a continuous period ending on such date, or (ii) was disabled for
a continuous period ending on this date, then subsection
(10)(f)(i)(C)(II) of this section ((shall)) must be applied with
respect to the property by substituting "the date on which the longer
of such continuous periods began" for "the date of the decedent's
death" in subsection (10)(f)(i)(C) of this section.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, an individual
((shall be)) is disabled if the individual has a mental or physical
impairment which renders that individual unable to materially
participate in the operation of the farm.
(8) Property may be deducted under this section whether or not
special valuation is elected under section 2032A of the internal
revenue code on the federal return. For the purposes of determining
the deduction under this section, the value of property is its value as
used to determine the value of the gross estate.
(9)(a) In the case of any qualified replacement property, any
period during which there was ownership, qualified use, or material
participation with respect to the replaced property by the decedent or
any member of the decedent's family ((shall)) must be treated as a
period during which there was ownership, use, or material
participation, as the case may be, with respect to the qualified
replacement property.
(b) Subsection (9)(a) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to
the extent that the fair market value of the qualified replacement
property, as of the date of its acquisition, exceeds the fair market
value of the replaced property, as of the date of its disposition.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (9), the following
definitions apply:
(i) "Qualified replacement property" means any real property:
(A) Which is acquired in an exchange which qualifies under section
1031 of the internal revenue code; or
(B) The acquisition of which results in the nonrecognition of gain
under section 1033 of the internal revenue code.
The term "qualified replacement property" only includes property
which is used for the same qualified use as the replaced property was
being used before the exchange.
(ii) "Replaced property" means the property was:
(A) Transferred in the exchange which qualifies under section 1031
of the internal revenue code; or
(B) Compulsorily or involuntarily converted within the meaning of
section 1033 of the internal revenue code.
(10) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Active management" means the making of the management
decisions of a farm, other than the daily operating decisions.
(b) "Farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, furbearing
animal, and truck farms; plantations; ranches; nurseries; ranges;
greenhouses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising
of agricultural or horticultural commodities; and orchards and
woodlands.
(c) "Farming purposes" means:
(i) Cultivating the soil or raising or harvesting any agricultural
or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding,
caring for, training, and management of animals on a farm;
(ii) Handling, drying, packing, grading, or storing on a farm any
agricultural or horticultural commodity in its unmanufactured state,
but only if the owner, tenant, or operator of the farm regularly
produces more than one-half of the commodity so treated; and
(iii)(A) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of
trees; or
(B) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.
(d) "Member of the family" means, with respect to any individual,
only:
(i) An ancestor of the individual;
(ii) The spouse of the individual;
(iii) A lineal descendant of the individual, of the individual's
spouse, or of a parent of the individual; or
(iv) The spouse of any lineal descendant described in (d)(iii) of
this subsection.
For the purposes of this subsection (10)(d), a legally adopted
child of an individual ((shall)) must be treated as the child of such
individual by blood.
(e) "Qualified heir" means, with respect to any property, a member
of the decedent's family who acquired property, or to whom property
passed, from the decedent.
(f)(i) "Qualified real property" means real property which was
acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified heir of the
decedent and which, on the date of the decedent's death, was being used
for a qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's
family, but only if:
(A) Fifty percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross estate
consists of the adjusted value of real or personal property which:
(I) On the date of the decedent's death, was being used for a
qualified use by the decedent or a member of the decedent's family; and
(II) Was acquired from or passed from the decedent to a qualified
heir of the decedent;
(B) Twenty-five percent or more of the adjusted value of the gross
estate consists of the adjusted value of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(A)(II) and (f)(i)(C) of this subsection; and
(C) During the eight-year period ending on the date of the
decedent's death there have been periods aggregating five years or more
during which:
(I) The real property was owned by the decedent or a member of the
decedent's family and used for a qualified use by the decedent or a
member of the decedent's family; and
(II) There was material participation by the decedent or a member
of the decedent's family in the operation of the farm. For the
purposes of this subsection (f)(i)(C)(II), material participation
((shall)) must be determined in a manner similar to the manner used for
purposes of section 1402(a)(1) of the internal revenue code.
(ii) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "adjusted value"
means:
(A) In the case of the gross estate, the value of the gross estate,
determined without regard to any special valuation under section 2032A
of the internal revenue code, reduced by any amounts allowable as a
deduction under section 2053(a)(4) of the internal revenue code; or
(B) In the case of any real or personal property, the value of the
property for purposes of chapter 11 of the internal revenue code,
determined without regard to any special valuation under section 2032A
of the internal revenue code, reduced by any amounts allowable as a
deduction in respect of such property under section 2053(a)(4) of the
internal revenue code.
(g) "Qualified use" means the property is used as a farm for
farming purposes. In the case of real property which meets the
requirements of (f)(i)(C) of this subsection, residential buildings and
related improvements on the real property occupied on a regular basis
by the owner or lessee of the real property or by persons employed by
the owner or lessee for the purpose of operating or maintaining the
real property, and roads, buildings, and other structures and
improvements functionally related to the qualified use ((shall)) must
be treated as real property devoted to the qualified use. For tangible
personal property eligible for a deduction under subsection (1)(b) of
this section, "qualified use" means the property is used primarily for
farming purposes on a farm.
(h) "Qualified woodland" means any real property which:
(i) Is used in timber operations; and
(ii) Is an identifiable area of land such as an acre or other area
for which records are normally maintained in conducting timber
operations.
(i) "Timber operations" means:
(i) The planting, cultivating, caring for, or cutting of trees; or
(ii) The preparation, other than milling, of trees for market.

Sec. 316 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under
another section of this chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers; (5) representing and performing services for fire or casualty
insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent
licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW ((48.05.310)); (6)
radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and
regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the
national average thereof as annually reported by the Federal
Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW
82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 317 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines;
(2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind and
including any readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the
facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned utility or
railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the
responsibility of the public authority whose street, place, road,
highway, easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired
or improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except
persons taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under
another section of this chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers; (5) representing and performing services for fire or casualty
insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent
licensed under the provisions of chapter 48.17 RCW ((48.05.310)); (6)
radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and
regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the
national average thereof as annually reported by the Federal
Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which
bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in RCW
82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business
shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the
rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

PART IV
PROPERTY TAX
Sec. 401 RCW 29A.36.210 and 2004 c 80 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
the regular property tax levies authorized in RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145,
67.38.130, 84.52.069, or 84.52.135 ((shall)) must contain in substance
the following:

"((Shall)) Will the . . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing
district) be authorized to impose regular property tax levies of
. . . . . . (insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation for each of . . . . . . (insert the maximum number
of years allowable) consecutive years?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"
Each voter ((shall)) may indicate either "Yes" or "No" on his or
her ballot in accordance with the procedures established under this
title.

(2) The ballot proposition authorizing a taxing district to impose
a permanent regular tax levy under RCW 84.52.069 ((shall)) must contain
in substance the following:

"((Shall)) Will the . . . . . (insert the name of the taxing
district) be authorized to impose a PERMANENT regular property levy of
. . . . . (insert the maximum rate) or less per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation?
Yes. . . . . . . . . . . . □
No . . . . . . . . . . . . □"

Sec. 402 RCW 36.68.525 and 1994 c 156 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A park and recreation service area may impose regular property tax
levies in an amount equal to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars
of assessed value of property in the service area in each year for six
consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority
of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted not more than twelve months prior to
the date on which the proposed initial levy is to be made and not
oftener than twice in such twelve month period, either at a special
election or at the regular election of the service area, at which
election the number of voters voting "yes" on the proposition ((shall))
must constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of the
number of voters voting in the service area at the last preceding
general election when the number of voters voting on the proposition
does not exceed forty percent of the number of voters voting in such
taxing district in the last preceding general election; or by a
majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the
proposition if the number of voters voting on the proposition exceeds
forty per centum of the number of voters voting in such taxing district
in the last preceding general election. A proposition authorizing such
tax levies ((shall)) may not be submitted by a park and recreation
service area more than twice in any twelve-month period. Ballot
propositions ((shall)) must conform with RCW ((29.30.111)) 29A.36.210.
If a park and recreation service area is levying property taxes, which
in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts
result in taxes in excess of the ((nine-dollar and fifteen cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation)) limitation provided for in RCW
84.52.043(2), the park and recreation service area property tax levy
((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated ((before the property tax
levies of other taxing districts are reduced)) as provided in RCW
84.52.010.

Sec. 403 RCW 36.69.145 and 1994 c 156 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A park and recreation district may impose regular property tax
levies in an amount equal to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars
of assessed value of property in the district in each year for six
consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority
of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted at a special election or at the
regular election of the district, at which election the number of
voters voting "yes" on the proposition ((shall)) must constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty per centum of the number of voters
voting in such district at the last preceding general election when the
number of voters voting on the proposition does not exceed forty per
centum of the number of voters voting in such taxing district in the
last preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof voting on the proposition if the number of
voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty per centum of the number
of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election. A proposition authorizing the tax levies ((shall)) may not
be submitted by a park and recreation district more than twice in any
twelve-month period. Ballot propositions ((shall)) must conform with
RCW ((29.30.111)) 29A.36.210. In the event a park and recreation
district is levying property taxes, which in combination with property
taxes levied by other taxing districts subject to the one percent
limitation provided for in Article 7, section 2, of our state
Constitution result in taxes in excess of the limitation provided for
in RCW 84.52.043(2), the park and recreation district property tax levy
((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated ((before the property tax
levies of other taxing districts are reduced)) as provided in RCW
84.52.010.
(2) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 ((shall)) does not apply to the
first levy imposed under this section following the approval of the
levies by the voters under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.03.140 and 2000 c 103 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW
82.03.130, a party ((taking)) filing an appeal may elect either a
formal or an informal hearing((, such election to be made)). The
election must be made according to rules of practice and procedure to
be promulgated by the board((: PROVIDED, That)).
(2)(a) Nothing ((shall)) in subsection (1) of this section prevents
the county assessor or taxpayer, as a party to an appeal ((pursuant
to)) under RCW 84.08.130((, within twenty days from the date of the
receipt of the notice of appeal)), from filing with the clerk of the
board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal one((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed to modify the
provisions of RCW 82.03.190: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That upon an)).
The notice under this subsection must be filed within twenty days from
the date that the party received the notice of appeal.
(b) For appeals under RCW 82.03.130(1)(((e))) in which the
department of revenue is a party, other than appeals governed by RCW
82.03.190, the ((director)) department of revenue may, within ((ten))
twenty days from the date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file
with the clerk of the board notice of its intention that the hearing be
held pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) In the event that appeals ((are taken from)) of the same
decision, order, or determination, as the case may be, are filed by
different parties and only one of ((such)) the parties elects a formal
hearing, the board must grant a formal hearing ((shall be granted)).
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed as modifying the
provisions of RCW 82.03.190.

Sec. 405 RCW 84.34.020 and 2005 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter.
Parcels of land described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection
((shall)) will, upon any transfer of the property excluding a transfer
to a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, be subject to the
limits of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of this subsection;
(d) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands ((shall))
also include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands"; or
(e) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
agricultural purposes.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
((shall mean)) means the contract vendee.
(6) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property
held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but
otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, ((shall be)) is
considered contiguous.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 406 RCW 84.36.040 and 2001 c 126 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The real and personal property used by ((nonprofit)), and for
the purposes of, the following nonprofit organizations is exempt from
property taxation:
(a) Child day care centers as defined ((pursuant to RCW 74.15.020))
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Free public libraries;
(c) Orphanages and orphan asylums;
(d) Homes for the sick or infirm;
(e) Hospitals for the sick; and
(f) Outpatient dialysis facilities((, which are used for the
purposes of such organizations shall be exempt from taxation:
PROVIDED, That the benefit of the exemption inures to the user)).
(2) The real and personal property leased to and used by a
hospital((,)) for hospital purposes is exempt from property taxation if
the hospital is established under chapter 36.62 RCW or is owned and
operated by a public hospital district established under chapter 70.44
RCW((, for hospital purposes is exempt from taxation. The benefit of
the exemption must inure to the user)).
(3) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805, and the benefit of the exemption must inure
to the user.
(4) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "child day care
center" means a nonprofit organization that regularly provides child
day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours.

Sec. 407 RCW 84.36.381 and 2008 c 6 s 706 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person ((shall be)) is exempt from any legal obligation to pay
all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property
taxes due and payable in the year following the year in which a claim
is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person
who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant ((shall)) may receive an exemption on more than one residence
in any year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the person to a
hospital, nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home ((shall))
does not disqualify the claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner
and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned
by cotenants ((shall be)) is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each
domestic partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life ((shall be))
is deemed a life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be (a) sixty-one years
of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption
claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of disability, or (b) a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with one hundred percent service-connected disability as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423 (d)(1)(A) as
amended prior to January 1, 2005, or such subsequent date as the
department may provide by rule consistent with the purpose of this
section. However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner
of a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's
death ((shall)) will qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving
domestic partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise
meets the requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person ((shall be)) is exempt from an
obligation to pay ((shall be)) is calculated on the basis of combined
disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming
the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment
year, the combined disposable income of such person ((shall)) must be
calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable
income of such person during the months such person was retired by
twelve. If the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for
two or more months of the assessment year by reason of the death of the
person's spouse or the person's domestic partner, or when other
substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person ((shall)) must be calculated by multiplying the
average monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less
((shall be)) is exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less but
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars ((shall be)) is exempt from
all regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or
thirty-five percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not
to exceed seventy thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her
residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of twenty-five thousand dollars or less
((shall be)) is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater
of sixty thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or
her residence;
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less,
the valuation of the residence ((shall be)) is the assessed value of
the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the
assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one
year because of high income, this same valuation ((shall)) must be used
upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one
year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any
other reason, the valuation upon requalification ((shall be)) is the
assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the
person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under this
section to a different residence, the valuation of the different
residence ((shall be)) is the assessed value of the different residence
on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the
exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property ((shall)) must be added to the value
otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value
in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 408 RCW 84.36.383 and 2008 c 182 s 1 and 2008 c 6 s 709 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre, except that a residence includes any additional property up to a
total of five acres that comprises the residential parcel if this
larger parcel size is required under land use regulations. The term
((shall)) also includes a share ownership in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership if the person claiming
exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term
((shall)) also includes a single family dwelling situated upon lands
the fee of which is vested in the United States or any instrumentality
thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of Washington, and
notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a
residence ((shall be)) is deemed real property.
(2) The term "real property" ((shall)) also includes a mobile home
which has substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of
its being fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of
the mobile home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed
pipe, connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant
occupying the residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by
the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse or domestic
partner during the assessment year for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions;
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home; and
(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII
of the social security act.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits, other than:
(i) Attendant-care payments;
(ii) Medical-aid payments;
(iii) Disability compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3,
section 3.4 of the code of federal regulations, as of January 1, 2008;
and
(iv) Dependency and indemnity compensation, as defined in Title 38,
part 3, section 3.5 of the code of federal regulations, as of January
1, 2008;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; and
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.
(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, ((2004)) 2005, or such
subsequent date as the ((director)) department may provide by rule
consistent with the purpose of this section.

Sec. 409 RCW 84.37.030 and 2007 sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A claimant may defer payment of fifty percent of special
assessments or real property taxes, or both, listed on the annual tax
statement in any year in which all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The special assessments or property taxes must be imposed upon
a residence that was occupied by the claimant as a principal place of
residence as of January 1st of the year in which the assessments and
taxes are due, subject to the exceptions allowed under RCW
84.36.381(1);
(2) The claimant must have combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of fifty-seven thousand dollars or less in the
calendar year preceding the filing of the declaration;
(3) The claimant must have paid one-half of the total amount of
special assessments and property taxes listed on the annual tax
statement for the year in which the deferral claim is made;
(4) A deferral is not allowed for special assessments ((or)),
property taxes, or both, levied for collection in the first five
calendar years in which the person owns the residence;
(5) The claimant who defers payment of special assessments or real
property taxes, or both, listed on the annual tax statement under this
section must also meet the conditions of RCW 84.38.030 (4) and (5);
(6) The total amount deferred by a claimant under this chapter must
not exceed forty percent of the amount of the claimant's equity value
in the claimant's residence; and
(7) The claimant may not defer taxes under both this chapter and
chapter 84.38 RCW((; and
(8) In the case of deferred special assessments, the claimant must
have opted for payment of the assessments on the installment method if
this method was available)) in the same tax year.

Sec. 410 RCW 84.37.902 and 2007 sp.s. c 2 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((During calendar year 2011, the joint legislative audit and
review committee shall review the property tax deferral program under
chapter 84.37 RCW.)) Pursuant to chapter 43.136 RCW, the citizen
commission for performance measurement of tax preferences must schedule
the property tax deferral program under this chapter for a tax
preference review by the joint legislative audit and review committee
in 2011. The department of revenue and county assessors shall provide
the committee with any data within its purview that the committee
considers necessary to conduct the review. ((By December 1, 2011, the
joint legislative audit and review committee shall report to the
legislature the results of its review.))
(2) ((As part of its review under subsection (1) of this section))
In addition to the factors in RCW 43.136.055(1), the committee shall
also study and report on:
(a) The effectiveness of the property tax deferral program in
assisting families in economic distress in remaining in their homes;
(b) The effectiveness of the property tax deferral program in
decreasing the default rate on residential mortgages for the statewide
population within the income threshold of the program;
(c) The number of potential participants per thousand population by
geographic region;
(d) The ratio of actual deferral program participants to potential
deferral program participants by geographic region;
(e) The ratio of average annual household property taxes for
deferral program participants and average annual income of deferral
program participants by geographic region;
(f) Economic conditions in the housing and lending markets for the
prior three years and the forecasted economic conditions for the
current biennium and the next succeeding biennium;
(g) Annual costs specific to the administration of the deferral
program; and
(h) Total annual costs of the deferral program((;
(i) Recommended changes to the deferral program that would increase
program participation;
(j) Any other recommendations the committee may have to improve the
deferral program; and
(k) Any other factors that the committee considers necessary to
properly evaluate the deferral program)).
(3) This section expires January 1, 2012.

Sec. 411 RCW 84.40.042 and 2008 c 17 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When real property is divided in accordance with chapter 58.17
RCW, the assessor ((shall)) must carefully investigate and ascertain
the true and fair value of each lot and assess each lot on that same
basis, unless specifically provided otherwise by law. For purposes of
this section, "lot" has the same definition as in RCW 58.17.020.
(a) For each lot on which an advance tax deposit has been paid in
accordance with RCW 58.08.040, the assessor ((shall)) must establish
the true and fair value by October ((30th)) 31st of the year following
the recording of the plat, replat, or altered plat. The value
established ((shall)) must be the value of the lot as of January 1st of
the year the original parcel of real property was last revalued.
((An)) No additional property tax ((shall not be)) is due on the land
until the calendar year following the year for which the advance tax
deposit was paid if the deposit was sufficient to pay the full amount
of the taxes due on the property.
(b) For each lot on which an advance tax deposit has not been paid,
the assessor ((shall)) must establish the true and fair value not later
than the calendar year following the recording of the plat, map,
subdivision, or replat. For purposes of this section, "subdivision"
means a division of land into two or more lots.
(c) For each subdivision, all current year and delinquent taxes and
assessments on the entire tract must be paid in full in accordance with
RCW 58.17.160 and 58.08.030 except when property is being acquired by
a government for public use. For purposes of this section, "current
year taxes" means taxes that are collectible under RCW 84.56.010
subsequent to ((February 14th)) completing the tax roll for current
year collection.
(2) When the assessor is required by law to segregate any part or
parts of real property, assessed before or after July 27, 1997, as one
parcel or when the assessor is required by law to combine parcels of
real property assessed before or after July 27, 1997, as two or more
parcels, the assessor ((shall)) must carefully investigate and
ascertain the true and fair value of each part or parts of the real
property and each combined parcel and assess each part or parts or each
combined parcel on that same basis.

Sec. 412 RCW 84.48.050 and 1995 c 134 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor ((shall)) must, on or before the fifteenth
day of January in each year, ((make out and transmit to the state
auditor, in such form as may be prescribed,)) prepare a complete
abstract of the tax rolls of the county, showing the number of acres
that have been assessed and the total value of the real property,
including the structures on the real property; the total value of all
taxable personal property in the county; the aggregate amount of all
taxable property in the county; the total amount as equalized and the
total amount of taxes levied in the county for state, county, city, and
other taxing district purposes, for that year. ((Should the))
(2) If an assessor of any county fails to transmit to the
department of revenue the abstract provided for in RCW 84.48.010, and
if((, by reason of such failure to transmit such abstract, any)) a
county ((shall)) fails to collect and pay to the state its due
proportion of the state tax for any year because of that failure, the
department of revenue ((shall)) must ascertain what amount of state tax
((said)) the county ((has)) failed to collect((, and)). The department
must certify ((the same)) to the state auditor((, who shall)) the
amount of state tax the county failed to collect. The state auditor
must charge the amount to the proper county and notify the auditor of
((said)) the county of the amount ((of said charge; said)) due. This
sum ((shall be)) is due and payable immediately by warrant in favor of
the state on the current expense fund of ((said)) the county.

Sec. 413 RCW 84.52.030 and 1994 c 124 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purpose of raising revenue for state, county, and other
taxing district purposes, the county legislative authority of each
county ((at its October session)), and all other officials or boards
authorized by law to levy taxes for taxing district purposes, ((shall))
must levy taxes on all the taxable property in the county or district,
as the case may be, sufficient for such purposes, and within the
limitations permitted by law.

Sec. 414 RCW 84.52.070 and 1994 c 81 s 86 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the county legislative authority
of each county, on or before the thirtieth day of November in each
year, to certify to the county assessor ((of the county)) the amount of
taxes levied upon the property in the county for county purposes, and
the respective amounts of taxes levied by the board for each taxing
district, within or coextensive with the county, for district
purposes((, and)).
(2) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the council of each city having
a population of three hundred thousand or more, and of the council of
each town, and of all officials or boards of taxing districts within or
coextensive with the county, authorized by law to levy taxes directly
and not through the county legislative authority, on or before the
thirtieth day of November in each year, to certify to the county
assessor ((of the county)) the amount of taxes levied upon the property
within the city, town, or district for city, town, or district
purposes.
(3) If a levy amount is ((not)) certified to the county assessor
((by)) after the thirtieth day of November, the county assessor
((shall)) may use no more than the certified levy amount for the
previous year for the taxing district((: PROVIDED, That)). This
((shall)) subsection (3) does not apply to the state levy or when the
assessor has not certified assessed values as required by RCW 84.48.130
at least twelve working days ((prior to)) before November 30th.

Sec. 415 RCW 84.52.080 and 1989 c 378 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county assessor ((shall)) must extend the taxes upon the
tax rolls in the form ((herein)) prescribed in this section. The rate
percent necessary to raise the amounts of taxes levied for state and
county purposes, and for purposes of taxing districts coextensive with
the county, ((shall)) must be computed upon the assessed value of the
property of the county((;)). The rate percent necessary to raise the
amount of taxes levied for any taxing district within the county
((shall)) must be computed upon the assessed value of the property of
the district((;)). All taxes assessed against any property ((shall))
must be added together and extended on the rolls in a column headed
consolidated or total tax. In extending any tax, whenever ((it)) the
tax amounts to a fractional part of a cent greater than ((five mills))
one-half of a cent it ((shall)) must be ((made)) rounded up to one
cent, and whenever it amounts to ((five mills)) one-half of a cent or
less ((than five mills)) it ((shall)) must be dropped. The amount of
all taxes ((shall)) must be entered in the proper columns, as shown by
entering the rate percent necessary to raise the consolidated or total
tax and the total tax assessed against the property.
(2) For the purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the
amount of any excess levy in a taxing district ((which has classified
or designated forest land under chapter 84.33 RCW)) entitled to a
distribution under RCW 84.33.081, other than the state, the county
assessor ((shall)) must add the district's timber assessed value, as
defined in RCW 84.33.035, to the assessed value of the property((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, for school districts maintenance and
operations levies, only one-half of the district's timber assessed
value or eighty percent of the timber roll of ((such)) the district in
calendar year 1983 as determined under chapter 84.33 RCW, whichever is
greater, ((shall)) must be added to the assessed value of the property.
(3) Upon the completion of such tax extension, it ((shall be)) is
the duty of the county assessor to make in each assessment book, tax
roll or list a certificate in the following form:

(4) The county assessor ((shall)) must deliver ((said)) the tax
rolls to the county treasurer, on or before the fifteenth day of
January, taking a receipt ((therefor, and)) from the treasurer. At the
same time, the county assessor ((shall)) must provide the county
auditor with an abstract of the tax rolls showing the total amount of
taxes collectible in each of the taxing districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 416 RCW 84.55.080 (Adjustment to tax
limitation) and 2006 c 184 s 5 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 12 are each
repealed.

Sec. 417 RCW 84.56.070 and 2007 c 295 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
((On the fifteenth day of February succeeding the levy of
taxes,))(1) The county treasurer ((shall)) must proceed to collect all
personal property taxes after first completing the tax roll for the
current year's collection. The treasurer ((shall)) must give notice by
mail to all persons charged with personal property taxes((, and if
such)).
(2) If the taxes are not paid before they become delinquent, the
treasurer ((shall forthwith)) must immediately proceed to collect the
((same)) delinquent taxes. In the event that he or she is unable to
collect the ((same)) taxes when due, the treasurer ((shall)) may
prepare papers in distraint, which ((shall)) must contain a description
of the personal property, the amount of taxes, the amount of the
accrued interest at the rate provided by law from the date of
delinquency, and the name of the owner or reputed owner. The treasurer
((shall)) may without demand or notice distrain sufficient goods and
chattels belonging to the person charged with ((such taxes to pay the
same)) paying the taxes, with interest at the rate provided by law from
the date of delinquency, together with all accruing costs((, and
shall)). Following the distraint, the treasurer must proceed to
advertise the ((same)) sale of the distrained property by posting
written notices ((in three)) at the county courthouse and two other
public places in the county in which ((such)) the property ((has been))
was distrained((, one of which places shall be at the county court
house, such)). The notice ((to)) must state the time when and place
where ((such)) the property will be sold. The county treasurer, or the
treasurer's deputy, ((shall tax)) must assess the same fees for making
the distraint and sale of goods and chattels for the payment of taxes
as are allowed by law to sheriffs for making levy and sale of property
on execution; traveling fees to be computed from the county seat of the
county to the place of making distraint.
(3) If the taxes for which ((such)) the property is distrained, and
the interest and costs accruing thereon, are not paid before the date
appointed for ((such)) the sale, which ((shall)) may be not less than
ten days after the taking of ((such)) the property, ((such)) the
treasurer or treasurer's designee ((shall)) must proceed to sell
((such)) the property at public auction, or so much ((thereof)) of the
property as ((shall)) will be sufficient to pay ((such)) the taxes,
with interest and costs((, and)). If there ((be)) is any excess of
money arising from the sale of any personal property, the treasurer
((shall)) must pay ((such)) the excess less any cost of the auction to
the owner of the property so sold or to his or her legal
representative((: PROVIDED, That whenever it shall)).
(4) If it becomes necessary to distrain any standing timber owned
separately from the ownership of the land upon which the ((same))
timber may stand, or any fish trap, pound net, reef net, set net or
drag seine fishing location, or any other personal property as the
treasurer ((shall)) determines to be incapable or reasonably
impracticable of manual delivery, it ((shall)) will be deemed to have
been distrained and taken into possession when the treasurer ((shall
have)) has, at least thirty days before the date fixed for the sale
((thereof)) of the property, filed with the auditor of the county
((wherein such)) where the property is located a notice in writing
reciting that the treasurer has distrained ((such)) the property((,
describing it, giving)). The notice must include a description of the
property, the name of the owner or reputed owner, the amount of the tax
due, with interest, and the time and place of sale((;)). A copy of the
notice ((shall)) must also be sent to the owner or reputed owner at his
or her last known address, by ((registered letter)) certified mail,
return receipt requested, at least thirty days ((prior to)) before the
date of the sale((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(5) If the county treasurer has reasonable grounds to believe that
any personal property, including mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park model trailers, upon which taxes have been levied, but not paid,
is about to be removed from the county where the ((same has been))
property was assessed, or is about to be destroyed, sold or disposed
of, the county treasurer may demand ((such)) payment of the taxes,
without the notice provided for in this section, and if necessary may
((forthwith)) immediately distrain sufficient goods and chattels to pay
the ((same)) taxes.

Sec. 418 RCW 84.60.050 and 1994 c 301 s 54 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When real property is acquired by purchase or condemnation by
the state of Washington, any county or municipal corporation or is
placed under a recorded agreement for immediate possession and use or
an order of immediate possession and use ((pursuant to)) under RCW
8.04.090, ((such)) the property ((shall)) will continue to be subject
to the tax lien for the years prior to the year in which the property
is so acquired or placed under ((such)) the agreement or order, of any
tax levied by the state, county, municipal corporation, or other tax
levying public body, except as is otherwise provided in RCW 84.60.070.
(2) The lien for taxes applicable to the real property being
acquired or placed under immediate possession and use for the year in
which ((such)) the real property is so acquired or placed under
immediate possession and use ((shall)) will be for only the pro rata
portion of taxes allocable to that portion of the year ((prior to))
before the date of execution of the instrument vesting title, date of
recording ((such)) the agreement of immediate possession and use, date
of ((such)) the order of immediate possession and use, or date of
judgment. No taxes levied or tax lien on ((such)) the property
allocable to a period ((subsequent to)) following the dates identified
in this subsection ((shall)) will be valid and any ((such)) taxes
levied ((shall)) must be canceled as provided in RCW 84.48.065. In the
event the owner has paid taxes allocable to that portion of the year
((subsequent to)) following the dates identified in this subsection
((he or she shall be)) that person is entitled to a pro rata refund of
the amount paid on the property so acquired or placed under a recorded
agreement or an order of immediate possession and use. If the dates
identified in this subsection precede ((February 15th of the year in
which such taxes become payable)) the completion of the property tax
rolls for the current year's collection, no lien for ((such)) the taxes
((shall)) will be valid and any ((such)) taxes levied but not payable
((shall)) must be canceled as provided in RCW 84.48.065.

Sec. 419 RCW 86.09.490 and 1937 c 72 s 164 are each amended to
read as follows:
The assessment upon real property ((shall be)) is a lien against
the property assessed, from and after the first day of January in the
year in which the assessment becomes due and payable, but as between
grantor and grantee ((such)) the lien ((shall)) does not attach until
the ((fifteenth day of February of such year, which)) county treasurer
has completed the property tax roll for the current year's collection
and provided the notification required by RCW 84.56.020 in the year in
which the assessment is payable. The lien ((shall be)) is paramount
and superior to any other lien ((theretofore or thereafter)) created
before or after the lien provided in this section, whether by mortgage
or otherwise, except a lien for undelinquent flood control district
assessments, diking or drainage district assessments, or diking or
drainage improvement((,)) district assessments, and for unpaid and
outstanding general ad valorem taxes((, and such)). The lien ((shall))
will not be removed until the assessments are paid or the property sold
for the payment ((thereof)) of the delinquent assessments as provided
by law.

Sec. 420 RCW 87.03.265 and 1939 c 171 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The assessment upon real property ((shall be)) is a lien
against the property assessed, from and after the first day of January
in the year in which it is levied, but as between grantor and grantee
((such)) the lien ((shall)) does not attach until the ((fifteenth day
of February of)) county treasurer has completed the property tax roll
for the current year's collection and provided the notification
required by RCW 84.56.020 in the year in which the assessment is
payable((, which)). The lien ((shall be)) is paramount and superior to
any other lien ((theretofore or thereafter)) created before or after
the lien provided in this section, whether by mortgage or otherwise,
except for a lien for prior assessments((, and such)). The lien
((shall)) will not be removed until the assessments are paid or the
property sold for the payment ((thereof)) of the delinquent assessment
as provided by law. ((And))
(2) The lien for the bonds of any issue ((shall be)) is a preferred
lien to that of any subsequent issue. Also, the lien for all payments
due or to become due under any contract with the United States, or the
state of Washington, accompanying which bonds of the district have not
been deposited with the United States or the state of Washington, as in
RCW 87.03.140 provided, ((shall be)) is a preferred lien to any issue
of bonds ((subsequent to)) after the date of ((such)) the contract.

Sec. 421 RCW 87.03.270 and 1988 c 134 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The assessment roll, before its equalization and adoption,
((shall)) must be checked and compared as to descriptions and
ownerships, with the county treasurer's land rolls. On or before the
fifteenth day of January in each year the secretary must deliver the
assessment roll or the respective segregation ((thereof)) of the
assessment roll to the county treasurer of each respective county in
which the lands ((therein)) described in the assessment roll are
located((, and said)). The assessments ((shall become)) reflected in
the assessment roll are due and payable ((on the fifteenth day of
February following)) after the county treasurer has subsequently
completed the property tax roll for the current year's collection and
provided the notification required by RCW 84.56.020.
(2) All assessments on ((said)) the assessment roll ((shall)) will
become delinquent on the first day of May following the filing of the
roll unless the assessments are paid ((on or)) before ((the thirtieth
day of April of said year: PROVIDED,)) that date. If an assessment is
ten dollars or more for ((said)) the current year and if one-half of
the assessment is paid on or before the thirtieth day of April, the
remainder ((shall be)) is due and payable on or before the thirty-first
day of the following October ((following)) and ((shall be)) is
delinquent after that date. All delinquent assessments ((shall)) bear
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, computed on a monthly
basis and without compounding, from the date of delinquency until paid.
(3) Upon receiving the assessment roll the county treasurer
((shall)) must prepare ((therefrom)) an assessment book ((in which
shall be)). The assessment book must contain a written ((the))
description of the land as it appears in the assessment roll, the name
of the owner or owners where known, and if assessed to the unknown
owners, then the word "unknown", and the total assessment levied
against each tract of land. Proper space ((shall)) must be left in
((said)) the assessment book for the entry ((therein)) of all
subsequent proceedings relating to the payment and collection of
((said)) the assessments.
(4) On or before April 1st of each year, the treasurer of the
district ((shall)) must send a statement of assessments due. County
treasurers who collect irrigation district assessments may send the
statement of irrigation district assessments together with the
statement of general taxes.
(5) Upon payment of any assessment the county treasurer must enter
the date of ((said)) the payment in ((said)) the assessment book
opposite the description of the land and the name of the person paying
and give a receipt to such person specifying the amount of the
assessment and the amount paid with the description of the property
assessed.
(6) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the treasurer of the district to
furnish upon request of the owner, or any person interested, a
statement showing any and all assessments levied as shown by the
assessment roll in his or her office upon land described in ((such))
the request. All statements of irrigation district assessments
covering any land in the district ((shall)) must show the amount of the
irrigation district assessment, the dates on which the assessment is
due, the place of payment, and, if the property was sold for delinquent
assessments in a prior year, the amount of the delinquent assessment
and the notation "certificate issued."((: PROVIDED, That)) The failure
of the treasurer to render any statement ((herein)) required of him
((shall)) or her by this section does not render invalid any
assessments made by any irrigation district.
(7) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the county treasurer of any
county, other than the county in which the office of the board of
directors is located, to make monthly remittances to the county
treasurer of the county in which the office of the board of directors
is located covering all amounts collected by him or her for the
irrigation district during the preceding month.
(8) When the treasurer collects a delinquent assessment, the
treasurer ((shall)) must collect any other amounts due by reason of the
delinquency, including accrued costs, which ((shall)) must be deposited
to the treasurer's operation and maintenance fund.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 501 2006 c 300 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) ((This act and)) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003; section 7,
chapter 300, Laws of 2006; and sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129,
131, 149, and 317, chapter ..., Laws of 2009 (sections 104, 110, 117,
123, 125, 129, 131, 149, and 317 of this act) are contingent upon the
siting and commercial operation of a significant semiconductor
microchip fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) This act takes effect the first day of the month in which a
contract for the construction of a significant semiconductor
fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the director of the
department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide notice of
the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 to
affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed appropriate
by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and this act is effective, the department discovers that
commencement of commercial production did not take place within three
years of the date the contract was signed, the department ((shall))
must make a determination that this act is no longer effective, and all
taxes that would have been otherwise due ((shall be)) are deemed
deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person
reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit
under section 2 or 5 through 10 ((of this act)), chapter 149, Laws of
2003. The department is not authorized to make a second determination
regarding the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Those provisions of sections 101 through
103, 105 through 109, 111 through 116, 118 through 122, 124, 126
through 128, 130, 132 through 148, and 150 through 152 of this act that
relate to annual surveys and annual reports apply beginning with annual
surveys and annual reports due in 2010 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 Section 106 of this act expires July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 Sections 204(3) (a)(i) and (r) and 211 of
this act apply to return or tax information in respect to the tax
imposed under chapter 83.100 RCW in the possession of the department of
revenue on or after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 Sections 314 and 315 of this act apply
both retroactively and prospectively to estates of decedents dying on
or after May 17, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 Section 406 of this act applies both
prospectively and retroactively beginning with taxes levied for
collection in 2002 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 2009 c . . . s 501 (section 501 of this
act), 2006 c 300 s 12, and 2003 c 149 s 12 (uncodified) are codified as
a section within chapter 82.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---