BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.135 and 2007 c 111 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, whenever the
department is required to send any assessment, notice, or any other
information to persons by regular mail, the department ((may)) must
instead provide the assessment, notice, or other information
electronically ((if the following conditions are met:
(a) The person entitled to receive the information has authorized
the department in writing, electronically or otherwise, to provide the
assessment, notice, or other information electronically; and
(b))). The department may implement the requirement in this
subsection in phases. The department, for good cause, may waive the
requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the discretion of
the department, a waiver under this subsection may be made temporary or
permanent, and may be made on the department's own motion.
(2) If the assessment, notice, or other information is subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330, the department must
use methods reasonably designed to protect the information from
unauthorized disclosure. The provisions of this subsection (((1)(b)))
(2) may be waived by a taxpayer. The waiver must be in writing and may
be provided to the department electronically. A person may provide a
waiver with respect to a particular item of information or may give a
blanket waiver with respect to any item of information or certain items
of information to be provided electronically. A blanket waiver will
continue until revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such revocation may
be provided to the department electronically in a manner provided or
approved by the department.
(((2) A person may authorize the department under subsection (1)(a)
of this section to provide a particular item of information
electronically or may give blanket authorization to provide any item of
information or certain items of information electronically. Such
blanket authorization will continue until revoked in writing by the
taxpayer. Such revocation may be provided to the department
electronically in a manner provided or approved by the department.))
(3) Any assessment, notice, or other information provided by the
department electronically to a person is deemed to be received by the
taxpayer on the date that the department electronically sends the
information to the person or electronically notifies the person that
the information is available to be accessed by the person.
(4) This section also applies to any information that is not
expressly required by statute to be sent by regular mail, but is
customarily sent by the department using regular mail, to persons
entitled to receive the information.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, "good cause" includes the
inability of the department to comply with this section for any reason,
including lacking information necessary to send information to a person
electronically or to electronically notify a person that information is
available to be accessed by the person.
(b) "Good cause" also includes the inability of a person to receive
or otherwise obtain information from the department electronically
because:
(i) The person does not have the equipment or software necessary to
enable the person to receive or otherwise obtain information from the
department electronically;
(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the person to
receive or otherwise obtain information from the department
electronically is not functioning properly;
(iii) The person does not have access to the internet using the
person's own equipment; or
(iv) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the
department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from receiving or
otherwise obtaining information from the department electronically.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.080 and 2008 c 181 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When authorized by the department, payment of the tax may be
made by uncertified check under such ((regulations)) rules as the
department ((shall)) prescribes, but, if a check so received is not
paid by the bank on which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check
is tendered, ((shall)) will remain liable for payment of the tax and
for all legal penalties, the same as if such check had not been
tendered.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, payment of
the tax ((shall)) must be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined
in RCW 82.32.085, ((if the amount of the tax due in a calendar year is
one million eight hundred thousand dollars or more. The department may
by rule provide for tax thresholds between two hundred forty thousand
dollars and one million eight hundred thousand dollars for mandatory
use of electronic funds transfer)) if the taxpayer is required to file
and remit its taxes on a monthly basis. As an alternative to
electronic funds transfer, the department may authorize other forms of
electronic payment, such as credit card and e-check. All taxes
administered by this chapter are subject to this requirement except the
taxes authorized by chapters 82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, 82.27, 82.29A, and
84.33 RCW. It is the intent of this ((section)) subsection to require
electronic ((funds transfer)) payment for those taxes reported on the
department's combined excise tax return or any successor return. The
mandatory electronic payment requirement in this subsection also
applies to taxpayers who meet the threshold for filing and remitting
taxes on a monthly basis as established by rule of the department but
for whom the department has authorized a less frequent reporting
frequency, when such authorization became effective on or after the
effective date of this section.
(b) The department, for good cause, may waive the electronic
payment requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the
discretion of the department, a waiver under this subsection may be
made temporary or permanent, and may be made on the department's own
motion.
(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
payment requirements in this subsection.
(3) ((A return or remittance which is transmitted to the department
by United States mail shall be deemed filed or received on the date
shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope
containing it, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. The
department is authorized to allow electronic filing of returns or
remittances from any taxpayer. A return or remittance which is
transmitted to the department electronically shall be deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.)) (a)
Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, returns must be filed
electronically using the department's online tax filing service, if the
taxpayer is required to file and remit its taxes on a monthly basis.
The mandatory electronic filing requirement in this subsection also
applies to taxpayers who meet the threshold for filing and remitting
taxes on a monthly basis as established by rule of the department but
for whom the department has authorized a less frequent reporting
frequency, when such authorization became effective on or after the
effective date of this section.
(b) The department, for good cause, may waive the electronic filing
requirement in this subsection for any taxpayer. In the discretion of
the department, a waiver under this subsection may be made temporary or
permanent, and may be made on the department's own motion.
(c) The department is authorized to accept payment of taxes by
electronic funds transfer or other acceptable forms of electronic
payment from taxpayers that are not subject to the mandatory electronic
payment requirements in this subsection.
(4)(a)(i) The department, for good cause shown, may extend the time
for making and filing any return, and may grant such reasonable
additional time within which to make and file returns as it may deem
proper, but any permanent extension granting the taxpayer a reporting
date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due date, and any
extension in excess of thirty days ((shall)) must be conditional on
deposit with the department of an amount to be determined by the
department which shall be approximately equal to the estimated tax
liability for the reporting period or periods for which the extension
is granted. In the case of a permanent extension or a temporary
extension of more than thirty days the deposit ((shall)) must be
deposited within the state treasury with other tax funds and a credit
recorded to the taxpayer's account which may be applied to taxpayer's
liability upon cancellation of the permanent extension or upon
reporting of the tax liability where an extension of more than thirty
days has been granted.
(ii) The department ((shall)) must review the requirement for
deposit at least annually and may require a change in the amount of the
deposit required when it believes that such amount does not approximate
the tax liability for the reporting period or periods for which the
extension is granted.
(b) During a state of emergency declared under RCW 43.06.010(12),
the department, on its own motion or at the request of any taxpayer
affected by the emergency, may extend the time for making or filing any
return as the department deems proper. The department may not require
any deposit as a condition for granting an extension under this
subsection (4)(b).
(5) The department ((shall)) must keep full and accurate records of
all funds received and disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of
RCW 82.32.105 and 82.32.350, the department ((shall)) must apply the
payment of the taxpayer first against penalties and interest, and then
upon the tax, without regard to any direction of the taxpayer.
(6) The department may refuse to accept any return ((which)) that
is not accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon
or that is not filed electronically as required in this section. When
such return is not accepted, the taxpayer ((shall be)) is deemed to
have failed or refused to file a return and ((shall be)) is subject to
the procedures provided in RCW 82.32.100 and to the penalties provided
in RCW 82.32.090. The above authority to refuse to accept a return
((shall)) may not apply when a return is timely filed electronically
and a timely payment has been made by electronic funds transfer or
other form of electronic payment as authorized by the department.
(7) Except for returns and remittances required to be transmitted
to the department electronically under this section and except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, a return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department by United States mail is deemed filed or
received on the date shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped
upon the envelope containing it. A return or remittance that is
transmitted to the department electronically is deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.
(8)(a) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
"good cause" means the inability of a taxpayer to comply with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section because:
(i) The taxpayer does not have the equipment or software necessary
to enable the taxpayer to comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this
section;
(ii) The equipment or software necessary to enable the taxpayer to
comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section is not functioning
properly;
(iii) The taxpayer does not have access to the internet using the
taxpayer's own equipment;
(iv) The taxpayer does not have a bank account or a credit card;
(v) The taxpayer's bank is unable to send or receive electronic
funds transfer transactions; or
(vi) Some other circumstance or condition exists that, in the
department's judgment, prevents the taxpayer from complying with the
requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(b) "Good cause" also includes any circumstance that, in the
department's judgment, supports the efficient or effective
administration of the tax laws of this state, including providing
relief from the requirements of subsection (2) or (3) of this section
to any taxpayer that is voluntarily collecting and remitting this
state's sales or use taxes on sales to Washington customers but has no
legal requirement to be registered with the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.085 and 2006 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Electronic funds transfer" means any transfer of funds, other
than a transaction originated by check, drafts, or similar paper
instrument, which is initiated through an electronic terminal,
telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape so as to order,
instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an
account.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the electronic
funds transfer is to be completed so that the state receives
collectible funds on or before the next banking day following the due
date.
(b) A remittance made using the automated clearinghouse debit
method will be deemed to be received on the due date if the electronic
funds transfer is initiated on or before 11:59 p.m. pacific time on the
due date with an effective payment date on or before the next banking
day following the due date.
(3)(((a))) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules necessary to
implement the provisions of RCW 82.32.080 and this section. The rules
((shall)) must include but are not limited to: (((i))) (a)
Coordinating the filing of tax returns with payment by electronic funds
transfer or other form of electronic payment as authorized by the
department; (((ii))) (b) form and content of electronic funds transfer;
(((iii))) (c) voluntary use of electronic funds transfer with
permission of the department for those taxpayers that are not subject
to the mandatory electronic payment requirement in RCW 82.32.080;
(((iv))) (d) use of commonly accepted means of electronic funds
transfer; (((v))) (e) means of crediting and recording proof of
payment; and (((vi))) (f) means of correcting errors in transmission.
(((b) Any changes in the threshold of tax shall be implemented with
a separate rule-making procedure.))

Sec. 4 RCW 82.32.060 and 2004 c 153 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer for a refund
or for an audit of the taxpayer's records, or upon an examination of
the returns or records of any taxpayer, it is determined by the
department that within the statutory period for assessment of taxes,
penalties, or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any amount of tax,
penalty, or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the
excess amount paid within, or attributable to, such period ((shall))
must be credited to the taxpayer's account or ((shall)) must be
refunded to the taxpayer, at the taxpayer's option. Except as provided
in subsection (2) of this section, no refund or credit ((shall)) may be
made for taxes, penalties, or interest paid more than four years prior
to the beginning of the calendar year in which the refund application
is made or examination of records is completed.
(2)(a) The execution of a written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or
82.32.100 ((shall)) will extend the time for making a refund or credit
of any taxes paid during, or attributable to, the years covered by the
waiver if, prior to the expiration of the waiver period, an application
for refund of such taxes is made by the taxpayer or the department
discovers a refund or credit is due.
(b) A refund or credit ((shall)) must be allowed for an excess
payment resulting from the failure to claim a bad debt deduction,
credit, or refund under RCW 82.04.4284, 82.08.037, 82.12.037,
82.14B.150, or 82.16.050(5) for debts that became bad debts under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, less
than four years prior to the beginning of the calendar year in which
the refund application is made or examination of records is completed.
(3) Any such refunds ((shall)) must be made by means of vouchers
approved by the department and by the issuance of state warrants drawn
upon and payable from such funds as the legislature may provide.
However, taxpayers who are required to pay taxes by electronic funds
transfer under RCW 82.32.080 ((shall)) must have any refunds paid by
electronic funds transfer if the department has the necessary account
information to facilitate a refund by electronic funds transfer.
(4) Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any court of
competent jurisdiction, not appealed from, for tax, penalties, and
interest which were paid by the taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by any
taxpayer ((shall)) must be paid in the same manner, as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, upon the filing with the department of
a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.
(a) Interest at the rate of three percent per annum ((shall)) must
be allowed by the department and by any court on the amount of any
refund, credit, or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer for taxes,
penalties, or interest paid by the taxpayer before January 1, 1992.
This rate of interest ((shall apply)) applies for all interest allowed
through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December 31, 1998,
((shall)) must be computed at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the
first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for
that calendar year.
(b) For refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery
allowed to a taxpayer after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest
((shall)) must be the rate as computed for assessments under RCW
82.32.050(2) less one percent. This rate of interest ((shall apply))
applies for all interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest
allowed after December 31, 1998, ((shall)) must be computed at the rate
as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed ((shall))
must be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.
(5) Interest allowed on a credit notice or refund issued after
December 31, 2003, ((shall)) must be computed as follows:
(a) If all overpayments for each calendar year and all reporting
periods ending with the final month included in a notice or refund were
made on or before the due date of the final return for each calendar
year or the final reporting period included in the notice or refund:
(i) Interest ((shall)) must be computed from January 31st following
each calendar year included in a notice or refund; or
(ii) Interest ((shall)) must be computed from the last day of the
month following the final month included in a notice or refund.
(b) If the taxpayer has not made all overpayments for each calendar
year and all reporting periods ending with the final month included in
a notice or refund on or before the dates specified by RCW 82.32.045
for the final return for each calendar year or the final month included
in the notice or refund, interest ((shall)) must be computed from the
last day of the month following the date on which payment in full of
the liabilities was made for each calendar year included in a notice or
refund, and the last day of the month following the date on which
payment in full of the liabilities was made if the final month included
in a notice or refund is not the end of a calendar year.
(c) Interest included in a credit notice ((shall)) must accrue up
to the date the taxpayer could reasonably be expected to use the credit
notice, as defined by the department's rules. If a credit notice is
converted to a refund, interest ((shall)) must be recomputed to the
date the refund is issued, but not to exceed the amount of interest
that would have been allowed with the credit notice.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.32.087 and 2001 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may grant a direct pay permit to a taxpayer who
demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the director, that the taxpayer
meets the requirements of this section. The direct pay permit allows
the taxpayer to accrue and remit directly to the department use tax on
the acquisition of tangible personal property or sales tax on the sale
of or charges made for labor and/or services, in accordance with all of
the applicable provisions of this title. Any taxpayer that uses a
direct pay permit shall remit state and local sales or use tax directly
to the department. The agreement by the purchaser to remit tax
directly to the department, rather than pay sales or use tax to the
seller, relieves the seller of the obligation to collect sales or use
tax and requires the buyer to pay use tax on the tangible personal
property and sales tax on the sale of or charges made for labor and/or
services.
(2)(a) A taxpayer may apply for a permit under this section if:
(i) The ((taxpayer (i) is subject to mandatory use of electronic funds
transfer under RCW 82.32.080)) taxpayer's cumulative tax liability is
reasonably expected to be two hundred forty thousand dollars or more in
the current calendar year; or (ii) the taxpayer makes purchases subject
to the taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW in excess of ten
million dollars per calendar year. For the purposes of this section,
"tax liability" means the amount required to be remitted to the
department for taxes administered under this chapter, except for the
taxes imposed or authorized by chapters 82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, 82.27,
82.29A, and 84.33 RCW.
(b) Application for a permit must be made in writing to the
director in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A taxpayer
who transacts business in two or more locations may submit one
application to cover the multiple locations.
(c) The director ((shall)) must review a direct pay permit
application in a timely manner and shall notify the applicant, in
writing, of the approval or denial of the application. The department
((shall)) must approve or deny an application based on the applicant's
ability to comply with local government use tax coding capabilities and
responsibilities; requirements for vendor notification; recordkeeping
obligations; electronic data capabilities; and tax reporting
procedures. Additionally, an application may be denied if the director
determines that denial would be in the best interest of collecting
taxes due under this title. The department ((shall)) must provide a
direct pay permit to an approved applicant with the notice of approval.
The direct pay permit shall clearly state that the holder is solely
responsible for the accrual and payment of the tax imposed under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW and that the seller is relieved of
liability to collect tax imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on
all sales to the direct pay permit holder. The taxpayer may petition
the director for reconsideration of a denial.
(d) A taxpayer who uses a direct pay permit must continue to
maintain records that are necessary to a determination of the tax
liability in accordance with this title. A direct pay permit is not
transferable and the use of a direct pay permit may not be assigned to
a third party.
(3) Taxes for which the direct pay permit is used are due and
payable on the tax return for the reporting period in which the
taxpayer (a) receives the tangible personal property purchased or in
which the labor and/or services are performed or (b) receives an
invoice for such property or such labor and/or services, whichever
period is earlier.
(4) The holder of a direct pay permit ((shall)) must furnish a copy
of the direct pay permit to each vendor with whom the taxpayer has
opted to use a direct pay permit. Sellers who make sales upon which
the sales or use tax is not collected by reason of the provisions of
this section, in addition to existing requirements under this title,
((shall)) must maintain a copy of the direct pay permit and any such
records or information as the department may specify.
(5) A direct pay permit is subject to revocation by the director at
any time the department determines that the taxpayer has violated any
provision of this section or that revocation would be in the best
interests of collecting the taxes due under this title. The notice of
revocation must be in writing and is effective either as of the end of
the taxpayer's next normal reporting period or a date deemed
appropriate by the director and identified in the revocation notice.
The taxpayer may petition the director for reconsideration of a
revocation and reinstatement of the permit.
(6) Any taxpayer who chooses to no longer use a direct pay permit
or whose permit is revoked by the department, ((shall)) must return the
permit to the department and immediately make a good faith effort to
notify all vendors to whom the permit was given, advising them that the
permit is no longer valid.
(7) Except as provided in this subsection, the direct pay permit
may be used for any purchase of tangible personal property and any
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050. The direct pay permit may not be used
for:
(a) Purchases of meals or beverages;
(b) Purchases of motor vehicles, trailers, boats, airplanes, and
other property subject to requirements for title transactions by the
department of licensing;
(c) Purchases for which a resale certificate may be used;
(d) Purchases that meet the definitions of RCW 82.04.050 (2)(e) and
(f), (3)(a) through (d), (f), and (g), and (5); or
(e) Other activities subject to tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW that the department by rule designates, consistent with the
purposes of this section, as activities for which a direct pay permit
is not appropriate and may not be used.

--- END ---