BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, as of 2009, the
challenges posed by low wages and lack of training that the legislature
identified in enacting the child care career and wage ladder persist,
and the availability of quality child care in the state continues to
suffer. The legislature intends to address these problems by creating
the possibility for a new relationship between child care center
directors and workers and the state. Child care center directors and
workers are to be given the opportunity to work collectively to improve
standards in their profession and to expand opportunities for
educational advancement to ensure continuous quality improvement in the
delivery of early learning services. Family child care providers in
the state have recently been given a similar opportunity, and the
results of their efforts have improved standards and quality for that
segment of the child care industry.
The legislature intends to create a new type of collective
bargaining for these directors and workers whereby they can come
together and bargain with the state over matters within the state's
purview to improve the quality of child care for the state's families.
Unlike traditional collective bargaining, this new approach will afford
these directors and workers the opportunity to bargain with the state
only over the state's support for child care centers, a matter of
common concern to both directors and workers. Specific terms and
conditions of employment at individual centers, which are the subjects
of traditional collective bargaining between employers and their
employees, fall outside the limited scope of bargaining defined by this
act. Accordingly, traditional policy concerns over supervisors and
employees being organized into a common bargaining unit are
inapplicable. Sharing a community of interest in the subjects of
bargaining enables directors and workers to work side by side in the
same bargaining unit for common goals.
All child care center directors and workers will equally be able to
maintain full membership in the organization that represents them in
their efforts to improve the quality of child care they provide to the
state's children. This new bargaining relationship does not intrude in
any manner upon those relationships governed by the national labor
relations act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq). Child care center directors
and workers do not forfeit their rights under the national labor
relations act by becoming members of an organization that represents
them in their dealings with the state. Under the national labor
relations act, an organization that represents child care center
directors and workers in bargaining with the state under this act is
precluded from representing workers seeking to engage in traditional
collective bargaining with their employer over specific terms and
conditions of employment at individual child care centers.
Nothing in this act is intended to create any unfunded mandates or
financial obligations on child care centers covered by this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.028 and 2007 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to family child care
providers and to child care center directors and workers. Solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining and as expressly limited under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the governor is the public
employer of family child care providers and of child care center
directors and workers who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees. The public employer shall be
represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the governor's
designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW.
(2) This chapter governs the collective bargaining relationship
between the governor and family child care providers and between the
governor and child care center directors and workers, except as
follows:
(a) ((A statewide unit of all family child care providers is)) The
only units appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060 are:
(i) A statewide unit for family child care providers; and
(ii) The units for child care center directors and workers
determined by the commission which shall conform to the unit requested
in the application for certification as the bargaining representative
if consistent with the terms of this act. In determining the units,
the commission shall include in the same unit all child care center
directors and workers employed at child care centers located in
department of social and health services regions existing on the
effective date of this section, and may group together regions to
minimize the number of units.
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of family child care
providers or of child care center directors and workers in the units
specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the representative chosen
in an election conducted pursuant to RCW 41.56.070, except that:
(i) In the initial election conducted under chapter 54, Laws of
2006, or this act, if more than one labor organization is on the ballot
and none of the choices receives a majority of the votes cast, a
run-off election shall be held;
(ii) To show at least thirty percent representation within a unit
to accompany a request for an initial election under this act, the
written proof of representation is valid only if collected not more
than two years prior to the date the request is filed with the
commission; and
(iii) The initial election may not occur before July 1, 2010.
(c) For the exclusive bargaining representatives certified by the
commission to represent units of child care center directors and
workers, negotiations of a collective bargaining agreement shall be
conducted jointly by all certified representatives. The
representatives shall bargain for one collective bargaining agreement
covering all of the represented child care center directors and
workers.
(d)(i) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for family child
care providers under this section shall be limited solely to: (((i)))
(A) Economic compensation, such as manner and rate of subsidy and
reimbursement, including ((tiered reimbursements)) quality incentives;
(((ii))) (B) health and welfare benefits; (((iii))) (C) professional
development and training; (((iv))) (D) labor-management committees;
(((v))) (E) grievance procedures; and (((vi))) (F) other economic
matters. Retirement benefits shall not be subject to collective
bargaining. By such obligation neither party shall be compelled to
agree to a proposal or be required to make a concession unless
otherwise provided in this chapter.
(((d))) (ii) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective
bargaining" in RCW 41.56.030(4), the matters subject to bargaining
under this section shall be within the purview of the state and within
the community of interest of child care center directors and workers.
The public employer is: (A) Required to bargain over the manner and
rate of subsidy and reimbursement, including quality incentives; (B)
permitted, but not required, to bargain over: (I) Funding for
professional development and training; (II) mechanisms and funding to
improve the access of child care centers to health care insurance and
other benefit programs; (III) other economic support for child care
centers; and (IV) grievance procedures to resolve disputes arising out
of the interpretation or application of the collective bargaining
agreement; and (C) prohibited from bargaining over retirement benefits.
By such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a
proposal or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided
in this chapter.
(e) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of family child
care providers or the exclusive bargaining representative or
representatives of child care center directors and workers,
negotiations shall be commenced initially upon certification of an
exclusive bargaining representative under (a) of this subsection and,
thereafter, by February 1st of any even-numbered year; and
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
((the)) an arbitrated collective bargaining agreement for family child
care providers or an arbitrated collective bargaining agreement for
child care center directors and workers, is not binding on the state.
(((e))) (f) Nothing in chapter 54, Laws of 2006, or this act grants
family child care providers ((do not have)) and child care center
directors and workers the right to strike.
(3) Family child care providers and child care center directors and
workers who are public employees solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining under subsection (1) of this section are not, for that
reason, employees of the state for any purpose. This section applies
only to the governance of the collective bargaining relationship
between the employer and family child care providers and between the
employer and child care center directors and workers as provided in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The parents' or legal guardians' right to choose and terminate
the services of any family child care provider or any child care center
that provides care for their child or children;
(b) The child care centers' right to choose, direct, and terminate
the services of any child care worker who provides care in the center,
and unless otherwise provided in this chapter, to manage and operate
facilities and programs, including rights to plan, direct, and control
the use of resources;
(c) The rights of employers and employees under the national labor
relations act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.;
(d) The secretary of the department of social and health services'
right to adopt requirements under RCW 74.15.030, except for
requirements related to grievance procedures and collective
negotiations on personnel matters as specified in subsection (2)(((c)))
(d) of this section;
(((c))) (e) Chapter 26.44 RCW, RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, and
74.15.130; and
(((d))) (f) The legislature's right to make programmatic
modifications to the delivery of state services through child care
subsidy programs, including standards of eligibility of parents, legal
guardians, ((and)) family child care providers and child care centers
participating in child care subsidy programs, ((and)) the nature of
services provided, and the right to determine standards for
professional development and training, quality criteria, or ratings
through programs such as a quality rating system. The governor shall
not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under this section that
does not expressly reserve the legislative rights described in this
subsection (4)(((d))) (f).
(5) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (6) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, ((a)) requests for funds necessary to implement the
compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement for family child care providers and a collective bargaining
agreement for child care center directors and workers entered into
under this section or for legislation necessary to implement such
agreements.
(6) ((A)) Requests for funds necessary to implement the
compensation and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement for family child care providers and a collective bargaining
agreement for child care center directors and workers entered into
under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless such ((request has)) requests have been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st before the legislative session at which the request is to be
considered, except that, for initial negotiations under this section
for family child care providers, the request must be submitted by
November 15, 2006, and for child care center directors and workers, the
request may not be submitted before July 1, 2011; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as being
feasible financially for the state or reflects the binding decision of
an arbitration panel reached under this section.
(7) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
requests for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submissions, any such agreements will be reopened solely for
the purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to implement the
agreements.
(8) The governor shall periodically consult with the joint
committee on employment relations established by RCW 41.80.010
regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of ((any)) a collective bargaining agreement for
family child care providers and a collective bargaining agreement for
child care center directors and workers and, upon completion of
negotiations, advise the committee on the elements of the agreements
and on any legislation necessary to implement such agreements.
(9) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in any such agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement, except as provided in
subsection (4)(((d))) (f) of this section.
(10) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of ((an)) a
collective bargaining agreement for family child care providers or for
a collective bargaining agreement for child care center directors and
workers are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(11) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of family child care providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative and of child care center directors and
workers and their exclusive bargaining representatives to the extent
such activities are authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.030 and 2007 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Public employer" means any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any public body
governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public body. For
the purposes of this section, the public employer of district court or
superior court employees for wage-related matters is the respective
county legislative authority, or person or body acting on behalf of the
legislative authority, and the public employer for nonwage-related
matters is the judge or judge's designee of the respective district
court or superior court.
(2) "Public employee" means any employee of a public employer
except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b) appointed to
office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy, administrative
assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential relationship to
(i) the executive head or body of the applicable bargaining unit, or
(ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii) any person appointed
to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a specified
term of office as a member of a multimember board, commission, or
committee, whether appointed by the executive head or body of the
public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner or a court
magistrate of superior court, district court, or a department of a
district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e) who is a
personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court judge, or
court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this subsection, no more
than one assistant for each judge or commissioner may be excluded from
a bargaining unit.
(3) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement officers as
defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of any city or
town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more and law
enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any county with
a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional employees who
are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and noncommissioned
security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020(5),
by a county with a population of seventy thousand or more, and who are
trained for and charged with the responsibility of controlling and
maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and safeguarding inmates
from other inmates; (c) general authority Washington peace officers as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a port district in a county with
a population of one million or more; (d) security forces established
under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as that term is defined in RCW
41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district in a county with a
population of one million or more whose duties include crash fire
rescue or other fire fighting duties; (g) employees of fire departments
of public employers who dispatch exclusively either fire or emergency
medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the several classes of
advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, who are
employed by a public employer.
(8) "Institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, and the various state community colleges.
(9) "Home care quality authority" means the authority under chapter
74.39A RCW.
(10) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(11) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(12) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(13) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in
RCW 70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(14) "Child care center directors and workers" includes all
employees of child care centers who work on-site at the centers.
"Child care center directors and workers" also includes owners of child
care centers who work on-site at the centers.
(15)(a) "Child care center" means a child care center licensed by
the state under RCW 74.15.030 that has at least four children for whom
it receives a child care subsidy.
(b) "Child care center" does not include a child care center:
(i) Operated directly by another unit of government or a tribe;
(ii) Operated by an individual, partnership, profit or nonprofit
corporation, or other entity that operates ten or more child care
centers statewide; or
(iii) Operated by a local nonprofit organization whose primary
mission is to provide social services, including serving children and
families, and that pays membership dues or assessments to either: (A)
A national organization, exempt from income tax under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code, with more than three million dollars in
membership dues and assessments annually, as reported to the internal
revenue service; or (B) a regional council that is affiliated with a
national organization, exempt from income tax under section 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code, with more than two hundred affiliates.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.56.113 and 2007 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider, a
family child care provider, or an adult family home provider within the
bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition of the
bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the state as
payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject to subsection (((3)))
(4) of this section, deduct from the payments to an individual
provider, a family child care provider, or an adult family home
provider the monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of
the exclusive bargaining representative and shall transmit the same to
the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative.
(2) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers, family child care providers,
or adult family home providers enter into a collective bargaining
agreement that:
(a) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, enforce the agreement by
deducting from the payments to bargaining unit members the dues
required for membership in the exclusive bargaining representative, or,
for nonmembers thereof, a fee equivalent to the dues; or
(b) Includes requirements for deductions of payments other than the
deduction under (a) of this subsection, the state, as payor, but not as
the employer, shall, subject to subsection (((3))) (4) of this section,
make such deductions upon written authorization of the individual
provider, family child care provider, or adult family home provider.
(3) In lieu of the deductions authorized under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section, and the union security provisions authorized under
RCW 41.56.122, the governor and the exclusive representative of a
bargaining unit of child care center directors and workers shall agree
to a representation fee to be paid to the exclusive representative for
the costs of representation of child care center directors and workers
as provided in this chapter. The state shall deduct the representation
fee from the monthly amount of the child care subsidy due to a child
care center and transmit the representation fee to the secretary of the
exclusive bargaining representative. However:
(a) Any agreement to pay a representation fee must safeguard the
child care center owner's and operator's rights of nonassociation based
on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or other
religious body of which the owner or operator is a member. The child
care center owner or operator shall pay an amount equivalent to the
representation fee to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable
organization;
(b) The child care center shall furnish written proof that such
payment has been made.
(4)(a) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions ((from the payments to individual providers, family child
care providers, and adult family home providers)) under this section
shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the
state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(b) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions ((from the payments to individual providers, family
child care providers, or adult family home providers)) under this
section shall be an appropriate subject of collective bargaining
between the exclusive bargaining representative and the governor unless
prohibited by another statute. If no collective bargaining agreement
containing a provision allocating the ongoing additional cost is
entered into between the exclusive bargaining representative and the
governor, or if the legislature does not approve funding for the
collective bargaining agreement as provided in RCW 74.39A.300,
41.56.028, or 41.56.029, as applicable, the ongoing additional costs to
the state in making deductions ((from the payments to individual
providers, family child care providers, or adult family home
providers)) under this section shall be negotiated, agreed upon in
advance, and reimbursed to the state by the exclusive bargaining
representative.
(((4))) (5) The governor and the exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit of family child care providers may
not enter into a collective bargaining agreement that contains a union
security provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be
administered by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining
unit of family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for
license- exempt family child care providers who are also temporary
assistance for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.56.465 and 2007 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, the panel
shall consider:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;
(d) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (c) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(e) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (d) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(7)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a city or
town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a county with
a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration must also be
given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (a) through (d), the
panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings with
the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel of
like employers of similar size on the west coast of the United States.
(3) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7) (e) through (h), the
panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours, and
conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings with
the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel of
public fire departments of similar size on the west coast of the United
States. However, when an adequate number of comparable employers
exists within the state of Washington, other west coast employers may
not be considered.
(4) For ((employees)) family child care providers listed in RCW
41.56.028:
(a) The panel shall also consider:
(i) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and
reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and
municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) The public's interest in reducing turnover and increasing
retention of child care providers;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting, through education and
training, a stable child care workforce to provide quality and reliable
child care from all providers throughout the state; and
(iii) In addition, for employees exempt from licensing under
chapter 74.15 RCW, the state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance
upon public benefit programs including but not limited to medical
coupons, food stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical
services.
(5) For child care center directors and workers listed in RCW
41.56.028, the panel shall also consider:
(a) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and
reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and
municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and
(b) The financial ability of the state to pay for a collective
bargaining agreement.
(6) For employees listed in RCW 74.39A.270:
(a) The panel shall consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly reimbursed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly employed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting a stable long-term care
workforce to provide quality and reliable care to vulnerable elderly
and disabled recipients;
(iii) The state's interest in ensuring access to affordable,
quality health care for all state citizens; and
(iv) The state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public
benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food
stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services.
(((6))) (7) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section may not be
construed to authorize the panel to require the employer to pay,
directly or indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting
from chapter 502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required
under chapter 41.26 RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.04.810 and 2007 c 184 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Individual providers, as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, family child
care providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, child care center
directors and workers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, and adult family
home providers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, are not employees of the
state or any of its political subdivisions and are specifically and
entirely excluded from all provisions of this title, except as provided
in RCW 74.39A.270, 41.56.028, and 41.56.029.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.01.047 and 2007 c 184 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
RCW 43.01.040 through 43.01.044 do not apply to individual
providers under RCW 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, family child care
providers under RCW 41.56.028, child care center directors and workers
under RCW 41.56.028, or adult family home providers under RCW
41.56.029.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Every child care center shall provide to the department a list
of the names and addresses of all current child care center directors
and workers, as defined in RCW 41.56.030, annually by January 30th,
except that initially the lists shall be provided within thirty days of
the effective date of this section.
(2) The department shall, upon request, provide to a labor
organization seeking to organize child care center directors and
workers, a list of all directors and workers in the unit that the
organization seeks to organize. The list shall contain the information
collected with regard to the directors and workers pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A labor organization receiving information under subsection (2)
of this section may not release that information to any other party and
may only use that information for collective bargaining and for the
purposes specified in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall adjust the rates of child care subsidies, as
defined in RCW 41.56.030, paid to all child care centers located in a
department of social and health services region to reflect the rate
provisions in a collective bargaining agreement for child care center
directors and workers employed at child care centers located in the
same region that was negotiated under RCW 41.56.028 and funded by the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 74.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall adjust the rates of child care subsidies, as
defined in RCW 41.56.030, paid to all child care centers located in a
department of social and health services region to reflect the rate
provisions in a collective bargaining agreement for child care center
directors and workers employed at child care centers located in the
same region that was negotiated under RCW 41.56.028 and funded by the
legislature.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.215.010 and 2007 c 415 s 2 and 2007 c 394 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child day care provider who
regularly provides child day care and early learning services for not
more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living
quarters;
(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity
registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a
primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental
support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in
contributions;
(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools or kindergartens that are engaged primarily in
educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing care to children for periods of less than
twenty-four hours whose parents remain on the premises to participate
in activities other than employment;
(i) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(l) An agency that offers early learning and support services, such
as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a
regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Child care center directors and workers" means the same as in
RCW 41.56.030.
(5) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(((5))) (6) "Director" means the director of the department.
(((6))) (7) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the
services of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work
in an agency.
(((7))) (8) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension,
revocation, modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(1) or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(((8))) (9) "Family child care licensee" means a person who: (a)
Provides regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home
of the provider for periods of less than twenty-four hours or, if
necessary due to the nature of the parent's work, for periods equal to
or greater than twenty-four hours; (b) does not receive child care
subsidies; and (c) is licensed by the state under RCW 43.215.200.
(10) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((9))) (11) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.215.350 and 2007 c 17 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall have the power and it shall be the director's
duty to engage in negotiated rule making pursuant to RCW
34.05.310(2)(a) with:
(1) The exclusive representative of the unit of family child care
licensees selected in accordance with RCW 43.215.355 and with other
affected interests before adopting requirements that affect family
child care licensees; and
(2) The exclusive representative or representatives of the unit or
units of child care center directors and workers selected in accordance
with RCW 41.56.028 and with other affected interests before adopting
requirements that affect child care center directors and workers.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.15.020 and 2007 c 412 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031, and unless
otherwise clearly indicated by the context thereof, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or
persons with developmental disabilities for control, care, or
maintenance outside their own homes, or which places, arranges the
placement of, or assists in the placement of children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities for foster care or
placement of children for adoption, and shall include the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency or to the
children, expectant mothers or persons with developmental disabilities
for services rendered:
(a) "Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or
children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;
(b) "Community facility" means a group care facility operated for
the care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185.
A county detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the
department under RCW 13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the
department is not a community facility;
(c) "Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a
temporary protective residential facility operated to perform the
duties specified in chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW
74.13.032 through 74.13.036;
(d) "Emergency respite center" is an agency that may be commonly
known as a crisis nursery, that provides emergency and crisis care for
up to seventy-two hours to children who have been admitted by their
parents or guardians to prevent abuse or neglect. Emergency respite
centers may operate for up to twenty-four hours a day, and for up to
seven days a week. Emergency respite centers may provide care for
children ages birth through seventeen, and for persons eighteen through
twenty with developmental disabilities who are admitted with a sibling
or siblings through age seventeen. Emergency respite centers may not
substitute for crisis residential centers or HOPE centers, or any other
services defined under this section, and may not substitute for
services which are required under chapter 13.32A or 13.34 RCW;
(e) "Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides
care on a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant
mothers, or persons with developmental disabilities in the family abode
of the person or persons under whose direct care and supervision the
child, expectant mother, or person with a developmental disability is
placed;
(f) "Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group
of children on a twenty-four hour basis;
(g) "HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to
provide temporary residential placement and other services to street
youth. A street youth may remain in a HOPE center for thirty days
while services are arranged and permanent placement is coordinated. No
street youth may stay longer than thirty days unless approved by the
department and any additional days approved by the department must be
based on the unavailability of a long-term placement option. A street
youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may remain in a
HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth, not
longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;
(h) "Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges
for care or services to expectant mothers, before or during
confinement, or which provides care as needed to mothers and their
infants after confinement;
(i) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by
the secretary that provides residential and transitional living
services to persons ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under
chapter 13.34 RCW and who have been unable to live in his or her
legally authorized residence and, as a result, the minor lived outdoors
or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by the minor.
Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be eligible if no other
placement alternative is available and the department approves the
placement;
(j) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" shall not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with
developmental disability in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, second cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons
of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or
great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law;
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated;
(v) Relatives, as named in (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (2)(a), of any half sibling of the child; or
(vi) Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of
the Indian child's tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a
person who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian
child's grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law
or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or
stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a twenty-four-hour
basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother,
or persons with developmental disabilities;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the parent and person
providing care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement
in writing and the state is not providing any payment for the care;
(d) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to exchange students or
international student exchange visitors or persons who have the care of
an exchange student in their home;
(e) A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that
provides placement or similar services to international children who
have entered the country by obtaining visas that meet the criteria for
medical care as established by the United States immigration and
naturalization service, or persons who have the care of such an
international child in their home;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged
primarily in education, operate on a definite school year schedule,
follow a stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children
and do not accept custody of children;
(g) Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when
performing functions defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW and boarding homes licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW;
(h) Licensed physicians or lawyers;
(i) Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;
(j) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
prior to June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or
assistance from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part
by an endowment or trust fund;
(k) Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of
adoption, if the child was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized public or tribal agency or court or if a
replacement report has been filed under chapter 26.33 RCW and the
placement has been approved by the court;
(l) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency licensed by an Indian tribe pursuant to RCW
74.15.190;
(m) A maximum or medium security program for juvenile offenders
operated by or under contract with the department;
(n) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter.
(3) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(4) (("Family child care licensee" means a person who: (a)
Provides regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home
of the provider for periods of less than twenty-four hours or, if
necessary due to the nature of the parent's work, for periods equal to
or greater than twenty-four hours; (b) does not receive child care
subsidies; and (c) is licensed by the state under RCW 74.15.030.
(5))) "Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has
been sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department under RCW 13.40.185.
(((6))) (5) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a
disciplinary measure to an agency that has previously been issued a
full license but is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(((7))) (6) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard
of care to be maintained by an agency.
(((8))) (7) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((9))) (8) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen
who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for
occupancy by the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent
or at his or her legally authorized residence.
(((10))) (9) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to
the extent funds are available, the following:
(a) Educational services, including basic literacy and
computational skills training, either in local alternative or public
high schools or in a high school equivalency program that leads to
obtaining a high school equivalency degree;
(b) Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational
training or higher education, job readiness, job search assistance, and
placement programs;
(c) Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money
management, home management, consumer skills, parenting, health care,
access to community resources, and transportation and housing options;
(d) Individual and group counseling; and
(e) Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local
organizations such as the United States department of labor, employment
and training administration programs including the job training
partnership act which administers private industry councils and the job
corps; vocational rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act may be known and cited as the
access to quality child care workforce act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act shall be in effect only if funds
are specifically appropriated for this purpose.

--- END ---