BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall develop standard
court forms and format rules for mandatory use by parties in dependency
matters commenced under this chapter or chapter 26.44 RCW. Forms shall
be developed not later than November 1, 2009, and the mandatory use
requirement shall be effective January 1, 2010. The administrative
office of the courts has continuing responsibility to develop and
revise mandatory forms and format rules as appropriate.
(2) According to rules established by the administrative office of
the courts, a party may delete unnecessary portions of the forms and
may supplement the mandatory forms with additional material.
(3) Failure by a party to use the mandatory forms or follow the
format rules shall not be a reason to dismiss a case, refuse a filing,
or strike a pleading. The court may, however, require the party to
submit a corrected pleading and may impose terms payable to the
opposing party or payable to the court, or both.
(4) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a
master copy of the mandatory forms to all county court clerks. Upon
request, the administrative office of the courts and county clerks must
distribute the forms to the public and may charge for the cost of
production and distribution of the forms. Private vendors also may
distribute the forms. Distribution of forms may be in printed or
electronic form.

--- END ---