BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.035 and 2000 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology;
(3) "Groundwaters" means all waters that exist beneath the land
surface or beneath the bed of any stream, lake or reservoir, or other
body of surface water within the boundaries of this state, whatever may
be the geological formation or structure in which such water stands or
flows, percolates or otherwise moves. There is a recognized
distinction between natural groundwater and artificially stored
groundwater;
(4) "Natural groundwater" means water that exists in underground
storage owing wholly to natural processes;
(5) "Artificially stored groundwater" means water that is made
available in underground storage artificially, either intentionally, or
incidentally to irrigation and that otherwise would have been
dissipated by natural processes; ((and))
(6) "Stock watering" means all reasonable uses of water normally
associated with the care and management of livestock including, but not
limited to, drinking, feeding, cleaning of stalls, washing livestock,
washing equipment used in the feeding or milking of livestock,
controlling dust around livestock, and cooling livestock; and
(7) "Underground artificial storage and recovery project" means any
project in which it is intended to artificially store water in the
ground through injection, surface spreading and infiltration, or other
department-approved method, and to make subsequent use of the stored
water. However, (a) this subsection does not apply to irrigation
return flow, or to operational and seepage losses that occur during the
irrigation of land, or to water that is artificially stored due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district
project, or to projects involving water reclaimed in accordance with
chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies to those instances of
claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the construction,
operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project or
operational and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of
land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial recharge already
existing at the time a groundwater subarea is established.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.050 and 2003 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public groundwaters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public
groundwaters for ((stock-watering)) stock watering purposes not to
exceed three hundred fifty acre feet of water per year, or for the
watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half
acre in area, or for single or group domestic uses in an amount not
exceeding five thousand gallons a day, or as provided in RCW 90.44.052,
or for an industrial purpose in an amount not exceeding five thousand
gallons a day, is and shall be exempt from the provisions of this
section, but, to the extent that it is regularly used beneficially,
shall be entitled to a right equal to that established by a permit
issued under the provisions of this chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That)).
(2)(a) However, the department from time to time may require the
person or agency making any such small withdrawal to furnish
information as to the means for and the quantity of that withdrawal((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)).
(b) Prior to withdrawing more than fifteen thousand gallons a day
for stock watering purposes, the department shall require the
following:
(i) A report of examination describing the quantity of water to be
withdrawn;
(ii) The development schedule;
(iii) A metering plan;
(iv) A water right impairment analysis prepared by a qualified
hydrologist or engineer;
(v) Proof of compliance with any applicable county land use
planning;
(vi) Compliance with applicable state environmental policy act
requirements; and
(vii) Generally applicable well construction and reporting
requirements.
(3) At the option of the party making withdrawals of groundwaters
of the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications
under this section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and
permits and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---