BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.430 and 2007 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may sell any ((new)) motor vehicle as specified in
this title, nor may any ((new)) motor vehicle as specified in this
title be registered unless such vehicle is equipped with safety glazing
material of a type that meets or exceeds federal standards((, or if
there are none, standards approved by the Washington state patrol))
under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.205.
(b) The foregoing provisions apply to all passenger-type motor
vehicles, including passenger buses and school buses, but in respect to
trucks, including truck tractors, the requirements as to safety glazing
material apply to all glazing material used in doors, windows, and
windshields in the drivers' compartments of such vehicles except as
provided by subsection (4) of this section.
(c) The safety glazing material that is manufactured and installed
in accordance with federal standards shall not be etched or otherwise
permanently altered if the safety glazing material is installed in the
windshield or any other window located in the motor vehicle passenger
compartment, except for the etching of the vehicle identification
number if:
(i) The maximum height of the letters or numbers do not exceed one-half inch; and
(ii) The etched vehicle identification number is not located in a
position that interferes with the vision of any occupant of the motor
vehicle.
(2) ((The term)) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Light transmission" means the ratio of the amount of total
visible light, expressed in percentages, that is allowed to pass
through the sunscreening or coloring material to the amount of total
visible light falling on the motor vehicle window.
(b) "Net film screening" means the total sunscreening or coloring
material applied to the window that includes both the material applied
by the manufacturer during the safety glazing and any film sunscreening
or coloring material applied after the vehicle is manufactured.
(c) "Reflectance" means the ratio of the amount of total light,
expressed in percentages, that is reflected outward by the sunscreening
or coloring material to the amount of total light falling on the motor
vehicle window.
(d) "Safety glazing materials" means glazing materials so
constructed, treated, or combined with other materials as to reduce
substantially, in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass,
the likelihood of injury to persons by objects from exterior sources or
by these safety glazing materials when they may be cracked or broken.
(3) The director of licensing shall not register any motor vehicle
which is subject to the provisions of this section unless it is
equipped with an approved type of safety glazing material, and he or
she shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle so subject to
this section which the director finds is not so equipped until it is
made to conform to the requirements of this section.
(4) No person may sell or offer for sale, nor may any person
operate a motor vehicle registered in this state which is equipped
with, any camper manufactured after May 23, 1969, unless such camper is
equipped with safety glazing material of a type conforming to rules
adopted ((by the state patrol)) under 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.205 wherever
glazing materials are used in outside windows and doors.
(5) No film sunscreening or coloring material that reduces light
transmittance to any degree may be applied to the surface of the safety
glazing material in a motor vehicle unless it meets the following
standards for such material:
(a) The maximum level of net film sunscreening ((material)) to be
applied to any window, except the windshield, shall have a total
reflectance of thirty-five percent or less, ((plus or minus three
percent,)) and a light transmission of ((thirty-five)) twenty-four
percent or more, ((plus or minus three percent, when measured against
clear glass resulting in a minimum of twenty-four percent light
transmission on AS-2 glazing)) where the vehicle is equipped with
outside rearview mirrors on both the right and left. Installation of
more than a single sheet of film sunscreening material to any window is
prohibited. ((The same maximum levels of film sunscreen material may
be applied to windows to the immediate right and left of the driver
on))
(b) Hearses, collector vehicles, limousines and passenger buses
used to transport persons for compensation, ambulances, rescue squad
vehicles, any other emergency medical vehicle licensed under RCW
18.73.130 that is used to transport patients, and any vehicle((s))
identified by the manufacturer as ((multi-use, multipurpose, or other
similar designation. All windows to the rear of the driver on such
vehicles)) a truck, motor home, or multipurpose passenger vehicle as
defined in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 571.3, may have net film sunscreening
((material)) applied on any window to the rear of the driver that has
less than ((thirty- five)) twenty-four percent light transmittance, if
the light reflectance is thirty-five percent or less and the vehicle is
equipped with outside rearview mirrors on both the right and left.
(c) A person or business tinting windows for profit who tints
windows within restricted areas of the glazing system shall supply a
sticker to be affixed to the driver's door post, in the area adjacent
to the manufacturer's identification tag. Installation of this sticker
certifies that the glazing application meets this chapter's standards
for light transmission, reflectance, and placement requirements.
Stickers must be no smaller than three-quarters of an inch by one and
one-half inches, and no larger than two inches by two and one-half
inches. The stickers must be of sufficient quality to endure exposure
to harsh climate conditions. The business name and state tax
identification number of the installer must be clearly visible on the
sticker.
(((b))) (d) A greater degree of light reduction is permitted on all
windows and the top six inches of windshields of a vehicle operated by
or carrying as a passenger a person who possesses a written
verification from a licensed physician that the operator or passenger
must be protected from exposure to sunlight for physical or medical
reasons.
(((c) Windshield application.)) (e) A greater degree of light
reduction is permitted ((on the top six-inch area of a vehicle's))
along the top edge of the windshield as long as the product is
transparent and does not extend into the AS-1 portion of the windshield
or extend more than six inches from the top of the windshield. Clear
film sunscreening material that reduces or eliminates ultraviolet light
may be applied to windshields.
(((d))) (f) When film sunscreening material is applied to any
window except the windshield, outside mirrors on both the left and
right sides shall be located so as to reflect to the driver a view of
the roadway, through each mirror, a distance of at least two hundred
feet to the rear of the vehicle.
(((e))) (g) The following types of film sunscreening material are
not permitted:
(i) Mirror finish products;
(ii) Red, gold, yellow, or black material; or
(iii) Film sunscreening material that is in liquid preapplication
form and brushed or sprayed on.
((Nothing in this section prohibits))
(6) Subsection (5) of this section does not prohibit:
(a) The use of shaded or heat-absorbing safety glazing material in
which the shading or heat-absorbing characteristics have been applied
at the time of manufacture of the safety glazing material and which
meet federal standards ((and the standards of the state patrol)) for
such safety glazing materials.
(((6))) (b) The use and placement of federal, state, or local
certificates or decals on any window as required by applicable laws or
regulations. However, any such certificate or decal must be of a size
and placed on the motor vehicle so as not to impair the ability of the
driver to safely operate the motor vehicle.
(c) Sunscreening devices to be applied to any window behind the
driver provided that the devices reduce the driver's area of vision
uniformly and by no more than fifty percent, as measured on a
horizontal plane. If sunscreening devices are applied to the rear
window, the vehicle must be equipped with outside rearview mirrors on
both the left and right.
(d) Recreational products, such as toys, cartoon characters,
stuffed animals, signs, and any other vision-reducing article or
material to be applied to or placed in windows behind the driver
provided that they do not interfere, in their size or position, with
the driver's ability to see other vehicles, persons, or objects.
(7) It is a traffic infraction for any person to operate a vehicle
for use on the public highways of this state, if the vehicle is
equipped with film sunscreening or coloring material in violation of
this section.
(((7))) (8) Owners of vehicles with film sunscreening material
applied to windows to the rear of the driver, prior to June 7, 1990,
must comply with the requirements of this section and RCW 46.37.435 by
July 1, 1993.
(((8))) (9) The side and rear windows of law enforcement vehicles
are exempt from the requirements of subsection (5) of this section.
However, when law enforcement vehicles are sold to private individuals
the film sunscreening or coloring material must comply with the
requirements of subsection (5) of this section or documentation must be
provided to the buyer stating that the vehicle windows must comply with
the requirements of subsection (5) of this section before operation of
the vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Collector vehicle" means any motor vehicle that is more than
thirty years old.

--- END ---