BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
state patrol's participation in charitable work, such as the chief for
a day program that provides special attention to chronically ill
children through recognition by various law enforcement agencies within
the state, advances the overall purposes of the department by promoting
positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the
state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To promote positive relationships between law enforcement and
the citizens of the state of Washington, the Washington state patrol
may participate in the chief for a day program. The chief of the
Washington state patrol may designate staff who may participate in
organizing the event. The Washington state patrol may accept grants of
funds and gifts to be utilized in furtherance of this purpose, and may
use their public facilities for such purpose. At all times, the
participation of the Washington state patrol must comply with chapter
42.52 RCW.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "chief for a day program"
means a program in which the Washington state patrol partners with
other local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies, hospitals,
and the community to provide a day of special attention to chronically
ill children. Each child is selected and sponsored by a law
enforcement agency. The event, chief for a day, may occur on the
grounds and in the facilities of the Washington state patrol. The
program may include any appropriate honoring of the child as a chief,
such as a certificate swearing them in as a chief, a badge, a uniform,
and donated gifts. The gifts may include, but are not limited to,
games, puzzles, and art supplies.

--- END ---