BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.43.020 and 2007 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Engineer" means a professional engineer as defined in this
section.
(2) "Professional engineer" means a person who, by reason of his or
her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences and the
principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, acquired by
professional education and practical experience, is qualified to
practice engineering as defined in this section, as attested by his or
her legal registration as a professional engineer.
(3) "Engineer-in-training" means a candidate who: (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) has successfully passed the examination in the
fundamental engineering subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board as
an engineer-in-training.
(4) "Engineering" means the "practice of engineering" as defined
in this section.
(5)(a) "Practice of engineering" means any professional service or
creative work requiring engineering education, training, and experience
and the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical,
and engineering sciences to such professional services or creative work
as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, design, and
supervision of construction for the purpose of assuring compliance with
specifications and design, in connection with any public or private
utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes,
works, or projects.
(b) A person shall be construed to practice or offer to practice
engineering, within the meaning and intent of this chapter, who
practices any branch of the profession of engineering; or who, by
verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other
way represents himself or herself to be a professional engineer, or
through the use of some other title implies that he or she is a
professional engineer; or who holds himself or herself out as able to
perform, or who does perform, any engineering service or work or any
other professional service designated by the practitioner or recognized
by educational authorities as engineering.
(c) The practice of engineering does not include the work
ordinarily performed by persons who operate or maintain machinery or
equipment.
(6) "Land surveyor" means a professional land surveyor.
(7) "Professional land surveyor" means a person who, by reason of
his or her special knowledge of the mathematical and physical sciences
and principles and practices of land surveying, which is acquired by
professional education and practical experience, is qualified to
practice land surveying and as attested to by his or her legal
registration as a professional land surveyor.
(8) "Land-surveyor-in-training" means a candidate who: (a) Has
satisfied the experience requirements in RCW 18.43.040 for
registration; (b) successfully passes the examination in the
fundamental land surveying subjects; and (c) is enrolled by the board
as a land-surveyor-in-training.
(9) "Practice of land surveying" means assuming responsible charge
of ((the surveying of land for the establishment of corners, lines,
boundaries, and monuments, the laying out and subdivision of land, the
defining and locating of corners, lines, boundaries, and monuments of
land after they have been established, the survey of land areas for the
purpose of determining the topography thereof, the making of
topographical delineations and the preparing of maps and accurate
records thereof, when the proper performance of such services requires
technical knowledge and skill)) and providing, or offering to provide:
Professional services involving acts of consultation; investigations;
testimony evaluation; planning; preparation of descriptions, reports,
and maps; assembling and interpreting gathered measurements; and
information related to one or more of the following:
(a) Determining the size, shape, or contour of the earth's surface,
any point on the earth, or the relative position of fixed objects on
the earth by means of measuring. Photogrammetric mapping and the
graphical representation of the resulting data performed by
photogrammetrists may not be subject to provisions of this chapter;
(b) Determining the position of any boundary or nonboundary survey
control monument or reference point, and the setting, resetting, or
replacing of any monument or reference point;
(c) Locating, relocating, laying out, or retracing any property
line, right-of-way, or easement;
(d) Locating, relocating, establishing, or laying out any primary
horizontal or vertical control for construction alignment, or any
survey for determining final as-constructed locations;
(e) Making any survey for the subdivision of real property;
(f) Locating, relocating, laying out, or retracing any lines that
restrict the use of real property;
(g) Creating or modifying the descriptions of the limits of real
property interests. The creating or modification by an agency of a
description of existing parcels or interests must comply with the
provisions of RCW 58.24.040; and
(h) Creating, preparing, or modifying documents, maps, electronic
data, or computerized data used in the performance of the activities in
(a) through (g) of this subsection.
(10) "Board" means the state board of registration for professional
engineers and land surveyors, provided for by this chapter.
(11) "Responsible charge" means the practice of engineering or land
surveying performed by the registrant or under the registrant's direct
supervision.
(12) "Survey" means to determine and delineate the form, extent,
and position of objects and legal boundaries by taking linear and
angular measurements of the earth's surface and applying the principles
of geometry and trigonometry.
(13) "Surveying" means the practice of land surveying as defined in
this section.
(14) "Photogrammetric mapping" means evaluating and measuring land
that is limited to the determination of the topography, area, contours,
and location of planimetric features, by using photogrammetric methods
or a similar remote sensing mapping process.
(15) "Photogrammetrist" means a person who is certified by a
national organization of photogrammetry and remote sensing approved by
the board.
(16) "State agency" means any department, agency, commission,
bureau, office, or any other entity or authority of the state
government.
(17) "Local agency" means any city and any town, county, special
district, municipal corporation, agency, port district or authority, or
political subdivision of any type, or any other entity or authority of
local government in corporate form or otherwise.
(18) "Special district" means a local unit of government, other
than a city, town, or county, authorized by law to perform a single
function or a limited number of functions, including, but not limited
to, water-sewer districts, irrigation districts, fire districts, school
districts, community college districts, hospital districts,
transportation districts, and metropolitan municipal corporations
organized under chapter 35.58 RCW.
(19) "Agency" means state and local agencies and special districts
as defined in this section.
(20) "Significant structures" include:
(a) Hazardous facilities, defined as: Structures housing,
supporting, or containing sufficient quantities of explosive substances
to be of danger to the safety of the public if released;
(b) Essential facilities that have a ground area of more than five
thousand square feet and are more than twenty feet in mean roof height
above average ground level. Essential facilities are defined as:
(i) Hospitals and other medical facilities having surgery and
emergency treatment areas;
(ii) Fire and police stations;
(iii) Tanks or other structures containing, housing, or supporting
water or fire suppression material or equipment required for the
protection of essential or hazardous facilities or special occupancy
structures;
(iv) Emergency vehicle shelters and garages;
(v) Structures and equipment in emergency preparedness centers;
(vi) Standby power-generating equipment for essential facilities;
(vii) Structures and equipment in government communication centers
and other facilities requiring emergency response;
(viii) Aviation control towers, air traffic control centers, and
emergency aircraft hangars; and
(ix) Buildings and other structures having critical national
defense functions;
(c) Structures exceeding one hundred feet in height above average
ground level;
(d) Buildings that are customarily occupied by human beings and are
five stories or more above average ground level;
(e) Bridges having a total span of more than two hundred feet and
piers having a surface area greater than ten thousand square feet; and
(f) Buildings and other structures where more than three hundred
people congregate in one area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
If professional land surveying judgment is required in the review,
approval, or examination by an agency of survey data, documents
prepared by a person authorized to practice land surveying, or services
performed by a person authorized to practice land surveying, the
review, approval, or examination must be performed by, or under the
direct supervision of, another person authorized to practice land
surveying or as otherwise authorized by state law.

--- END ---