BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Any agency or state or local government
entity that is required by statute to consult with a board or
commission suspended or eliminated by this act shall instead seek
informed opinions from other individuals or groups engaged in similar
activities, as the director or governing body feels is appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 34.05.610 (joint administrative rules review
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.185B
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.185B.020 (affordable housing advisory
board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.20A.685 (council on aging).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 70.94.650 (agricultural burning practices and
research task force).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.108
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28B.108.030 (American Indian endowed
scholarship advisory and selection commission).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.46.015 (arts commission).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.66 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 46.66.010 (auto theft prevention authority).
During the temporary suspension, the powers, duties, and authority of
the auto theft prevention authority shall be assumed by the executive
board of the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
within the current resources of the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 70.195 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 70.195.010 (birth-to-six interagency
coordinating council).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 36.93 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011:
(1) RCW 36.93.040 (boundary review boards); and
(2) RCW 36.93.051.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.34.010 (capitol committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2007 c 354 s 12 (uncodified) (career and technical
education curricula advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.31.504 (child care facility fund
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 26.19.025 (child support guidelines and review
report work group).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 26.19.025 (child support laws, rules, and
practices work group).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 74.13.096 (child welfare advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 74.13.096 (children of color advisory
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 74.13.031(4) (children and family services
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 43.63A
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.63A.068 (children and families with
incarcerated parents).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 44.04.220 (legislative children's oversight
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 43.136
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.136.035 (citizen commission for performance
measurement of tax preferences).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 35.78 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011:
(1) RCW 35.78.020 (city and county design standards); and
(2) RCW 43.32.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 43.32 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011:
(1) RCW 35.78.020 (city and county design standards); and
(2) RCW 43.32.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 19.16 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 19.16.280 (collection agency board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 43.160
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.160.030 (community economic revitalization
board). During the temporary suspension, the powers, duties, and
authority of the community economic revitalization board shall be
assumed by the department of community, trade, and economic development
within the current resources of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 72.78 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 72.78.030 (community transition coordination
networks advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 76.15.080 (community and urban forestry
technical advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 89.08.030 (conservation commission).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 43.101
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.101.310 (correctional training standards
and education board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.20A.725 (deaf and hard of hearing advisory
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.175.075 (drop-out prevention state-level
leadership group).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 43.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.15.060 (legislative committee on economic
development and international relations).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.20A.350 (economic services advisory
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 43.06B
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.06B.010 (education ombudsman appointment
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 44.39 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 44.39.010 (joint committee on energy supply
and energy conservation).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 38.52.530 (enhanced 911 advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.22.420 (factory assembled structures
advisory board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2007 c 357 s 2 (uncodified) (joint legislative
task force on family leave insurance).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 89.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 89.10.020 (farmland preservation task force).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.300.450 (financial literacy public-private
partnership).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 A new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 77.04.013 (fish and wildlife commission).
During the temporary suspension, the powers, duties, and authority of
the fish and wildlife commission shall be assumed by the department of
fish and wildlife within the current resources of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 A new section is added to chapter 77.75 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 77.75.040 (pacific marine fisheries
commission).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 A new section is added to chapter 43.103
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.103.030 (forensic investigations council).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 A new section is added to chapter 43.126
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.126.025 (geographic names board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.31.425 (Hanford area economic investment
fund committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2008 c 311 s 2 (uncodified) (Washington citizens'
work group on health care reform).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 A new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.20.270 (health disparities interagency
coordinating council).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 A new section is added to chapter 70.47A
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 70.47A.100 (health insurance partnership
board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 A new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 48.41.040 (health insurance pool).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 A new section is added to chapter 28B.115
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28B.115.050 (health professional loan
repayment and scholarship advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 51 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 27.34.405 (heritage barn preservation advisory
board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 27.34.250 (historical preservation advisory
council).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 A new section is added to chapter 27.34 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 27.34.020 (historical society board of
trustees).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 54 A new section is added to chapter 79A.30
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 79A.30.030 (horse park authority).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2008 c 189 s 1 (uncodified) (interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children task force).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 79A.25.310 (invasive species council).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.105.810 (K-20 network technical steering
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 44.04.325 (legislative oral history
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 59 A new section is added to chapter 18.225
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 18.225.060 (licensed counselor advisory
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 60 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 77.85.200 (lower Columbia fish recovery
board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 61 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.305.219 (mathematics advisory panel and
science advisory panel).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 62 A new section is added to chapter 1.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 1.40.020 (medal of merit committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 63 A new section is added to chapter 1.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 1.60.020 (state medal of valor committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 64 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.70.056(2) (medicaid school administrative
match advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 65 A new section is added to chapter 48.87 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 48.87.040 (midwives and birthing centers).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 66 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 77.12.690 (migratory waterfowl art committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 67 A new section is added to chapter 77.85 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 77.85.250 (forum on monitoring salmon recovery
and watershed health).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 68 A new section is added to chapter 70.149
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 70.149.040 (oil heat advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 69 A new section is added to chapter 13.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 13.60.120 (missing and exploited children task
force).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 70 A new section is added to chapter 43.147
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: Chapter 43.147 RCW (Pacific Northwest economic
region delegate council and executive committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 71 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28B.10.922 (performance agreement committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 72 A new section is added to chapter 28A.195
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.195.050 (private school advisory
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 73 A new section is added to chapter 48.62 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 48.62.041 (property and liability advisory
board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 74 A new section is added to chapter 2.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 2.70.030 (public defense advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 75 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 42.56.140 (public records exemptions
accountability committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 76 A new section is added to chapter 36.102
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 36.102.040 (public stadium authority advisory
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 77 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 41.04.276 (select committee on pension
policy).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 78 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.70.520 (public health improvement plan
steering committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 79 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2008 c 195 s 2 (uncodified) (recreation on state
trust lands work group).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 80 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.20A.350 (region 3 family to family advisory
group).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 81 A new section is added to chapter 74.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 74.18.070 (rehabilitation council for the
department of services for the blind).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 82 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.600.130 (scholars advisory and selection
committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 83 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.160.195 (school bus equipment and
specifications committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 84 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2007 c 520 s 6016 (joint legislative task force on
school construction funding and study committee on public
infrastructure programs and funding structures).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 85 A new section is added to chapter 28A.525
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.525.025 (school facilities citizen
advisory panel).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 86 A new section is added to chapter 43.210
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.210.020 (small business export finance
assistance center board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 87 A new section is added to chapter 76.13 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 76.13.110(4) (small forest landowner office
advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 88 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 28A.175.075 (state-level leadership group).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 89 A new section is added to chapter 2.53 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 2.53.040 (task force on statewide protocols
for dissolution cases).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 90 A new section is added to chapter 1.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 1.08.001 (statute law committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 91 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2007 c 520 s 6026 (uncodified) (study committee on
public infrastructure programs and funding structures).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 92 A new section is added to chapter 58.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 58.24.020 (survey advisory board).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 93 A new section is added to chapter 43.336
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.336.020 (tourism commission).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 94 A new section is added to chapter 44.55 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 44.55.020 (joint legislative oversight
committee on trade policy).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 95 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2007 c 288 s 2 (uncodified) (joint legislative
task force on underground economy in the construction industry).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 96 A new section is added to chapter 43.56 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 43.56.010 (uniform legislation commission).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 97 A new section is added to chapter 79A.75
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 79A.75.010 (Washington state parks centennial
advisory committee).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 98 A new section is added to chapter 90.86 RCW
to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts are each temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: RCW 90.86.010 (joint legislative committee on
water supply during drought).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 99 The following act is temporarily suspended
until July 1, 2011: 2008 c 329 (legislative work group on the
Washington assessment of student learning).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 100 RCW 77.85.110 (Salmon recovery funding
board -- Creation -- Membership) and 2007 c 241 s 20 & 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 3
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 43.30
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A program for salmon and steelhead recovery is established in
Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis, Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties within the
habitat areas classified as the lower Columbia evolutionarily
significant units by the federal national marine fisheries service.
The department is responsible for developing and overseeing the
implementation of the habitat portion of the salmon and steelhead
recovery plan and is empowered to receive and disburse funds for the
salmon and steelhead recovery initiatives. The department of natural
resources shall be the lead entity responsible for fulfilling the
requirements and exercising powers under this chapter.
(2)(a) The department shall participate in the development of a
habitat recovery plan to implement its responsibilities under (b) of
this subsection. The department shall consider local watershed efforts
and activities as well as habitat conservation plans in the development
and implementation of the recovery plan. Any of the participating
counties may continue its own efforts for restoring steelhead habitat.
Nothing in this section limits the authority of units of local
government to enter into interlocal agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW
or any other provision of law.
(b) The department is responsible for the development of a lower
Columbia salmon and steelhead habitat recovery plan and for
coordinating and monitoring the implementation of the plan. The
department will submit all future plans and amendments to plans to the
governor's salmon recovery office for the incorporation of hatchery,
harvest, and hydropower components of the statewide salmon recovery
strategy for all submissions to the national marine fisheries service.
In developing and implementing the habitat recovery plan, the
department will work with appropriate federal and state agencies,
tribal governments, local governments, and the public to make sure
hatchery, harvest, and hydropower components receive consideration in
context with the habitat component. The department may work in
cooperation with the state and the national marine fisheries service to
modify the plan, or to address habitat for other aquatic species that
may be subsequently listed under the federal endangered species act.
The department may not exercise authority over land or water within the
individual counties or otherwise preempt the authority of any units of
local government.
(c) The department shall prioritize as appropriate and approve
projects and programs related to the recovery of lower Columbia river
salmon and steelhead runs, including the funding of those projects and
programs, and coordinate local government efforts as prescribed in the
recovery plan. The department shall establish criteria for funding
projects and programs based upon their likely value in salmon and
steelhead recovery. The department may consider local economic impact
among the criteria, but jurisdictional boundaries and factors related
to jurisdictional population may not be considered as part of the
criteria.
(d) The department shall assess the factors for decline along each
tributary basin in the lower Columbia. The department is encouraged to
take a stream-by-stream approach in conducting the assessment which
utilizes state and local expertise, including volunteer groups,
interest groups, and affected units of local government.
(3) The department has the authority to hire and fire staff,
including an executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants
and other moneys, disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and
counties about potential code changes and the development of programs
and incentives upon request, pay all necessary expenses, and may choose
a fiduciary agent. The department shall report on its progress on a
biennial basis to the legislative bodies of the five participating
counties and the state natural resources-related agencies. The
department shall prepare a final report at the conclusion of the
program describing its efforts and successes in developing and
implementing the lower Columbia salmon and steelhead recovery plan.
The final report shall be transmitted to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the legislative bodies of the participating counties,
and the state natural resources-related agencies.
(4) The program terminates on July 1, 2010.
(5) For purposes of this section, "evolutionarily significant unit"
means the habitat area identified for an evolutionarily significant
unit of an aquatic species listed or proposed for listing as a
threatened or endangered species under the federal endangered species
act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

Sec. 102 RCW 15.24.050 and 2004 c 178 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the event a position becomes vacant due to resignation,
disqualification, death, or for any other reason, such position shall
be filled for the balance of the unexpired term by appointment by the
director from at least two nominees submitted by the remaining members
of the commission.
A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of all business and the carrying out of the duties of the
commission.
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Employees of
the commission may also be reimbursed for actual travel expenses when
on official commission business. Reimbursement shall be made from the
assessments of the commission, and shall not be made by the department.

Sec. 103 RCW 15.26.100 and 1984 c 287 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Employees of
the commission may also be reimbursed for actual travel expenses when
out of state on official commission business. Compensation and
reimbursement shall be made from the assessments of the commission, and
shall not be made by the department.

Sec. 104 RCW 15.28.090 and 1984 c 287 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses
incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Employees of
the commission may also be reimbursed for actual travel expenses when
out of state on official commission business. Compensation and
reimbursement shall be made from the assessments of the commission, and
shall not be made by the department.

Sec. 105 RCW 15.44.038 and 2002 c 313 s 92 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A majority of the commission members shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of all business and the performance of all duties
of the commission.
(2) Each member shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.230. Each member or employee shall be reimbursed for actual
travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter
as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise, if not defined in
rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed
by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Compensation and reimbursement shall
be made from the assessments of the commission, and shall not be made
by the department.

Sec. 106 RCW 15.65.047 and 2002 c 313 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules necessary to carry out the
director's duties and responsibilities under this chapter including:
(a) The issuance, amendment, or termination of marketing orders or
agreements;
(b) Procedural, technical, or administrative rules which may
address and include, but are not limited to:
(i) The submission of a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a
marketing order or agreement under this chapter;
(ii) Nominations conducted under this chapter;
(iii) Elections of board members or referenda conducted under this
chapter;
(iv) Actions of the director upon a petition to issue, amend, or
terminate a marketing order or agreement;
(c) Rules that provide for a method to fund:
(i) The costs of staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if the position is not
directly funded by the legislature; and
(ii) The actual costs related to the specific activity undertaken
on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission.
The department may not provide staff support or pay any costs or
expenses of any commodity board or commission, including boards and
commissions established in chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.88,
15.89, and 16.67 RCW, in excess of that authorized by RCW 43.23.033.
(2) The director may adopt amendments to marketing agreements or
orders without conducting a referendum if the amendments are adopted
under the following criteria:
(a) The proposed amendments relate only to internal administration
of a marketing order or agreement and are not subject to violation by
a person;
(b) The proposed amendments adopt or incorporate by reference
without material change federal statutes or regulations, Washington
state statutes, or rules of other Washington state agencies, if the
material adopted or incorporated regulates the same activities as are
authorized under the marketing order or agreement;
(c) The proposed amendments only correct typographical errors, make
address or name changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing
the marketing order or agreement; and
(d) The content of the proposed amendments is explicitly and
specifically dictated by statute.
A marketing order or agreement shall not be amended without a
referendum to provide that a majority of the commodity board members be
appointed by the director.

Sec. 107 RCW 15.65.270 and 2002 c 313 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the event of a vacancy in an elected position on the board,
the remaining board members shall select a qualified person to fill the
vacant position for the remainder of the current term or as provided in
the marketing order or agreement.
(2) In the event of a vacancy on the board in a position appointed
by the director, the remaining board members shall recommend to the
director a qualified person for appointment to the vacant position.
The director shall appoint the person recommended by the board unless
the person fails to meet the qualifications of board members under this
chapter and the marketing order or agreement.
(3) A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute
a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of
all duties of the board.
(4) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230. Members and employees of the board may be
reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity board's
marketing order or agreement. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced
in the marketing order or agreement, reimbursement for travel expenses
shall be at the rates allowed state employees in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Compensation and reimbursement shall be made
from the funds of the board or commission, and shall not be made by the
department.

Sec. 108 RCW 15.66.055 and 2002 c 313 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director may adopt rules necessary to carry out the director's
duties and responsibilities under this chapter including:
(1) The issuance, amendment, suspension, or termination of
marketing orders;
(2) Procedural, technical, or administrative rules which may
address and include, but are not limited to:
(a) The submission of a petition to issue, amend, or terminate a
marketing order under this chapter;
(b) Nominations conducted under this chapter;
(c) Elections of commission members or referenda conducted under
this chapter; and
(d) Actions of the director upon a petition to issue, amend, or
terminate a marketing order;
(3) Rules that provide for a method to fund:
(a) The costs of staff support for all commodity boards and
commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if the position is not
directly funded by the legislature; and
(b) The actual costs related to the specific activity undertaken on
behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The department
may not provide staff support or pay any costs or expenses of any
commodity board or commission in excess of that authorized by RCW
43.23.033.

Sec. 109 RCW 15.66.130 and 2002 c 313 s 56 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each commodity commission shall hold such regular meetings as the
marketing order may prescribe or that the commission by resolution may
prescribe, together with such special meetings that may be called in
accordance with provisions of its resolutions upon reasonable notice to
all members thereof. A majority of the voting members shall constitute
a quorum for the transaction of all business of the commission.
Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.230. Members and employees of the commission may be
reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter, as defined under the commodity commission's
marketing order. Otherwise, if not defined or referenced in the
marketing order, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Compensation and
reimbursement shall be made from the funds of the board or commission,
and shall not be made by the department.

Sec. 110 RCW 15.74.030 and 1991 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power to elect a chair and such
officers as the commission deems necessary and advisable. The
commission shall elect a treasurer who shall be responsible for all
receipts and disbursements by the commission. The treasurer's faithful
discharge of duties shall be guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense
of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for its
governance, which shall provide for the holding of an annual meeting
for the election of officers and the transaction of other business and
for such other meetings as the commission may direct. The commission
shall do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of this
chapter. The commission shall have no legislative power. The
commission may employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents,
attorneys, and other employees or staff, and may engage the services of
independent contractors, prescribe their duties, and fix their
compensation. Each member of the board shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses at the rates allowed state employees in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Compensation and reimbursement shall be made
from the assessments of the commission, and shall not be made by the
department.

Sec. 111 RCW 15.76.170 and 1984 c 287 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a fairs commission to consist of the
director of agriculture as ex officio member and chairman, and seven
members appointed by the director to be persons who are interested in
fair activities; at least three of whom shall be from the east side of
the Cascades and three from the west side of the Cascades and one
member at large. The first appointment shall be: Three for a one year
term, two for a two year term, and two for a three year term, and
thereafter the appointments shall be for three year terms.
Appointed members of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 payable on
proper vouchers submitted to and approved by the director, and payable
from that portion of the state fair fund set aside for administrative
costs under this chapter. The commission shall meet at the call of the
chairman, but at least annually. It shall be the duty of the
commission to act as an advisory committee to the director, to assist
in the preparation of the merit rating used in determining allocations
to be made to fairs, and to perform such other duties as may be
required by the director from time to time. No compensation or
reimbursement may be made from the effective date of this act until
after July 1, 2011.

Sec. 112 RCW 15.88.050 and 2003 c 396 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint the members of the commission. In
making such appointments, the director shall take into consideration
recommendations made by the growers' association and the wine institute
as the persons recommended for appointment as members of the
commission. In appointing persons to the commission, the director
shall seek to ensure as nearly as possible a balanced representation on
the commission which would reflect the composition of the growers and
wine producers throughout the state as to number of acres cultivated
and amount of wine produced.
(2) The appointment shall be carried out immediately subsequent to
July 1, 1987, and members so appointed as set forth in this chapter
shall serve for the periods set forth for the original members of the
commission under RCW 15.88.040.
(3) In the event a position on the commission becomes vacant due to
resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the
unexpired term of the position shall immediately be filled by
appointment by the director.
(4) Each member or employee of the commission shall be reimbursed
for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of
this chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not
defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the
rates allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Reimbursement shall be
made from the assessments of the commission as provided in RCW
15.88.130, and shall not be made by the department.

Sec. 113 RCW 15.89.070 and 2007 c 211 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Elect a chair and officers. The officers must include a
treasurer who is responsible for all receipts and disbursements by the
commission and the faithful discharge of whose duties shall be
guaranteed by a bond at the sole expense of the commission. The
commission must adopt rules for its own governance that provide for the
holding of an annual meeting for the election of officers and the
transaction of other business and for other meetings the commission may
direct;
(2) Do all things reasonably necessary to effect the purposes of
this chapter. However, the commission has no rule-making power except
as provided in this chapter;
(3) Employ and discharge managers, secretaries, agents, attorneys,
and employees and engage the services of independent contractors;
(4) Retain, as necessary, the services of private legal counsel to
conduct legal actions on behalf of the commission. The retention of a
private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney
general;
(5) Receive donations of beer from producers for promotional
purposes under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and for fund-raising purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Donations of
beer for promotional purposes may only be disseminated without charge;
(6) Engage directly or indirectly in the promotion of Washington
beer, including, without limitation, the acquisition in any lawful
manner and the dissemination without charge of beer. This
dissemination is not deemed a sale for any purpose and the commission
is not deemed a producer, supplier, or manufacturer, or the clerk,
servant, or agent of a producer, supplier, distributor, or
manufacturer. This dissemination without charge shall be for
agricultural development or trade promotion, and not for fund-raising
purposes under subsection (8) of this section. Dissemination for
promotional purposes may include promotional hosting and must in the
good faith judgment of the commission be in the aid of the marketing,
advertising, sale of beer, or of research related to such marketing,
advertising, or sale;
(7) Promote Washington beer by conducting unique beer tastings
without charge;
(8) Beginning July 1, 2007, fund the Washington beer commission
through sponsorship of up to twelve beer festivals annually at which
beer may be sold to festival participants. For this purpose, the
commission would qualify for issue of a special occasion license as an
exception to WAC 314-05-020 but must comply with laws under Title 66
RCW and rules adopted by the liquor control board under which such
events may be conducted;
(9) Participate in international, federal, state, and local
hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production,
regulation, distribution, sale, or use of beer including activities
authorized under RCW 42.17.190, including the reporting of those
activities to the public disclosure commission;
(10) Acquire and transfer personal and real property, establish
offices, incur expenses, and enter into contracts, including contracts
for the creation and printing of promotional literature. The contracts
are not subject to chapter 43.78 RCW, and are cancelable by the
commission unless performed under conditions of employment that
substantially conform to the laws of this state and the rules of the
department of labor and industries. The commission may create debt and
other liabilities that are reasonable for proper discharge of its
duties under this chapter;
(11) Maintain accounts with one or more qualified public
depositories as the commission may direct, for the deposit of money,
and expend money for purposes authorized by this chapter by drafts made
by the commission upon such institutions or by other means;
(12) Cause to be kept and annually closed, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, accurate records of all
receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions, available
for audit by the state auditor;
(13) Create and maintain a list of producers and disseminate
information among and solicit the opinions of producers with respect to
the discharge of the duties of the commission, directly or by
arrangement with trade associations or other instrumentalities;
(14) Employ, designate as an agent, act in concert with, and enter
into contracts with any person, council, commission, or other entity to
promote the general welfare of the beer industry and particularly to
assist in the sale and distribution of Washington beer in domestic and
foreign commerce. The commission shall expend money necessary or
advisable for this purpose and to pay its proportionate share of the
cost of any program providing direct or indirect assistance to the sale
and distribution of Washington beer in domestic or foreign commerce,
employing and paying for vendors of professional services of all kinds;
(15) Sue and be sued as a commission, without individual liability
for acts of the commission within the scope of the powers conferred
upon it by this chapter;
(16) Serve as liaison with the liquor control board on behalf of
the commission and not for any individual producer;
(17) Until July 1, 2009, receive such gifts, grants, and endowments
from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in
trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the
commission and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the
terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments. Reimbursement shall be made
from the assessments of the commission, and shall not be made by the
department.

Sec. 114 RCW 16.67.070 and 2002 c 313 s 81 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In the event a position on the commission becomes vacant due to
resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the
unexpired term of such position shall be filled by the director
forthwith.
(2) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.230.
(3) Each member or employee shall be reimbursed for actual travel
expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter as
defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule,
reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) Compensation and reimbursement shall be made from the
assessments of the commission, and shall not be made by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 The activities of the following boards and
commissions shall be suspended until July 1, 2011:
(1) The joint select committee on beer and wine regulation;
(2) The committee on legislative old timers events; and
(3) The Pacific fisheries legislative task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 By July 1, 2010, the governor shall
recommend to the legislature which of the boards and commissions,
created either by statute or by action of the executive branch, shall
receive state funding, those whose activities shall be suspended, and
those which shall be terminated either by legislative or executive
branch action.

--- END ---