BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The traumatic brain injury grant advisory
board must be dissolved by July 1, 2010. The traumatic brain injury
council shall assume all duties and powers of the traumatic brain
injury grant advisory board necessary to retain any federal grants.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.60A.010 and 2006 c 343 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have
the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Department" means the department of veterans affairs.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of veterans
affairs.
(3) "Committee" means the veterans affairs advisory committee.
(((4) "Board" means the veterans innovations program board.))

Sec. 3 RCW 43.60A.080 and 1995 c 25 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby created a veterans affairs advisory committee
which shall serve in an advisory capacity to the governor and the
director of the department of veterans affairs. The committee shall be
composed of seventeen members to be appointed by the governor, and
shall consist of the following:
(a) One representative of the Washington soldiers' home and colony
at Orting and one representative of the Washington veterans' home at
Retsil. Each home's resident council may nominate up to three
individuals whose names are to be forwarded by the director to the
governor. In making the appointments, the governor shall consider
these recommendations or request additional nominations.
(b) One representative each from the three congressionally
chartered or nationally recognized veterans service organizations as
listed in the current "Directory of Veterans Service Organizations"
published by the United States department of veterans affairs with the
largest number of active members in the state of Washington as
determined by the director. The organizations' state commanders may
each submit a list of three names to be forwarded to the governor by
the director. In making the appointments, the governor shall consider
these recommendations or request additional nominations.
(c) Ten members shall be chosen to represent those congressionally
chartered or nationally recognized veterans service organizations
listed in the directory under (b) of this subsection and having at
least one active chapter within the state of Washington. Up to three
nominations may be forwarded from each organization to the governor by
the director. In making the appointments, the governor shall consider
these recommendations or request additional nominations.
(d) Two members shall be veterans at large. Any individual or
organization may nominate a veteran for an at-large position.
Organizational affiliation shall not be a prerequisite for nomination
or appointment. All nominations for the at-large positions shall be
forwarded by the director to the governor.
(e) No organization shall have more than one official
representative on the committee at any one time.
(f) In making appointments to the committee, care shall be taken to
ensure that members represent all geographical portions of the state
and minority viewpoints, and that the issues and views of concern to
women veterans are represented.
(2) All members shall have terms of four years. In the case of a
vacancy, appointment shall be only for the remainder of the unexpired
term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may serve more than two
consecutive terms, with vacancy appointments to an unexpired term not
considered as a term. Members appointed before June 11, 1992, shall
continue to serve until the expiration of their current terms; and
then, subject to the conditions contained in this section, are eligible
for reappointment.
(3) The committee shall adopt an order of business for conducting
its meetings.
(4) The committee shall have the following powers and duties:
(a) To serve in an advisory capacity to the governor and the
director on matters pertaining to the department of veterans affairs;
(b) To acquaint themselves fully with the operations of the
department and recommend such changes to the governor and the director
as they deem advisable; and
(c) To exercise the powers granted under RCW 43.60A.160 through
43.60A.185 related to the competitive grant program.
(5) Members of the committee shall receive no compensation for the
performance of their duties but shall receive a per diem allowance and
mileage expense according to the provisions of chapter 43.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.60A.170 (Competitive grant program -- Veterans innovations
program board -- Travel expenses) and 2006 c 343 s 5;
(2) RCW 43.131.405 (Veterans innovations program -- Termination) and
2006 c 343 s 10; and
(3) RCW 43.131.406 (Veterans innovations program -- Repeal) and 2006
c 343 s 11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The HIV early intervention program steering
committee must be dissolved by July 1, 2010. The HIV/AIDS education
program review panel must assume all duties and powers of the HIV early
intervention program steering committee necessary to retain any federal
grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The HIV policy collaborative must be
dissolved by July 1, 2010. The HIV/AIDS education program review panel
must assume all duties and powers of the HIV policy collaborative
necessary to retain any federal grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) All documents and papers, equipment, or
other tangible property in the possession of a consolidated or
dissolved entity under this act shall be delivered to the custody of
the entity assuming the responsibilities of the consolidated or
dissolved entity or if such responsibilities have been eliminated,
documents and papers shall be delivered to the state archivist and
equipment or other tangible property to the department of general
administration.
(2) All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the consolidated or
dissolved entity shall revert to the fund from which they were
appropriated, or if that fund is abolished to the general fund.
(3) All contractual rights and duties of an entity shall be
assigned or delegated to the entity assuming the responsibilities of
the consolidated or dissolved entity, or if there is none to such
entity as the governor shall direct.

--- END ---