BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 86.12.037 and 1921 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No action shall be brought or maintained against any county or
countywide flood control zone district alone or when acting jointly
with any other county or countywide flood control zone district under
any law, its or their agents, officers or employees, for any
noncontractual acts or omissions of such county or counties or
countywide flood control zone district, its or their agents, officers,
or employees, relating to the improvement, protection, regulation, and
control for flood prevention and navigation purposes of any river or
its tributaries and the beds, banks, and waters thereof: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this section shall apply to or affect any
action now pending or begun prior to the passage of this section.

--- END ---