BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.380 and 2000 c 84 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that career and technical student
organizations help to prepare students to meet minimum college and
workforce requirements.
(2) Career and technical student organization activities are
integral to career and technical education if they:
(a) Provide instructional strategies used to develop, improve, and
expand occupational competencies that relate to a particular career and
technical subject matter;
(b) Are an extension of the classroom and laboratory instructional
program that enriches and enhances classroom learning; and
(c) Include curriculum-oriented activities to help students to gain
personal and leadership skills that maximize employability and the
ability to become productive citizens in the workforce, home, and
community.
(3) In order to receive state support, student organizations must:
(a) Prepare students for career experiences beyond high school;
(b) Help students develop personal, leadership, technical, and
occupational skills;
(c) Be an integral component of career and technical education
instructional programs; and
(d) Directly help students achieve state learning goals, especially
goals three and four with respect to critical thinking, problem
solving, and decision-making skills.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain support
for statewide coordination for career and technical student
organizations by providing program staff support that is available to
assist in meeting the needs of career and technical student
organizations and their members and students. The superintendent shall
provide at least one full-time equivalent program staff for purposes of
implementing this section. The superintendent may provide additional
support to the organizations through contracting with independent
coordinators.
(((2))) (5) Career and technical student organizations eligible for
technical assistance and other support services under this section are
organizations recognized as career and technical student organizations
by:
(a) The United States department of education; or
(b) The superintendent of public instruction, if such recognition
is recommended by the Washington association for career and technical
education.
(((3))) (6) Career and technical student organizations eligible for
technical assistance and other support services under this section
include, but are not limited to: The national FFA organization;
family, career, and community leaders of America; skillsUSA;
distributive education clubs of America; future business leaders of
America; and the technology student association.

--- END ---