BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state arts commission shall work with interested
citizens and groups to promote the works of Seattle playwright August
Wilson through activities such as performances, readings, workshops,
lectures, and presentations for Washington educational institutions.
(2) To accomplish the goals of this section, the Washington state
arts commission shall make a reasonable effort to seek input and
involvement from the following groups:
(a) People with an intimate knowledge of August Wilson's life and
works;
(b) Local theater groups;
(c) Local humanities and cultural heritage groups;
(d) Local colleges and universities;
(e) The city of Seattle; and
(f) King county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the gifts and grants generally accepted under
RCW 43.46.060, the arts commission may accept gifts, grants, and
economic stimulus funds specifically for the purpose of accomplishing
the goals of section 1 of this act.
(2) Promoting the works of August Wilson is deemed a proper use of
funds obtained under RCW 43.46.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010, from the general fund to the Washington state arts
commission for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---