BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the northwest
weather and avalanche center provides valuable avalanche forecasting
and education services, provides valuable information to the public,
and reduces the impacts of adverse mountain weather and avalanches on
recreation, industry, and transportation in Washington state.
The northwest weather and avalanche center is cooperatively funded
by a number of public and private entities. In recent years, however,
several budget crises have threatened to shut down the avalanche
center, posing risks to recreation safety, tourism, and freight and
passenger mobility.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure, in
continued cooperation with the federal government, appropriate states,
and private sources, that the northwest weather and avalanche center
receive the resources necessary to continue providing weather and
avalanche forecasts for the benefit of Washington state. It is also
the intent of the legislature that any resources provided to the center
through this act be in addition to, and not supplant, current support
from the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the registration fees collected under RCW
46.10.040, the department shall collect a northwest weather and
avalanche center surcharge of two dollars. The revenue generated from
the surcharge must be deposited in the northwest weather and avalanche
center account established in section 4 of this act to be used solely
to support the operation of the northwest weather and avalanche center.
(2) This section applies to registrations due or to become due on
or after October 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) In addition to the fees collected for
winter recreation area parking permits authorized under RCW 79A.05.230,
the commission shall collect a northwest weather and avalanche center
surcharge of two dollars. The revenue generated from the surcharge
must be deposited in the northwest weather and avalanche center account
established in section 4 of this act to be used solely to support the
operation of the northwest weather and avalanche center.
(2) This section applies to winter recreation area parking permits
purchased on or after October 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The northwest weather and avalanche center
account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the
northwest weather and avalanche center surcharges collected under
sections 2 and 3 of this act must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to support the operation
of the northwest weather and avalanche center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The commission shall collaborate with
appropriate public and private entities to seek sustainable and
cooperative funding for the northwest weather and avalanche center,
with equitable contributions from the federal government, appropriate
states, and private sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 79A.05 RCW.

--- END ---