BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
ocean waters serve as a potential source for ocean renewable energy,
including wave, tidal, and offshore wind energy, and rural economic
development. There is compelling evidence that ocean renewable energy
resources can provide a strategically significant and domestically
produced power supply for the state. The legislature declares that the
state has a significant interest in whether and how the renewable
energy potential of its ocean waters, as well as those waters beyond
three miles of its coastline, are developed. Therefore, the
legislature intends to direct a review of the state's ocean renewable
energy resources and development potential, and an analysis of the
costs, benefits, and significant issues associated with its
development, to help the state address current and future project
proposals in an informed and coordinated manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development's energy policy office shall:
(a) Determine the potential size of the ocean renewable energy
resource in the state and federal waters off Washington's coast based
on existing technology or technology likely to be available within five
years, including analysis of potential limiting factors such as
transmission capacity and protection of traditional uses;
(b) Determine the potential economic impact that ocean renewable
energy development in the state and federal waters off Washington's
coast could have, including analysis under a range of future energy
scenarios, a range of potential project numbers and sizes, and short
and long-term scenarios under which energy generation technologies and
infrastructure are either imported into or manufactured in Washington;
(c) In conjunction with the department of ecology and other
appropriate organizations, analyze the potential environmental,
navigation, and fisheries issues and conflicts raised by ocean
renewable energy development in the state and federal waters off
Washington's coast, including analysis of permitting and site selection
processes, and make recommendations on steps the state can take to
address such issues and conflicts; and
(d) Identify the opportunities for and issues involved in
initiating demonstration projects regarding ocean renewable energy
generation and provide recommendations for developing demonstration
projects from the most promising sources.
(2) In carrying out this section, the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall coordinate with appropriate
public and private entities and individuals and may contract with
persons not employed by the state.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide a report including its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
by September 1, 2010.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "ocean renewable
energy" means wave, tidal, and offshore wind resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of two hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the energy freedom account to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act expires December 31, 2010.

--- END ---