BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that more than half of
the state's forty-two and one-half million acres are forest lands and
that the majority of these lands are available for harvest. However,
many of the state's forest lands are threatened by conversion to
nonforest uses, mostly from commercial and residential development. In
addition, worldwide fiber commodity prices, increased environmental
regulations, forest health issues, and changing patterns in corporate
and individual ownership of forest lands are also contributing to the
declines in forest lands in the state. Therefore, it is the intent of
this chapter and this act to provide greater state financial assistance
to maintain Washington's working forest land base through the creation
of a funding board to make grants and loans on a competitive basis that
support protection of working forest land and that assist in developing
innovative strategies for supporting economically and environmentally
healthy forests and forest-dependent communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the timber recovery fund board created in section
3 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(3) "Local government" means any county, city, town, port district,
or special purpose district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The timber recovery fund board is
created. The board is composed of five members, of whom two members
must be appointed by the governor. The commissioner of public lands,
or the commissioner's designee, shall serve ex officio as a voting
member of the board. The deans of the University of Washington college
of forest resources and the Washington State University college of
agriculture, human and natural resource sciences, or their designees,
shall serve as members of the board. In making appointments to the
board, the governor shall ensure that one member each representing the
interests of forest landowners and conservation interests are board
members at all times. The governor shall solicit and give substantial
consideration to nominations provided by organizations representing
these interests. Appointments to the board by the governor are subject
to senate confirmation.
(2) The board shall select a chair from among the members of the
board.
(3) Board members serve four-year terms, except that the governor
shall designate one of the initial appointments to serve for a term of
two years. The terms commence January 1, 2010.
(4) Staff support to the board must be provided by the department.
For administrative purposes, the board shall be located within the
department.
(5) Members of the board shall be compensated as provided by RCW
43.03.250, and reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board is responsible for allocating
grants and loans for the protection of working forest lands to projects
and activities that include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) Projects and activities that will sustain the working forest
land base and strengthen the connection between economic health and
conservation of forests in Washington, such as forest health, providing
carbon sequestration, production of wood-based biomass energy,
protection of forest ecosystems, benefits for habitats, biodiversity,
and watershed functions;
(2) Projects and activities that preserve forest lands over the
long term for working forestry and resist forest land conversion, such
as land exchanges and transfer of development rights programs; and
(3) Projects and activities for planning, research, and policy
development related to maintaining working forests as well as for
long-term sustainable supplies of timber products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board shall establish procedures and
criteria consistent with section 4 of this act for making grants and
loans for the protection of working forest lands. To accomplish this
purpose, the board may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures
and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
grant recipients, and with other public and private parties as the
board deems necessary, consistent with the purposes of this chapter;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter; and
(e) Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(2) The department shall provide all necessary grant and loan
administration assistance to the board and shall distribute and account
for funds appropriated or provided to the board for the purposes of
this chapter.
(3) The board shall adopt guidelines for the amount of nonstate
resources that must be committed for grants from the categories
established by the board. The amount may not be less than ten percent
of the amount of the grant or the loan from the board.
(4) The board shall adopt guidelines that limit the amount of a
grant or loan that may be allocated to those administrative or other
expenses of a grant or loan recipient not directly applied to
maintaining Washington's working forest land base.
(5) In order to fund as many projects and activities as possible,
the board shall establish goals to encourage loan applications and to
maximize the amount of funds awarded in the form of low-interest loans.
Only local governments are eligible for low-interest loans awarded by
the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The timber recovery fund board account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Any funds appropriated
by the legislature for distribution by the board, repayments of
principal and interest on loans extended by the board, or other public
or private funds provided for distribution by the board must be placed
in the account. Only the board may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
Moneys in the account may only be used by the board to make grants and
loans under sections 4 and 5 of this act, and may not be used for the
administrative expenses of the board.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition
propensity account, ((and)) the reading achievement account, and the
timber recovery fund board account. However, the earnings to be
distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The institute of forest resources shall establish and maintain a
forest land database that may include, but is not limited to, forest
and forest characteristics, parcel level information, ownership,
streams, roads, wetlands, and geological features.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The code reviser is directed to alphabetize
the accounts listed in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(b) by their common name.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 76 RCW.

--- END ---