BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A budget is hereby adopted and, subject
to the provisions set forth in the following sections, the several
amounts specified in parts I through IX of this act, or so much thereof
as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are
hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries, wages,
and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for
other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1,
2009, and ending June 30, 2011, except as otherwise provided, out of
the several funds of the state hereinafter named.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this act.
(a) "Fiscal year 2010" or "FY 2010" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2010.
(b) "Fiscal year 2011" or "FY 2011" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2011.
(c) "FTE" means full time equivalent.
(d) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(e) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose which is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,497,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,928,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,257,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,414,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,671,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW
COMMITTEE
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,811,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for
projects included on the committee's 2009-11 work plan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall conduct a review of the effect of risk management practices on
tort payouts. This review shall include an analysis of the state's
laws, policies, procedures, and practices as they relate to the conduct
of post-incident reviews and the impact of such reviews on the state's
conduct and liability.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall conduct a review of the state's workplace safety and health
program. The review shall examine workplace safety inspection,
enforcement, training, and outreach efforts compared to other states
and federal programs; analyze workplace injury and illness rates and
trends in Washington; identify factors that may influence workplace
safety and health; and identify practices that may improve workplace
safety and health and/or impact insurance costs.
(4) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall prepare an evaluation of the implementation of legislation
designed to improve communication, collaboration, and expedited
medicaid attainment with regard to persons released from confinement
who have mental health or chemical dependency disorders. The review
shall evaluate the implementation of: (a) Chapter 166, Laws of 2004
(E2SSB 6358); (b) sections 507 and 508 of chapter 504, Laws of 2005
(E2SSB 5763); (c) sections 12 and 13 of chapter 503, Laws of 2005
(E2SHB 1290); and (d) section 8 of chapter 359, Laws of 2007 (2SHB
1088). The departments of corrections and social and health services,
the administrative office of the courts, institutions for mental
disease, city and county jails, city and county courts, county clerks,
and mental health and chemical dependency treatment providers shall
provide the committee with information necessary for the study.
(5) Within the amount appropriated in this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of the
state's recreational boating programs. This review shall include
examination of the following:
(a) Revenue sources for state recreational boating programs;
(b) Expenditures for state boating programs;
(c) Methods of administrating state recreational boating programs,
including the roles of both state and local government entities; and
(d) Approaches other states have taken to funding and administering
their recreational boating programs.
The committee shall complete the review by October 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,728,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,731,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $25,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the continued study of local
government liabilities for postretirement medical benefits for members
of plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system.
(2) $20,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely to assist the University of Washington
medical center and Harborview medical center with the financial
reporting of their postretirement benefits liabilities.
(3) $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the office of the state actuary to
conduct an independent assessment of alternatives for assuring the
long-term financial solvency of the guaranteed education tuition
program including suspension of the program. In conducting this
review, the office may contract for assistance, and shall consult with
the higher education coordinating board, the operating budget
committees of the legislature, the office of financial management, and
the state's public colleges and universities. The office shall report
findings, an assessment of the major alternatives, and suggested
actions to the governor and to the relevant legislative committees by
November 15, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,577,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,519,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,096,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,674,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,082,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,756,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 FOR THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $630,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES. In order to achieve
operating efficiencies within the financial resources available to the
legislative branch, the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives and the facilities and operations committee of the
senate by joint action may transfer funds among the house of
representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and review committee,
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
legislative transportation committee, office of the state actuary,
joint legislative systems committee, and statute law committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,221,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,240,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,461,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,791,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,785,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,576,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,485,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,543,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,028,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 FOR THE COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,076,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,124,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,935,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,698,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,321,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,954,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public
instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection.
Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the
number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school
districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW
28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the
performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW
28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $8,253,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

Sec. 115 2009 c 4 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,517,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,965,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those state government
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest
extent possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the
least impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 FOR THE OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,127,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,125,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,252,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) An amount not to exceed $40,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and an amount not to exceed $40,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 may be
used to provide telephonic legal advice and assistance to otherwise
eligible persons who are sixty years of age or older on matters
authorized by RCW 2.53.030(2) (a) through (k) regardless of household
income or asset level.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,270,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $782,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $798,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,670,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,273,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,262,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,446,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,561,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,158,000
Archives and Records Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,911,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $765,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,833,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,730,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,404,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,101,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,897,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,076,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2009-2011 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) The appropriations in this section are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6122 (election
costs).
(4) The secretary of state shall not reduce the services provided
by the talking book and Braille library below the service level
provided in fiscal year 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 121 FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $405,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
personnel on providing the government-to-government training sessions
for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees. The
training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of personnel shall be
responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the training,
including the billing and collection of the fees for the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC
AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $164,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 123 FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $733,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,480,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,951,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $752,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $762,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for staff and related costs to
verify the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for
state funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 125 FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES
FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 126 FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,989,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,294,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,026,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,356,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $223,974,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $241,909,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) $82,000 of the fiscal year 2010 general fund--state
appropriation and $82,000 of the fiscal year 2011 general fund--state
appropriation are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5850 (human trafficking violations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 127 FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $790,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,583,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 128 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,818,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,550,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $428,903,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,714,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,461,000
Tourism Development and Promotion Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,002,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $439,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,340,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,726,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,900,000
Independent Youth Housing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,166,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,389,000
Manufacturing Innovation and Modernization
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
Community and Economic Development Fee
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,849,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,776,000
Manufactured Housing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000
Energy Recovery Act Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $653,641,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,520,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,521,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington
technology center for work essential to the mission of the Washington
technology center and conducted in partnership with universities.
(2) Repayments of outstanding loans granted under RCW 43.63A.600,
the mortgage and rental assistance program, shall be remitted to the
department, including any current revolving account balances. The
department shall collect payments on outstanding loans, and deposit
them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed under the
program shall be remitted to the department according to the terms
included in the original loan agreements.
(3) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement section 2(7) of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1959 (land use and transportation
planning for marine container ports). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $45,000 of the building code council account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5895 (residential real property). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $102,000 of the building code council account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of sections 3
and 7 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5854 (building
efficiency). If sections 3 and 7 of the bill are not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6)(a) $49,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for grants for low income weatherization, consistent
with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 6861 et seq.
(b) $10,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for training and technical assistance associated with low
income weatherization programs. Subject to federal requirements, the
department shall provide: (i) $4,000,000 to the state board for
community and technical colleges to provide workforce training related
to weatherization and energy efficiency; (ii) $3,000,000 to the
Bellingham opportunity council to provide workforce training related to
energy efficiency and weatherization; and (iii) $3,500,000 to
community-based organizations and to community action agencies
consistent with the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2009
(Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2227).
(c) $6,787,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the state energy program, including not less than
$5,000,000 to provide credit enhancements consistent with the
provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5649).
(d) The department shall provide: $14,500,000 to the Washington
State University for the purpose of making grants for pilot projects
providing community-wide urban, residential, and commercial energy
efficiency upgrades consistent with the provisions of chapter . . .,
Laws of 2009 (Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5649);
$500,000 to Washington State University to conduct farm energy
assessments. In contracting with the Washington State University for
the provision of these services, the total administration of Washington
State University and the department shall not exceed 3 percent of the
amounts provided.
(e) $38,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided for deposit in the energy recovery act account to establish a
revolving loan program, consistent with the provisions of chapter . .
., Laws of 2009 (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2289). The
department must consult with the clean energy leadership council prior
to awarding funds from this account. The utilization of these funds
shall be consistent with the recommendations of the clean energy
leadership council created by chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5921).
(f) $10,646,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided pursuant to the energy efficiency and conservation block grant
under the American reinvestment and recovery act. The department may
use up to $3,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection to
provide technical assistance for energy programs administered by the
agency under the American reinvestment and recovery act.
(7) $28,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5560 (state agency climate leadership). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5138 (integrated climate
change response). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) Associate development organizations receiving funding through
the appropriations in this section shall work with the community and
technical colleges to better align workforce and economic development
programs within industry clusters identified by the associate
development associations as necessary to deploy funds in response to
high-demand fields and consistent with Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5809 (revising unemployment compensation and workforce
training provisions). The workforce programs should be consistent with
industry clusters identified by the associate development organization
and approved by a private industry partner within the industry cluster.
(10) $22,400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for the justice assistance grant program and is
contingent upon the department transferring $6,400,000 to the
department of corrections for security threat mitigation and $1,700,000
to the Washington state patrol for law enforcement activities. The
remaining funds shall be distributed by the department to local
jurisdictions.
(11) $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to KCTS public
television to support Spanish language programming and the V-me Spanish
language channel.
(12) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(13) $142,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5840 (energy independence). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(14) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6015 (commercialization of technology). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(15) By June 30, 2011, the department shall request information
from jurisdictions that are required to review and if necessary revise
their comprehensive plans by December 1, 2011, in accordance with RCW
36.70A.130, that describes what, or if the jurisdictions have adopted
or are in the process of adopting, that help achieve the greenhouse gas
emission reductions established in RCW 70.235.020.
(16) During the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the department shall allot
all of its appropriations subject to allotment by object, account, and
expenditure authority code to conform with the office of financial
management's definition of an option 2 allotment. For those funds
subject to allotment but not appropriation, the agency shall submit
option 2 allotments to the office of financial management.
(17) A county receiving funds pursuant to RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179,
and 36.22.1791, shall, within that funding:
(a) Beginning July 1, 2009, include a life-cycle cost analysis
program as one of the criteria in deciding which proposals to award
funds. "Life-cycle cost analysis" means an analysis of the total
discounted dollar cost of owning, operating, maintaining, and disposing
of a building or building system to compare the cost of capital
developments to vouchers, and to compare the cost of two or more
competing development proposals.
(b) By September 30, 2009, and September 30, 2010, submit to the
department of community, trade, and economic development a report
describing the distribution of the funds. The report shall include:
(i) A description of the process used by the county for allocating
funds;
(ii) The use of funds including, but not limited to, housing
vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(iii) The criteria used for making funding allocation decisions.
(c) By December 1st of each year, the department of community,
trade, and economic development shall prepare a report to the
legislature and the office of financial management compiling the
reports submitted under (b) of this subsection. For the funds
collected under RCW 36.22.178, 36.22.179, and 36.22.1791, and allocated
by the department to entities other than counties, this report must
also include:
(i) A description of the process used by the department for
allocating funds;
(ii) The use of funds including, but not limited to, housing
vouchers, program services, and housing projects; and
(iii) The criteria used for making funding allocation decisions.
(18) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the state's
participation in the Pacific Northwest economic region.
(19) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a contract with the University
of Washington college of forest resources' center for international
trade in forest products.
(20) The Washington state economic development commission shall
review existing state infrastructure programs which are focused on
economic development and provide analysis, findings, and
recommendations to the legislature and governor on preferred policy
priorities and funding options for existing programs and possible
revised or new programs to best ensure successful state economic
efforts which are: (a) Aligned with the state's comprehensive plan for
economic development; (b) responding to emerging economic conditions
and opportunities; (c) improving local capacity; (d) maximizing results
through partnerships and leveraging private capital; and (e) providing
accountability to the public, the executive branch, and the legislative
branch. The commission shall submit its report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 129 FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $801,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 130 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,982,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,066,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,610,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,272,000
State Auditing Services Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $68,935,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health partnership plan).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $542,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $542,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6048 (state's education system). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the accounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(3) The office of financial management shall conduct a study on
alternatives for consolidating or transferring activities and
responsibilities of the state lottery commission, state horse racing
commission, state liquor control board, and the state gambling
commission to achieve cost savings and regulatory efficiencies. In
conducting the study, the office of financial management shall consult
with the legislative fiscal committees. Further, the office of
financial management shall establish an advisory group to include, but
not be limited to, representatives of affected businesses, state
agencies or entities, local governments, and stakeholder groups. The
office of financial management shall submit a final report to the
governor and the legislative fiscal committees by November 15, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 131 FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,908,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,389,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,722,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,189,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The department shall coordinate with the
governor's office of Indian affairs on providing the government-to-government training sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal
government employees. The training sessions shall cover tribal
historical perspectives, legal issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal
governments. Costs of the training sessions shall be recouped through
a fee charged to the participants of each session. The department
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 133 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,059,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $189,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $371,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 135 FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $171,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $172,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $343,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,293,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $148,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5303 (transferring
members of retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $12,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5542 or House Bill
No. 1678 (minimum disability benefits). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $45,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1445 (Washington state patrol retirement system domestic
partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $56,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill
No. 1548 (military service credit purchases). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) $35,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
House Bill No. 1953 (department of fish and wildlife enforcement
officers' past service credit). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,421,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,731,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,969,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter
Control -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
Real Estate Excise Tax Grant Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,050,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,411,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5368 (annual property revaluation). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $5,453,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,242,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the implementation of revenue enhancement
strategies. The strategies must include increased out-of-state
auditing and compliance, the purchase of third party data sources for
enhanced audit selection, and increased traditional auditing and
compliance efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 138 FOR THE STATE INVESTMENT BOARD
State Investment Board Expense Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,997,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,471,000 of the state investment board expense account--state
appropriation is provided solely for development of a risk management
information system, with the intent that further expenditures for this
project be made only by appropriation.
(2) The state investment board shall include funding for any future
salary increases authorized under RCW 43.33A.100 in the agency's budget
request submitted in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW in advance of
granting related salary increases. The biennial salary survey required
under RCW 43.33A.100 shall also be provided to the office of financial
management and to the fiscal committees of the legislature as part of
the state investment board's biennial budget submittal, and shall
include the total amount of compensation increases proposed, as well as
recommended salary ranges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 139 FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,418,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,417,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 140 FOR THE MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL
County Research Services Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000
City and Town Research Services -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,515,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 141 FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S
BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,669,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $817,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,661,000
General Administration Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,021,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,312,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $28,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $28,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
purposes of section 8 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
5854 (built environment pollution). If section 8 of the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 143 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,106,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,105,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,502,000
Data Processing Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,905,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,618,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $800,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the purposes of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1701 (high-speed internet), including expenditure for deposit
to the community technology opportunity account. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) The department shall implement some or all of the following
strategies to achieve savings on information technology expenditures
through: (a) Holistic virtualization strategies; (b) wide-area network
optimization strategies; (c) replacement of traditional telephone
communications systems with alternatives; and (d) migration of external
voice mail systems to internal voice mail systems coordinated by the
department. The department shall consult with a systems integration
firm in order to assess the potential reduction in information
technology expenditures that can be achieved through the strategies
identified in this subsection. No later than July 1, 2010, the
department shall report its findings to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,952,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,572,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,524,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $410,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5480 (discount health plans). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $598,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5195 (life settlements model act). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $551,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5346 (health care administration simplification). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 145 FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,045,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 146 FOR THE FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation
account appropriation is provided solely for providing financial
assistance to local jurisdictions in multiple death investigations.
The forensic investigation council shall develop criteria for awarding
these funds for multiple death investigations involving an
unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those involving
multiple jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 147 FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,137,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the commission
is authorized to increase licensing fees during the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium as necessary to support the appropriation in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 148 FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,817,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $202,097,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,914,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,306,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to open five new state
stores.
(2) $40,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the liquor control board to open ten new contract
stores.
(3) $3,059,000 of the liquor revolving account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the liquor control board to increase state and
local revenues from new retail strategies including opening nine state
stores on Sunday, opening state liquor stores on seven holidays,
opening six mall locations during the holiday season, and increasing
lottery sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 FOR THE BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS
Volunteer Firefighters' and Reserve Officers'
Administrative Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,031,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 150 FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION
Public Service Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,652,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,221,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,554,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,427,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 151 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,297,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,311,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,422,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,624,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,243,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,263,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Military Department Active State Service Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $856,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $331,322,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,243,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $91,263,000 of the disaster response account -- federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the disaster response account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2009-2011 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(2) $144,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- state
appropriation and $856,000 of the Nisqually earthquake account -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for response and recovery costs
associated with the February 28, 2001, earthquake. The military
department shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing earthquake
recovery costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual
expenditures; (d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and
(e) estimates of future payments by biennium. This information shall
be displayed by fund, by type of assistance, and by amount paid on
behalf of state agencies or local organizations. The military
department shall also submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
information on the Nisqually earthquake account, including: (a) The
amount and type of deposits into the account; (b) the current available
fund balance as of the reporting date; and (c) the projected fund
balance at the end of the 2009-2011 biennium based on current revenue
and expenditure patterns.
(3) $85,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee;
(b) The department shall submit a quarterly report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; incremental changes from the
previous estimate, planned and actual homeland security expenditures by
the state and local governments with this federal funding; and matching
or accompanying state or local expenditures; and
(c) The department shall submit a report by December 1st of each
year to the office of financial management and the legislative fiscal
committees detailing homeland security revenues and expenditures for
the previous fiscal year by county and legislative district.
(4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the military department to
contract with the Washington information network 2-1-1 to operate a
statewide 2-1-1 system. The department shall provide the entire amount
for 2-1-1 and shall use any of the funds for administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,115,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,494,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,401,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,668,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,463,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 154 FOR THE GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,418,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,844,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 155 FOR THE STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,127,000
State Convention and Trade Center Operating
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,995,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $117,122,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in this act to the department of
social and health services shall initially be allotted as required by
this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not include
transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other
than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act.
(4) The department is authorized to develop an integrated health
care program designed to slow the progression of illness and disability
and better manage medicaid expenditures for the aged and disabled
population. Under this Washington medicaid integration partnership
(WMIP), the department may combine and transfer such medicaid funds
appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 209 of this act as may
be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP program
enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county, during the
2009-2011 biennium. The amount of funding assigned to the pilot
projects from each program may not exceed the average per capita cost
assumed in this act for individuals covered by that program,
actuarially adjusted for the health condition of persons enrolled in
the pilot project, times the number of clients enrolled in the pilot
project. In implementing the WMIP pilot projects, the department may:
(a) Withhold from calculations of "available resources" as set forth in
RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated rate for individuals
enrolled in the pilots; and (b) employ capitation financing and risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The department shall conduct an evaluation of the WMIP, measuring
changes in participant health outcomes, changes in patterns of service
utilization, participant satisfaction, participant access to services,
and the state fiscal impact.
(5) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2010, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2010 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,813,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,684,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,604,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Home Security Fund Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,789,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,145,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,147,435,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the category of services
titled "intensive family preservation services."
(2) $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $993,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care facility. The facility shall provide
residential care for up to seventeen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three
months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current
foster and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The
department shall not require case management as a condition of the
contract.
(3) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2008, $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2009, and $322,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the
training, consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster,
and adoptive parents of children through age three in need of special
care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers, except that each
program may serve up to three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting nonfacility-based programs, preference
shall be given to programs whose federal or private funding sources
have expired or that have successfully performed under the existing
pediatric interim care program.
(4) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secure crisis residential
centers. Within appropriated amounts, the department shall collaborate
with providers to maintain no less than forty-five beds that are
geographically representative of the state. The department shall
examine current secure crisis residential staffing requirements,
flexible payment options, center specific waivers, and other
appropriate methods to accomplish this outcome.
(5) A maximum of $77,817,000 of the general fund--state
appropriations and $57,563,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriations for the 2009-11 biennium may be expended for behavioral
rehabilitative services. The department shall work with behavioral
rehabilitative service providers to decrease the length of stay through
improved emotional, behavioral, or medical outcomes for children in
behavioral rehabilitative services in order to achieve the appropriated
levels.
(a) The department shall work to not reduce entry rates into
behavioral rehabilitative services and achieve a maximum caseload ten
percent below fiscal year 2009 levels adjusted for changes in total
foster care caseloads. Contracted providers shall act in good faith
and accept the hardest to place children, to the greatest extent
possible, in order to improve their emotional, behavioral, or medical
conditions.
(b) The department and the contracted provider shall mutually agree
and establish an exit date for when the child is to exit the behavioral
rehabilitative service provider. The department and the contracted
provider should mutually agree, to the greatest extent possible, on a
viable placement for the child to go to once the child's treatment
process has been completed. The child shall exit only when the
emotional, behavioral, or medical condition has improved or if the
provider has not shown progress toward the outcomes specified in the
signed contract at the time of exit. This subsection (b) does not
prevent or eliminate the department's responsibility for removing the
child from the provider if the child's emotional, behavioral, or
medical condition worsens or is threatened.
(c) The department is encouraged to use performance-based contracts
with incentives directly tied to outcomes described in this section.
The contracts should incentivize contracted providers to accept the
hardest to place children and incentivize improvement in children's
emotional, mental, and medical well-being within the established exit
date. The department is further encouraged to increase the use of
behavioral rehabilitative service group homes and other means to
control expenditures.
(d) The total foster care per capita amount shall not increase more
than four percent in the 2009-11 biennium and shall not include
behavioral rehabilitative service.
(6) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(7) Within amounts appropriated in this section, priority shall be
given to proven intervention models, including evidence-based
prevention and early intervention programs identified by the Washington
state institute for public policy and the department. The department
shall include information on the number, type, and outcomes of the
evidence-based programs being implemented in its reports on child
welfare reform efforts.
(8) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $32,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of chapter 465, Laws of 2007
(child welfare).
(9) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for continuum of care services.
$100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners and $25,000 of
this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2010.
$100,000 of this amount is for Casey family partners and $25,000 of
this amount is for volunteers of America crosswalk in fiscal year 2011.
(10) $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $616,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $368,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to contract with medical professionals for
comprehensive safety assessments of high-risk families. The safety
assessments will use validated assessment tools to guide intervention
decisions through the identification of additional safety and risk
factors. $800,000 of this amount is for comprehensive safety
assessments for families receiving in-home child protective services or
family voluntary services. $800,000 of this amount is for
comprehensive safety assessments of families with an infant age birth
to fifteen days where the infant was, at birth, diagnosed as substance
exposed and the department received an intake referral related to the
infant due to the substance exposure.
(11) $7,970,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $7,711,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $5,177,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for court-ordered supervised visits
between parents and dependent children. The department shall work
collaboratively with the juvenile dependency courts to stay within
appropriations without impeding reunification outcomes between parents
and dependent children. The department shall report to the legislative
fiscal committees quarterly, the number of children in foster care who
receive supervised visits, their frequency, length of time of each
visit, and whether reunification is attained.
(12) $1,789,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for street youth program services.
(13) The appropriations in this section reflect a one percent
decrease in all vendor rate payments. To achieve these savings, the
department shall implement a one-half percent vendor rate reduction for
fiscal year 2010 and a one-half percent vendor rate reduction for
fiscal year 2011 to achieve a total vendor rate reduction of one
percent.
(14) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for information technology expenses. It is the intent
of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to the
greatest extent possible, by reducing those costs that do not affect
the contractual obligation of the state for the famlink system or the
department's ability to provide timely data reports.
(15) Within appropriations in this section, specific funds are
provided for Senate Bill No. 5943 (child welfare services).
(16) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the children's administration administrative
expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that these reductions
shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $107,913,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $93,431,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,564,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,901,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,812,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $211,817,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $353,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $3,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,578,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $2,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,947,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,287,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $787,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training. The administration
may concentrate delivery of these treatments and therapies at a limited
number of programs to deliver the treatments in a cost-effective
manner.
(7) $64,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $47,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operations of the Echo
Glen children's center, the Maple Lane school, the Green Hill school,
the Naselle youth camp, and the juvenile offender basic training camp
and are contingent upon the closure of the Green Hill school on July 1,
2010. In fiscal year 2011, the department may expend funds at Green
Hill school solely for the purpose of maintaining and preserving the
physical plant of the school.
(8)(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall offer a block grant, rather than
categorical funding, of consolidated juvenile service funds, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemical dependency disposition
alternative funds, the special sex offender disposition alternative
funds, the mental health disposition alternative, sentencing
disposition alternative, and evidence-based program expansion grants to
juvenile courts for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. Evidence-based programs and disposition
alternatives will be funding priorities. Funds may be used for
promising practices when approved by juvenile rehabilitation
administration, based on criteria established in consultation with
Washington state institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
By September 1, 2009, the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in
consultation with Washington state institute for public policy and the
juvenile courts, shall develop a funding formula that takes into
account the juvenile courts average daily population of program
eligible youth in conjunction with the number of youth served in each
approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative. By
September 1, 2010, the Washington state institute for public policy
shall provide a report to the office of financial management and the
legislature on the administration of the block grant authorized in this
subsection. The report shall include the criteria used for allocating
the funding as a block grant and the participation targets and actual
participation in the programs subject to the block grant.
(b) By December 1, 2009, the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, in consultation with Washington state institute for
public policy, the juvenile courts, and the office of the administrator
of the courts shall propose to the office of financial management and
the legislature changes in the process of funding and managing,
including accountability and information collection and dissemination,
grants to juvenile courts for serving youth adjudicated in the juvenile
court system use in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011. The proposal
shall include, but is not limited to: A process of making a block
grant of funds consistent with (a) of this subsection; a program of
data collection and measurement criteria for receiving the funds which
will include targets of the number of youth served in identified
evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives in which the
juvenile courts and office of the administrator of the courts will have
responsibility for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data; and necessary changes to the
Washington administrative code.
(c) Within the funds provided for criminal justice analysis in
section 610(4) of this act, the Washington state institute for public
policy shall conduct an analysis of the costs per participant of
evidence-based programs by the juvenile courts and by December 1, 2009,
shall report the results of this analysis to the juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the juvenile courts, office of the
administrator of the courts, the office of financial management, and
the fiscal committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $266,677,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $296,617,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $463,180,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,868,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,041,342,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $113,684,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $113,684,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$11,608,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2009 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $11,608,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $16,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to contract for implementation of high-intensity
program for active community treatment (PACT) teams, and other proven
program approaches that the department concurs will enable the regional
support network to achieve significant reductions in the number of beds
the regional support network would otherwise need to use at the state
hospitals.
(c) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 617 per day during the
first quarter of fiscal year 2010, and 587 per day thereafter. Beds in
the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) are not included in the
preceding bed allocations. The department shall separately charge
regional support networks for persons served in the PALS program.
(d) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(e) $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(f) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(g) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(h) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(i) The department shall return to the Spokane regional support
network fifty percent of the amounts assessed against the network
during the last six months of calendar year 2009 for state hospital
utilization in excess of its contractual limit. The regional support
network shall use these funds for operation during its initial months
of a new sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility that will enable
the network to reduce its use of the state hospital, and for diversion
and community support services for persons with dementia who would
likely otherwise require care at the state hospital.
(j) The department is directed to identify and implement program
efficiencies and benefit changes in its delivery of medicaid managed-care services that are sufficient to operate within the state and
federal appropriations in this section. Such actions may include but
are not limited to methods such as adjusting the care access standards;
improved utilization management of ongoing, recurring, and high-intensity services; and increased uniformity in provider payment rates.
The department shall ensure that the capitation rate adjustments
necessary to accomplish these efficiencies and changes are distributed
uniformly and equitably across all regional support networks statewide.
The department is directed to report to the relevant legislative fiscal
and policy committees at least thirty days prior to implementing rate
adjustments reflecting these changes.
(k) In developing the new medicaid managed care rates under which
the public mental health managed care system will operate during the
five years beginning in fiscal year 2011, the department should seek to
estimate the reasonable and necessary cost of efficiently and
effectively providing a comparable set of medically necessary mental
health benefits to persons of different acuity levels regardless of
where in the state they live. Actual prior period spending in a
regional administrative area shall not be a key determinant of future
payment rates. The department shall report to the office of financial
management and to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature on its proposed new waiver and mental health managed care
rate-setting approach by October 1, 2009, and again at least sixty days
prior to implementation of new capitation rates.
(l) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,858,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $126,888,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,098,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,870,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $467,714,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The state psychiatric hospitals may use
funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies
through hospital group purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,895,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,888,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,085,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,868,000

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,193,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,213,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,422,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,828,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,480,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,164,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532,336,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) The department shall establish rates for boarding homes, adult
family homes, group homes, and supported living providers in an amount
not to exceed the appropriations in this subsection. The department is
authorized to reduce rates, if necessary to manage the appropriations
in this subsection.
(c) Consistent with RCW 74.09.520 and in accordance with RCW
74.39A.270(6)(f), the department shall adjust plans of care for in-home
clients receiving personal care under the state plan or 1915(c) waivers
to reduce utilized service hours by three percent for all
classification groups. The resulting level of hours is sufficient to
ensure client care.
(d) $800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $2,034,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $4,006,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the children's intensive in-home
behavioral supports waiver authorized in the 2008 supplemental
appropriations act (chapter 329, Laws of 2008). Within the amounts
provided in this subsection, the department shall serve children in the
community rather than in institutions as the best practice, when
possible. Funds provided as part of expanded community services may
also be used to serve children in the community.
(e) $5,593,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,002,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $14,701,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expanded community services,
prioritized for all of the following groups: (i) Children who are at
risk of institutionalization, in residential habilitation centers, or
who are aging out of other state services; (ii) residents of
residential habilitation centers who are able to be adequately cared
for in community settings and who choose to live in those community
settings; (iii) adult clients without residential services who are at
immediate risk of institutionalization or in crisis; and (iv) current
home and community-based waiver program clients who have been assessed
as having an immediate need for increased services. The department
shall electronically report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on a quarterly basis on the number of persons served with
these additional community services, and the actual expenditures for
all community services to support these clients.
(f) $493,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,463,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,741,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for residential and support services
for approximately thirty new clients with developmental disabilities
and community protection issues. New placements will serve clients
being diverted or discharged from state psychiatric hospitals,
participants in the dangerous mentally ill offender program,
participants in the community protection program, or mental health
crisis diversion outplacements.
(g) $8,322,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $11,459,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $29,034,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
cost of health care benefits for eligible participating providers,
pursuant to RCW 74.39A.270.
(h) $1,788,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $2,534,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. . . . (delaying
implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1029). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(i) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department may expand the new freedom waiver program to accommodate new
waiver recipients throughout the state. As possible, and in compliance
with current state and federal laws, the department shall allow current
waiver recipients to transfer to the new freedom waiver.
(j) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection (1), the
department shall implement all necessary rules to facilitate the
transfer to a department home and community-based services (HCBS)
waiver of all eligible individuals who (i) currently receive services
under the existing state-only employment and day program, and (ii)
otherwise meet the waiver eligibility requirements. The amounts
appropriated are sufficient to ensure that all individuals currently
receiving services under the state-only employment and day program who
are not transferred to a department HCBS waiver will continue to
receive services.
(k) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for in-home
clients.
(l) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,805,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,399,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $205,532,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,441,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,177,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Effective July 1, 2009, the department shall begin transferring
residents from Yakima Valley school to other institutional,
residential, or home-based settings: Provided, that (i) no individual
shall be moved from an institutional to a community setting until
sufficient services and support arrangements are in place to assure the
individual's health, safety, personal well-being, and continued growth
and development on an ongoing basis; (ii) the needs of each resident
have been assessed to identify the level of support needed to maintain
the person in the most normal and least-restrictive setting consistent
with the person's needs; and (iii) the department shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009, and at
the beginning of each biennial quarter thereafter, on specific progress
in accomplishing the goals of this subsection. All residents shall be
transferred by June 30, 2011.
(c) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department may develop and pay enhanced rates to community providers,
including nursing facilities and others, in order to care for
individuals transitioning from residential habilitation centers.
(d) The developmental disabilities program is authorized to use
funds appropriated in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies
through direct contracting with vendors when the program determines it
is cost-effective to do so.
(e) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to fulfill its
contracts with the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to
provide transportation, building space, and other support services as
are reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of
students living in residential habilitation centers.
(f) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall prepare a report and plan on the closure of the Francis Hadden
Morgan institution. The report shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature no later than January 15, 2010.
(g) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
subsection reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,456,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,410,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,407,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,273,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this subsection reflect reductions targeted
specifically to state government administrative costs. These
administrative reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent
possible, by reducing those administrative costs that do not affect
direct client services or direct service delivery or programs.

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,325,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,357,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this subsection are
available solely for the infant toddler early intervention program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $588,262,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $698,571,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,815,861,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,593,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,816,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,124,103,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,714,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $23,767,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $59,291,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
cost of health care benefits for eligible participating providers,
pursuant to RCW 74.39A.270.
(2) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $156.37 for
fiscal year 2010 and shall not exceed $158.74 for fiscal year 2011.
There shall be no adjustment for economic trends and conditions for
rates established for fiscal year 2010 and there shall be no adjustment
for economic trends and conditions for rates established for fiscal
year 2011. Economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in
any earlier appropriations act shall not be applied solely or
compounded to the component rate allocations established in accordance
with chapter 74.46 RCW.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2010 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2011.
(4) The department shall establish rates for boarding homes and
adult family homes in an amount not to exceed the appropriation in this
section. The department shall reduce rates to manage the
appropriations in this section.
(5) Within funds appropriated in this section, the long-term care
program may develop and pay exceptional care rates:
(a) To boarding homes that contract for specialized care for
persons with Alzheimer's disease and related dementias who might
otherwise require nursing home care, provided the total number of beds
does not exceed 610;
(b) So that persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases who might
otherwise require nursing home or hospital care may instead be served
in adult family homes or boarding homes that specialize in the care of
persons with AIDS or HIV-related diseases; and
(c) To adult family homes and boarding homes that are contracted to
provide support for specifically eligible clients as part of the
expanded community services program, to reduce the use of state and
local psychiatric hospitals for individuals who are not receiving
active treatment.
(6) Reductions to rates paid to adult family homes and boarding
homes also apply to those receiving exceptional care rates for
HIV/AIDS, dementia, and enhanced community services, but will not apply
to the portion of their rate that is considered exceptional, which will
remain unchanged from fiscal year 2009 levels.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may expand the new freedom waiver program to accommodate new waiver
recipients throughout the state. As possible, and in compliance with
current state and federal laws, the department shall allow current
waiver recipients to transfer to the new freedom waiver.
(8) Consistent with RCW 74.09.520 and in accordance with RCW
74.39A.270(6)(f), the department shall adjust plans of care for in-home
clients receiving personal care under the state plan or 1915(c) waivers
to reduce utilized service hours by an average of three percent for all
classification groups. The resulting level of hours is sufficient to
ensure client care.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) Adult day health services shall only be authorized for in-home
clients.
(11) $265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $3,274,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $4,291,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. . . . .
(delaying implementation of Initiative Measure No. 1029). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) $3,955,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $4,239,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $10,190,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. Coordination of these services will be done in partnership
between the mental health program and the aging and disability services
administration.
(13) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection. The department shall adopt rules to implement the terms of
this subsection.
(14) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
chore services program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $515,164,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $536,391,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,509,040,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,920,000
Administrative Contingency Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,489,000
Employment Service Administrative Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,645,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,649,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $310,197,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $310,197,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, $15,489,000 of the administrative contingency
account--state appropriation, $6,645,000 of the employment service
administrative account--state appropriation, and $832,657,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for all
components of the WorkFirst program. The department shall use moneys
from the administrative contingency account and the employment service
administrative account for WorkFirst job placement services provided by
the employment security department. Within the amounts provided for
the WorkFirst program, the department may provide assistance using
state-only funds for families eligible for temporary assistance for
needy families.
(2) The department and the office of financial management shall
report quarterly the expenditures, maintenance of effort allotments,
expenditure amounts, and caseloads for the WorkFirst program to the
legislative fiscal committees.
(3) A maximum of $40,491,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for the 2009-11 biennium may be expended for general
assistance-unemployable cash benefits. The department will prioritize
its review of the caseload by:
(a) Evaluating those recipients who have remained on this caseload
for more than 12 months and, pursuant to RCW 74.04.005(6)(g), shall
have their benefits discontinued unless the recipient demonstrates no
material improvement in their medical or mental condition has occurred,
(b) Evaluating those recipients who have a co-occurring alcohol or
drug addiction and refer them to the appropriate assessment, treatment,
or shelter services, pursuant to RCW 74.04.005(6)(a)(ii)(C). The
department shall not prohibit granting general assistance benefits to
alcoholics and drug addicts who are incapacitated due to other physical
or mental conditions that meet the eligibility criteria for the general
assistance program. If these enrollees fail to accept such services,
pursuant to RCW 74.04.005(6)(c), the department shall terminate their
benefits until the person agrees to cooperate, and
(c) Evaluating any recipient who, pursuant to RCW 74.04.005(6)(c),
has not accepted all available services that can reasonably be expected
to enable the individual to work, the department shall terminate their
benefits until the person agrees to cooperate.
If caseload reductions cannot be achieved through the reviews under
this subsection (3), the department shall establish a rateable
reduction to the cash grant amounts, pursuant to RCW 74.04.770, to
achieve the appropriated levels.
(4) $46,216,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $47,072,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for general assistance-expedited cash benefits and
state funded general assistance-expedited medical expenditures. If the
general assistance-expedited medical caseload increases above four
percent per year, the department shall establish a rateable reduction
to general assistance-expedited cash grant amounts, pursuant to RCW
74.04.770, to pay for increases above four percent in the medical
program. The cash benefit expenditures shall not increase above four
percent per year.
(5) $4,277,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,412,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the state's contribution to
the cost of health benefits for eligible participating child care
providers.
(6) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the economic services administration's
administrative expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that
these reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,720,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,360,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,800,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $632,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,750,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,462,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $333,724,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible and general assistance-unemployable
patients.
(3) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,615,751,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,957,676,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,173,326,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,917,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,076,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,778,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the department estimates that expenditures for the medical
assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the department shall
take steps including but not limited to reduction of rates or
elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so that total
program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation authority.
(2) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the department is authorized to disregard recoveries by
Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined
in RCW 48.104.030.
(3) In accordance with RCW 74.46.625, $6,000,000 of the general
fund -- federal appropriation is provided solely for supplemental
payments to nursing homes operated by public hospital districts. The
public hospital district shall be responsible for providing the
required nonfederal match for the supplemental payment, and the
payments shall not exceed the maximum allowable under federal rules.
It is the legislature's intent that the payments shall be supplemental
to and shall not in any way offset or reduce the payments calculated
and provided in accordance with part E of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the
legislature's further intent that costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall
not be disallowed solely because such costs have been paid by revenues
retained by the nursing home from these supplemental payments. The
supplemental payments are subject to retrospective interim and final
cost settlements based on the nursing homes' as-filed and final
medicare cost reports. The timing of the interim and final cost
settlements shall be at the department's discretion. During either the
interim cost settlement or the final cost settlement, the department
shall recoup from the public hospital districts the supplemental
payments that exceed the medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper
payment limit. The department shall apply federal rules for
identifying the eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper
payment limit.
(4) $2,402,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation,
$1,201,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010, and $1,201,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for grants to rural hospitals.
The department shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides
a relatively larger share of the available funding to hospitals that
(a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent
patients, and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the
extent allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(5) $10,546,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $10,546,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $19,725,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided solely for grants to nonrural hospitals.
The department shall distribute the funds under a formula that provides
a relatively larger share of the available funding to hospitals that
(a) serve a disproportionate share of low-income and medically indigent
patients, and (b) have relatively smaller net financial margins, to the
extent allowed by the federal medicaid program.
(6) The department shall continue the inpatient hospital certified
public expenditures program for the 2009-11 biennium. The program
shall apply to all public hospitals, including those owned or operated
by the state, except those classified as critical access hospitals or
state psychiatric institutions. The department shall submit reports to
the governor and legislature by November 1, 2009, and by November 1,
2010, that evaluate whether savings continue to exceed costs for this
program. If the certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its
current form is no longer cost-effective to maintain, the department
shall submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain (a)
one hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital
cost for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by
medical assistance; and (b) one hundred percent of the federal portion
of the maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under
federal regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established
using an allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims
submitted by the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the
program in each fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a
baseline amount. The baseline amount will be determined by the total
of (a) the inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid
during the fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program,
and (b) disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and
retained by each hospital during fiscal year 2005 that pertain to
fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share programs
exist in the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium. If payments during the fiscal
year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will
be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable
disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can
certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less
than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal
to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the
applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made
in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The
grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is
updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an
interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal
year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that
either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in
excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection,
the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.
$36,704,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section 204(1) of this act
and the balance in this section, and $34,383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011, of which $1,500,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this act and the balance in this
section, are provided solely for state grants for the participating
hospitals.
(7) The department is authorized to use funds appropriated in this
section to purchase goods and supplies through direct contracting with
vendors when the department determines it is cost-effective to do so.
(8) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to continue podiatry services for medicaid-eligible adults.
(9) Sufficient amounts are appropriated in this section for the
department to provide an adult dental benefit that is at least
equivalent to the benefit provided in the 2003-05 biennium.
(10) $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $93,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the department to pursue a federal Medicaid waiver
pursuant to Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5945 (Washington health
partnership plan). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) The department shall require managed health care organizations
that have contracts with the department to serve medical assistance
clients to limit any reimbursements or payments the organizations make
to providers not employed by or under contract with the organizations
to not more than the medical assistance rates paid by the department to
providers for comparable services rendered to clients in the fee-for-service delivery system.
(12) Appropriations in this section are sufficient for the
department to continue to fund family planning nurses in the community
services offices.
(13) A maximum of $160,000,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation and $24,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation in this section may be expended in the fiscal biennium
for the general assistance-unemployable medical program, and these
amounts are provided solely for this program. The department shall
prioritize its review of the caseload by evaluating those enrollees who
have remained on this caseload for more than 12 months or, pursuant to
RCW 74.04.005(6)(g), have not demonstrated that no material improvement
in their medical or mental condition has occurred or, pursuant to RCW
74.04.005(6)(c), have not accepted all available services that can
reasonably be expected to enable the individual to work. If sufficient
caseload reductions cannot be achieved through these reviews, the
department shall freeze admissions or impose time limits, or both, on
the medical program in order to meet these appropriated levels. The
department shall submit a report to the governor and legislative fiscal
and policy committees by December 1, 2009, on the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of transitioning the general assistance-unemployable
program to a statewide managed care program within existing
appropriations for fiscal year 2011. Pursuant to RCW 74.09.035, the
department shall not expend for the general assistance-unemployable
program any amounts in excess of the amounts provided in this
subsection.
(14) If determined to be feasible within the amounts provided in
subsection (13) of this section and without the loss of federal
disproportionate share hospital funds, the department may contract with
the carrier operating the managed care pilot for general assistance-unemployable clients. Effective July 1, 2009, in addition to serving
clients in the pilot counties, the carrier may expand managed care
services to clients residing in at least the following counties:
Spokane, Yakima, Chelan, Kitsap, and Cowlitz. Total per person costs
to the state, including outpatient and inpatient services and any
additional costs due to stop loss agreements, shall not exceed the per
capita payments projected for the general-assistance unemployable
eligibility category, by fiscal year, in the February 2009 medical
assistance expenditures forecast. The department, in collaboration
with the carrier, shall seek to improve the transition rate of general
assistance clients to the federal supplemental security income program.
(15) In order to maintain budget neutrality, state funding for
caseload growth in the general assistance-expedited program for persons
considered presumptively eligible for supplemental security income
above four percent per year shall be paid for from funds provided in
section 207(4) of this act.
(16) The department shall report to the governor and the fiscal
committees of the legislature by June 1, 2010, on its progress toward
achieving a twenty percent increase in the generic prescription drug
utilization rate. If this increase is not achieved by June 1, 2010,
the department is directed to cease coverage of medicare part D co-pays
as of July 1, 2010, in accordance with RCW 74.09.520(8), in order to
achieve the necessary savings.
(17) The legislature finds that medical assistance payment rates,
as calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that hospital medicare cost reports, payment data
from the federal government, historical utilization, economic data, and
clinical input constitute reliable data upon which to determine the
payment rates.
(18) State funds shall not be used by hospitals for advertising
purposes.
(19) The department shall seek a medicaid state plan amendment to
create a professional services supplemental payment program for
University of Washington medicine professional providers no later than
July 1, 2009. The department shall apply federal rules for identifying
the shortfall between current fee-for-service medicaid payments to
participating providers and the applicable federal upper payment limit.
Participating providers shall be solely responsible for providing the
local funds required to obtain federal matching funds. Any incremental
costs incurred by the department in the development, implementation,
and maintenance of this program will be the responsibility of the
participating providers. Participating providers will retain the full
amount of supplemental payments provided under this program, net of any
potential costs for any related audits or litigation brought against
the state. The department shall report to the governor and the
legislative fiscal committees on the prospects for expansion of the
program to other qualifying providers as soon as feasibility is
determined but no later than December 31, 2009. The report will
outline estimated impacts on the participating providers, the
procedures necessary to comply with federal guidelines, and the
administrative resource requirements necessary to implement the
program.
(20) $9,350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $8,313,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $20,371,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and implementation of
a replacement system for the existing medicaid management information
system. The amounts provided in this subsection are conditioned on the
department satisfying the requirements of section 902 of this act.
(21) $506,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011 and $657,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill
No. 1373 (children's mental health). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(22) Pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(a)(25), the department shall
pursue insurance claims on behalf of medicaid children served through
its in-home medically intensive child program under WAC 388-551-3000.
The department shall report to the Legislature by December 31, 2009, on
the results of its efforts to recover such claims.
(23) The department will pursue a competitive procurement process
for antihemophilic products, emphasizing evidence-based medicine and
protection of patient access without significant disruption in
treatment.
(24) The department will pursue several strategies towards reducing
pharmacy expenditures including but not limited to increasing generic
prescription drug utilization by 20 percent and promoting increased
utilization of the existing mail-order pharmacy program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,851,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,430,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,553,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,981,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,815,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,389,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,490,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,879,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,153,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 is provided solely for the
department to assume operations of McNeil island upon the closure of
the McNeil island corrections center by the department of corrections.
These operations include providing security at the Steilacoom dock,
operation of the wastewater treatment plant, staffing the fire
department, and transportation of staff and visitors on McNeil island
but does not include marine transport operations, the provision of
which the department shall contract with Pierce county or a private
vendor consistent with the provisions of RCW 41.06.142(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,997,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,680,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,902,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,526,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,105,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,598,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,635,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,356,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $166,589,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 214 FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,263,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $181,644,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $188,596,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,635,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $531,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $426,669,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(4) In order to maximize funding appropriated for the basic health
plan, the authority is directed to terminate enrollment of individuals
concurrently enrolled in a department of social and health services
medical assistance program and, in collaboration with the department,
transition individuals eligible for medical assistance to the
appropriate program within the department. Additionally, the authority
may adopt policies to allow disenrollment based on income eligibility
not lower than the federal poverty level.
(5) $735,000 of the health care authority administrative account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5491 (developing a strategy for K-12 health benefits).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 215 FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,168,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,171,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,336,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,675,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 216 FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,671,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,671,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,362,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 217 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,340,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,398,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,844,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,390,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,874,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,922,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for 10 additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2010 and 10 additional basic law
enforcement academies in fiscal year 2011.
(2) $1,191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,191,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs to continue to develop, maintain, and
operate the jail booking and reporting system (JBRS) and the statewide
automated victim information and notification system (SAVIN).
(3) $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $2,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $2,000,000 of the Washington auto theft
prevention authority account--state appropriation are provided to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify
the address and residency of registered sex offenders and kidnapping
offenders under RCW 9A.44.130. The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs shall:
(a) Enter into performance-based agreements with units of local
government to ensure that registered offender address and residency are
verified;
(b) Collect performance data from all participating jurisdictions
sufficient to evaluate the efficiency and effectiveness of the address
and residency verification program; and
(c) Submit a report on the effectiveness of the address and
residency verification program to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 31,
each year.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs may retain up
to three percent of the amount provided in this subsection for the cost
of administration. Any funds not disbursed for address and residency
verification or retained for administration may be allocated to local
prosecutors for the prosecution costs associated with failing-to-register offenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 218 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,414,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,389,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Public Safety and Education Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $891,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,256,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,997,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $249,253,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,688,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Manufactured Housing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,713,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,824,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $633,310,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees related to factory assembled structures, contractor
registration, electricians, plumbers, asbestos removal, boilers,
elevators, and manufactured home installers. These increases are
necessary to support expenditures authorized in this section,
consistent with chapters 43.22, 18.27, 19.28, and 18.106 RCW, RCW
49.26.130, and chapters 70.79, 70.87, and 43.22A RCW.
(2) The reduced appropriations for the crime victims' compensation
program reflect reductions in the program's administrative expenses
only. The department shall not make reductions to crime victims'
compensation benefits.
(3) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department of labor and industries'
administrative expenses. It is the intent of the legislature that
these reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or program.
(4) $500,000 of the accident account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract with one or more
independent experts to oversee and assist the department's
implementation of improvements to the rating plan under chapter 51.18
RCW, in collaboration with the department and with the department's
work group of retrospective rating and workers' compensation
stakeholders. The independent experts will validate the impact of
recommended changes on retrospective rating participants and
nonparticipants, confirm implementation technology changes, and provide
other implementation assistance as determined by the department.
(5) $194,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$192,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5346 (health care
administrative procedures). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $84,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$82,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5613 (stop work orders).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $68,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$68,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5688 (registered domestic
partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $320,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$147,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 5873 (apprenticeship
utilization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $183,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5895 (residential real property). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $394,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$394,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6035 (retrospective rating
plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 219 FOR THE INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,963,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,963,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,926,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 220 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,946,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,927,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,883,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,008,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,058,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,842,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,513,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,080,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,651,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the veterans innovation
program.
(b) In addition to other reductions, the appropriations in this
section reflect reductions targeted specifically to state government
administrative costs. These administrative reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,691,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,872,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,237,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,073,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,873,000
The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In addition to other reductions, the
appropriations in this section reflect reductions targeted specifically
to state government administrative costs. These administrative
reductions shall be achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by
reducing those administrative costs that do not affect direct client
services or direct service delivery or programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 221 FOR THE HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,487,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,480,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,967,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 222 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,934,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $96,844,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $482,063,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $139,332,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,505,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,534,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,748,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,637,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,528,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,638,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,529,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $298,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,920,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,001,636,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
of health shall continue operations of the pesticide incident report
and tracking review panel.
(3) $764,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the medical quality assurance commission to
maintain disciplinary staff and associated costs sufficient to reduce
the backlog of disciplinary cases and to continue to manage the
disciplinary caseload of the commission.
(4) $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure and
regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees. There
shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program. The department shall convene the
midwifery advisory committee on a quarterly basis to address issues
related to licensed midwifery.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, the department, in collaboration with
the department of social and health services, shall maximize the use of
existing federal funds, including section 317 of the federal public
health services act direct assistance as well as federal funds that may
become available under the American recovery and reinvestment act, in
order to continue to provide immunizations for low-income, nonmedicaid
eligible children up to three hundred percent of the federal poverty
level in state-sponsored health programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 223 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,321,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,004,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $113,325,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Within funds appropriated in this section,
the department shall seek contracts for chemical dependency vendors to
provide chemical dependency treatment of offenders in corrections
facilities, including corrections centers and community supervision
facilities, which have demonstrated effectiveness in treatment of
offenders and are able to provide data to show a successful treatment
rate.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $639,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $625,643,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,698,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,400,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,229,811,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department may expend funds generated by contractual
agreements entered into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local
jails. Any funds generated in excess of actual costs shall be
deposited in the state general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed
revenue generated by such agreements and shall be treated as a recovery
of costs.
(b) The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership
program at the Washington corrections center for women at a level at
least equal to that provided in the 1995-97 biennium.
(c) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(d) During the 2009-11 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(e) The Harborview medical center shall provide inpatient and
outpatient hospital services to offenders confined in department of
corrections facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that
the department has negotiated with other community hospitals in
Washington state.
(f) The amounts provided in this section include funding for the
operation of the McNeil island corrections center, including the
closure of the corrections center effective July 1, 2010.
(g) The appropriations in this subsection are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of the following bills: Substitute
House Bill No. 2188 (illegal alien offenders), Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5225 (crimes against property), Senate Bill No. 5525
(state institutions/release), Substitute Senate Bill No. 5987
(corrections department personnel), Senate Bill No. 5292 (persistent
offenders), and Senate Bill No. . . . (S-2444) (changes to the
sentencing grid).
(h) A political subdivision which is applying for funding to
mitigate one-time impacts associated with construction or expansion of
a correctional institution, consistent with WAC 137-12A-030, may apply
for the mitigation funds in the fiscal biennium in which the impacts
occur or in the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,635,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,930,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,315,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The department shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody
staff, and correctional industries. For the purposes of this
subsection, correctional custody staff means employees responsible for
the direct supervision of offenders.
(b) $3,460,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5525
(state institutions/release). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(c) $249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5292
(persistent offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $375,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely as a matching amount of state funds for a
federal second chance act grant and is contingent upon receipt of
$750,000 of federal funding under the second chance act.
(e) The appropriations in this subsection are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5288 (supervision of offenders).

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,583,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,572,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,155,000

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,455,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,777,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,232,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 224 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE
BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,564,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,673,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 225 FOR THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $960,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $960,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 226 FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $316,986,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,836,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,264,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,742,000
Employment Service Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,828,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $721,770,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $41,662,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account -- federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to continue current unemployment insurance
functions and department services to employers and job seekers.
(2) $32,067,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided from amounts made available
to the state by section 903(d) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is authorized to fund the replacement of the unemployment
insurance tax information system (TAXIS) for the employment security
department.
(3) $110,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Senate Bill No. 5804 (leaving part time work voluntarily). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) $1,099,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Senate Bill No. 5963 (unemployment insurance). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $476,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $478,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,074,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,058,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,290,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,979,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,709,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Reclamation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,718,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,984,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,675,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $432,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $706,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,697,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,296,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $387,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,815,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,272,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,352,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,426,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,029,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,865,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,826,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,837,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,703,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,078,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,966,000
Emissions Reduction Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000
Saltwater Algae Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $451,110,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account--state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) $240,000 of the woodstove education and enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for citizen outreach efforts to
improve understanding of burn curtailments, the proper use of wood
heating devices, and public awareness of the adverse health effects of
woodsmoke pollution.
(3) $3,000,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for contracted toxic-site cleanup actions at sites
where multiple potentially liable parties agree to provide funding.
(4) $3,600,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the standby emergency rescue tug stationed at Neah
Bay.
(5) $811,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for oversight of toxic cleanup at facilities that
treat, store, and dispose of hazardous wastes.
(6) $1,456,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation is
provided solely for toxic cleanup at sites where willing parties
negotiate prepayment agreements with the department and provide
necessary funding.
(7) $558,000 of the state toxics account--state appropriation and
$3,000,000 of the local toxics account--state appropriation are
provided solely for grants and technical assistance to Puget Sound-area
local governments engaged in updating shoreline master programs.
(8) $950,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for measuring water and habitat
quality to determine watershed health and assist salmon recovery,
beginning in fiscal year 2011.
(9) RCW 70.105.280 authorizes the department to assess reasonable
service charges against those facilities that store, treat, incinerate,
or dispose of dangerous or extremely hazardous waste that involves both
a nonradioactive hazardous component and a radioactive component.
Service charges may not exceed the costs to the department in carrying
out the duties in RCW 70.105.280. The current service charges do not
meet the costs of the department to carry out its duties. Pursuant to
RCW 43.135.055 and 70.105.280, the department is authorized to increase
the service charges no greater than 18 percent for fiscal year 2010 and
no greater than 15 percent for fiscal year 2011. Such service charges
shall include all costs of public participation grants awarded to
qualified entities by the department pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5) for
facilities at which such grants are recognized as a component of a
community relations or public participation plan authorized or required
as an element of a consent order, federal facility agreement or agreed
order entered into or issued by the department pursuant to any federal
or state law governing investigation and remediation of releases of
hazardous substances. Public participation grants funded by such
service charges shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other
grants made pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5).
(10) The department is authorized to increase the following fees in
the 2009-2011 biennium as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Environmental lab accreditation, dam safety and inspection, biosolids
permitting, air emissions new source review, and manufacturer
registration and renewal.
(11) $813,000 of the air pollution control account--state
appropriation and $49,000 of the emissions reduction account--state
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5735 (reducing greenhouse gas
emissions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(12) $144,000 of the saltwater algae control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No.
5412 (saltwater algae control). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) $194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $182,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5138 (climate change response). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(14) $63,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permit). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(15) $31,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $11,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5560 (agency climate leadership). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(16)(a) The department shall convene a stock water working group
that includes: Legislators, four members representing agricultural
interests, three members representing environmental interests, the
attorney general or designee, the director of the department of ecology
or designee, the director of the department of agriculture or designee,
and affected federally recognized tribes shall be invited to send
participants.
(b) The group shall review issues surrounding the use of permit-exempt wells for stock-watering purposes and may develop
recommendations for legislative action.
(c) The working group shall meet periodically and report its
activities and recommendations to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by December 1, 2009.
(17) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall develop recommendations by December 1, 2009, for a convenient and
effective mercury-containing light recycling program for residents,
small businesses, and small school districts throughout the state. The
department shall consider options including but not limited to a
producer-funded program, a recycler-supported or recycle fee program,
a consumer fee at the time of purchase, general fund appropriations, or
a currently existing dedicated account. The department shall involve
and consult with stakeholders including persons who represent
retailers, waste haulers, recyclers, mercury-containing light
manufacturers or wholesalers, cities, counties, environmental
organizations, and other interested parties. The department shall
report its findings and recommendations for a recycling program for
mercury-containing lights to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.
(18) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the purpose of supporting the
trust water rights program and processing trust water right transfer
applications that improve instream flow.
(19) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided for the purpose of providing pass through
funding to the department of fish and wildlife for its work to develop
science in support of instream flow setting and instream flow planning.
(20) $22,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5282 (Bisphenol A). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,746,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,989,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,927,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,561,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,845,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $369,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,840,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account --
Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,802,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,560,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,252,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $79,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(2) Proceeds received from voluntary donations given by motor
vehicle registration applicants shall be used solely for the operation
and maintenance of state parks.
(3) The commission shall actively pursue transferring ownership of
state parks to local governments, tribes, or other entities that have
expressed an interest in operating the park. The commission shall
provide biannual updates of this effort to the office of financial
management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.
The first report shall be submitted no later than December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,602,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,649,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,431,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,851,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,162,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The recreation and conservation office, under the direction of
the salmon recovery funding board, shall assess watershed and regional-scale capacity issues relating to the support and implementation of
salmon recovery. The assessment shall examine priority setting and
incentives to further promote coordination to ensure that effective and
efficient mechanisms for delivery of salmon recovery funding board
funds are being utilized. The salmon recovery funding board shall
distribute its operational funding to the appropriate entities based on
this assessment.
(2) $204,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the implementation of
Substitute House Bill No. 2157 (salmon recovery). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,094,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,086,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,180,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,727,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,179,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,222,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,723,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,829,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,766,000
Off-Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $419,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,792,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,657,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,896,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $857,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $206,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $845,000
Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,674,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,391,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,930,000
Game Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Regional Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $892,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $918,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $321,775,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(3) $536,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $603,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the department to implement a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(4) Prior to submitting its 2011-2013 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(5) Within existing funds, the department shall continue
implementing its capital program action plan dated September 1, 2007,
including the purchase of the necessary maintenance and support costs
for the capital programs and engineering tools. The department shall
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate
committees of the legislature, its progress in implementing the plan,
including improvements instituted in its capital program, by September
30, 2011.
(6) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(7) The department of fish and wildlife shall dispose of all fixed
wing aircraft it currently owns. The proceeds from the aircraft shall
be deposited into the state wildlife account. Disposal of the aircraft
must occur no later than June 30, 2010.
(8) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for an electron project fish passage study
consistent with the recommendations and protocols contained in the 2008
electron project downstream fish passage final report.
(9) $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5138 (climate change response). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(10) If sufficient new revenues are not identified to continue
hatchery operations, within the constraints of legally binding tribal
agreements, the department shall dispose of, by removal, sale, lease,
reversion, or transfer of ownership, the following hatcheries:
McKernan, Colville, Omak, Bellingham, Arlington, and Mossyrock.
Disposal of the hatcheries must occur by June 30, 2011, and any
proceeds received from disposal shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account. Within available funds, the department shall provide
quarterly reports on the progress of disposal to the office of
financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature. The first report shall be submitted no later than
September 30, 2009.
(11) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,483,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,873,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,757,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,373,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,265,000
Off Road Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,274,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,563,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,295,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,889,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,519,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,339,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $572,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $982,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,755,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,659,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,712,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,299,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $11,128,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $11,128,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response account--state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.
None of the general fund and disaster response account amounts provided
in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect and
administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a
quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $5,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $600,000 of the derelict vessel removal account--state
appropriation is provided solely for removal of derelict and abandoned
vessels that have the potential to contaminate Puget Sound.
(5) The department of natural resources shall dispose of the King
Air aircraft it currently owns. Disposal of the aircraft must occur no
later than June 30, 2010, and the proceeds from the sale of the
aircraft shall be deposited into the natural resources equipment
revolving fund. At the expiration of current leases, the department
shall lease facilities in eastern Washington sufficient to house the
necessary aircraft, mechanics, and pilots used for forest fire
prevention and suppression.
(6) $2,087,250 of the state general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $2,087,250 of the state general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011, $2,730,900 of the resource
management cost account--state appropriation, and $2,022,300 of the
forest development account--state appropriation are provided solely for
forest work crews that support correctional camps and are contingent
upon continuing operations of Naselle youth camp at the level provided
in fiscal year 2008.
(7) $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $30,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Bill No. 5138 (climate change response). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(8) $666,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 2165 (forest biomass energy
project). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,777,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,424,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,641,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,570,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,323,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,998,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $350,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for funding to the Pacific county noxious weed
control board to eradicate remaining spartina in Willipa Bay.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
of agriculture shall convene meetings with the dairy industry
representatives and affected groups to consider alternatives for
stabilizing farm milk prices. The department of agriculture shall
provide a report of findings to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management no later than
December 15, 2009.
(3) $63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Bill No. 5005 (naturally raised beef cattle). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $25,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5797 (solid waste handling permits). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(5) The department is authorized to establish or increase the
following fees in the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium as necessary to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section: Christmas tree grower licensing, nursery dealer
licensing, plant pest inspection and testing, and commission merchant
licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY
REINSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $646,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,002,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,657,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,625,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000
Oil Spill Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,775,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $305,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $170,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 are provided solely for measuring
water and habitat quality to determine watershed health and assist
salmon recovery.
(2) The partnership may provide independent advice and assessment
of the state's oil spill prevention, preparedness, and response
programs, including review of existing activities and recommendations
for any necessary improvements. The partnership may carry out this
function through an existing committee, such as the ecosystem
coordination board or the leadership council, or may appoint a special
advisory council. Because this is a unique statewide program, the
partnership may invite participation from outside the Puget Sound
region. $250,000 of the oil spill response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for this purpose.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.
(4) The Puget Sound partnership shall work with Washington State
University and the environmental protection agency to secure funding
for the beach watchers program.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,703,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,746,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,063,000
Cemetery Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $417,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,609,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,123,000
Master License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,813,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,127,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,707,000
Business and Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,530,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000
Funeral Directors And Embalmers Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $891,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,409,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees for cosmetologists, funeral directors, cemeteries, court
reporters and appraisers. These increases are necessary to support the
expenditures authorized in this section, consistent with RCW 43.24.086.
(2) $1,352,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5391 (tattoo and body piercing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $150,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5698
(soil and wetland scientists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $289,000 of the architects' license account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5529
(architects). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $358,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6126
(professional athletics). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,792,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,577,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,452,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,935,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,084,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,267,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,743,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $507,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,393,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $132,743,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) The department shall dispose of the two King Air aircraft it
currently owns. The proceeds from the sale of the airplanes shall be
deposited into the state general fund and the state patrol highway
account in equal amounts. Disposal of the aircraft must occur no later
than June 30, 2011.
(4) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the agency's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs.
(5) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,465,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,370,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,571,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,406,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of $21,487,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2010, $19,823,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $21,478,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation is for state agency operations.
(a) $11,901,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $11,462,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection (1)(a), the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, consistent with
392-121-182 (alternative learning experience requirements) which
requires documentation of alternative learning experience student
headcount and full-time equivalent (FTE) enrollment claimed for basic
education funding, shall provide, via the monthly report of school
district enrollment, accurate monthly headcount and FTE enrollments for
students in internet alternative learning experience (ALE) programs as
well as information about resident and serving districts.
(ii) Within amounts appropriated in this subsection (1)(a), the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with the
office of financial management to assess the state allocation for
internet alternative learning experience (ALE) programs, relative to
the basic education general allocation. The assessment shall include
but not be limited to a comparison of staffing ratios, nonemployee-related costs, and facility requirements. Further, given Washington
Administrative Code requirements for monthly progress reviews by school
staff as well as requirements for direct personal contact with
students, and the potential for necessary services at both the resident
and the serving district, the assessment shall include an analysis of
the appropriate share of per-student allocations between resident
districts and serving districts in the event the districts are not the
same. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the senate ways and means committee and the house ways and
means committee by November 1, 2009, with the results and
recommendations for adjusting the state allocation for online learning
relative to the basic education general allocation and for allocating
appropriate distributions between districts.
(b) $1,043,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $965,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities. $78,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5449 (relating to a statewide effort to
establish and meet graduation and reengagement goals). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(i) The state board of education shall continue to refine the
development of an accountability framework that creates a unified
system of support for challenged schools that aligns with basic
education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of
need, and uses data for decisions. The board shall develop an
accountability index to identify schools and districts for recognition
and for additional state support. The index shall be based on criteria
that are fair, consistent, and transparent. Performance shall be
measured using multiple outcomes and indicators including, but not
limited to, graduation rates and results from statewide assessments.
The index shall be developed in such a way as to be easily understood
by both employees within the schools and districts, as well as parents
and community members. The index should provide feedback to schools
and districts to self-assess their progress, and enable the
identification of schools with exemplary student performance and those
that need assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve
exemplary student performance. Once the accountability index has
identified schools that need additional help, a more thorough analysis
will be done to analyze specific conditions in the district including
but not limited to the level of state resources a school or school
district receives in support of the basic education system, achievement
gaps for different groups of students, and community support.
(ii) Based on the accountability index and in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education
shall develop a proposal and timeline for implementation of a
comprehensive system of voluntary support and assistance for schools
and districts. The timeline must take into account and accommodate
capacity limitations of the K-12 educational system. Changes that have
a fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized by the legislature
through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.
(iii) The state board of education shall develop a proposal and
implementation timeline for a more formalized comprehensive system
improvement targeted to challenged schools and districts that have not
demonstrated sufficient improvement through the voluntary system. The
timeline must take into account and accommodate capacity limitations of
the K-12 educational system. The proposal and timeline shall be
submitted to the education committees of the legislature by December 1,
2009, and shall include recommended legislation and recommended
resources to implement the system according to the timeline developed.
The proposal shall outline a process for addressing performance
challenges that will include the following features: (A) An academic
performance audit using peer review teams of educators that considers
school and community factors in addition to other factors in developing
recommended specific corrective actions that should be undertaken to
improve student learning; (B) a requirement for the local school board
plan to develop and be responsible for implementation of corrective
action plan taking into account the audit findings, which plan must be
approved by the state board of education at which time the plan becomes
binding upon the school district to implement; and (C) monitoring of
local district progress by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. The proposal shall take effect only if formally
authorized by the legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or
other enacted legislation.
(iv) In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States
department of education for use of the accountability index and the
state system of support, assistance, and intervention, to replace the
federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(c) $5,278,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,070,000 for fiscal year 2010 and $1,070,000 for fiscal year
2011 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board, including administering the alternative
routes to certification program, pipeline for paraeducators conditional
scholarship loan program, and the retooling to teach math conditional
loan program and recruiting diverse teachers program;
(ii) $3,431,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,431,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board. Of
the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c)(ii):
(A) $500,000 each year is provided solely for conditional
scholarships to candidates seeking an endorsement in special education,
math, science, or bilingual education;
(B) $2,372,000 for fiscal year 2010 and $2,372,000 for fiscal year
2011 are for the expansion of conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends for individuals enrolled in alternative route state
partnership programs and seeking endorsements in math, science, special
education or bilingual education;
(C) Remaining amounts in this subsection (1)(c)(ii) shall be used
to continue existing alternative routes to certification programs; and
(D) Candidates seeking math and science endorsements under (A) and
(B) of this subsection shall receive priority for funding;
(iii) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5973 (relating to closing the achievement gap in order
to provide all students an excellent and equitable education). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(iv) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for the recruiting Washington teachers program;
(v) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for $4,000 conditional loan stipends for
paraeducators participating in the pipeline for paraeducators program;
and
(vi) $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $244,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for conditional stipends for certificated teachers
pursuing a mathematics or science endorsement under the retooling to
teach mathematics or science program. The conditional stipends shall
be for endorsement exam fees as well as stipends for teachers who must
also complete coursework.
(d) $1,099,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for replacement of the
apportionment and grant payment system, which includes the processes
that collect school district budget and expenditure information,
staffing characteristics, and the student enrollments that drive the
funding process.
(e) $1,146,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,146,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the creation of a statewide
data base of longitudinal student information. This amount is
conditioned on the department satisfying the requirements in section
902 of this act.
(f) During the 2009-11 biennium, to the maximum extent possible, in
adopting new agency rules or making any changes to existing rules or
policies related to the fiscal provisions in the administration of part
V of this act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall attempt to request approval through the normal legislative budget
process.
(2) $11,978,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $11,547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $55,890,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for statewide programs.
(3) $44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5248 (relating to the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 6048 (relating to education). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(5) $610,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $518,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5410 (relating to online learning). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $145,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to enhance the reading skills of students with
dyslexia by implementing the findings of the dyslexia pilot program.
Funds shall be used to provide information and training to classroom
teachers and reading specialists, for development of a dyslexia
handbook, and to take other statewide actions to improve the reading
skills of students with dyslexia. The training program shall be
delivered regionally through the educational service districts.
(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,541,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a school safety training
program provided by the criminal justice training commission. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel, including school safety
personnel hired after the effective date of this section.
(iii) $9,670,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for safe and drug free schools and communities grants for drug
and violence prevention activities and strategies.
(iv) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the nonviolence leadership
training program.
(v) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided for the youth suicide prevention program.
(b) TECHNOLOGY
(i) $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,939,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications
network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures
and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing
and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.
(ii) $1,475,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $1,045,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $435,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5941 (relating to comprehensive
education data). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
state funds provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(iii) $1,656,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $2,483,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 of the American recovery and
reinvestment act (ARRA) of 2009 funds for education technology are
provided solely for distribution to school districts, by formula, as
provided in the ARRA and related federal guidelines. $4,139,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation of the American recovery and
reinvestment act (ARRA) of 2009 funds for education technology shall be
awarded to local education agencies through a competitive grant
process.
(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,329,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to cover up to seven participating
districts. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall allocate these funds to the district or districts participating
in the program according to the provisions of RCW 28A.630.016.
(ii) $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $31,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for operation of the Cispus
environmental learning center.
(iii) $700,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $700,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(iv) $175,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $175,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for incentive grants for districts
and pilot projects to develop preapprenticeship programs. Incentive
grant awards up to $10,000 each shall be used to support the program's
design, school/business/labor agreement negotiations, and recruiting
high school students for preapprenticeship programs in the building
trades and crafts.
(v) $3,220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,219,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the dissemination of the
navigation 101 curriculum to all districts, including disseminating
electronic student planning tools and software for analyzing the impact
of the implementation of navigation 101 on student performance, and
grants for up to one hundred school districts each year, including
prior grantees based on progress and need, for the implementation of
the navigation 101 program. The implementation grants and the school
districts selected shall represent various regions of the state and
reflect differences in school district size and enrollment
characteristics. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction will create a navigation 101 accountability model that will
gather student cause and effect data and implementation process data to
analyze the impact of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,079,486,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,458,855,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,778,341,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 2009-10 and
2010-11 school years shall be determined using formula-generated staff
units calculated pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for
small school enrollments in (e) through (g) of this subsection shall be
reduced for vocational full-time equivalent enrollments. Staff
allocations for small school enrollments in grades K-6 shall be the
greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection, or under (d)
and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations shall be
as follows:
(a) On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent
enrollments, excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise
recognized for certificated staff unit allocations under (d) through
(g) of this subsection:
(i) Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-12;
(ii) Forty-nine certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3; and
(iii) Forty-six certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades 4-12;
(b) For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time
equivalent students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count
in a given month exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent
enrollment count by 5 percent, an additional state allocation of 110
percent of the share that such increased enrollment would have
generated had such additional full-time equivalent students been
included in the normal enrollment count for that particular month;
(c)(i) On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:
(A) Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff
units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5
full-time equivalent vocational students; and
(B) Skills center programs meeting the standards for skills center
funding established in January 1999 by the superintendent of public
instruction with a waiver allowed for skills centers in current
operation that are not meeting this standard until the 2008-09 school
year, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated
administrative units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational
students;
(ii) Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported
on the same monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for
basic support, and payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support; and
(iii) Indirect cost charges by a school district to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic
education and vocational enhancement allocations of state funds;
(d) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education and enroll not
more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(e) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the state board of education:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(f) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full time equivalent students.
Units calculated under (g)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced
by certificated staff units at the rate of forty-six certificated
instructional staff units and four certificated administrative staff
units per thousand vocational full-time equivalent students;
(g) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit; and
(i) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit.
(3) Allocations for classified salaries for the 2009-10 and 2010-11
school years shall be calculated using formula-generated classified
staff units determined as follows:
(a) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations
under subsection (2)(e) through (i) of this section, one classified
staff unit for each 3.00 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(b) For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational
full-time equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each
60.00 average annual full-time equivalent students; and
(c) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit.
(4) Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
14.62 percent in the 2009-10 school year and 14.62 percent in the 2010-11 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 16.70 percent in the
2009-10 school year and 16.70 percent in the 2010-11 school year for
classified salary allocations provided under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504(1) of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection
(2) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsection
(3) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to
adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of distributing insurance
benefits, full-time equivalent classified employees may be calculated
on the basis of 1440 hours of work per year, with no individual
employee counted as more than one full-time equivalent.
(6)(a) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d)
through (g) of this section, there shall be provided a maximum of
$10,179 per certificated staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a
maximum of $10,465 per certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school
year.
(b) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $24,999 per certificated
staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a maximum of $25,499 per
certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school year.
(c) For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational
certificated staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this
section, there shall be provided a maximum of $19,395 per certificated
staff unit in the 2009-10 school year and a maximum of $19,783 per
certificated staff unit in the 2010-11 school year.
(7) Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall
be distributed at a maintenance rate of $607.44 for the 2009-10 and
2010-11 school years per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely
for the purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall
be equal to the number of certificated instructional staff units
allocated under subsection (2) of this section, multiplied by the ratio
between the number of actual basic education certificated teachers and
the number of actual basic education certificated instructional staff
reported statewide for the prior school year.
(8) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(9) The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $8,747,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2010 and 2011
as follows:
(a) For fire protection for school districts located in a fire
protection district as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter
52.04 RCW, a maximum of $567,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2010
and a maximum of $578,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2011;
(b) For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of
$2,385,000 may be expended for the 2010 fiscal year and a maximum of
$2,385,000 for the 2011 fiscal year. 20 percent of each fiscal year
amount may carry over from one year to the next;
(c) A maximum of $404,000 may be expended for school district
emergencies;
(d) A maximum of $485,000 each fiscal year may be expended for
programs providing skills training for secondary students who are
enrolled in extended day school-to-work programs, as approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. The funds shall be allocated at
a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent student enrolled in
those programs; and
(e) $648,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5676 (relating to middle school career and
technical education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time
equivalent student is 4.0 percent from the 2008-09 school year to the
2009-10 school year and 4.0 percent from the 2009-10 school year to the
2010-11 school year.
(11) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) through (h) of this section, the following shall
apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through (g) of this section
shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(12) $240,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 from the American recovery and reinvestment act (ARRA)
of 2009 funds for fiscal stabilization and $360,000,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for
distribution to school districts as provided in this subsection.
Following restoration of school-year 2008-09 carryforward levels for
the student achievement program and the local effort assistance program
in fiscal year 2010 with ARRA fiscal stabilization funds, distribution
of ARRA Title I Part A recovery funds, distribution of ARRA individuals
with disabilities education act (IDEA), Part B recovery funds, and
distribution of ARRA education technology funds, the state and federal
fiscal stabilization funds shall be allocated as follows:
(a) $179,899,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, or as much as remains after setting aside funds for
the cost of a new minimum administrative salary of $67,126 and a new
minimum classified salary of $33,428, shall be used solely to restore
funding levels proportionately to school districts to achieve an
equitable reduction from estimated maintenance-level state formula
allocations. To the extent that initial distribution, by formula, of
the funds identified in this subsection (12) yield a percent reduction
from maintenance level that is higher than the equitable reduction
achieved for other school districts, districts will be held harmless
and funds shall not be removed;
(b) $284,625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, or as much as remains after setting aside funds for
the cost of a new minimum administrative salary of $67,126 and a new
minimum classified salary of $33,428, shall be used solely to restore
funding levels to school districts to achieve an equitable reduction
from estimated maintenance-level state allocations. To the extent that
initial distribution, by formula, of the funds identified in this
subsection (12) yield a percent reduction from maintenance level that
is higher than the equitable reduction achieved for other school
districts, districts will be held harmless and funds shall not be
removed; and
(c) Remaining funds, in amounts necessary to achieve a new minimum
administrative salary of $67,126 and a new minimum classified salary of
$33,428 - estimated at increases of 12.18 percent and 4.14 percent
respectively in school year 2009-10 - shall then be distributed for
administrative and classified salary increases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units under section 502 of this
act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
shall be determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district shall be based on the
district's certificated administrative and classified salary allocation
amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on April 11, 2009, 08:22 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
April 11, 2009, 09:10 hours.
(3)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2009-10 School Year

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or Ph.D.

0 34,237 35,162 36,120 37,080 40,161 42,145 41,047 44,128 46,115

1 34,698 35,635 36,606 37,608 40,721 42,695 41,503 44,617 46,589

2 35,137 36,083 37,064 38,144 41,248 43,242 41,963 45,067 47,061

3 35,589 36,545 37,536 38,650 41,749 43,791 42,398 45,494 47,538

4 36,033 37,031 38,028 39,180 42,297 44,354 42,855 45,971 48,030

5 36,492 37494 38,501 39,718 42,823 44,921 43,319 46,425 48,523

6 36,963 37,943 38,984 40,262 43,352 45,462 43,794 46,885 48,993

7 37,790 38,786 39,841 41,187 44,324 46,491 44,685 47,820 49,989

8 39,002 40,052 41,132 42,590 45,768 48,016 46,086 49,266 51,512

9 41,363 42,497 44,008 47,260 49,584 47,503 50,757 53,081

10 43,877 45,498 48,794 51,195 48,995 52,291 54,692

11 47,032 50,399 52,849 50,528 53,897 56,345

12 48,517 52,048 54,571 52,122 55,545 58,068

13 53,737 56,335 53,773 57,234 59,831

14 55,434 58,165 55,471 59,042 61,663

15 56,877 59,679 56,913 60,577 63,266

16 or more 58,014 60,871 58,051 61,788 64,531

K-12 Salary Allocation Schedule For Certificated Instructional Staff

2010-11 School Year

Years of
Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 MA+90
or Ph.D.

0 34,237 35,162 36,120 37,080 40,161 42,145 41,047 44,128 46,115

1 34,698 35,635 36,606 37,608 40,721 42,695 41,503 44,617 46,589

2 35,137 36,083 37,064 38,144 41,248 43,242 41,963 45,067 47,061

3 35,589 36,545 37,536 38,650 41,749 43,791 42,398 45,494 47,538

4 36,033 37,031 38,028 39,180 42,297 44,354 42,855 45,971 48,030

5 36,492 37494 38,501 39,718 42,823 44,921 43,319 46,425 48,523

6 36,963 37,943 38,984 40,262 43,352 45,462 43,794 46,885 48,993

7 37,790 38,786 39,841 41,187 44,324 46,491 44,685 47,820 49,989

8 39,002 40,052 41,132 42,590 45,768 48,016 46,086 49,266 51,512

9 41,363 42,497 44,008 47,260 49,584 47,503 50,757 53,081

10 43,877 45,498 48,794 51,195 48,995 52,291 54,692

11 47,032 50,399 52,849 50,528 53,897 56,345

12 48,517 52,048 54,571 52,122 55,545 58,068

13 53,737 56,335 53,773 57,234 59,831

14 55,434 58,165 55,471 59,042 61,663

15 56,877 59,679 56,913 60,577 63,266

16 or more 58,014 60,871 58,051 61,788 64,531

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent in-
service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(5) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this act, or any replacement schedules and
documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(6) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for
each district in LEAP Document 2 and the salary schedules in subsection
(3)(a) of this section includes one learning improvement day. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds only if the
learning improvement day has been added to the 180-day contract year.
The additional day shall be limited to specific activities identified
in RCW 28A.415.360(2), related to math, science, and reading, and shall
not be considered part of basic education. Where appropriate, priority
shall be given to math and science training. The principal in each
school shall assure that the day is used accordingly. The school
principal and the district superintendent shall maintain documentation
as to their approval of these activities. The total hours of a
learning improvement day shall not be less than the length of a full
day under the base contract. The superintendent of public instruction
shall ensure that school districts adhere to the intent and purposes of
this subsection.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2)
and subsection (6) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,409,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,120,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $43,120,000 is for adjustments to insurance benefit
allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$732.00 per month for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $745.00
per month for the 2009-10 school year and $768.00 per month for the
2010-11 school year. The adjustments to health insurance benefit
allocations are at the following rates:

School Year

2009-10 2010-11

Pupil Transportation (per weighted pupil mile) $0.12 $0.33

Highly Capable (per formula student) $0.82 $2.22

Transitional Bilingual Education (per eligible bilingual student) $2.10 $5.83

Learning Assistance (per formula student) $0.54 $1.49

(2) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,254,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $310,809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $621,063,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) A maximum of $878,000 of this fiscal year 2010 appropriation
and a maximum of $896,000 of the fiscal year 2011 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(3) $5,000 of the fiscal year 2010 appropriation and $5,000 of the
fiscal year 2011 appropriation are provided solely for the
transportation of students enrolled in "choice" programs.
Transportation shall be limited to low-income students who are
transferring to "choice" programs solely for educational reasons.
(4) Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on
reimbursement rates of $48.83 per weighted mile in the 2009-10 school
year and $49.11 per weighted mile in the 2010-11 school year exclusive
of salary and benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act.
Allocations for transportation of students transported more than one
radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based
on the number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five
living within one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by
the per mile reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district only after the
superintendent of public instruction determines that the school bus was
purchased from the list established pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or
a comparable competitive bid process based on the lowest price quote
based on similar bus categories to those used to establish the list
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the five-year
average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus. In the
final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation payment shall
be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus category for that
school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,159,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $281,988,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $288,306,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,000,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided for state matching money for federal
child nutrition programs.
(2) $100,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the 2011 fiscal year appropriation are
provided for summer food programs for children in low-income areas.
(3) $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $59,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to reimburse school districts for
school breakfasts served to students enrolled in the free or reduced
price meal program pursuant to chapter 287, Laws of 2005 (requiring
school breakfast programs in certain schools).
(4) $1,588,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation of
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) funds is provided
solely for equipment assistance to school food authorities (SFAs)
participating in the national school lunch program (NSLP). Local SFAs
may apply to the office of the superintendent of public instruction to
receive grants in accordance with provisions of the ARRA. As
stipulated in the ARRA, priority will be given to SFAs for equipment
for schools in which at least 50 percent of the students are eligible
for free or reduced-priced meals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $653,870,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $668,789,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $656,052,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,979,467,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(a) Special education students are basic education students first;
(b) As a class, special education students are entitled to the full
basic education allocation;
(c) Special education students are basic education students for the
entire school day; and
(d) All school districts continue to use the full cost method of
excess cost accounting.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: (a) The first
category includes (i) children birth through age two who are eligible
for the optional program for special education eligible developmentally
delayed infants and toddlers, and (ii) students eligible for the
mandatory special education program and who are age three or four, or
five and not yet enrolled in kindergarten; and (b) the second category
includes students who are eligible for the mandatory special education
program and who are age five and enrolled in kindergarten and students
age six through 21.
(5)(a) For the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years, the superintendent
shall make allocations to each district based on the sum of:
(i) A district's annual average headcount enrollment of students
ages birth through four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as defined in subsection (4) of this section, multiplied
by the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student, multiplied by 1.15; and
(ii) A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment multiplied by the funded enrollment percent
determined pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, multiplied by
the district's average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student" for a district shall be
based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260 and shall not
include enhancements, secondary vocational education, or small schools.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Annual average full-time equivalent basic education
enrollment" means the resident enrollment including students enrolled
through choice (RCW 28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts
(RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding students residing in another district
enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program (RCW
28A.225.250).
(b) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special
education annual average enrollment, excluding the birth through age
four enrollment and those five year olds not yet enrolled in
kindergarten, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
Each district's general fund -- state funded special education
enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual enrollment
percent or 12.7 percent.
(7) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with subsection
(6)(b) of this section, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units. For purposes of this subsection, the
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student
shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units.
(8) To the extent necessary, $73,668,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation and $29,574,000 of the general fund -- federal
appropriation are provided for safety net awards for districts with
demonstrated needs for special education funding beyond the amounts
provided in subsection (5) of this section. If the federal safety net
awards based on the federal eligibility threshold exceed the federal
appropriation in this subsection (8) in any fiscal year, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds
necessary to meet this need. Safety net funds shall be awarded by the
state safety net oversight committee subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The committee shall consider unmet needs for districts that can
convincingly demonstrate that all legitimate expenditures for special
education exceed all available revenues from state funding formulas.
In the determination of need, the committee shall also consider
additional available revenues from federal sources. Differences in
program costs attributable to district philosophy, service delivery
choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for safety
net awards. In the determination of need, the committee shall require
that districts demonstrate that they are maximizing their eligibility
for all state and federal revenues related to services for special
education-eligible students. Awards associated with (b) and (c) of
this subsection shall not exceed the total of a district's specific
determination of need.
(b) The committee shall then consider the extraordinary high cost
needs of one or more individual special education students.
Differences in costs attributable to district philosophy, service
delivery choice, or accounting practices are not a legitimate basis for
safety net awards.
(c) Using criteria developed by the committee, the committee shall
then consider extraordinary costs associated with communities that draw
a larger number of families with children in need of special education
services. The safety net awards to school districts shall be adjusted
to reflect amounts awarded under (b) of this subsection.
(d) The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net
eligibility may not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate
for the district plus one percent.
(e) Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or
exceptions related to special education funding.
(f) Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of
potential medicaid eligible students billed as calculated by the
superintendent in accordance with chapter 318, Laws of 1999. The state
safety net oversight committee shall ensure that safety net
documentation and awards are based on current medicaid revenue amounts.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules
and procedures as are necessary to administer the special education
funding and safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards,
procedures, or rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office
of financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.
(10) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction shall consist of:
(a) One staff from the office of superintendent of public
instruction;
(b) Staff of the office of the state auditor who shall be nonvoting
members of the committee; and
(c) One or more representatives from school districts or
educational service districts knowledgeable of special education
programs and funding.
(11) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review and streamline the application process to access safety net
funds, provide technical assistance to school districts, and annually
survey school districts regarding improvement to the process.
(12) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(13) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2011, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction. The purpose
of the program is to provide support to parents, guardians, educators,
and students with disabilities. The program will provide information
to help families and educators understand state laws, rules, and
regulations, and access training and support, technical information
services, and mediation services. The ombudsman program will provide
data, information, and appropriate recommendations to the office of
superintendent of public instruction, school districts, educational
service districts, state need projects, and the parent and teacher
information center. Within the appropriations in this section there is
sufficient funding provided to also provide at least a half-time
support staff position for the special education ombudsman program.
(14) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(15) The superintendent, consistent with federal IDEA
reauthorization, shall continue to educate school districts on how to
implement a birth-to-three program and review the cost effectiveness
and learning benefits of early intervention.
(16) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund -- state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(17) $221,357,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation of
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 funds is provided solely
for the individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA), Part B, for
distribution to school districts. The funds' use is to be consistent
with the current IDEA, Part B statutory and regulatory requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,608,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,609,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,217,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) $3,355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in fiscal
year 2010 and $3,355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation in
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for regional professional
development related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instructional strategies. For each educational service district,
$372,357 is provided in each fiscal year for professional development
activities related to mathematics and science curriculum and
instruction. Each educational service district shall use this funding
solely for salary and benefits for a certificated instructional staff
with expertise in the appropriate subject matter and in professional
development delivery, and for travel, materials, and other expenditures
related to providing regional professional development support. The
office of superintendent of public instruction shall also allocate to
each educational service district additional amounts provided in
section 504 of this act for compensation increases associated with the
salary amounts and staffing provided in this subsection (2).
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,817,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,611,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,169,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,597,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $106,169,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2010 is provided solely for American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) fiscal stabilization funds
to restore state reductions for local effort assistance payments for
the portion of school year 2008-09 that are paid in fiscal year 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,350,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,615,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,965,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund -- state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) $329,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $329,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to maintain at least one
certificated instructional staff and related support services at an
institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not sufficient to support
one full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff to furnish
the educational program. The following types of institutions are
included: Residential programs under the department of social and
health services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for
juveniles under the department of corrections, and programs for
juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation administration.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,625,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,682,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,307,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) Allocations for school district programs for highly capable
students shall be distributed at a maximum rate of $411.81 per funded
student for the 2009-10 school year and $411.81 per funded student for
the 2010-11 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of 2.314 percent of each district's full-time
equivalent basic education enrollment.
(3) $170,000 of the fiscal year 2010 appropriation and $170,000 of
the fiscal year 2011 appropriation are provided for the centrum program
at Fort Worden state park.
(4) $90,000 of the fiscal year 2010 appropriation and $90,000 of
the fiscal year 2011 appropriation are provided for the Washington
destination imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES UNDER THE ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT AND THE NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,247,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $104,651,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,626,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,744,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $443,268,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $37,406,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $35,403,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, $1,063,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington assessments of student learning
(WASL), including: (i) Development and implementation of retake
assessments for high school students who are not successful in one or
more content areas of the WASL; and (ii) development and implementation
of alternative assessments or appeals procedures to implement the
certificate of academic achievement. The superintendent of public
instruction shall report quarterly on the progress on development and
implementation of alternative assessments or appeals procedures.
Within these amounts, the superintendent of public instruction shall
contract for the early return of 10th grade student WASL results, on or
around June 10th of each year.
(2) $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for end-of-course tests in math.
(3) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the second grade assessments.
(4) $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $139,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering program in their schools.
(5) $1,079,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,079,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership coordinated at the Pacific science center, including
instructional material purchases, teacher and principal professional
development, and school and community engagement events. Funding shall
be distributed to the various LASER activities in a manner proportional
to LASER program spending during the 2007-2009 biennium.
(6) $81,030,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants for voluntary full-day
kindergarten at the highest poverty schools. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide allocations to
districts for recipient schools in accordance with the funding formulas
provided in section 502 of this act. Each kindergarten student who
enrolls for the voluntary full-day program in a recipient school shall
count as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for the purpose
of making allocations under this subsection. Although the allocations
are formula-driven, the office of the superintendent shall consider the
funding provided in this subsection as a fixed amount, and shall limit
the number of recipient schools so as to stay within the amounts
appropriated each fiscal year in this subsection. The funding provided
in this subsection is estimated to provide full-day kindergarten
programs for 20 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2009-10
school year and 20 percent of kindergarten enrollment in the 2010-11
school year. Funding priority shall be given to schools with the
highest poverty levels, as measured by prior year free and reduced
priced lunch eligibility rates in each school. Additionally, as a
condition of funding, school districts must agree to provide the
full-day program to the children of parents who request it in each
eligible school. For the purposes of calculating a school district
levy base, funding provided in this subsection shall be considered a
state block grant program under RCW 84.52.0531.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, a maximum of
$272,000 may be used for administrative support of the full-day
kindergarten program within the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(b) Student enrollment pursuant to this program shall not be
included in the determination of a school district's overall K-12 FTE
for the allocation of student achievement programs and other funding
formulas unless specifically stated.
(7) $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for a leadership academy for
school principals and administrators. The superintendent of public
instruction shall contract with an independent organization to
implement a state-of-the-art education leadership academy that will be
accessible throughout the state. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners, with varying roles, shall include the
state level organizations for school administrators and principals, the
superintendent of public instruction, the professional educator
standards board, and others as the independent organization shall
identify.
(8) $105,754,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for preparing, training, and recruiting high quality teachers
and principals under Title II of the no child left behind act.
(9) $4,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,046,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for focused assistance. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
educational audits of low-performing schools and enter into performance
agreements between school districts and the office to implement the
recommendations of the audit and the community. Each educational audit
shall include recommendations for best practices and ways to address
identified needs and shall be presented to the community in a public
meeting to seek input on ways to implement the audit and its
recommendations.
(10) $30,702,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided for the reading first program under Title I of the no child
left behind act.
(11) $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,667,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to eliminate the lunch co-pay for
students in grades kindergarten through third grade that are eligible
for reduced price lunch.
(12) $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $5,285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for: (a) The meals for kids
program under RCW 28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155; (b) to eliminate the
breakfast co-pay for students eligible for reduced price lunch; and (c)
for additional assistance for school districts initiating a summer food
service program.
(13)(a) $28,021,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $38,417,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the
following bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification
from the national board for professional teaching standards and who are
teaching in a Washington public school, subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,319 per
teacher for fiscal year 2010, and $5,325 for fiscal year 2011.
National board certified teachers who become public school principals
shall continue to receive this bonus for as long as they are principals
and maintain the national board certification;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch; and
(b) Included in the amounts provided in this subsection are amounts
for mandatory fringe benefits.
(14) $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to allow approved middle and
junior high school career and technical education programs to receive
enhanced vocational funding. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide grants to districts for middle and
junior high school students in accordance with the funding formulas
provided in section 502 of this act.
(15) $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008.
(16) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5414 (relating to statewide assessments and curricula).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $38,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5714 (relating to conditional funding for teachers to
pursue national board for professional teaching standards
certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2009, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(18) The appropriations in this section are based upon savings
assumed from the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5498 (relating to
graduation without a certificate of academic achievement or a
certificate of individual achievement).
(19) $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,594,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for readiness to learn.
(20) $1,056,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $1,056,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for reading corps.
(21) State grant funding for the 21st century after-school program
is suspended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,997,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,521,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,263,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,781,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $930.26 per
eligible bilingual student in the 2009-10 school year and $930.26 in
the 2010-11 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments
provided in section 504 of this act.
(3) The superintendent may withhold up to 1.5 percent of the school
year allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this section,
and adjust the per eligible pupil rates in subsection (2) of this
section accordingly, solely for the central provision of assessments as
provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2).
(4) $70,000 of the amounts appropriated in this section are
provided solely to track current and former transitional bilingual
program students.
(5) The general fund -- federal appropriation in this section is
provided for migrant education under Title I Part C and English
language acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III
of the elementary and secondary education act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,808,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,704,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $543,925,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,980,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $801,417,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund -- state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b) Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall
be allocated at maximum rates of $289.56 per funded student for the
2009-10 school year and $290.55 per funded student for the 2010-11
school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided under
section 504 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the following as appropriate:
(i) The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-12
for the prior school year multiplied by the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch in the prior school year; and
(ii) If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of
October headcount enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free or
reduced price lunch exceeded forty percent, subtract forty percent from
the district's percentage and multiply the result by the district's K-
12 annual average full-time equivalent enrollment for the prior school
year.
(d) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for an additional amount to be allocated to school districts
with high concentrations of poverty and English language learner
students pursuant to chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(2) $365,019,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation in this
section is provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(3) $51,970,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $77,955,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 of American recovery and
reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) Title I, Part A funds are in addition
to regular Title I, Part A allocations solely for allocation to
eligible school districts in accordance with the guidelines of ARRA.
(4) $48,981,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation from the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (ARRA) is for school
improvement. This consists of 4 percent, or $5,413,000, of the Title
I Part A recovery funds which must be set aside for school improvement
as well as $43,568,000 in additional school improvement funds. At
least $8,092,000 of the ARRA school improvement funds shall be used to
enhance the state's focused assistance program.
(5) Small school districts are encouraged to make the most
efficient use of the funding provided by using regional educational
service district cooperatives to hire staff, provide professional
development activities, and implement reading and mathematics programs
consistent with research-based guidelines provided by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(6) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund -- state or education legacy trust
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(7) School districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of these
funds with other federal, state, and local sources to serve students
who are below grade level and to make efficient use of resources in
meeting the needs of students with the greatest academic deficits.
(8) Within amounts appropriated in this section, funding is
provided for the extended learning program to provide additional
instructional services for eligible students in grades eight, eleven,
and twelve during the regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at
other times in order to meet the needs of these students pursuant to
chapter 328, Laws of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION -- FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,290,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,515,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $74,253,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,058,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for school district student achievement programs shall
be allocated at a maximum rate of $11.66 per FTE student for the 2009-
10 school year and $11.69 per FTE student for the 2010-11 school year.
For the purposes of this section, FTE student refers to the annual
average full-time equivalent enrollment of the school district in
grades kindergarten through twelve for the prior school year, as
reported to the office of the superintendent of public instruction by
August 31st of the previous school year.
(2) $74,253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation from the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 fiscal stabilization
funds is to be used solely to fund the state fiscal year 2010 costs of
school year 2008-09 student achievement fund commitments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR
ADJUSTMENTS. State general fund and state student achievement fund
appropriations provided to the superintendent of public instruction for
state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V of this
act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general
fund moneys from school districts and educational service districts for
a prior fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment
payments for the current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year
adjustments on apportionment reports for the current period. Such
recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state, but as a
reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 518 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION. Appropriations made in this act to the office of
superintendent of public instruction shall be allotted initially as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The appropriations in sections 605
through 611 of this act are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(1) "Institutions" means the institutions of higher education
receiving appropriations under sections 605 through 611 of this act.
(2) The legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies need consistent and accurate personnel data from
institutions of higher education for policy planning purposes.
Institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to the
department of personnel for inclusion in the department's data
warehouse. Uniform reporting procedures shall be established by the
department of personnel for use by the reporting institutions,
including provisions for common job classifications and common
definitions of full-time equivalent staff. Annual contract amounts,
number of contract months, and funding sources shall be consistently
reported for employees under contract.
(3) In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards and the state board may waive all or
a portion of operating fees for any student. State general fund
appropriations shall not be provided to replace tuition and fee revenue
foregone as a result of waivers granted under this subsection.
(4) The colleges of education for institutions with appropriations
in sections 606 through 611 shall develop a plan, by October 30, 2009,
to increase the number of math and science teacher endorsements and
certificates granted by the institution. The plan shall address the
college's math and science teacher endorsement and certification
completion goal for each of the next six years, beginning with the
2010-2011 academic year, and shall be reported to the governor, the
relevant policy committees of the legislature, the higher education
coordinating board (HECB) and the professional educator standards board
(PESB). Plan components may address: Student advising practices,
increase outreach and recruitment efforts to under-represented
populations, linkages with university mathematics and science
departments, and implementation of redesigned, innovative endorsement
and certification programs. To accomplish this work, enrollments may
need to be shifted from low-need endorsement and certificate areas to
math and science. A report shall be made each October 30th to the HECB
and PESB regarding the degree to which plan goals have been met and
activities undertaken to support those outcomes.
(5) Any salary increase provided by an institution of higher
education from nonstate sources shall not be included in the base used
to calculate future state-funded compensation adjustments.
(6) In accordance with RCW 28B.10.920 through 28B.10.922, the state
performance agreement committee and each public four-year institution
of higher education shall develop performance agreements for the period
September 1, 2009, through June 30, 2015. The agreements shall reflect
the level of state, tuition, and other resources appropriated or
authorized for each institution in this act and in the omnibus 2009-11
omnibus capital budget act, as well as reasonably anticipated changes
in such resources for the two subsequent biennia as required to
accomplish the higher education master plan as adopted by the
legislature. The agreements shall build upon each institution's actual
performance relative to the 2011 targets previously negotiated between
the institution, the higher education coordinating board, and the
office of financial management, and shall include measurable
performance targets, benchmarks, and goals in areas including but not
limited to:
(a) Student enrollment levels, by campus;
(b) Baccalaureate and advanced degree production;
(c) Baccalaureate and advanced degree production in high employer-demand fields;
(d) Undergraduate retention and graduation rates;
(e) Time-to-degree for students entering as freshmen, and as upper-division transfers;
(f) Efficiency to degree; and
(g) Capital investment as required to (i) maintain existing
capacity, and (ii) meet enrollment targets in accordance with the
master plan as adopted by the legislature.
Each institution shall report progress toward its performance targets
during the preceding academic year to the state performance agreement
committee prior to November 1, 2010. The higher education coordinating
board shall consolidate and summarize the institutional reports, and
provide them to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2010.
(7) To facilitate transparency and compliance with the American
recovery and reinvestment act, the institutions of higher education
receiving state and federal appropriations under sections 605 through
611 of this act shall allot anticipated state, federal, and tuition
expenditures by budget program and fiscal year. The office of
financial management shall notify the legislative ways and means
committees of the proposed allotments at least ten days prior to their
approval.
(8) To the extent permitted by the applicable personnel system
rules, and to the extent collectively bargained with represented
employees, institutions of higher education are encouraged to achieve
the reductions in full-time-equivalent employment and payroll levels
necessary to operate within this budget through strategies that will
minimize impacts on employees, their families, their communities, and
short- and longer-term accomplishment of institutional mission.
Institutions are encouraged to utilize strategies such as reduced work-hours per day or week, voluntary leave without pay, and temporary
furloughs that enable employees to maintain permanent employment
status. Institutions are further encouraged to implement such
strategies in ways that will enable employees to maintain full
insurance benefits, full retirement service credit, and a living wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 (1) Within the funds appropriated in this
act, each institution of higher education is expected to enroll and
educate at least the following numbers of full-time equivalent state-supported students per academic year:

2009-10
Annual Average 2010-11
Annual Average

University of Washington 38,348 38,348

Washington State University 22,250 22,250

Central Washington University 9,322 9,322

Eastern Washington University 9,184 9,184

The Evergreen State College 4,213 4,213

Western Washington University 12,089 12,089

State Board for Community &
Technical Colleges 140,237 139,237

(2) In achieving or exceeding these enrollment targets, each
institution shall seek to:
(a) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at branch campuses;
(b) Maintain and to the extent possible increase enrollment
opportunities at university centers and other partnership programs that
enable students to earn baccalaureate degrees on community college
campuses; and
(c) Eliminate and consolidate programs of study for which there is
limited student or employer demand, or that are not areas of core
academic strength for the institution, particularly when such programs
duplicate offerings by other in-state institutions.
(3) By September 1, 2009, each institution shall report to the
higher education committees and the relevant fiscal committees of the
legislature on its plans for achieving the objectives in this section.
(4) For purposes of monitoring and reporting statewide enrollment,
the University of Washington and Washington State University shall
notify the office of financial management of the number of full-time
student equivalent enrollments budgeted for each of their campuses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS. In
order to operate within the state funds appropriated in this act, the
governing boards of the state research universities, the state regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College are authorized to adopt
and adjust tuition and fees for the 2009-10 and 2010-11 academic years
as provided in this section:
(1) Each governing board may increase the tuition fees, as defined
in RCW 28B.15.020, charged to resident undergraduate students by no
more than fourteen percent over the amounts charged to resident
undergraduate students for the prior academic year.
(2) Each governing board is authorized to increase tuition charges
to graduate and professional students, and to nonresident undergraduate
students, by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing
board.
(3) Each governing board is authorized to increase summer quarter
or semester tuition fees for resident and nonresident undergraduate,
graduate, and professional students pursuant to RCW 28B.15.067.
(4) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase charges
for fee-based, self-sustaining degree programs, credit courses,
noncredit workshops and courses, and special contract courses by
amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(5) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
services and activities fees for all categories of students as provided
in RCW 28B.15.069.
(6) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
technology fees as provided in RCW 28B.15.069.
(7) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase special
course and lab fees, and health and counseling fees, to the extent
necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost of the
course or service.
(8) Each governing board is authorized to adopt or increase
administrative fees such as but not limited to those charged for
application, matriculation, special testing, and transcripts by amounts
judged reasonable and necessary by the governing board.
(9) In addition to the 3.5 percent of tuition and services and
activities fees used for institutional financial aid as required by RCW
28B.15.820, each governing board shall assure that at least one-seventh
of the additional tuition revenue that would otherwise be collected as
a result of resident undergraduate tuition increases in excess of seven
percent per year is used to provide additional financial aid to
resident undergraduate students. Each institution shall report to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1,
2009, and again by December 1, 2010, demonstrating how it has modified
financial aid policies and practices during the current academic year
to accomplish this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGES. In order to operate within the state funds appropriated in
this act, the state board for community and technical colleges and the
trustees of the state's community and technical colleges are authorized
to adopt and adjust tuition and fees for the 2009-10 and 2010-11
academic years as provided in this section:
(1) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
resident undergraduate students by no more than seven percent over the
amounts charged to resident undergraduates during the prior academic
year. The board may increase tuition fees under this subsection
differentially based on student credit hour load, provided that the
overall increase in average tuition revenue per student does not exceed
five percent each year.
(2) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
resident undergraduates enrolled in upper division applied
baccalaureate programs by no more than seven percent over the amounts
charged during the prior academic year.
(3) The state board may increase the tuition fees charged to
nonresident students by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by the
board, but by no less than the percentage by which resident
undergraduate tuition is increased.
(4) The trustees of the technical colleges are authorized to either
(a) increase operating fees by no more than the percentage increases
authorized for community colleges by the state board; or (b) fully
adopt the tuition fee charge schedule adopted by the state board for
community colleges.
(5) For the 2009-10 academic year, the trustees of the technical
colleges are authorized to increase building fees by four cents per
clock hour and by sixty-two cents per credit hour. For the 2010-11
academic year, the trustees are authorized to increase building fees by
four cents per clock hour and by sixty-nine cents per credit hour. The
purpose of these increases is to progress toward parity with the
building fees charged students attending the community colleges.
(6) The state board is authorized to increase the maximum allowable
services and activities fee as provided in RCW 28B.15.096. The
trustees of the community and technical colleges are authorized to
increase services and activities fees up to the maximum level
authorized by the state board.
(7) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase charges for fee-based, self-sustaining
programs such as summer session, international student contracts, and
special contract courses by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.
(8) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase special course and lab fees to the
extent necessary to cover the reasonable and necessary exceptional cost
of the course or service.
(9) The trustees of the community and technical colleges are
authorized to adopt or increase administrative fees such as but not
limited to those charged for application, matriculation, special
testing, and transcripts by amounts judged reasonable and necessary by
the trustees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,207,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $648,402,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,072,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,161,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,395,842,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010, $28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011, and $4,744,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 7,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2010 and at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2011.
(2) $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,725,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(3) $2,900,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $4,100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to continue, expand, and improve
the board's student achievement initiative.
(4) When implementing the appropriations in this section, the state
board and the trustees of the individual community and technical
colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(5) Within the board's 2009-11 biennial budget allocation to
Bellevue Community College, and pursuant to RCW 28B.50.810, the college
may implement an additional applied baccalaureate degree in interior
design. This program is intended to provide students with additional
opportunities to earn baccalaureate degrees and to respond to emerging
job and economic growth opportunities. The program reviews and
approval decisions required by RCW 28B.50.810 (3) and (4) shall be
completed by July 31, 2009, so that the degree may be offered during
the 2009-10 academic year.
(6) In accordance with the recommendations of the higher education
coordinating board's 2008 Kitsap region higher education center study,
the state board shall facilitate development of university centers by
allocating thirty 2-year and 4-year partnership full-time enrollment
equivalencies to Olympic College. The college shall use the allocation
to establish a partnership with a baccalaureate university or
universities for delivery of upper division degree programs in the
Kitsap region. The Olympic and Peninsula Community College districts
shall additionally work together to ensure coordinated development of
these and other future baccalaureate opportunities through coordinated
needs assessment, planning, and scheduling.
(7) By September 1, 2009, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
office of financial management shall review and to the extent necessary
revise current 2009-11 performance targets based on the level of state,
tuition, and other resources appropriated or authorized in this act and
in the omnibus 2009-11 omnibus capital budget act. The current targets
for the 2010-11 academic year include:
(a) Increase the number of students who are prepared to transfer to
baccalaureate institutions to 19,400;
(b) Increase the number of students who earn professional or
technical certificates or degrees or who achieve industry skill
standards to 25,500;
(c) Increase the number of basic skills students who demonstrate
substantive skill gain to 23,800;
(d) Increase the percentage of students who have demonstrated an
intent to achieve an academic degree who have either transferred to a
four-year institution within three years, or who are continuing to
pursue academic studies at a community college.
The boards and the office of financial management shall additionally
develop new performance targets for the 2011-13 and the 2013-15 biennia
that will guide and measure the community and technical college
system's contributions to achievement of the state's higher education
master plan goals.
(8) $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the hospital employee
education and training program under which labor, management, and
college partnerships develop or expand and evaluate training programs
for incumbent hospital workers that lead to careers in nursing and
other high-demand health care occupations. The board shall report
student progress, outcomes, and costs to the relevant fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by November 2009 and November 2010.
(9) Within the funds appropriated in this section, each community
and technical college, in close consultation with the faculty union,
shall develop a plan to convert teaching assignments so that by 2015 up
to 75 percent of academic teaching assignments are held by full-time,
tenure-track faculty. The plans shall include recommendations on a
process and cost estimates for faculty conversions at each college, as
well as part-time faculty job security strategies. The plans shall be
submitted to the state board by November 15, 2010. The state board
shall review, analyze, compile, and report system recommendations to
the legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $282,448,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $308,357,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,730,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,333,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,713,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,519,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $683,550,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for forestry research by the
Olympic natural resources center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,188,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,666,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,772,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $433,326,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) When implementing reductions for fiscal year 2010 and fiscal
year 2011, Washington State University shall minimize reductions to
agriculture extension services. Agriculture extension includes:
(a) Faculty with extension appointments working within the
following departments in the college of agricultural, human, and
natural resource sciences with extension appointments: Animal
sciences, crop and soil sciences, entomology, horticulture, and plant
pathology;
(b) The portion of county extension educators' appointments
assigned to the "agricultural programs" area;
(c) Staff with extension appointments and extension operating
allocations located at the irrigated agriculture research and extension
center (Prosser), northwest Washington research and extension center
(Mt. Vernon), and tree fruit research and extension center (Wenatchee);
and
(d) Extension contributions to the center for precision
agricultural systems, center for sustaining agriculture and natural
resources, and the agriculture weather network.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,868,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,704,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,522,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,181,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the northwest
autism center.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,225,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,975,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,076,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,512,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,419,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,179,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,366,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,414,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the college shall maintain, and endeavor to
increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.
(3) At least $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $100,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the labor
education and research center.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to report to the legislature regarding efficient and
effective programs and policies. The report shall calculate the return
on investment to taxpayers from evidence-based prevention and
intervention programs and policies that influence crime, K-12 education
outcomes, child maltreatment, substance abuse, mental health, public
health, public assistance, employment, and housing. The institute for
public policy shall provide the legislature with a comprehensive list
of programs and policies that improve these outcomes for children and
adults in Washington and result in more cost-efficient use of public
resources. The institute shall submit interim reports by December 15,
2009, and October 1, 2010, and a final report by June 30, 2011. The
institute may receive additional funds from a private organization for
the purpose of conducting this study.
(5) To the extent federal or private funding is available for this
purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy and the
center for reinventing public education at the University of Washington
shall examine the relationship between participation in pension systems
and teacher quality and mobility patterns in the state. The department
of retirement systems shall facilitate researchers' access to necessary
individual-level data necessary to effectively conduct the study. The
researchers shall ensure that no individually identifiable information
will be disclosed at any time. An interim report on project findings
shall be completed by November 15, 2010, and a final report shall be
submitted to the governor and to the relevant committees of the
legislature by October 15, 2011.
(6) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 shall be expended on the Washington
center for undergraduate education.
(7) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 is provided solely for the Washington state institute for
public policy to examine the need for and methods to increase the
availability of nonfood items, such as personal hygiene supplies,
soaps, paper products, and other items, to needy persons in the state.
The study shall examine existing private and public programs that
provide such products, and develop recommendations for the most cost-effective incentives for private and public agencies to increase local
distribution outlets and local and regional networks of supplies. A
final report shall be delivered to the legislature and the governor by
December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,089,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,318,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,885,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,036,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $123,328,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other non-instructional activities.
(2) Because higher education is an essential driver of economic
recovery and development, the university shall maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment and degree production levels at or beyond their
academic year 2008-09 levels in the following high-demand fields:
Biological and biomedical sciences; computer and information sciences;
education with specializations in special education, math, or science;
engineering and engineering technology; health professions and related
clinical sciences; and mathematics and statistics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,009,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,878,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,361,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,248,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the funds appropriated in this section, the higher
education coordinating board shall complete a system design planning
project that defines how the current higher education delivery system
can be shaped and expanded over the next ten years to best meet the
needs of Washington citizens and businesses for high quality and
accessible post-secondary education. The board shall propose policies
and specific, fiscally feasible implementation recommendations to
accomplish the goals established in the 2008 strategic master plan for
higher education. The project shall specifically address the roles,
missions, and instructional delivery systems both of the existing and
of proposed new components of the higher education system; the extent
to which specific academic programs should be expanded, consolidated,
or discontinued and how that would be accomplished; the utilization of
innovative instructional delivery systems and pedagogies to reach both
traditional and nontraditional students; and opportunities to
consolidate institutional administrative functions. The study
recommendations shall also address the proposed location, role,
mission, academic program, and governance of any recommended new
campus, institution, or university center. During the planning
process, the board shall inform and actively involve the chairs from
the senate and house of representatives committees on higher education,
or their designees. The board shall report the findings and
recommendations of this system design planning project to the governor
and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.
(2) The higher education coordinating board, in coordination with
the research and regional colleges and universities, shall review
options and make recommendations with regard to providing further
flexibility and differentiation within Washington's current "flat rate"
public baccalaureate tuition system. Options to be examined include
higher tuition coupled with higher institutional need-based financial
aid; graduated tuition rates based on family income; differential
tuition rates by institutional mission, campus, and/or delivery method;
and differential tuition rates by academic program and/or course level.
Each option shall be assessed in terms of administrative feasibility;
interactions with and implications for state and federal financial aid
programs, including tax credits; impacts on the guaranteed education
tuition program; and impacts on students of different income levels.
The board shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor
and to the higher education and relevant fiscal committees of the
legislature by November 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $198,373,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,691,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,138,000
Education Legacy Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $88,062,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $508,264,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $182,596,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010, $205,094,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2011, $46,340,000 of the education legacy trust account
appropriation for fiscal year 2010, $33,850,000 of the education legacy
trust account appropriation for fiscal year 2011, and $2,446,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for student
financial aid payments under the state need grant; the state work study
program including up to a four percent administrative allowance; the
Washington scholars program; and the Washington award for vocational
excellence. State need grant, Washington award for vocational
excellence, and Washington scholars awards shall be adjusted to offset
the cost of the resident undergraduate tuition increases authorized
under this act.
(2)(a) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility
for the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at
or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted
for family size. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the
estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected
increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for
students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median
shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount
granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 75 percent
for students with family incomes between 51 and 65 percent MFI; and 50
percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70 percent MFI.
(b) Grant awards for students at private four-year colleges shall
be set at the same level as the student would receive if attending one
of the public research universities.
(3) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely to encourage more students to teach
secondary mathematics and science. $500,000 of this amount is for the
future teacher scholarship and conditional loan program. $500,000 of
this amount is provided to support state work study positions for
students to intern in secondary schools and classrooms.
(4) $3,872,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the passport to college
scholarship program. Funds are provided for student scholarships,
provider training, and for incentive payments to the colleges they
attend for individualized student support services which may include,
but are not limited to, college and career advising, counseling,
tutoring, costs incurred for students while school is not in session,
personal expenses, health insurance, and emergency services.
(5) Amounts provided in this section are sufficient to continue
Washington scholars awards and Washington awards for vocational
excellence under existing terms and conditions, adjusted for the
tuition increases authorized in this act, for all scholarships and
awards granted through the beginning of the 2009-10 academic year. No
new Washington scholars shall be named for the 2010-11 academic year.
(6) $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are for community scholarship matching grants and its
administration. To be eligible for the matching grant, nonprofit
groups organized under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code must demonstrate they have raised at least $2,000 in new
moneys for college scholarships after the effective date of this
section. Groups may receive no more than one $2,000 matching grant per
year and preference shall be given to groups affiliated with
scholarship America. Up to a total of $46,000 per year of the amount
appropriated in this section may be awarded to a nonprofit community
organization to administer scholarship matching grants, with preference
given to an organization affiliated with scholarship America.
(7) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for state need grants provided to
students enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or
the equivalent semester credits. Total state expenditures on this
program shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(8) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely to continue Washington's dues-paying participation in the western interstate commission for higher
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION
COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,635,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,050,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,285,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH
AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,565,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,574,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 616 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,774,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,045,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $252,269,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $370,088,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $54,469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $54,469,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for early childhood education and
assistance program services. This appropriation temporarily reduces
the number of slots for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium for the early
childhood education and assistance program. The department shall
reduce slots where providers serve both federal headstart and early
childhood education and assistance program children, to the greatest
extent possible, in order to achieve no reduction of slots across the
state. The amounts in this subsection also reflect reductions to the
administrative expenditures for the early childhood education and
assistance program. The department shall reduce administrative
expenditures, to the greatest extent possible, prior to reducing early
childhood education and assistance program slots. Of these amounts,
$10,284,000 is a portion of the biennial amount of state matching
dollars required to receive federal child care and development fund
grant dollars.
(2) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided to the department to contract with Thrive by Five, Washington
for a pilot project for a quality rating and improvement system to
provide parents with information they need to choose quality child care
and education programs and to improve the quality of early care and
education programs. The department in collaboration with Thrive by
Five shall operate the pilot project in King, Yakima, Clark, Spokane,
and Kitsap counties. The department shall use child care development
fund quality money for this purpose.
(3) $1,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for child care resource and referral network services.
The department shall use child care development fund quality set-aside
funding provided in the federal American recovery and reinvestment act
of 2009.
(4) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to partially fund the
child care subsidies paid by the department of social and health
services on behalf of the department of early learning.
(5) The department shall use child care development fund money to
satisfy the federal audit requirement of the improper payments act
(IPIA) of 2002. In accordance with the IPIA's rules, the money spent
on the audits will not count against the five percent state limit on
administrative expenditures.
(6) Within available amounts, the department in consultation with
the office of financial management and the department of social and
health services shall report quarterly enrollments and active caseload
for the working connections child care program to the legislative
fiscal committees. The report shall also identify the number of cases
participating in both temporary assistance for needy families and
working connections child care.
(7) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,138,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,123,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,970,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,231,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $135,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $136,000 of the
general fund--private/local appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are
provided solely for the operation of a short course program. The
school for the blind shall provide this service to the extent it is
funded by contracts with school districts and educational service
districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,848,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,879,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,253,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $126,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation for fiscal year 2010 and $84,000 of the
general fund--private/local appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are
provided solely for the operation of a shared reading video outreach
program. The school for the deaf shall provide this service to the
extent it is funded by contracts with school districts and educational
service districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,046,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,047,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,767,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce
spending in those areas that shall have the least impact on
implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,631,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,665,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,296,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce
spending in those areas that shall have the least impact on
implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 621 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,635,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,671,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the legislature that
the reductions in appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent possible, reduce
spending in those areas that shall have the least impact on
implementing its mission.

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $854,461,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $897,826,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,707,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,136,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,619,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,768,112,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2010 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES
State Convention and Trade Center Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,543,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,171,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,171,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,885,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,463,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,811,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,507,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,258,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2010 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,273,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,114,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--
FIRE CONTINGENCY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,558,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,645,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account. $5,000,000 of the
appropriation is provided for emergency fire suppression by the
department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EMERGENCY FUND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are for
the governor's emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE,
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT -- COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall distribute the
appropriations to the following counties and health districts in the
amounts designated:

Health District FY 2010
FY 2011 FY 2010-11
Biennium

Adams County Health District $30,951 $30,951 $61,902

Asotin County Health District $67,714 $67,714 $135,428

Benton-Franklin Health District $1,165,612 $1,165,612 $2,331,224

Chelan-Douglas Health District $184,761 $184,761 $369,522

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department $141,752 $141,752 $283,504

Southwest Washington Health District $1,084,473 $1,084,473 $2,168,946

Columbia County Health District $40,529 $40,529 $81,058

Cowlitz County Health Department $278,560 $278,560 $557,120

Garfield County Health District $15,028 $15,028 $30,056

Grant County Health District $118,595 $118,596 $237,191

Grays Harbor Health Department $183,870 183,870 $367,740

Island County Health Department $91,892 $91,892 $183,784

Jefferson County Health and Human Services $85,782 $85,782 $171,564

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health $9,531,747 $9,531,747 $19,063,494

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District $554,669 $554,669 $1,109,338

Kittitas County Health Department $92,499 $92,499 $184,998

Klickitat County Health Department $62,402 $62,402 $124,804

Lewis County Health Department $105,801 $105,801 $211,602

Lincoln County Health Department $29,705 $29,705 $59,410

Mason County Department of Health Services $95,988 $95,988 $191,976

Okanogan County Health District $63,458 $63,458 $126,916

Pacific County Health Department $77,427 $77,427 $154,854

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department $2,820,590 $2,820,590 $5,641,180

San Juan County Health and Community Services $37,531 $37,531 $75,062

Skagit County Health Department $223,927 $223,927 $447,854

Snohomish Health District $2,258,207 $2,258,207 $4,516,414

Spokane County Health District $2,101,429 $2,101,429 $4,202,858

Northeast Tri-County Health District $110,454 $110,454 $220,908

Thurston County Health Department $600,419 $600,419 $1,200,838

Wahkiakum County Health Department $13,773 $13,772 $27,545

Walla Walla County-City Health Department $172,062 $172,062 $344,124

Whatcom County Health Department $855,863 $855,863 $1,711,726

Whitman County Health Department $78,733 $78,733 $157,466

Yakima Health District $623,797
$623,797 $1,247,594

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $24,000,000 $24,000,000 $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 BELATED CLAIMS. The agencies and
institutions of the state may expend moneys appropriated in this act,
upon approval of the office of financial management, for the payment of
supplies and services furnished to the agency or institution in prior
fiscal biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS.
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a
monthly basis beginning July 1, 2009, consistent with chapter 41.45
RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement
systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters
2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,500,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,800,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,570,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,860,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for expenditure into the education technology revolving
account for the purpose of covering ongoing operational and equipment
replacement costs incurred by the K-20 educational network program in
providing telecommunication services to network participants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the water pollution control revolving account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2010. The sum of
one hundred twenty-five million dollars or so much thereof as may be
available on June 30, 2010, from the total amount of unspent fiscal
year 2010 state general fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts
expressly placed into unallotted status by this act, is appropriated
for the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this
section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed one hundred
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 INCENTIVE SAVINGS -- FY 2011. The sum of
one hundred twenty-five million dollars or so much thereof as may be
available on June 30, 2011, from the total amount of unspent fiscal
year 2011 state general fund appropriations, exclusive of amounts
expressly placed into unallotted status by this act, is appropriated
for the purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this
section.
(1) Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that
is attributable to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million
dollars, is appropriated to the savings incentive account for the
purpose of improving the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of
agency services, and credited to the agency that generated the savings.
(2) The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed one hundred
million dollars, is appropriated to the education savings account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for allocation to counties that are eligible for
funding for chemical dependency or substance abuse treatment programs
pursuant to RCW 70.96A.325.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,185,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute funds to Franklin county ($126,832), Skagit county
($64,701), Yakima county ($83,457), Spokane county ($205,781), and King
county ($704,229) for extraordinary criminal justice costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SMALL AGENCY TECHNOLOGY POOL
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the data processing revolving account for the small
agency technology pool.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,312,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,615,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,927,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the capitol building construction account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--TRANSITIONAL HOUSING OPERATING AND RENT ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely for
expenditure into the transitional housing operating and rent account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT
Budget Stabilization Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,800,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 721 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION--O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,870,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations are provided solely to
the general administration for payment of principal, interest, and
financing expenses associated with the certificate of participation for
the O'Brien building improvement, project number (20081007).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 722 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,857,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,518,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,933,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,676,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,487,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
increase agency and institution appropriations to reflect the increased
insurance premium rates specified in part 9 of this act.
(2) The office of financial management shall increase allotments
for all agencies and institutions by these amounts to reflect the
amounts identified in LEAP document SWM 6M - 2009, a computerized
tabulation developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee on March 25, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 723 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE EMPLOYEES--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($51,903,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($52,369,000)
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($23,101,000)
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,713,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($33,539,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($163,181,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
reduce agency and institution appropriations to reflect the retirement
system employer contribution rate changes specified in Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6161 (actuarial funding of pension systems).
(2) The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for
all agencies and institutions by these amounts to reflect the amounts
identified in LEAP document SWM Z9R - 2009, a computerized tabulation
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on April 15, 2009. The allotment reductions under this
section shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 724 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE TRANSPORTATION EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,657,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
increase transportation agency appropriations to reflect the increased
insurance premium rates specified in part 9 of this act.
(2) The office of financial management shall increase allotments
for all agencies and institutions by these amounts to reflect the
amounts identified in LEAP document STC 6M - 2009, a computerized
tabulation developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee on March 25, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 725 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE TRANSPORTATION EMPLOYEES--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($32,162,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to reduce
transportation agency appropriations to reflect the retirement system
employer contribution rate changes specified in Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6161 (actuarial funding of pension systems).
(2) The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for
all transportation agencies by these amounts to reflect the amounts
identified in LEAP document STC Z9R - 2009, a computerized tabulation
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on April 15, 2009. The allotment reductions under this
section shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 726 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SCHOOL EMPLOYEES--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($135,472,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($170,122,000)
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($137,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($305,731,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for
adjustments to allocations to reflect the retirement system employer
contribution rate changes specified in Senate Bill No. . . .
(retirement system funding).
(2) The office of financial management shall reduce allotments for
the office of the superintendent of public instruction by these
amounts. The allotment reductions under this section shall be placed
in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,268,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,504,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,281,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating
safety and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,854,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax
distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for distribution
to counties for publicly funded autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,544,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,288,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,374,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,622,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,052,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,950,000
Streamline Sales and Use Tax Account Appropriation for
distribution to local taxing jurisdictions to mitigate
the unintended revenue redistribution effect of the
sourcing law changes . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,038,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for the
Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,308,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for the
Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,676,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,435,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for additional
liquor profits distribution to local governments . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,677,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,105,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,351,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2009-11 biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,543,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2009-11 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FEDERAL REVENUES
FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for federal flood control funds
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000
General Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees
distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,296,000
Forest Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest
reserve fund distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,566,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS.
Performance Audits of Government Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $10,400,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$10,400,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,800,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling and Litter Control Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,000,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
State Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $15,340,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$14,400,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,740,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $36,530,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$36,530,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,060,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $91,150,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$91,150,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $182,300,000
Nisqually Earthquake Account: For transfer to the disaster
response account for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,600,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $4,000,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
city-county assistance account, $5,000,000 on
July 1, 2009, and $5,000,000 on July 1, 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $184,000,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $184,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed by more than
$26,000,000 the actual amount of the annual base payment to
the tobacco settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $207,351,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
$26,000,000 less than the strategic contribution
supplemental payment to the tobacco settlement
account . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,098,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamline sales and
use tax account, $31,447,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$33,591,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,038,000
Energy Freedom Account: For transfer to the
general fund, $3,000,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $3,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,250,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$4,250,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,194,000 for
fiscal year 2010 and $4,194,000 for fiscal year
2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,388,000
State Forest Nursery Revolving Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $500,000 for fiscal year 2010 and $200,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $390,000 for fiscal
year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $3,250,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $3,250,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $1,500,000
for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Judicial Information System Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $2,500,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $2,500,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
State Convention and Trade Center Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $18,465,000 for fiscal
year 2010 and $18,685,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,150,000
Liquor Revolving Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $30,000,000 for fiscal year 2010 and
$30,000,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the general fund, $4,300,000 for fiscal year
2010 and $4,300,000 for fiscal year 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,600,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS. The
appropriations contained in this act are maximum expenditure
authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys disbursed from the
treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be recorded as
loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes. To
the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed
from the treasury during the 2007-2009 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies
shall comply with the following requirements regarding information
systems projects when specifically directed to do so by this act.
(1) Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology
shall be made in the context of its information technology portfolio.
"Information technology portfolio" means a strategic management
approach in which the relationships between agency missions and
information technology investments can be seen and understood, such
that: Technology efforts are linked to agency objectives and business
plans; the impact of new investments on existing infrastructure and
business functions are assessed and understood before implementation;
and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative statewide infrastructure.
(2) Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in
making decisions on matters related to the following:
(a) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(b) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology
in meeting legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;
(c) Assessment of overall information processing performance,
resources, and capabilities;
(d) Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for
the operation of any new systems developed using external resources;
and
(e) Progress toward enabling electronic access to public
information.
(3) Each project will be planned and designed to take optimal
advantage of Internet technologies and protocols. Agencies shall
ensure that the project is in compliance with the architecture,
infrastructure, principles, policies, and standards of digital
government as maintained by the information services board.
(4) The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information
technology projects at the direction of the information services board
and in accordance with published department of information services
policies and guidelines. At a minimum, such studies shall include a
statement of: (a) The purpose or impetus for change; (b) the business
value to the agency, including an examination and evaluation of
benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a comprehensive risk assessment
based on the proposed project's impact on both citizens and state
operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing nothing; (d)
the impact on agency and statewide information infrastructure; and (e)
the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.
(5) The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for
each project. The plan or plans shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of each project. The plan(s) shall include, but
is not limited to, the following elements: A description of the
problem or opportunity that the information technology project is
intended to address; a statement of project objectives and assumptions;
a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to be
accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for
the phased approach shall be such that the business case justification
for a project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or
adds measurable value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business
functions within each development cycle.
(6) The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for
information technology projects. Consistent with the direction of the
information services board and the published policies and guidelines of
the department of information services, the quality assurance plan
shall address all factors critical to successful completion of the
project and successful integration with the agency and state
information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality assurance
plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The
quality assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements
for each phase of a project.
(7) A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and
quality assurance plan shall be provided to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and
legislative fiscal committees. The plans and studies shall demonstrate
a sound business case that justifies the investment of taxpayer funds
on any new project, an assessment of the impact of the proposed system
on the existing information technology infrastructure, the disciplined
use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval
of the relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan by the department of information services and the office
of financial management.
(8) Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the
department of information services, the office of financial management,
and legislative fiscal committees at intervals specified in the
project's quality assurance plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERPRISE
SERVICES. Agencies may make use of the department of information
services when acquiring information technology services, products, and
assets.
"Information technology services" means the acquisition,
provisioning, or approval of hardware, software, and purchased or
personal services provided by the department of information services.
If an information technology enterprise service is provided by the
department, or an agency has a specific requirement to acquire
hardware, software, or purchased or personal services directly, the
agency shall consult with the department of information services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department
of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video
telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased
and purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in
developing a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may
spend any portion of any appropriation in this act for new video
telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication transmission,
or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding current
video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and
without first submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan,
in accordance with the policies of the department of information
services, for review and assessment by the department of information
services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any such expenditure by a
public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the
department. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications in public schools
by providing educational information to local school districts and
shall assist local school districts and educational service districts
in telecommunications planning and curriculum development. Prior to
any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by
the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications
for instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education,
including the review and approval of instructional telecommunications
course offerings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 PRINT ASSESSMENTS. The department of
printing shall conduct print assessments of agencies in order to
identify opportunities for financial savings and efficiencies and to
eliminate redundancies and create consistencies in the printing of
state materials. When conducting a print assessment, agencies shall
work with the department of printing and provide the necessary
information in order for the department to assess costs related to
office convenience and production printing, in-house printing
facilities and related costs for services, equipment and supplies, and
third-party printing costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 CENTRAL SERVICES. The governor shall
convene a work group consisting of representatives from the central
service agencies and their clients to collaborate on methods for
providing commonly needed services to state agencies, including, but
not limited to: Human resource management, employee benefits, payroll,
accounting, purchasing, information technology, real estate services,
facility management, building and grounds maintenance, fleet
management, printing services, and office mail distribution. The work
group should consider the experience of other states and large
organizations and should identify opportunities to improve service
delivery and reduce costs, including, but not limited to:
(1) Simplifying processes and gaining efficiencies;
(2) Using a shared, common service model;
(3) Centralizing services or activities which may lead to
consolidating or eliminating existing programs or state agencies; and
(4) Revising agencies' authority or governance structures.
The work group shall submit a proposal that improves the delivery
of central services to state agencies, including changes to the current
governance structure, organizational changes that improves and
simplifies service delivery, and any statutory changes that may be
necessary to the governor by October 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 NATURAL RESOURCES ORGANIZATIONS. The
governor shall convene a work group consisting of representatives from
the natural resource agencies. The work group shall consider the
experience of other states and their organizational structures to
identify consolidation opportunities to improve service delivery and
reduce costs. The work group shall submit a comprehensive written
recommendation to the governor and the office of financial management
by September 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION.
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under this
act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery, agencies
shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that
expenditures are either in, or consistent with, the 2020 action agenda.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever
allocations are made from the governor's emergency fund appropriation
to an agency that is financed in whole or in part by other than general
fund moneys, the director of financial management may direct the
repayment of such allocated amount to the general fund from any balance
in the fund or funds which finance the agency. No appropriation shall
be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 910 STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS. In addition
to the amounts appropriated in this act for revenues for distribution,
state contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, and bond retirement and interest including
ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest on
registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and
39.96 RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 911 BOND EXPENSES. In addition to such other
appropriations as are made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to
the state finance committee from legally available bond proceeds in the
applicable construction or building funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES. State
agencies, including institutions of higher education, may implement a
voluntary retirement incentive program for employees that results in
cost savings to the agency that exceed the amount of the incentive
payment. The program may be offered to any employee who has already
met the eligibility requirements for retirement or early retirement
under the state administered retirement plan in which the employee is
a member, and who retires as a result of the incentive payment. An
agency's incentive program may include, but is not limited to, payment
into a tax exempt medical expense plan. The cost of any incentive
payment must be recovered within two years of the incentive payment
through any combination of reduced expenditures on salaries, benefits,
leave cash-out and/or unemployment insurance costs. The agency's plan
is subject to approval and review by the office of financial management
and the department of retirement systems. An employee does not have a
contractual right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this
section. Agencies participating in this authorization are required to
submit a report by June 30, 2011, to the legislature and the office of
financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement
incentive program. The report should include information on the
details of the program including any resulting service delivery
changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of the retirement incentive per
participant, the total cost to the agency, and the actual and projected
net dollar savings over the 2007-09, 2009-11, and future fiscal
biennia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 VOLUNTARY SEPARATION AND DOWNSHIFTING
INCENTIVES. As a management tool to reduce costs and make more
effective use of resources, while improving employee productivity and
morale, agencies may implement voluntary separation and/or downshifting
incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings,
provided that such a program is approved by the director of the office
of financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization
may offer voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and
options according to procedures established by the office of financial
management, in consultation with the department of personnel. The
options may include, but are not limited to: Voluntary separation,
voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary workweek or work hour reduction,
voluntary downward movement, or temporary separation for development
purposes. An employee does not have a contractual right to a financial
incentive offered pursuant to this section. Offers shall be reviewed
and monitored jointly by the department of personnel and the department
of retirement systems. Agencies are required to submit a report by
June 30, 2011, to the legislature and the office of financial
management on the outcome of their approved incentive program. The
report shall include information on the details of the program,
including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the
cost the incentives per participant, the total cost to the state, and
the projected or annual net dollar savings over the 2009-11 fiscal
biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 ADMINISTRATIVE REDUCTIONS. (1) The
appropriations in this act reflect significant reductions in the
appropriations for the administrative expenses of state government. It
is the intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or programs.
(2) To the extent permitted by the applicable personnel system
rules, and to the extent collectively bargained with represented
employees where applicable, the agencies and institutions of state
government are encouraged to achieve the reductions in full-time-equivalent employment and payroll levels necessary to operate within
these appropriations through strategies that will minimize impacts on
employees, their families, their communities, and short- and long-term
accomplishment of the agency's mission. Agencies are encouraged to use
strategies such as reduced work-hours per day or week, voluntary leave
without pay, and temporary furloughs that enable employees to maintain
permanent employment status. Agencies are further encouraged to
implement such strategies in ways that will enable employees to
maintain full insurance benefits, full accrual of retirement service
credit, and a living wage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 COMPENSATION--INSURANCE BENEFITS.
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
nonrepresented and represented state employee health benefits for state
agencies, including institutions of higher education and are subject to
the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $745 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2010. For fiscal year 2011 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed $768 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in
point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed
competition, or make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW
41.05.065. Except as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section,
during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the board may only authorize
benefit plans and premium contributions for an employee and the
employee's dependents that are the same, regardless of an employee's
status as represented or nonrepresented under the personnel system
reform act of 2002.
(c) Collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the 2007-09
fiscal biennium as part of the super coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW
include employer contributions to health insurance premiums at 88
percent of the cost. In the absence of collective bargaining
agreements for the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, this distribution of costs
for super coalition represented employees continues until the end of
fiscal year 2010. If no new collective bargaining agreements governing
health care cost-sharing for super coalition or other represented
employees are implemented for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, to ensure
that represented employees whose contracts call for them to bear no
more than an average of 12 percent of the cost of health benefits do
not pay more than required by their contracts, during the first six
months of calendar year 2010 a rebate shall be provided to these
employees for any difference between the percentage of costs charged to
employees for health care and associated benefits between January 1,
2010, and June 30, 2010, and the cost-sharing amount allowed under
their contract.
(d) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(e) The conditions in this section apply to benefits for
nonrepresented employees, employees represented by the super coalition,
and represented employees outside of the super coalition, including
employees represented under chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. From January 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, the
subsidy shall be $182.89. Starting January 1, 2011, the subsidy shall
be $182.89 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $59.59 per month beginning
September 1, 2009, and $64.90 beginning September 1, 2010;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $59.59 each month beginning September 1, 2009, and
$64.90 beginning September 1, 2010, prorated by the proportion of
employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the
part-time employee receives. The remittance requirements specified in
this subsection shall not apply to employees of a technical college,
school district, or educational service district who purchase insurance
benefits through contracts with the health care authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 COMPENSATION--REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION
RATES. The appropriations for school districts and state agencies,
including institutions of higher education are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to agency appropriations to reflect savings resulting from
changes to pension funding as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No.
6161 (actuarial funding of pension systems). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, this section shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT
IMPAIRED. Nothing in this act or chapter 5 (ESSB 5460), Laws of 2009
prohibits the expenditure of any funds by an agency or institution of
the state for benefits guaranteed by any collective bargaining
agreement in effect on the effective date of chapter 5, Laws of 2009
(February 18, 2009).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 918 GAMBLING COMMISSION. The state gambling
commission must take any actions that are necessary to ensure that its
rules and other interpretive statements are consistent with Senate Bill
No. 6152 (definition of gambling).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 919 FIRST-TIME HOME BUYERS. To accelerate
the receipt of federal tax credits for first-time home buyers provided
in the 2009 American recovery and relief act, the state housing finance
commission is authorized to obtain services from a qualified public
depositary. The housing finance commission and the state treasurer are
further authorized to enter into an agreement with the selected public
depositary to receive an off-setting deposit of up to $25,000,000 in
state funds. The off-setting deposit shall be made at market rates.
Deposit can only be made from May 1, 2009, until the expiration of the
federal tax credit if an established account with a minimum value of
$400,000, at least $200,000 of which must be cash, exists to finance
first losses, and funds are used consistent with federal requirements.

Sec. 920 RCW 2.68.020 and 2005 c 282 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information
system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of
providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and
providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary.
The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the
purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and
other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and
administration of information services, telecommunications, systems,
software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal
and interest on items paid in installments. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 921 RCW 28A.160.130 and 1991 c 114 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a fund on deposit with each county treasurer
for each school district of the county, which shall be known as the
transportation vehicle fund. Money to be deposited into the
transportation vehicle fund shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(a) The balance of accounts held in the general fund of each school
district for the purchase of approved transportation equipment and for
major transportation equipment repairs under RCW 28A.150.280. The
amount transferred shall be the balance of the account as of September
1, 1982;
(b) Reimbursement payments provided for in RCW 28A.160.200 except
those provided under RCW 28A.160.200(((4))) (3) that are necessary for
contracted payments to private carriers;
(c) Earnings from transportation vehicle fund investments as
authorized in RCW 28A.320.300; and
(d) The district's share of the proceeds from the sale of
transportation vehicles, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) Funds in the transportation vehicle fund may be used for the
following purposes:
(a) Purchase of pupil transportation vehicles pursuant to RCW
28A.160.200 and 28A.150.280;
(b) Payment of conditional sales contracts as authorized in RCW
28A.335.200 or payment of obligations authorized in RCW 28A.530.080,
entered into or issued for the purpose of pupil transportation
vehicles;
(c) Major repairs to pupil transportation vehicles;
(d) For the 2009-2011 biennium, a school district that is wholly
contained on an island and has a student enrollment greater than two
hundred fifty students and fewer than five hundred and fifty students
may transfer from the transportation vehicle fund to the school
district's general fund such amounts as necessary for instructional
costs.
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules which
shall establish the standards, conditions, and procedures governing the
establishment and use of the transportation vehicle fund. The rules
shall not permit the transfer of funds from the transportation vehicle
fund to any other fund of the district, except as provided under
subsection (2)(d) of this section.

Sec. 922 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2006 c 372 s 904 are each amended to
read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(b) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to December 31, 2005, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.9563.
Beginning with calendar year 2007, allocations and maximum eligibility
under this chapter shall be fully funded at one hundred percent and
shall not be reduced except as provided in this section.
(6) From January 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, allocations
and maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by
0.2596.
(7) From January 1, 2011, through December 31, 2011, allocations
and maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by
0.2519.

Sec. 923 RCW 28B.76.660 and 2005 c 518 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington scholars award or the Washington
scholars-alternate award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 who
choose to attend an independent college or university in this state, as
defined in subsection (4) of this section, and recipients of the award
named after June 30, 1994, who choose to attend a public college or
university in the state may receive grants under this section if moneys
are available. The higher education coordinating board shall
distribute grants to eligible students under this section from moneys
appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall not exceed,
on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident, undergraduate
tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the state-funded
research universities. Grants to recipients attending an independent
institution shall be contingent upon the institution matching on at
least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual money or by a
waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the student from
the state. The higher education coordinating board shall establish
procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the
students.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall establish rules
that provide for the annual awarding of grants, if moneys are
available, to three Washington scholars per legislative district,
except for ((fiscal year 2007)) the academic year beginning in 2010
when no ((more than two)) new scholars ((per district)) shall be
selected; and, if not used by an original recipient, to the Washington
scholars-alternate from the same legislative district.
Beginning with scholars selected in the year 2000, if the
recipients of grants fail to demonstrate in a timely manner that they
will enroll in a Washington institution of higher education in the fall
term of the academic year following the award of the grant or are
deemed by the higher education coordinating board to have withdrawn
from college during the first academic year following the award, then
the grant shall be considered relinquished. The higher education
coordinating board may then award any remaining grant amounts to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district if the
grants are awarded within one calendar year of the recipient being
named a Washington scholars-alternate. Washington scholars-alternates
named as recipients of the grant must also demonstrate in a timely
manner that they will enroll in a Washington institution of higher
education during the next available term, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board. The board may accept appeals and grant
waivers to the enrollment requirements of this section based on
exceptional mitigating circumstances of individual grant recipients.
To maintain eligibility for the grants, recipients must maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve
quarters or eight semesters of grants for undergraduate study and may
transfer among in-state public and independent colleges and
universities during that period and continue to receive the grant as
provided under RCW 28B.76.665. If the student's cumulative grade point
average falls below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two
semesters, that student may petition the higher education coordinating
board which shall have the authority to establish a probationary period
until such time as the student's grade point average meets required
standards.
(3) No grant shall be awarded to any student who is pursuing a
degree in theology.
(4) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(5) As used in this section, "public college or university" means
an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

Sec. 924 RCW 28B.105.110 and 2008 c 329 s 908 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The GET ready for math and science scholarship account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all money received for
the GET ready for math and science scholarship program from
appropriations and private sources. The account shall be
self-sustaining.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to
eligible students and for purchases of GET units. Purchased GET units
shall be owned and held in trust by the board. Expenditures from the
account shall be an equal match of state appropriations and private
funds raised by the program administrator. During the ((2007-09))
2009-2011 fiscal biennium, expenditures from the account not to exceed
five percent may be used by the program administrator to carry out the
provisions of RCW 28B.105.090.
(4) With the exception of the operating costs associated with the
management of the account by the treasurer's office as authorized in
chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all investment
income earned by the account.
(5) Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations
and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.
(6) Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the
authorization of the board.

Sec. 925 RCW 35.104.060 and 2007 c 251 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The authority has all the general powers necessary to carry out
its purposes and duties and to exercise its specific powers, including
the authority may:
(a) Sue and be sued in its own name;
(b) Make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments,
with any public or private entity or person, in accordance with this
chapter;
(c) Employ, contract with, or engage independent counsel, financial
advisors, auditors, other technical or professional assistants, and
such other personnel as are necessary or desirable to implement this
chapter;
(d) Establish such special funds, and control deposits to and
disbursements from them, as it finds convenient for the implementation
of this chapter;
(e) Enter into contracts with public and private entities for
research to be conducted in this state;
(f) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(g) Exercise any other power reasonably required to implement the
purposes of this chapter; and
(h) Hire staff and pay administrative costs; however, such expenses
shall be paid from moneys provided by the sponsoring local government
and moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests and the interest
earned on the authority's accounts and investments. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, up to ten percent of the amounts received under
RCW 82.14.480 may be used by a health services and sciences authority
for the purposes of subsections (1)(c) and (h) of this section.
(2) In addition to other powers and duties prescribed in this
chapter, the authority is empowered to:
(a) Use the authority's public moneys, leveraging those moneys with
amounts received from other public and private sources in accordance
with contribution agreements, to promote bioscience-based economic
development, and to advance new therapies and procedures to combat
disease and promote public health;
(b) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into
contribution agreements with private entities and public entities to
receive moneys in consideration of the authority's promise to leverage
those moneys with the revenue generated by the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.480 and contributions from other public entities and private
entities, in order to use those moneys to promote bioscience-based
economic development and advance new therapies and procedures to combat
disease and promote public health;
(c) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use
pursuant to this chapter to promote bioscience-based economic
development and advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease
and promote public health;
(d) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
consistent with its purpose, including the segregation of revenues into
separate funds and accounts;
(e) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract to promote
bioscience-based economic development and advance new therapies and
procedures to combat disease and promote public health. Grant
agreements shall specify the deliverables to be provided by the
recipient pursuant to the grant. Grants to private entities may only
be provided under a contractual agreement that ensures the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention, or the delivery of services that provide for the public
health, safety, and welfare. The authority shall solicit requests for
funding and evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as: (i)
The quality of the proposed research; (ii) its potential to improve
health outcomes, with particular attention to the likelihood that it
will also lower health care costs, substitute for a more costly
diagnostic or treatment modality, or offer a breakthrough treatment for
a particular disease or condition; (iii) its potential to leverage
additional funding; (iv) its potential to provide health care benefits;
(v) its potential to stimulate employment; and (vi) evidence of public
and private collaboration;
(f) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists,
industrialists, and others familiar with health sciences and services;
and
(g) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process
of grant application, review, and reward.
(3) The records of the authority shall be subject to audit by the
office of the state auditor.

Sec. 926 RCW 38.52.106 and 2008 c 329 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Nisqually earthquake account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from tax revenues, budget transfers
or appropriations, federal appropriations, gifts, or any other lawful
source. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Moneys in the account shall be used only to support state and local
government disaster response and recovery efforts associated with the
Nisqually earthquake. During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually earthquake account
to the disaster response account for fire suppression and mobilization
costs. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be used to support disaster response and recovery efforts
associated with flood and storm damage. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer moneys from the Nisqually
earthquake account to the disaster response account for disaster
response and recovery efforts associated with flood and storm damage.

Sec. 927 RCW 41.04.276 and 2005 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The select committee on pension policy is created. The select
committee consists of:
(a) Four members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom
are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees
shall be members of the senate ways and means committee;
(b) Four members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker, two of whom are members of the majority party and two of whom
are members of the minority party. At least three of the appointees
shall be members of the house of representatives appropriations
committee;
(c) Four active members or representatives from organizations of
active members of the state retirement systems appointed by the
governor for staggered three-year terms, with no more than two
appointees representing any one employee retirement system;
(d) Two retired members or representatives of retired members'
organizations of the state retirement systems appointed by the governor
for staggered three-year terms, with no two members from the same
system;
(e) Four employer representatives of members of the state
retirement systems appointed by the governor for staggered three-year
terms; and
(f) The directors of the department of retirement systems and
office of financial management.
(2)(a) The term of office of each member of the house of
representatives or senate serving on the committee runs from the close
of the session in which he or she is appointed until the close of the
next regular session held in an odd-numbered year. If a successor is
not appointed during a session, the member's term continues until the
member is reappointed or a successor is appointed. The term of office
for a committee member who is a member of the house of representatives
or the senate who does not continue as a member of the senate or house
of representatives ceases upon the convening of the next session of the
legislature during the odd-numbered year following the member's
appointment, or upon the member's resignation, whichever is earlier.
All vacancies of positions held by members of the legislature must be
filled from the same political party and from the same house as the
member whose seat was vacated.
(b) Following the terms of members and representatives appointed
under subsection (1)(d) of this section, the retiree positions shall be
rotated to ensure that each system has an opportunity to have a retiree
representative on the committee.
(3) The committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson.
The chairperson shall be a member of the senate in even-numbered years
and a member of the house of representatives in odd-numbered years and
the vice-chairperson shall be a member of the house of representatives
in even-numbered years and a member of the senate in odd-numbered
years.
(4) The committee shall establish an executive committee of six
members, including the chairperson, the vice-chairperson, one member
from subsection (1)(c) of this section, one member from subsection
(1)(d) of this section, one member from subsection (1)(e) of this
section, and the director of the department of retirement systems.
(5) Nonlegislative members of the select committee serve without
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The office of state actuary under chapter 44.44 RCW shall
provide staff and technical support to the committee.
(7) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, in order to conserve
public resources, the activities of the select committee on pension
policy are suspended.

Sec. 928 RCW 41.45.110 and 2007 c 280 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The pension funding council shall solicit and administer a biennial
actuarial audit of the preliminary and final actuarial valuations used
for employer and member rate-setting purposes. This audit will be
conducted concurrent with the actuarial valuation performed by the
state actuary. At least once in each six-year period, the pension
funding council shall solicit and administer an actuarial audit of the
results of the experience study required in RCW 41.45.090. Except
during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, upon receipt of the results of
the preliminary actuarial audits required by this section, and at least
thirty days prior to adopting contribution rates, the pension funding
council shall submit the results to the select committee on pension
policy.

Sec. 929 RCW 41.48.060 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 112 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a special account in the state
treasury to be known as the OASI contribution account. Such account
shall consist of and there shall be deposited in such account: (a) All
contributions and penalties collected under RCW 41.48.040 and
41.48.050; (b) all moneys appropriated thereto under this chapter; (c)
any property or securities belonging to the account; and (d) all sums
recovered upon the bond of the custodian or otherwise for losses
sustained by the account and all other moneys received for the account
from any other source. All moneys in the account shall be mingled and
undivided. Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the governor is
vested with full power, authority and jurisdiction over the account,
including all moneys and property or securities belonging thereto, and
may perform any and all acts whether or not specifically designated,
which are necessary to the administration thereof and are consistent
with the provisions of this chapter. During the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, moneys in the OASI contribution account may also be
transferred into the OASI revolving fund.
(2) The OASI contribution account shall be established and held
separate and apart from any other funds of the state and shall be used
and administered exclusively for the purpose of this chapter.
Withdrawals from such account shall be made for, and solely for (a)
payment of amounts required to be paid to the secretary of the treasury
pursuant to an agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030; (b) payment
of refunds provided for in RCW 41.48.040(3); and (c) refunds of
overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political subdivision
or instrumentality.
(3) From the OASI contribution account the custodian of the fund
[account] shall pay to the secretary of the treasury such amounts and
at such time or times as may be directed by the governor in accordance
with any agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030 and the social
security act.
(4) The treasurer of the state shall be ex officio treasurer and
custodian of the OASI contribution account and shall administer such
account in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the
directions of the governor and shall pay all warrants drawn upon it in
accordance with the provisions of this section and with the regulations
as the governor may prescribe pursuant thereto.

Sec. 930 RCW 41.50.110 and 2008 c 329 s 911 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by RCW 41.50.255 and subsection (6) of this
section, all expenses of the administration of the department, the
expenses of administration of the retirement systems, and the expenses
of the administration of the office of the state actuary created in
chapters 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.40, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37, 43.43,
and 44.44 RCW shall be paid from the department of retirement systems
expense fund.
(2) In order to reimburse the department of retirement systems
expense fund on an equitable basis the department shall ascertain and
report to each employer, as defined in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010,
41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, the sum necessary to defray its
proportional share of the entire expense of the administration of the
retirement system that the employer participates in during the ensuing
biennium or fiscal year whichever may be required. Such sum is to be
computed in an amount directly proportional to the estimated entire
expense of the administration as the ratio of monthly salaries of the
employer's members bears to the total salaries of all members in the
entire system. It shall then be the duty of all such employers to
include in their budgets or otherwise provide the amounts so required.
(3) The department shall compute and bill each employer, as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, 41.32.010, 41.35.010, 41.37.010, or 41.40.010, at the
end of each month for the amount due for that month to the department
of retirement systems expense fund and the same shall be paid as are
its other obligations. Such computation as to each employer shall be
made on a percentage rate of salary established by the department.
However, the department may at its discretion establish a system of
billing based upon calendar year quarters in which event the said
billing shall be at the end of each such quarter.
(4) The director may adjust the expense fund contribution rate for
each system at any time when necessary to reflect unanticipated costs
or savings in administering the department.
(5) An employer who fails to submit timely and accurate reports to
the department may be assessed an additional fee related to the
increased costs incurred by the department in processing the deficient
reports. Fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the
retirement system expense fund.
(a) Every six months the department shall determine the amount of
an employer's fee by reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the
reports submitted by the employer in the preceding six months. If
those reports were not both timely and accurate the department may
prospectively assess an additional fee under this subsection.
(b) An additional fee assessed by the department under this
subsection shall not exceed fifty percent of the standard fee.
(c) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.
(6) Expenses other than those under RCW 41.34.060(3) shall be paid
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal ((biennium)) biennia,
the legislature may transfer from the department of retirement systems'
expense fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 931 RCW 43.08.190 and 2008 c 329 s 912 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be
known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used
solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation
and administration of the state treasurer's office.
Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state
treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the
trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings
generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other
than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and
accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040 or 43.84.092(4). The allocation
shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed
under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall
establish a uniform allocation rate based on the appropriations for the
treasurer's office.
During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state treasurer's service fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 932 RCW 43.09.475 and 2006 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The performance audits of government account is hereby created in
the custody of the state treasurer. Revenue identified in RCW
82.08.020(5) and 82.12.0201 shall be deposited in the account. Money
in the account shall be used to fund the performance audits and follow-up performance audits under RCW 43.09.470 and shall be expended by the
state auditor in accordance with chapter 1, Laws of 2006. Only the
state auditor or the state auditor's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the performance audits of government
account to the state general fund such amounts as deemed to be
appropriate or necessary. In addition, during the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the performance
audits of government account for governmental management, evaluation,
accountability, and performance audit programs.

Sec. 933 RCW 43.10.180 and 2007 c 522 s 951 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attorney general shall keep such records as are necessary
to facilitate proper allocation of costs to funds and agencies served
and the director of financial management shall prescribe appropriate
accounting procedures to accurately allocate costs to funds and
agencies served. Billings shall be adjusted in line with actual costs
incurred at intervals not to exceed six months.
(2) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, all
expenses for administration of the office of the attorney general shall
be allocated to and paid from the legal services revolving fund in
accordance with accounting procedures prescribed by the director of
financial management.

Sec. 934 RCW 43.19.501 and 2008 c 328 s 6016 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Thurston county capital facilities account is created in the
state treasury. The account is subject to the appropriation and
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. Moneys in the account
may be expended for capital projects in facilities owned and managed by
the department of general administration in Thurston county. For the
2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used for predesign
identified in section 1037, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the Thurston county capital facilities account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account.

Sec. 935 RCW 43.30.720 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 938 are each
amended to read as follows:
All receipts from the sale of stock or seed shall be deposited in
a state forest nursery revolving fund to be maintained by the
department, which is hereby authorized to use all money in said fund
for the maintenance of the state tree nursery or the planting of
denuded state owned lands.
During the ((2003-2005)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state forest nursery revolving fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 936 RCW 43.79.201 and 1995 c 399 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions
account is hereby created, in the state treasury, into which account
there shall be deposited all moneys arising from the sale, lease or
transfer of the land granted by the United States government to the
state for charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions
by section 17 of the enabling act, or otherwise set apart for such
institutions, except all moneys arising from the sale, lease, or
transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of such land
assigned for the support of the University of Washington by chapter 91,
Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.
(2) If feasible, not less than one-half of all income to the
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account
shall be appropriated for the purpose of providing housing, including
repair and renovation of state institutions, for persons ((who are
mentally ill, developmentally disabled)) with mental illness or
developmental disabilities, or youth who are blind, deaf, or otherwise
disabled. If moneys are appropriated for community-based housing, the
moneys shall be appropriated to the department of community, trade, and
economic development for the housing assistance program under chapter
43.185 RCW. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
excess fund balance of the fund.

Sec. 937 RCW 43.79.460 and 2009 c 4 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated
to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures from the account.
(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may
create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable
to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial
management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.
Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the
authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for
the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state,
such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish
new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or
incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.
(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state
general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a
fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board
reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations
for:
(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the
extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have
been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program.
"Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for
which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third
parties or other entities;
(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;
(c) A specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an
appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not
achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or
limitation;
(d) Debt service on state obligations; and
(e) State retirement system obligations.
(4) The office of financial management, after consulting with the
legislative fiscal committees, shall report to the treasurer the amount
of savings incentives achieved. By December 1, ((1998)) 2010, and each
December 1st thereafter, the office of financial management shall
submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the
implementation of this section. The report shall (a) evaluate the
impact of this section on agency reversions and end-of-biennium
expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency expenditures from the
savings recovery account. The office of financial management is
relieved from having to submit a report by December 1, 2008.
(5) For fiscal year 2009, the legislature may transfer from the
savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state
general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008.

Sec. 938 RCW 43.79.480 and 2005 c 424 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the health services account for the purposes set forth
in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco prevention and control account for
purposes set forth in this section. The legislature shall transfer
amounts received as strategic contribution payments as defined in RCW
43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery fund created in RCW
43.350.070. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer less than the entire strategic contribution payments.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the
state general fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 939 RCW 43.83B.360 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 33 are each amended
to read as follows:
The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 43.83B.300,
and 43.83B.355 through 43.83B.375 shall be deposited in the state
emergency water projects revolving account, hereby created in the state
treasury, and shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in
RCW 43.83B.300, and 43.83B.355 through 43.83B.375 and for the payment
of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of such bonds. During
the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
state emergency water projects revolving account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 940 RCW 43.135.045 and 2007 c 520 s 6035 and 2007 c 484 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The student achievement fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(2) The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(a) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the education construction fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(b) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds from the student achievement fund shall be appropriated
to the superintendent of public instruction strictly for distribution
to school districts to meet the provisions set out in the student
achievement act. Allocations shall be made on an equal per full-time
equivalent student basis to each school district.

Sec. 941 RCW 43.155.050 and 2008 c 328 s 6002 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public works assistance account is hereby established in
the state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. ((For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used
for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of
2005, for the infrastructure investment system implementation plan
identified in section 1022, chapter 328, Laws of 2008; for the interest
rate buy-down pilot program identified in section 1004, chapter 328,
Laws of 2008; and for the housing assistance, weatherization, and
affordable housing program identified in section 1005, chapter 328,
Laws of 2008.)) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the public works assistance account to the general
fund and the city-county assistance account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account.
(2) The job development fund is hereby established in the state
treasury. ((Up to fifty million dollars each biennium from the public
works assistance account may be transferred into the job development
fund. Money in the job development fund may be used solely for job
development fund program grants, administrative expenses related to the
administration of the job development fund program created in RCW
43.160.230, and for the report prepared by the joint legislative audit
and review committee pursuant to RCW 44.28.801(2).)) Moneys in the job
development fund may be spent only after appropriation. ((The board
shall prepare a prioritized list of proposed projects of up to fifty
million dollars as part of the department's 2007-09 biennial budget
request. The board may provide an additional alternate job development
fund project list of up to ten million dollars. The legislature may
remove projects from the list recommended by the board. The
legislature may not change the prioritization of projects recommended
for funding by the board, but may add projects from the alternate list
in order of priority, as long as the total funding does not exceed
fifty million dollars.))

Sec. 942 RCW 43.215.125 and 2008 c 164 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Within existing funds)) For the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, to
the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the department
shall develop a proposal for implementing a statewide Washington head
start program. To the extent possible while maintaining quality
standards, the proposal should align the state early childhood
education and assistance program with federal head start program
eligibility criteria, guidelines, performance standards, and
methods/processes for ensuring continuous improvement in program
quality. In this proposal, the department shall make recommendations
that:
(a) Identify federal head start program guidelines, performance
measures and standards, or other requirements for which state
flexibility would be recommended. This shall include an analysis of
how state flexibility may impact outcomes for children and how that
flexibility might deviate from outcomes associated with the federal
standards. Areas to be examined must include, but are not limited to,
transportation requirements, service hour configurations, delivery
methods, and impact on rural programs;
(b) Provide comparative data regarding child performance,
readiness, and educational outcomes for Washington's existing head
start and early childhood education and assistance programs;
(c) Determine the alignment between head start standards and the
recommendations of Washington learns;
(d) Identify any change in the state early childhood education and
assistance program laws that would be required to implement the
Washington head start proposal;
(e) Identify additional resources needed to meet federal guidelines
and standards. Areas to be examined must include, but are not limited
to: Per-child funding levels, professional development and training
needs, facilities needs, and technical assistance;
(f) Identify state early childhood education and assistance
programs that do and do not offer full-day, full-year services to
children, and what transition steps would be needed for these programs
to operate in the same manner as federal head start programs;
(g) Provide steps for phasing-in the Washington head start
proposal;
(h) Include a timeline, strategy, and funding needs to implement a
statewide, state-supported early head start program as a component of
the Washington head start proposal; and
(i) Detail the process the department would take with the regional
office of federal head start in identifying any exceptions or waivers
needed to provide flexibility and maintain high quality standards.
(2) In developing its recommendations for this proposal, the
department shall seek, where appropriate and available, training or
technical assistance from the appropriate regional office of federal
head start in order to maximize nonstate resources that might be
available for the consultative work and research involved with
developing this proposal. The department also shall consult with and
solicit input from:
(a) State early childhood education and assistance program
providers on Indian reservations and across the state, including
providers who operate solely state-supported programs;
(b) Tribal governments operating head start programs and early head
start programs in the state to ensure that the needs of Indian and
Alaskan native children and their families are incorporated into the
recommendations of the proposal, especially as they pertain to
standards or guidelines around language acquisition, school readiness,
availability and need for services among Indian and Alaskan native
children and their families, and curriculum development; and
(c) Providers operating migrant and seasonal head start programs in
the state in order to address the needs of the children of migrant and
seasonal farmworker families.
(3) The department shall make recommendations on how it would
periodically review the standards and guidelines within the Washington
head start program, including incorporation of the latest research and
information on early childhood development as well as any new
innovations that may further improve outcomes to low-income children
and their families.
(4) The department's recommendations on a Washington head start
proposal shall include how the proposal aligns with the department's
current statutory duties. The recommendations shall also include any
other options that may improve the quality of state-supported early
learning programs.
(5) The department shall deliver its report to the governor and
legislature by December 1, 2009.

Sec. 943 RCW 43.325.040 and 2007 c 348 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The energy freedom account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from appropriations made to the account and any loan
payments of principal and interest derived from loans made under this
chapter must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for assistance for projects consistent with this chapter
or otherwise authorized by the legislature.
(2) The green energy incentive account is created in the state
treasury as a subaccount of the energy freedom account. All receipts
from appropriations made to the green energy incentive account shall be
deposited into the account, and may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for:
(a) Refueling projects awarded under this chapter;
(b) Pilot projects for plug-in hybrids, including grants provided
for the electrification program set forth in RCW 43.325.110; and
(c) Demonstration projects developed with state universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 and local governments that result in the
design and building of a hydrogen vehicle fueling station.
(3) Any state agency receiving funding from the energy freedom
account is prohibited from retaining greater than three percent of any
funding provided from the energy freedom account for administrative
overhead or other deductions not directly associated with conducting
the research, projects, or other end products that the funding is
designed to produce unless this provision is waived in writing by the
director.
(4) Any university, institute, or other entity that is not a state
agency receiving funding from the energy freedom account is prohibited
from retaining greater than fifteen percent of any funding provided
from the energy freedom account for administrative overhead or other
deductions not directly associated with conducting the research,
projects, or other end products that the funding is designed to
produce.
(5) Subsections (2) through (4) of this section do not apply to
assistance awarded for projects under RCW 43.325.020(3).
(6) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the energy freedom account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 944 RCW 43.330.250 and 2008 c 329 s 914 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The economic development strategic reserve account is created
in the state treasury to be used only for the purposes of this section.
(2) Only the governor, with the recommendation of the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development and the
economic development commission, may authorize expenditures from the
account.
(3) Expenditures from the account shall be made in an amount
sufficient to fund a minimum of one staff position for the economic
development commission and to cover any other operational costs of the
commission.
(4) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys in
the account may also be transferred into the state general fund.
(5) Expenditures from the account may be made to prevent closure of
a business or facility, to prevent relocation of a business or facility
in the state to a location outside the state, or to recruit a business
or facility to the state. Expenditures may be authorized for:
(a) Workforce development;
(b) Public infrastructure needed to support or sustain the
operations of the business or facility; and
(c) Other lawfully provided assistance, including, but not limited
to, technical assistance, environmental analysis, relocation
assistance, and planning assistance. Funding may be provided for such
assistance only when it is in the public interest and may only be
provided under a contractual arrangement ensuring that the state will
receive appropriate consideration, such as an assurance of job creation
or retention.
(6) The funds shall not be expended from the account unless:
(a) The circumstances are such that time does not permit the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the business or facility to secure funding from other
state sources;
(b) The business or facility produces or will produce significant
long-term economic benefits to the state, a region of the state, or a
particular community in the state;
(c) The business or facility does not require continuing state
support;
(d) The expenditure will result in new jobs, job retention, or
higher incomes for citizens of the state;
(e) The expenditure will not supplant private investment; and
(f) The expenditure is accompanied by private investment.
(7) No more than three million dollars per year may be expended
from the account for the purpose of assisting an individual business or
facility pursuant to the authority specified in this section.
(8) If the account balance in the strategic reserve account exceeds
fifteen million dollars at any time, the amount in excess of fifteen
million dollars shall be transferred to the education construction
account.

Sec. 945 RCW 44.44.013 and 2003 c 295 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state actuary appointment committee is created.
(a) After June 30, 2011, the committee shall consist of: (((a)))
(i) The chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the chair and ranking
minority member of the senate ways and means committee; and (((b)))
(ii) four members of the select committee on pension policy appointed
jointly by the chair and vice-chair of the select committee, at least
one member representing state retirement systems active or retired
members, and one member representing state retirement system employers.
(b) From the effective date of this section through June 30, 2011,
the membership of the state actuary appointment committee shall consist
of the membership of the pension funding council created under RCW
41.45.100.
(2) The state actuary appointment committee shall be jointly
chaired by the chair of the house of representatives appropriations
committee and the chair of the senate ways and means committee.
(3) The state actuary appointment committee shall appoint or remove
the state actuary by a two-thirds vote of the committee. When
considering the appointment or removal of the state actuary, the
appointment committee shall consult with the director of the department
of retirement systems, the director of the office of financial
management, and other interested parties.
(4) The state actuary appointment committee shall be convened by
the chairs of the house of representatives appropriations committee and
the senate ways and means committee (a) whenever the position of state
actuary becomes vacant, or (b) upon the written request of any four
members of the appointment committee.

Sec. 946 RCW 46.09.170 and 2007 c 522 s 953 and 2007 c 241 s 16
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e) twenty-three cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel beginning July 1, 2011,
and thereafter, less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.09.110, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the ((2007-09)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance in the NOVA account to the department of natural resources
((for planning and designing)) to install consistent off-road vehicle
signage at department-managed recreation sites, and ((for planning)) to
implement the recreation opportunities on department-managed lands in
the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest, and to the state parks and
recreation commission for maintenance and operation of parks and to
improve accessibility for boaters and off-road vehicle users. This
appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 947 RCW 46.66.080 and 2007 c 199 s 27 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington auto theft prevention authority account is
created in the state treasury, subject to appropriation. All revenues
from the traffic infraction surcharge in RCW 46.63.110(7)(b) and all
receipts from gifts, grants, bequests, devises, or other funds from
public and private sources to support the activities of the auto theft
prevention authority must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for activities relating to motor
vehicle theft, including education, prevention, law enforcement,
investigation, prosecution, and confinement. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the
Washington auto theft prevention authority account for criminal justice
purposes.
(2) The authority shall allocate moneys appropriated from the
account to public agencies for the purpose of establishing,
maintaining, and supporting programs that are designed to prevent motor
vehicle theft, including:
(a) Financial support to prosecution agencies to increase the
effectiveness of motor vehicle theft prosecution;
(b) Financial support to a unit of local government or a team
consisting of units of local governments to increase the effectiveness
of motor vehicle theft enforcement;
(c) Financial support for the procurement of equipment and
technologies for use by law enforcement agencies for the purpose of
enforcing motor vehicle theft laws; and
(d) Financial support for programs that are designed to educate and
assist the public in the prevention of motor vehicle theft.
(3) The costs of administration shall not exceed ten percent of the
moneys in the account in any one year so that the greatest possible
portion of the moneys available to the authority is expended on
combating motor vehicle theft.
(4) Prior to awarding any moneys from the Washington auto theft
prevention authority account for motor vehicle theft enforcement, the
auto theft prevention authority must verify that the financial award
includes sufficient funding to cover proposed activities, which
include, but are not limited to: (a) State, municipal, and county
offender and juvenile confinement costs; (b) administration costs; (c)
law enforcement costs; (d) prosecutor costs; and (e) court costs, with
a priority being given to ensuring that sufficient funding is available
to cover state, municipal, and county offender and juvenile confinement
costs.
(5) Moneys expended from the Washington auto theft prevention
authority account under subsection (2) of this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other moneys that are available for motor
vehicle theft prevention.
(6) Grants provided under subsection (2) of this section constitute
reimbursement for purposes of RCW 43.135.060(1).

Sec. 948 RCW 50.16.010 and 2009 c 4 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(viii) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) During the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for the (i) cost of the job skills or
worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and
administrative costs at the state board for community and technical
colleges, and (ii) reemployment services such as business and project
development assistance, local economic development capacity building,
and local economic development financial assistance at the department
of community, trade, and economic development, and the remaining
appropriation upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval
of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such
expenditure is necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d) During the 2009-11 biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended by the
department of social and human services as appropriated by the
legislature for employment and training services and programs in the
WorkFirst program, for the administrative costs of state agencies
participating in the WorkFirst program, and the remaining appropriation
upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the
governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such expenditure is
necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(4) Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a)
may only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified
in this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

Sec. 949 RCW 66.08.170 and 2002 c 371 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund", which
shall consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures,
and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the board. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by
the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an
amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law
shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state
treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the
liquor revolving fund. During the ((2001-2003)) 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the liquor revolving
account to the state general fund ((such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the fund and reductions made by the 2002 supplemental
appropriations act for administrative efficiencies and savings)) and
may direct an additional amount of liquor profits to be distributed to
local governments. Neither the transfer of funds nor the additional
distribution of liquor profits to local governments during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium may reduce the excess fund distributions that
otherwise would occur under RCW 66.08.190. Disbursements from the
revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board or a duly
authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall
be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such
fund.

Sec. 950 RCW 67.40.040 and 2008 c 329 s 917 and 2008 c 328 s 6011
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
67.40.130, and all other moneys received by the state convention and
trade center from any public or private source which are intended to
fund the acquisition, design, construction, expansion, exterior cleanup
and repair of the Eagles building, conversion of various retail and
other space to meeting rooms, purchase of the land and building known
as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation
of the center, and those expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170
shall be deposited in the state convention and trade center account
hereby created in the state treasury and in such subaccounts as are
deemed appropriate by the directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170, and during the
((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the state convention and trade center account ((to the Washington
housing trust account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance
in the account; and during the 2007-2009 biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state convention and trade center account)) to the
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
account;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center;
(iv) For debt service for the acquisition, design, and construction
and retrofit of the museum of history and industry museum property or
other future expansions of the convention center as approved by the
legislature; and
(v) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(5) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this section,
starting in fiscal year 2008, and except for the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium in which no transfers shall be made, the state treasurer shall
transfer:
(a) The sum of four million dollars, or as much as may be available
pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the state
convention and trade center account to the tourism enterprise account,
with the maximum transfer being four million dollars per fiscal year;
and
(b) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much as may be
available pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the
state convention and trade center account to the tourism development
and promotion account, with the maximum transfer being five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year.
(6)(a) Funds required for debt service payments and reserves for
bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030; for debt service authorized under RCW
67.40.170; and for the issuance and sale of financial instruments
associated with the acquisition, design, construction, and retrofit of
the museum of history and industry museum property or for other future
expansions of the center, as approved by the legislature, shall be
maintained within the state convention and trade center account.
(b) Except for during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, during which
no reserve shall be retained, no less than six million one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per year shall be retained in the state
convention and trade center account for funding capital maintenance as
required by the center's long-term capital plan, facility enhancements,
unanticipated replacements, and operating reserves for the convention
center operation. This amount shall be escalated annually as follows:
(i) Four percent for annual inflation for capital maintenance,
repairs, and replacement;
(ii) An additional two percent for enhancement to the facility; and
(iii) An additional three percent for growth in expenditure due to
aging of the facility and the need to maintain an operating reserve.
(c) Sufficient funds shall be reserved within the state convention
and trade center account to fund operating appropriations for the
annual operation of the convention center.

Sec. 951 RCW 67.70.190 and 2005 c 427 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unclaimed prizes shall be retained in the state lottery account for
the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days after the
drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end of the
game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize within this
time, all rights to the prize shall be extinguished, and the prize
shall be retained in the state lottery fund for further use as prizes,
except that one-third of all unclaimed prize money shall be deposited
in the economic development strategic reserve account created in RCW
43.330.250.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, all unclaimed prize money
revenue retained in the state lottery fund in excess of three million
dollars each fiscal year, after distribution to the economic
development strategic reserve account, shall be deposited into the
state general fund. In addition, on July 1, 2009, June 30, 2010, and
June 30, 2011, all unclaimed prize money retained in the state lottery
fund in excess of three million dollars shall be deposited into the
state general fund.

Sec. 952 RCW 70.93.180 and 2005 c 518 s 939 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an account within the state treasury to
be known as the "waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account". Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control
account shall be used as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the department of ecology, for use by the
departments of ecology, natural resources, revenue, transportation, and
corrections, and the parks and recreation commission, for use in litter
collection programs, to be distributed under RCW 70.93.220. The amount
to the department of ecology shall also be used for a central
coordination function for litter control efforts statewide, for the
biennial litter survey under RCW 70.93.200(8), and for statewide public
awareness programs under RCW 70.93.200(7). The amount to the
department shall also be used to defray the costs of administering the
funding, coordination, and oversight of local government programs for
waste reduction, litter control, and recycling, so that local
governments can apply one hundred percent of their funding to achieving
program goals. The amount to the department of revenue shall be used
to enforce compliance with the litter tax imposed in chapter 82.19 RCW;
(b) Twenty percent to the department for local government funding
programs for waste reduction, litter control, and recycling activities
by cities and counties under RCW 70.93.250, to be administered by the
department of ecology; and
(c) Thirty percent to the department of ecology for waste reduction
and recycling efforts.
(2) All taxes imposed in RCW 82.19.010 and fines and bail
forfeitures collected or received pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
and used for the programs under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not less than five percent and no more than ten percent of the
amount appropriated into the waste reduction, recycling, and litter
control account every biennium shall be reserved for capital needs,
including the purchase of vehicles for transporting crews and for
collecting litter and solid waste. Capital funds shall be distributed
among state agencies and local governments according to the same
criteria provided in RCW 70.93.220 for the remainder of the funds, so
that the most effective waste reduction, litter control, and recycling
programs receive the most funding. The intent of this subsection is to
provide funds for the purchase of equipment that will enable the
department to account for the greatest return on investment in terms of
reaching a zero litter goal.
(4) During the ((2005-2007)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the waste reduction, recycling, and
litter control account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, this transfer shall be treated as an
expenditure for litter collection.

Sec. 953 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2008 c 329 s 921, 2008 c 329 s 920,
2008 c 329 s 919, and 2008 c 328 s 6009 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship; ((and))
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150; and
(xiii) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, shoreline update
technical assistance.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) ((Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to
implement programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal
safe drinking water act for public water systems. The department of
health shall reimburse the account from fees assessed under RCW
70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.
(d))) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department
shall partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups.
The department is authorized to use the following additional strategies
in order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) Except during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall
be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be
adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The
primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by
persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to
implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities.
((However, during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, funding may not be
granted to entities engaged in lobbying activities, and applicants may
not be awarded grants if their cumulative grant awards under this
section exceed two hundred thousand dollars.)) No grant may exceed
sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys
appropriated for public participation from either account which are not
expended at the close of any biennium shall revert to the state toxics
control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to ((the
state toxics control)) either the state general fund or the oil spill
prevention account, or both such amounts as reflect excess fund balance
in the account.
(9) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the local
toxics control account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at
Neah Bay, local government shoreline update grants, private and public
sector diesel equipment retrofit, and oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response activities.
(10) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 954 RCW 71.24.310 and 2006 c 333 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and
this chapter can be most efficiently and effectively implemented as
part of the regional support network defined in RCW 71.24.025. For
this reason, the legislature intends that the department and the
regional support networks shall work together to implement chapter
71.05 RCW as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2006, regional support networks shall recommend to
the department the number of state hospital beds that should be
allocated for use by each regional support network. The statewide
total allocation shall not exceed the number of state hospital beds
offering long-term inpatient care, as defined in this chapter, for
which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act.
(2) If there is consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of state hospital beds that should be allocated
for use by each regional support network, the department shall contract
with each regional support network accordingly.
(3) If there is not consensus among the regional support networks
regarding the number of beds that should be allocated for use by each
regional support network, the department shall establish by emergency
rule the number of state hospital beds that are available for use by
each regional support network. The emergency rule shall be effective
September 1, 2006. The primary factor used in the allocation shall be
the estimated number of ((acutely and chronically mentally ill)) adults
with acute and chronic mental illness in each regional support network
area, based upon population-adjusted incidence and utilization.
(4) The allocation formula shall be updated at least every three
years to reflect demographic changes, and new evidence regarding the
incidence of acute and chronic mental illness and the need for long-term inpatient care. In the updates, the statewide total allocation
shall include (a) all state hospital beds offering long-term inpatient
care for which funding is provided in the biennial appropriations act;
plus (b) the estimated equivalent number of beds or comparable
diversion services contracted in accordance with subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) The department is encouraged to enter performance-based
contracts with regional support networks to provide some or all of the
regional support network's allocated long-term inpatient treatment
capacity in the community, rather than in the state hospital. The
performance contracts shall specify the number of patient days of care
available for use by the regional support network in the state
hospital.
(6) If a regional support network uses more state hospital patient
days of care than it has been allocated under subsection (3) or (4) of
this section, or than it has contracted to use under subsection (5) of
this section, whichever is less, it shall reimburse the department for
that care. The reimbursement rate per day shall be the hospital's
total annual budget for long-term inpatient care, divided by the total
patient days of care assumed in development of that budget.
(7) One-half of any reimbursements received pursuant to subsection
(6) of this section shall be used to support the cost of operating the
state hospital and, during calendar year 2009, implementing new
services that will enable a regional support network to reduce its
utilization of the state hospital. The department shall distribute the
remaining half of such reimbursements among regional support networks
that have used less than their allocated or contracted patient days of
care at that hospital, proportional to the number of patient days of
care not used.

Sec. 955 RCW 74.08A.340 and 2008 c 329 s 922 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall operate the
Washington WorkFirst program authorized under RCW 74.08A.200 through
74.08A.330, 43.330.145, 43.215.545, and 74.25.040, and chapter 74.12
RCW within the following constraints:
(1) The full amount of the temporary assistance for needy families
block grant, plus qualifying state expenditures as appropriated in the
biennial operating budget, shall be appropriated to the department each
year in the biennial appropriations act to carry out the provisions of
the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330,
43.330.145, 43.215.545, and 74.25.040, and chapter 74.12 RCW.
(2)(a) The department may expend funds defined in subsection (1) of
this section in any manner that will effectively accomplish the outcome
measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 with the following exception:
Beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium, funds that constitute the
working connections child care program, child care quality programs,
and child care licensing functions.
(b) Beginning in the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
shall appropriate and the departments of early learning and social and
health services shall expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this
section that constitute the working connections child care program,
child care quality programs, and child care licensing functions in a
manner that is consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410.
(c) No more than fifteen percent of the amount provided in
subsection (1) of this section may be spent for administrative
purposes. For the purpose of this subsection, "administrative
purposes" does not include expenditures for information technology and
computerization needed for tracking and monitoring required by P.L.
104-193. The department shall not increase grant levels to recipients
of the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and
43.330.145 and chapter 74.12 RCW, except as authorized in the omnibus
appropriations act for the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 biennium.
(3) The department shall implement strategies that accomplish the
outcome measures identified in RCW 74.08A.410 that are within the
funding constraints in this section. Specifically, the department
shall implement strategies that will cause the number of cases in the
program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and 43.330.145
and chapter 74.12 RCW to decrease by at least fifteen percent during
the 1997-99 biennium and by at least five percent in the subsequent
biennium. The department may transfer appropriation authority between
funding categories within the economic services program in order to
carry out the requirements of this subsection.
(4) The department shall monitor expenditures against the
appropriation levels provided for in subsection (1) of this section.
The department shall quarterly make a determination as to whether
expenditure levels will exceed available funding and communicate its
finding to the legislature. If the determination indicates that
expenditures will exceed funding at the end of the fiscal year, the
department shall take all necessary actions to ensure that all services
provided under this chapter shall be made available only to the extent
of the availability and level of appropriation made by the legislature.

Sec. 956 RCW 77.12.820 and 1997 c 422 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The eastern Washington pheasant enhancement account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts under RCW 77.12.810
must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account are subject to
legislative appropriation and shall be used for the purpose of funding
the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement program. The department
may use moneys from the account to improve pheasant habitat or to
purchase or produce pheasants. Except as otherwise provided in the
omnibus appropriations act for the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, not less
than eighty percent of expenditures from the account must be used to
purchase or produce pheasants. The eastern Washington pheasant
enhancement account funds must not be used for the purchase of land.
The account may be used to offer grants to improve pheasant habitat on
public or private lands that are open to public hunting. The
department may enter partnerships with private landowners, nonprofit
corporations, cooperative groups, and federal or state agencies for the
purposes of pheasant habitat enhancement in areas that will be
available for public hunting.

Sec. 957 RCW 77.32.010 and 2008 c 329 s 923 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a recreational
license issued by the director is required to hunt for or take wild
animals or wild birds, fish for, take, or harvest fish, shellfish, and
seaweed. A recreational fishing or shellfish license is not required
for carp, smelt, and crawfish, and a hunting license is not required
for bullfrogs.
(2) A permit issued by the department is required to park a motor
vehicle upon improved department access facilities.
(3) During the ((2007-09)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium to enable the
implementation of the pilot project established in section 307, chapter
329, Laws of 2008, a fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the
Colville Tribes shall satisfy the license requirements in subsection
(1) of this section on the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north
shore of Lake Rufus Woods, and a Colville Tribes tribal member
identification card shall satisfy the license requirements in
subsection (1) of this section on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods.

Sec. 958 RCW 79.64.040 and 2007 c 522 s 958 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way
issued by the department and affecting state lands and aquatic lands,
provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds from
agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in connection
with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and aquatic lands
other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of navigable
waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the department
pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds of
navigable waters.
(4) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the
moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the
contract harvesting sale.
(5) During the ((2007-2009)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in subsection (3) of this
section may be increased up to thirty percent by the board((, provided
the total amount deducted does not exceed the total appropriations in
the operating and capital budgets for the fiscal period. At the end of
the fiscal period, any amounts deducted in excess of the appropriations
shall be transferred to the appropriate beneficiary distribution
accounts)).

Sec. 959 RCW 79A.25.080 and 2007 c 241 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys transferred to the recreation resource account from the
marine fuel tax refund account may be used when appropriated by the
legislature, as well as any federal or other funds now or hereafter
available, to pay the office and necessary administrative and
coordinative costs of the recreation and conservation funding board
established by RCW 79A.25.110. All moneys so transferred, except those
appropriated as aforesaid, shall be divided into two equal shares and
shall be used to benefit watercraft recreation in this state as
follows:
(((1))) (a) One share as grants to state agencies for (((a))) (i)
acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine
recreation land, (((b))) (ii) capital improvement and renovation of
marine recreation land, including periodic dredging in accordance with
subsection (((3))) (2) of this section, if needed, to maintain or make
the facility more useful, or (((c))) (iii) matching funds in any case
where federal or other funds are made available on a matching basis for
purposes described in (a)(i) or (((b))) (ii) of this subsection;
(((2))) (b) One share as grants to public bodies to help finance
(((a))) (i) acquisition of title to, or any interests or rights in,
marine recreation land, or (((b))) (ii) capital improvement and
renovation of marine recreation land, including periodic dredging in
accordance with subsection (((3))) (2) of this section, if needed, to
maintain or make the facility more useful. A public body is authorized
to use a grant, together with its own contribution, as matching funds
in any case where federal or other funds are made available for
purposes described in (a)(i) or (((b))) (ii) of this subsection. The
board may prescribe further terms and conditions for the making of
grants in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(((3))) (2) For the purposes of this section "periodic dredging" is
limited to dredging of materials that have been deposited in a channel
due to unforeseen events. This dredging should extend the expected
usefulness of the facility for at least five years.
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the
recreation resource account to the state parks and recreation
commission for maintenance and operation of parks and to improve
accessibility for boaters and off-road vehicle users. This
appropriation is not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section.

Sec. 960 RCW 79.105.150 and 2008 c 299 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2009-11
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic lands
enhancement account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect
excess fund balance of the account.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 961 RCW 80.01.080 and 2006 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is created in the state treasury a public service revolving
fund. Regulatory fees payable by all types of public service companies
shall be deposited to the credit of the public service revolving fund.
Except for expenses payable out of the pipeline safety account, all
expense of operation of the Washington utilities and transportation
commission shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund.
During the ((2003-2005)) 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the public service revolving fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.
((Due to the extraordinarily high winter energy costs, during the
2005-2007 fiscal biennium, no more than seven million six hundred
thousand dollars, as appropriated in section 1, chapter 3, Laws of
2006, shall be payable out of the public service revolving fund to
provide energy assistance to customers in accordance with the
low-income energy assistance program.))

Sec. 962 RCW 80.36.430 and 2004 c 254 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded by
a telephone assistance excise tax on all switched access lines and by
funds from any federal government or other programs for this purpose.
Switched access lines are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The telephone
assistance excise tax shall be applied equally to all residential and
business access lines not to exceed fourteen cents per month. The
department shall submit an approved annual budget for the Washington
telephone assistance program to the department of revenue no later than
March 1st prior to the beginning of each fiscal year. The department
of revenue shall then determine the amount of telephone assistance
excise tax to be placed on each switched access line and shall inform
local exchange companies and the utilities and transportation
commission of this amount no later than May 1st. The department of
revenue shall determine the amount of telephone assistance excise tax
by dividing the total of the program budget funded by the telephone
assistance excise tax, as submitted by the department, by the total
number of switched access lines in the prior calendar year. The
telephone assistance excise tax shall be separately identified on each
ratepayer's bill as the "Washington telephone assistance program." All
money collected from the telephone assistance excise tax shall be
transferred to a telephone assistance fund administered by the
department.
(2) Local exchange companies shall bill the fund for their expenses
incurred in offering the telephone assistance program, including
administrative and program expenses. The department shall disburse the
money to the local exchange companies. The department is exempted from
having to conclude a contract with local exchange companies in order to
effect this reimbursement. The department shall recover its
administrative costs from the fund. The department may specify by rule
the range and extent of administrative and program expenses that will
be reimbursed to local exchange companies.
(3) The department shall enter into an agreement with the
department of community, trade, and economic development for an amount
not to exceed eight percent of the prior fiscal year's total revenue
for the administrative and program expenses of providing community
service voice mail services. The community service voice mail service
may include toll-free lines in community action agencies through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no
charge.
(4) During the 2009-2011 biennium, the department shall enter into
an agreement with the military department for one million dollars to
support the WIN 211 program.

Sec. 963 RCW 86.26.007 and 2005 c 518 s 947 are each amended to
read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the general
fund to the flood control assistance account. Each biennium thereafter
the state treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the
general fund to the flood control assistance account, except that
during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall
transfer two million dollars from the general fund to the flood control
assistance account. Moneys in the flood control assistance account may
be spent only after appropriation for purposes specified under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 964 Section 941 of this act expires June 30,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 965 Section 943 of this act expires June 30,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 966 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 967 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATIVE REDUCTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
BELATED CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
BOND EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
CENTRAL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 144
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS NOT IMPAIRED . . . . . . . . . . . . 180
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
COMPENSATION
INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 178
REVISE PENSION CONTRIBUTION RATES . . . . . . . . . . . . 180
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 76
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
O'BRIEN BUILDING IMPROVEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 65
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 86
DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 40
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 68
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
FIRST-TIME HOME BUYERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 181
FORENSIC INVESTIGATION COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
GAMBLING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 180
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
GROWTH MANAGEMENT HEARINGS BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMIN . . . . . . . . . . . . 147
HOME CARE QUALITY AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
INCENTIVE SAVINGS
FY 2010 . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
FY 2011 . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 67
INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
NATURAL RESOURCES ORGANIZATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
OFFICE OF CIVIL LEGAL AID . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
BUDGET STABILIZATION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
CAPITOL BUILDING CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
EMERGENCY FUND . . . . . . . . . . . . 157
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
FIRE CONTINGENCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
SCHOOL EMPLOYEES--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
SMALL AGENCY TECHNOLOGY POOL . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
STATE EMPLOYEES--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
STATE EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
STATE TRANSPORTATION EMPLOYEES--CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
STATE TRANSPORTATION EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
TRANSITIONAL HOUSING OPERATING AND RENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 162
WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 160
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 9
OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
PRINT ASSESSMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 174
PUBLIC BACCALAUREATE INSTITUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 136
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNOLOGY INSTITUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 137, 139
STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
STATE INVESTMENT BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 81
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 152
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 12
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST . . . . . . . . . . . . 155, 156
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
FEDERAL REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 94, 132
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 120
FOR GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
FOR INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
FOR LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 121
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 112
FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 115
FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 131
FOR THE ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
FOR THE LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 129
FOR TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 128
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 145
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
VOLUNTARY SEPARATION AND DOWNSHIFTING INCENTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 142
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
--- END ---