BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
BASIC EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 Article IX, section 1 of the state
Constitution states that "It is the paramount duty of the state to make
ample provision for the education of all children residing within its
borders, without distinction or preference on account of race, color,
caste, or sex."
The state's funding is not ample. In 2005, Washington ranked
forty-sixth in the nation in largest class size, forty-fifth for per
student spending adjusted for cost-of-living, and below the national
average on teacher salaries. The state salary allocation for all
categories of K-12 employees does not reflect districts' actual costs.
In 1993, the state enacted the education reform act. That act made
a significant change in educational requirements to reflect the state's
commitment to bring all students to higher academic standards within a
world-class, internationally competitive public school system.
Although the state set high standards for students and established an
assessment and accountability system for schools and districts, the
state did not provide the funding that districts needed to bring all
students to the new, higher standards.
The purpose of this act is to establish a new funding system for
the state's public schools. Under this act, over the next six years
the state will provide adequate resources for school districts to
maintain educational programs that give all students the opportunity to
meet the state's educational standards. The new system will be more
transparent and will allow greater flexibility to districts to
determine which educational programs best meet the needs of their
students. Districts will have more flexibility in spending state funds
but will be held accountable to meet designated performance outcomes
for all of their students. School districts and schools that do not
meet designated performance outcomes will receive progressive levels of
support and assistance with less flexibility as they work to improve
their student outcomes.
This act creates a permanent commission to oversee the new system
and make recommendations to the legislature each year on the funding
needed to meet the state's definition of basic education and to review
and update the definition of basic education as needed.

Sec. 102 RCW 28A.150.210 and 2007 c 400 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The goal of the basic education act for the schools of the state of
Washington set forth in this chapter shall be to provide students with
the opportunity to become responsible and respectful global citizens,
to contribute to their economic well-being and that of their families
and communities, to explore and understand different perspectives, and
to enjoy productive and satisfying lives. Additionally, the state of
Washington intends to provide for a public school system that is able
to evolve and adapt in order to better focus on strengthening the
educational achievement of all students, which includes high
expectations for all students and gives all students the opportunity to
achieve personal and academic success. To these ends, the goals of
each school district and each school, with the involvement of parents
and community members, shall be to provide opportunities for every
student to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate
successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of
audiences;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history, including
different cultures and participation in representative government;
geography; arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
different experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and
solve problems; and
(4) Understand the importance of work and finance and how
performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future career and
educational opportunities.

Sec. 103 RCW 28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements))
The program established to provide the basic education for regular
students identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be ((considered to be))
implemented by the following ((program)):
(a) Until the 2013-14 school year, each school district not
receiving allocations for full-day kindergarten pursuant to RCW
28A.150.315 shall make available to students enrolled in kindergarten
at least a total instructional offering of four hundred fifty hours.
Districts receiving funding for full-day kindergarten pursuant to RCW
28A.150.315 shall make available to students enrolled in kindergarten
at least a total instructional offering of one thousand hours. The
program shall include instruction in the essential academic learning
requirements under RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.230.095 and such other
subjects and such activities as the school district shall determine to
be appropriate for the education of the school district's students
enrolled in such program, and comport with the program requirements of
RCW 28A.150.315;
(b) Each school district shall make available to students enrolled
in grades one through twelve, at least a district-wide annual average
total instructional hour offering of one thousand hours. The state
board of education may define alternatives to classroom instructional
time for students in grades nine through twelve enrolled in alternative
learning experiences. The state board of education shall establish
rules to determine annual average instructional hours for districts
including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall include the
essential academic learning requirements under RCW ((28A.630.885))
28A.230.095 and such other subjects and such activities as the school
district shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the
school district's students enrolled in such group;
(c) If the essential academic learning requirements include a
requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met
by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian
languages.
(2) Nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to require individual students to attend school for any
particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.
(3) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five
years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one
years of age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred eighty
school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred eighty half days or full days of instruction,
or equivalent, in kindergarten in accordance with subsection (1)(a) of
this section and RCW 28A.150.315: PROVIDED, That effective May 1,
1979, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the
one hundred and eighty day school year for noninstructional purposes in
the case of students who are graduating from high school, including,
but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from
school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could
otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.
(4) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this
section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental
program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

Sec. 104 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2007 c 400 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. The phase-in shall be
completed by the 2012-13 school year. Once a school receives funding
for the all-day kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible
for funding in subsequent school years regardless of changes in the
school's percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
lunches as long as other program requirements are fulfilled.
Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support
shall agree to the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.
(3) ((Any)) During the phase-in period, funds allocated to support
all-day kindergarten programs under this section shall ((not)) be
considered as basic education funding in the schools allocated such
funds. When fully implemented in the 2012-13 school year, all-day
kindergarten shall be part of basic education.
(4) For purposes of this section, "voluntary all-day kindergarten"
means that in districts offering both all-day or half-day kindergarten
parents may choose either a half-day or all-day kindergarten program
for their children.

Sec. 105 RCW 28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
From those funds made available by the legislature for the current
use of the common schools, the superintendent of public instruction
shall distribute annually as provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school
district of the state operating a program approved by the state board
of education an amount which, when combined with an appropriate portion
of such locally available revenues, other than receipts from federal
forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant to RCW
28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies, will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual
average full-time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full
school year of one hundred eighty days, except that for kindergartens
one full school year shall be one hundred eighty full or half days of
instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.315.
((Basic education shall be considered to be fully funded by those
amounts of dollars appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to fund those program requirements
identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance with the formula and ratios
provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of dollars appropriated
by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW 28A.150.100
and 28A.150.410.))
Operation of a program approved by the state board of education,
for the purposes of this section, shall include a finding that the
ratio of students per classroom teacher in grades kindergarten through
three is not greater than the ratio of students per classroom teacher
in grades four and above for such district: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of this section, "classroom teacher" shall be defined as an
instructional employee possessing at least a provisional certificate,
but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose primary
duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and
regulations to insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio
provisions of this section, and such rules and regulations shall allow
for exemptions for those special programs and/or school districts which
may be deemed unable to practicably meet the student/teacher ratio
requirements of this section by virtue of a small number of students.
If a school district's basic education program fails to meet the
basic education requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the state board of education shall
require the superintendent of public instruction to withhold state
funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation until
program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack
of classroom space.

Sec. 106 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2006 c 263 s 322 are each amended to
read as follows:
The basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student shall be determined in accordance with the following
procedures:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students
to staff for the distribution of a basic education allocation for each
annual average full-time equivalent student enrolled in a common
school. The distribution formula shall have the primary objective of
equalizing educational opportunities and shall provide appropriate
recognition of the following costs among the various districts within
the state:
(a) Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;
(b) Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;
(c) Classified staff and their related costs;
(d) Nonsalary costs;
(e) Extraordinary costs, including school facilities, of remote and
necessary schools as judged by the superintendent of public
instruction, with recommendations from the school facilities citizen
advisory panel under RCW 28A.525.025, and small high schools, including
costs of additional certificated and classified staff. Allocations for
extraordinary costs of small school districts shall be increased to
reflect increased staff allocations commencing in the 2009-10 school
year and thereafter; and
(f) The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and
28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing school district.
(2) Basic nonemployee-related costs allocations specified in the
omnibus appropriations act for the 2009-10 school year shall be
increased by twelve and four-tenths percent above maintenance level and
twenty-three and seven-tenths percent for the 2010 school year.
Subsequent school year increases shall be based on recommendations of
the commission for quality education in Washington, established
pursuant to section 202 of this act, to the extent adopted by the
legislature and the governor.
(3)(a) ((This formula for distribution of basic education funds
shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor. The
recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.)) The formula shall be for allocation
purposes only. While the legislature intends that the allocations for
additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of such
staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.
(b) For the 2009-10 school year, the formula adopted by the
legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a minimum: (i)
((Forty-nine)) Fifty-six and thirty-seven one-hundredths certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) ((forty-six)) forty-seven and seven one-hundredths certificated instructional
staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades four through twelve; (iii) four certificated administrative
staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through twelve; and (iv) ((sixteen and sixty-seven)) seventeen and twenty-one one-hundredths classified personnel to
one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in
grades kindergarten through twelve.
(c) ((In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect: PROVIDED, That)) For the 2010-11 school year, the
formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios
at a minimum: (i) Fifty-nine and fifty-six one-hundredths certificated
instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent
students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three; (ii) forty-eight and fourteen one-hundredths certificated instructional staff to
one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades
four through twelve; (iii) four certificated administrative staff to
one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through twelve; and (iv) seventeen and forty-one one-hundredths classified personnel to one thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through
twelve.
(d) The distribution formula developed pursuant to this section
shall be for state apportionment and equalization purposes only and
shall not be construed as mandating specific operational functions of
local school districts other than those program requirements identified
in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The enrollment of any district
shall be the annual average number of full-time equivalent students and
part time students as provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the
first school day of each month and shall exclude full-time equivalent
students with disabilities recognized for the purposes of allocation of
state funds for programs under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100.
The definition of full-time equivalent student shall be determined by
rules of the superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the
definition shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial
budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the office of financial management shall make
a monthly review of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent
students in the common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.
(((3))) (4)(a) Certificated instructional staff shall include those
persons employed by a school district who are nonsupervisory employees
within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional
cases, people of unusual competence but without certification may teach
students so long as a certificated person exercises general
supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the hiring of such classified
people shall not occur during a labor dispute and such classified
people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees during a
labor dispute.
(b) Certificated administrative staff shall include all those
persons who are chief executive officers, chief administrative
officers, confidential employees, supervisors, principals, or assistant
principals within the meaning of RCW 41.59.020(4).
(5) This section expires August 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A 2008 comparative wage analysis conducted by the Washington
institute for public policy that compared educator wages with
noneducator wages found that the prevailing wages for Washington's K-12
teachers and classified staff were below comparable labor market wages.
(2) Pending completion of a comparable wage analysis by the
commission for quality education in Washington as established by
section 202 of this act, staff salary allocations required by RCW
28A.150.260(1) (a), (b), and (c) shall be increased above the cost-of-living adjustments required by RCW 28A.400.205 (Initiative Measure No.
732, chapter 4, Laws of 2001) by three percent for the 2009-10 school
year and two percent for the 2010-11 school year. Subsequent school
year salary adjustments, in addition to those required under RCW
28A.150.260, shall be made based on recommendations of the commission
for quality education in Washington as approved by the governor and the
legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
For the 2011-12 school year and thereafter, it is expected that the
legislature will adopt a replacement basic education allocation formula
based on its consideration of recommendations of the commission for
quality education in Washington pursuant to section 203 of this act
that is based on prototype schools and includes funding for the regular
education of students, special education, bilingual, and learning
assistance.

Sec. 109 RCW 28A.150.370 and 1995 c 335 s 102 and 1995 c 77 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In addition to those state funds provided to school districts for
the regular basic education of students under RCW 28A.150.260, the
legislature shall appropriate ancillary basic education funds for:
Pupil transportation, in accordance with this chapter, RCW 28A.160.150
through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010((, and
for)); special education programs for students with disabilities, in
accordance with RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100; learning
assistance in accordance with RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.900; and
bilingual instruction in accordance with RCW 28A.180.080. The
legislature may appropriate funds to be distributed to school districts
for population factors such as urban costs, enrollment fluctuations,
and for special programs((,)) including, but not limited to,
((vocational-technical institutes,)) compensatory programs, ((bilingual
education,)) urban, rural, racial, and disadvantaged programs, programs
for gifted students, and other special programs. Beginning with the
2011-12 school year and thereafter, allocations for the purposes and
programs in this section may be made as separate categorical program
appropriations or combined in a foundation formula that also includes
the basic education allocation in accordance with RCW 28A.150.260.

Sec. 110 RCW 28A.150.380 and 2001 c 3 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the state general fund for the current
use of the common schools such amounts as needed for state support to
the common schools during the ensuing biennium as provided in this
chapter, chapter 28A.165 RCW, and RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210,
28A.180.080, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.
(2) Through the 2010-11 school year, the state legislature shall
also, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate from
the student achievement fund and education construction fund solely for
the purposes of and in accordance with the provisions of the student
achievement act during the ensuing biennium. Beginning with the
2011-12 school year, the legislature may incorporate the student
achievement fund into a new foundation formula pursuant to the
recommendations of the commission for quality education in Washington
created in section 202 of this act.

Sec. 111 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2007 c 403 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree
may be used to determine compensation allocations under the state
salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus
appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(4)(a) The certificated instructional staff base salary specified
for each district in the omnibus appropriations act pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section shall include allocations for a minimum
of three and two-tenths learning improvement days in the 2009-10 school
year and a minimum of four and three-tenths learning improvement days
in the 2010-11 school year. It is intended that for ensuing school
years, additional learning improvement days, including amounts
available under Initiative Measure No. 728, shall be phased-in by the
legislature considering the recommendations of the commission for
quality education in Washington under section 202 of this act.
(b) A school district is eligible for the learning improvement day
funds only if the learning improvement days have been added to the one
hundred eighty-day contract year. If fewer days are added, the
additional learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted
accordingly. The additional days shall be limited to specific
activities identified in the state-required school improvement plan
related to improving student learning that are consistent with
education reform implementation and shall be considered part of the
basic education allocation. The principal in each school shall assure
that the days are used to provide the necessary school-wide, all-staff
professional development that is tied directly to the school
improvement plan. The school principal and the district superintendent
shall maintain documentation as to their approval of these activities.
The length of a learning improvement day shall not be less than the
length of a full day under the base contract. The superintendent of
public instruction shall ensure that school districts adhere to the
intent and purposes of this subsection.
(5) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the calculation of years
of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers,
counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include
experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational
therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists.
The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool
position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up
to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of
service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be
applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement
system benefits.

Sec. 112 RCW 28A.160.150 and 1996 c 279 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds allocated for transportation costs shall be ((in addition to
the)) an additional basic education allocation. The distribution
formula developed in RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be for
allocation purposes only and shall not be construed as mandating
specific levels of pupil transportation services by local districts.
Operating costs as determined under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180
shall be funded at one hundred percent or as close thereto as
reasonably possible for transportation of an eligible student to and
from school as defined in RCW 28A.160.160(3). In addition, funding
shall be provided for transportation services for students living
within one radius mile from school as determined under RCW
28A.160.180(2).

Sec. 113 RCW 28A.165.055 and 2008 c 321 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Each school district with an approved program is eligible
for state funds provided for the learning assistance program. The
funds shall be appropriated for the learning assistance program in
accordance with the biennial appropriations act. The distribution
formula is for school district allocation purposes only. The
distribution formula shall be based on one or more family income
factors measuring economic need.
(b) The allocation per student specified in the omnibus
appropriations act shall be increased from the three and forty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff per thousand eligible
students in the 2008-09 school year to five and twenty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff per thousand eligible
students in the 2009-10 school year and to seven and six one-hundredths
certificated instructional staff per thousand eligible students in the
2011-12 school year. Subsequent school year increases shall be based
on recommendations of the commission for quality education in
Washington, pursuant to section 203 of this act, to the extent adopted
by the legislature and the governor.
(2) In addition to the funds allocated to eligible school districts
on the basis of family income factors, enhanced funds shall be
allocated for school districts where more than twenty percent of
students are eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual
instruction program under chapter 28A.180 RCW as provided in this
subsection. The enhanced funding provided in this subsection shall
take effect beginning in the 2008-09 school year.
(a) If, in the prior school year, a district's percent of October
headcount student enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve who
are enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program, based
on an average of the program headcount taken in October and May,
exceeds twenty percent, twenty percent shall be subtracted from the
district's percent transitional bilingual instruction program
enrollment and the resulting percent shall be multiplied by the
district's kindergarten through twelve annual average full-time
equivalent enrollment for the prior school year.
(b) The number calculated under (a) of this subsection shall be the
number of additional funded students for purposes of this subsection,
to be multiplied by the per-funded student allocation rates specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(c) School districts are only eligible for the enhanced funds under
this subsection if their percentage of October headcount enrollment in
grades kindergarten through twelve eligible for free or reduced-price
lunch exceeded forty percent in the prior school year.

Sec. 114 RCW 28A.180.080 and 1995 c 335 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and submit
biennially to the governor and the legislature a budget request for
bilingual instruction programs. Through the 2010-11 school year,
moneys appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of RCW
28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 shall be allocated by the
superintendent of public instruction to school districts for the sole
purpose of operating an approved bilingual instruction program;
priorities for funding shall exist for the early elementary grades.
Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, funding for bilingual
instruction programs may be combined into a foundation formula pursuant
to RCW 28A.150.370. No moneys shall be allocated pursuant to this
section to fund more than three school years of bilingual instruction
for each eligible pupil within a district: PROVIDED, That such moneys
may be allocated to fund more than three school years of bilingual
instruction for any pupil who fails to demonstrate improvement in
English language skills adequate to remove impairment of learning when
taught only in English. The superintendent of public instruction shall
set standards and approve a test for the measurement of such English
language skills.

PART 2
TWO-WAY ACCOUNTABILITY AND THE COMMISSION FOR
QUALITY EDUCATION IN WASHINGTON
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
State funding formulas have evolved over time to accommodate a
variety of factors but have not been updated routinely based on changes
in current conditions including changes in the cost-of-living, economic
circumstances, or findings on best practices of student instruction,
and school management and leadership. Regular updates would reflect
new data aligning state funding with the resources students and schools
need to meet state standards.
A system in which the state and school districts share
accountability for achieving state educational standards requires new
mechanisms that will clearly define the relationship of expectations
for the state, school districts, and schools.
A commission is established, pursuant to section 202 of this act,
that is accountable to the legislature and the governor with duties and
responsibilities as specified in section 203 of this act. This
commission will devote the necessary time and energy to making reasoned
and rational determinations of educational needs and expected
performance, make budget and policy recommendations to the legislature
and governor, and evaluate the overall functioning of the public
schools to optimize system efficiency and effectiveness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The commission for quality education in Washington is created.
(2) The commission shall be composed of eleven members who are
residents of the state of Washington as follows:
(a) Five shall be members representing the educational system
appointed by the governor;
(b) The superintendent of public instruction; and
(c) Five other members appointed by the governor.
(3)(a) In order to establish staggered terms, initial appointments
shall be for terms from one to four years in length, with the terms
expiring on the second Monday of January of the applicable year. As
the terms of the first appointees expire or vacancies on the commission
occur, the governor shall appoint or reappoint members of the
commission to complete the initial terms or to four-year terms, as
appropriate.
(b) Appointees must be individuals who have demonstrated interest
in public schools and are supportive of educational improvement, have
a positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient time to
the responsibilities of the commission.
(c) All gubernatorial appointments to the commission are subject to
confirmation by the senate.
(d) With the exception of the superintendent of public instruction,
no person may serve as a member of the commission for more than two
consecutive full four-year terms.
(4) The governor may remove an appointed member of the commission
for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office,
or for incompetent or unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter
18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall file with the secretary
of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from
office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of the
statement of causes for and order of removal to the last known post
office address of the member.
(5)(a) The chair of the commission shall be elected by a majority
vote of the members of the commission. The chair of the commission
shall serve a term of two years, and may be reelected to an additional
term. A member of the commission may not serve as chair for more than
two consecutive terms.
(b) Six voting members of the commission constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business.
(6) Members of the commission appointed by the governor who are not
public employees shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out
the duties of the commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law,
the commission shall:
(a) Determine annually the resources necessary to make ample
provision for the education of all Washington public education students
by creating and updating prototype schools that represent hypothetical
models of schools that could achieve all basic education standards
effectively and at specified levels. These prototypes shall contain
detailed specifications of the programs, staffing, and resources
sufficient to enable all students to meet state and federal standards
and to offer a program of education consistent with state and federal
mandates, rules, and regulations;
(b) Review the results of each legislative session pertaining to
actions that have a potential fiscal impact on public schools. For
each such action, the commission shall determine the fiscal impact and
incorporate into the prototype schools sufficient resources to comply
with all enacted laws, regulations, and rules;
(c) Apply a set of adjustments to the prototype schools that take
into account variations in the cost of educating students to basic
education standards by school size, region, family income level, and
other relevant student demographic factors;
(d) Conduct a comparative labor market analysis every two years of
salaries and other compensation for school district employees in
Washington:
(i) That examines salaries and other compensation for teachers,
other certificated instructional staff, principals and other building-level certificated administrators, and the types of classified school
employees for whom salaries are allocated;
(ii) That is calculated at a statewide level and that identifies
labor markets in Washington through the use of data from the United
States bureau of the census and the bureau of labor statistics;
(iii) That also includes a comparison of salaries and other
compensation to the appropriate labor market for at least the following
subgroups of educators:
(A) Beginning teachers; and
(B) Types of educational staff associates;
(iv) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(d), "salaries and
other compensation" includes average base salaries, average total
salaries, average employee basic benefits, and retirement benefits;
(e) Identify a comprehensive set of performance indicators that can
be quantified and collected longitudinally in order to track the
performance of Washington schools along a number of key dimensions that
represent basic education standards for schooling, including but not
necessarily limited to student performance, and review the results from
the data collected on each of the performance indicators and issue a
report to the governor and the legislature by December 1st of each year
assessing the performance of Washington schools relative to basic
education standards. The assessment shall take into account the
resources provided in relation to the performance achieved;
(f) Develop a means to calculate expected performance of Washington
schools relative to basic education standards when provided full
funding at the level identified by the prototype schools and at funding
levels below full funding. The purpose is to establish appropriate
performance expectations for schools in relation to funding provided.
If funding provided is less than that identified as necessary to
accomplish basic education standards, the expectations for schools
shall be adjusted accordingly;
(g) Determine annually the projected performance of Washington
schools in relation to the proportion of full funding provided to
schools for basic education and forecast future expected performance of
Washington schools at varying funding levels from less than full
funding sufficient to meet basic education standards to full funding.
By December 1, 2010, and each year thereafter, the commission shall
submit a report of the findings to the governor, legislature, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education;
(h) Review existing data sources and identify additional data
necessary to determine the relation between funding and achievement of
basic education standards. In the process of developing this
relational model, the commission shall identify areas where additional
data are necessary and make recommendations to the governor and
legislature regarding the nature and functioning of a comprehensive
data system to support accurate determinations of school funding needs
and projected performance expectations. By December 1, 2010, and each
year thereafter, the commission shall recommend new data sources
necessary to improve the accuracy of resource and performance estimates
along with ways to improve existing data sources so that they yield
more precise, useful information that improves the descriptive and
predictive capabilities of commission models;
(i) By December 1, 2010, and each year thereafter, issue a
technical report to the governor, the superintendent of public
instruction, and appropriate legislative committees. This report shall
document the level of funding necessary to meet all state and federal
standards and basic education requirements and related mandates,
compare this to the current and projected levels of funding for
education, and consider scenarios that describe the impact of various
funding levels on the performance of the educational system;
(j) Conduct feasibility studies and analyses to determine the
proportion of the student population that can be expected to achieve
any given performance standard in order to establish the performance
levels schools are expected to meet.
(i) The studies in this subsection (1)(j) shall take into account
factors beyond the school's ability to control that might prevent a
student from reaching a performance level or achieving a performance
standard. Examples include students who may have physiological or
cognitive limitations not amenable to instructional intervention, the
proportion of students who at any given time may be unable to engage in
schooling for any of a range of reasons, or any groups of students that
could not be expected to reach a performance standard for reasons such
as having not attended school in Washington long enough to have learned
any of the tested material or to have learned English well enough to
understand material being tested or the test questions themselves.
(ii) Before each legislative session, the commission shall review
and update the identified assumptions about the structural limitations
inherent in the student population that prevent all students from
achieving target performance levels based on any new evidence or
examples of programs that demonstrated actual performance of students
with special conditions;
(k) By December 1, 2010, and each year thereafter, prepare and
release a nontechnical report to the general public highlighting
progress or issues in funding to the level identified by the commission
as necessary to fulfill constitutional obligations. This report shall
contain analyses of the potential reasons Washington schools were
achieving expected performance levels or failing to do so; and
(l) To assist in preparing the various reports, use advisory
committees and technical panels composed of educators and members of
the private and public sector with expertise on systems analysis and
data-driven outcomes measurement systems.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide staff for the commission. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall maintain web pages for the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature may fund K-12 at levels other than those identified
by the commission for quality education in Washington. The legislature
must issue a report not later than August 1st of each year, detailing
the degree to which appropriated amounts for public schools differ from
recommendation of the commission for quality education in Washington
and the implications and ramifications of the differences on the
performance of students, schools, and school districts.

PART 3
ACCOUNTABILITY AND EXPECTATIONS OF A SUCCESSFULLY
FUNCTIONING FULLY FUNDED K-12 EDUCATION SYSTEM
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 State expectations of school districts
need to transition from input and seat time variables to accountability
for performance based on multiple measures of achievement, including
assessment results, on-time graduation rates, grade progression, and
attendance. Districts would then be responsible for providing
effective educational opportunities to students in proportion to the
state funding provided. Districts exercise local control over how to
best meet the state's performance objectives and accountability
requirements.
Struggling schools and school districts should receive progressive
levels of support and assistive measures after a thorough diagnosis is
undertaken to determine the reasons they are struggling. The objective
is to improve these schools and districts so that they are capable of
meeting state standards.
By December 1, 2010, the state board of education, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the professional educator
standards board shall report to the governor and the legislature on
ways to measure and implement the following accountability measures:
(1) Students:
(a) Should enter kindergarten and each subsequent grade level ready
to learn;
(b) Are connected to school and engaged in academics and
extracurricular programs;
(c) Should reach designated performance standards through
successful completion of academic programs as measured by multiple
assessments at rates established by the commission for quality
education in Washington; and
(d) Should progress from grade to grade and graduate on time from
high school at least at rates predicted by the commission for quality
education in Washington based on state funding levels.
(2) Classroom practices: Whether curricula and instruction are
aligned with state education standards and are designed to incorporate
effective instructional methods.
(3) Teachers:
(a) Should possess the content knowledge base, technical skills,
and human relations capabilities to enable students to meet specified
learning requirements; and
(b) Are responsible for addressing student learning needs.
(4) Schools:
(a) Are organized in ways that facilitate student learning;
(b) Involve parents and community members;
(c) Demonstrate the ability to adapt to changes in the
characteristics of the student population;
(d) Create a culture based on the belief that all students can
learn and that all willing students can achieve state learning
requirements;
(e) Provide a safe and orderly learning environment;
(f) Use data and analysis to improve instructional programs; and
(g) Address the needs of the support staff.
(5) Central administration:
(a) Is accountable to the school board for management and operation
of the district and for achievement of specified performance standards
related to student learning;
(b) Supports student learning needs by making strategic and
operational decisions based on improving student learning;
(c) Manages long-range strategic and operational plans;
(d) Ensures that laws, policies, procedures, and contracts are
followed; and
(e) Advocates for student and staff needs.
(6) Local school boards:
(a) Set long-range policy strategies and purposes;
(b) Hold school administrators accountable for achieving designated
goals;
(c) Set policies that establish the conditions under which learning
can take place and performance standards can be achieved; and
(d) Monitor district operation and adherence to state, state board
of education, and office of the superintendent of public instruction
policies.
(7) Executive branch:
(a) Appoints and provides resources for the commission for quality
education in Washington;
(b) Develops a biennial education budget consistent with commission
for quality education in Washington guidelines; and
(c) Forwards recommendations for revisions and adjustments to basic
education definition to the legislature.
(8) Legislative branch:
(a) Supports basic education by providing ample, stable, and
equitable funding;
(b) Reviews its definition of basic education to maintain currency;
(c) Establishes state education performance standards; and
(d) Sets accountability expectations for schools.

PART 4
RESOURCES FOR IMPLEMENTING FULL FUNDING OF BASIC EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 43.79
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The full funding of basic education account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. All receipts from section 402 of this act and RCW
84.52.043(1)(b) shall be deposited into the account. The funds may be
expended only for the following purposes:
(a) To improve certificated instructional and classified staff per-student ratios in state basic education allocation formulas above
maintenance levels in each succeeding school year;
(b) To increase funding for nonemployee-related costs in basic
education formulas above maintenance level amounts in each succeeding
school year;
(c) To phase-in full-day kindergarten for additional schools above
levels funded in the 2008-09 school year in the omnibus appropriations
act, chapter 329, Laws of 2008;
(d) To fund the increased costs above maintenance level of
implementing a new pupil transportation formula;
(e) To increase the percentage of local school district maintenance
and operation levy revenue equalized through local effort assistance
above the twelve percent rate specified in RCW 28A.500.020.
(2) Full funding of basic education account funds shall not be used
for state maintenance level budget adjustments from one school year to
the next and shall be used only for formula improvements in each
succeeding year as specified in subsection (1)(a) through (e) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 43.79
RCW to read as follows:
By September 30, 2009, and by September 30th of each odd-numbered
year thereafter, if the prior fiscal biennium's general state revenues
exceed the previous fiscal biennium's revenues by more than five
percent, subject to appropriation by the legislature, the state
treasurer shall transfer fifty percent of the amount over five percent
to the full funding of basic education account.

Sec. 403 RCW 84.52.043 and 2005 c 122 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state shall not exceed three dollars and ((sixty))
thirty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to
the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed
by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the
support of the common schools; (b) the full funding for basic education
levy by the state shall not exceed twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in
accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of
revenue to be used exclusively to support the purposes in section 401
of this act; (c) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar and
eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (((c))) (d) the
levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (((d))) (e) the levy
by any city or town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and
one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any
county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and
eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and
one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general
county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road
district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district
has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; and (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts
that are protected under RCW 84.52.125.

Sec. 404 RCW 84.55.005 and 2007 sp.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of
economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of
the year before the taxes are payable;
(2) "Limit factor" means:
(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten
thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred
one percent;
(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized
under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under
that section or one hundred one percent;
(c) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent
or one hundred percent plus inflation; and
(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140, except that it does not include tax levies under RCW
84.52.043(1)(b).

PART 5
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 501 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2006 c 119 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full-time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation for the regular
education of students as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Bilingual education;
(iv) Education of highly capable students;
(((iv))) (v) Compensatory education, including but not limited to
learning assistance, migrant education, Indian education, and refugee
programs((, and bilingual education));
(((v))) (vi) Food services; and
(((vi))) (vii) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2011, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended
by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the
district received in the current school year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(a) by any additional per student allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocations the district
actually received the prior school year pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offset the
amount added to a district's levy base pursuant to this subsection
(4)(b) by any additional salary increase allocations included in a
district's levy base pursuant to the enactment of an initiative to the
people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (6) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(11) Effective for the 2010-11 school year, the superintendent
shall make the necessary changes in the accounting manual requiring
school districts to account for expenditures of maintenance and
operations levy revenues as a separate program or programs.

Sec. 502 RCW 84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined
in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (4) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full-time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation for the regular
education of students as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Bilingual education;
(iv) Education of highly capable students;
(((iv))) (v) Compensatory education, including but not limited to
learning assistance, migrant education, Indian education, and refugee
programs((, and bilingual education));
(((v))) (vi) Food services; and
(((vi))) (vii) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter; plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered
percentage determined as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(5) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of
this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes,
compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are
or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the
most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies
are to be collected.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means
the year immediately following the prior school year.
(8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and regulations and inform school districts of the pertinent data
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(10) Effective for the 2010-11 school year and thereafter, the
superintendent shall make the necessary changes in the accounting
manual requiring school districts to account for expenditures of
maintenance and operations levy revenues as a separate program or
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Section 501 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 Section 502 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---