BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.2501 and 2002 c 68 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
((An emergency has been caused by the)) The department has a need
to expeditiously site and construct facilities to house sexually
violent predators who have been committed under this chapter. To meet
this ((emergency)) need, for purposes of RCW 71.09.250 and 71.09.342,
"all other laws" means the state environmental policy act, the
shoreline management act, the hydraulics code, and all other state laws
regulating the protection and use of the water, land, and air.
This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2017.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21C.270 and 2002 c 68 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
((An emergency has been caused by the)) The department of social
and health services has a need to expeditiously site and construct
facilities to house sexually violent predators who have been committed
under chapter 71.09 RCW. To meet this ((emergency)) need, secure
community transition facilities sited pursuant to the preemption
provisions of RCW 71.09.342 and secure facilities sited pursuant to the
preemption provisions of RCW 71.09.250 are not subject to the
provisions of this chapter.
This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2017.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.390 and 2002 c 68 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
((An emergency has been caused by the)) The department of social
and health services has a need to expeditiously site and construct
facilities to house sexually violent predators who have been committed
under chapter 71.09 RCW. To meet this ((emergency)) need, secure
community transition facilities sited pursuant to the preemption
provisions of RCW 71.09.342 and secure facilities sited pursuant to the
preemption provisions of RCW 71.09.250 are not subject to the
provisions of this chapter.
This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2017.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.55.071 and 2002 c 68 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
((An emergency has been caused by the)) The department of social
and health services has a need to expeditiously site and construct
facilities to house sexually violent predators who have been committed
under chapter 71.09 RCW. To meet this ((emergency)) need, secure
community transition facilities sited pursuant to the preemption
provisions of RCW 71.09.342 and secure facilities sited pursuant to the
preemption provisions of RCW 71.09.250 are not subject to the
provisions of this chapter.
This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---