BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.105 and 1994 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((In entering or modifying)) Whenever a child support order is
entered or modified under this chapter, ((the court shall require)) the
court shall provide medical support for any child named in the order,
in the nature of health care coverage or cash medical support, as
provided in this section.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Cash medical support" means the amount that a parent must pay
to the other parent as a proportionate share of the cost of uninsured
medical expenses and the cost of health insurance coverage provided by
medicaid or by another parent.
(b) "Health insurance coverage" does not include medical assistance
provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(c) "Proportionate share" means the parent's share of the expense
that is the same percentage as the parent's share of the combined
monthly net income of both parents as computed when determining a
parent's child support obligation under chapter 26.19 RCW.
(3)(a) Either or both parents ((to)) shall maintain or provide
health insurance coverage ((except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section,)) for any child named in the order if:
(((a))) (i) Coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or
becomes available to that parent through employment or is union-related; and
(((b))) (ii) The cost of such coverage does not exceed twenty-five
percent of the ((obligated)) providing parent's basic child support
obligation.
(((2))) (b) The court ((shall consider the best interests of the
child and have discretion to)) may order a parent to provide health
insurance coverage ((when entering or modifying a support order under
this chapter if the cost of such coverage)) that exceeds twenty-five
percent of the ((obligated)) providing parent's basic support
obligation if it is in the best interests of the child to provide
coverage.
(((3))) (4) A parent who provides health insurance coverage may:
(a) Have the premium paid for health insurance coverage included in
the calculation of child support under chapter 26.19 RCW if coverage is
being provided at the time the order is entered; or
(b) Seek to enforce cash medical support in the amount of the other
parent's proportionate share of the insurance premium, not to exceed
twenty-five percent of the obligated parent's basic child support
obligation.
(5) If no private health insurance coverage is otherwise available
and a parent is receiving health insurance coverage for the child
through medicaid, the other parent shall pay cash medical support in an
amount equal to the obligated parent's proportionate share of the
health insurance premium, not to exceed twenty-five percent of the
obligated parent's basic child support obligation.
(6) Each parent is responsible for his or her proportionate share
of uninsured medical expenses for the child or children covered by the
support order.
(7) The parents ((shall)) must maintain ((such)) health insurance
coverage as required under this section until:
(a) Further order of the court;
(b) The child is emancipated, if there is no express language to
the contrary in the order; or
(c) Health insurance is no longer available through the parents'
employer or union and no conversion privileges exist to continue
coverage following termination of employment.
(((4))) (8) A parent who is required to extend health insurance
coverage to a child under this section is liable for any covered health
care costs for which the parent receives direct payment from an
insurer.
(((5))) (9) This section shall not be construed to limit the
authority of the court to enter or modify support orders containing
provisions for payment of uninsured health expenses, health care costs,
or insurance premiums which are in addition to and not inconsistent
with this section.
(((6))) (10) A parent ordered to provide health insurance coverage
((shall)) must provide proof of such coverage or proof that such
coverage is unavailable within twenty days of the entry of the order
to:
(a) The physical custodian; or
(b) The department of social and health services if the parent has
been notified or ordered to make support payments to the Washington
state support registry.
(((7))) (11) Every order requiring a parent to provide health care
or insurance coverage ((shall)) must be entered in compliance with RCW
26.23.050 and be subject to direct enforcement as provided under
chapter 26.18 RCW.
(((8) "Health insurance coverage" as used in this section does not
include medical assistance provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.)) (12) The
department of social and health services has rule-making authority to
enact rules in compliance with 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304, 305, and
308.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.18.170 and 2007 c 143 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a parent ((who)) has been ordered to provide ((health
insurance coverage)) medical support for a dependent child ((fails to
provide such coverage or lets it lapse)), the department or a parent
may seek enforcement of the ((coverage order)) medical support as
provided under this section.
(2) The department may first attempt to enforce a parent's
requirement to provide health insurance coverage for the dependent
child. If health insurance coverage is not available through the
parent's employment or union at a cost not to exceed twenty-five
percent of the parent's basic support obligation, or as otherwise
provided in the support order, the department may enforce any cash
medical support obligation ordered to be provided under RCW 26.09.105
or 74.20A.300.
(3) A parent seeking to enforce another parent's cash medical
support obligation under RCW 26.09.105 may initiate an action in
superior court to determine the amount owed by the obligated parent.
(4)(a) The department may serve a notice of support owed under RCW
26.23.110 on a parent to determine the amount of the obligated parent's
cash medical support obligation.
(b) Whether or not the child receives temporary assistance for
needy families or medicaid, the department may enforce the obligated
parent's cash medical support obligation on behalf of the other parent.
When the child receives state-financed medical coverage through the
department under chapter 74.09 RCW for which there is an assignment,
the department may disburse amounts collected to the other parent to be
used for the medical costs of the child or the department may retain
amounts collected and apply them toward the cost of providing the
child's state-financed medical coverage. The department may disregard
cash medical support payments in accordance with federal law.
(5)(a) If the ((parent's)) order to provide health insurance
coverage contains language notifying the parent ordered to provide
coverage that failure to provide such coverage or proof that such
coverage is unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order
and orders payments through, or has been submitted to, the Washington
state support registry for enforcement, then the department may,
without further notice to the parent, send a national medical support
notice pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19), and sections 401 (e) and
(f) of the federal child support and performance incentive act of 1998
to the parent's employer or union. The notice shall be served:
(i) By regular mail;
(ii) In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a
civil action;
(iii) By certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(iv) By electronic means if there is an agreement between the
secretary of the department and the person, firm, corporation,
association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to accept service
by electronic means.
(b) The notice shall require the employer or union to enroll the
child in the health insurance plan as provided in subsection (((3)))
(8) of this section.
(c) The returned part A of the national medical support notice to
the division of child support by the employer constitutes proof of
service of the notice in the case where the notice was served by
regular mail.
(((d))) (6) Upon receipt of a national medical support notice from
a child support agency operating under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act:
(a) The parent's employer or union shall comply with the provisions
of the notice, including meeting response time frames and withholding
requirements required under part A of the notice;
(b) The parent's employer or union shall also be responsible for
complying with forwarding part B of the notice to the child's plan
administrator, if required by the notice;
(c) The plan administrator is responsible for complying with the
provisions of the notice.
(7) If the parent's order to provide health insurance coverage does
not order payments through, and has not been submitted to, the
Washington state support registry for enforcement:
(((i))) (a) The parent seeking enforcement may, without further
notice to the other parent, send a certified copy of the order
requiring health insurance coverage to the ((obligor's)) parent's
employer or union by certified mail, return receipt requested; and
(((ii))) (b) The parent seeking enforcement shall attach a
notarized statement to the order declaring that the order is the latest
order addressing coverage entered by the court and require the employer
or union to enroll the child in the health insurance plan as provided
in subsection (((3))) (8) of this section.
(((3))) (8) Upon receipt of an order that provides for health
insurance coverage:
(a) The parent's employer or union shall answer the party who sent
the order within twenty days and confirm that the child:
(i) Has been enrolled in the health insurance plan;
(ii) Will be enrolled; or
(iii) Cannot be covered, stating the reasons why such coverage
cannot be provided;
(b) The employer or union shall withhold any required premium from
the parent's income or wages;
(c) If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union, and
each plan may be extended to cover the child, then the child shall be
enrolled in the parent's plan. If the parent's plan does not provide
coverage which is accessible to the child, the child shall be enrolled
in the least expensive plan otherwise available to the parent;
(d) The employer or union shall provide information about the name
of the health insurance coverage provider or issuer and the extent of
coverage available to the parent and shall make available any necessary
claim forms or enrollment membership cards.
(((4) Upon receipt of a national medical support notice from a
child support agency operating under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act:
(a) The parent's employer or union shall comply with the provisions
of the notice, including meeting response time frames and withholding
requirements required under part A of the notice;
(b) The parent's employer or union shall also be responsible for
complying with forwarding part B of the notice to the child's plan
administrator, if required by the notice;
(c) The plan administrator shall be responsible for complying with
the provisions of the notice.
(5))) (9) If the order for coverage contains no language notifying
either or both parents that failure to provide health insurance
coverage or proof that such coverage is unavailable may result in
direct enforcement of the order, the department or the parent seeking
enforcement may serve a written notice of intent to enforce the order
on the other parent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by
personal service. If the parent required to provide medical support
fails to provide written proof that such coverage has been obtained or
applied for or fails to provide proof that such coverage is unavailable
within twenty days of service of the notice, the department or the
parent seeking enforcement may proceed to enforce the order directly as
provided in subsection (((2))) (5) of this section.
(((6))) (10) If the parent ordered to provide health insurance
coverage elects to provide coverage that will not be accessible to the
child because of geographic or other limitations when accessible
coverage is otherwise available, the department or the parent seeking
enforcement may serve a written notice of intent to purchase health
insurance coverage on the parent required to provide medical support by
certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice shall also
specify the type and cost of coverage.
(((7))) (11) If the department serves a notice under subsection
(((6))) (10) of this section the parent required to provide medical
support shall, within twenty days of the date of service:
(a) File an application for an adjudicative proceeding; or
(b) Provide written proof to the department that the parent has
either applied for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.
(((8))) (12) If the parent seeking enforcement serves a notice
under subsection (((6))) (10) of this section, within twenty days of
the date of service the parent required to provide medical support
shall provide written proof to the parent seeking enforcement that the
parent required to provide medical support has either applied for, or
obtained, coverage accessible to the child.
(((9))) (13) If the parent required to provide medical support
fails to respond to a notice served under subsection (((6))) (10) of
this section to the party who served the notice, the party who served
the notice may purchase the health insurance coverage specified in the
notice directly. The amount of the monthly premium shall be added to
the support debt and be collectible without further notice. The amount
of the monthly premium may be collected or accrued until the parent
required to provide medical support provides proof of the required
coverage.
(((10))) (14) The signature of the parent seeking enforcement or of
a department employee shall be a valid authorization to the coverage
provider or issuer for purposes of processing a payment to the child's
health services provider. An order for health insurance coverage shall
operate as an assignment of all benefit rights to the parent seeking
enforcement or to the child's health services provider, and in any
claim against the coverage provider or issuer, the parent seeking
enforcement or his or her assignee shall be subrogated to the rights of
the parent obligated to provide medical support for the child.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section regarding assignment of
benefits, this section shall not require a health care service
contractor authorized under chapter 48.44 RCW or a health maintenance
organization authorized under chapter 48.46 RCW to deviate from their
contractual provisions and restrictions regarding reimbursement for
covered services. If the coverage is terminated, the employer shall
mail a notice of termination to the department or the parent seeking
enforcement at that parent's last known address within thirty days of
the termination date.
(((11))) (15) This section shall not be construed to limit the
right of the parents or parties to the support order to bring an action
in superior court at any time to enforce, modify, or clarify the
original support order.
(((12))) (16) Where a child does not reside in the issuer's service
area, an issuer shall cover no less than urgent and emergent care.
Where the issuer offers broader coverage, whether by policy or
reciprocal agreement, the issuer shall provide such coverage to any
child otherwise covered that does not reside in the issuer's service
area.
(((13))) (17) If a parent required to provide medical support fails
to pay his or her portion, determined under RCW 26.19.080, of any
deductible, copay, or uninsured medical expense incurred on behalf of
the child, pursuant to a child support order, the department or the
obligee parent may enforce collection of that parent's portion of the
deductible, copay, or uninsured medical expense incurred on behalf of
the child. If the department is enforcing the order, the parent
required to provide medical support shall have his or her portion of
the deductible, copay, or uninsured medical expenses incurred on behalf
of the child added to the support debt and be collectible without
further notice, following the reduction of the expenses to a sum
certain either in a court order or by the department, pursuant to RCW
26.23.110.
(((14))) (18) The department has rule-making authority to enact
rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec.
666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of
2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to
implement regulations required under ((parts)) 45 C.F.R. Parts 302,
303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.18.180 and 2000 c 86 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((An obligated parent's)) The employer or union of a parent who
has been ordered to provide health insurance coverage shall be liable
for a fine of up to one thousand dollars per occurrence, if the
employer or union fails or refuses, within twenty days of receiving the
order or notice for health insurance coverage to:
(a) Promptly enroll the ((obligated)) parent's child in the health
insurance plan; or
(b) Make a written answer to the person or entity who sent the
order or notice for health insurance coverage stating that the child:
(i) Will be enrolled in the next available open enrollment period;
or
(ii) Cannot be covered and explaining the reasons why coverage
cannot be provided.
(2) Liability may be established and the fine may be collected by
the office of support enforcement under chapter 74.20A or 26.23 RCW
using any of the remedies contained in those chapters.
(3) Any employer or union who enrolls a child in a health insurance
plan in compliance with chapter 26.18 RCW shall be exempt from
liability resulting from such enrollment.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.23.050 and 2007 c 143 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the division of child support is providing support
enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for
support enforcement services by signing the application form on the
bottom of the support order, the superior court shall include in all
court orders that establish or modify a support obligation:
(a) A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to
make all support payments to the Washington state support registry;
(b) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) A statement that the receiving parent might be required to
submit an accounting of how the support, including any cash medical
support, is being spent to benefit the child;
(d) A statement that any parent required to provide health
insurance coverage for the child or children covered by the order must
notify the division of child support and the other parent when the
coverage terminates; and
(((d))) (e) A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to
obtain and maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be
renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a
support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.
As used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section,
"good cause not to require immediate income withholding" means a
written determination of why implementing immediate wage withholding
would not be in the child's best interests and, in modification cases,
proof of timely payment of previously ordered support.
(2) In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section,
the court may order the responsible parent to make payments directly to
the person entitled to receive the payments, to the Washington state
support registry, or may order that payments be made in accordance with
an alternate arrangement agreed upon by the parties.
(a) The superior court shall include in all orders under this
subsection that establish or modify a support obligation:
(i) A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state, without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the court order, unless:
(A) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding and
that withholding should be delayed until a payment is past due; or
(B) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement; ((and))
(ii) A statement that the receiving parent may be required to
submit an accounting of how the support is being spent to benefit the
child;
(iii) A statement that any parent required to provide health
insurance coverage for the child or children covered by the order must
notify the division of child support and the other parent when the
coverage terminates; and
(iv) A statement that a parent seeking to enforce the other
parent's obligation to provide health insurance coverage may initiate
an action in the superior court.
As used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate
income withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.
(b) The superior court may order immediate or delayed income
withholding as follows:
(i) Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible
parent has earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under
this subsection, all support payments shall be paid to the Washington
state support registry. The superior court shall issue a mandatory
wage assignment order as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW when the
support order is signed by the court. The parent entitled to receive
the transfer payment is responsible for serving the employer with the
order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18 RCW.
(ii) If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court
shall require that income withholding be delayed until a payment is
past due. The support order shall contain a statement that withholding
action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and
liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to
the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.
(c) If a mandatory wage withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW
is issued under this subsection and the division of child support
provides support enforcement services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing
wage withholding assignment is prospectively superseded upon the
division of child support's subsequent service of an income withholding
notice.
(3) The office of administrative hearings and the department of
social and health services shall require that all support obligations
established as administrative orders include a provision which orders
and directs that the responsible parent shall make all support payments
to the Washington state support registry. All administrative orders
shall also state that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and
maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed,
or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All administrative orders shall
also state that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and
personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state without further notice to the responsible parent at any time
after entry of the order, unless:
(a) One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer
finds, that there is good cause not to require immediate income
withholding; or
(b) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
presiding officer that provides for an alternate agreement.
(4) If the support order does not include the provision ordering
and directing that all payments be made to the Washington state support
registry and a statement that withholding action may be taken against
wages, earnings, assets, or benefits if a support payment is past due
or at any time after the entry of the order, or that a parent's
licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be suspended, the
division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible parent
stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by
personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.
(5) Every support order shall state:
(a) The address where the support payment is to be sent;
(b) That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings,
assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state,
without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after
entry of a support order, unless:
(i) One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that
there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or
(ii) The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the
court that provides for an alternate arrangement;
(c) The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is
unknown and the income upon which the support award is based;
(d) The support award as a sum certain amount;
(e) The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;
(f) The names and ages of the dependent children;
(g) A provision requiring both the responsible parent and the
custodial parent to keep the Washington state support registry informed
of whether he or she has access to health insurance coverage at
reasonable cost and, if so, the health insurance policy information;
(h) That either or both the responsible parent and the custodial
parent shall be obligated to provide ((health insurance coverage))
medical support for his or her child through health insurance coverage
if coverage that can be extended to cover the child is or becomes
available to the parent through employment or is union-related, or, in
the absence of such coverage, through an additional sum certain amount,
as a cash medical support obligation as provided under RCW 26.09.105;
(i) That a parent providing health insurance coverage must notify
both the division of child support and the other parent when coverage
terminates;
(j) That if proof of health insurance coverage or proof that the
coverage is unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the parent
seeking enforcement or the department may seek direct enforcement of
the coverage through the employer or union of the parent required to
provide medical support without further notice to the parent as
provided under chapter 26.18 RCW;
(((j))) (k) The reasons for not ordering health insurance coverage
if the order fails to require such coverage;
(((k))) (l) That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and
maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed,
or may be suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support
order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
(((l))) (m) That each parent must:
(i) Promptly file with the court and update as necessary the
confidential information form required by subsection (7) of this
section; and
(ii) Provide the state case registry and update as necessary the
information required by subsection (7) of this section; and
(((m))) (n) That parties to administrative support orders shall
provide to the state case registry and update as necessary their
residential addresses and the address of the responsible parent's
employer. The division of child support may adopt rules that govern
the collection of parties' current residence and mailing addresses,
telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, the names
of the children, social security numbers of the children, dates of
birth of the children, driver's license numbers, and the names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers to enforce
an administrative support order. The division of child support shall
not release this information if the division of child support
determines that there is reason to believe that release of the
information may result in physical or emotional harm to the party or to
the child, or a restraining order or protective order is in effect to
protect one party from the other party.
(6) After the responsible parent has been ordered or notified to
make payments to the Washington state support registry under this
section, the responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making
all payments to the Washington state support registry and shall be
subject to payroll deduction or other income-withholding action. The
responsible parent shall not be entitled to credit against a support
obligation for any payments made to a person or agency other than to
the Washington state support registry except as provided under RCW
74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to recover
payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained
support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.
(7) All petitioners and parties to all court actions under chapters
26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.21A, 26.23, 26.26, and 26.27 RCW shall
complete to the best of their knowledge a verified and signed
confidential information form or equivalent that provides the parties'
current residence and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
birth, social security numbers, driver's license numbers, and the
names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the parties' employers. The
clerk of the court shall not accept petitions, except in parentage
actions initiated by the state, orders of child support, decrees of
dissolution, or paternity orders for filing in such actions unless
accompanied by the confidential information form or equivalent, or
unless the confidential information form or equivalent is already on
file with the court clerk. In lieu of or in addition to requiring the
parties to complete a separate confidential information form, the clerk
may collect the information in electronic form. The clerk of the court
shall transmit the confidential information form or its data to the
division of child support with a copy of the order of child support or
paternity order, and may provide copies of the confidential information
form or its data and any related findings, decrees, parenting plans,
orders, or other documents to the state administrative agency that
administers Title IV-A, IV-D, IV-E, or XIX of the federal social
security act. In state initiated paternity actions, the parties
adjudicated the parents of the child or children shall complete the
confidential information form or equivalent or the state's attorney of
record may complete that form to the best of the attorney's knowledge.
(8) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under ((parts)) 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304,
305, and 308.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.23.110 and 2007 c 143 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may serve a notice of support owed on a
responsible parent when a support order:
(a) Does not state the current and future support obligation as a
fixed dollar amount;
(b) Contains an escalation clause or adjustment provision for which
additional information not contained in the support order is needed to
determine the fixed dollar amount of the support debt or the fixed
dollar amount of the current and future support obligation, or both; or
(c) Provides that the responsible parent is responsible for paying
for a portion of uninsured medical costs, copayments, and/or
deductibles incurred on behalf of the child, but does not reduce the
costs to a fixed dollar amount.
(2) The department may serve a notice of support owed on a parent
who has been designated to pay per a support order a portion of
uninsured medical costs, copayments, or deductibles incurred on behalf
of the child, but only when the support order does not reduce the costs
to a fixed dollar amount.
(3) The department may serve a notice of support owed on a parent
who has been designated to pay cash medical support as defined in RCW
26.09.105, if the support order does not reduce the obligated parent's
share of the premium to a fixed dollar amount.
(4) The notice of support owed shall facilitate enforcement of the
support order and implement and effectuate the terms of the support
order, rather than modify those terms. When the office of support
enforcement issues a notice of support owed, the office shall inform
the payee under the support order.
(((4))) (5) The notice of support owed shall be served on a
responsible parent by personal service or any form of mailing requiring
a return receipt. The notice shall be served on the applicant or
recipient of services by first-class mail to the last known address.
The notice of support owed shall contain an initial finding of the
fixed dollar amount of current and future support obligation that
should be paid or the fixed dollar amount of the support debt owed
under the support order, or both.
(((5))) (6) A parent who objects to the fixed dollar amounts stated
in the notice of support owed has twenty days from the date of the
service of the notice of support owed to file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding or initiate an action in superior court.
(((6))) (7) The notice of support owed shall state that the parent
may:
(a) File an application for an adjudicative proceeding governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, in which the
parent will be required to appear and show cause why the fixed dollar
amount of support debt or current and future support obligation, or
both, stated in the notice of support owed is incorrect and should not
be ordered; or
(b) Initiate an action in superior court.
(((7))) (8) If either parent does not file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding or initiate an action in superior court, the
fixed dollar amount of current and future support obligation or support
debt, or both, stated in the notice of support owed shall become final
and subject to collection action.
(((8))) (9) If an adjudicative proceeding is requested, the
department shall mail a copy of the notice of adjudicative proceeding
to the parties.
(((9))) (10) If either parent does not initiate an action in
superior court, and serve notice of the action on the department and
the other party to the support order within the twenty-day period, the
parent shall be deemed to have made an election of remedies and shall
be required to exhaust administrative remedies under this chapter with
judicial review available as provided for in RCW 34.05.510 through
34.05.598.
(((10))) (11) An adjudicative order entered in accordance with this
section shall state the basis, rationale, or formula upon which the
fixed dollar amounts established in the adjudicative order were based.
The fixed dollar amount of current and future support obligation or the
amount of the support debt, or both, determined under this section
shall be subject to collection under this chapter and other applicable
state statutes.
(((11))) (12) The department shall also provide for:
(a) An annual review of the support order if either the office of
support enforcement or the parent requests such a review; and
(b) A late adjudicative proceeding if the parent fails to file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding in a timely manner under
this section.
(((12))) (13) If an annual review or late adjudicative proceeding
is requested under subsection (((11))) (12) of this section, the
department shall mail a copy of the notice of adjudicative proceeding
to the parties' last known address.
(((13))) (14) The department has rule-making authority to enact
rules consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec.
666(a)(19) as amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of
2005. Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to
implement regulations required under ((parts)) 45 C.F.R. Parts 302,
303, 304, 305, and 308.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.20A.300 and 1994 c 230 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever a support order is entered or modified under this
chapter, the department shall require ((the responsible)) either or
both parents to ((maintain or provide health insurance coverage))
provide medical support for any dependent child, in the nature of
health insurance coverage or cash medical support, as provided under
RCW 26.09.105.
(2) "Health insurance coverage" as used in this section does not
include medical assistance provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.
(3) A parent ordered to provide health insurance coverage shall
provide proof of such coverage or proof that such coverage is
unavailable to the department within twenty days of the entry of the
order.
(4) A parent required to provide health insurance coverage must
notify the department and the other parent when coverage terminates.
(5) Every order requiring a parent to provide health insurance
coverage shall be entered in compliance with RCW 26.23.050 and be
subject to direct enforcement as provided under chapter 26.18 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.20A.055 and 2007 c 143 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary may, if there is no order that establishes the
responsible parent's support obligation or specifically relieves the
responsible parent of a support obligation or pursuant to an
establishment of paternity under chapter 26.26 RCW, serve on the
responsible parent or parents and custodial parent a notice and finding
of financial responsibility requiring the parents to appear and show
cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of responsibility
and/or the amount thereof is incorrect, should not be finally ordered,
but should be rescinded or modified. This notice and finding shall
relate to the support debt accrued and/or accruing under this chapter
and/or RCW 26.16.205, including periodic payments to be made in the
future. The hearing shall be held pursuant to this section, chapter
34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, and the rules of the
department. A custodian who has physical custody of a child has the
same rights that a custodial parent has under this section.
(2) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be
served in the same manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a
civil action or may be served on the responsible parent by certified
mail, return receipt requested. The receipt shall be prima facie
evidence of service. The notice shall be served upon the debtor within
sixty days from the date the state assumes responsibility for the
support of the dependent child or children on whose behalf support is
sought. If the notice is not served within sixty days from such date,
the department shall lose the right to reimbursement of payments made
after the sixty-day period and before the date of notification:
PROVIDED, That if the department exercises reasonable efforts to locate
the debtor and is unable to do so the entire sixty-day period is tolled
until such time as the debtor can be located. The notice may be served
upon the custodial parent who is the nonassistance applicant or public
assistance recipient by first-class mail to the last known address. If
the custodial parent is not the nonassistance applicant or public
assistance recipient, service shall be in the same manner as for the
responsible parent.
(3) The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall set
forth the amount the department has determined the responsible parent
owes, the support debt accrued and/or accruing, and periodic payments
to be made in the future. The notice and finding shall also include:
(a) A statement of the name of the custodial parent and the name of
the child or children for whom support is sought;
(b) A statement of the amount of periodic future support payments
as to which financial responsibility is alleged;
(c) A statement that the responsible parent or custodial parent may
object to all or any part of the notice and finding, and file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding to show cause why the terms
set forth in the notice should not be ordered;
(d) A statement that, if neither the responsible parent nor the
custodial parent files in a timely fashion an application for an
adjudicative proceeding, the support debt and payments stated in the
notice and finding, including periodic support payments in the future,
shall be assessed and determined and ordered by the department and that
this debt and amounts due under the notice shall be subject to
collection action;
(e) A statement that the property of the debtor, without further
advance notice or hearing, will be subject to lien and foreclosure,
distraint, seizure and sale, order to withhold and deliver, notice of
payroll deduction or other collection action to satisfy the debt and
enforce the support obligation established under the notice;
(f) A statement that either or both parents are responsible for
providing health insurance for his or her child if coverage that can be
extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent
through employment or is union-related, or for paying a cash medical
support obligation if no such coverage is available, as provided under
RCW 26.09.105.
(4) A responsible parent or custodial parent who objects to the
notice and finding of financial responsibility may file an application
for an adjudicative proceeding within twenty days of the date of
service of the notice or thereafter as provided under this subsection.
(a) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the
application within twenty days, the office of administrative hearings
shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or
parents' objection and determine the support obligation for the entire
period covered by the notice and finding of financial responsibility.
The filing of the application stays collection action pending the entry
of a final administrative order;
(b) If both the responsible parent and the custodial parent fail to
file an application within twenty days, the notice and finding shall
become a final administrative order. The amounts for current and
future support and the support debt stated in the notice are final and
subject to collection, except as provided under (c) and (d) of this
subsection;
(c) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the
application more than twenty days after, but within one year of the
date of service, the office of administrative hearings shall schedule
an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or parents' objection
and determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by
the notice and finding of financial responsibility. The filing of the
application does not stay further collection action, pending the entry
of a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior
collection action;
(d) If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the
application more than one year after the date of service, the office of
administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding at
which the parent who requested the late hearing must show good cause
for failure to file a timely application. The filing of the
application does not stay future collection action and does not affect
prior collection action:
(i) If the presiding officer finds that good cause exists, the
presiding officer shall proceed to hear the parent's objection to the
notice and determine the support obligation;
(ii) If the presiding officer finds that good cause does not exist,
the presiding officer shall treat the application as a petition for
prospective modification of the amount for current and future support
established under the notice and finding. In the modification
proceeding, the presiding officer shall set current and future support
under chapter 26.19 RCW. The petitioning parent need show neither good
cause nor a substantial change of circumstances to justify modification
of current and future support;
(e) If the responsible parent's support obligation was based upon
imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need
standard, the division of child support may file an application for
adjudicative proceeding more than twenty days after the date of service
of the notice. The office of administrative hearings shall schedule an
adjudicative proceeding and provide notice of the hearing to the
responsible parent and the custodial parent. The presiding officer
shall determine the support obligation for the entire period covered by
the notice, based upon credible evidence presented by the division of
child support, the responsible parent, or the custodial parent, or may
determine that the support obligation set forth in the notice is
correct. The division of child support demonstrates good cause by
showing that the responsible parent's support obligation was based upon
imputed median net income, the grant standard, or the family need
standard. The filing of the application by the division of child
support does not stay further collection action, pending the entry of
a final administrative order, and does not affect any prior collection
action.
(f) The department shall retain and/or shall not refund support
money collected more than twenty days after the date of service of the
notice. Money withheld as the result of collection action shall be
delivered to the department. The department shall distribute such
money, as provided in published rules.
(5) If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the
presiding or reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and
responsibility, if any, of the alleged responsible parent and shall
also determine the amount of periodic payments to be made in the
future, which amount is not limited by the amount of any public
assistance payment made to or for the benefit of the child. If
deviating from the child support schedule in making these
determinations, the presiding or reviewing officer shall apply the
standards contained in the child support schedule and enter written
findings of fact supporting the deviation.
(6) If either the responsible parent or the custodial parent fails
to attend or participate in the hearing or other stage of an
adjudicative proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding
officer shall enter an order of default against each party who did not
appear and may enter an administrative order declaring the support debt
and payment provisions stated in the notice and finding of financial
responsibility to be assessed and determined and subject to collection
action. The parties who appear may enter an agreed settlement or
consent order, which may be different than the terms of the
department's notice. Any party who appears may choose to proceed to
the hearing, after the conclusion of which the presiding officer or
reviewing officer may enter an order that is different than the terms
stated in the notice, if the obligation is supported by credible
evidence presented by any party at the hearing.
(7) The final administrative order establishing liability and/or
future periodic support payments shall be superseded upon entry of a
superior court order for support to the extent the superior court order
is inconsistent with the administrative order.
(8) Debts determined pursuant to this section, accrued and not
paid, are subject to collection action under this chapter without
further necessity of action by a presiding or reviewing officer.
(9) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under ((parts)) 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304,
305, and 308.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.20A.056 and 2007 c 143 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an alleged father has signed an affidavit acknowledging
paternity which has been filed with the state registrar of vital
statistics before July 1, 1997, the division of child support may serve
a notice and finding of parental responsibility on him and the
custodial parent. Procedures for and responsibility resulting from
acknowledgments filed after July 1, 1997, are in subsections (8) and
(9) of this section. Service of the notice shall be in the same manner
as a summons in a civil action or by certified mail, return receipt
requested, on the alleged father. The custodial parent shall be served
by first-class mail to the last known address. If the custodial parent
is not the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient,
service shall be in the same manner as for the responsible parent. The
notice shall have attached to it a copy of the affidavit or
certification of birth record information advising of the existence of
a filed affidavit, provided by the state registrar of vital statistics,
and shall state that:
(a) Either or both parents are responsible for providing health
insurance for their child if coverage that can be extended to cover the
child is or becomes available to the parent through employment or is
union-related, or for paying a cash medical support obligation if no
such coverage is available, as provided under RCW 26.09.105;
(b) The alleged father or custodial parent may file an application
for an adjudicative proceeding at which they both will be required to
appear and show cause why the amount stated in the notice as to support
is incorrect and should not be ordered;
(c) An alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, may request that a blood or genetic test be administered to
determine whether such test would exclude him from being a natural
parent and, if not excluded, may subsequently request that the division
of child support initiate an action in superior court to determine the
existence of the parent-child relationship; and
(d) If neither the alleged father nor the custodial parent requests
that a blood or genetic test be administered or files an application
for an adjudicative proceeding, the amount of support stated in the
notice and finding of parental responsibility shall become final,
subject only to a subsequent determination under RCW 26.26.500 through
26.26.630 that the parent-child relationship does not exist.
(2) An alleged father or custodial parent who objects to the amount
of support requested in the notice may file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding up to twenty days after the date the notice was
served. An application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed
within one year of service of the notice and finding of parental
responsibility without the necessity for a showing of good cause or
upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An adjudicative proceeding
under this section shall be pursuant to RCW 74.20A.055. The only
issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt, the amount of the
current and future support obligation, and the reimbursement of the
costs of blood or genetic tests if advanced by the department. A
custodian who is not the parent of a child and who has physical custody
of a child has the same notice and hearing rights that a custodial
parent has under this section.
(3) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed
within twenty days of service of the notice, collection action shall be
stayed pending a final decision by the department. If no application
is filed within twenty days:
(a) The amounts in the notice shall become final and the debt
created therein shall be subject to collection action; and
(b) Any amounts so collected shall neither be refunded nor returned
if the alleged father is later found not to be a responsible parent.
(4) An alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, may request that a blood or genetic test be administered at any
time. The request for testing shall be in writing, or as the
department may specify by rule, and served on the division of child
support. If a request for testing is made, the department shall
arrange for the test and, pursuant to rules adopted by the department,
may advance the cost of such testing. The department shall mail a copy
of the test results by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the
alleged father's and mother's, if she is also the custodial parent,
last known address.
(5) If the test excludes the alleged father from being a natural
parent, the division of child support shall file a copy of the results
with the state registrar of vital statistics and shall dismiss any
pending administrative collection proceedings based upon the affidavit
in issue. The state registrar of vital statistics shall remove the
alleged father's name from the birth certificate and change the child's
surname to be the same as the mother's maiden name as stated on the
birth certificate, or any other name which the mother may select.
(6) The alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, may, within twenty days after the date of receipt of the test
results, request the division of child support to initiate an action
under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 to determine the existence of the
parent-child relationship. If the division of child support initiates
a superior court action at the request of the alleged father or mother
and the decision of the court is that the alleged father is a natural
parent, the parent who requested the test shall be liable for court
costs incurred.
(7) If the alleged father or mother, if she is also the custodial
parent, does not request the division of child support to initiate a
superior court action, or fails to appear and cooperate with blood or
genetic testing, the notice of parental responsibility shall become
final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a
subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.500 through
26.26.630.
(8)(a) Subsections (1) through (7) of this section do not apply to
acknowledgments of paternity filed with the state registrar of vital
statistics after July 1, 1997.
(b) If an acknowledged father has signed an acknowledgment of
paternity that has been filed with the state registrar of vital
statistics after July 1, 1997:
(i) The division of child support may serve a notice and finding of
financial responsibility under RCW 74.20A.055 based on the
acknowledgment. The division of child support shall attach a copy of
the acknowledgment or certification of the birth record information
advising of the existence of a filed acknowledgment of paternity to the
notice;
(ii) The notice shall include a statement that the acknowledged
father or any other signatory may commence a proceeding in court to
rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial of paternity under
RCW 26.26.330 and 26.26.335;
(iii) A statement that either or both parents are responsible for
providing health insurance for his or her child if coverage that can be
extended to cover the child is or becomes available to the parent
through employment or is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;
and
(iv) The party commencing the action to rescind or challenge the
acknowledgment or denial must serve notice on the division of child
support and the office of the prosecuting attorney in the county in
which the proceeding is commenced. Commencement of a proceeding to
rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial stays the
establishment of the notice and finding of financial responsibility, if
the notice has not yet become a final order.
(c) If neither the acknowledged father nor the other party to the
notice files an application for an adjudicative proceeding or the
signatories to the acknowledgment or denial do not commence a
proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment of paternity, the
amount of support stated in the notice and finding of financial
responsibility becomes final, subject only to a subsequent
determination under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630 that the parent-child relationship does not exist. The division of child support does
not refund nor return any amounts collected under a notice that becomes
final under this section or RCW 74.20A.055, even if a court later
determines that the acknowledgment is void.
(d) An acknowledged father or other party to the notice who objects
to the amount of support requested in the notice may file an
application for an adjudicative proceeding up to twenty days after the
date the notice was served. An application for an adjudicative
proceeding may be filed within one year of service of the notice and
finding of parental responsibility without the necessity for a showing
of good cause or upon a showing of good cause thereafter. An
adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to RCW
74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt
and the amount of the current and future support obligation.
(i) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed
within twenty days of service of the notice, collection action shall be
stayed pending a final decision by the department.
(ii) If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is not filed
within twenty days of the service of the notice, any amounts collected
under the notice shall be neither refunded nor returned if the alleged
father is later found not to be a responsible parent.
(e) If neither the acknowledged father nor the custodial parent
requests an adjudicative proceeding, or if no timely action is brought
to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial after service of
the notice, the notice of financial responsibility becomes final for
all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a subsequent
superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.500 through 26.26.630.
(9) Acknowledgments of paternity that are filed after July 1, 1997,
are subject to requirements of chapters 26.26, the uniform parentage
act, and 70.58 RCW.
(10) The department and the department of health may adopt rules to
implement the requirements under this section.
(11) The department has rule-making authority to enact rules
consistent with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 652(f) and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 666(a)(19) as
amended by section 7307 of the deficit reduction act of 2005.
Additionally, the department has rule-making authority to implement
regulations required under ((parts)) 45 C.F.R. Parts 302, 303, 304,
305, and 308.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.20A.059 and 1991 c 367 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, the physical custodian, or the responsible
parent may petition for a prospective modification of a final
administrative order if:
(a) The administrative order has not been superseded by a superior
court order; and
(b) There has been a substantial change of circumstances, except as
provided under RCW 74.20A.055(4)(d).
(2) An order of child support may be modified one year or more
after it has been entered without showing a substantial change of
circumstances:
(a) If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on
either party or the child; or
(b) If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support
that was based on guidelines which determined the amount of support
according to the child's age, and the child is no longer in the age
category on which the current support amount was based; or
(c) If a child is a full-time student and reasonably expected to
complete secondary school or the equivalent level of vocational or
technical training before the child becomes nineteen years of age upon
a finding that there is a need to extend support beyond the eighteenth
birthday.
(3) An order may be modified without showing a substantial change
of circumstances if the requested modification is to:
(a) Require ((health insurance coverage)) medical support under RCW
26.09.105 for a child covered by the order; or
(b) Modify an existing order for health insurance coverage.
(4) Support orders may be adjusted once every twenty-four months
based upon changes in the income of the parents without a showing of
substantially changed circumstances.
(5)(a) All administrative orders entered on, before, or after
September 1, 1991, may be modified based upon changes in the child
support schedule established in chapter 26.19 RCW without a substantial
change of circumstances. The petition may be filed based on changes in
the child support schedule after twelve months has expired from the
entry of the administrative order or the most recent modification order
setting child support, whichever is later. However, if a party is
granted relief under this provision, twenty-four months must pass
before another petition for modification may be filed pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section.
(b) If, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section or (a) of this
subsection, the order modifies a child support obligation by more than
thirty percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the
change may be implemented in two equal increments, one at the time of
the entry of the order and the second six months from the entry of the
order. Twenty-four months must pass following the second change before
a petition for modification under subsection (4) of this section may be
filed.
(6) An increase in the wage or salary of the parent or custodian
who is receiving the support transfer payments ((as defined in section
24 of this act)) is not a substantial change in circumstances for
purposes of modification under subsection (1)(b) of this section. An
obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment, by
itself, is not a substantial change of circumstances.
(7) The department shall file the petition and a supporting
affidavit with the secretary or the secretary's designee when the
department petitions for modification.
(8) The responsible parent or the physical custodian shall follow
the procedures in this chapter for filing an application for an
adjudicative proceeding to petition for modification.
(9) Upon the filing of a proper petition or application, the
secretary or the secretary's designee shall issue an order directing
each party to appear and show cause why the order should not be
modified.
(10) If the presiding or reviewing officer finds a modification is
appropriate, the officer shall modify the order and set current and
future support under chapter 26.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect October 1, 2009.

--- END ---