BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.67.020 and 2006 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington customized employment training program is hereby
created to provide training assistance to employers locating or
expanding in the state.
(2)(a) Application to receive funding under this program shall be
made to the board in a form and manner as specified by the board.
Successful applicants shall receive a training allowance from the board
to cover the costs of training at a qualified training institution.
Employers may not receive an allowance for training costs which exceed
the maximum annual training cost per employee, as established by the
board, and are not eligible to receive an allowance or allowances of
over five hundred thousand dollars per calendar year.
(b) Allowances shall be granted for applicants who meet the
following criteria:
(i) The employer must have entered into an agreement with a
qualified training institution to engage in customized training and the
employer must agree to: (A) Upon completion of the training, make a
payment to the employment training finance account created in RCW
28B.67.030 in an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the
training allowance; and (B) over the subsequent eighteen months, make
monthly or quarterly payments, as specified in the agreement, to the
employment training finance account created in RCW 28B.67.030 in an
amount equal to three-quarters of the amount of the training allowance.
During calendar years 2009 and 2010, participants may delay payments
due under this section for up to eighteen months. The payments into
the employment training finance account provided for in this section do
not constitute payment to the institution.
(ii) ((The employer must ensure that the number of employees an
employer has in the state during the calendar year following the
completion of the training program will equal the number of employees
the employer had in the state in the calendar year preceding the start
of the training program plus seventy-five percent of the number of
trainees.)) When hiring, the employer must make good faith efforts, as
determined by the board, to hire from trainees in the participant's
training program. The agreement with the qualified training
institution provided for in (b)(i) of this subsection shall specify
terms for reimbursement or additional payment to the employment
training finance account by the employer if the ((employment criterion
of this subsection is not met)) participant does not, when hiring, make
good faith efforts to hire from trainees in the participant's training
program.
(iii) The training ((grant)) allowance may not be used to train
workers who have been hired as a result of a strike or lockout.
(c) Preference shall be given to employers with fewer than fifty
employees.
(3) Qualified training institutions may enter into agreements with
four-year institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, in accordance with the interlocal cooperation act, chapter
39.34 RCW.
(4) The board and qualified training institutions may solicit and
receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, from tribal, local, federal, or other governmental entities,
as well as private sources, for the purpose of providing training
allowances under chapter 112, Laws of 2006. All revenue thus solicited
and received shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account created in RCW 28B.67.030.
(5) Qualified training institutions must make good faith efforts to
develop training programs using trainers preferred by participants.
(6) For employers who (a) have requested training under the job
skills program created under chapter 28C.04 RCW but are not able to
participate in the job skills program because the funds have all been
committed, and (b) desire to become participants in the Washington
customized employment training program, the board shall ensure a
seamless process toward participation.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.67.030 and 2006 c 112 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington
customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 shall
be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state
board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures
from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures.
The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances
under the Washington customized employment training program created in
RCW 28B.67.020 and for providing up to seventy-five thousand dollars
per year for training, marketing, and facilitation services to increase
the use of the program. The deposit of payments under this section
from a participant shall cease when the board specifies that the
participant has met the monetary obligations of the program.
(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW
28B.67.020(4) shall be deposited into the employment training finance
account to provide training allowances.
(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.449 and 2006 c 112 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington customized employment
training program created in RCW 28B.67.020. The credit allowed under
this section is equal to fifty percent of the value of a participant's
payments to the employment training finance account created in RCW
28B.67.030. If a participant in the program does not meet the
((qualifications in)) requirements of RCW 28B.67.020(2)(b)(ii), the
participant must remit to the department the value of any credits taken
plus interest. The credit earned by a participant in one calendar year
may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in a
subsequent calendar year. No credit may be allowed for repayment of
training allowances received from the Washington customized employment
training program on or after July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---