BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.090 and 2007 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The early learning advisory council is established to advise
the department on statewide early learning ((community needs and
progress)) issues that would build a comprehensive system of quality
early learning programs and services for Washington's children and
families by assessing needs and the availability of services, aligning
resources, developing plans for data collection and professional
development of early childhood educators, and establishing key
performance measures.
(2) The council shall work in conjunction with the department to
develop a statewide early learning plan that ((crosses systems and
sectors to promote)) guides the department in promoting alignment of
private and public sector actions, objectives, and resources, and ((to
ensure)) ensuring school readiness.
(3) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation
from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall
reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately
represent the needs of all children and families in the state.
(4) Councilmembers shall serve two-year terms. However, to stagger
the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve of the
members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to two-year
terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years, with the
terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms shall be
staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of members
representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(5) The council shall consist of not more than ((twenty-five))
twenty-three members, as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from
each of the following: The department, the office of financial
management, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state board for community and technical colleges;
(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) The governor shall appoint ((at least)) seven leaders in early
childhood education, with at least one representative with experience
or expertise in each of the areas such as the following ((areas)):
Children with disabilities, the K-12 system, family day care providers,
and child care centers;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively;
(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on the department's parent
advisory council, to be appointed by the governor;
(f) ((Two)) One representative((s)) of the private-public
partnership created in RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the
partnership board;
(g) One representative designated by sovereign tribal governments;
and
(h) One representative from the Washington federation of
independent schools.
(6) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of a state
agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the council for
two-year terms.
(7) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(8) The department shall provide staff support to the council.

--- END ---