BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) In every school district there are older
youth who have become disengaged with the traditional education program
of public high schools. They may have failed multiple classes and are
far behind in accumulating credits to graduate. They do not see a high
school diploma as an achievable goal. They may have dropped out of
school entirely. They are not likely to become reengaged in their
education by the prospect of reenrollment in a traditional or even an
alternative high school.
(2) For many years, school districts, community and technical
colleges, and community-based organizations have created partnerships
to provide appropriate educational programs for these students.
Programs such as career education options and career link have
successfully offered individualized academic instruction, case
management support, and career-oriented skills in an age-appropriate
learning environment to hundreds of disengaged older youth.
Preparation for the GED test is provided but is not the end goal for
students.
(3) However, in recent years, many of these partnerships have
ceased to operate. The laws and rules authorizing school districts to
contract using basic education allocations do not provide sufficient
guidance and instead present barriers. Program providers are forced to
adapt to rules that were not written to address the needs of the
students being served. Questions and concerns about liability,
responsibility, and administrative burden have caused districts
reluctantly to abandon their partnerships, and consequently leave
hundreds of students without a viable alternative for continuing their
public education.
(4) Therefore the legislature intends to provide a statutory
framework to support a statewide dropout reengagement system for older
youth. The framework clarifies, simplifies, and standardizes funding,
programs, and administration by creating statewide model contracts and
interlocal agreements and by directing educational service districts to
act as brokers and managers on behalf of individual school districts
and with program providers. It is the legislature's intent to
encourage school districts, community and technical colleges, and
community-based organizations to participate in this system and provide
appropriate instruction and services to reengage older students and
help them make progress toward a meaningful credential and career
skills. Alternatively, school districts may provide dropout
reengagement programs on their own or through separate contracts or
interlocal agreements. It is critical that school districts assure
that some form of appropriate education and services are made available
to disengaged older youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Sections 2 through 6 of this act create a statewide dropout
reengagement system to provide appropriate educational opportunities
and access to services for students aged sixteen to twenty-one who have
dropped out of high school or are not accumulating sufficient credits
to reasonably complete a high school diploma in a public school before
the age of twenty-one.
(2) Each school district must:
(a) Enter into a model interlocal agreement with the educational
service district in which the school district is located that
authorizes the educational service district to oversee dropout
reengagement programs on behalf of the school district for eligible
students residing in the school district;
(b) Make available to eligible students, either directly or through
a contract or interlocal agreement separately entered into by the
district, a dropout reengagement program that is similar to an eligible
program as defined under section 3 of this act; or
(c) Offer dropout reengagement programs to eligible students
through the mechanisms of both (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) Each educational service district shall oversee a dropout
reengagement system in its district as provided under section 5 of this
act. Educational service districts shall enter into model interlocal
agreements with community and technical colleges and contract with
community-based organizations to provide eligible dropout reengagement
programs and shall serve as contract and agreement managers and brokers
on behalf of school districts that enter into model interlocal
agreements with the educational service district.
(3) An educational service district may enter into interlocal or
cooperative agreements to provide special education or related services
on behalf of a resident school district to eligible students with
disabilities who are enrolled in a dropout reengagement program, but
the educational service district shall maintain management and staffing
of these agreements separately from the model interlocal agreements and
contracts under subsection (2) of this section to avoid any conflict of
interest when the educational service district is acting both as a
contract manager and monitor and as a service provider.
(4) This section does not affect the authority of school districts
to contract for educational services under RCW 28A.150.305 and
28A.320.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
As used in sections 2 through 6 of this act, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Eligible student" means a student who:
(a) Is at least sixteen but less than twenty-one years of age at
the beginning of the school year;
(b) Is not accumulating sufficient credits toward a high school
diploma to reasonably complete a high school diploma from a public
school before the age of twenty-one or is recommended for the program
by case managers from the department of social and health services or
the juvenile justice system; and
(c) Is enrolled or enrolls in the school district in which the
student resides.
(2) "Eligible program" means a dropout reengagement program that
offers the following instruction and services:
(a) Academic instruction, including but not limited to GED
preparation, academic skills instruction, and college and work
readiness preparation, that generates credits that can be applied to a
high school diploma from the student's school district or from a
community or technical college under RCW 28B.50.535 and has the goal of
enabling the student to obtain the academic and work readiness skills
necessary for employment or postsecondary study. An eligible program
is not required to offer instruction in only those subject areas where
a student is deficient in accumulated credits. Academic instruction
must be provided by teachers certified by the Washington professional
educator standards board or by instructors employed by a community or
technical college whose required credentials are established by the
college;
(b) Case management, academic and career counseling, and assistance
with accessing services and resources that support at-risk youth and
reduce barriers to educational success; and
(c) If the program provider is a community or technical college,
the opportunity for qualified students to enroll in college courses
that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate. The college may
not charge an eligible student tuition for such enrollment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement section 3 of this act, including:
(a) Establishing common minimum requirements for eligible students
including a definition of "insufficient credits to reasonably complete
a high school diploma"; and
(b) Establishing minimum instructional staffing ratios for eligible
programs offered by community-based organizations. The staffing ratios
for dropout reengagement programs are not required to be the same as
for other basic education programs in school districts.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop nonregulatory guidance that describes dropout reengagement
programs that are similar to eligible programs, to provide guidance to
school districts that choose to offer programs directly or through a
separate contract or interlocal agreement. The legislature's intent is
to provide school districts with flexibility to design and offer
programs of their choosing.
(3) When adopting rules under this section and section 6 of this
act and developing model contracts and interlocal agreements under
section 5 of this act, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall consult with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, colleges and community-based organizations that have previously
offered dropout reengagement programs, school districts, and
educational service districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop statewide model contracts and interlocal agreements for the
dropout reengagement system. Interlocal agreements between school
districts and educational service districts under section 2 of this
act, as well as contracts and interlocal agreements between educational
service districts and dropout reengagement program providers, shall be
based on the model contracts and interlocal agreements. The model
contracts and agreements shall include performance measures that must
be reported in a common format for purposes of accountability.
(2) Under a model interlocal agreement, school districts shall:
(a) Enroll and refer to the educational service district eligible
students residing in the district who the school district determines
would benefit from a dropout reengagement program. If a school
district determines that a program offered by the district other than
the dropout reengagement program would be more appropriate for an
otherwise eligible student, the district may counsel the student to
enroll in the other district program;
(b) Provide special education or related services under an
individualized education program for eligible students with
disabilities, in consultation and cooperation with the dropout
reengagement program provider. School districts may enter into
separate interlocal or cooperative agreements with the educational
service district or the program provider for the provision of special
education or related services for eligible students;
(c) Provide necessary data to the educational service district,
including transcripts and other information required for the statewide
student information system, for all eligible students who enroll in a
dropout reengagement program; and
(d) Fulfill other responsibilities identified in the model
interlocal agreement.
(3) Educational service districts shall:
(a) Work with school districts, workforce development councils,
colleges, and community-based organizations to identify high quality
dropout reengagement program providers in the region; create
partnerships among organizations to offer programs and services; and
identify other public and private sources of funding that may be used
to leverage the state funds provided for the program;
(b) Enter into contracts based on the statewide model with
community-based organizations, as well as interlocal agreements based
on the statewide model with community and technical colleges, to
provide eligible dropout reengagement programs for eligible students;
(c) Serve as a liaison between school districts and program
providers as necessary;
(d) Refer eligible students to dropout reengagement programs;
(e) Monitor the financial and student performance of eligible
programs;
(f) On behalf of a school district with which the educational
service district has an interlocal agreement, manage enrollment and
data reporting to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction through the statewide student information system and
maintain high school credit and transcript information for eligible
students enrolled in a dropout reengagement program;
(g) Manage financial billing to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and payments to school districts and program
providers as specified under section 6 of this act;
(h) Work with program providers and school districts to assure
eligible students are able to earn credit that can be applied to a high
school diploma from the school district or from a college under RCW
28B.50.535, including providing assistance with course equivalencies
and competency testing in lieu of course completion as authorized under
RCW 28A.230.100;
(i) Administer the Washington assessment of student learning to
eligible students enrolled in a dropout reengagement program when
necessary;
(j) Annually report to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction on enrollment, student progress toward certificate or
degree completion, and financial and student performance of eligible
programs; and
(k) Fulfill other responsibilities identified in the model contract
and interlocal agreement.
(4) Dropout reengagement program providers shall:
(a) Offer the components of an eligible program to eligible
students as specified in section 3 of this act and in the statewide
model contract or interlocal agreement;
(b) Comply with financial and student performance accountability
requirements under the contract or interlocal agreement;
(c) Cooperate with the appropriate school district or the
educational service district to coordinate provision of special
education or related services for eligible students with disabilities
who have an individualized education program;
(d) Assume responsibility for necessary accommodations and plans
for students qualifying under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of
1973; and
(e) Fulfill other responsibilities identified in the model contract
or interlocal agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate the basic education allocation generated under RCW 28A.150.260
and the student achievement fund allocation under RCW 28A.505.220 for
each annual average full-time equivalent eligible student enrolled in
a dropout reengagement program under sections 2 through 6 of this act
directly to the educational service district that has an agreement with
the school district, rather than to the school district.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the basic education
allocation shall be calculated at a statewide uniform rate. The
calculations and allocations shall be based upon the estimated
statewide annual average per full-time equivalent high school student
allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, excluding small high school
enhancements, and including enhancements for vocational students where
eligible students are enrolled in vocational courses.
(3) The educational service district shall transmit two percent of
the total per student allocation under this section to an eligible
enrolled student's school district to offset administrative costs of
the district. The educational service district may retain five percent
of the total per student allocation for program administration and
coordination. The educational service district shall pay the remaining
allocation to program providers through the statewide model contract or
interlocal agreement.
(4) For purposes of other state, federal, or local funds, including
special education excess cost allocations, eligible students who are
enrolled in a dropout reengagement program are considered regularly
enrolled students of the resident school district, except that the
students shall not be included in the school district's enrollment for
purposes of calculating compliance with RCW 28A.150.100.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt a definition of a full-time equivalent student for the purposes
of sections 2 through 6 of this act. The definition shall be:
(a) Based on the community or technical college credits generated
by the student if the program provider is a community or technical
college; and
(b) Based on a minimum amount of planned programming or instruction
and minimum attendance by the student rather than hours of seat time if
the program provider is a community-based organization.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.310.180 and 1990 c 33 s 276 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every
educational service district board shall:
(1) Comply with rules ((or regulations)) of the state board of
education and the superintendent of public instruction((.));
(2) If the district board deems necessary, establish and operate
for the schools within the boundaries of the educational service
district a depository and distribution center for films, tapes, charts,
maps, and other instructional material as recommended by the school
district superintendents within the service area of the educational
service district: PROVIDED, That the district may also provide the
services of the depository and distribution center to private schools
within the district so long as such private schools pay such fees that
reflect actual costs for services and the use of instructional
materials as may be established by the educational service district
board((.));
(3) Establish cooperative service programs for school districts
within the educational service district and joint purchasing programs
for schools within the educational service district pursuant to RCW
28A.320.080(3): PROVIDED, That on matters relating to cooperative
service programs the board and superintendent of the educational
service district shall seek the prior advice of the superintendents of
local school districts within the educational service district((.));
(4) Establish direct student service programs for school districts
within the educational service district including pupil transportation.
However, for the provision of state-funded pupil transportation for
special education cooperatives programs for special education conducted
under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, the educational service
district, with the consent of the participating school districts, shall
be entitled to receive directly state apportionment funds for that
purpose: PROVIDED, That the board of directors and superintendent of
a local school district request the educational service district to
perform said service or services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
educational service district board of directors and superintendents
agree to provide the requested services: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW are strictly adhered to: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the educational service district board of directors may
contract with the school for the deaf and the school for the blind to
provide transportation services; and
(5) Oversee the dropout reengagement system in its district and
fulfill the responsibilities described in statewide model contracts and
interlocal agreements as provided under sections 2 through 6 of this
act.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.305.190 and 1993 c 218 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state board of education shall adopt rules governing the
eligibility of a child sixteen years of age and under nineteen years of
age to take the ((general educational development)) GED test if the
child provides a substantial and warranted reason for leaving the
regular high school education program, ((or)) if the child was home-schooled, or if the child is an eligible student enrolled in a dropout
reengagement program under sections 2 through 6 of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2007 c 277 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the
term:
(1) "System" shall mean the state system of community and technical
colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(2) "Board" shall mean the workforce training and education
coordinating board.
(3) "College board" shall mean the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(4) "Director" shall mean the administrative director for the state
system of community and technical colleges.
(5) "District" shall mean any one of the community and technical
college districts created by this chapter.
(6) "Board of trustees" shall mean the local community and
technical college board of trustees established for each college
district within the state.
(7) "Occupational education" shall mean that education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree, and education and training leading to an applied
baccalaureate degree.
(8) "K-12 system" shall mean the public school program including
kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(9) "Common school board" shall mean a public school district board
of directors.
(10) "Community college" shall include those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(11) "Technical college" shall include those higher education
institutions with the sole mission of conducting occupational
education, basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short
notice, when appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs.
The programs of technical colleges shall include, but not be limited
to, continuous enrollment, competency-based instruction, industry-experienced faculty, curriculum integrating vocational and basic skills
education, and curriculum approved by representatives of employers and
labor. For purposes of this chapter, technical colleges shall include
Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute, Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park
Vocational Institute, and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.
(12) "Adult education" shall mean all education or instruction,
including academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and
literacy training, and "occupational education" provided by public
educational institutions, including common school districts for persons
who are eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school
diploma or certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include
academic education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of
age who do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are
attending a public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high
school diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include
education or instruction provided by any four year public institution
of higher education. "Adult education" also does not include education
or instruction provided by a college to eligible students in a dropout
reengagement program under sections 2 through 6 of this act.
(13) "Dislocated forest product worker" shall mean a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(14) "Forest products worker" shall mean a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(15) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish products
worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(16) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish industry
affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish
including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt
rules further interpreting these definitions.
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (18) of this section.
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(19) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under RCW 28B.50.810 for successful completion of
a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.
(20) "Qualified institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Washington public community and technical colleges;
(b) Private career schools that are members of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating
board for the purposes of chapter 28B.92 RCW; and
(c) Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved
apprenticeship programs.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.50.535 and 2007 c 355 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
A community or technical college may issue a high school diploma or
certificate, including to students enrolled in dropout reengagement
programs under sections 2 through 6 of this act, subject to rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board
of education.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2007 c 355 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610 or eligible students enrolled in a dropout
reengagement program under sections 2 through 6 of this act.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.

--- END ---