BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Within existing resources, the
department of early learning, in collaboration with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall recommend six kindergarten
entry assessments for statewide implementation. The assessments shall
be chosen based on the recommendations established in the report
required by the legislature under section 616(14), chapter 329, Laws of
2008.
(2) For each recommended assessment, the department shall:
(a) Provide a detailed description of the assessment;
(b) Identify the purpose of the assessment; and
(c) Identify the costs of the assessment, including the time
required to administer the assessment.
(3) The department shall submit a report with recommendations for
six kindergarten entry assessments to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---