BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.100 and 2007 c 394 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department, in collaboration with community and
statewide partners, including the nongovernmental private-public
partnership created in RCW 43.215.070, shall implement a unified
statewide voluntary quality rating and improvement system applicable to
licensed or certified child care centers and homes and early education
programs. The purpose of the voluntary quality rating and improvement
system is to give parents clear and easily accessible information about
the quality of child care and early education programs, support
improvement in early learning programs throughout the state, increase
the readiness of children for school, and close the disparity in access
to quality care. Before final implementation of ((the)) a single
statewide voluntary quality rating and improvement system, the
department shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees
of the legislature. Nothing in this section changes the department's
responsibility to collectively bargain over mandatory subjects.

--- END ---