BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.330 and 1995 c 347 s 429 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter requiring
a planning commission to hear and issue recommendations for plat
approval, the county or city legislative body may adopt a hearing
examiner system and shall specify by ordinance the legal effect of the
decisions made by the examiner. The legal effect of such decisions
shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) The decision may be given the effect of a final decision of the
legislative body.
The legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed
by a hearing examiner.
(2) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to
support the decision. Each final decision of a hearing examiner,
unless a longer period is mutually agreed to by the applicant and the
hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following
conclusion of all testimony and hearings.
(3) Hearing examiner fees may not exceed the cost of filing for
judicial review of an agency action in superior court as described in
RCW 36.18.020.

--- END ---