BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.26.375 and 2002 c 302 s 316 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After the period for rescission of an acknowledgment of
paternity provided in RCW 26.26.330 has passed, a parent executing an
acknowledgment of paternity of the child named therein may commence a
judicial proceeding for:
(a) Making residential provisions or a parenting plan with regard
to the minor child on the same basis as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW;
or
(b) Establishing a child support obligation under chapter 26.19 RCW
and maintaining health insurance coverage under RCW 26.09.105.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 26.09.010(3), a proceeding authorized by this
section shall be entitled "In re the parenting and support of...."
(3) Before the period for a challenge to the acknowledgment or
denial of paternity has elapsed under RCW 26.26.335, the petitioner
must specifically allege under penalty of perjury, to the best of the
petitioner's knowledge, that: (a) No man other than the man who
executed the acknowledgment of paternity is the father of the child;
(b) there is not currently pending a proceeding to adjudicate the
parentage of the child or that another man is adjudicated the child's
father; and (c) the petitioner has provided notice of the proceeding to
any other men who have claimed parentage of the child. Should the
respondent or any other person appearing in the action deny the
allegations, a permanent parenting plan or residential schedule may not
be entered for the child without the matter being converted to a
proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment of paternity under RCW
26.26.335 and 26.26.340. A copy of the acknowledgment of paternity or
the birth certificate issued by the state in which the child was born
must be filed with the petition or response. The court may convert the
matter to a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment on its own
motion.

--- END ---