BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
preserve and promote a safe and beneficial learning environment for all
students while also balancing each student's right to be free from
unreasonable use of physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical
sprays. The legislature recognizes that a truly beneficial learning
environment is dependent on the quality of the interaction between
staff, students, and parents and is fostered through the development of
a sense of community within the school. The legislature acknowledges
that school district boards of directors may find it necessary to
employ school security personnel or to rely upon school resource
officers in order to preserve a safe and beneficial learning
environment within certain schools. The legislature finds that the
establishment of appropriate student discipline policies, security
models, and training requirements, which stress techniques meant to
diffuse anger, de-escalate conflict, and reduce violent behavior within
the school, will help to further a quality learning environment where
all students are treated with dignity and respect. The legislature
further finds that use of physical force, mechanical restraint, or
chemical sprays, as an intervention in the school environment should be
used only in emergency situations after other less invasive
alternatives have failed or have been deemed inappropriate and, if
used, should only be used by appropriately trained personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Chemical sprays" means the use of pepper spray or chemicals,
or the administration of any medication to control a student or limit
a student's freedom of movement.
(b) "Mechanical restraint" means the use a mechanical device
including, but not limited to, metal handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle
restraints, leather cuffs, other hospital-type restraints, tasers, or
batons to control a student or limit a student's freedom of movement.
(c) "Physical force" means the use of any bodily force or physical
intervention to control a student or limit a student's freedom of
movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical restraint or
chemical spray. Physical force does not include momentary periods of
minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact,
without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited
force and designed to:
(i) Prevent a student from completing an act that would result in
potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property; or
(ii) Remove a disruptive student who is unwilling to leave the area
voluntarily.
(d) "School resource officer" means a person who provides security
and law enforcement services at one or more public schools and is a
commissioned law enforcement officer who has been assigned by the
employing police department or agency to work in collaboration with the
district.
(e) "School security officer" means a classified or contracted
school district employee other than a school resource officer who
provides security services at one or more public schools under the
direction of a district administrator.
(f) "Bodily harm" means physical pain or injury, illness, or an
impairment of physical condition.
(g) "Substantial bodily harm" means bodily injury that involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement or that causes a temporary but
substantial loss or impairment of the function of any bodily part or
organ or that causes a fracture of any bodily part.
(2) The use of mechanical restraints or chemical sprays on a
student at a public school by a school employee is prohibited, unless
administered by:
(a) A school resource officer; or
(b) A school security officer or building staff designated by the
school district who receives:
(i) Appropriate annual training from either a local law enforcement
agency or the criminal justice training commission for each type of
restraint or spray authorized to be used; and
(ii) Ongoing supervision from a district or school administrator.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the use
of physical force in public schools is limited to the use of reasonable
force under the following circumstances only:
(a) The student's behavior poses a threat of substantial bodily
harm to self or to others; and
(b) Nonphysical interventions would not be effective in preventing
or minimizing the threat of substantial bodily harm.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the use
of physical force in public schools is prohibited in the following
circumstances:
(a) As a means of punishment; or
(b) As a disciplinary response to destruction of school property,
disruption of school or classroom order, noncompliance with a school
rule or staff directive, or communication of a verbal threat that does
not constitute a threat of substantial bodily harm.
(5) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The right of any individual to report to appropriate
authorities a crime committed by a student or other individual; or
(b) Commissioned law enforcement officers, including school
resource officers, or judicial authorities from exercising their
authority or executing their responsibilities, including the ability to
use physical force, mechanical restraints, or chemical sprays.
(6) Each school district shall establish a written policy regarding
the use of physical force, mechanical restraints, and chemical sprays
on students by school employees. The policy shall be made available to
students and parents or guardians. The policy shall include at a
minimum:
(a) A description and explanation of the types of physical force,
mechanical restraint, or chemical spray authorized at the school and
under what circumstances each is allowed to be used;
(b) Which school employees at the school are authorized to use each
type of physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical spray;
(c) A description of the school's training requirements for those
authorized to use physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical
sprays; and
(d) Incident reporting requirements and the follow-up procedures
used when any type of physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical
spray is used on a student, including:
(i) A requirement that the incident be immediately reported to both
a district and school building administrator or a designee;
(ii) A description of what must be included in a written report of
the incident;
(iii) The timeline for when the written report must be submitted
and when student's parents or guardians will be informed of the
incident;
(iv) The manner by which the information will be provided to
parents or guardians; and
(v) A requirement that a log of all instances of use of physical
force, mechanical restraint, and chemical sprays be maintained and
provided to the school board annually.
(7) School districts shall report annually to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction the total number of instances when
physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical spray was used,
including:
(a) The type of physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical
spray used;
(b) The duration of the physical force or mechanical restraint if
longer than five minutes;
(c) A brief description or classification of the activity that was
the cause of the physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical
spray;
(d) The person who administered the physical force, mechanical
restraint, or chemical spray;
(e) Whether the physical force, mechanical restraint, or chemical
spray resulted in any injury to the student or employee; and
(f) What additional disciplinary action was taken toward the
student.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to be inconsistent
with chapter 28A.155 RCW, section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act
of 1972 as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), or rules or regulations
adopted thereunder.

--- END ---