BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A college in Snohomish county is established. The college must
provide baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs
primarily to the citizens of Snohomish, Island, and Skagit counties
under rules or guidelines adopted by the higher education coordinating
board.
(2) The priorities of the college shall be: (a) Preparing students
for careers in high employer demand fields such as science, technology,
and engineering; (b) preparing students for careers in clean energy,
clean energy technology, sustainable energy and smart grid
technologies, and green building design and architecture; and (c)
developing an atmosphere of innovation, entrepreneurship, and economic
development by encouraging relationships with the business community
and providing on-campus or near-campus locations for the development of
incubator projects and businesses.
(3) The college shall provide upper division capacity for transfer
students and may offer lower division courses linked to specific majors
in fields not addressed at local community colleges. In addition, the
college may also directly admit freshman and sophomores gradually and
deliberately in accordance with the campus plan to be submitted to the
higher education coordinating board. The college shall admit students
through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with a community college
emphasizing access for transfer students codeveloped by the college and
the state board for community and technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that as part of
its planning work designed to support implementation of the strategic
master plan for higher education, the higher education coordinating
board, in collaboration with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the council of presidents, the independent colleges
of Washington, and other stakeholders, has initiated a system design
planning project for the purpose of examining issues including, but not
limited to, the following:
(a) The structure of the current higher education delivery system
and how that structure can be expanded and shaped over the next twenty
years to best meet the needs of Washington citizens while optimizing
the public investment in postsecondary education;
(b) Strategies for applying an "expand on demand" planning
principle intended to authorize new postsecondary educational resources
when there is demonstrated demand and to ensure that new postsecondary
educational resources that may become available contribute to and are
in concert with all other parts of the existing system of higher
education; and
(c) Other issues as deemed appropriate by the higher education
coordinating board.
(2) The legislature finds that the results of the planning project
in this section should inform policy decisions concerning the expansion
of the higher education system and changes to the role and mission of
existing parts of the higher education system.
(3) The higher education coordinating board shall report the
findings and recommendations of the system design planning project to
the governor and the higher education and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Section 1 of this act takes effect July
1, 2010, only if:
(a) A plan describing the proposed role and mission, academic
program, and governance of any new campus, institution, or university
center authorized by this act, or change in the mission of an existing
campus, institution, or university center authorized by this act is
submitted to the higher education coordinating board; and
(b) The higher education coordinating board determines the plan
described in (a) of this subsection is consistent with the findings and
recommendations of the system design planning project in section 2 of
this act.
(2) By July 1, 2010, the higher education coordinating board shall
notify appropriate committees of the legislature and the code reviser's
office regarding whether section 1 of this act takes effect.
(3) If the conditions in this section do not occur by July 1, 2010,
section 1 of this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---