BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in this
chapter, there is imposed a tax in the amount equal to five cents per
cigarette.
(2) The moneys collected under this section must be deposited as
follows:
(a) Each year, twenty million dollars must be deposited into the
tobacco prevention and control account under RCW 43.79.480(3);
(b) 5.32 percent must be deposited into the general fund;
(c) 1.95 percent must be deposited into the water quality account
under RCW 70.146.030;
(d) 2.56 percent must be deposited into the violence reduction and
drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520;
(e) 9.26 percent must be deposited into the education legacy trust
account; and
(f) The remainder must be deposited into the health services
account.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.79.480 and 2005 c 424 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the health services account for the purposes set forth
in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco prevention and control account for
purposes set forth in this section. The legislature shall transfer
amounts received as strategic contribution payments as defined in RCW
43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery fund created in RCW
43.350.070.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account, the tax
imposed under section 1 of this act, investment earnings, donations to
the account, and other revenues as directed by law. Expenditures from
the account are subject to appropriation.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.146.030 and 2007 c 522 s 955 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The water quality account is hereby created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be used only in a manner
consistent with this chapter. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
administered by the department of ecology and shall be subject to
legislative appropriation. Moneys placed in the account shall include
tax receipts as provided in chapter 82.24 RCW ((82.24.027,
82.24.026(2)(d),)) and RCW 82.32.390, principal and interest from the
repayment of any loans granted pursuant to this chapter, and any other
moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.
(2) The department may use or permit the use of any moneys in the
account to make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants to
public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal, local,
or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for water
pollution control facilities and activities, or for purposes of
assisting a public body to obtain an ownership interest in water
pollution control facilities and/or to defray a part of the payments
made by a public body to a service provider under a service agreement
entered into pursuant to RCW 70.150.060, within the purposes of this
chapter and for related administrative expenses. For the period July
1, 2007, to June 30, 2009, moneys in the account may be used to process
applications received by the department that seek to make changes to or
transfer existing water rights and for other water resources and water
quality activities, for water conveyance projects, shoreline technical
assistance((.[,])), Puget Sound education and outreach(([,])), and for
grants and technical assistance to public bodies for watershed planning
under chapter 90.82 RCW. No more than three percent of the moneys
deposited in the account may be used by the department to pay for the
administration of the grant and loan program authorized by this
chapter.
(3) Beginning with the biennium ending June 30, 1997, the
department shall present a biennial progress report on the use of
moneys from the account to the chairs of the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.
The first report is due June 30, 1996, and the report for each
succeeding biennium is due December 31st of the odd-numbered year. The
report shall consist of a list of each recipient, project description,
and amount of the grant, loan, or both.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.50.520 and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 c 1107, and
2005 c 514 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), ((82.24.020(2), 82.24.026(2)(c),)) and 82.64.020, chapter
82.24 RCW, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for funding services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989
and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration
costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated to reimburse
local governments for costs associated with implementing criminal
justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997. During the
2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums, funds from the account may also be
used for costs associated with providing grants to local governments in
accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug offender
treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350, maintenance and
operating costs of the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and operating costs of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration's client activity tracking
system, civil indigent legal representation, multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces, transfers to the health services account, and
grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family
policy council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---