BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The worker's compensation act, Title 51 RCW,
is impressed with a trust with workers as beneficiaries of the state
accident and medical aid funds and the department of labor and
industries, as trustee of the funds, has a duty toward these
beneficiaries. A trustee relationship does not exist between employers
and workers. It is therefore recognized that different rules,
obligations, and standards are applied to employers and their
representatives than those applied to the department of labor and
industries and its representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection, after
the filing of a notice of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the
employer and its representatives shall not have contact to discuss the
issues in question in the appeal with any medical provider who has
examined or treated the claimant at the request of the claimant or
treating medical provider, unless written authorization for contact is
given by the claimant or the claimant's representative. Written
authorization is only valid if given after the date that the appeal is
filed and expires ninety days after it is signed.
(b) Contact is permitted as necessary for the ongoing management of
the claim, including but not limited to communication regarding the
worker's treatment needs and the provider's treatment plan, vocational
and return-to-work issues and assistance, and certification of the
worker's inability to work, unless these issues are in question in the
appeal.
(c) If the employer or its representatives wish to communicate with
the examining or treating medical providers concerning the issues in
question in the appeal, and no written authorization from the claimant
or the claimant's representative has been obtained, the communication
must either be:
(i) In writing, sent contemporaneously to all parties with a notice
to the provider in bold type that any response must be in writing;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the claimant or the
claimant's representative given the opportunity to fully participate;
or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(d) Written authorization is not required if the claimant fails to
identify or confirm the examining or treating medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, after
the filing of a notice of an appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2), the
claimant and the representative for the claimant, if any, shall not
have contact to discuss the issues in question in the appeal with any
medical provider who has examined the claimant at the request of the
employer pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, unless written authorization for
contact is given by the employer or its representative. Written
authorization is only valid if given after the date that the appeal is
filed and expires ninety days after it is signed.
(b) If the claimant or the claimant's representative wishes to
communicate with a medical provider who has examined the claimant
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, and no written authorization from the
employer or its representative has been obtained, the communication
must either be:
(i) In writing, sent contemporaneously to all parties with a notice
to the provider in bold type that any response must be in writing;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the department, employer,
and their representatives given the opportunity to fully participate;
or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(c) Written authorization is not required if the employer fails to
identify or confirm the examining medical provider as a witness as
required by the board.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the
department.
(a) Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection, after an
appeal has been filed under RCW 51.52.060(2), a conference has been
held to schedule hearings, and the claimant has named his or her
witnesses, the department and its representatives shall not have
contact to discuss the issues in question in the appeal with any
medical provider who has examined or treated the claimant at the
request of the claimant or treating medical provider and has been named
as a witness by the claimant or their representative unless written
authorization for contact is given by the claimant or the claimant's
representative. Written authorization is only valid if given after the
date that the appeal is filed and expires ninety days after it is
signed.
(b) Contact is permitted as necessary for the ongoing management of
the claim, including but not limited to communication regarding the
worker's treatment needs and the provider's treatment plan, vocational
and return-to-work issues and assistance, and certification of the
worker's inability to work, unless these issues are in question in the
appeal.
(c) If the department or its representatives wish to communicate
with the examining or treating medical providers concerning the issues
in question in the appeal, and no written authorization from the
claimant or the claimant's representative has been obtained, the
communication must either be:
(i) In writing, sent contemporaneously to all parties with a notice
to the provider in bold type that any response must be in writing;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the claimant or the
claimant's representative given the opportunity to fully participate;
or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(d) Written authorization is not required if the claimant fails to
identify or confirm the examining or treating medical provider as a
witness as required by the board.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, after
an appeal has been filed under RCW 51.52.060(2), a conference has been
held to schedule hearings, and the claimant has named his or her
witnesses, the claimant and the representative for the claimant, if
any, shall not have contact to discuss the issues in question in the
appeal with any medical provider who has examined the claimant at the
request of the department pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, unless written
authorization for contact is given by the department or its
representatives. Written authorization is only valid if given after
the date that the appeal is filed and expires ninety days after it is
signed.
(b) If the claimant or the claimant's representative wishes to
communicate with a medical provider who has examined the claimant
pursuant to RCW 51.36.070, and no written authorization from the
department or its representative has been obtained, the communication
must either be:
(i) In writing, sent contemporaneously to all parties with a notice
to the provider in bold type that any response must be in writing;
(ii) In person, by telephone, or by videoconference, at a date and
time mutually agreed to by all parties, with the department or its
representatives given the opportunity to fully participate; or
(iii) Pursuant to a properly scheduled and noted deposition.
(c) Written authorization is not required if the department fails
to identify or confirm the examining medical provider as a witness as
required by the board.
(5) The board may determine whether the parties have made
themselves reasonably available to participate in telephone or
videoconference communications as provided in subsections (1)(c)(ii),
(2)(b)(ii), (3)(c)(ii), and (4)(b)(ii) of this section.
(6) This section only applies to issues set forth in a notice of
appeal under RCW 51.52.060(2).
(7) This section does not limit the reporting requirements under
RCW 51.04.050 and 51.36.060 for issues not set forth in a notice of
appeal.
(8) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to orders entered on or
after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---