BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The utilities and transportation commission
shall conduct a comprehensive analysis of the structure of the state's
telecommunications and information industries. The study shall
address, among other things, the state of competition among
telecommunications providers and services; consumer protections;
interconnection rights and obligations, including carrier-to-carrier
service quality; public safety; number administration and portability;
and universal service. The study shall set forth recommendations for
legislative and regulatory measures to improve telecommunications
services, promote investment in innovative technologies and services,
and provide appropriate protections for consumers and the public. The
commission shall consult, where appropriate, with other agencies,
including the department of information services, the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the department of revenue,
and the military department, as well as telecommunications service
providers and other stakeholders. The commission shall submit its
study to the legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---