BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to help
people to protect themselves from unintended pregnancy and sexually
transmitted disease through programs that are evidence-based,
economical, and consistent with RCW 28A.300.475, the state's healthy
youth act, as existing on the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To reduce unintended pregnancies, state agencies may apply for
sexual health education funding for programs that are medically and
scientifically accurate, including, but not limited to, programs on
abstinence, the prevention of sexually transmitted diseases, and the
prevention of unintended pregnancies. The state shall ensure that such
programs:
(a) Are evidence-based;
(b) Use state funds cost-effectively;
(c) Maximize the use of federal matching funds; and
(d) Are consistent with RCW 28A.300.475, the state's healthy youth
act, as existing on the effective date of this section.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Medically and scientifically accurate" has the same meaning as
in RCW 28A.300.475, as existing on the effective date of this section;
and
(b) "Evidence-based" means a program that uses practices proven to
the greatest extent possible through research in compliance with
scientific methods to be effective and beneficial for the target
population.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.12.410 and 1997 c 58 s 601 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At time of application or reassessment under this chapter the
department shall offer or contract for family planning information and
assistance, including alternatives to abortion, and any other available
locally based ((teen)) unintended pregnancy prevention programs, to
prospective and current recipients of aid to families with dependent
children.
(2) The department shall work in cooperation with the
superintendent of public instruction to reduce the rate of
((illegitimate births and abortions)) unintended pregnancies in
Washington state.
(((3) The department of health shall maximize federal funding by
timely application for federal funds available under P.L. 104-193 and
Title V of the federal social security act, 42 U.S.C. 701 et seq., as
amended, for the establishment of qualifying abstinence education and
motivation programs. The department of health shall contract, by
competitive bid, with entities qualified to provide abstinence
education and motivation programs in the state.
(4) The department of health shall seek and accept local matching
funds to the maximum extent allowable from qualified abstinence
education and motivation programs.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, "qualifying abstinence
education and motivation programs" are those bidders with experience in
the conduct of the types of abstinence education and motivation
programs set forth in Title V of the federal social security act, 42
U.S.C. Sec. 701 et seq., as amended.
(b) The application for federal funds, contracting for abstinence
education and motivation programs and performance of contracts under
this section are subject to review and oversight by a joint committee
of the legislature, composed of four legislative members, appointed by
each of the two caucuses in each house.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be known and cited as the
proven programs act.

--- END ---