BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.40.091 and 2005 c 246 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a
security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger
envelope in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on
how to mark the ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The
instructions that accompany an absentee ballot for a partisan primary
must include instructions for voting the applicable ballot style, as
provided in chapter 29A.36 RCW. The absentee voter's name and address
must be printed on the larger return envelope, which must also contain
a declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications
and stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at
this election, together with a summary of the penalties for any
violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The declaration
must clearly inform the voter that it is illegal to vote if he or she
is not a United States citizen; it is illegal to vote if he or she has
been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her voting rights
restored; and, except as otherwise provided by law, it is illegal to
cast a ballot or sign an absentee envelope on behalf of another voter.
The return envelope must provide space for the voter to indicate the
date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the oath.
It must also contain a space so that the voter may include a telephone
number. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the
space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the
return envelope must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. The
return envelope must also have a secrecy flap that the voter may seal
that will cover the voter's signature and optional telephone number.
For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the
signed declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of
a voter registration for the election or primary for which the ballot
has been issued. The voter must be instructed to either return the
ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient
first-class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the
appropriate county auditor ((no later than the day of the election or
primary for which the ballot was issued)) in accordance with the time
requirements of RCW 29A.40.110.
If the county auditor chooses to forward absentee ballots, he or
she must include with the ballot a clear explanation of the
qualifications necessary to vote in that election and must also advise
a voter with questions about his or her eligibility to contact the
county auditor. This explanation may be provided on the ballot
envelope, on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the ballot
itself. If the information is not included, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage
is guaranteed.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.40.110 and 2006 c 207 s 4 and 2006 c 206 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The opening and subsequent processing of return envelopes for
any primary or election may begin upon receipt. The tabulation of
absentee ballots ((must not)) may commence ((until after)) at 8:00
((p.m.)) a.m. on the Monday immediately before the day of the primary
or election. Tabulation results must be held in secrecy, as provided
in RCW 29A.84.730, until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election.
(2) All received absentee return envelopes must be placed in secure
locations from the time of delivery to the county auditor until their
subsequent opening. After opening the return envelopes, the county
canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall place all of
the ballots in secure storage until ((after 8:00 p.m. of the day of the
primary or election)) tabulation. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the
inner envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to
prepare these ballots for tabulation.
(3) Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing
board, or its designated representatives, shall examine the ((postmark,
statement,)) oath and signature on the return envelope that contains
the security envelope and absentee ballot. All personnel assigned to
verify signatures must receive training on statewide standards for
signature verification. Personnel shall verify that the voter's
signature on the return envelope is the same as the signature of that
voter in the registration files of the county. Verification may be
conducted by an automated verification system approved by the secretary
of state. For any absentee ballot, a variation between the signature
of the voter on the return envelope and the signature of that voter in
the registration files due to the substitution of initials or the use
of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting
are clearly the same.
(4) For registered voters casting absentee ballots, the ((date on
the return envelope to which the voter has attested determines the
validity, as to the time of voting for that absentee ballot if the
postmark is missing or is illegible)) absentee ballots must be received
by the county auditor by 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or
election in order to be valid. The county auditor may designate poll
sites, deposit sites, or other locations for the receipt of absentee
ballots. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters
((stationed in the United States)), the date on the return envelope to
which the voter has attested ((determines the validity as to the time
of voting for that absentee ballot)) must be no later than the day of
the primary or election in order for the ballot to be valid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 29A.40 RCW
to read as follows:
Following certification of each election, the county auditor shall
notify each voter whose absentee ballot was not counted because it was
not returned within the time requirements provided in RCW 29A.40.110.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.48.050 and 2006 c 206 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the
return ((identification)) envelope in accordance with the time
requirements of RCW 29A.40.110. ((If mailed, a ballot must be
postmarked not later than the date of the primary or election.
Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the office of the county
auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on
the date of the primary or election.)) All personnel assigned to
verify signatures on the return envelope must receive training on
statewide standards for signature verification.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2006 c 344 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, fifteen
days after a primary or special election and twenty-one days after a
general election, the county canvassing board shall complete the
canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was
returned ((before the closing of the polls, and each absentee ballot
bearing a postmark on or before the date of the primary or election and
received on or before the date on which the primary or election is
certified,)) in accordance with the time requirements of RCW 29A.40.110
must be included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.
(3) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by RCW 29A.53.020, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and
certify the results.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2006 c 344 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Fifteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one
days after a general election, the county canvassing board shall
complete the canvass and certify the results. Each absentee ballot
that was returned ((before the closing of the polls, and each absentee
ballot bearing a postmark on or before the date of the primary or
election and received on or before the date on which the primary or
election is certified,)) in accordance with the time requirements of
RCW 29A.40.110 must be included in the canvass report.
(2) At the request of a caucus of the state legislature, the county
auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief
clerk of the house of representatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 5 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---