BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.42.010 and 1993 c 203 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) (("Amusement structure" means electrical or mechanical devices
or combinations of devices operated for revenue and to provide
amusement or entertainment to viewers or audiences at carnivals, fairs,
or amusement parks. "Amusement structure" also means a bungee jumping
device regardless of where located. "Amusement structure" does not
include games in which a member of the public must perform an act, nor
concessions at which customers may make purchases.)) "Amusement
apparatus" means an amusement structure or amusement ride, but does not
include any structure, device, ride, or other apparatus excluded from
the definition of either amusement structure or amusement ride. An
amusement apparatus may be:
(a) Situated inside, outside, or as a part of a building;
(b) Stationary or mobile; or
(c) Temporarily or permanently installed at a location.
(2) "Amusement apparatus inspector" means an independent third-party inspector with no organizational, managerial, financial, design,
or promotional affiliation with the amusement apparatus being inspected
and is authorized by the department to conduct safety inspections of
amusement structures under this chapter.
(3)(a) "Amusement ride" means any vehicle, boat, bungee jumping
device, or other mechanical device used to convey one or more
individuals for amusement, entertainment, diversion, or recreation:
(i) Operated for revenue; and
(ii) Moving:
(A) Upon or within a structure((,)) or track;
(B) Along cables or rails((,));
(C) Through the air by centrifugal force or otherwise((,)); or
(D) Across water((, that is used to convey one or more individuals
for amusement, entertainment, diversion, or recreation)).
(b) "Amusement ride" includes, but is not limited to, devices
commonly known as: Skyrides, ferris wheels, carousels, parachute
towers, tunnels of love, bungee jumping devices, go carts, bumper cars,
and roller coasters.
(c) "Amusement ride" does not include:
(((a))) (i) Conveyances for persons in recreational winter sports
activities such as ski lifts, ski tows, j-bars, t-bars, and similar
devices subject to regulation under chapter ((70.88)) 79A.40 RCW;
(((b))) (ii) Any stationary single-passenger or dual-passenger
coin-operated ride that is manually, mechanically, or electrically
operated and customarily placed in a public location and that does not
normally require the supervision or services of an operator;
(((c))) (iii) Nonmechanized playground equipment, not operated for
revenue, including but not limited to((,)): Swings, seesaws,
stationary spring-mounted animal features, rider-propelled merry-go-rounds, climbers, slides, trampolines, and physical fitness devices; or
(((d))) (iv) Water slides.
(((3))) (4)(a) "Amusement structure" means electrical or mechanical
or inflatable devices or combinations of one or more structures and/or
devices:
(i) Operated for revenue; and
(ii) Providing amusement or entertainment to a person or persons
who climb(s) in or upon the structure.
(b) "Amusement structure" also means a bungee jumping device
regardless of where located.
(c) "Amusement structure" does not include booths or other
enclosures typically found at carnivals, fairs, or amusement parks in
or from which are offered:
(i) Games, such as coin-toss, ring-throw, or darts, that do not
involve the transportation of the participant; or
(ii) Concessions.
(5) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(((4))) (6) "Insurance policy" means an insurance policy written by
an insurer authorized to do business in this state under Title 48 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.42.020 and 1993 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Before)) Except as provided under section 3 of this act, when
operating, renting, or leasing any amusement ride or structure, the
owner or operator of the apparatus shall:
(1) ((Obtain a permit)) Possess a valid amusement apparatus
operating decal issued pursuant to RCW 67.42.030;
(2) ((Have the amusement ride or structure inspected for safety at
least once annually by an insurer, a person with whom the insurer has
contracted, or a person who meets the qualifications set by the
department and obtain from the insurer or person a written certificate
that the inspection has been made and that the amusement ride or
structure meets the standards for coverage and is covered by the
insurer as required by subsection (3) of this section. A bungee
jumping device, including, but not limited to, the crane, tower,
balloon or bridge, person lift basket, platforms, bungee cords, end
attachments, anchors, carabiners or locking devices, harnesses, landing
devices, and additional ride operation hardware shall be inspected for
safety prior to beginning operation and annually by an insurer, a
person with whom the insurer has contracted, or a person authorized by
the department to inspect bungee jumping devices. The operator of the
bungee jumping device shall obtain a written certificate which states
that the required inspection has been made and the bungee jumping
device meets the standards for coverage and is covered by the insurer
as required by subsection (3) of this section;
(3))) Have and keep in effect an insurance policy in an amount not
less than one million dollars per occurrence insuring: (a) The owner
or operator; and (b) any municipality or county on whose property the
amusement ((ride or structure stands)) apparatus is located, or any
municipality or county which has contracted with the owner or operator
against liability for injury to persons arising out of the use of the
amusement ((ride or structure)) apparatus;
(((4) File with the department the inspection certificate and
insurance policy required by this section; and
(5))) (3) File with each sponsor, lessor, landowner, or other
person responsible for an amusement ((structure or ride)) apparatus
being offered for use by the public a certificate stating that the
insurance required by subsection (((3))) (2) of this section is in
effect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 67.42 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter requires that an amusement apparatus
operating decal be obtained by:
(1) A person operating or otherwise making an amusement apparatus
available without charge to the person's family or invitees at his or
her place of residence, but only if:
(a) The person operating the apparatus owns the residence; or
(b) The owner of the residence has authorized the use of the
apparatus.
(2) A person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
operating an amusement apparatus when the apparatus is part of an act
or stage performance to entertain an audience and access to the
apparatus by the general public is prohibited.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.42.025 and 1986 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An amusement ((ride)) apparatus that has been inspected in any
state, territory, or possession of the United States that, in the
discretion of the department, has a level of regulation comparable to
this chapter, shall be deemed to meet the inspection requirement of
this chapter.
(2) An amusement ((ride)) apparatus inspector who is authorized to
inspect amusement ((rides)) apparatus in any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, who, in the discretion of the
department, has a level of qualifications comparable to those required
under this chapter, shall be deemed qualified to inspect amusement
((rides)) apparatus under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.42.030 and 1985 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Application for an operating permit to operate an amusement
ride or structure shall be made on an annual basis by the owner or
operator of the amusement ride or structure. The)) An application for
an amusement apparatus operating decal shall be made on forms or in a
manner prescribed by the department and shall include the application
fee required by rule and the certificates of insurance and inspection
required by RCW 67.42.020(((2))) (3) and subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) ((The department shall issue a decal with each permit. The
decal shall be affixed on or adjacent to the control panel of the
amusement ride or structure in a location visible to the patrons of the
ride or structure)) (a) An applicant for an amusement apparatus
operating decal shall identify the apparatus for which a decal is being
applied and certify that all of the components of the apparatus have
been inspected for safety by an amusement apparatus inspector.
(b)(i) After the date of any invalidating event identified in RCW
67.42.040(2), an inspection must be performed by either:
(A) An amusement apparatus inspector retained by the applicant's
insurer; or
(B) A person meeting the qualifications for an amusement apparatus
inspector as established by the department by rule.
(ii) The person performing the inspection under this subsection
must verify the date of the inspection and that the apparatus meets or
exceeds the safety standards applicable to the apparatus as adopted by
the department under this chapter.
(3) If the requirements of this section are met, the department
shall issue an amusement apparatus operating decal with each permit to
the applicant.
(4) When the amusement apparatus identified in the application is
operated, rented, leased, or otherwise made available to the public,
the decal shall be displayed in a location visible to the patrons of
the apparatus.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.42.040 and 1993 c 203 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or unless
a shorter period is specified by the department, ((permits)) amusement
apparatus operating decals issued under RCW 67.42.030 are valid for a
one-year period from the date of issuance and are not transferable.
(2) ((If an amusement ride or structure)) An amusement apparatus
operating decal becomes invalid immediately when:
(a) The insurance policy required by RCW 67.42.020(2) is canceled;
or
(b) Amusement apparatus for which the decal has been issued:
(i) Is materially rebuilt or materially modified so as to change
the original action of the amusement ((ride or structure, the amusement
ride or structure shall be subject to a new inspection under RCW
67.42.020 and the owner or operator shall apply for a new permit under
RCW 67.42.030.)) apparatus;
(((3) If an amusement ride or structure for which a permit has been
issued pursuant to RCW 67.42.030)) (ii) Is a bungee jumping device or
a permanently installed amusement apparatus and the device or apparatus
is moved and installed in another ((place but is not materially rebuilt
or materially modified so as to change the original action of the
amusement ride or structure, no new permit is required prior to the
expiration of the permit.
(4))) location;
(iii) Is a bungee jumping device ((or a)) and any part of ((a)) the
device((,)) is repaired or replaced including, but not limited to, the
crane, tower, platforms, bungee cords, end attachments, carabiners or
locking devices, harnesses, person lift basket, mobile crane, balloon
or balloon basket, anchor or anchor attachment structure, or landing
device((, that is replaced shall be reinspected by an insurer, a person
with whom the insurer has contracted, or by a person authorized by the
department to inspect bungee jumping devices, and the owner or operator
of the device shall apply for a new permit under RCW 67.42.030.
(5) A bungee jumping operator shall have any bungee jumping device
or structure that is moved and installed in another location
reinspected by an insurer, a person with whom the insurer has
contracted, or a person authorized by the department to inspect bungee
jumping devices before beginning operation.
(6) Any new operator who purchases an existing bungee jumping
device or structure must have the bungee jumping device inspected and
permitted as required under RCW 67.42.020 before beginning operation));
(iv) Is a climbing wall and any personal restraining device or part
of a restraining device is repaired or replaced;
(v) Is sold or ownership of the apparatus is otherwise transferred
to a new owner.

Sec. 7 RCW 67.42.050 and 1985 c 262 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to
administer this chapter, including provisions relating to:
(i) Inspector qualifications and safety standards;
(ii) Issuance of orders and rulings, including demand and filings;
(iii) Citations and penalties, not to exceed five thousand dollars
per violation; and
(iv) Any other actions as may be necessary for the implementation
and enforcement of this chapter.
(b) Such rules may exempt amusement ((rides or structures))
apparatus otherwise subject to this chapter if the amusement ((rides or
structures)) apparatus are located on lands owned by (([the])) the
United States government or its agencies and are required to comply
with federal safety standards at least equal to those under this
chapter.
(2)(a) The department may order, in writing, the cessation of the
operation of an amusement ((ride or structure)) apparatus for which:
(i) No valid permit is in effect ((or for which));
(ii) The owner or operator does not have an insurance policy as
required by RCW 67.42.020; or
(iii) The apparatus is found by the department to be unsafe.
(b) Incident reporting is required by rule.
(3) All proceedings relating to ((permits)) applications,
citations, or orders to cease operation under this chapter shall be
conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 67.42.060 and 1993 c 203 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may ((charge)) establish, by rule, a reasonable
fee ((not to exceed ten dollars for each permit issued)) to review each
application received under RCW 67.42.030.
(2)(a) In establishing the fee for reviewing applications received
during the first fiscal year after the effective date of this act, the
department may exceed the fiscal growth factor limit as provided under
RCW 43.135.055, but may not establish a fee exceeding:
(i) One hundred fifty dollars for each application relating to a
bungee jumping device; or
(ii) Twenty dollars for each application relating to any other
amusement apparatus.
(b) The fee may provide for a reduced per apparatus fee for
reviewing applications submitted at the same time that relate to more
than five materially identical apparatus.
(3) Subsequent fee changes shall be subject to the fiscal growth
factor limit as provided under RCW 43.135.055.
(4) All fees, penalties, and other amounts collected by the
department under this chapter shall be deposited in the ((state
general)) electrical license fund. ((This subsection does not apply to
permits issued under RCW 67.42.030 to operate a bungee jumping device.
(2) The department may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed one
hundred dollars for each permit issued under RCW 67.42.030 to operate
a bungee jumping device. Fees collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the state general fund for appropriation for the
permitting and inspection of bungee jumping devices under this
chapter.))
(5) No amount deposited under the authority of this section may be
used for any purpose other than the regulation of amusement apparatus
under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 67.42.070 and 1985 c 262 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is a gross misdemeanor for any person ((who operates an
amusement ride or structure without complying with the requirements of
this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor)) to operate:
(1) An amusement apparatus without a valid amusement apparatus
operating decal, and any person is injured by the operation of the
apparatus; or
(2) A bungee jumping device from any location where written
permission of the owner is required by RCW 67.42.090, and the operator
has not obtained the written permission of the owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 67.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation
of this chapter, the director and the director's authorized
representatives may issue a subpoena to enforce the production and
examination of any of the following, whether written or electronic:
(a) A listing of the amusement apparatus owned or operated;
(b) Contracts or other agreements between an amusement apparatus
owner, lessor, or operator;
(c) Records relating to any incident required to be reported by
rule; or
(d) Any other information necessary to enforce this chapter.
(2) The subpoena may be issued only if an amusement apparatus
owner, lessor, or operator fails to provide the information in
subsection (1) of this section when requested by the department.
(3) The superior court has the power to enforce such a subpoena by
proper proceedings.
(4) This section applies to all amusement apparatus owners,
lessors, and operators regardless of whether the amusement apparatus
has a valid operating decal.

Sec. 11 RCW 67.42.080 and 1985 c 262 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing contained in this chapter prevents a county or municipality
from adopting and enforcing ordinances which relate to the operation of
amusement ((rides or structures)) apparatus and supplement the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 12 RCW 67.42.090 and 1993 c 203 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Bungee jumping from a publicly owned bridge or publicly owned
land is ((allowed only if)) prohibited unless permission has been
granted ((by)), in writing, by a public officer designated by the chief
executive officer of the government body that has jurisdiction over the
bridge or land.
(2) Bungee jumping into publicly owned waters is ((allowed only
if)) prohibited unless permission has been granted ((by)), in writing,
by a public officer designated by the chief executive officer of the
government body that has jurisdiction over the body of water.
(3) Bungee jumping from a privately owned bridge is ((allowed only
if)) prohibited unless permission has been granted, in writing, by the
owner of the bridge.

Sec. 13 RCW 19.28.351 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 910 are each
amended to read as follows:
All sums received from licenses, permit fees, or other sources,
herein shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed in a special
fund designated as the "electrical license fund," and paid out upon
vouchers duly and regularly issued therefor and approved by the
director of labor and industries or the director's designee following
determination by the board that the sums are necessary to accomplish
the intent of this chapter ((19.28)) and chapter 67.42 RCW. The
treasurer shall keep an accurate record of payments into, or receipts
of, the fund, and of all disbursements therefrom, and must distinguish
deposits and disbursement made pursuant to this chapter from those made
pursuant to chapter 67.42 RCW.
((During the 2003-2005 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the electrical license fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.))

--- END ---