BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.037 and 2006 c 305 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Real or personal property owned by a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation in connection with the operation of a
public assembly hall or meeting place is exempt from taxation. The
area exempt under this section includes the building or buildings, the
land under the buildings, and an additional area necessary for parking,
not exceeding a total of one acre. When property for which exemption
is sought is essentially unimproved except for restroom facilities and
structures and this property has been used primarily for annual
community celebration events for at least ten years, the exempt
property shall not exceed twenty-nine acres.
(2) To qualify for this exemption the property must be used
exclusively for public gatherings and be available to all organizations
or persons desiring to use the property, but the owner may impose
conditions and restrictions which are necessary for the safekeeping of
the property and promote the purposes of this exemption. Membership
shall not be a prerequisite for the use of the property.
(3) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or for business
activities, except as provided in this section, nullifies the exemption
otherwise available for the property for the assessment year. The
exemption is not nullified by:
(a) The collection of rent or donations if all funds collected are
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(b) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(c)(i) The use of the property for pecuniary gain, for business
activities for periods of not more than fifteen days each assessment
year so long as all income received from rental or use of the exempt
property is used for capital improvements to the exempt property,
maintenance and operation of the exempt property, or for exempt
purposes; or (ii) the use of the property for pecuniary gain or for
business activities for periods in excess of fifteen days, so long as
such rental income does not exceed forty percent of the total revenues
received from the use or rental of the property, and the income
received from the rental or use of the exempt property for pecuniary
gain or business activities is used for capital improvements to the
exempt property, maintenance and operation of the exempt property, or
for exempt purposes.
(d) In a county with a population of less than twenty thousand, the
use of the property to promote the following business activities:
Dance lessons, art classes, or music lessons.
(e) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(4) The department of revenue shall narrowly construe this
exemption.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2010 and thereafter.

--- END ---