BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Washington
wing of the civil air patrol is uniquely suited to assist the state in
providing air search, rescue, and emergency services including response
to emergency missions. The legislature further finds that the
Washington wing of the civil air patrol is a nonprofit, federally
chartered private corporation which is the auxiliary of the United
States air force and is engaged in cooperation with the national,
state, and local emergency services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state patrol may receive gifts, grants, or
endowments from public or private sources that are made from time to
time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of
the Washington wing of the civil air patrol.
(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's
designee shall deposit moneys received under subsection (1) of this
section into the Washington wing of the civil air patrol account
created in section 3 of this act.
(3) The chief of Washington state patrol or the chief's designee
shall disperse the donated funds to the Washington wing of the civil
air patrol for the following purposes: Equipment purchase, conduct of
search and rescue missions, and training and education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington wing of the civil air patrol account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from public and
private contributions to the Washington wing of the civil air patrol
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the purposes of section 2 of this act. Only the chief
of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

--- END ---