BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.280.030 and 2008 c 119 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter is responsible for performing
a visual and noninvasive inspection of the following readily accessible
systems and components of a home and reporting on the general condition
of those systems and components at the time of the inspection in his or
her written report: The roof, foundation, exterior, heating system,
air-conditioning system, structure, plumbing and electrical systems,
and other aspects of the home as may be identified by the board. The
inspection must include looking for mold and certain fire and safety
hazards as defined by the board. The standards of practice to be
developed by the board will be used as the minimum standards for an
inspection. The duties of the home inspector with regard to wood
destroying organisms are provided in RCW 18.280.190.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.280.060 and 2008 c 119 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board has the following authority in administering this
chapter:
(1) To establish rules, including board organization and assignment
of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by the
director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for licensing
applicants as provided in this chapter;
(3) To approve qualified instructional courses. In order to
facilitate distance learning, the board must approve both online and
traditional classroom courses that meet appropriate instructional
standards;
(4) To approve the method of administration of examinations
required by this chapter or by rule as established by the director;
(((4))) (5) To approve the content of or recognition of
examinations prepared by other entities for adoption by the director;
(((5))) (6) To set the time and place of examinations with the
approval of the director; and
(((6))) (7) To establish and review standards of professional
conduct, practice, and ethics for adoption by the director. These
standards must address what constitutes certain fire and safety hazards
as used in RCW 18.280.030.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.280.070 and 2008 c 119 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to become licensed as a home inspector, an applicant must
submit the following to the department:
(1) An application on a form developed by the department;
(2) Proof of a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of ((classroom))
instruction approved by the board;
(3) Proof of up to forty hours of field training supervised by a
licensed home inspector;
(4) Evidence of successful passage of the written exam as required
in RCW 18.280.080; and
(5) The fee in the amount set by the department.

--- END ---