BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.180.010 and 1992 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person who serves legal process for a fee in the state of
Washington shall be a resident of the state of Washington, be eighteen
years of age or older, and register as a process server with the
auditor of the county in which the process server resides or operates
his or her principal place of business.
(2) The requirement to register under subsection (1) of this
section does not apply to any of the following persons:
(a) A sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, constable, or government
employee who is acting in the course of employment;
(b) An attorney or the attorney's employees, who are not serving
process on a fee basis;
(c) A person who is court appointed to serve the court's process;
(d) An employee of a person who is registered under this section;
(e) A person who does not receive a fee or wage for serving
process.

--- END ---