BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the Walla Walla
watershed community faces substantial challenges in planning for future
water use and meeting the needs of fish, farms, and people. The
legislature further finds that the participants in the Walla Walla
watershed planning group have demonstrated exceptional cooperation in
developing an innovative water management concept that enhances
flexibility in water use while protecting ecological functions. The
legislature also recognizes the significant contribution of
representative William Grant's leadership in the creation of a Walla
Walla pilot design to authorize local water management activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Basin" means the WRIA where the planning area is located.
(2) "Board" means a water management board created under this
chapter.
(3) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(5) "Initiating entities" means the county boards of commissioners
within the planning area, the city council of the largest Washington
city in the planning area, the largest water user in the planning area,
and all affected federally recognized tribes within the planning area.
(6) "Instream flow" means a minimum flow under chapter 90.03 or
90.22 RCW or a base flow under chapter 90.54 RCW that has been set by
rule.
(7) "Local water management program" means the water banking
mechanism, any local water plans authorized by the board, and any other
activities authorized by section 5 of this act.
(8) "Local water plan" means a voluntary water management plan
developed by local water rights holders within the planning area to
manage their water use in a manner that enhances stream flows in
exchange for greater flexibility in exercising the water rights.
(9) "Planning area" means the entirety or a subsection of a single
or multiple WRIA as identified in the creation of a board under this
chapter.
(10) "Trust water right" means any water right acquired by the
state under chapter 90.42 RCW for management in the state's water
rights program.
(11) "Watershed plan" means a plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW.
(12) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in
chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Initiating entities may collectively
petition the department in order to establish a water management board.
(2) The department, in consultation with the initiating entities,
may create a board if:
(a) The initiating entities demonstrate to the department that the
following criteria are satisfied:
(i) Community support for the development of a local watershed
management plan, including the affected federally recognized tribes,
local governments, and general community support;
(ii) There is commitment on the part of the initiating entities and
the affected community to enhance instream flows for fish; and
(iii) An adequate monitoring network is in place, as determined by
the department;
(b) The department determines the following:
(i) An instream flow rule for the WRIA or WRIAs in the planning
area has been adopted since 1998;
(ii) The planning area is located within one of the sixteen fish-critical basins designated by the department in its March 2003
"Washington Water Acquisition Program" report and demonstrates a
significant history of severely impaired flows; and
(iii) The watershed planning unit has completed a watershed
implementation plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW and salmon recovery
implementation plan adopted under chapter 77.85 RCW.
(3) The department, in determining whether to create a board, must
give strong consideration to basins that have completed a judicial
proceeding to adjudicate water rights under chapter 90.03 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1)(a) Each board must be composed of the
following members:
(i) All affected federally recognized tribes within the planning
area will be invited to participate and may appoint one member each;
(ii) The following entities must each appoint one member:
(A) Each county board of commissioners within the planning area;
(B) The city council of the largest Washington city in the planning
area; and
(C) The board of directors of the entity or the person who uses the
greatest quantity of water in the planning area;
(iii) The conservation districts' board of supervisors in the
planning area must jointly appoint one member; and
(iv) The members under (a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection must
appoint the remaining three members of the board. These three members
must be residents of the planning area. One member must be a planning
area water rights holder. One member must represent environmental
interests in the planning area. One member must be a citizen at large.
(b) If for any reason one of the required governments or entities
to be represented on the board declines to participate, the remaining
board members may invite another local government within the planning
area to join the board.
(2) Each member of the board serves a two-year term and may be
reappointed for an additional term. Members may continue to serve on
the board until a new appointment is made.
(3) The board must create a policy advisory group and a water
resource panel.
(a) For the policy advisory group, the board must invite
participation from the department and the department of fish and
wildlife, other affected state agencies, and other interests as
appropriate. The board may also appoint members from local government
agencies, academia, watershed and salmon recovery entities, businesses,
and agricultural and environmental organizations as the board deems
appropriate.
(b) The policy advisory group must assist and advise the board in
coordinating and developing water resource-related programs, planning,
and activities within the planning area, including the coordination of
efforts with all jurisdictions of the planning area and development of
the board's strategic actions.
(c) For the water resource panel, the board must appoint members to
the water resource panel who have expertise and understanding regarding
surface water and groundwater monitoring and hydrological analysis,
irrigation management and engineering, water rights, and fisheries
habitat and economic development. The board must invite participation
from the department and the department of fish and wildlife.
(d) The water resource panel must provide technical assistance for
the development of the local water plans and provide advice to the
board on the criteria for establishment of local water plans and the
approval, denial, or modification of the local water plans.
(4) A board member, employee, or contractor may not engage in any
act that is in conflict with the proper discharge of their official
duties. Such conflicts of interest include, but are not limited to,
holding a financial interest in a matter before the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board has the following authority,
duties, and responsibilities:
(a) Assume the duties, responsibilities, and all current activities
of the watershed planning unit and the initiating governments
authorized in RCW 90.82.040;
(b) Develop strategic actions for the planning area by building on
the watershed plan;
(c) Adopt and revise criteria, guidance, and processes to
effectuate the purpose of this chapter;
(d) Administer the local water plan process;
(e) Oversee local water plan implementation;
(f) Manage banked water as authorized under this chapter;
(g) Acquire water rights by donation, purchase, or lease;
(h) Participate in local, state, tribal, federal, and multistate
basin water planning initiatives and programs; and
(i) Enter into agreements with water rights holders to not divert
water that becomes available as a result of local water plans, water
banking activities, or other programs and projects endorsed by the
board and the department.
(2) The board may acquire, purchase, hold, lease, manage, occupy,
and sell real and personal property, including water rights, or any
interest in water rights, enter into and perform all necessary
contracts, appoint and employ necessary agents and employees, including
an executive director and fix their compensation, employ contractors
including contracts for professional services, and do all lawful acts
required and expedient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(3) The board constitutes an independently funded entity, and may
provide for its own funding as determined by the board. The board may
solicit and accept grants, loans, and donations and may adopt fees for
services it provides. The board may not impose taxes or acquire
property, including water rights, by the exercise of eminent domain.
The board may distribute available funds as grants or loans to local
water plans or other water initiatives and projects that will further
the goals of the board.
(4) The ability of the board to fully meet its duties under this
chapter is dependent on the level of funding available to the board.
If sufficient funding is not available to the board to carry out its
duties, the board may, in consultation with the department, establish
a plan that determines and sets priorities for implementation of the
board's duties.
(5) The board, and its members and staff, acting in their official
capacities, are immune from liability and are not subject to any cause
of action or claim for damages arising from acts or omissions engaged
in under this chapter.
(6) Upon the creation of the board, and for the duration of the
board, the existing planning unit for the planning area, established
under RCW 90.82.040, is dissolved and all assets, funds, files,
planning documents, pending plans and grant applications, and other
current activities of the planning unit are transferred to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board, in collaboration with the
department, must provide a written report to the legislature by
December 1, 2012, December 1, 2015, and December 1, 2018. The report
must summarize the actions, funding, and accomplishments of the board
in the previous three years, and submit recommendations for improvement
of the local water plan process. The 2018 report must also contain
recommendations on the future of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The board may establish a mechanism to
bank water for the holders of water rights within the planning area to
voluntarily deposit them on a temporary or permanent basis.
(2) The board has the following authority regarding banked water in
the planning area:
(a) The board may accept a surface water right or a groundwater
right on a permanent or temporary basis under terms and conditions
agreed upon by the water rights holder and the board.
(b) On a temporary or permanent basis, the board may accept a water
right, or portion thereof, that will be made available under local
water plans for stream flow enhancement under the terms of the local
water plan, as provided in this chapter.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, the board must
accept a water right temporarily banked for instream flow without
conducting a review of the extent and validity of the water right.
Such a water right may not thereafter be authorized for any other
purposes. A banked water right that has not been tentatively
determined as to its extent and validity is not entitled to be
protected from impairment by another water right.
(d) The board may manage a water right that has been banked as
mitigation for impairment to instream flows and other existing water
rights. However, the water right may only be available for mitigation
to the extent the department determines the water right is valid and
use of the water right for mitigation will not cause detriment or
injury to existing water rights.
(3)(a) A water right banked on a temporary basis remains in the
ownership of the water rights holder and not the state of Washington or
the board.
(b) A water right banked on a permanent basis must be transferred
to the state of Washington as a trust water right consistent with RCW
90.42.080.
(4) A water right or portion of a water right banked under this
chapter is not subject to loss by forfeiture under RCW 90.14.130
through 90.14.200. When a temporary water right is withdrawn from
banking, the time period that the water right was banked may not be
calculated as time water was not used for purposes of RCW 90.14.160,
90.14.170, and 90.14.180.
(5) When a temporarily deposited water right is withdrawn from
banking, the time period that the water right was banked may not be
included in the five years of prior water use for purposes of
applications to add acreage or purposes of water use under RCW
90.03.380(1).
(6) Nothing in this chapter forecloses or diminishes the rights of
any person to apply to the department to transfer a water right to the
state trust water rights program under the authority of chapter 90.42
RCW or to apply for a change of a water right to the department or to
a water conservancy board authorized under chapter 90.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The board shall adopt guidelines and
criteria for filing, review, and approval of a local water plan. The
board shall also develop a dispute resolution process that provides for
water users, the board, and the department to resolve disputes
regarding the implementation and enforcement of a local water plan.
(2) A water user or group of water users within the planning area,
organized as provided in guidelines adopted by the board, may submit a
proposed local water plan to the board.
(3) A local water plan must include:
(a) A determination by the board of the baseline water use for all
water rights involved in the local water plan, based on the guidelines
adopted by the board, and in consultation with the water resource
panel. The baseline documents regarding water use that are submitted
by the water users may not be used by the department to determine the
validity of the water rights in any future administrative or regulatory
actions;
(b) A clearly defined set of practices that provide for flexibility
of water use as defined in subsection (4) of this section;
(c) An estimate of the amount of water that would remain instream
either long term or during critical flow periods for fish;
(d) Performance measures and options for achieving reductions in
total water use from baseline;
(e) Performance measures for tracking improved stream flows either
long term or during critical flow periods for fish; and
(f) Measurement, tracking, and monitoring measures and procedures
that ensure the implementation and enforcement of the measures for
flexibility of water use, enhancement of the stream flows, and other
elements, terms, and conditions in the local water plan.
(4) The local water plan may have elements and provide rights to
the use and application of water that are not otherwise authorized in
the water rights, including:
(a) The ability to use the quantity of water defined as baseline in
section 12(1)(a) of this act on new or additional places of use, from
new or additional points of diversion or withdrawal, and at different
times of the year;
(b) The ability to change or add a source of water supply including
the use of groundwater to supplement surface water rights and the
ability to implement the conjunctive use of the groundwater and surface
water; and
(c) The storage of water and infiltration of the water to the
groundwater to supplement shallow groundwater withdrawals or for the
purpose of replenishing the aquifer.
(5) To participate in a local water plan, water rights holders
must: (a) Agree to allow a portion or all of their baseline water use
to remain instream, as specified in the approved local water plan; (b)
have existing operable water conveyance infrastructure in place and
available for use; (c) agree that any water made available for stream
flow enhancement may not be diverted from the water source and used
during the term of the local water plan, but instead must be deposited
into the water bank or, upon request by the water rights holder,
transferred to the trust water rights program consistent with chapter
90.42 RCW; (d) measure and monitor their water use, stream flows
upstream and downstream of the boundaries of the plan, and groundwater
levels within the boundaries of the plan; and (e) commit to staying in
the program consistent with criteria established by the board.
(6) Unless agreed upon by the water rights holder, nothing in this
chapter diminishes or changes existing water rights.
(7) The water users must submit annual reports to the department
and the board regarding contract performance, consistent with the
guidelines adopted by the board.
(8) A local water plan may be effective for a term of one to ten
years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The board must provide a thirty-day
public notice period for the proposal for a local water plan and accept
comments from all interested persons during that period.
(2) To become effective, the local water plan must be approved by
both the board and the department. A proposed local water plan must
not be approved if the board and the department determine the local
water plan will not substantially enhance instream flow conditions.
(3) The approved local water plan must be signed by the executive
director of the board, by the director, and by all water users
participating in the local water plan. The local water plan is a
contract among the board, the department, and the water users in which
all parties agree to abide by all terms and conditions of the local
water plan.
(4) If an approved local water plan is not in compliance with its
terms and conditions, the board shall, consistent with the dispute
resolution process adopted by the board, seek compliance. If the board
revokes a local water plan due to noncompliance, the water users in the
local water plan must thereafter exercise the water rights only as the
water rights were authorized and conditioned prior to the approval of
the local water plan, and all rights and duties that were terms in the
local water plan lapse and are not valid or enforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Any person not party to the local water
plan and aggrieved by the director's decision may appeal the decision
to the pollution control hearings board as provided under RCW
43.21B.230.
(2) A water rights holder who believes the holder's water right has
been impaired by any action under this chapter may request that the
department review the impairment claim. If the department determines
that some action under this chapter is impairing existing rights, the
department, the board, and the water users must amend the local water
plan to eliminate the impairment. Any decision of the department to
alter or not alter a local water plan is appealable to the pollution
control hearings board under RCW 43.21B.230.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) A local water plan expires by its
terms, by withdrawal of one or more water users to the local water
plan, or upon agreement by all parties to the contact. Upon the
expiration of a local water plan that has been operating for five or
more years, the water users may request that the board and the
department make the elements of the local water plan, including water
deposited to the water bank for placement in the trust water rights
program, permanent authorizations and conditions for use of the water
rights.
(2) The request under subsection (1) of this section must be
evaluated based on whether:
(a) The determination of the baseline water use adequately analyzed
the extent and validity of the donated water right; and
(b)(i) Whether there is injury or detriment to other existing water
rights; or
(ii) The written approval obtained from the holder of an impaired
water right is continued or renewed.
(3) If the board and the department approve the request under
subsection (1) of this section, the department shall issue superseding
water rights consistent with the management and uses of the water under
the local water plan. That portion of the water rights deposited in
the water bank for placement in the trust water rights program must be
made permanent and transferred in accordance with chapter 90.42 RCW.
(4) If the local water plan expires and the water management and
uses under the local water plan are not granted approval to be
permanent, the water users in the local water plan must thereafter
exercise the water rights only as the water rights were authorized and
conditioned prior to the local water plan, and all rights and duties
that were terms in the local water plan lapse and are not valid or
enforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The water rights in the local water
plan as authorized for the uses described in section 8(4) of this act
are:
(a) Not subject to either the approval of the department under RCW
90.03.380 through 90.03.390, 90.44.100, and 90.44.105, or a tentative
determination of the validity and extent of the water rights;
(b) Not subject to loss by forfeiture under RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.200 during the period of time from when the local water plan is
approved to the expiration or nullification of the local water plan as
provided in section 11 of this act; and
(c) Not to be exercised in a manner that would result in injury or
detriment to other existing water rights unless express written
approval is obtained from the holder of the impaired water right. To
allow impacts to existing instream flow rights, the board and the
department must agree that the flow benefits provided by a local water
plan outweigh the impacts on existing instream flow rights.
(2) The years during the period of time when the local water plan
is operational may not be considered or calculated as a period of time
that the water was not applied to use for purposes of RCW 90.14.130
through 90.14.200. Further, the years during this period of time may
not be considered or calculated as a period of time that the water was
not applied to use and for purposes of future applications to change
the water right for additional purposes or acreage under RCW 90.03.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The local water management program
authorized by this chapter must be piloted in WRIA 32, as defined in
chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

Sec. 14 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of five or more
consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW;
(i) If such a right is involved in an approved local water plan
created under section 9 of this act, provided the right is subject to
an agreement not to divert under section 5 of this act, or provided the
right is banked under section 7 of this act.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 15 RCW 90.03.380 and 2003 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water. The time period that the water right was
banked under section 7 of this act, in an approved local water plan
created under section 9 of this act, or the water right was subject to
an agreement to not divert under section 5 of this act will not be
included in the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial
use for the purpose of determining the annual consumptive quantity
under this section. If the water right has not been used during the
previous five years but the nonuse of which qualifies for one or more
of the statutory good causes or exceptions to relinquishment in RCW
90.14.140 and 90.44.520, the period of nonuse is not included in the
most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial use for purposes
of determining the annual consumptive quantity of water under this
section.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under section 9 of this act, a water
right that is subject to an agreement not to divert under section 5 of
this act, or a banked water right under section 7 of this act.

Sec. 16 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under section 9 of this act or a
banked water right under section 7 of this act.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2003 c 393 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, and the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, or
local health departments:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and
90.56.330.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under this
act.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(((d))) (e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the
grant or denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((e))) (f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the
issuance and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids
under RCW 70.95J.080.
(((f))) (g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived
fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and
decisions of the department regarding waste-derived soil amendments
under RCW 70.95.205.
(((g))) (h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to
the denial of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient
management plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any
dairy nutrient management practices, standards, methods, and
technologies to a particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the
plan review and approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(((h))) (i) Any other decision by the department or an air
authority which pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Proceedings conducted by the department, or the department's
designee, under RCW 90.03.160 through 90.03.210 or 90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 18 RCW 90.82.060 and 2008 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Planning conducted under this chapter must provide for a
process to allow the local citizens within a WRIA or multi-WRIA area to
join together in an effort to: (a) Assess the status of the water
resources of their WRIA or multi-WRIA area; and (b) determine how best
to manage the water resources of the WRIA or multi-WRIA area to balance
the competing resource demands for that area within the parameters
under RCW 90.82.120.
(2)(a) Watershed planning under this chapter may be initiated for
a WRIA only with the concurrence of: (i) All counties within the WRIA;
(ii) the largest city or town within the WRIA unless the WRIA does not
contain a city or town; and (iii) the water supply utility obtaining
the largest quantity of water from the WRIA or, for a WRIA with lands
within the Columbia Basin project, the water supply utility obtaining
from the Columbia Basin project the largest quantity of water for the
WRIA. To apply for a grant for organizing the planning unit as
provided for under RCW 90.82.040(2)(a), these entities shall designate
the entity that will serve as the lead agency for the planning effort
and indicate how the planning unit will be staffed.
(b) For purposes of this chapter, WRIA 40 shall be divided such
that the portion of the WRIA located entirely within the Stemilt and
Squilchuck subbasins shall be considered WRIA 40a and the remaining
portion shall be considered WRIA 40b. Planning may be conducted
separately for WRIA 40a and 40b. WRIA 40a shall be eligible for one-fourth of the funding available for a single WRIA, and WRIA 40b shall
be eligible for three-fourths of the funding available for a single
WRIA.
(c) For purposes of this chapter, WRIA 29 shall be divided such
that the portion of the WRIA located entirely within the White Salmon
subbasin and the subbasins east thereof shall be considered WRIA 29b
and the remaining portion shall be considered WRIA 29a. Planning may
be conducted separately for WRIA 29a and 29b. WRIA 29a shall be
eligible for one-half of the funding available for a single WRIA and
WRIA 29b shall be eligible for one-half of the funding available for a
single WRIA.
(d) For purposes of this chapter, WRIA 14 shall be divided such
that the portion of the WRIA where surface waters drain into Hood Canal
shall be considered WRIA 14b, and the remaining portion shall be
considered WRIA 14a. Planning for WRIA 14b under this chapter shall be
conducted by the WRIA 16 planning unit. WRIA 14b shall be eligible for
one-half of the funding available for a single WRIA, and WRIA 14a shall
be eligible for one-half of the funding available for a single WRIA.
(3) Watershed planning under this chapter may be initiated for a
multi-WRIA area only with the concurrence of: (a) All counties within
the multi-WRIA area; (b) the largest city or town in each WRIA unless
the WRIA does not contain a city or town; and (c) the water supply
utility obtaining the largest quantity of water in each WRIA.
(4) If entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this section decide
jointly and unanimously to proceed, they shall invite all tribes with
reservation lands within the management area.
(5) The entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this section,
including the tribes if they affirmatively accept the invitation,
constitute the initiating governments for the purposes of this section.
(6) The organizing grant shall be used to organize the planning
unit and to determine the scope of the planning to be conducted. In
determining the scope of the planning activities, consideration shall
be given to all existing plans and related planning activities. The
scope of planning must include water quantity elements as provided in
RCW 90.82.070, and may include water quality elements as contained in
RCW 90.82.090, habitat elements as contained in RCW 90.82.100, and
instream flow elements as contained in RCW 90.82.080. The initiating
governments shall work with state government, other local governments
within the management area, and affected tribal governments, in
developing a planning process. The initiating governments may hold
public meetings as deemed necessary to develop a proposed scope of work
and a proposed composition of the planning unit. In developing a
proposed composition of the planning unit, the initiating governments
shall provide for representation of a wide range of water resource
interests.
(7) Each state agency with regulatory or other interests in the
WRIA or multi-WRIA area to be planned shall assist the local citizens
in the planning effort to the greatest extent practicable, recognizing
any fiscal limitations. In providing such technical assistance and to
facilitate representation on the planning unit, state agencies may
organize and agree upon their representation on the planning unit.
Such technical assistance must only be at the request of and to the
extent desired by the planning unit conducting such planning. The
number of state agency representatives on the planning unit shall be
determined by the initiating governments in consultation with the
governor's office.
(8) As used in this section, "lead agency" means the entity that
coordinates staff support of its own or of other local governments and
receives grants for developing a watershed plan.
(9) A planning unit is dissolved when the department approves a
water management board, as authorized in section 3 of this act, and all
assets, funds, files, planning documents, pending plans and grant
applications, and other current activities of the planning unit are
transferred to the approved water management board. The approved water
management board must assume the duties, responsibilities, and
activities of the planning unit and the initiating governments, as
required in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 90 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act expires June 30, 2019.

--- END ---