BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. (1) The legislature finds that
improving energy efficiency in structures is one of the most cost-effective means to meet energy requirements, and that while there have
been significant efficiency savings achieved in the state over the past
quarter century, there remains enormous potential to achieve even
greater savings. Increased weatherization and more extensive
efficiency improvements in residential, commercial, and public
buildings achieves many benefits, including reducing energy bills,
avoiding the construction of new electricity generating facilities with
associated climate change impacts, and creation of family-wage jobs in
performing energy audits and improvements.
(2) The legislature recognizes that the Washington State University
extension energy program is uniquely qualified to implement programs
consistent with the purposes of this act. Washington State University
has nationally recognized experts in energy efficiency, renewable
energy, energy technology, and program delivery.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that financial and
technical assistance programs be expanded to direct municipal, state,
and federal funds, as well as electric and natural gas utility funding,
toward greater achievement of energy efficiency improvements. To this
end, the legislature establishes a policy goal of assisting in
weatherizing twenty thousand homes and businesses in the state in each
of the next five years. The legislature also intends to attain this
goal in part through supporting programs that rely on community
organizations and that there be maximum family-wage job creation in
fields related to energy efficiency.

PART 1
Energy Efficiency Improvement Program
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Account" means the energy efficiency assistance account
created in section 110 of this act.
(2) "Board" means the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(3) "Credit enhancement" means instruments which enhance the
security for the payment of the lender's obligations and includes, but
is not limited to insurance, letters of credit, lines of credit, or
other similar agreements.
(4) "Customers" means residents, businesses, and building owners.
(5) "Direct outreach" means:
(a) The use of door-to-door contact, community events, and other
methods of direct interaction with customers to inform them of energy
efficiency and weatherization opportunities; and
(b) The performance of energy audits.
(6) "Director" means the director of the energy efficiency
assistance program created in section 102 of this act.
(7) "Energy audit" means an assessment of building energy
efficiency opportunities, from measures that require very little
investment and without any disruption to building operation, normally
involving general building operational measures, to low or relatively
higher cost investment, such as installing timers to turn off
equipment, replacing light bulbs, installing insulation, replacing
equipment and appliances with higher efficiency equipment and
appliances, and similar measures. The term includes an assessment of
alternatives for generation of heat and power from renewable energy
resources, including installation of solar hot water heating and
equipment for photovoltaic electricity generation.
(8) "Energy efficiency and conservation block grant program" means
the federal program created under the energy independence and security
act of 2007 (P.L. 110-140).
(9) "Energy efficiency services" means energy audits,
weatherization, energy efficiency retrofits, energy management systems
as defined in RCW 39.35.030, and other activities to reduce a
customer's energy consumption, and includes assistance with paperwork,
arranging for financing, program design and development, and other
postenergy audit assistance and education to help customers meet their
energy savings goals.
(10) "Middle income" means household incomes that are between
eighty and one hundred twenty percent of the area median income.
(11) "President" means the president of Washington State
University.
(12) "Program" means the energy efficiency assistance program
created in section 102 of this act.
(13) "Sponsor" means any entity or group of entities that submits
a proposal under section 103 of this act, including but not limited to
any nongovernmental nonprofit organization, local community action
agency, community service agency, public service company, county,
municipality, publicly owned electric, or natural gas utility.
(14) "Sponsor match" means the share, if any, of the cost of
efficiency improvements to be paid by the sponsor.
(15) "State energy program" means the federal program created under
the energy policy and conservation act (Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6321).
(16) "University" means Washington State University.
(17) "Weatherization" means making energy and resource conservation
and energy efficiency improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 ENERGY EFFICIENCY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
CREATED. (1) The energy efficiency assistance program is created
within the extension energy program of Washington State University.
The program must be managed by the director, who is appointed by the
president. The director must:
(a) Establish a process to award grants on a competitive basis
using funds from the account;
(i) Grants must be used to:
(A) Conduct direct outreach;
(B) Deliver energy efficiency services; or
(C) Create credit enhancements, such as loan loss reserve funds as
specified in section 107 of this act;
(ii) The allocation of grants funded by state energy program funds
shall be prioritized as follows:
(A) Weatherization of residential structures for middle-income
households, that are not eligible for weatherization assistance under
chapter 70.164 RCW; and
(B) Weatherization of operations of commercial, industrial, and
nonprofit entities that have reported an average of less than one
million dollars of gross revenue annually in the preceding five years;
(iii) Grants must be matched, in amounts determined by the
director, by resources provided by the sponsor;
(iv) If a match is required by the director, preference must be
given to those grant applicants with higher ratios of resources
provided by the sponsor to grant awards;
(b) Provide technical assistance:
(i) To grant recipients conducting direct outreach, delivering
energy efficiency services, or providing financing assistance and
services; and
(ii) For farm energy assessment activities as specified in section
109 of this act;
(c) Cooperate and coordinate with the department of community,
trade, and economic development and those entities providing energy
audit and energy efficiency services and training to maximize the
assistance provided in the program, avoid duplication of existing
programs, and encourage:
(i) The use of service delivery models by grant recipients that
have proven effective in existing programs; and
(ii) The development of geographic information about direct
outreach to be shared between grant recipients and low-income
weatherization providers to minimize duplication in targeting
customers;
(d)(i) Distribute a minimum of sixty percent of program funding as
grants, at least seventy-five percent of which must be prioritized for
programs that provide both direct outreach and delivery of energy
efficiency services;
(ii) Distribute a minimum of twenty percent of program funding for
technical assistance and training resource moneys as specified in
section 401 of this act, up to five hundred thousand dollars per year;
(iii) Distribute a maximum of ten percent of program funding for
credit enhancements, using criteria as developed in subsection (4) of
this section;
(e) Retain a maximum of five percent of program funds for program
administration and the administrative overhead of the university; and
(f) Create an appliance efficiency rebate program with available
funds from the energy efficient appliances rebate program authorized
under the federal energy policy act of 2005 (P.L. 109-58).
(2) The director shall adopt guidelines addressing best practices
for direct outreach and energy efficiency services and avoiding
duplication of such services.
(3) The program must offer assistance to sponsors to develop and
design effective energy efficiency services programs.
(4) The director, in consultation with the department of financial
institutions, shall develop criteria regarding the extent which funds
will be provided for the purposes of credit enhancements under
subsection (1)(d)(iii) of this section and set forth principles for
accountability for financial institutions receiving funding for credit
enhancements.
(5) The director shall require any financial institution or other
entity receiving funding for credit enhancements to:
(a) Provide books, accounts, and other records in such a form and
manner as the director may require;
(b) Identify a loan loss reserve that is sufficient to cover
projected loan losses which are not guaranteed by the United States
government; and
(c) Identify any other credit enhancements.
(6)(a) If a sponsor match is required by the director, a sponsor
may elect to: (i) Pay a sponsor match as a lump sum at the time of
weatherization; or (ii) make yearly payments to the account over a
period not to exceed ten years. If a sponsor elects to make yearly
payments, the value of the payments may not be less than the value of
the lump sum payment that would have been made under (a)(i) of this
subsection.
(b) A sponsor may use its own moneys, including corporate or
ratepayer moneys, or moneys provided by landlords, charitable groups,
government programs, the Bonneville power administration, or other
sources to pay the sponsor match.
(c) The director may permit a sponsor to meet its match requirement
in whole or in part through providing labor, materials, or other in-kind expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 GRANTS AUTHORIZED. (1) The director shall
solicit grant applications from sponsors. The director may provide
grants that fully or partially fund a sponsor's proposal. The director
shall require the following in the grant application:
(a) The amount requested from the account;
(b) The amount of the sponsor match;
(c) The entities participating as sponsors and any entities that
will provide administrative support, direct outreach, energy efficiency
services, or financing assistance and services;
(d) A demonstration of effective fiscal accountability measures;
(e) Performance measures by which to assess the monetary and energy
savings of proposed efficiency projects following project completion;
(f) A work plan detailing the means and methods by which the
sponsor will carry out the required direct outreach or energy
efficiency services;
(g) Convincing evidence that a sponsor providing energy efficiency
services will be capable of helping customers achieve a savings-to-investment ratio of at least one over a payback period of twenty years,
subject to the useful life of the improvements;
(h) Convincing evidence of a sponsor's capacity to create or
maintain living-wage jobs located within the geographic area reached by
the sponsor's proposal;
(i) Convincing evidence that the sponsor will be able to
efficiently and expeditiously provide direct outreach or energy
efficiency services, including details on the sponsor's proposed hiring
practices, means of oversight of employees or contractors, and the use
of quality control measures; and
(j) Any other information required by the director.
(2) The director shall allocate funds appropriated from the account
among proposals accepted or accepted in part so as to achieve the
greatest possible expected monetary and energy savings by energy
consumers and shall, to the extent feasible, ensure a balance of
participation for (a) geographic regions in the state; (b) types of
fuel used for heating; (c) owner-occupied and rental residences; and
(d) single-family and multifamily dwellings. The director may allocate
funds to a nonutility sponsor without requiring a sponsor match if the
director determines that such an allocation is necessary to provide the
greatest benefits to middle-income residents of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 EXPEDITED GRANTS IN 2009. (1) The
legislature finds that conducting energy audits and performing
efficiency improvements in residences and commercial structures creates
family-wage jobs and will stimulate local economies where this work is
conducted. Therefore, the legislature directs that where
appropriations are made to the account specifically for the purpose of
expedited grants, the director shall accord priority to making such
grants over all other duties in the program. The director shall award
grants within the time frame set by the federal government under the
programs providing the funding for these activities. The director
shall develop and utilize expedited grant procedures to ensure both
compliance with federal program requirements and the legislature's goal
of providing prompt stimulation to local economies.
(2) By November 1, 2009, the director shall report to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees in the senate and house of
representatives on the status of grant awards under this section. The
report may be combined with that made by the department of community,
trade, and economic development under section 206 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 PILOT GRANTS FOR COMMUNITY-WIDE URBAN
RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL EFFICIENCY UPGRADES. (1) The legislature
finds that comprehensive energy efficiency retrofits in the residential
and smaller commercial markets are significantly underutilized due in
part to the complex set of decisions that property owners face when
securing an energy audit, arranging for financing, and obtaining a
contractor to perform the retrofit work. While these retrofits have
previously been viewed as primarily benefiting the property owner with
energy cost savings, the additional benefits of the avoided costs of
new energy generation and the environmental and climate benefits of
reduced carbon emissions call for new ways of reaching residential and
business building owners to deliver energy efficiency services.
Therefore, the purpose of this section is to encourage programs that
will combine utility, government, and private investments in
residential and commercial building energy efficiency upgrades, with a
community-based outreach component to overcome the hurdles that
property owners face in considering these upgrades.
(2)(a) The director shall award not less than three grants for
programs that:
(i) Provide assistance for energy audits and energy efficiency
related improvements to structures owned by or used for residential,
commercial, or nonprofit purposes in specified urban neighborhoods
where the objective is to achieve a high rate of participation among
building owners within the pilot area;
(ii) Utilize volunteer support to reach out to potential customers
through the use of community-based institutions;
(iii) Employ qualified energy auditors to perform the energy audits
using recognized retrofit measures that are cost-effective;
(iv) Select and provide oversight of contractors to perform
retrofit work. The contractors must agree to participate in quality
control and efficiency training, pay prevailing wages, meet minimum
apprentice utilization standards, and hire from the community in which
the program is located; and
(v) Work with customers to secure financing for their portion of
the project and apply for and administer utility, public, and
charitable funding provided for energy audits and retrofits.
(b) Priority must be given to grant applicants that can secure a
sponsor match of at least one dollar for each dollar awarded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 PROMOTING THE INVOLVEMENT OF FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS IN FINANCING ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROJECTS--FINDINGS AND
INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that the creation and use of risk
reduction mechanisms will promote greater involvement of local
financial institutions and other financing mechanisms in funding energy
efficiency improvements and will achieve greater leverage of state and
federal dollars. Risk reduction mechanisms will allow financial
institutions to lend to a broader pool of applicants on more attractive
terms, such as potentially lower rates and longer loan terms. Placing
a portion of funds in long-term risk reduction mechanisms will support
a sustained level of energy efficiency investment by financial
institutions while providing funding to projects quickly.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to leverage new federal
funding aimed at promoting energy efficiency projects, improving energy
efficiency, and increasing family wage jobs. To this end, the
legislature intends to invest a portion of all federal funding, subject
to federal requirements, for energy efficiency projects in financial
mechanisms that will provide for maximum leverage of financing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 PROMOTING THE INVOLVEMENT OF FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS IN FINANCING ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROJECTS. (1) Local
municipalities receiving federal stimulus moneys through the federal
energy efficiency and conservation block grant program are authorized
to use those funds, subject to federal requirements, to establish loan
loss reserves or toward risk reduction mechanisms, such as loan loss
reserves, to leverage financing for energy efficiency projects.
(2) Interest rate subsidies, financing transaction cost subsidies,
capital grants to energy users, and other forms of grants and
incentives that support financing energy efficiency projects are
authorized uses of federal energy efficiency funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 PROMOTING THE INVOLVEMENT OF STATE-CHARTERED BOND AUTHORITIES IN FINANCING ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROJECTS.
(1) The legislature finds that the state bond authorities have
capacities that can be applied to financing energy efficiency projects
for their respective eligible borrowers: Washington economic
development finance authority for industry; Washington state housing
finance commission for single-family and multifamily housing, and
nonprofit facilities; Washington higher education facilities authority
for private, nonprofit higher education; and Washington health care
facilities authority for hospitals and all types of health clinics.
(2)(a) Subject to federal requirements, the state bond authorities
may accept and administer an allocation of the state's share of the
federal energy efficiency funding for designing energy efficiency
finance loan products and for developing and operating energy
efficiency finance programs. The state bond authorities shall
coordinate with the program on the design of the bond authorities'
program.
(b) The director of the program may make allocations of the federal
funding to the state bond authorities and may direct and administer
funding for outreach, marketing, and delivery of energy services to
support the programs by the state bond authorities.
(c) The legislature authorizes a portion of the federal energy
efficiency funds to be used by the state bond authorities for credit
enhancements and reserves for such programs.
(3) The Washington state housing finance commission may:
(a) Issue revenue bonds as the term "bond" is defined in RCW
43.180.020 for the purpose of financing loans for energy efficiency and
renewable energy improvement projects in accordance with RCW
43.180.150;
(b) Establish eligibility criteria for financing that will enable
it to choose applicants who are likely to repay loans made or acquired
by the commission and funded from the proceeds of federal funds or
commission bonds; and
(c) Participate fully in federal and other governmental programs
and take such actions as are necessary and consistent with chapter
43.180 RCW to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits
of programs to promote energy efficiency and renewable energy
technologies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 FARM ENERGY ASSESSMENTS. (1) The
legislature finds that increasing energy costs put farm viability and
competitiveness at risk and that energy efficiency improvements on the
farm are the most cost-effective way to manage these costs. The
legislature further finds that current on-farm energy efficiency
programs often miss opportunities to evaluate and conserve all types of
energy, including fuels and fertilizers.
(2) The director, in consultation with the department of
agriculture, shall form an interdisciplinary team of agricultural and
energy extension agencies to develop and offer new methods to help
agricultural producers assess their opportunities to increase energy
efficiency in all aspects of their operations. The interdisciplinary
team must develop and deploy:
(a) Online energy self-assessment software tools to allow
agricultural producers to assess whole-farm energy use and to identify
the most cost-effective efficiency opportunities;
(b) Energy auditor training curricula specific to the agricultural
sector and designed for use by agricultural producers, conservation
districts, agricultural extensions, and commodity groups;
(c) An effective infrastructure of trained energy auditors
available to assist agricultural producers with on-farm energy audits
and identify cost-share assistance for efficiency improvements; and
(d) Measurement systems for cost savings, energy savings, and
carbon emission reduction benefits resulting from efficiency
improvements identified by the interdisciplinary team.
(3) The director shall seek to obtain additional resources for this
section from federal and state agricultural assistance programs and
from other sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 ACCOUNT CREATED. The energy efficiency
assistance account is created in the state treasury. Except for
appropriations and federal funds that must be used for low-income
weatherization assistance pursuant to chapter 70.164 RCW, a minimum of
thirty million dollars of all federal funds received pursuant to the
federal American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 (P.L. 111-5),
the federal energy independence and security act of 2007 (P.L. 110-140), the federal energy policy and conservation act (Title 42 U.S.C.
Sec. 6321), and the energy efficient appliance rebate program
authorized by the federal energy policy act of 2005 (P.L. 109-58), and
any other future appropriations in excess of levels of federal fiscal
year 2008 for these programs, for the purpose of assisting with energy
efficiency assessments, audits, or improvements must be deposited in
the account. Other funds, gifts, grants, and endowments from public or
private sources, in trust or otherwise, may be directed into the
account. Any moneys received from sponsor match payments must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of this chapter.

PART 2
Low-Income Weatherization Programs
Sec. 201 RCW 70.164.020 and 1995 c 399 s 199 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.
(2) "Energy ((assessment)) audit" means an analysis of a dwelling
unit to determine the need for cost-effective energy conservation
measures as determined by the department.
(3) "Household" means an individual or group of individuals living
in a dwelling unit as defined by the department.
(4) "Low income" means household income ((that is at or below one
hundred twenty-five percent of the federally established poverty
level)) as defined by the department, provided that the definition does
not exceed eighty percent of median household income, adjusted for
household size for the county where the dwelling unit to be weatherized
is located.
(5) "Nonutility sponsor" means any sponsor other than a public
service company, municipality, public utility district, mutual or
cooperative, furnishing gas or electricity used to heat low-income
residences.
(6) "Residence" means a dwelling unit as defined by the department.
(7) "Sponsor" means any entity that submits a proposal under RCW
70.164.040, including but not limited to any local community action
agency, tribal nation, community service agency, or any other
participating agency or any public service company, municipality,
public utility district, mutual or cooperative, or any combination of
such entities that jointly submits a proposal.
(8) "Sponsor match" means the share((, if any,)) of the cost of
weatherization to be paid by the sponsor.
(9) "Sustainable residential weatherization" or "weatherization"
means ((materials or measures, and their installation, that are used to
improve the thermal efficiency of a residence)) using moneys
administered by the department to preserve a dwelling unit occupied by
a low-income household for activities and materials that result in
energy and resource conservation and energy efficiency improvements;
repair, indoor air quality, and health and safety investments; and
client education. To the extent feasible, moneys must be used to
support and advance sustainable technologies.
(10) "Weatherizing agency" means any approved department grantee,
tribal nation, or any public service company, municipality, public
utility district, mutual or cooperative, or other entity that bears the
responsibility for ensuring the performance of weatherization of
residences under this chapter and has been approved by the department.

Sec. 202 RCW 70.164.040 and 1987 c 36 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall solicit proposals for low-income
weatherization programs from potential sponsors. A proposal shall
state the amount of the sponsor match, the amount requested ((from the
low-income weatherization assistance account)), the name of the
weatherizing agency, and any other information required by the
department.
(2)(a) A sponsor may use its own moneys, including corporate or
ratepayer moneys, or moneys provided by landlords, charitable groups,
government programs, the Bonneville power administration, or other
sources to pay the sponsor match.
(b) Moneys provided by a sponsor pursuant to requirements in this
section shall be in addition to and shall not supplant any funding for
low-income weatherization that would otherwise have been provided by
the sponsor or any other entity enumerated in (a) of this subsection.
(c) No proposal may require any contribution as a condition of
weatherization from any household whose residence is weatherized under
the proposal.
(d) Proposals shall provide that full levels of all cost-effective,
structurally feasible, sustainable residential weatherization
materials, measures, and practices, as determined by the department,
shall be installed when a low-income residence is weatherized.
(3)(a) The department may in its discretion accept, accept in part,
or reject proposals submitted. The department shall allocate funds
appropriated from the low-income weatherization assistance account
among proposals accepted or accepted in part so as to:
(i) Achieve the greatest possible expected monetary and energy
savings by low-income households and other energy consumers ((and))
over the longest period of time;
(ii) Identify and correct, to the extent practical, health and
safety problems for residents of low-income households; and
(iii) Leverage, to the extent feasible, environmentally friendly
sustainable technologies, practices, and designs.
(b) The department shall, to the extent feasible, ensure a balance
of participation in proportion to population among low-income
households for: (((a))) (i) Geographic regions in the state; (((b)))
(ii) types of fuel used for heating, except that the department shall
encourage the use of energy efficient sustainable technologies; (((c)))
(iii) owner-occupied and rental residences; and (((d))) (iv) single-family and multifamily dwellings.
(c) The department shall give priority to weatherize dwelling units
occupied by low-income households with incomes at or below one hundred
twenty-five percent of the federally established poverty level.
(d) The department may allocate funds to a nonutility sponsor
without requiring a sponsor match if the department determines that
such an allocation is necessary to provide the greatest benefits to
low-income residents of the state.
(4)(a) A sponsor may elect to: (i) Pay a sponsor match as a lump
sum at the time of weatherization, or (ii) make yearly payments to the
low-income weatherization assistance account over a period not to
exceed ten years. If a sponsor elects to make yearly payments, the
value of the payments shall not be less than the value of the lump sum
payment that would have been made under (a)(i) of this subsection.
(b) The department may permit a sponsor to meet its match
requirement in whole or in part through providing labor, materials, or
other in-kind expenditures.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out this section.

Sec. 203 RCW 70.164.050 and 1987 c 36 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department is responsible for ensuring that sponsors and
weatherizing agencies comply with the state laws, the department's
rules, and the sponsor's proposal in carrying out proposals.
(2) Before a residence is weatherized, the department shall require
that an energy ((assessment)) audit be conducted.
(3) To the extent possible, the department shall maximize available
federal funding for weatherization projects.

Sec. 204 RCW 70.164.060 and 1987 c 36 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before a leased or rented residence is weatherized, written
permission shall be obtained from the owner of the residence for the
weatherization. The department shall adopt rules to ensure that: (1)
The benefits of weatherization assistance ((in connection with a leased
or rented residence)), including utility bill reduction and
preservation of affordable housing stock, accrue primarily to low-income tenants occupying a leased or rented residence; (2) as a result
of weatherization provided under this chapter, the rent on the
residence is not increased and the tenant is not evicted; and (3) as a
result of weatherization provided under this chapter, no undue or
excessive enhancement occurs in the value of the residence. This
section is in the public interest and any violation by a landlord of
the rules adopted under this section shall be an act in trade or
commerce violating chapter 19.86 RCW, the consumer protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 70.164
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall coordinate with the Washington State
University energy efficiency assistance program created in section 102
of this act in order to maximize the extension of weatherization
assistance across low-income and middle-income households. To the
extent allowable under federal requirements, the department shall
maximize the amount of funding directed to weatherization services of
low-income housing. The department may solicit proposals for low and
middle-income weatherization projects, if providing funding
specifically for additional projects. The department shall determine
a priority ranking system for determining the order of preference for
projects for low and middle-income households. In determining the
ranking, the department must give first priority to low-income
households that are at or below eighty percent of the state area median
income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 EXPEDITED LOW-INCOME HOUSEHOLD ENERGY
AUDIT PROGRAM GRANTS IN 2009. (1) The legislature finds that
conducting energy audits and performing efficiency improvements in low-income households creates family-wage jobs and will stimulate local
economies where this work is conducted. Therefore, the legislature
directs that where appropriations are made to the low-income
weatherization assistance program as part of a federal economic
stimulus, the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall award grants as quickly as practical for maximum community
economic benefit within the parameters stipulated with the funding.
(2) By November 1, 2009, the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees in the senate and house of representatives on the status of
grant awards under this section. The report may be combined with that
made by the director of the energy efficiency assistance program under
section 104 of this act.

PART 3
Consolidation of Weatherization Programs
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 It is the intent of the legislature that
all state administered building weatherization programs are conducted
to provide the greatest efficiency in terms of administrative
processes, economies of scale, institutional memory, and institutional
competence. The legislature also intends by this act to expand state
administered building weatherization programs to provide services not
only to low-income residents in the state, but also to middle-income
residences, farms, commercial buildings, public buildings, public
agencies, and other institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 (1) The department of community, trade,
and economic development and the Washington State University energy
extension program shall review:
(a) Low-income weatherization programs, as authorized under chapter
70.164 RCW, weatherization, weatherization services, and energy
efficiency programs administered by the state;
(b) The low-income energy assistance program funded by the federal
government pursuant to the federal low-income energy assistance act
(Title 42 U.S.C. 8623 et seq.);
(c) Weatherization and energy efficiency programs funded by private
entities, utilities, the federal government, and other entities; and
(d) Administrative and overhead costs incurred by weatherization
and energy efficiency programs.
(2) By July 1, 2010, the department of community, trade, and
economic development and the Washington State University energy
extension program shall provide to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature a report with findings from the review
required in subsection (1) of this section and recommendations for the
coordination of the state's energy efficiency and weatherization
programs, including the low-income energy assistance and low-income
weatherization programs under chapter 70.164 RCW and the weatherization
program created in section 102 of this act.
(a) The recommendations must include:
(i) Identification of best practices and opportunities to
consolidate and create efficiencies and economies of scale;
(ii) Identification of legislative action necessary to maximize the
state's receipt of funding for weatherization and energy efficiency
purposes; and
(iii) Identification of methods to minimize costs through
coordination and potential consolidation of programs.
(b) If the report finds that administrative efficiencies may best
be achieved by the transition of functions from one state agency or
entity to another, then the recommendations must also include:
(i) Identification of statutory changes necessary to ensure an
expeditious and efficient transition with the least programmatic
disruption; and
(ii) A timeline for the process that includes methods to phase and
synchronize the transition of administrative procedures, records,
files, and staff in accordance with the goals and intent of this
chapter.

PART 4
Training Programs for Energy Efficiency Jobs
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 WORKFORCE TRAINING FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF
ENERGY AUDITS AND RETROFITS. (1) The legislature finds that it is in
the interest of building owners, building residents, and the state that
energy audits and energy efficiency services be performed in a manner
that is both consistent with current best practices and that provides
increased occupational skills, education, and training to workers in
the state. The director, in collaboration with the board, the
workforce training and education coordinating board, the employment
security department, the Washington state building and construction
trades council, the Washington state apprenticeship and training
council, and the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall identify the necessary skills and qualifications required to
perform the energy audits and energy efficiency services authorized
under this act.
(2) The board shall work with the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, to jointly develop, by June 30, 2010, curricula and
training programs, to include on-the-job training, classroom training,
and safety and health training, for the development of the skills and
qualifications identified by the director under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Training resource moneys may be provided from the account for
the following purposes:
(a) To develop and deploy curricula and training programs in
accordance with subsection (2) of this section;
(b) For the expansion of existing high school, community and
technical college, journey level skills improvement and apprenticeship
training programs, and community-based training programs providing
energy audit and energy efficiency services training;
(c) For the implementation of new training programs developed under
the terms of this chapter;
(d) To supplement internship and apprenticeship programs using
curricula developed under subsection (2) of this section; and
(e) For other training activities identified by the director to
supplement and expand the skills of the existing workforce.
(4) The director shall direct the delivery of education and
training resource moneys as necessary to meet demands for jobs, giving
priority in distribution of training resource moneys to those
educational programs that can provide convincing evidence that they are
able to provide the requisite skills education and training
expeditiously.
(5) The board shall target a portion of any federal stimulus
funding received to ensure commensurate capacity for high employer
demand programs of study developed under this section. To that end,
the director must coordinate with the workforce training and education
coordinating board, the state board for community and technical
colleges, or other appropriate state agency in the application for and
receipt of such funding that may be made available through the federal
youthbuild program, workforce investment act, job corps, or other
relevant federal programs.
(6) The Washington apprenticeship and training council shall
evaluate the potential of existing apprenticeship and training programs
that would produce workers with the skills needed to conduct energy
audits and provide energy efficiency services and deliver their
findings to the director and the appropriate committees of the
legislature as soon as possible, but no later than January 18, 2010.
(7) The director shall direct funding to programs that provide
skills education and training services to underserved and disadvantaged
communities in the state, in accordance with RCW 43.330.310. This may
include, but is not limited to, at-risk youth seeking employment
pathways out of poverty and into economic self-sufficiency. The
director shall consult with the employment security department to
create a strategy to ensure that the workers who receive training under
these programs are provided with the type of employment opportunities
contemplated by this chapter.
(8) The board shall provide an interim report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011, and a final report
by December 1, 2013, detailing the effectiveness of, and any
recommendations for improving, the worker training curricula and
programs established in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 UNEMPLOYED WORKERS. Community and
technical colleges that enroll unemployed workers into the relevant
curricula and training programs indicated in this act shall receive
funding as indicated in section 4, chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (section
4 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5809).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 DESIGNATION OF WORKFORCE TRAINING PROGRAMS
FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF ENERGY AUDITS AND RETROFITS. (1) Existing
curricula and training programs or programs provided by community and
technical colleges in the state developed under section 401 of this act
must be recognized as programs of study under RCW 28B.50.273.
(2) Subject to available funding, the board may grant enrollment
priority to persons who qualify for waiver under RCW 28B.15.522 and who
enroll in curricula and training programs provided by community or
technical colleges in the state that have been developed in accordance
with section 401 of this act.

PART 5
Energy Efficiency in Publicly Funded Housing
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 43.185
RCW to read as follows:
ENERGY AUDITS AND RETROFITS IN PUBLICLY FUNDED HOUSING. (1) The
legislature finds that growing preservation and rehabilitation needs in
the housing trust fund property portfolio provide opportunities to
advance energy efficiency and weatherization efforts for low-income
individuals in Washington state while protecting the state's six
hundred million dollars in affordable housing investments.
Preservation of existing affordable housing, when done in conjunction
with weatherization activities, is a cost-effective, prudent, and
environmentally friendly strategy to ensure that low-income housing
remains durable, safe, and affordable. Therefore, the legislature
intends that where federal funds are available for increasing and
improving energy efficiency of low-income housing that these funds
shall be utilized, subject to federal requirements, for energy audits
and implementing energy efficiency measures in the state housing trust
fund real estate portfolio.
(2) The department shall review all housing properties in the
housing trust fund real estate portfolio and identify those in need of
major renovation or rehabilitation. In its review, the department
shall survey property owners for information including, but not limited
to, the age of the building and the type of heating, cooling, plumbing,
and electrical systems contained in the property. The department shall
prioritize all renovation or rehabilitation projects identified in the
review by the department's ability to:
(a) Achieve the greatest possible expected monetary and energy
savings by low-income households and other energy consumers over the
greatest period of time;
(b) Promote the greatest possible health and safety improvements
for residents of low-income households; and
(c) Leverage, to the extent feasible, technologically advanced and
environmentally friendly sustainable technologies, practices, and
designs.
(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, the department shall use the prioritization of
potential energy efficiency needs and opportunities in subsection (2)
of this section to make offers of energy audit services to project
owners and operators. The department shall use all practicable means
to achieve the completion of energy audits in at least twenty-five
percent of the properties in its portfolio that exceed twenty-five
years in age, by June 30, 2011. Where the energy audits identify cost-effective weatherization and other energy efficiency measures, the
department shall accord a priority within appropriated funding levels
to include funding for energy efficiency improvements when the
department allocates funding for renovation or rehabilitation of the
property.

PART 6
Miscellaneous
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Sections 101 through 110 and 401 through
403 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Captions and part headings used in this
act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---