BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.310.240 and 2008 c 174 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every educational service district board shall adopt written
policies granting leaves to persons under contracts of employment with
the district in positions requiring either certification or classified
qualifications, including but not limited to leaves for attendance at
official or private institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves
for employees in positions requiring certification qualification, and
leaves for illness, injury, bereavement, and emergencies for both
certificated and classified employees, with such compensation as the
board prescribes. The board shall adopt written policies granting
annual leave with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies as
follows:
(a) For persons under contract with the district for a full fiscal
year, at least ten days;
(b) For persons under contract with the district as part-time
employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total number of
days contracted for bears to one hundred eighty days;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per fiscal year. Provisions
of any contract in force on July 23, 1989, which conflict with
requirements of this subsection shall continue in effect until contract
expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed between the
parties shall be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation the person would have received
had the person not taken the leave provided in this section;
(e) Leave provided in this section not taken shall accumulate from
fiscal year to fiscal year up to a maximum of one hundred eighty days
for the purposes of RCW 28A.310.490, and for leave purposes up to a
maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given contract,
but not greater than one fiscal year. Such accumulated time may be
taken at any time during the fiscal year, or up to twelve days per year
may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick leave; and
(f) Accumulated leave under this section shall be transferred to
educational service districts, school districts, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state school for the blind,
the school for the deaf, institutions of higher education, and
community and technical colleges, and from any such district, school,
or office to another such district, school, office, institution of
higher education, or community or technical college. An intervening
customary summer break in employment or the performance of employment
duties shall not preclude such a transfer.
(2) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
the district may, under rules of the board, be granted to the person
when the person returns to the employment of the district.
(3) Leave for illness or injury accumulated before July 23, 1989,
under the administrative practices of an educational service district,
and such leave transferred before July 23, 1989, to or from an
educational service district, school district, or the office of the
superintendent of public instruction under the administrative practices
of the district or office, is declared valid and shall be added to such
leave for illness or injury accumulated after July 23, 1989.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.300 and 2008 c 174 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by
law, shall:
(1) Employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause
discharge all certificated and classified employees;
(2) Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under
contracts of employment with the school district(s) in positions
requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including
but not limited to leaves for attendance at official or private
institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in
positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of
directors prescribe: PROVIDED, That the board of directors shall adopt
written policies granting to such persons annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury and emergencies as follows:
(a) For such persons under contract with the school district for a
full year, at least ten days;
(b) For such persons under contract with the school district as
part time employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total
number of days contracted for bears to one hundred eighty days;
(c) For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with
compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and
accrue at a rate not to exceed twelve days per year; provisions of any
contract in force on June 12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of
this subsection shall continue in effect until contract expiration;
after expiration, any new contract executed between the parties shall
be consistent with this subsection;
(d) Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken
shall be the same as the compensation such person would have received
had such person not taken the leave provided in this proviso;
(e) Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from
year to year up to a maximum of one hundred eighty days for the
purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.400.220, and for leave purposes up
to a maximum of the number of contract days agreed to in a given
contract, but not greater than one year. Such accumulated time may be
taken at any time during the school year or up to twelve days per year
may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick leave;
(f) Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195,
Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under
administrative practice of school districts prior to the effective date
of section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is
hereby declared valid, and shall be added to leave for illness or
injury accumulated under this proviso;
(g) Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of
forty-five days shall be creditable as service rendered for the purpose
of determining the time at which an employee is eligible to retire, if
such leave is taken it may not be compensated under the provisions of
RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;
(h) Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to
and from one district to another, the office of superintendent of
public instruction, offices of educational service district
superintendents and boards, the state school for the blind, the school
for the deaf, institutions of higher education, and community and
technical colleges, to and from such districts, schools, offices,
institutions of higher education, and community and technical colleges;
(i) Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving
said district may, under rules ((and regulations)) of the board, be
granted to such person when the person returns to the employment of the
district.
When any certificated or classified employee leaves one school
district within the state and commences employment with another school
district within the state, the employee shall retain the same
seniority, leave benefits and other benefits that the employee had in
his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That classified employees who
transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall not retain any
seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school district
and beginning employment with another. If the school district to which
the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority,
leave benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted
the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in
that district who has similar occupational status and total years of
service.

--- END ---