BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Dogs are neither a commercial crop nor commodity and should not
be indiscriminately or irresponsibly mass produced;
(2) Large-scale dog breeding increases the likelihood that the dogs
will be denied their most basic needs including but not limited to:
Sanitary living conditions, proper and timely medical care, the ability
to move freely at least once per day, and adequate shelter from the
elements;
(3) Without proper oversight, large-scale breeding facilities can
easily fall below even the most basic standards of humane housing and
husbandry;
(4) Current Washington state laws are inadequate regarding the care
and husbandry of dogs in large-scale breeding facilities;
(5) No Washington state agency currently regulates large-scale
breeding facilities;
(6) The United States department of agriculture does not regulate
large-scale breeding facilities that sell dogs directly to the public
and thus, such direct-sales breeders are currently exempt from even the
minimum care and housing standards outlined in the federal animal
welfare act;
(7) Documented conditions at large-scale breeding facilities
include unsanitary conditions, potential for soil and groundwater
contamination, the spread of zoonotic parasites and infectious
diseases, and the sale of sick and dying animals to the public; and
(8) An unfair fiscal burden is placed on city, county, and state
taxpayers as well as government agencies and nongovernmental
organizations, who are required to care for discarded or abused and
neglected dogs from large-scale breeding facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not own, possess, control, or otherwise have
charge or custody of more than fifty dogs with intact sexual organs
over the age of six months at any time.
(2) Any person who owns, possesses, controls, or otherwise has
charge or custody of more than ten dogs with intact sexual organs over
the age of six months and keeps the dogs in an enclosure for the
majority of the day must at a minimum:
(a) Provide space to allow each dog to turn about freely, to stand,
sit, and lie down. The dog must be able to lie down while fully
extended without the dog's head, tail, legs, face, or feet touching any
side of an enclosure and without touching any other dog in the
enclosure when all dogs are lying down simultaneously. The interior
height of the enclosure must be at least six inches higher than the
head of the tallest dog in the enclosure when it is in a normal
standing position. Each enclosure must be at least three times the
length and width of the longest dog in the enclosure, from tip of nose
to base of tail and shoulder blade to shoulder blade.
(b) Provide each dog that is over the age of four months with a
minimum of one exercise period during each day for a total of not less
than one hour of exercise during such day. Such exercise must include
removing the dog from the dog's primary enclosure and either leash
walking or giving the dog access to an enclosure at least four times
the size of the primary enclosure allowing the dog free mobility for
the entire exercise period, but may not include use of a treadmill, cat
mill, jenny mill, slat mill, or similar device, unless prescribed by a
doctor of veterinary medicine. The exercise requirements in this
subsection do not apply to a dog certified by a doctor of veterinary
medicine as being medically precluded from exercise.
(c) Maintain adequate housing facilities and primary enclosures
that meet the following requirements at a minimum:
(i) Housing facilities and primary enclosures must be kept in a
sanitary condition. Housing facilities where dogs are kept must be
sufficiently ventilated at all times to minimize odors, drafts, ammonia
levels, and to prevent moisture condensation. Housing facilities must
be equipped with a working smoke alarm and have a means of fire
suppression, such as functioning fire extinguishers or a functioning
sprinkler system on the premises and must have sufficient lighting to
allow for observation of the dogs at any time of day or night;
(ii) Housing facilities must enable all dogs to remain dry and
clean;
(iii) Housing facilities must provide shelter and protection from
extreme temperatures and weather conditions that may be uncomfortable
or hazardous to the dogs. Ambient temperature must not fall below
fifty degrees Fahrenheit or rise above eighty-five degrees Fahrenheit;
(iv) Housing facilities must provide sufficient shade to shelter
all the dogs housed in the primary enclosure at one time;
(v) A primary enclosure must have floors that are constructed in a
manner that protects the dogs' feet and legs from injury. Raised
kennels must be slatted with a solid resting surface. The following
must be met for floors constructed with slats: (A) Slats must be flat;
must have spaces in between that are no more than 0.5 inches in width;
(B) slats must have spaces between them that run the length of the
floor; (C) slats must be no less than one inch in width; (D) slats must
be level with the slat next to it within a single enclosure; (E) slats
must be strong enough so that the slats do not sag or bend between
structural supports; and (F) slats must be constructed of a material
impervious to moisture and able to be cleaned and sanitized;
(vi) Primary enclosures must be placed no higher than forty-two
inches above the floor and may not be placed over or stacked on top of
another cage or primary enclosure;
(vii) Feces, hair, dirt, debris, and food waste must be removed
from primary enclosures at least daily or more often if necessary to
prevent accumulation and to reduce disease hazards, insects, pests, and
odors; and
(viii) All dogs housed in the same enclosure must be compatible, as
determined by observation. Animals with a vicious or aggressive
disposition must be housed individually. Breeding females in heat may
not be housed in the same enclosure with sexually mature males, except
for breeding. Breeding females with litters may not be housed in the
same enclosure with other adult dogs. Puppies under twelve weeks may
not be housed in the same enclosure with other adult dogs, other than
the dam or foster dam unless under immediate supervision.
(d) Provide dogs with easy and convenient access to adequate
amounts of clean food and water. Food and water receptacles must be
readily cleaned and sanitized. Enclosures must contain potable water
that is not frozen, is free from debris, and is readily accessible to
all dogs at all times.
(e) Provide veterinary care without delay when necessary. A male
unaltered dog must be examined by a veterinarian at least once a year.
A female unaltered dog must be examined by a veterinarian at least once
a year or prior to each attempt at breeding, whichever occurs more
frequently. A dog may not be bred if a veterinarian determines that
the animal is unfit for breeding purposes. Only dogs between the ages
of twelve months and eight years of age may be used for breeding.
Animals requiring euthanasia must be euthanized only by a licensed
veterinarian.
(3) Any animal control officer or other authorized public health or
safety official may, upon receiving a complaint or upon the officer's
own motion, investigate any violation of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section.
(4) A person who violates this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.
(5) This section does not apply to the following:
(a) A publicly operated animal control facility or animal shelter;
(b) A private, charitable not-for-profit humane society or animal
adoption organization;
(c) A veterinary facility;
(d) A retail pet store;
(e) A research institution;
(f) A boarding facility;
(g) A grooming facility; or
(h)(i) A commercial dog breeder licensed, before the effective date
of this act, by the United States department of agriculture pursuant to
the federal animal welfare act (Title 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2131 et seq.); or
(ii) A commercial dog breeder licensed, on or after the effective
date of this act, by the United States department of agriculture
pursuant to the federal animal welfare act (Title 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2131 et
seq.), except as provided otherwise in this subsection. Subsection (1)
of this section applies to a commercial dog breeder under this
subsection (5)(h)(ii).
(6) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Dog" means any member of Canis lupus familiaris;
(b) "Large-scale breeding facility" means a breeding facility that
has fifty or more dogs with intact sexual organs; and
(c) "Retail pet store" means a commercial establishment that
engages in a for-profit business of selling at retail cats, dogs, or
other animals to be kept as household pets. This term does not
include: (i) Any person or establishment that breeds or raises animals
to sell, exchange, broker, or otherwise transfer the animals to the
public as household pets; and (ii) publicly operated animal control
facilities or animal shelters, private, charitable not-for-profit
humane societies, or animal adoption organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---