BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department must maintain for public review upon request the
following information regarding licensed foster parents and foster
parents who wish to adopt:
(a) General residence area listed by region and local jurisdiction;
(b) Any record of misdemeanor or felony convictions;
(c) Current employment and employment history with salary range;
(d) Educational attainment;
(e) Marital or domestic partnership history to include number of
unions and current status;
(f) Number of adults living in the foster home and relationship to
the foster parent;
(g) Number and ages of children living in the home at the time of
placement, to be updated every six months;
(h) The race or cultural background of the foster child or children
as compared with the foster parents or foster parents who wish to adopt
and any other person or persons residing in the home.
(2) The information must be displayed individually based upon case
number.
(3) The department shall also include the amount of federal and
state money spent on each child, including medical care costs, during
the child's out-of-home placement.
(4) The information must not include the names of the foster child
or of the foster parents or foster parents who wish to adopt.
(5) The department must update this information on a semiannual
basis.

--- END ---