BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature is increasingly concerned
about the handling of child welfare cases by the children's
administration in the department of social and health services. It has
been difficult for either the legislature or the public to fully
understand the workings of the child welfare system because so much
information is kept from public view. The legislature finds that the
creation of a transparency committee to review and investigate certain
child welfare cases may assist in shedding light on how the children's
administration is performing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) A child welfare transparency
committee is created within each of the six regions of the department
of social and health services to review and investigate child welfare
cases as provided in this chapter.
(b) The members of the committee must be appointed as follows:
(i) The governor shall appoint one member for each committee
established in each of the department's six regions;
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate for each committee
established in each of the department's six regions; and
(iii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives for each committee established in each of the
department's six regions.
(c) No member can be a current employee of the department, have
been employed by the department within the past five years, or have
immediate relatives, by blood or marriage, who are currently employed
by the department.
(d) The names of the members of the committees must be made public.
(e) Each committee shall select a chair from among its membership.
(f) The members shall serve three-year terms and must be staggered,
beginning August 1, 2009.
(2)(a) The purpose of the child welfare transparency committee is
to review and investigate child welfare cases in which the department
of social and health services is currently or has, within the last
twelve months, been involved.
(b) The committee has the discretion to determine which cases
brought to its attention merit review or investigation.
(c) To assist the committee in its work, the children's
administration shall provide, upon the committee's request, any
documents it has regarding the cases being reviewed or investigated by
the committee. These documents must be provided within fourteen days
of being requested. The children's administration shall also make
personnel involved in the case being reviewed or investigated available
to the committee if needed.
(3) All meetings of the committee must be open to the public,
unless the committee is discussing information that is otherwise
confidential under state or federal law.
(4) The committee may consider input from interested parties.
(5) The children's administration shall provide staff support to
the committee.
(6) Legislative members of the committee must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7)(a) The chair shall convene an initial meeting of the committee
no later than September 1, 2009.
(b) The committee must meet at least once a quarter and may hold
additional meetings at the call of the chair or by a majority vote of
the members of the committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 through 2 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

--- END ---