BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.315 and 1994 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
No city or town shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation
that fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" issued by the federal
communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a
city or town with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to
the limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that
involve placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health,
safety, or aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably
accommodate amateur communications, and to represent the minimal
practicable regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate
purpose. However, no city or town shall restrict amateur radio
antennas or antenna support structures to heights of less than seventy
feet unless the restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined
health, safety, or aesthetic consideration. Reasonable and customary
engineering practices must be followed in the erection of the antenna.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.21.260 and 1994 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No code city shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that
fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" issued by the federal
communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a
code city with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to the
limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that involve
placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or
aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate
amateur communications, and to represent the minimal practicable
regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose.
However, no code city shall restrict amateur radio antennas or antenna
support structures to heights of less than seventy feet unless the
restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined health, safety,
or aesthetic consideration. Reasonable and customary engineering
practices must be followed in the erection of the antenna.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.32.600 and 1994 c 50 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
No county shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that
fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled "Amateur Radio
Preemption, 101 FCC 2nd 952 (1985)" issued by the federal
communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a
county with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to the
limited federal preemption, that states local regulations that involve
placement, screening, or height of antennas based on health, safety, or
aesthetic considerations must be crafted to reasonably accommodate
amateur communications, and to represent the minimal practicable
regulation to accomplish the local authority's legitimate purpose.
However, no county shall restrict amateur radio antennas or antenna
support structures to heights of less than seventy feet unless the
restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined health, safety,
or aesthetic consideration. Reasonable and customary engineering
practices must be followed in the erection of the antenna.

--- END ---