BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the needs of
Washingtonians for social services, public assistance, juvenile
rehabilitation, and specialized rehabilitative and medical services are
not being effectively served by the department of social and health
services. The department has grown too large, and become too unwieldy
and unfocused to cope adequately with caseload demands and social and
demographic change. Despite the efforts of many employees of the
department, egregious incidents have occurred in the lives of the
clients the department is supposed to protect and help.
The legislature finds that, in the interest of efficient and humane
assistance to the state's citizens who are in need, the creation of
new, smaller, and more focused agencies will give the provision of
welfare, juvenile, and medical and social rehabilitative services an
improved focus and accountability.
It is the intent of the legislature that the combined biennial
budgets of the three new agencies created in this act not exceed ninety
percent of the department of social and health services' 2007-09
budget, and that future budgets of the new departments be tied to
inflation rates.

PART I
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 It is the purpose of this chapter to
administer and enforce programs relating to juvenile rehabilitation and
children, youth, and family services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of children and family
services.
(2) "Director" means the director of children and family services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 The department of children and family
services is created as an executive branch agency. The department is
vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter
and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.
(2) The director may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 (1) It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under
the control of the director in order that the director may institute
the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as may be necessary
for the general administration of the department. This employment
shall be in accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06
RCW, except as otherwise provided.
(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the
director may:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this
chapter; and
(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to
implement this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making
authority of the director beyond that necessary to implement and
administer programs and services existing July 1, 2010, as transferred
to the department of children and family services under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 Except as otherwise specified or as
federal requirements may differently require, the department may be
subdivided into divisions established and organized in accordance with
plans prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In
preparing such plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient
public management, to improve programs, and to take full advantage of
the economies, both fiscal and administrative, to be gained from the
consolidation of functions and agencies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 The director shall appoint a deputy
director, a department personnel director, and such assistant directors
as may be needed to administer the department. The deputy director
shall have charge and general supervision of the department in the
absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an
acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the department's
responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as
required by federal law or as the director may determine.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 The department shall endeavor to collocate
facilities with the departments of public welfare and medical and
rehabilitative services, and shall establish procedures for referring
clients to those departments if circumstances warrant referral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of children and
family services to the director, the director's personal secretary, the
deputy director, all division directors and assistant directors, and
one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of social and health services currently performed by the
juvenile rehabilitation administration, and the children's
administration are transferred to the department of children and family
services. All references to the secretary or the department of social
and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the director or the department of children and family
services when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department
of children and family services. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
department of social and health services in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department of children and family services. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the department of children and family
services.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of children and family services.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of children and
family services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the department of children and
family services to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department
of children and family services. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of children and family services.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired.

PART II
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WELFARE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 It is the purpose of this chapter to
administer and enforce programs relating to cash assistance, including
temporary assistance for needy families, basic food, WorkFirst, child
care assistance, child support, and refugee and immigrant assistance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of public welfare.
(2) "Director" means the director of public welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The department of public welfare is
created as an executive branch agency. The department is vested with
all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.
(2) The director may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 (1) It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under
the control of the director in order that the director may institute
the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as may be necessary
for the general administration of the department. This employment
shall be in accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06
RCW, except as otherwise provided.
(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the
director may:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this
chapter; and
(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to
implement this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making
authority of the director beyond that necessary to implement and
administer programs and services existing July 1, 2010, as transferred
to the department of public welfare under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 Except as otherwise specified or as
federal requirements may differently require, the department may be
subdivided into divisions established and organized in accordance with
plans prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In
preparing such plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient
public management, to improve programs, and to take full advantage of
the economies, both fiscal and administrative, to be gained from the
consolidation of functions and agencies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 The director shall appoint a deputy
director, a department personnel director, and such assistant directors
as may be needed to administer the department. The deputy director
shall have charge and general supervision of the department in the
absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an
acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the department's
responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as
required by federal law or as the director may determine.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 The department shall endeavor to collocate
facilities with the departments of children and family services and
medical and rehabilitative services, and shall establish procedures for
referring clients to those departments if circumstances warrant
referral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 212 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of public welfare to
the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director,
all division directors and assistant directors, and one confidential
secretary for each of these officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 213 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of social and health services currently performed by the
economic services administration are transferred to the department of
public welfare. All references to the secretary or the department of
social and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the director or the department of public welfare when
referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department
of public welfare. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of
social and health services in carrying out the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be made available to the department of public
welfare. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the
department of public welfare.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of public welfare.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of public welfare.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the department of public welfare to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department
of public welfare. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain
in full force and shall be performed by the department of public
welfare.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired.

PART III
DEPARTMENT OF MEDICAL AND REHABILITATIVE SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 It is the purpose of this chapter to
administer and enforce programs relating to medicaid, children's health
programs, mental health, alcohol and substance abuse, disability
determination services, home and community services, residential care
services, and developmental disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of medical and rehabilitative
services.
(2) "Director" means the director of medical and rehabilitative
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 The department of medical and
rehabilitative services is created as an executive branch agency. The
department is vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under
this chapter and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall
serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in session,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.
(2) The director may employ staff members, who shall be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are necessary to
administer this chapter. The director may delegate any power or duty
vested in him or her by this chapter, including authority to make final
decisions and enter final orders in hearings conducted under chapter
34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 (1) It is the intent of the legislature
wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under
the control of the director in order that the director may institute
the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that
changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the
director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director
has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The
director may create such administrative structures as the director
considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The
director may employ such assistants and personnel as may be necessary
for the general administration of the department. This employment
shall be in accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06
RCW, except as otherwise provided.
(2) In addition to other powers granted to the director, the
director may:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the department to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept gifts, grants, or other funds for the purposes of this
chapter; and
(c) Adopt, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, rules necessary to
implement this chapter. This section does not expand the rule-making
authority of the director beyond that necessary to implement and
administer programs and services existing July 1, 2010, as transferred
to the department of medical and rehabilitative services under this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 Except as otherwise specified or as
federal requirements may differently require, the department may be
subdivided into divisions established and organized in accordance with
plans prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In
preparing such plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient
public management, to improve programs, and to take full advantage of
the economies, both fiscal and administrative, to be gained from the
consolidation of functions and agencies under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 The director shall appoint a deputy
director, a department personnel director, and such assistant directors
as may be needed to administer the department. The deputy director
shall have charge and general supervision of the department in the
absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an
acting director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 Any power or duty vested in or transferred
to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the
director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or
subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the official
acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 The director may appoint such advisory
committees or councils as may be required by any federal legislation as
a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the department. The
director may also appoint statewide committees or councils on such
subject matters as are or come within the department's
responsibilities. The committees or councils shall be constituted as
required by federal law or as the director may determine.
Members of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid
their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 In furtherance of the policy of the state
to cooperate with the federal government in all of the programs under
the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as may become necessary
to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may be adopted,
unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal
funds. Any section or provision of law dealing with the department
that may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be
interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to comply with
federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the
various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the
state, or to any departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part
is declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 The department shall endeavor to collocate
facilities with the departments of children and family services and
public welfare, and shall establish procedures for referring clients to
those departments if circumstances warrant referral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter shall not apply in the department of medical and
rehabilitative services to the director, the director's personal
secretary, the deputy director, all division directors and assistant
directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of social and health services currently performed by the
aging and disability services and health and recovery services
administrations are transferred to the department of medical and
rehabilitative services. All references to the secretary or the
department of social and health services in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of
medical and rehabilitative services when referring to the functions
transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the department
of medical and rehabilitative services. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the department of social and health services in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the department of medical and rehabilitative services. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of medical
and rehabilitative services.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the department of medical and rehabilitative services.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of social and health services
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of medical and
rehabilitative services. All employees classified under chapter 41.06
RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of
medical and rehabilitative services to perform their usual duties upon
the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws
and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department
of medical and rehabilitative services. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of medical and rehabilitative services.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of social and health services shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired.

PART IV
FRAUD INVESTIGATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 74.04
RCW to read as follows:
All investigations of fraud under this title shall be conducted by
the office of the attorney general.

PART V
FAMILY POLICY COUNCIL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.190.005 (Purpose) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 301 & 1992 c 198
s 1;
(2) RCW 70.190.010 (Definitions) and 1996 c 132 s 2, 1995 c 399 s
200, & 1992 c 198 s 3;
(3) RCW 70.190.020 (Consolidate efforts of existing entities) and
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 315 & 1992 c 198 s 4;
(4) RCW 70.190.030 (Proposals to facilitate services at the
community level) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 316 & 1992 c 198 s 5;
(5) RCW 70.190.040 (Finding -- Grants to improve readiness to learn)
and 1993 c 336 s 901;
(6) RCW 70.190.050 (Community networks -- Outcome evaluation) and
1998 c 245 s 122 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 207;
(7) RCW 70.190.060 (Community networks -- Legislative intent--Membership -- Open meetings) and 2005 c 274 s 345, 1998 c 314 s 12, 1996
c 132 s 3, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 303;
(8) RCW 70.190.065 (Member's authorization of expenditures--Limitation) and 1996 c 132 s 5;
(9) RCW 70.190.070 (Community networks -- Duties) and 1994 sp.s. c 7
s 304;
(10) RCW 70.190.075 (Lead fiscal agent) and 1996 c 132 s 4;
(11) RCW 70.190.080 (Community networks -- Programs and plans) and
1996 c 132 s 6 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 305;
(12) RCW 70.190.085 (Community networks -- Sexual abstinence and
activity campaign) and 1994 c 299 s 5;
(13) RCW 70.190.090 (Community networks -- Planning grants and
contracts -- Distribution of funds -- Reports) and 1999 c 309 s 918, 1996
c 132 s 7, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 306;
(14) RCW 70.190.100 (Duties of council) and 1998 c 245 s 123 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 307;
(15) RCW 70.190.110 (Program review) and 1998 c 245 s 124 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 308;
(16) RCW 70.190.120 (Interagency agreement) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s
309;
(17) RCW 70.190.130 (Comprehensive plan -- Approval process -- Network
expenditures -- Penalty for noncompliance with chapter) and 1998 c 314 s
13, 1996 c 132 s 8, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 310;
(18) RCW 70.190.150 (Federal restrictions on funds transfers,
waivers) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 312;
(19) RCW 70.190.160 (Community networks -- Implementation in federal
and state plans) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 314;
(20) RCW 70.190.170 (Transfer of funds and programs to state
agency) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 320;
(21) RCW 70.190.180 (Community network -- Grants for use of school
facilities) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 604;
(22) RCW 70.190.190 (Network members immune from civil liability--Network assets not subject to attachment or execution) and 1996 c 132
s 9;
(23) RCW 70.190.910 (Severability -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s 20;
and
(24) RCW 70.190.920 (Effective date -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s
21.

PART VI
GENERAL AND MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 601 RCW 43.17.010 and 2007 c 341 s 46 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
community, trade, and economic development, (10) the department of
veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the department
of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, (14) the
department of health, (15) the department of financial institutions,
(16) the department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the
department of early learning, ((and)) (18) the Puget Sound partnership,
(19) the department of children and family services, (20) the
department of public welfare, and (21) the department of medical and
rehabilitative services, which shall be charged with the execution,
enforcement, and administration of such laws, and invested with such
powers and required to perform such duties, as the legislature may
provide.

Sec. 602 RCW 43.17.020 and 2007 c 341 s 47 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of community,
trade, and economic development, (10) the director of veterans affairs,
(11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement systems,
(13) the secretary of corrections, (14) the secretary of health, (15)
the director of financial institutions, (16) the director of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation, (17) the director
of early learning, ((and)) (18) the executive director of the Puget
Sound partnership, (19) the director of children and family services,
(20) the director of public welfare, and (21) the director of medical
and rehabilitative services.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 603 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2007 c 341 s 48, 2007 c 241 s 2, and
2007 c 15 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the department of children and family services, the director of the
state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology,
the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy
facility site evaluation council, the secretary of the state finance
committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish
and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals
board, the director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the department of information services,
the executive director of the state investment board, the director of
labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the
lottery commission, the director of the department of medical and
rehabilitative services, the director of the office of minority and
women's business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the
director of personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure
commission, the director of the department of public welfare, the
executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the
recreation and conservation office, the director of retirement systems,
the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of
the board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the
secretary of the utilities and transportation commission, the director
of veterans affairs, the president of each of the regional and state
universities and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each
district and each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, ((recreation and conservation funding board,)) state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines ((hearing[s]))
hearings board, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, board of tax
appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington board of
regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington state
maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board, Washington
public power supply system executive board, Washington State University
board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees, and
fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 604 RCW 43.70.555 and 1998 c 245 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department((, in consultation with the family policy council
created in chapter 70.190 RCW,)) shall establish, by rule, standards
for local health departments ((and networks)) to use in assessment,
performance measurement, policy development, and assurance regarding
social development to prevent health problems caused by risk factors
empirically linked to: Violent criminal acts by juveniles, teen
substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide
attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic
violence. The standards shall be based on the standards set forth in
the public health services improvement plan as required by RCW
43.70.550.

Sec. 605 RCW 69.50.520 and 2005 c 518 s 937, 2005 c 514 s 1107,
and 2005 c 514 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8),
66.24.210(4), 66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(9)(a), 82.08.150 (5) and
(7)(b)(iii), 82.24.020(2), 82.24.026(2)(c), 82.64.020, and section 420,
chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994
sp. sess. excluding sections 201 through 207, including state
incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be appropriated
to reimburse local governments for costs associated with implementing
criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums, funds from the account
may also be used for costs associated with providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, funding drug
offender treatment services in accordance with RCW 70.96A.350,
maintenance and operating costs of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs jail reporting system, maintenance and
operating costs of the juvenile rehabilitation administration's client
activity tracking system, civil indigent legal representation,
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces, and transfers to the health
services account((, and grants to community networks under chapter
70.190 RCW by the family policy council)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 Sections 101 through 111 and 113 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 Sections 201 through 211 and 213 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 Sections 301 through 311 and 313 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---