BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.100 and 2000 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is
the subject of an action under this chapter((, unless a court for good
cause finds the appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian
ad litem may be deemed satisfied if the child is represented by
independent counsel in the proceedings)).
(2) If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem
program with a sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint
a suitable person to act as guardian ad litem for the child under this
chapter. Another party to the proceeding or the party's employee or
representative shall not be so appointed.
(3) Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background
information record for each guardian ad litem in the program. The
background file shall include, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(a) Level of formal education;
(b) Training related to the guardian's duties;
(c) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(d) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or
counties of appointment;
(e) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause; ((and))
(f) Founded allegations of child abuse or neglect as defined in RCW
26.44.020;
(g) A statement of financial affairs that includes the topics
listed in RCW 42.17.241; and
(h) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
The background information report shall be updated annually. As a
condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court. If the
appointed guardian ad litem is not a member of a guardian ad litem
program the person shall provide the background information to the
court.
Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a
((statement containing: His or her training relating to the duties as
a guardian ad litem; the name of any counties in which the person was
removed from a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance
action, and the name of the court and the cause number of any case in
which the court has removed the person for cause; and his or her
criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering
ten years prior to the appointment)) copy of the background information
record. The background statement shall not include identifying
information that may be used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home
addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad
litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or pseudonyms as
necessary for their safety.
(4) The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect
until the court discharges the appointment or no longer has
jurisdiction, whichever comes first. The guardian ad litem may also be
discharged upon entry of an order of guardianship.
(5) A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized
by the court, shall have the right to present evidence, examine and
cross-examine witnesses, and to be present at all hearings. A guardian
ad litem shall receive copies of all pleadings and other documents
filed or submitted to the court, and notice of all hearings according
to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive all notice
contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under this
chapter.
(6) If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older,
or if the guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child
needs to be independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint
an attorney to represent the child's position.
(7) For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act
(42 U.S.C. Secs. 5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247,
or any related state or federal legislation, a person appointed
pursuant to ((RCW 13.34.100)) this section shall be deemed a guardian
ad litem to represent the best interests of the minor in proceedings
before the court.
(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the
name of the person it recommends ((and the appointment shall be
effective immediately)). The court ((shall)) may appoint the person
recommended by the program. If a party in a case reasonably believes
the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the
program. The program must complete the review within five judicial
days and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the
review is not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may
file a motion with the court for the removal of the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer on the grounds the advocate or volunteer
is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.102 and 2005 c 282 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All guardians ad litem must comply with the training
requirements established under RCW 2.56.030(15), prior to their
appointment in cases under Title 13 RCW, except that volunteer
guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocates may comply with
alternative training requirements approved by the administrative office
of the courts that meet or exceed the statewide requirements.
(2)(a) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem shall establish a rotational registry system for the appointment
of guardians ad litem. If a judicial district does not have a program
the court shall establish the rotational registry system. Guardians ad
litem shall be selected from the registry except in exceptional
circumstances as determined and documented by the court. The parties
may make a joint recommendation for the appointment of a guardian ad
litem from the registry.
(b) Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad
litem shall maintain a background information record for each guardian
ad litem in the program. The background record shall include, but is
not limited to, the following information:
(i) Level of formal education;
(ii) Training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;
(iii) Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;
(iv) Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county
or counties of appointment;
(v) The names of any counties in which the person was removed from
a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a grievance action, and the
name of the court and the cause number of any case in which the court
has removed the person for cause;
(vi) Founded allegations of child abuse or neglect as defined in
RCW 26.44.020;
(vii) A statement of financial affairs that includes the topics
listed in RCW 42.17.241; and
(viii) Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
(c) The background information report shall be updated annually.
As a condition of appointment, the guardian ad litem's background
information record shall be made available to the court.
(d) Upon appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem
program, shall provide the parties or their attorneys with a copy of
the background information record.
(3) In judicial districts with a population over one hundred
thousand, a list of three names shall be selected from the registry and
given to the parties along with the background information as specified
in RCW 13.34.100(3), including their hourly rate for services. Each
party may, within three judicial days, strike one name from the list.
If more than one name remains on the list, the court shall make the
appointment from the names on the list. In the event all three names
are stricken the person whose name appears next on the registry shall
be appointed.
(((c))) (4) If a party reasonably believes that the appointed
guardian ad litem lacks the necessary expertise for the proceeding,
charges an hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the
particular proceeding, or has a conflict of interest, the party may,
within three judicial days from the appointment, move for substitution
of the appointed guardian ad litem by filing a motion with the court.
(((d))) (5) The superior court shall remove any person from the
guardian ad litem registry who misrepresents his or her qualifications
pursuant to a grievance procedure established by the court.
(((3))) (6) The rotational registry system shall not apply to
court-appointed special advocate programs.

--- END ---