BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 All students in the state of Washington need
to have the opportunity to develop a skill that will help them enter
the job market. When the results of education offer tangible rewards
such as a job and saleable skills, dropout rates are likely to be
lowered. All students should leave high school with workplace
competencies and saleable skills that are transferable to a job or
profession. Many employers find that their prospective employees lack
the saleable skills vital to success in the marketplace. These firms
need entry level workers who come equipped with academic and vocational
skills. Partnerships between business and labor and the schools
increase the relevance of school courses teaching saleable skills.
There are examples of successful partnerships in Washington and other
states, including apprenticeship programs, career days, job coaches
from the business community instructing students on how to find jobs,
schools working with business and labor to develop curriculum that will
better prepare students for real life work experiences, after-school
electronics programs for middle school students, employers designing
job programs for at-risk students, classrooms in community programs,
and mentorships between local business operations and students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
Each school district and community in the state of Washington is
encouraged to inform students and parents about programs in the school
and community that will help students learn saleable skills.
Additionally, each school district and community in the state of
Washington is encouraged to work in partnership to promote and
implement programs that will help students develop saleable skills.
Further, each school district, in partnership with the community, shall
recognize that saleable skills are a desired outcome for the education
system and that curriculum shall be designed and implemented for every
student to be able to leave high school with a saleable skill.

--- END ---