BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter is intended to provide
authority for two or more affordable housing entities to participate in
a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks.
This chapter provides affordable housing entities with the exclusive
source of authority to jointly self-insure property and liability
risks, jointly purchase insurance or reinsurance, and to contract for
risk management, claims, and administrative services with other
affordable housing entities. This chapter must be liberally construed
to grant affordable housing entities maximum flexibility in jointly
self-insuring to the extent the self-insurance programs are operated in
a safe and sound manner. This chapter is intended to require prior
approval for the establishment of every joint self-insurance program.
In addition, this chapter is intended to require every joint self-insurance program for affordable housing entities established under
this chapter to notify the state of the existence of the program and to
comply with the regulatory and statutory standards governing the
management and operation of the programs as provided in this chapter.
This chapter is not intended to authorize or regulate self-insurance of
unemployment compensation under chapter 50.44 RCW or industrial
insurance under chapter 51.14 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affordable housing" means housing projects in which some of
the dwelling units may be purchased or rented, with or without
government assistance, on a basis that is affordable to persons of low
income.
(2) "Affordable housing entity" means any of the following:
(a) A housing authority created under the laws of this state or
another state and any agency or instrumentality of a housing authority
including, but not limited to, a legal entity created to conduct a
joint self-insurance program for housing authorities that is operating
in accordance with chapter 48.62 RCW;
(b) A nonprofit corporation, whether organized under the laws of
this state or another state, that is engaged in providing affordable
housing; or
(c) A partnership (whether general or limited) or limited liability
company, whether organized under the laws of this state or another
state, that is engaged in providing affordable housing and is
affiliated with a housing authority as described in (a) of this
subsection or a nonprofit corporation as described in (b) of this
subsection. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(c), a partnership
or limited liability company is affiliated with a housing authority as
described in (a) of this subsection or a nonprofit corporation as
described in (b) of this subsection if the housing authority or
nonprofit corporation (i) has, or has the right to acquire, a financial
or ownership interest in the partnership or limited liability company,
(ii) possesses the power to direct the management or policies of the
partnership or limited liability company, (iii) has entered into a
contract to lease, manage, or operate the affordable housing owned by
the partnership or limited liability company, or (iv) has any other
material relationship with the partnership or limited liability
company.
(3) "Property and liability risks" includes the risk of property
damage or loss sustained by an affordable housing entity and the risk
of claims arising from the tortious or negligent conduct or any error
or omission of the entity, its officers, employees, agents, or
volunteers as a result of which a claim may be made against the entity.
(4) "Self-insurance" means a formal program of advance funding and
management of entity financial exposure to a risk of loss that is not
transferred through the purchase of an insurance policy or contract.
(5) "State risk manager" means the risk manager of the risk
management division within the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The governing body of an affordable
housing entity may join or form a self-insurance program together with
one or more other affordable housing entities, and may jointly purchase
insurance or reinsurance with one or more other affordable housing
entities for property and liability risks only as permitted under this
chapter. Affordable housing entities may contract for or hire
personnel to provide risk management, claims, and administrative
services in accordance with this chapter.
(2) The agreement to form a joint self-insurance program may
include the organization of a separate legal or administrative entity
with powers delegated to the entity. The entity may be a nonprofit
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or other
form of entity, whether organized under the laws of this state or
another state.
(3) If provided for in the organizational documents, a joint self-insurance program may, in conformance with this chapter:
(a) Contract or otherwise provide for risk management and loss
control services;
(b) Contract or otherwise provide legal counsel for the defense of
claims and other legal services;
(c) Consult with the state insurance commissioner and the state
risk manager;
(d) Jointly purchase insurance and reinsurance coverage in a form
and amount as provided for in the organizational documents;
(e) Obligate the program's participants to pledge revenues or
contribute money to secure the obligations or pay the expenses of the
program, including the establishment of a reserve or fund for coverage;
and
(f) Possess any other powers and perform all other functions
reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(4) Every joint self-insurance program governed by this chapter
must appoint the state risk manager as its attorney to receive service
of, and upon whom must be served, all legal process issued against the
program in this state upon causes of action arising in this state.
(a) Service upon the state risk manager as attorney constitutes
service upon the program. Service upon joint self-insurance programs
subject to this chapter may only occur by service upon the state risk
manager. At the time of service, the plaintiff shall pay to the state
risk manager a fee to be set by the state risk manager, taxable as
costs in the action.
(b) With the initial filing for approval with the state risk
manager, each joint self-insurance program must designate by name and
address the person to whom the state risk manager must forward legal
process that is served upon him or her. The joint self-insurance
program may change this person by filing a new designation.
(c) The appointment of the state risk manager as attorney is
irrevocable, binds any successor in interest or to the assets or
liabilities of the joint self-insurance program, and remains in effect
as long as there is in force in this state any contract made by the
joint self-insurance program or liabilities or duties arising from the
contract.
(d) The state risk manager shall keep a record of the day and hour
of service upon him or her of all legal process. A copy of the
process, by registered mail with return receipt requested, must be sent
by the state risk manager to the person designated to receive legal
process by the joint self-insurance program in its most recent
designation filed with the state risk manager. Proceedings must not
commence against the joint self-insurance program, and the program must
not be required to appear, plead, or answer, until the expiration of
forty days after the date of service upon the state risk manager.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter does not apply to an affordable
housing entity that:
(1) Individually self-insures for property and liability risks; or
(2) Participates in a risk pooling arrangement, including a risk
retention group or a risk purchasing group, regulated under chapter
48.92 RCW, or is a captive insurer authorized in its state of domicile.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The state risk manager shall adopt rules
governing the management and operation of joint self-insurance programs
for affordable housing entities that cover property or liability risks.
All rules must be appropriate for the type of program and class of risk
covered. The state risk manager's rules must include:
(1) Standards for the management, operation, and solvency of joint
self-insurance programs, including the necessity and frequency of
actuarial analyses and claims audits;
(2) Standards for claims management procedures;
(3) Standards for contracts between joint self-insurance programs
and private businesses, including standards for contracts between
third-party administrators and programs; and
(4) Standards that preclude housing authorities or other public
entities participating in the joint self-insurance program from
subsidizing, regardless of the form of subsidy, affordable housing
entities that are not housing authorities or public entities. These
standards do not apply to the consideration attributable to the
ownership interest of a housing authority or public entity in a
separate legal or administrative entity organized with respect to the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Before the establishment of a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks by affordable
housing entities, the entities must obtain the approval of the state
risk manager. The entities proposing the creation of a joint self-insurance program requiring prior approval shall submit a plan of
management and operation to the state risk manager that provides at
least the following information:
(1) The risk or risks to be covered, including any coverage
definitions, terms, conditions, and limitations;
(2) The amount and method of funding the covered risks, including
the initial capital and proposed rates and projected premiums;
(3) The proposed claim reserving practices;
(4) The proposed purchase and maintenance of insurance or
reinsurance in excess of the amounts retained by the joint self-insurance program;
(5) The legal form of the program including, but not limited to,
any articles of incorporation, bylaws, charter, or trust agreement or
other agreement among the participating entities;
(6) The agreements with participants in the program defining the
responsibilities and benefits of each participant and management;
(7) The proposed accounting, depositing, and investment practices
of the program;
(8) The proposed time when actuarial analysis will be first
conducted and the frequency of future actuarial analysis;
(9) A designation of the individual to whom service of process must
be forwarded by the state risk manager on behalf of the program;
(10) All contracts between the program and private persons
providing risk management, claims, or other administrative services;
(11) A professional analysis of the feasibility of the creation and
maintenance of the program;
(12) A legal determination of the potential federal and state tax
liabilities of the program; and
(13) Any other information required by rule of the state risk
manager that is necessary to determine the probable financial and
management success of the program or that is necessary to determine
compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An affordable housing entity may participate
in a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks
with similar affordable housing entities from other states if the
program satisfies the following requirements:
(1) An ownership interest in the program is limited to some or all
of the affordable housing entities of this state and affordable housing
entities of other states that are provided insurance by the program;
(2) The participating affordable housing entities of this state and
other states shall elect a board of directors to manage the program, a
majority of whom must be affiliated with one or more of the
participating affordable housing entities;
(3) The program must provide coverage through the delivery to each
participating affordable housing entity of one or more written policies
affecting insurance of covered risks;
(4) The program must be financed, including the payment of premiums
and the contribution of initial capital, in accordance with the plan of
management and operation submitted to the state risk manager in
accordance with this chapter;
(5) The financial statements of the program must be audited
annually by the certified public accountants for the program, and these
audited financial statements must be delivered to the state risk
manager not more than one hundred twenty days after the end of each
fiscal year of the program;
(6) The investments of the program must be initiated only with
financial institutions or broker-dealers, or both, doing business in
those states in which participating affordable housing entities are
located, and these investments must be audited annually by the
certified public accountants for the program;
(7) The treasurer of a multistate joint self-insurance program must
be designated by resolution of the program and the treasurer must be
located in the state of one of the participating entities;
(8) The participating affordable housing entities may have no
contingent liabilities for covered claims, other than liabilities for
unpaid premiums, if assets of the program are insufficient to cover the
program's liabilities; and
(9) The program must obtain approval from the state risk manager in
accordance with this chapter and must remain in compliance with this
chapter, except if provided otherwise under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Within one hundred twenty days of
receipt of a plan of management and operation, the state risk manager
shall either approve or disapprove of the formation of the joint self-insurance program after reviewing the plan to determine whether the
proposed program complies with this chapter and all rules adopted in
accordance with this chapter.
(2) If the state risk manager denies a request for approval, the
state risk manager shall specify in detail the reasons for denial and
the manner in which the program fails to meet the requirements of this
chapter or any rules adopted in accordance with this chapter.
(3) If the state risk manager determines that a joint self-insurance program covering property or liability risks is in violation
of this chapter or is operating in an unsafe financial condition, the
state risk manager may issue and serve upon the program an order to
cease and desist from the violation or practice.
(a) The state risk manager shall deliver the order to the
appropriate entity or entities directly or mail it to the appropriate
entity or entities by certified mail with return receipt requested.
(b) If the program violates the order or has not taken steps to
comply with the order after the expiration of twenty days after the
cease and desist order has been received by the program, the program is
deemed to be operating in violation of this chapter, and the state risk
manager shall notify the attorney general of the violation.
(c) After hearing or with the consent of a program governed under
this chapter and in addition to or in lieu of a continuation of the
cease and desist order, the state risk manager may levy a fine upon the
program in an amount not less than three hundred dollars and not more
than ten thousand dollars. The order levying the fine must specify the
period within which the fine must be fully paid. The period within
which the fines must be paid must not be less than fifteen and no more
than thirty days from the date of the order. Upon failure to pay the
fine when due, the state risk manager shall request the attorney
general to bring a civil action on the state risk manager's behalf to
collect the fine. The state risk manager shall pay any fine collected
to the state treasurer for the account of the general fund.
(4) Each joint self-insurance program approved by the state risk
manager shall annually file a report with the state risk manager
providing:
(a) Details of any changes in the articles of incorporation,
bylaws, charter, or trust agreement or other agreement among the
participating affordable housing entities;
(b) Copies of all the insurance coverage documents;
(c) A description of the program structure, including participants'
retention, program retention, and excess insurance limits and
attachment point;
(d) An actuarial analysis;
(e) A list of contractors and service providers;
(f) The financial and loss experience of the program; and
(g) Other information as required by rule of the state risk
manager.
(5) A joint self-insurance program requiring the state risk
manager's approval may not engage in an act or practice that in any
respect significantly differs from the management and operation plan
that formed the basis for the state risk manager's approval of the
program unless the program first notifies the state risk manager in
writing and obtains the state risk manager's approval. The state risk
manager shall approve or disapprove the proposed change within sixty
days of receipt of the notice. If the state risk manager denies a
requested change, the state risk manager shall specify in detail the
reasons for the denial and the manner in which the program would fail
to meet the requirements of this chapter or any rules adopted in
accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A joint self-insurance program may by
resolution of the program designate a person having experience with
investments or financial matters as treasurer of the program. The
program must require a bond obtained from a surety company in an amount
and under the terms and conditions that the program finds will protect
against loss arising from mismanagement or malfeasance in investing and
managing program funds. The program may pay the premium on the bond.
(2) All interest and earnings collected on joint self-insurance
program funds belong to the program and must be deposited to the
program's credit in the proper program account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) An employee or official of a
participating affordable housing entity in a joint self-insurance
program may not directly or indirectly receive anything of value for
services rendered in connection with the operation and management of a
self-insurance program other than the salary and benefits provided by
his or her employer or the reimbursement of expenses reasonably
incurred in furtherance of the operation or management of the program.
An employee or official of a participating affordable housing entity in
a joint self-insurance program may not accept or solicit anything of
value for personal benefit or for the benefit of others under
circumstances in which it can be reasonably inferred that the
employee's or official's independence of judgment is impaired with
respect to the management and operation of the program.
(2) RCW 48.30.140, 48.30.150, and 48.30.157 apply to the use of
insurance producers by a joint self-insurance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A joint self-insurance program approved in
accordance with this chapter is exempt from insurance premium taxes,
fees assessed under chapter 48.02 RCW, chapters 48.32 and 48.32A RCW,
business and occupation taxes imposed under chapter 82.04 RCW, and any
assigned risk plan or joint underwriting association otherwise required
by law. This section does not apply to, and no exemption is provided
for, insurance companies issuing policies to cover program risks, and
does not apply to or provide an exemption for third-party
administrators or insurance producers serving the joint self-insurance
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The state risk manager shall establish
and charge an investigation fee in an amount necessary to cover the
costs for the initial review and approval of a joint self-insurance
program. The fee must accompany the initial submission of the plan of
operation and management.
(2) The costs of subsequent reviews and investigations must be
charged to the joint self-insurance program being reviewed or
investigated in accordance with the actual time and expenses incurred
in the review or investigation.
(3) Any program failing to remit its assessment when due is subject
to denial of permission to operate or to a cease and desist order until
the assessment is paid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Any person who files reports or
furnishes other information required under this title, required by the
state risk manager under the authority granted under this title, or
which is useful to the state risk manager in the administration of this
title, is immune from liability in any civil action or suit arising
from the filing of any such report or furnishing such information to
the state risk manager, unless actual malice, fraud, or bad faith is
shown.
(2) The state risk manager and his agents and employees are immune
from liability in any civil action or suit arising from the publication
of any report or bulletins or arising from dissemination of information
related to the official activities of the state risk manager unless
actual malice, fraud, or bad faith is shown.
(3) The immunity granted under this section is in addition to any
common law or statutory privilege or immunity enjoyed by such person.
This section is not intended to abrogate or modify in any way such
common law or statutory privilege or immunity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The state risk manager shall take all steps
necessary to implement this chapter on January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 16 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

Sec. 18 RCW 48.01.050 and 2003 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Insurer" as used in this code includes every person engaged in the
business of making contracts of insurance, other than a fraternal
benefit society. A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange is an
"insurer" as used in this code. Two or more hospitals that join and
organize as a mutual corporation pursuant to chapter 24.06 RCW for the
purpose of insuring or self-insuring against liability claims,
including medical liability, through a contributing trust fund are not
an "insurer" under this code. Two or more local governmental entities,
under any provision of law, that join together and organize to form an
organization for the purpose of jointly self-insuring or self-funding
are not an "insurer" under this code. Two or more affordable housing
entities that join together and organize to form an organization for
the purpose of jointly self-insuring or self-funding under chapter
48.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 17 of this act) are not
an "insurer" under this code. Two or more persons engaged in the
business of commercial fishing who enter into an arrangement with other
such persons for the pooling of funds to pay claims or losses arising
out of loss or damage to a vessel or machinery used in the business of
commercial fishing and owned by a member of the pool are not an
"insurer" under this code.

--- END ---