BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.180 and 1995 c 396 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The public facilities district may secure services by means of
an agreement with a service provider. The public facilities district
shall publish notice, establish criteria, receive and evaluate
proposals, and negotiate with respondents under requirements set forth
by district resolution.
(2) For personal service contracts of sixty-five thousand dollars
or greater not otherwise governed by chapter 39.80 RCW, contracts for
architectural and engineering services, a competitive solicitation
process is required. The district shall establish the process by
resolution, which must at a minimum include the following:
(a) Notice. A notice inviting statements of either qualifications
or proposals, or both, from interested parties must be published in a
newspaper of general circulation throughout the county in which the
district is located at least ten days before the date for submitting
the statements of qualifications or proposals.
(b) Description of services required. The request for statements
of either qualifications or proposals, or both published or provided to
interested parties must describe the services required and list the
types of information and data required of each proposal. It may also
describe the evaluation criteria and state the relative importance of
the criteria if then available.
(c) Review and evaluation. The district shall establish a process
to review and evaluate statements of either qualifications or
proposals, or both. That process may include a selection board
identified by the district or some other panel of evaluators. If
appropriate, the reviewers may hear oral presentations by proposers.
(d) Selection. The evaluators shall select and rank the most
qualified proposers. In selecting and ranking such proposers, the
selection board shall consider the evaluation criteria established by
the district and may consider such other information as may be secured
during the evaluation process related to a proposer's qualifications
and experience.
(e) Negotiations. The district shall enter into contract
negotiations with the top-ranked proposer or proposers identified in
the selection process. Negotiations may be conducted concurrently or
sequentially as may be allowed by law.
(f) Approval. When negotiations are complete, the proposed
contract will be presented to the district's governing body at its next
regularly scheduled meeting for approval or ratification.
(3) Exceptions. The requirements of this section need not be met
in the following circumstances:
(a) Emergency. When the contracting authority makes a finding that
an emergency requires the immediate execution of the work involved. As
used in this subsection, "emergency" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 39.29.006;
(b) Contract amendment. Amendments to existing service contracts
are exempt from these requirements; and
(c) Sole source. In the event that the services being sought can
only be obtained from a single source, then the district shall make a
formal written finding stating the factual basis for the exception and
the solicitation requirements of this section do not apply. As used in
this subsection, "sole source" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
39.29.006.
(4) Prospective application. Nothing in this section affects the
validity or effect of any district contract executed prior to the
effective date of this act.

--- END ---