BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.060 and 1947 c 79 s .02.06 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner ((shall have)) has the authority expressly
conferred upon him or her by or reasonably implied from the provisions
of this code.
(2) The commissioner shall execute his or her duties and shall
enforce the provisions of this code.
(3) The commissioner may:
(a) Make reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for effectuating any
provision of this code, except those relating to his or her election,
qualifications, or compensation. ((No such)) Rules ((and regulations
shall be)) are not effective prior to their being filed for public
inspection in the commissioner's office.
(b) Conduct investigations to determine whether any person has
violated any provision of this code.
(c) Conduct examinations, investigations, hearings, in addition to
those specifically provided for, useful and proper for the efficient
administration of any provision of this code.
(4) When the governor declares a state of emergency under RCW
43.06.010(12), the commissioner may issue an order that addresses any
or all of the following matters related to insurance policies issued in
this state:
(a) Reporting requirements for claims;
(b) Grace periods for payment of insurance premiums and performance
of other duties by insureds;
(c) Temporary postponement of cancellations and renewals; and
(d) Medical coverage to ensure access to care.
(5) An order by the commissioner under subsection (4) of this
section may remain effective for not more than thirty days unless the
commissioner extends the termination date for the order for an
additional period of not more than thirty days or for subsequent
additional periods of not more than thirty days. The commissioner may
extend the order if, in the commissioner's judgment, the circumstances
warrant an extension. The order must specify, by line of insurance:
(a) The geographic areas in which the order applies, which must be
within but may be less extensive than the geographic area specified in
the governor's proclamation of a state of emergency and must be
specific according to an appropriate means of delineation, such as the
United States postal service zip codes or other appropriate means; and
(b) The date on which the order becomes effective and the date on
which the order terminates.
(6) The commissioner may adopt rules that establish general
criteria for orders issued under subsection (4) of this section and may
adopt emergency rules applicable to a specific proclamation of a state
of emergency by the governor.
(7) The rule-making authority set forth in subsection (6) of this
section does not limit or affect the rule-making authority otherwise
granted to the commissioner by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---