BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.02.190 and 2008 c 328 s 6003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Organization" means every insurer, as defined in RCW
48.01.050, having a certificate of authority to do business in this
state, every health care service contractor, as defined in RCW
48.44.010, every health maintenance organization, as defined in RCW
48.46.020, or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement, as
defined in RCW 48.125.010, registered to do business in this state.
"Class one" organizations shall consist of all insurers as defined in
RCW 48.01.050. "Class two" organizations shall consist of all
organizations registered under provisions of chapters 48.44 and 48.46
RCW. "Class three" organizations shall consist of self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements as defined in RCW 48.125.010.
(b)(i) "Receipts" means (A) net direct premiums consisting of
direct gross premiums, as defined in RCW 48.18.170, paid for insurance
written or renewed upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state, less return premiums and premiums on policies
not taken, dividends paid or credited to policyholders on direct
business, and premiums received from policies or contracts issued in
connection with qualified plans as defined in RCW 48.14.021, and (B)
prepayments to health care service contractors, as defined in RCW
48.44.010, health maintenance organizations, as defined in RCW
48.46.020, or participant contributions to self-funded multiple
employer welfare arrangements, as defined in RCW 48.125.010, less
experience rating credits, dividends, prepayments returned to
subscribers, and payments for contracts not taken.
(ii) Participant contributions, under chapter 48.125 RCW, used to
determine the receipts in this state under this section shall be
determined in the same manner as premiums taxable in this state are
determined under RCW 48.14.090.
(c) "Regulatory surcharge" means the fees imposed by this section.
(2) The annual cost of operating the office of insurance
commissioner shall be determined by legislative appropriation. A pro
rata share of the cost shall be charged to all organizations as a
regulatory surcharge. Each class of organization shall contribute a
sufficient amount to the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to
pay the reasonable costs, including overhead, of regulating that class
of organization.
(3) The regulatory surcharge shall be calculated separately for
each class of organization. The regulatory surcharge collected from
each organization shall be that portion of the cost of operating the
insurance commissioner's office, for that class of organization, for
the ensuing fiscal year that is represented by the organization's
portion of the receipts collected or received by all organizations
within that class on business in this state during the previous
calendar year. However, the regulatory surcharge must not exceed one-eighth of one percent of receipts and the minimum regulatory surcharge
shall be one thousand dollars.
(4) The commissioner shall annually, on or before June 1st,
calculate and bill each organization for the amount of the regulatory
surcharge. The regulatory surcharge shall be due and payable no later
than June 15th of each year. However, if the necessary financial
records are not available or if the amount of the legislative
appropriation is not determined in time to carry out such calculations
and bill such regulatory surcharge within the time specified, the
commissioner may use the regulatory surcharge factors for the prior
year as the basis for the regulatory surcharge and, if necessary, the
commissioner may impose supplemental fees to fully and properly charge
the organizations. Any organization failing to pay the regulatory
surcharges by June 30th shall pay the same penalties as the penalties
for failure to pay taxes when due under RCW 48.14.060. The regulatory
surcharge required by this section is in addition to all other taxes
and fees now imposed or that may be subsequently imposed.
(5) All moneys collected shall be deposited in the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account in the state treasury which is hereby
created.
(6) Unexpended funds in the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account at the close of a fiscal year shall be carried forward in the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the succeeding fiscal
year and shall be used to reduce future regulatory surcharges.
((During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer
from the insurance commissioner's regulatory account to the Washington
state heritage center account such amounts as reflect excess fund
balance in the account.))
(7)(a) Each insurer may annually collect regulatory surcharges
remitted in preceding years by means of a policyholder surcharge on
premiums charged for all kinds of insurance. The recoupment shall be
at a uniform rate reasonably calculated to collect the regulatory
surcharge remitted by the insurer.
(b) If an insurer fails to collect the entire amount of the
recoupment in the first year under this section, it may repeat the
recoupment procedure provided for in this subsection (7) in succeeding
years until the regulatory surcharge is fully collected or a de minimis
amount remains uncollected. Any such de minimis amount may be
collected as provided in (d) of this subsection.
(c) The amount and nature of any recoupment shall be separately
stated on either a billing or policy declaration sent to an insured.
The amount of the recoupment must not be considered a premium for any
purpose, including the premium tax or agents' commissions.
(d) An insurer may elect not to collect the regulatory surcharge
from its insured. In such a case, the insurer may recoup the
regulatory surcharge through its rates, if the following requirements
are met:
(i) The insurer remits the amount of surcharge not collected by
election under this subsection; and
(ii) The surcharge is not considered a premium for any purpose,
including the premium tax or agents' commission.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.13.450 and 2008 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 48.13.450
through 48.13.475 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agent" means a national bank, state bank, trust company, or
broker/dealer that maintains an account in its name in a clearing
corporation or that is a member of the federal reserve system and
through which a custodian participates in a clearing corporation,
including the treasury/reserve automated debt entry securities system
(TRADES) or treasury direct systems; except that with respect to
securities issued by institutions organized or existing under the laws
of a foreign country or securities used to meet the deposit
requirements pursuant to laws of a foreign country as a condition of
doing business therein, "agent" may include a corporation that is
organized or existing under the laws of a foreign country and that is
legally qualified under those laws to accept custody of securities.
(2) "Broker/dealer" means a broker or dealer as defined in RCW
62A.8-102(1)(c), that is registered with and subject to the
jurisdiction of the securities and exchange commission, maintains
membership in the securities investor protection corporation, and has
a tangible net worth equal to or greater than two hundred fifty million
dollars.
(3) "Clearing corporation" means a corporation as defined in RCW
62A.8-102(1)(e) that is organized for the purpose of effecting
transactions in securities by computerized book-entry, except that with
respect to securities issued by institutions organized or existing
under the laws of any foreign country or securities used to meet the
deposit requirements pursuant to the laws of a foreign country as a
condition of doing business therein, "clearing corporation" may include
a corporation that is organized or existing under the laws of any
foreign country and is legally qualified under such laws to effect
transactions in securities by computerized book-entry. "Clearing
corporation" also includes treasury/reserve automated debt entry
securities system and treasury direct book-entry securities systems
established pursuant to 31 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq., 12 U.S.C. pt. 391,
and 5 U.S.C. pt. 301.
(4) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of the state of
Washington.
(5) "Custodian" means:
(a) A national bank, state bank, or trust company that shall, at
all times acting as a custodian, be no less than adequately capitalized
as determined by the standards adopted by United States banking
regulators and that is regulated by either state banking laws or is a
member of the federal reserve system and that is legally qualified to
accept custody of securities; except that with respect to securities
issued by institutions organized or existing under the laws of a
foreign country, or securities used to meet the deposit requirements
pursuant to laws of a foreign country as a condition of doing business
therein, "custodian" may include a bank or trust company incorporated
or organized under the laws of a country other than the United States
that is regulated as such by that country's government or an agency
thereof that shall at all times acting as a custodian be no less than
adequately capitalized as determined by the standards adopted by the
international banking authorities and legally qualified to accept
custody of securities; or
(b) A broker/dealer.
(6) "Custodied securities" means securities held by the custodian
or its agent or in a clearing corporation, including the
treasury/reserve automated debt ((equity)) entry securities system
(TRADES) or treasury direct systems.
(7) "Securities" means instruments as defined in RCW 62A.8-102(1)(o).
(8) "Securities certificate" has the same meaning as in RCW
62A.8-102(1)(d).
(9) "Tangible net worth" means shareholders equity, less intangible
assets, as reported in the broker/dealer's most recent annual or
transition report pursuant to section 13 or 15(d) of the securities
exchange act of 1934 (S.E.C. Form 10-K) filed with the securities and
exchange commission.
(10) "Treasury/reserve automated debt entry securities system"
("TRADES") and "treasury direct" mean book-entry securities systems
established pursuant to 31 U.S.C. Sec. 3100 et seq., 12 U.S.C. pt. 391,
and 5 U.S.C. pt. 301, with the operation of TRADES and treasury direct
subject to 31 C.F.R. pt. 357 et seq.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.14.020 and 2008 c 217 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to other provisions of this chapter, each authorized
insurer except title insurers shall on or before the first day of March
of each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's
office a tax on premiums. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, such tax shall be in the amount of two percent of all
premiums, excluding amounts returned to or the amount of reductions in
premiums allowed to holders of industrial life policies for payment of
premiums directly to an office of the insurer, collected or received by
the insurer under RCW 48.14.090 during the preceding calendar year
other than ocean marine and foreign trade insurances, after deducting
premiums paid to policyholders as returned premiums, upon risks or
property resident, situated, or to be performed in this state. For tax
purposes, the reporting of premiums shall be on a written basis or on
a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required by the annual
statement. For the purposes of this section the consideration received
by an insurer for the granting of an annuity shall not be deemed to be
a premium.
(2) In the case of insurers which require the payment by their
policyholders at the inception of their policies of the entire premium
thereon in the form of premiums or premium deposits which are the same
in amount, based on the character of the risks, regardless of the
length of term for which such policies are written, such tax shall be
in the amount of two percent of the gross amount of such premiums and
premium deposits upon policies on risks resident, located, or to be
performed in this state, in force as of the thirty-first day of
December next preceding, less the unused or unabsorbed portion of such
premiums and premium deposits computed at the average rate thereof
actually paid or credited to policyholders or applied in part payment
of any renewal premiums or premium deposits on one-year policies
expiring during such year.
(3) Each authorized insurer shall with respect to all ocean marine
and foreign trade insurance contracts written within this state during
the preceding calendar year, on or before the first day of March of
each year pay to the state treasurer through the commissioner's office
a tax of ninety-five one-hundredths of one percent on its gross
underwriting profit. Such gross underwriting profit shall be
ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e., gross premiums
less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on such ocean
marine and foreign trade insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e.,
gross losses paid less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded)
during such calendar year under such contracts. In the case of
insurers issuing participating contracts, such gross underwriting
profit shall not include, for computation of the tax prescribed by this
subsection, the amounts refunded, or paid as participation dividends,
by such insurers to the holders of such contracts.
(4) The state does hereby preempt the field of imposing excise or
privilege taxes upon insurers or their appointed insurance producers,
other than title insurers, and no county, city, town or other municipal
subdivision shall have the right to impose any such taxes upon such
insurers or these insurance producers.
(5) If an authorized insurer collects or receives any such premiums
on account of policies in force in this state which were originally
issued by another insurer and which other insurer is not authorized to
transact insurance in this state on its own account, such collecting
insurer shall be liable for and shall pay the tax on such premiums.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.14.090 and 1963 c 195 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
In determining the amount of direct premium taxable in this state,
all such premiums written, procured, or received in this state shall be
deemed written upon risks or property resident, situated, or to be
performed in this state except such premiums as are properly allocated
or apportioned and reported as taxable premiums of any other state or
states. For tax purposes, the reporting of premiums shall be on a
written basis or on a paid-for basis consistent with the basis required
by the annual statement.

Sec. 5 RCW 48.66.045 and 2005 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or
certificate providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or
after January 1, 1996, and before June 1, 2010, shall:
(((1))) (a) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue
coverage under its standardized benefit plans B, C, D, E, F, G, K, and
L without evidence of insurability to any resident of this state who is
eligible for both medicare hospital and physician services by reason of
age or by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the
medicare supplement policy replaces another medicare supplement
standardized benefit plan policy or certificate B, C, D, E, F, G, K, or
L, or other more comprehensive coverage than the replacing policy; and
(((2))) (b) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue
coverage under its standardized plans A, H, I, and J without evidence
of insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible for both
medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason
of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement
policy replaces another medicare supplement policy or certificate which
is the same standardized plan as the replaced policy. After December
31, 2005, plans H, I, and J may be replaced only by the same plan if
that plan has been modified to remove outpatient prescription drug
coverage((; and)).
(2)(a) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, every issuer
of a medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate providing
coverage to a resident of this state issued on or after June 1, 2010,
shall issue coverage under its standardized plans B, C, D, E, F with
high deductible, G, K, L, M, or N without evidence of insurability to
any resident of this state who is eligible for both medicare hospital
and physician services by reason of age or by reason of disability or
end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement policy or
certificate replaces another medicare supplement policy or certificate
or other more comprehensive coverage; and
(b) Unless otherwise provided for in RCW 48.66.055, issue coverage
under its standardized plan A without evidence of insurability to any
resident of this state who is eligible for both medicare hospital and
physician services by reason of age or by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement policy or certificate
replaces another standardized plan A medicare supplement policy or
certificate.
(3) Every issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or
certificate providing coverage to a resident of this state issued on or
after January 1, 1996, shall set rates only on a community-rated basis.
Premiums shall be equal for all policyholders and certificate holders
under a standardized medicare supplement benefit plan form, except that
an issuer may vary premiums based on spousal discounts, frequency of
payment, and method of payment including automatic deposit of premiums
and may develop no more than two rating pools that distinguish between
an insured's eligibility for medicare by reason of:
(a) Age; or
(b) Disability or end-stage renal disease.

--- END ---