BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to permit and set
standards for producers and insurers selling annuity products issued
after the effective date of this section that ensure consumers purchase
annuities suitable to their financial and insurance needs and life
circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Annuity" means a fixed annuity or variable annuity that is
individually solicited, whether the product is classified as an
individual or group annuity.
(b) "Recommendation" means advice provided by an insurance
producer, or an insurer when no producer is involved, to an individual
consumer that results in a purchase or exchange of an annuity in
accordance with that advice.
(2) Insurers and insurance producers must comply with the following
requirements in recommending and executing a purchase or exchange of an
annuity:
(a) In recommending the purchase of an annuity or the exchange of
an annuity that results in another insurance transaction or series of
insurance transactions to a consumer, the insurance producer, or the
insurer when no producer is involved, must have reasonable grounds for
believing that the recommendation is suitable for the consumer on the
basis of the facts disclosed by the consumer about their investments
and other insurance products and as to their financial situation and
needs.
(b) Prior to the execution of a purchase or exchange of an annuity
resulting from a recommendation, an insurance producer, or an insurer
when no producer is involved, shall make reasonable efforts to obtain
information concerning:
(i) The consumer's financial status;
(ii) The consumer's tax status;
(iii) The consumer's investment objectives; and
(iv) Other information used or considered to be reasonable by the
insurance producer, or the insurer when no producer is involved, in
making recommendations to the consumer.
(3) An insurer or insurance producer's recommendation must be
reasonable under all circumstances actually known to the insurer or
insurance producer at the time of the recommendation. Neither an
insurance producer nor an insurer when no producer is involved, has any
obligation to a consumer under subsection (2) of this section related
to any recommendation if a consumer:
(a) Refuses to provide relevant information requested by the
insurer or insurance producer;
(b) Decides to enter into an insurance transaction that is not
based on a recommendation of the insurer or insurance producer; or
(c) Fails to provide complete or accurate information.
(4) An insurer must assure that a system to supervise
recommendations, reasonably designed to achieve compliance with this
section, is established and maintained. The system must include, but
is not limited to, written procedures and conducting periodic review of
its records that are reasonably designed to assist in detecting and
preventing violations of this section.
(a) An insurer may contract with a third party, including insurance
producers, a general agent, or independent agency, to establish and
maintain a system of supervision as required in this subsection with
respect to insurance producers under contract with or employed by the
third party. An insurer must make reasonable inquiry to assure that
the third party is performing the functions required in this subsection
and must take action as is reasonable under the circumstances to
enforce the contractual obligation to perform the functions. An
insurer may comply with its obligation to make reasonable inquiry by
doing all of the following:
(i) Annually obtaining a certification from a third party senior
manager with responsibility for the delegated functions that the
manager has a reasonable basis to represent, and does represent, that
the third party is performing the required functions; and
(ii) Based on reasonable selection criteria, periodically selecting
third parties contracting under this subsection for a review to
determine whether the third parties are performing the required
functions. The insurer shall perform those procedures to conduct the
review that are reasonable under the circumstances.
(b) An insurer, or the contracted third party if a general agent or
independent agency, is not required to:
(i) Review, or provide for review of, all insurance producer
solicited transactions; or
(ii) Include in its system of supervision an insurance producer's
recommendations to consumers of products other than the annuities
offered by the insurer, general agent, or independent agency.
(c) A general agent or independent agency contracting with an
insurer to supervise compliance with this section shall promptly, when
requested by the insurer, give a certification of compliance or give a
clear statement that it is unable to meet the certification criteria.
A person may not provide a certification unless the person:
(i) Is a senior manager with responsibility for the delegated
functions; and
(ii) Has a reasonable basis for making the certification.
(5) Compliance with the financial industry regulatory authority
conduct rules pertaining to suitability satisfies the requirements
under this section for the recommendation of annuities registered under
the securities act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 77(a) et seq. or as
hereafter amended). This subsection does not limit the insurance
commissioner's ability to enforce this section.
(6) The commissioner may order an insurer, an insurance producer,
or both, to take reasonably appropriate corrective action for any
consumer harmed by the insurer's or insurance producer's violation of
this section.
(a) Any applicable penalty under this or other sections of Title 48
RCW may be reduced or eliminated by the commissioner if corrective
action for the consumer was taken promptly after a violation was
discovered.
(b) This subsection does not limit the commissioner's ability to
enforce this section or other applicable sections of Title 48 RCW.
(7) Insurers and insurance producers must maintain or be able to
make available to the commissioner records of the information collected
from the consumer and other information used in making the
recommendations that were the basis for the insurance transaction for
five years after the insurance transaction is completed by the insurer,
or for five years after the annuity begins paying benefits, whichever
is longer. An insurer is permitted, but is not required, to maintain
documentation on behalf of an insurance producer. This section does
not relieve an insurance producer of the obligation to maintain records
of insurance transactions as required by RCW 48.17.470.
(8) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer
this section.
(9) Unless otherwise specifically included, this section does not
apply to recommendations involving:
(a) Direct response solicitations when there is no recommendation
based on information collected from the consumer under this section; or
(b) Contracts used to fund:
(i) An employee pension or welfare benefit plan that is covered by
the employment and income security act;
(ii) A plan described by sections 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 408(k),
or 408(p) of the internal revenue code, as amended, if established or
maintained by an employer;
(iii) A government or church plan defined in section 414 of the
internal revenue code, a government or church welfare benefit plan or
a deferred compensation plan of a state or local government or tax
exempt organization under section 457 of the internal revenue code;
(iv) A nonqualified deferred compensation arrangement established
or maintained by an employer or plan sponsor;
(v) Settlements of or assumptions of liabilities associated with
personal injury litigation or any dispute or claim resolution process;
or
(vi) Formal prepaid funeral contracts.
(10) This section does not affect the application of chapter 21.20
RCW.

--- END ---