BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that significant
efforts are under way to improve mathematics and science instruction in
Washington's public schools through development and adoption of new
learning standards, identification of aligned curriculum, and expanded
opportunities for professional development for teachers. A significant
emphasis has also been made on improving career and technical education
programs focused on high-demand programs. Middle schools have
successfully served one thousand four hundred full-time equivalent
students in career and technical programs rich in science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics through a grant program. The legislature
concludes that opportunities for hands-on and applied learning in these
programs should be extended to middle school students on an ongoing,
statewide basis so that students are prepared to take advantage of more
advanced coursework in high school and postsecondary education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.130 and 2007 c 396 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) ((Within funds specifically appropriated therefor,)) A middle
school that receives approval from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction to provide a career and technical program in
science, technology, engineering, or mathematics directly to students
shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school operating a
similar program. Additionally, a middle school that provides a hands-on experience in ((math and)) science, technology, engineering, or
mathematics with an integrated curriculum of academic content and
career and technical education, and includes a career and technical
education exploratory component shall also qualify for the career and
technical education funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act takes effect September
1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---