BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that the urban corridors office
within the department operates as a seventh administrative region.
Therefore, the legislature intends that the regional consolidation in
this section will result in a decrease in the number of total regions.
This consolidation will also result in a reduction in the amount of
regional management level staff by at least five percent by July 1,
2011.
(2) Beginning in January 2010 and completed by July 1, 2011, as a
means of reducing department administrative costs and providing more
efficient use of department resources, the secretary shall realign the
transportation regions to generally include:
(a) The Olympic region, containing Clallam, Jefferson, Grays
Harbor, Mason, Lewis, Kitsap, and Thurston counties;
(b) The southwest region, containing Pacific, Wahkiakum, Cowlitz,
Clark, and Skamania counties;
(c) The northwest region, containing San Juan, Island, Whatcom, and
Skagit counties;
(d) The Puget Sound region, containing King, Pierce, and Snohomish
counties;
(e) The south central region, containing Chelan, Douglas, Grant,
Kittitas, Yakima, Benton, Franklin, and Klickitat counties, with a
connection into Walla Walla county along state route number 12 to the
Tri-Cities area; and
(f) The eastern region, containing Okanogan, Ferry, Stevens, Pend
Oreille, Lincoln, Spokane, Adams, Whitman, Columbia, Garfield, and
Asotin counties, and that portion of Walla Walla county not included in
(e) of this subsection.

--- END ---