BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.403 and 2005 c 312 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may provide for the establishment, construction,
and operation of a pilot project of high occupancy toll lanes on state
route 167 high occupancy vehicle lanes within King county. The
department may issue, buy, and redeem bonds, and deposit and expend
them; secure and remit financial and other assistance in the
construction of high occupancy toll lanes, carry insurance, and handle
any other matters pertaining to the high occupancy toll lane pilot
project.
(2) Tolls for high occupancy toll lanes will be established as
follows:
(a) The schedule of toll charges for high occupancy toll lanes must
be established by the transportation commission and collected in a
manner determined by the commission.
(b) Toll charges shall not be assessed on transit buses and vanpool
vehicles owned or operated by any public agency.
(c) The department shall establish performance standards for the
state route 167 high occupancy toll lane pilot project. The department
must automatically adjust the toll charge, using dynamic tolling, to
ensure that toll-paying single-occupant vehicle users are only
permitted to enter the lane to the extent that average vehicle speeds
in the lane remain above forty-five miles per hour at least ninety
percent of the time during peak hours. The toll charge may vary in
amount by time of day, level of traffic congestion within the highway
facility, vehicle occupancy, or other criteria, as the commission may
deem appropriate. The commission may also vary toll charges for
single-occupant inherently low-emission vehicles such as those powered
by electric batteries, natural gas, propane, or other clean burning
fuels.
(d) The commission shall periodically review the toll charges to
determine if the toll charges are effectively maintaining travel time,
speed, and reliability on the highway facilities.
(3) The department shall monitor the state route 167 high occupancy
toll lane pilot project and shall annually report to the transportation
commission and the legislature on operations and findings. At a
minimum, the department shall provide facility use data and review the
impacts on:
(a) Freeway efficiency and safety;
(b) Effectiveness for transit;
(c) Person and vehicle movements by mode;
(d) Ability to finance improvements and transportation services
through tolls; and
(e) The impacts on all highway users. The department shall analyze
aggregate use data and conduct, as needed, separate surveys to assess
usage of the facility in relation to geographic, socioeconomic, and
demographic information within the corridor in order to ascertain
actual and perceived questions of equitable use of the facility.
(4) The department shall modify the pilot project to address
identified safety issues and mitigate negative impacts to high
occupancy vehicle lane users.
(5) Authorization to impose high occupancy vehicle tolls for the
state route 167 high occupancy toll pilot project expires if either of
the following two conditions apply:
(a) If no contracts have been let by the department to begin
construction of the toll facilities associated with this pilot project
within four years of July 24, 2005; or
(b) Four years after toll collection begins under this section.
(6) The department of transportation shall adopt rules that allow
automatic vehicle identification transponders used for electronic toll
collection to be compatible with other electronic payment devices or
transponders from the Washington state ferry system, other public
transportation systems, or other toll collection systems to the extent
that technology permits.
(7) The conversion of a single existing high occupancy vehicle lane
to a high occupancy toll lane as proposed for SR-167 must be taken as
the exception for this pilot project.
(8) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the high
occupancy toll lanes established under this section is a traffic
infraction, plus an additional toll penalty. The toll penalty is equal
to three times the toll for a standard passenger car during peak hours.
The toll penalty may not be reduced. The court shall remit the toll
penalty to the department or a private entity under contract with the
department for deposit into the statewide account in which tolls are
deposited for the tolling facility at which the violation occurred.
(9) Procurement activity associated with this pilot project shall
be open and competitive in accordance with chapter 39.29 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.66.090 and 2005 c 312 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The high occupancy toll lanes operations account is created in the
state treasury. The department shall deposit all revenues received by
the department as toll charges collected from high occupancy toll lane
users and all toll penalties identified in RCW 47.56.403. Moneys in
this account may be spent only if appropriated by the legislature.
Moneys in this account may be used for, but be not limited to, debt
service, planning, administration, construction, maintenance,
operation, repair, rebuilding, enforcement, and expansion of high
occupancy toll lanes and to increase transit, vanpool and carpool, and
trip reduction services in the corridor. A reasonable proportion of
the moneys in this account must be dedicated to increase transit,
vanpool, carpool, and trip reduction services in the corridor. A
reasonable proportion of the moneys in this account must be dedicated
to increase transit, vanpool, carpool, and trip reduction services in
the corridor.

--- END ---