BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For highway construction projects where the department
considers agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance, as
defined in RCW 36.70A.030, in reviewing and selecting sites to meet
environmental mitigation requirements under the national environmental
policy act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) and chapter 43.21C RCW, the
department shall, to the greatest extent possible, consider using
public land first.
(2) If public lands are not available that meet the required
environmental mitigation needs, the department may use other sites
while making every effort to avoid any net loss of agricultural lands
that have a designation of long-term commercial significance.

--- END ---