BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.72.010 and 1996 c 87 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter:
(1) ((The term)) "For hire vehicle" includes all vehicles used for
the transportation of passengers for compensation, except auto stages,
school buses operating exclusively under a contract to a school
district, ride-sharing vehicles under chapter 46.74 RCW, limousine
carriers licensed under chapter 46.72A RCW except as provided in this
subsection, vehicles used by nonprofit transportation providers for
elderly persons or ((handicapped)) persons with disabilities and their
attendants under chapter 81.66 RCW, vehicles used by auto
transportation companies licensed under chapter 81.68 RCW, vehicles
used to provide courtesy transportation at no charge to and from
parking lots, hotels, and rental offices, and vehicles used by charter
party carriers of passengers and excursion service carriers licensed
under chapter 81.70 RCW. "For hire vehicle" also includes limousine
carriers licensed under chapter 46.72A RCW that are classified by rule
as executive sedans or executive vans pursuant to RCW 46.04.274 when
operating in a county with a population of one million or more or a
city with a population of five hundred thousand or more;
(2) ((The term)) "For hire operator" means and includes any person,
concern, or entity engaged in the transportation of passengers for
compensation in for hire vehicles.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.72A.010 and 1996 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that privately operated
limousine transportation service is a vital part of the transportation
system within the state and provides prearranged transportation
services to state residents, tourists, and out-of-state business
people. Consequently, the safety, reliability, and stability of
privately operated limousine transportation services are matters of
statewide importance. The regulation of privately operated limousine
transportation services is thus an essential governmental function.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to permit the department
and a port district in a county with a population of one million or
more to regulate limousine transportation services without liability
under federal antitrust laws. It is the further intent of the
legislature to permit a county with a population of one million or more
or a city with a population of five hundred thousand or more to each
separately regulate those categories of limousine carriers that qualify
as for hire vehicles under RCW 46.72.010.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.72A.030 and 1996 c 87 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, in conjunction with the Washington state
patrol, shall regulate limousine carriers with respect to entry, safety
of equipment, chauffeur qualifications, and operations. The department
shall adopt rules and require such reports as are necessary to carry
out this chapter.
(2) In addition, a port district in a county with a population of
one million or more may regulate limousine carriers with respect to
entry, safety of equipment, chauffeur qualifications, insurance
requirements, license fees, and operations. The county in which the
port district is located may adopt ordinances and rules to assist the
port district in enforcement of limousine regulations only at port
facilities. ((In no event may this be construed to grant the county
the authority to regulate limousines within its jurisdiction. The)) A
port district may not set limousine rates, but the limousine carriers
shall file their rates and schedules with the port district.
(3) A county with a population of one million or more and a city
with a population of five hundred thousand or more may each separately
regulate those categories of limousine carriers that qualify as for
hire vehicles under RCW 46.72.010, with respect to entry, safety of
equipment, chauffeur qualifications, insurance requirements, license
fees, and operations. A county or city may not set limousine rates for
such categories, but the limousine carriers falling within such
categories shall file their rates and schedules with the respective
county or city.
(4) The department, a port district in a county with a population
of at least one million, or a county in which the port district is
located may enter into cooperative agreements for the joint regulation
of limousines.
(((4))) (5) The department, a port district in a county with a
population of at least one million, a county with a population of one
million or more, or a city with a population of five hundred thousand
or more may enter into cooperative agreements for the joint regulation
of those categories of limousine carriers that qualify as for hire
vehicles under RCW 46.72.010.
(6) The Washington state patrol shall annually conduct a vehicle
inspection of each limousine licensed under this chapter, except when
a port district, a county with a population of one million or more, or
a city with a population of five hundred thousand or more regulates
limousine carriers under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, that
port district ((or)), county in which the port (([district])) district
is located, county with a population of one million or more, or city
with a population of five hundred thousand or more shall conduct the
annual vehicle inspection. The patrol, the port district, ((or)) the
county, or the city may impose an annual vehicle inspection fee and
monetary penalties for noncompliance.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.72A.040 and 1996 c 87 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except when a port district regulates limousine carriers under RCW
46.72A.030 or a city or county regulates those categories of limousine
carriers that qualify as for hire vehicles under RCW 46.72.010,
46.72.160, and 46.72A.030, the state of Washington fully occupies and
preempts the entire field of regulation over limousine carriers as
regulated by this chapter. Cities, towns, and counties or other
municipalities may enact only those laws and ordinances relating to
limousine carriers that are consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.72A RCW
to read as follows:
RCW 46.72A.060 through 46.72A.140 do not operate to limit the
authority of a port district in a county with a population of at least
one million, a county with a population of one million or more, or a
city with a population of five hundred thousand or more under this
chapter in the exercise of the regulatory authority granted under this
chapter. In exercising the authority granted under this chapter, each
of these jurisdictions has the separate authority to establish its own
requirements including, but not limited to, those related to insurance
requirements, license requirements for carriers and chauffeurs, conduct
requirements for carriers and chauffeurs, license fees, and penalties
for noncompliance.

--- END ---