BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The 2007 joint transportation committee
study on long-term transportation financing, the national surface
transportation infrastructure financing commission study, and other
studies have concluded that existing sources of state and national
long-term transportation funding are not sustainable. The studies
recommend the enhanced use of tolling and other financial methods to
serve as interim transitions leading to conversion to a mileage-based
user fee.
(2) Transitioning to alternative transportation funding methods
will be institutionally challenging. Further research and analysis of
identifying and implementing alternative funding methods are needed to
assist the legislature in developing mid-term and long-term
transportation funding policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the joint transportation
committee shall conduct a comprehensive research effort analyzing the
feasibility and practicality of implementing mid-term and long-term
funding methodologies identified in the 2007 long-term transportation
financing study, as well as other approaches identified by the
committee. The research and analysis must take into account existing
and emerging policy objectives regarding funding, energy, environment,
and mobility. The committee shall coordinate with the departments of
transportation, licensing, ecology, and community, trade, and economic
development to support the research and analysis as deemed necessary by
the committee.
(2) The research must:
(a) Utilize existing state and national research to analyze
relevant baseline data and trends. The data analysis must identify
those characteristics of transportation and finance that influence
alternative funding methods. The research must update and conduct
original data analysis where existing research data is not adequate.
The analysis must include, but is not limited to:
(i) Update data and financial forecasts relative to: Energy price
and availability volatility; energy trends; vehicle characteristics and
pool trends; usage; and environmental initiatives; and
(ii) Use characteristics and trends of: State and local
transportation systems; rural and urban transportation systems; and
mode.
(b) Use existing state and national research to assess funding
methods with regard to implementation feasibility, practicality, and
sustainability. The research must update and conduct original data
analysis where existing research data is not adequate. The analysis of
funding methods must include, but is not limited to:
(i) Relationship to funding, energy, environment, and mobility
policy objectives;
(ii) Relationship to users and general population;
(iii) Simplicity and transparency;
(iv) Sustainability, revenue adequacy, and administration costs;
(v) Institutional requirements and governmental roles;
(vi) Technology; and
(vii) Privacy and equity.
(3) Performance and evaluation criteria must be developed to
analyze alternative funding strategies. The criteria must take into
account existing and emerging policy objectives regarding funding,
energy, environment, and mobility.
(4) The committee shall develop planning level strategic funding
alternatives strategies. The strategies must:
(a) Be developed to a planning level that allows for comparative
analysis of alternatives based on the performance and evaluation
criteria;
(b) Provide incremental options; and
(c) Include a scaled testing approach.
(5)(a) The research and analysis is intended to be an iterative
process based on direction from the committee. The intent is to
provide a series of research and analysis over the biennium to inform
the discussion and help facilitate the development and possible
implementations of alternative transportation funding methods.
(b) The activities and schedule of the research and analysis must
be managed by the committee, which must set and approve the scope and
schedule of the project.
(6) Baseline data and methods assessment must be completed by
December 31, 2009.
(7) Performance criteria must be developed by June 30, 2010.
(8) Planning level strategic funding alternatives strategies must
be completed by December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---