BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the total
acreage of forest land owned and managed by small forest landowners is
diminishing at an alarming rate. Approximately one hundred thousand
acres of private working forest land is lost annually to conversion of
the land to a nonforestry land use. The loss of forest land has a
direct negative impact on fish, wildlife, water quality, water
resources, and the ecology of the state's watersheds and near shore
marine environments. Conversion of working lands out of forestry also
directly effects the livability of the state's rural and urban
communities and limits the state's ability to restore the ecology of
Puget Sound and address the environmental effects of climate change.
(2) The legislature further finds that the current forest practices
regulations have resulted in an unanticipated disproportionate economic
impact on small forest landowners. The current regulations, coupled
with the continued population growth of the state, have resulted in an
increasing number of small forest landowners being forced to convert
their land to nonforestry uses.
(3) The legislature further finds that the forest and fish law,
adopted in 1999, envisioned a path by which small forest landowners
could satisfy environmental protections by implementing forest
practices that differ from the default forest practices rules. Lewis
county, together with a nonprofit partner, has developed an alternate
approach for the small forest landowners living within its jurisdiction
to satisfy the environmental safeguards of the current forest practices
rules in a document entitled the "Family Forest Habitat Conservation
Plan." This plan details alternate harvest restrictions that are
specifically tailored to the unique local geography of Lewis county and
are designed to be the equivalent of the environmental protections of
the default forest practices rules while providing a lower
administrative burden to small forest landowners.
(4) It is the intent of this act to reaffirm the legislature's
commitment to assisting small forest landowners to keep their land in
active working forestry and to recognize that the alternate harvest
restrictions developed by Lewis county in the family forest habitat
conservation plan represents the commitment to science and to the
protection of aquatic life originally envisioned in alternate harvest
restrictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.368 and 2002 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends that small forest landowners have
access to alternate plan processes or alternate harvest restrictions,
or both if necessary, that meet the public resource protection standard
set forth in RCW 76.09.370(3), but which also lowers the overall cost
of regulation to small forest landowners including, but not limited to,
timber value forgone, layout costs, and operating costs.
(2) The forest practices board shall consult with the small forest
landowner office advisory committee in developing these alternate
approaches. ((By July 1, 2003, the forest practices board shall
provide the legislature with a written report that describes the
board's progress in developing alternate plan processes or alternate
harvest restrictions, or both if necessary, that meet legislative
intent.))
(3) As used in this section((,)) the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Small forest landowner" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
76.13.120(2).
(b) "Alternate harvest restrictions" means geographically
appropriate restrictions on forest practices that differ from the
default forest practices rules. Examples of acceptable alternate
harvest restrictions include restrictions found in:
(i) Federally approved habitat conservation plans;
(ii) State-approved alternative plans; and
(iii) The family forest habitat conservation plan submitted by
Lewis county and a nonprofit partner on January 12, 2009, to the United
States fish and wildlife service and the national oceanic and
atmospheric administration.

--- END ---