BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to regulate soil
science and wetland science as professions by establishing minimum
standards of ethical conduct and professional responsibility and by
establishing professional education and experience requirements for
those persons representing to the public that they are soil scientists
or wetland scientists certified by the state. This chapter may not be
construed to require a farmer or rancher to seek clearance from a soil
scientist in order to undertake an agricultural activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certifying organizations" means the two national organizations
that certify soil scientists and the one national organization that
certifies wetland scientists. For soil scientists, the certifying
organizations are the soil science society of America and the national
society of consulting soil scientists. For wetland scientists, the
certifying organization is the society of wetland scientists
professional certification program.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of licensing.
(4) "Holder" means a person who has been issued a certificate under
this chapter.
(5) "Responsible charge" means the exercise of fully independent
control and direction of soil science or wetland science work, or both,
or the supervision of such work, and being fully responsible,
answerable, accountable, or liable for the results.
(6) "Soil" means a living ecosystem that is composed of living and
once-living organic materials combined with inorganic mineral materials
derived from the break down and weathering of rocks at the earth's
surface. Soil develops as a result of weathering processes that
reflect effects of climate, topography, and biology acting on the
original parent material over time. Soil extends from the surface of
the earth down to undifferentiated or unweathered parent material.
(7)(a) "Soil science" means the science that:
(i) Involves the study of various aspects of the living soil
ecosystem and includes the following focused subject areas:
(A) Soil physics;
(B) Soil chemistry and mineralogy;
(C) Soil biochemistry;
(D) Soil fertility; and
(E) Soil genesis, morphology, and classification; and
(ii) Can be used to provide information for projects including, but
not limited to, the following:
(A) Management of water quantity by utilizing infiltration and
percolation capabilities on a soil-specific basis;
(B) Treatment of polluted water using soil microbial populations
working in concert with natural soil chemistry and mineralogy;
(C) Treatment of polluted soils using soil biochemical and physical
applications;
(D) Interpretation of soil morphology that indicates a wetland
condition; and
(E) Preparation of detailed soil maps that can be used for site-specific soil management, such as erosion control plans.
(b) "Soil science" does not include the study, description, and
amelioration of all unconsolidated materials above bedrock or soils as
defined by the unified soil classification system of American standard
testing method and performed by foresters, geologists, and engineers.
(8) "Soil scientist" means a person who, by reason of the person's
knowledge of soil science, mathematics, the environment, and the
supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by education and
practical experience, has met the qualifications established under this
chapter, and has been issued a certificate as a soil scientist by the
director.
(9) "Wetland" means an area that:
(a) Predominantly supports wetland vegetation;
(b) Has hydric soils; and
(c) Has wetland hydrology, as defined in RCW 90.58.030.
(10) "Wetland science" means the science that:
(a) Studies wetland systems and includes, but is not limited to,
the following focused subject areas:
(i) Wetland delineation, which is the formal identification and
marking of the wetland boundary on the land surface;
(ii) Wetland mitigation, which describes compensation to offset
wetland or wetland buffer losses as required by federal, state, or
local regulations;
(iii) Wetland classification, which defines and groups wetlands
into discrete ecologically or geomorphically based units which are used
to create management plans or to rate wetlands;
(iv) Wetland rating, which is used to evaluate a wetland's quality
based on individual functions and values; and
(v) Wetland ecology, which evaluates the interrelationship of
organisms and their wetland environments; and
(b) Can be used to provide information for projects including, but
not limited to, the following:
(i) Defining legally developable portions of a property, as might
be limited by wetland or stream presence; or
(ii) Assessing wetland type for purposes of compensation or
mitigation.
(11) "Wetland scientist" means a person who, by reason of the
person's knowledge of wetland science, mathematics, the environment,
and the supporting physical and life sciences, acquired by education
and practical experience, has met the qualifications established under
this chapter, and has been issued a certificate as a wetland scientist
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, it is unlawful for a person to use in connection with the
person's name or otherwise assume or advertise the title soil
scientist, soil classifier, wetland scientist, wetland delineator,
wetland biologist, or wetland ecologist, or a title conveying the
impression that the person is a state-certified soil scientist or
state-certified wetland scientist unless the person has received the
appropriate certification under this chapter.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Officers and employees of the United States using the title of
soil scientist or wetland scientist solely as such officers or
employees;
(b) Persons using the title of soil scientist or wetland scientist
on manuscripts or reports resulting from research at an academic
institution; and
(c) Persons using the title of soil scientist or wetland scientist
while teaching soil science or wetland science or related physical or
natural sciences in an academic institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Whether a person or entity hires or does not
hire a person certified under this chapter is not admissible in an
action for damages or negligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The director has the following authority in
administering this chapter:
(1) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086;
(2) To adopt rules necessary to carry out this chapter;
(3) To establish the minimum qualifications for applicants for
certification as provided by this chapter, including establishing
additional certifying organizations;
(4) To adopt standards of professional conduct and practice;
(5) To review and investigate complaints made under this chapter
and take disciplinary action for violations of this chapter as provided
in chapter 18.235 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) To become a certified soil scientist or
certified wetland scientist, an applicant must meet the requirements of
this section:
(a) For a soil scientist, the applicant must be a certified
professional soil scientist or a certified professional soil classifier
through the soil science society of America, or a registered
professional soil scientist through the national society of consulting
soil scientists or other similar organization established by rule by
the director;
(b) For a wetland scientist, the applicant must be a certified
professional wetland scientist through the society of wetland
scientists professional certification program or other similar
organization established by rule by the director.
(2) The director shall periodically evaluate the certification
programs in subsection (1) of this section to assure standards of
eligibility and performance are maintained in accordance with rules
adopted under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 An application for certification must be
filed with the director on a form provided by the director and must
contain evidence demonstrating the applicant's certification with the
certifying organizations described in section 6 of this act. The
director may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
criteria for certification. The application fee for initial
certification must be determined by the director as provided in RCW
43.24.086. The application, together with the fee, must be submitted
to the department prior to the application deadline established by the
director. Fees for initial certification include issuance of a
certificate and are nonrefundable. Nothing in this section requires
applicants to maintain membership in any of the certifying
organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The director shall issue a certificate
to any applicant who has satisfactorily met all of the requirements of
this chapter for certification as a soil scientist or wetland
scientist. The certificate must show the full name of the holder, have
a unique certification number, and be signed by the director. The
issuance by the director of a certificate to an individual is prima
facie evidence that the person is entitled to all the rights and
privileges of a Washington state certified soil scientist or a
Washington state certified wetland scientist while the certificate
remains unrevoked or unexpired.
(2) Each holder must obtain a seal of the design authorized by the
director, bearing the holder's name, certification number, and the
legend "Washington state certified soil scientist" or "Washington state
certified wetland scientist." Soil science or wetland science reports,
plans, and other technical documents prepared by or under the
responsible charge of the holder must be signed, dated, and stamped
with the seal or facsimile of the seal. Each signature and stamping
constitutes a certification by the holder that the document was
prepared by or under the holder's responsible charge and that, to the
holder's knowledge and belief, the document was prepared in accordance
with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The director may, upon application and
payment of a fee determined by the director as provided in RCW
43.24.086, issue a certificate to any person who holds valid
credentials issued by the proper authority of any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, District of Columbia, or any foreign
country, if the applicant's qualifications, as evaluated by the
director, meet the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted
by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The director shall require persons
certified under this chapter to obtain continuing professional
development or continuing education. The director may also require
these certificate holders to demonstrate maintenance of knowledge and
skills as a condition of certificate renewal, including peer review of
work products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Certificates issued under this chapter must
be renewed periodically on a date to be set by the director. Fees for
renewals must be set by the director by rule as provided in RCW
43.24.086. Any holder who fails to pay the prescribed fee must have
his or her certificate classified as invalid. Certificate holders who
fail to pay the renewal fee within thirty days of the due date shall
pay a penalty fee equal to one year's renewal. Any certificate that
has been expired for five years or more may be reinstated in
conformance with rules adopted by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 All receipts from fees and fines collected
under this chapter must be deposited into the business and professions
account described in RCW 43.24.150. Expenditures from the fees and
fines collected under this chapter deposited in the account may be used
only for the purposes of administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 In addition to the unprofessional conduct
described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, and
conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules
adopted under this chapter;
(2) Suspension, revocation, or restrictions of certification
through the certifying groups described in section 6 of this act;
(3) Committing any other act, or failing to act, in a manner
contrary to normal professional conduct or contrary to a standard
generally expected of those practicing soil science or wetland science;
(4) Failing to comply with the terms and conditions of an order
issued by the director;
(5) Failing to respond to inquiries from clients or other
professionals regarding conflicts with the holder's work, opinions, or
procedures, in a manner that would be expected from a prudent
practitioner;
(6) Modifying another holder's work without notifying that holder
and clearly describing the modifications in writing and signing the
report describing the modifications. However, this subsection does not
apply when the plans, maps, or documents are modified by the owner to
reflect changes over time for the owner's own purposes and are not used
for submittals or bid documents;
(7) Offering or accepting money, goods, or other favors as
inducement to receive favorable consideration for a professional
assignment or as an inducement to approve, authorize, or influence the
granting of a professional assignment;
(8) Soliciting or accepting gratuities, directly or indirectly,
from contractors, their agents, or other parties dealing with clients
or employers in connection with work for which the holder is
responsible;
(9) Using privileged information coming to the holder in the course
of his or her assignments as a means of making personal profit beyond
their professional compensation;
(10) Requesting, proposing, or accepting professional commissions
on a contingent basis under circumstances in which the holder's
integrity may be compromised;
(11) Willfully attempting to interfere with a director's
investigation by falsifying records, making false statements, or
intimidating or influencing witnesses; or
(12) Willfully attempting to suborn another person to violate the
law, public policy, or his or her code of professional ethics.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The director shall immediately suspend the
certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW
74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a child support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for a certificate under this
chapter during the suspension, reissuance of the certificate must be
automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the holder is in
compliance with the child support order. The procedure in RCW
74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy for contesting the
establishment of noncompliance with a child support order, and
suspension of a certificate under this section, and satisfies the
requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The director shall suspend the certificate
or registration of any person who has been certified by a lending
agency and reported to the department for nonpayment or default on a
federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional
scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the agency must provide the
person an opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW
34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or
default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-
conditional scholarship. The person's certificate or registration may
not be reissued until the person provides the director a written
release issued by the lending agency stating that the person is making
payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement approved
by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for certification or registration during the suspension,
reinstatement is automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of
any reinstatement fee the director may impose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The uniform regulation of business and
professions act, chapter 18.235 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of
certificates, and the discipline of holders under this chapter.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.235.020 and 2008 c 119 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the director and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the businesses and
professions licensed under the chapters specified in this section.
This chapter does not apply to any business or profession not licensed
under the chapters specified in this section.
(2)(a) The director has authority under this chapter in relation to
the following businesses and professions:
(i) Auctioneers under chapter 18.11 RCW;
(ii) Bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents under chapter
18.185 RCW;
(iii) Camping resorts' operators and salespersons under chapter
19.105 RCW;
(iv) Commercial telephone solicitors under chapter 19.158 RCW;
(v) Cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, and estheticians under
chapter 18.16 RCW;
(vi) Court reporters under chapter 18.145 RCW;
(vii) Driver training schools and instructors under chapter 46.82
RCW;
(viii) Employment agencies under chapter 19.31 RCW;
(ix) For hire vehicle operators under chapter 46.72 RCW;
(x) Limousines under chapter 46.72A RCW;
(xi) Notaries public under chapter 42.44 RCW;
(xii) Private investigators under chapter 18.165 RCW;
(xiii) Professional boxing, martial arts, and wrestling under
chapter 67.08 RCW;
(xiv) Real estate appraisers under chapter 18.140 RCW;
(xv) Real estate brokers and salespersons under chapters 18.85 and
18.86 RCW;
(xvi) Security guards under chapter 18.170 RCW;
(xvii) Sellers of travel under chapter 19.138 RCW;
(xviii) Timeshares and timeshare salespersons under chapter 64.36
RCW;
(xix) Whitewater river outfitters under chapter 79A.60 RCW; ((and))
(xx) Home inspectors under chapter 18.280 RCW; and
(xxi) Soil scientists and wetland scientists under chapter 18.--RCW (the new chapter created in section 20 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The state board of registration for architects established in
chapter 18.08 RCW;
(ii) The cemetery board established in chapter 68.05 RCW;
(iii) The Washington state collection agency board established in
chapter 19.16 RCW;
(iv) The state board of registration for professional engineers and
land surveyors established in chapter 18.43 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.43 and 18.210 RCW;
(v) The state board of funeral directors and embalmers established
in chapter 18.39 RCW;
(vi) The state board of registration for landscape architects
established in chapter 18.96 RCW; and
(vii) The state geologist licensing board established in chapter
18.220 RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplinary authority may grant or deny licenses based on the
conditions and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters
specified in subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs
any investigation, hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of
licensure or issuance of a license conditioned on the applicant's
compliance with an order entered under RCW 18.235.110 by the
disciplinary authority.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.24.150 and 2008 c 119 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.96 RCW, landscape architects;
(d) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(e) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(f) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(g) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(h) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;
(i) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(k) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(l) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(m) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public; ((and))
(n) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares; and
(o) Chapter 18.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 20 of
this act).
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account ((shall)) must be accumulated
and ((shall)) may not revert to the general fund at the end of the
biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
((shall)) must include the estimated income from these business and
professions fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 16 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 3, 4, 8 through 10, and 13 through
17 of this act take effect July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The director of the department of licensing
may take the necessary steps to ensure that sections 3, 4, 8 through
10, and 13 through 17 of this act are implemented by July 1, 2011.

--- END ---