BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.72.030 and 2007 c 364 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public guardianship administrator is authorized to establish
and administer a public guardianship program as follows:
(1)(a) The office shall contract with public or private entities or
individuals to provide public guardianship services to persons age
eighteen or older whose income does not exceed two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level determined annually by the United States
department of health and human services or who are receiving long-term
care services through the Washington state department of social and
health services. Neither the public guardianship administrator nor the
office may act as public guardian or limited guardian or act in any
other representative capacity for any individual.
(b) The office is exempt from RCW 39.29.008 because the primary
function of the office is to contract for public guardianship services
that are provided in a manner consistent with the requirements of this
chapter. The office shall otherwise comply with chapter 39.29 RCW and
is subject to audit by the state auditor.
(c) Public guardianship service contracts are dependent upon
legislative appropriation. This chapter does not create an
entitlement.
(d) The initial implementation of public guardianship services
shall be on a pilot basis in a minimum of two geographical areas that
include one urban area and one rural area. There may be one or several
contracts in each area.
(2) The office shall, within one year of the commencement of its
operation, adopt eligibility criteria to enable it to serve individuals
with the greatest need when the number of cases in which courts propose
to appoint a public guardian exceeds the number of cases in which
public guardianship services can be provided. In adopting such
criteria, the office may consider factors including, but not limited
to, the following: Whether an incapacitated individual is at
significant risk of harm from abuse, exploitation, abandonment,
neglect, or self-neglect; and whether an incapacitated person is in
imminent danger of loss or significant reduction in public services
that are necessary for the individual to live successfully in the most
integrated and least restrictive environment that is appropriate in
light of the individual's needs and values.
(3) The office shall adopt minimum standards of practice for public
guardians providing public guardianship services. Any public guardian
providing such services must be certified by the certified professional
guardian board established by the supreme court.
(4) The office shall require a public guardian to visit each
incapacitated person for which public guardianship services are
provided no less than monthly to be eligible for compensation.
(5) The office shall not petition for appointment of a public
guardian for any individual. It may develop((, and shall consult with
the advisory committee regarding the need to develop,)) a proposal for
the legislature to make affordable legal assistance available to
petition for guardianships.
(6) The office shall not authorize payment for services for any
entity that is serving more than twenty incapacitated persons per
certified professional guardian.
(7) The office shall monitor and oversee the use of state funding
to ensure compliance with this chapter.
(8) The office shall collect uniform and consistent basic data
elements regarding service delivery. This data shall be made available
to the legislature and supreme court in a format that is not
identifiable by individual incapacitated person to protect
confidentiality.
(9) The office shall report to the legislature on how services
other than guardianship services, and in particular services that might
reduce the need for guardianship services, might be provided under
contract with the office by December 1, 2009. The services to be
considered should include, but not be limited to, services provided
under powers of attorney given by the individuals in need of the
services.
(10) The office shall require public guardianship providers to seek
reimbursement of fees from program clients who are receiving long-term
care services through the department of social and health services to
the extent, and only to the extent, that such reimbursement may be
paid, consistent with an order of the superior court, from income that
would otherwise be required by the department to be paid toward the
cost of the client's care. Fees reimbursed shall be remitted by the
provider to the office unless a different disposition is directed by
the public guardianship administrator.
(11) The office shall require public guardianship providers to
certify annually that for each individual served they have reviewed the
need for continued public guardianship services and the appropriateness
of limiting, or further limiting, the authority of the public guardian
under the applicable guardianship order, and that where termination or
modification of a guardianship order appears warranted, the superior
court has been asked to take the corresponding action.
(12) The office shall adopt a process for receipt and consideration
of and response to complaints against the office and contracted
providers of public guardianship services. The process shall include
investigation in cases in which investigation appears warranted in the
judgment of the administrator. ((The office shall provide the advisory
committee with a summary and analysis of the results of these
complaints. When requested by the complaining party, his or her
identity shall not be disclosed to the advisory committee created under
section 5 of this act.))
(13) The office shall contract with the Washington state institute
for public policy for a study. An initial report is due two years
following July 22, 2007, and a second report by December 1, 2011. The
study shall analyze costs and off-setting savings to the state from the
delivery of public guardianship services.
(14) The office shall develop standardized forms and reporting
instruments that may include, but are not limited to, intake, initial
assessment, guardianship care plan, decisional accounting, staff time
logs, changes in condition or abilities of an incapacitated person, and
values history. The office shall collect and analyze the data gathered
from these reports ((and submit it to the advisory committee
periodically)).
(15) The office shall identify training needs for guardians it
contracts with, and shall make recommendations((, after consultation
with the advisory committee,)) to the supreme court, the certified
professional guardian board, and the legislature for improvements in
guardianship training. The office may offer training to individuals
providing services pursuant to this chapter or to individuals who, in
the judgment of the administrator or the administrator's designee, are
likely to provide such services in the future.
(16) The office shall establish a system for monitoring the
performance of public guardians, and office staff shall make in-home
visits to a randomly selected sample of public guardianship clients.
The office may conduct further monitoring, including in-home visits, as
the administrator deems appropriate. For monitoring purposes, office
staff shall have access to any information relating to a public
guardianship client that is available to the guardian. ((The office
shall confer with the advisory committee in developing its monitoring
process.))
(17) During the first five years of its operations, the office
shall issue annual reports of its activities((, after review of and
comment by the advisory committee)).

--- END ---