BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.631 and 1984 c 209 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence, a community corrections officer may arrest or cause the
arrest of the offender without a warrant, pending a determination by
the court or a department of corrections hearing officer.
(2) If there is reasonable cause to believe that an offender has
violated a condition or requirement of the sentence, an offender may be
required to submit to a search and seizure of the offender's person,
residence, automobile, or other personal property.
(3) A community corrections officer may also arrest an offender for
any crime committed in his or her presence. The facts and
circumstances of the conduct of the offender shall be reported by the
community corrections officer, with recommendations, to the court or
department of corrections hearing officer.
(4) For the safety and security of department staff, an offender
may be required to submit to pat searches or other limited security
searches by community corrections officers, correctional officers, and
other agency approved staff, without reasonable cause, when present on
department premises. Except in emergency situations, pat searches of
offenders shall be conducted by staff of like gender.
(5) If a community corrections officer arrests or causes the arrest
of an offender under this section, the offender shall be confined and
detained in the county jail of the county in which the offender was
taken into custody, and the sheriff of that county shall receive and
keep in the county jail, where room is available, all prisoners
delivered to the jail by the community corrections officer, and such
offenders shall not be released from custody on bail or personal
recognizance, except upon approval of the court or authorized
department staff, pursuant to a written order.

--- END ---