BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2006 c 339 s 302 and 2006 c 73 s 10 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a sentence under this section may be made by the
court, the offender, or the state. ((If the sentencing court
determines that the offender is eligible for this alternative, the
court may order an examination of the offender. The examination shall,
at a minimum, address the following issues:
(a) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(b) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(c) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(d) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(3) The examination report must contain:
(a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(iv) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(4) After receipt of the examination report,)) (3) If the
sentencing court determines that the offender is eligible for this
alternative and that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the
court shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence
range and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based
alternative under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section or a
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under
subsection (((6))) (5) of this section. If the court is considering
the residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under
subsection (5) of this section, then the court may order an examination
of the offender as described in subsection (5) of this section. The
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative is only
available if the midpoint of the standard range is twenty-four months
or less.
(((5))) (4) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months,
whichever is greater. During incarceration in the state facility,
offenders sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive
substance abuse assessment and receive, within available resources,
treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment
services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation
with the department of corrections;
(b) ((The remainder of)) One-half the midpoint of the standard
range as a term of community custody which must include appropriate
substance abuse treatment in a program that has been approved by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services. If the department finds that conditions have been
willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the
remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails to
complete the program or who is administratively terminated from the
program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.715 to be
imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the
special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(((6))) (5)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence
under the residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
in this subsection, then the court may order an examination of the
offender. The examination shall, at a minimum, address the following
issues:
(i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(iii) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(iv) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(b) The examination report must also contain:
(i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(c) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(((a))) (i) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the
midpoint of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is
greater, conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in
residential chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter
70.96A RCW for a period set by the court between three and six months.
If the court imposes a term of community custody, the department shall,
within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and
treatment services available to the offender during the term of
community custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community
custody, treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under
((subsection (3)))(b) of this ((section)) subsection. The department
may impose conditions and sanctions as authorized in RCW 9.94A.715 (2),
(3), (6), and (7), 9.94A.737, and 9.94A.740. If the court imposes a
sentence under this subsection, then the treatment provider will be
required to send the treatment plan to the court within thirty days of
the offender's arrival to the residential chemical dependency treatment
program. The court shall schedule a progress hearing during the period
of residential chemical dependency treatment, and schedule a treatment
termination hearing for three months before the expiration of the term
of community custody;
(((b))) (ii) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination
hearing, the treatment provider and the department shall submit written
reports to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance
with treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations
regarding termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(((i))) (A) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's
community custody status on the expiration date determined under (((a)
of this)) subsection (5)(c)(i) of this section; or
(((ii))) (B) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration
date of community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(((iii))) (C) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half
the midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.715;
(((c))) (iii) If the court imposes a term of total confinement
under (((b)(iii))) (c)(ii) of this subsection, the department shall,
within available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and
treatment services available to the offender during the terms of total
confinement and community custody.
(((7))) (6) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the
court may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled
substances and may require that the monitoring for controlled
substances be conducted by the department or by a treatment
alternatives to street crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be required to pay thirty dollars
per month while on community custody to offset the cost of monitoring.
In addition, the court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) Devote time to a specific employment or training;
(b) Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the
court or the community corrections officer before any change in the
offender's address or employment;
(c) Report as directed to a community corrections officer;
(d) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;
(e) Perform community restitution work;
(f) Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing court;
(g) Such other conditions as the court may require such as
affirmative conditions.
(((8))) (7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under
this section back into court at any time on its own initiative to
evaluate the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any
violations of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the terms of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c) of
this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions of the sentence or if the offender is failing
to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(((9))) (8) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based
alternative under subsection (((5))) (4) of this section is found by
the United States attorney general to be subject to a deportation
order, a hearing shall be held by the department unless waived by the
offender, and, if the department finds that the offender is subject to
a valid deportation order, the department may administratively
terminate the offender from the program and reclassify the offender to
serve the remaining balance of the original sentence.
(((10))) (9) An offender sentenced under this section shall be
subject to all rules relating to earned release time with respect to
any period served in total confinement.
(((11))) (10) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans
under ((subsections (2) and (3) of)) this section may be paid, at the
option of the county, from funds provided to the county from the
criminal justice treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2008 c 231 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation
under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of
the particular controlled substance as determined by the judge upon
consideration of such factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale
price, and street value of the controlled substance;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The standard sentence range for the current offense is greater
than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a ((sentence under this section)) special drug
offender sentencing alternative may be made by the court, the offender,
or the state.
(3) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is
eligible for ((this)) an alternative sentence under this section and
that the alternative sentence is appropriate, the court shall waive
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose
a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative under
section 3 of this act or a residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under section 4 of this act. The residential
chemical dependency treatment-based alternative is only available if
the midpoint of the standard range is twenty-four months or less.
(4)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence under the
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative, the court
may order an examination of the offender. The examination shall, at a
minimum, address the following issues:
(((a))) (i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(((b))) (ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a
probability that criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(((c))) (iii) Whether effective treatment for the offender's
addiction is available from a provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services; and
(((d))) (iv) Whether the offender and the community will benefit
from the use of the alternative.
(((3))) (b) The examination report must contain:
(((a) Information on the issues required to be addressed in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) A proposed treatment plan that must, at a minimum, contain:
(i) A proposed treatment provider that has been licensed or
certified by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;
(ii) The recommended frequency and length of treatment, including
both residential chemical dependency treatment and treatment in the
community;
(iii))) (i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(((iv))) (ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and
affirmative conditions.
(((4) After receipt of the examination report, if the court
determines that a sentence under this section is appropriate, the court
shall waive imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range
and impose a sentence consisting of either a prison-based alternative
under subsection (5) of this section or a residential chemical
dependency treatment-based alternative under subsection (6) of this
section. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
twenty-four months or less.
(5) The prison-based alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
of the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months,
whichever is greater. During incarceration in the state facility,
offenders sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive
substance abuse assessment and receive, within available resources,
treatment services appropriate for the offender. The treatment
services shall be designed by the division of alcohol and substance
abuse of the department of social and health services, in cooperation
with the department of corrections;
(b) The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term
of community custody which must include appropriate substance abuse
treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services. If the department finds that conditions of community custody
have been willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve
the remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails
to complete the program or who is administratively terminated from the
program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 to be
imposed upon failure to complete or administrative termination from the
special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(6) The residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative
shall include:
(a) A term of community custody equal to one-half of the midpoint
of the standard sentence range or two years, whichever is greater,
conditioned on the offender entering and remaining in residential
chemical dependency treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a
period set by the court between three and six months. If the court
imposes a term of community custody, the department shall, within
available resources, make chemical dependency assessment and treatment
services available to the offender during the term of community
custody. The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the plan under subsection
(3)(b) of this section. The court shall schedule a progress hearing
during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment, and
schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before the
expiration of the term of community custody;
(b) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment. At the hearing, the court may:
(i) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under (a) of this
subsection; or
(ii) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(iii) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.701;
(c) If the court imposes a term of total confinement under (b)(iii)
of this subsection, the department shall, within available resources,
make chemical dependency assessment and treatment services available to
the offender during the terms of total confinement and community
custody.
(7) The)) (5) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody
under this section:
(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703
and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers
appropriate. In addition, an offender may be required to pay thirty
dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of
monitoring for alcohol or controlled substances.
(((8) The court may impose any of the following conditions:
(a) Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations; or
(b) Perform community restitution work.
(9)(a))) (b) The department may impose conditions and sanctions as
authorized in RCW 9.94A.704 and RCW 9.94A.737.
(6)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate
the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations
of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c)
of this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the
offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(((10))) (7) In serving a term of community custody imposed upon
failure to complete, or administrative termination from, the special
drug offender sentencing alternative program, the offender shall
receive no credit for time served in community custody prior to
termination of the offender's participation in the program.
(((11) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative
under subsection (5) of this section is found by the United States
attorney general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall
be held by the department unless waived by the offender, and, if the
department finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation
order, the department may administratively terminate the offender from
the program and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance
of the original sentence.
(12))) (8) An offender sentenced under this section shall be
subject to all rules relating to earned release time with respect to
any period served in total confinement.
(((13))) (9) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans
under ((subsections (2) and (3) of this section)) a special drug
offender sentencing alternative may be paid, at the option of the
county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal justice
treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A sentence for a prison-based special
drug offender sentencing alternative shall include:
(a) A period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half
the midpoint of the standard sentence range or twelve months, whichever
is greater;
(b) One-half the midpoint of the standard sentence range as a term
of community custody, which must include appropriate substance abuse
treatment in a program that has been approved by the division of
alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services;
(c) Crime-related prohibitions, including a condition not to use
illegal controlled substances;
(d) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor that status; and
(e) A term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 to be
imposed upon the failure to complete or administrative termination from
the special drug offender sentencing alternative program.
(2) During incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced
under this section shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse
assessment and receive, within available resources, treatment services
appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed
by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of
social and health services, in cooperation with the department of
corrections.
(3) If the department finds that conditions of community custody
have been willfully violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve
the remaining balance of the original sentence. An offender who fails
to complete the program or who is administratively terminated from the
program shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her
sentence as ordered by the sentencing court.
(4) If an offender sentenced to the prison-based alternative under
this section is found by the United States attorney general to be
subject to a deportation order, a hearing shall be held by the
department unless waived by the offender, and, if the department finds
that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order, the
department may administratively terminate the offender from the program
and reclassify the offender to serve the remaining balance of the
original sentence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A sentence for a residential chemical
dependency treatment-based alternative shall include a term of
community custody equal to one-half the midpoint of the standard
sentence range or two years, whichever is greater, conditioned on the
offender entering and remaining in residential chemical dependency
treatment certified under chapter 70.96A RCW for a period set by the
court between three and six months.
(2)(a) The court shall impose, as conditions of community custody,
treatment and other conditions as proposed in the examination report
completed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660.
(b) If the court imposes a term of community custody, the
department shall, within available resources, make chemical dependency
assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the
term of community custody.
(3)(a) If the court imposes a sentence under this section, the
treatment provider must send the treatment plan to the court within
thirty days of the offender's arrival to the residential chemical
dependency treatment program.
(b) Upon receipt of the plan, the court shall schedule a progress
hearing during the period of residential chemical dependency treatment,
and schedule a treatment termination hearing for three months before
the expiration of the term of community custody;
(c) Before the progress hearing and treatment termination hearing,
the treatment provider and the department shall submit written reports
to the court and parties regarding the offender's compliance with
treatment and monitoring requirements, and recommendations regarding
termination from treatment.
(4) At a progress hearing or treatment termination hearing, the
court may:
(a) Authorize the department to terminate the offender's community
custody status on the expiration date determined under subsection (1)
of this section;
(b) Continue the hearing to a date before the expiration date of
community custody, with or without modifying the conditions of
community custody; or
(c) Impose a term of total confinement equal to one-half the
midpoint of the standard sentence range, followed by a term of
community custody under RCW 9.94A.701.
(5) If the court imposes a term of total confinement, the
department shall, within available resources, make chemical dependency
assessment and treatment services available to the offender during the
term of total confinement and subsequent term of community custody.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act are each added
to chapter 9.94A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect
August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 1 of this act expires August 1,
2009.

--- END ---