BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.38.090 and 1991 c 349 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the governing body of a special district has more than
three members, the governing body shall be reduced to three members as
of January 1, 1986, by eliminating the positions of those district
governing body members with the shortest remaining terms of office.
The remaining three governing body members shall have staggered terms
with the one having the shortest remaining term having his or her
position filled at the 1987 special district general election, the one
with the next shortest remaining term having his or her position filled
at the 1989 special district general election, and the one with the
longest remaining term having his or her position filled at the 1992
special district general election. If any of these remaining three
governing body members have identical remaining terms of office, the
newly calculated remaining terms of these persons shall be determined
by lot with the county auditor who assists the special district in its
elections managing such lot procedure. The newly established terms
shall be recorded by the county auditor.
(2) However, whenever five or more special districts have
consolidated under chapter 85.36 RCW and the consolidated district has
five members in its governing body on July 28, 1985, the consolidated
district may adopt a resolution retaining a five-member governing body.
At any time thereafter, such a district may adopt a resolution and
reduce the size of the governing body to three members with the
reduction occurring as provided in subsection (1) of this section, but
the years of the effective dates shall be extended so that the
reduction occurs at the next January 1st occurring after the date of
the adoption of the resolution. Whenever a special district is so
governed by a five-member governing body, two members shall be elected
at each of two consecutive special district general elections, and one
member shall be elected at the following special district general
election, each to serve a six-year staggered term.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to flood
districts that contain three or more counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 85.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The following applies to flood districts that contain three or more
counties:
(1) The governing body shall include one member from each county
and two additional governing members. No more than two governing
members may be from one county.
(2) The initial members of the governing body must be chosen by
each county legislative authority, with each county choosing one
member, and the counties with the two largest populations within the
special flood district choosing one member each. These initial
governing body members shall serve until their successors are elected
and qualified at the next special district general election.
(3) At this first election, the members receiving the two greatest
number of votes shall serve six-year terms, the members receiving the
third and fourth greatest number of votes shall serve four-year terms,
and the remaining members shall serve two-year terms of office.
(4) The requirements for the filing period and method for filing
declarations of candidacy for the governing body of the district and
the arrangement of candidate names on the ballot for all special
district elections conducted after the initial election in the district
shall be the same as the requirements for the initial election in the
district. No primary elections may be held for the governing body of
a special district.
(5)(a) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the governing body, the
legislative authority of the county within which the largest portion of
the special flood district is located shall appoint a district voter to
serve until a person is elected, at the next special district general
election occurring sixty or more days after the vacancy has occurred,
to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. The person so elected
shall take office immediately when qualified as defined in RCW
29A.04.133.
(b) If an election for the position which became vacant would
otherwise have been held at this special district election, only one
election shall be held and the person elected to fill the succeeding
term for that position shall take office immediately when qualified as
defined in RCW 29A.04.133 and shall serve both the remainder of the
unexpired term and the succeeding term. A vacancy occurs upon the
death, resignation, or incapacity of a governing body member or
whenever the governing body member ceases being a qualified voter of
the special district.
(6) An elected or appointed member of a special district governing
body, or a candidate for a special district governing body, must be a
qualified voter of the special district: PROVIDED, That the state, its
agencies and political subdivisions, or their designees under RCW
85.38.010(3) shall not be eligible for election or appointment.

--- END ---