BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 85.38.105 and 1991 c 349 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner of land located in a special district who is a
qualified voter of the special district shall receive two votes at any
election. This section does not apply to special flood control
districts consisting of three or more counties.
(2) If multiple undivided interests, other than community property
interests, exist in a lot or parcel and no person owns a majority
undivided interest, the owners of undivided interests at least equal to
a majority interest may designate in writing:
(a) Which owner is eligible to vote and may cast two votes; or
(b) Which two owners are eligible to vote and may cast one vote
each.
(3) If land is owned as community property, each spouse is entitled
to one vote if both spouses otherwise qualify to vote, unless one
spouse designates in writing that the other spouse may cast both votes.
(4) A corporation, partnership, or governmental entity shall
designate:
(a) A natural person to cast its two votes; or
(b) Two natural persons to each cast one of its votes.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 85.08.025 and 86.09.377, no owner of
land may cast more than two votes or have more than two votes cast for
him or her in a special district election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 85.38 RCW
to read as follows:
All registered voters within a special flood control district
consisting of three or more counties are qualified voters in special
flood control district elections.

Sec. 3 RCW 29A.04.330 and 2006 c 344 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held
throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the
first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.
This section shall not apply to:
(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;
(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district
elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is
a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the
times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;
(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.235 and
nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540
RCW;
(d) Special flood control districts consisting of three or more
counties.
(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon
request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city,
town, or district, presented to the auditor prior to the proposed
election date, may call a special election in such city, town, or
district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may
combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided in subsection
(((3))) (4) of this section, such a special election shall be held on
one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:
(a) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;
(b) The second Tuesday in March;
(c) The fourth Tuesday in April;
(d) The third Tuesday in May;
(e) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29A.04.311;
or
(f) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth
in subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section must be presented to
the county auditor at least fifty-two days prior to the election date.
A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth in
subsection (2)(e) or (f) of this section must be presented to the
county auditor at least eighty-four days prior to the election date.
(4) In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference
primary is conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter
29A.56 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under
subsection (2) of this section during the month of that primary is the
date of the presidential primary.
(5) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section,
a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood,
earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be
held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and
the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than
as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section. Such special
election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner
provided by law.
(6) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all
other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different
dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this
section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

--- END ---