BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.16.100 and 1986 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the policy of this state to protect children from assault and
abuse and to encourage parents, teachers, and their authorized agents
to use methods of correction and restraint of children that are not
dangerous to the children. However, the physical discipline of a child
is not unlawful when it is reasonable and moderate and is inflicted by
a parent, teacher, or guardian for purposes of restraining or
correcting the child. Any use of force on a child by any other person
is unlawful unless it is reasonable and moderate and is authorized in
advance by the child's parent or guardian for purposes of restraining
or correcting the child.
The following actions are presumed unreasonable when used to
correct or restrain a child: (1) Throwing, kicking, burning, or
cutting a child; (2) striking a child with a closed fist; (3) shaking
a child under age three; (4) interfering with a child's breathing; (5)
threatening a child with a deadly weapon; or (6) doing any other act
that is likely to cause and which does cause bodily harm greater than
transient pain or minor temporary marks that last longer than twenty-four hours. The age, size, and condition of the child and the location
of the injury shall be considered when determining whether the bodily
harm is reasonable or moderate. This list is illustrative of
unreasonable actions and is not intended to be exclusive.

--- END ---