BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.090 and 1991 c 3 s 290 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any child shall be exempt in whole or in part from the immunization
measures required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 upon the
presentation of any one or more of the following, on a form prescribed
by the department of health:
(1) A written certification signed by any physician licensed to
practice medicine pursuant to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW that a
particular vaccine required by rule of the state board of health is, in
his or her judgment, not advisable for the child: PROVIDED, That when
it is determined that this particular vaccine is no longer
contraindicated, the child will be required to have the vaccine;
(2) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian
of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the
religious beliefs of the signator are contrary to the required
immunization measures; ((and)) or
(3) ((A written certification signed by any parent or legal
guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that
the signator has either a philosophical or personal objection to the
immunization of the child.)) The following documents, affirmed as
authentic before a notary public, acknowledging a philosophical or
personal objection to immunization and informed consent of a parent,
legal guardian, or person acting in loco parentis to the child who
rejects immunization:
(a) The signed and dated statement, of a parent, legal guardian, or
person acting in loco parentis to the child, requesting the exemption
on the basis of a philosophical or personal belief and recognizing that
a child may be prohibited from attending school during an outbreak of
a disease for which the child has not been immunized; and
(b) A signed and dated note, from a physician licensed under
chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a physician assistant licensed under
chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, or a nurse licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW, stating that the parent, legal guardian, or person acting in loco
parentis to the child received information about the benefits and risks
of immunization.

--- END ---