BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Recent increases in gasoline prices have inflated the costs of
transportation, requiring Washington families to spend more of their
income on transportation and further stretching families' limited
budgets;
(2) Consistent with chapter 348, Laws of 2007, climate change, due
in part to vehicles emitting greenhouse gases, is expected to have
significant impacts in the Pacific Northwest region in the near and
long-term future, including: Increased temperatures; declining
snowpack; more frequent heavy rainfall and flooding; receding glaciers;
rising sea levels; increased risks to public health due to insect and
rodent-borne diseases; declining salmon populations; and increased
drought and risk of forest fires;
(3) Consistent with chapter 14, Laws of 2008, the state intends to
take steps to limit and reduce emissions of greenhouse gas and reduce
emissions at the lowest cost to Washington's economy;
(4) A reduction in the average vehicle miles traveled per
Washington motorist may lead to a substantive reduction in greenhouse
gas emissions;
(5) Providing insurance-based incentives to motorists to drive less
may reduce overall vehicle miles traveled;
(6) Current state automotive insurance rates do not necessarily
reflect the actual miles that motorists drive;
(7) According to the United States environmental protection agency,
once an individual purchases a car, roughly eighty-eight percent of his
or her transportation costs remain much the same on a monthly basis
regardless of how much or how little he or she drives;
(8) The increase in traffic density from a typical additional
driver increases total statewide insurance costs of other drivers;
(9) Implementing new programs that offer insurance on a usage basis
may effectively reduce vehicle miles traveled and help the state
achieve its goals to reduce gas emissions;
(10) Verifying miles driven ensures insurance rates that more
accurately reflect vehicle miles traveled and provides incentives for
Washington drivers to reduce driving and emissions; and
(11) Verifying miles driven will better enable insurance companies
to charge accurate rates based on actual miles driven.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to private passenger automobile insurance
and commercial automobile insurance.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Recording device" means an electronic system, and the physical
device or mechanism containing the electronic system, that primarily or
incidental to its primary function, preserves or records, in electronic
form, data collected by sensors or provided by other systems within a
motor vehicle. "Recording device" includes event data recorders,
sensing and diagnostic modules, electronic control modules, automatic
crash notification systems, geographic information systems, and any
other device that records and preserves data that can be accessed
related to the usage of that motor vehicle.
(b) "Usage-based algorithm" means any algorithm or formula that is
used in the calculation of insurance rates and is based on data that is
collected from a recording device that is continuously or temporarily
installed in the insured vehicle and is not available from any other
source. A usage-based algorithm may also include adjustments
acceptable to the commissioner that are designed to prevent the
insurer's use of the algorithm from causing rates to be unfairly
discriminatory.
(c) "Usage-based insurance" means automobile insurance in which the
premium is based in part on a usage-based algorithm or other
information reflecting how the vehicle was operated in the reported
period including, but not necessarily limited to, information reported
by an insured.
(3) Before selling usage-based insurance, an insurer must file the
usage-based insurance with the commissioner and obtain the
commissioner's approval. For usage-based insurance incorporating a
usage-based algorithm:
(a) The insurer may include the usage-based algorithm in its rate
filing. In this case, the entire rate filing, including the usage-based algorithm, is open to public inspection after the filing becomes
effective as provided under RCW 48.19.040(5).
(b) Alternatively, the insurer may keep the usage-based algorithm
confidential by filing it separately from its rates and rules. In this
case, RCW 48.19.040(5) does not apply, and the usage-based algorithm is
withheld from public inspection and is considered a trade secret under
RCW 48.02.120(3).
(4) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---