BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.04.010 and 2008 c 94 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
anywhere outside Washington by a brewery or winery which does not hold
a certificate of approval issued by the board; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its exclusive authorized representative for marketing and
selling its products within the United States in accordance with a
written agreement between the authorized representative and such
brewery or winery pursuant to this title. The board may waive the
requirement for the written agreement of exclusivity in situations
consistent with the normal marketing practices of certain products,
such as classified growths.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(7) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether
by drinking or otherwise.
(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(12) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the reduced
licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(13) "Craft wine" means the product fermented at a craft winery and
regulated as wine by the federal tax and trade bureau under 27 CFR part
4.
(14) "Craft winery" means a facility described in a federal basic
permit as a bonded winery or bonded wine cellar and producing from zero
to twenty-five thousand gallons, inclusively, in any calendar year,
alone or in combination with other facilities required to be aggregated
under federal law for purposes of the federal small producer tax credit
in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5041 of the internal revenue code of 1986 as amended,
as of the effective date of this act.
(15) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((14))) (16) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((15))) (17) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((16))) (18) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((17))) (19) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((18))) (20) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((19))) (21) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(((20))) (22) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((21))) (23) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((22))) (24) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds,
having facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are
kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a
place where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for
pay to transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(((23))) (25) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((24))) (26) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((25))) (27) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((26))) (28) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((27))) (29) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((28))) (30) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.
(((29))) (31) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((30))) (32) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor
under this title.
(((31))) (33) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((32))) (34) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within
the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((33))) (35) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor
pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((34))) (36) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((35))) (37) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((36))) (38) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((37))) (39) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((38))) (40) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((39))) (41) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((40))) (42) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((41))) (43) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((42))) (44) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(((43))) (45)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage, other than
craft wine, obtained by fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries,
apples, et cetera) or other agricultural product containing sugar, to
which any saccharine substances may have been added before, during or
after fermentation, and containing not more than twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits,
such as port, sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent
of alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage
containing no more than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when
bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table
wine," and any beverage containing alcohol in an amount more than
fourteen percent by volume when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer
shall be referred to as "fortified wine." However, "fortified wine"
shall not include: (i) Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork
closure and aged two years or more; and (ii) wines that contain more
than fourteen percent alcohol by volume solely as a result of the
natural fermentation process and that have not been produced with the
addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((44))) (46) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((45))) (47) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for a craft winery. The fee is one
hundred dollars per year.
(2) A craft winery licensed under this section may do all things
necessary and convenient for the manufacture, distribution, and sale of
craft wine, subject to compliance with the general antitrust laws and
the general commercial laws of sales. The craft winery license does
not exempt the holder from compliance with any other chapter of this
title.
(3) Craft wine is deemed wine for the purposes of:
(a) RCW 66.12.020, 66.12.180, 66.20.300 through 66.20.350,
66.24.185, and 66.24.210 and chapters 66.16, 66.32, 66.36, and 66.44
RCW, and is not "wine" or "liquor" for any other purpose under this
title;
(b) License privileges of retail, importer, and wine distributor
licensees, other than craft wineries, and for the purposes of conduct
of retail and wholesale licensed premises, other than craft winery
premises, except that craft wine is not wine for the purposes of RCW
66.28.170.

--- END ---