BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2007 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2008-09 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, academic
year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education beginning with 2009-10, other than summer term, shall
be as charged during the 2008-09 academic year unless different rates
are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The board of regents of each state university may establish
tuition fees rates for its students.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6))) (7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college under RCW 28C.04.610.
(((7))) (8) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8))) (9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle income resident law students.
(((9))) (10) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09,
institutions of higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten
percent of all revenues received as a result of graduate academic
school tuition increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through
academic year 2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident
graduate academic students.

--- END ---