BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that meaningful and
venerated traditions accompany the burial of a veteran, including a
live performance of the song Taps. A live performance of Taps at a
funeral, alongside other traditional military rites, properly honors a
veteran's life and military service at the time of burial. Prerecorded
music is an inferior substitute. Therefore, the legislature intends to
provide the option of a live performance of Taps at every veteran's
funeral.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 73.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, is entitled to a
performance of the song Taps at the veteran's funeral by a qualified
trumpeter, without cost or charge to the veteran.
(2) The Washington state arts commission shall identify and
maintain a list of trumpet players who are qualified to play Taps at
veterans' funerals.
(3) The department of veterans affairs shall hire trumpeters from
the list maintained by the Washington state arts commission and shall
pay a fee of one hundred dollars per performance.

--- END ---