BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington manufacturing innovation and
modernization extension service program created in RCW 43.338.020. The
credit allowed under this section is equal to fifty percent of the
value of a program participant's contributions to the manufacturing
innovation and modernization account created in RCW 43.338.030. If a
participant in the program does not meet the qualifications in RCW
43.338.020(2)(b)(iv), the participant must remit to the department the
value of any credits taken plus interest. The credit earned by a
participant in one calendar year may be carried over to be credited
against taxes incurred in subsequent calendar years. The annual
statewide credit available is limited to one million two hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2019.

--- END ---