BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.190.010 and 1996 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A program of education shall be provided for by the department of
social and health services and the several school districts of the
state for common school age persons who (1) have been admitted to
facilities staffed and maintained or contracted pursuant to RCW
13.40.320 by the department of social and health services for the
education and treatment of juveniles who have been diverted ((or)), (2)
who have been found to have committed a juvenile offense, or (3) who
have been found to be a criminal street gang associate or member as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030. The division of duties, authority, and
liabilities of the department of social and health services and the
several school districts of the state respecting the educational
programs shall be the same in all respects as set forth in RCW
28A.190.030 through 28A.190.060 respecting programs of education for
state residential school residents. For the purposes of this section,
the term "residential school" or "schools" as used in RCW 28A.190.030
through 28A.190.060 shall be construed to mean a facility staffed and
maintained by the department of social and health services or a program
established under RCW 13.40.320, for the education and treatment of
juvenile offenders on probation or parole. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit a school district from utilizing the services of an
educational service district subject to RCW 28A.310.180.

--- END ---