BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35A.12.180 and 1994 c 223 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
((At any time not within three months previous to a municipal
general election the council of a noncharter code city organized under
this chapter may divide the city into wards or change the boundaries of
existing wards.))
(1) Noncharter code cities may be divided into wards, and
boundaries of existing wards may be changed, upon approval of a
majority of the voters voting on such a proposal.
(a) A proposal to divide the noncharter code city into wards must
be put to a vote of the people upon the passage of a resolution of the
legislative body of the noncharter code city, or upon the filing of a
sufficient petition with the county auditor signed by registered voters
in numbers equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast at the
last general municipal election.
(b) The election must be conducted in the same manner as a change
in plan of government under chapter 35A.02 RCW, insofar as the
provisions are applicable and do not conflict with this section.
(2) No boundaries may be changed during the period starting on the
thirtieth day prior to the first day for candidates to file for the
primary election and ending with the day of the general election.
(3) No change in the boundaries of wards shall affect the term of
any councilmember, and councilmembers shall serve out their terms in
the wards of their residences at the time of their elections:
PROVIDED, That if this results in one ward being represented by more
councilmembers than the number to which it is entitled those having the
shortest unexpired terms shall be assigned by the council to wards
where there is a vacancy, and the councilmembers so assigned shall be
deemed to be residents of the wards to which they are assigned for
purposes of those positions being vacant. The representation of each
ward in the city council shall be in proportion to the population as
nearly as is practicable.
(4) Wards shall be redrawn as provided in chapter ((29.70)) 29A.76
RCW. Wards shall be used as follows: (((1))) (a) Only a resident of
the ward may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a councilmember of
the ward; and (((2))) (b) only voters of the ward may vote at a primary
to nominate candidates for a councilmember of the ward. Voters of the
entire city may vote at the general election to elect a councilmember
of a ward, unless the city had prior to January 1, 1994, limited the
voting in the general election for any or all council positions to only
voters residing within the ward associated with the council positions.
If a city had so limited the voting in the general election to only
voters residing within the ward, then the city shall be authorized to
continue to do so.

--- END ---