BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.28.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 366 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Operating property" means all of the property utilized by a
public utility district in the operation of a plant or system for the
generation, transmission, or distribution of electric energy for sale;
(2) "Taxing districts" means counties, cities, towns, school
districts, and road districts;
(3) "Distributes to consumers" means the sale of electric energy to
ultimate consumers thereof, and does not include sales of electric
energy for resale by the purchaser;
(4) "Wholesale value" means all costs of a public utility district
associated with the generation and transmission of energy from its own
generation and transmission system to the point or points of inter-connection with a distribution system owned and used by a district to
distribute such energy to consumers, or in the event a distribution
system owned by a district is not used to distribute such energy, then
the term means the gross revenues derived by a district from the sale
of such energy to consumers;
(5) "Thermal electric generating facility" means a steam-powered
electrical energy producing facility utilizing nuclear or fossil fuels;
(6) "Placed in operation" means delivery of energy into a
transmission or distribution system for use or sale in such a manner as
to establish a value accruing to the power plant operator, except
operation incidental to testing or startup adjustments;
(7) "Impacted area" for a thermal electric generating facility on
a federal reservation means that area in the state lying within thirty-five statute miles of the most commonly used entrance of the federal
reservation and which is south of the southern boundary of township
fifteen north;
(8) "Modified impacted area" for a thermal electric generating
facility on a federal reservation means that area in the state lying
within thirty-five statute miles of the most commonly used entrance of
the federal reservation.

Sec. 2 RCW 54.28.055 and 1986 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After computing the tax imposed by RCW 54.28.025(1), the
department of revenue shall instruct the state treasurer to distribute
the amount collected as follows:
(a) Fifty percent to the state general fund for the support of
schools; and
(b) Twenty-two percent to the counties, twenty-three percent to the
cities, three percent to the fire protection districts, and two percent
to the library districts.
(2) Each county, city, fire protection district, and library
district shall receive a percentage of the amount for distribution to
counties, cities, fire protection districts, and library districts,
respectively, in the proportion that the population of such district
residing within the impacted area bears to the total population of all
such districts residing within the impacted area. Except that, for any
tax amount collected in excess of the collections for fiscal year 2009,
the department shall instruct the state treasurer to distribute to each
county, city, fire protection district, and library district a
percentage of the amount for distribution to counties, cities, fire
protection districts, and library districts, respectively, in the
proportion that the population of such district residing within the
modified impacted area bears to the total population of all such
districts residing within the modified impacted area. For the purposes
of this chapter, the term "library district" includes only regional
libraries as defined in RCW 27.12.010(4), rural county library
districts as defined in RCW 27.12.010(5), intercounty rural library
districts as defined in RCW 27.12.010(6), and island library districts
as defined in RCW 27.12.010(7). The population of a library district,
for purposes of such a distribution, shall not include any population
within the library district and the impacted area or modified impacted
area that also is located within a city or town.
(3) If any distribution pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this
section cannot be made, then that share shall be prorated among the
state and remaining local districts.
(4) All distributions directed by this section to be made on the
basis of population shall be calculated in accordance with data to be
provided by the office of financial management.

--- END ---