BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.09.020 and 2006 c 303 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, federally approved renal dialysis
center or facility, or federally approved blood bank.
(3) "Health care practitioner" means an individual or firm licensed
or certified to engage actively in a regulated health profession.
(4) "Health care services" means those services provided by health
professionals licensed pursuant to RCW 18.120.020(4).
(5) "Health profession" means those licensed or regulated
professions set forth in RCW 18.120.020(4).
(6) "Less restrictive alternative" means court-ordered treatment in
a setting less restrictive than total confinement which satisfies the
conditions set forth in RCW 71.09.092. A less restrictive alternative
may not include placement in the community protection program as
pursuant to RCW 71A.12.230.
(7) "Likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility" means that the person more probably than
not will engage in such acts if released unconditionally from detention
on the sexually violent predator petition. Such likelihood must be
evidenced by a recent overt act if the person is not totally confined
at the time the petition is filed under RCW 71.09.030.
(8) "Mental abnormality" means a congenital or acquired condition
affecting the emotional or volitional capacity which predisposes the
person to the commission of criminal sexual acts in a degree
constituting such person a menace to the health and safety of others.
(9) "Personality disorder" means an enduring pattern of inner
experience and behavior that deviates markedly from the expectations of
the individual's culture, is pervasive and inflexible, has onset in
adolescence or early adulthood, is stable over time and leads to
distress or impairment. Purported evidence of a personality disorder
must be supported by testimony of a licensed forensic psychologist or
psychiatrist.
(10) "Predatory" means acts directed towards: (a) Strangers; (b)
individuals with whom a relationship has been established or promoted
for the primary purpose of victimization; or (c) persons of casual
acquaintance with whom no substantial personal relationship exists.
(((10))) (11) "Prosecuting agency" means the prosecuting attorney
of the county where the person was convicted or charged or the attorney
general if requested by the prosecuting attorney, as provided in RCW
71.09.030.
(12) "Recent overt act" means any act ((or)), threat, or
combination thereof that has either caused harm of a sexually violent
nature or creates a reasonable apprehension of such harm in the mind of
an objective person who knows of the history and mental condition of
the person engaging in the act or behaviors.
(((11))) (13) "Risk potential activity" or "risk potential
facility" means an activity or facility that provides a higher
incidence of risk to the public from persons conditionally released
from the special commitment center. Risk potential activities and
facilities include: Public and private schools, school bus stops,
licensed day care and licensed preschool facilities, public parks,
publicly dedicated trails, sports fields, playgrounds, recreational and
community centers, churches, synagogues, temples, mosques, public
libraries, public and private youth camps, and others identified by the
department following the hearings on a potential site required in RCW
71.09.315. For purposes of this chapter, "school bus stops" does not
include bus stops established primarily for public transit.
(((12))) (14) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services or the secretary's designee.
(((13))) (15) "Secure facility" means a residential facility for
persons civilly confined under the provisions of this chapter that
includes security measures sufficient to protect the community. Such
facilities include total confinement facilities, secure community
transition facilities, and any residence used as a court-ordered
placement under RCW 71.09.096.
(((14))) (16) "Secure community transition facility" means a
residential facility for persons civilly committed and conditionally
released to a less restrictive alternative under this chapter. A
secure community transition facility has supervision and security, and
either provides or ensures the provision of sex offender treatment
services. Secure community transition facilities include but are not
limited to the facility established pursuant to RCW 71.09.250(1)(a)(i)
and any community-based facilities established under this chapter and
operated by the secretary or under contract with the secretary.
(((15))) (17) "Sexually violent offense" means an act committed on,
before, or after July 1, 1990, that is: (a) An act defined in Title 9A
RCW as rape in the first degree, rape in the second degree by forcible
compulsion, rape of a child in the first or second degree, statutory
rape in the first or second degree, indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion, indecent liberties against a child under age fourteen,
incest against a child under age fourteen, or child molestation in the
first or second degree; (b) a felony offense in effect at any time
prior to July 1, 1990, that is comparable to a sexually violent offense
as defined in (a) of this subsection, or any federal or out-of-state
conviction for a felony offense that under the laws of this state would
be a sexually violent offense as defined in this subsection; (c) an act
of murder in the first or second degree, assault in the first or second
degree, assault of a child in the first or second degree, kidnapping in
the first or second degree, burglary in the first degree, residential
burglary, or unlawful imprisonment, which act, either at the time of
sentencing for the offense or subsequently during civil commitment
proceedings pursuant to this chapter, has been determined beyond a
reasonable doubt to have been sexually motivated, as that term is
defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or (d) an act as described in chapter 9A.28
RCW, that is an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit one of the felonies designated in (a), (b), or (c) of this
subsection.
(((16))) (18) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has
been convicted of or charged with a crime of sexual violence and who
suffers from a mental abnormality or personality disorder which makes
the person likely to engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not
confined in a secure facility.
(((17))) (19) "Total confinement facility" means a secure facility
that provides supervision and sex offender treatment services in a
total confinement setting. Total confinement facilities include the
special commitment center and any similar facility designated as a
total confinement facility by the secretary.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.025 and 2008 c 213 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When it appears that a person may meet the criteria of a
sexually violent predator as defined in RCW 71.09.020 (16), the agency
with jurisdiction shall refer the person in writing to the prosecuting
attorney of the county ((where that person was charged)) in which an
action under this chapter may be filed pursuant to RCW 71.09.030 and
the attorney general, three months prior to:
(i) The anticipated release from total confinement of a person who
has been convicted of a sexually violent offense;
(ii) The anticipated release from total confinement of a person
found to have committed a sexually violent offense as a juvenile;
(iii) Release of a person who has been charged with a sexually
violent offense and who has been determined to be incompetent to stand
trial pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4); or
(iv) Release of a person who has been found not guilty by reason of
insanity of a sexually violent offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.020(3).
(b) The agency shall provide the ((prosecutor)) prosecuting agency
with all relevant information including but not limited to the
following information:
(i) A complete copy of the institutional records compiled by the
department of corrections relating to the person, and any such out-of-state department of corrections' records, if available;
(ii) A complete copy, if applicable, of any file compiled by the
indeterminate sentence review board relating to the person;
(iii) All records relating to the psychological or psychiatric
evaluation and/or treatment of the person;
(iv) A current record of all prior arrests and convictions, and
full police case reports relating to those arrests and convictions; and
(v) A current mental health evaluation or mental health records
review.
(c) The prosecuting agency has the authority, consistent with RCW
72.09.345(3), to obtain all records relating to the person if the
prosecuting agency deems such records are necessary to fulfill its
duties under this chapter. The prosecuting agency may only disclose
such records in the course of performing its duties pursuant to this
chapter, unless otherwise authorized by law.
(d) The prosecuting agency has the authority to utilize the inquiry
judge procedures of chapter 10.27 RCW prior to the filing of any action
under this chapter to seek the issuance of compulsory process for the
production of any records necessary for a determination of whether to
seek the civil commitment of a person under this chapter. Any records
obtained pursuant to this process may only be disclosed by the
prosecuting agency in the course of performing its duties pursuant to
this chapter, or unless otherwise authorized by law.
(2) ((This section applies to acts committed before, on, or after
March 26, 1992.
(3))) The agency, its employees, and officials shall be immune from
liability for any good-faith conduct under this section.
(((4))) (3) As used in this section, "agency with jurisdiction"
means that agency with the authority to direct the release of a person
serving a sentence or term of confinement and includes the department
of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, and the
department of social and health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.030 and 2008 c 213 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A petition may be filed alleging that a person is a sexually
violent predator and stating sufficient facts to support such
allegation when it appears that: (((1))) (a) A person who at any time
previously has been convicted of a sexually violent offense is about to
be released from total confinement ((on, before, or after July 1,
1990)); (((2))) (b) a person found to have committed a sexually violent
offense as a juvenile is about to be released from total confinement
((on, before, or after July 1, 1990)); (((3))) (c) a person who has
been charged with a sexually violent offense and who has been
determined to be incompetent to stand trial is about to be released, or
has been released ((on, before, or after July 1, 1990)), pursuant to
RCW 10.77.086(4); (((4))) (d) a person who has been found not guilty by
reason of insanity of a sexually violent offense is about to be
released, or has been released ((on, before, or after July 1, 1990)),
pursuant to RCW 10.77.020(3), 10.77.110 (1) or (3), or 10.77.150; or
(((5))) (e) a person who at any time previously has been convicted of
a sexually violent offense and has since been released from total
confinement and has committed a recent overt act((; and it appears that
the person may be a sexually violent predator, the prosecuting attorney
of the county where the person was convicted or charged or the attorney
general if requested by the prosecuting attorney may file a petition
alleging that the person is a "sexually violent predator" and stating
sufficient facts to support such allegation)).
(2) The petition may be filed by:
(a) The prosecuting attorney of a county in which:
(i) The person has been charged or convicted with a sexually
violent offense;
(ii) A recent overt act occurred involving a person covered under
subsection (1)(e) of this section; or
(iii) The person committed a recent overt act, or was charged or
convicted of a criminal offense that would qualify as a recent overt
act, if the only sexually violent offense charge or conviction occurred
in a jurisdiction other than Washington; or
(b) The attorney general, if requested by the county prosecuting
attorney identified in (a) of this subsection. If the county
prosecuting attorney requests that the attorney general file and
prosecute a case under this chapter, then the county shall charge the
attorney general only the fees, including filing and jury fees, that
would be charged and paid by the county prosecuting attorney, if the
county prosecuting attorney retained the case.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.040 and 2001 c 286 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition under RCW 71.09.030, the judge
shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the
person named in the petition is a sexually violent predator. If such
determination is made the judge shall direct that the person be taken
into custody.
(2) Within seventy-two hours after a person is taken into custody
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall provide the
person with notice of, and an opportunity to appear in person at, a
hearing to contest probable cause as to whether the person is a
sexually violent predator. In order to assist the person at the
hearing, within twenty-four hours of service of the petition, the
prosecuting agency shall provide to the person or his or her counsel a
copy of all materials provided to the prosecuting agency by the
referring agency pursuant to RCW 71.09.025, or obtained by the
prosecuting agency pursuant to RCW 71.09.025(1) (c) and (d). At this
hearing, the court shall (a) verify the person's identity, and (b)
determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the person is
a sexually violent predator. At the probable cause hearing, the state
may rely upon the petition and certification for determination of
probable cause filed pursuant to RCW 71.09.030. The state may
supplement this with additional documentary evidence or live testimony.
The person may be held in total confinement at the county jail until
the trial court renders a decision after the conclusion of the seventy-two hour probable cause hearing. The county shall be entitled to
reimbursement for the cost of housing and transporting the person
pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary.
(3) At the probable cause hearing, the person shall have the
following rights in addition to the rights previously specified: (a)
To be represented by counsel; (b) to present evidence on his or her
behalf; (c) to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
(d) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file. The
court must permit a witness called by either party to testify by
telephone. Because this is a special proceeding, discovery pursuant to
the civil rules shall not occur until after the hearing has been held
and the court has issued its decision.
(4) If the probable cause determination is made, the judge shall
direct that the person be transferred to an appropriate facility for an
evaluation as to whether the person is a sexually violent predator.
The evaluation shall be conducted by a person deemed to be
professionally qualified to conduct such an examination pursuant to
rules developed by the department of social and health services. In
adopting such rules, the department of social and health services shall
consult with the department of health and the department of
corrections. In no event shall the person be released from confinement
prior to trial. A witness called by either party shall be permitted to
testify by telephone.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.09.050 and 1995 c 216 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within forty-five days after the completion of any hearing held
pursuant to RCW 71.09.040, the court shall conduct a trial to determine
whether the person is a sexually violent predator. The trial may be
continued upon the request of either party and a showing of good cause,
or by the court on its own motion in the due administration of justice,
and when the respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. At all
stages of the proceedings under this chapter, any person subject to
this chapter shall be entitled to the assistance of counsel, and if the
person is indigent, the court shall appoint counsel to assist him or
her. The person shall be confined in a secure facility for the
duration of the trial.
(2) Whenever any person is subjected to an examination under this
chapter, he or she may retain experts or professional persons to
perform an examination on their behalf. When the person wishes to be
examined by a qualified expert or professional person of his or her own
choice, such examiner shall be permitted to have reasonable access to
the person for the purpose of such examination, as well as to all
relevant medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of
a person who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request,
assist the person in obtaining an expert or professional person to
perform an examination or participate in the trial on the person's
behalf.
(3) The person, the prosecuting ((attorney or attorney general))
agency, or the judge shall have the right to demand that the trial be
before a twelve-person jury. If no demand is made, the trial shall be
before the court.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.09.060 and 2008 c 213 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The court or jury shall determine whether, beyond a reasonable
doubt, the person is a sexually violent predator. In determining
whether or not the person would be likely to engage in predatory acts
of sexual violence if not confined in a secure facility, the fact
finder may consider only placement conditions and voluntary treatment
options that would exist for the person if unconditionally released
from detention on the sexually violent predator petition. The
community protection program under RCW 71A.12.230 may not be considered
as a placement condition or treatment option available to the person if
unconditionally released from detention on a sexually violent predator
petition. When the determination is made by a jury, the verdict must
be unanimous.
If, on the date that the petition is filed, the person was living
in the community after release from custody, the state must also prove
beyond a reasonable doubt that the person had committed a recent overt
act. If the state alleges that the prior sexually violent offense that
forms the basis for the petition for commitment was an act that was
sexually motivated as provided in RCW 71.09.020(15)(c), the state must
prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the alleged sexually violent act
was sexually motivated as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
If the court or jury determines that the person is a sexually
violent predator, the person shall be committed to the custody of the
department of social and health services for placement in a secure
facility operated by the department of social and health services for
control, care, and treatment until such time as: (a) The person's
condition has so changed that the person no longer meets the definition
of a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative as set forth in RCW 71.09.092 is in the best
interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that would
adequately protect the community.
If the court or unanimous jury decides that the state has not met
its burden of proving that the person is a sexually violent predator,
the court shall direct the person's release.
If the jury is unable to reach a unanimous verdict, the court shall
declare a mistrial and set a retrial within forty-five days of the date
of the mistrial unless the prosecuting agency earlier moves to dismiss
the petition. The retrial may be continued upon the request of either
party accompanied by a showing of good cause, or by the court on its
own motion in the due administration of justice provided that the
respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. In no event may the
person be released from confinement prior to retrial or dismissal of
the case.
(2) If the person charged with a sexually violent offense has been
found incompetent to stand trial, and is about to (([be])) be or has
been released pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and his or her commitment
is sought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall
first hear evidence and determine whether the person did commit the act
or acts charged if the court did not enter a finding prior to dismissal
under RCW 10.77.086(4) that the person committed the act or acts
charged. The hearing on this issue must comply with all the procedures
specified in this section. In addition, the rules of evidence
applicable in criminal cases shall apply, and all constitutional rights
available to defendants at criminal trials, other than the right not to
be tried while incompetent, shall apply. After hearing evidence on
this issue, the court shall make specific findings on whether the
person did commit the act or acts charged, the extent to which the
person's incompetence or developmental disability affected the outcome
of the hearing, including its effect on the person's ability to consult
with and assist counsel and to testify on his or her own behalf, the
extent to which the evidence could be reconstructed without the
assistance of the person, and the strength of the prosecution's case.
If, after the conclusion of the hearing on this issue, the court finds,
beyond a reasonable doubt, that the person did commit the act or acts
charged, it shall enter a final order, appealable by the person, on
that issue, and may proceed to consider whether the person should be
committed pursuant to this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the state shall
comply with RCW 10.77.220 while confining the person ((pursuant to this
chapter, except that)). During all court proceedings where the person
is present, the person shall be detained in a secure facility. If the
proceedings last more than one day, the person may be held in the
county jail for the duration of the proceedings, except the person may
be returned to the department's custody on weekends and court holidays
if the court deems such a transfer feasible. The county shall be
entitled to reimbursement for the cost of housing and transporting the
person pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary. The department
shall not place the person, even temporarily, in a facility on the
grounds of any state mental facility or regional habilitation center
because these institutions are insufficiently secure for this
population.
(4) A court has jurisdiction to order a less restrictive
alternative placement only after a hearing ordered pursuant to RCW
71.09.090 following initial commitment under this section and in accord
with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.09.080 and 1995 c 216 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person subjected to restricted liberty as a sexually
violent predator pursuant to this chapter shall not forfeit any legal
right or suffer any legal disability as a consequence of any actions
taken or orders made, other than as specifically provided in this
chapter, or as otherwise authorized by law.
(2) Any person committed pursuant to this chapter has the right to
adequate care and individualized treatment. The department of social
and health services shall keep records detailing all medical, expert,
and professional care and treatment received by a committed person, and
shall keep copies of all reports of periodic examinations made pursuant
to this chapter. All such records and reports shall be made available
upon request only to: The committed person, his or her attorney, the
prosecuting attorney, the court, the protection and advocacy agency, or
another expert or professional person who, upon proper showing,
demonstrates a need for access to such records.
(3) At the time a person is taken into custody or transferred into
a facility pursuant to a petition under this chapter, the professional
person in charge of such facility or his or her designee shall take
reasonable precautions to inventory and safeguard the personal property
of the persons detained or transferred. A copy of the inventory,
signed by the staff member making it, shall be given to the person
detained and shall, in addition, be open to inspection to any
responsible relative, subject to limitations, if any, specifically
imposed by the detained person. For purposes of this subsection,
"responsible relative" includes the guardian, conservator, attorney,
spouse, parent, adult child, or adult brother or sister of the person.
The facility shall not disclose the contents of the inventory to any
other person without consent of the patient or order of the court.
(4) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person presently committed
from exercising a right presently available to him or her for the
purpose of obtaining release from confinement, including the right to
petition for a writ of habeas corpus.
(5) No indigent person may be conditionally released or
unconditionally discharged under this chapter without suitable
clothing, and the secretary shall furnish the person with such sum of
money as is required by RCW 72.02.100 for persons without ample funds
who are released from correctional institutions. As funds are
available, the secretary may provide payment to the indigent persons
conditionally released pursuant to this chapter consistent with the
optional provisions of RCW 72.02.100 and 72.02.110, and may adopt rules
to do so.
(6) If a civil commitment petition is dismissed, or a trier of fact
determines that a person does not meet civil commitment criteria, the
person shall be released within twenty-four hours of service of the
release order on the superintendent of the special commitment center,
or later by agreement of the person who is the subject of the petition.

Sec. 8 RCW 71.09.090 and 2005 c 344 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so
changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional
discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon
the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The
court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the annual report with the court. If the person
does not affirmatively waive the right to petition, the court shall set
a show cause hearing to determine whether probable cause exists to
warrant a hearing on whether the person's condition has so changed
that: (i) He or she no longer meets the definition of a sexually
violent predator; or (ii) conditional release to a proposed less
restrictive alternative would be in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show
cause hearing, the prosecuting attorney or attorney general shall
present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed person
continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator and
that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of the
person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the state may rely exclusively upon
the annual report prepared pursuant to RCW 71.09.070. The committed
person may present responsive affidavits or declarations to which the
state may reply.
(c) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The state has failed to present prima facie evidence that the
committed person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator and that no proposed less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and conditions cannot be imposed that would
adequately protect the community; or (ii) probable cause exists to
believe that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(d) If the court has not previously considered the issue of release
to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on the merits
or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the court
shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative would
be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be imposed
that would adequately protect the community, without considering
whether the person's condition has changed. The court may not find
probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive alternatives
unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement meeting the
conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause
hearing.
(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency
((or the attorney general if requested by the county)) shall represent
the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to have the
committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state. The
committed person shall also have the right to a jury trial and the
right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or her behalf and the
court shall appoint an expert if the person is indigent and requests an
appointment.
(b) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the state
to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the committed person's
condition remains such that the person continues to meet the definition
of a sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial
and disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall
otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of
proof at the hearing shall be upon the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that conditional release to any proposed less
restrictive alternative either: (i) Is not in the best interest of the
committed person; or (ii) does not include conditions that would
adequately protect the community. Evidence of the prior commitment
trial and disposition is admissible.
(4)(a) Probable cause exists to believe that a person's condition
has "so changed," under subsection (2) of this section, only when
evidence exists, since the person's last commitment trial, or less
restrictive alternative proceeding, of a substantial change in the
person's physical or mental condition such that the person either no
longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator or that a
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
person's best interest and conditions can be imposed to adequately
protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may
be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is
current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following
and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last
commitment trial proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish probable cause for a new trial
proceeding under subsection (3) of this section. As used in this
section, a single demographic factor includes, but is not limited to,
a change in the chronological age, marital status, or gender of the
committed person.
(5) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed
pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is
unconditionally discharged.

Sec. 9 RCW 71.09.092 and 1995 c 216 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before the court may enter an order directing conditional release
to a less restrictive alternative, it must find the following: (1) The
person will be treated by a treatment provider who is qualified to
provide such treatment in the state of Washington under chapter 18.155
RCW; (2) the treatment provider has presented a specific course of
treatment and has agreed to assume responsibility for such treatment
and will report progress to the court on a regular basis, and will
report violations immediately to the court, the prosecutor, the
supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent of
the special commitment center; (3) housing exists in Washington that is
sufficiently secure to protect the community, and the person or agency
providing housing to the conditionally released person has agreed in
writing to accept the person, to provide the level of security required
by the court, and immediately to report to the court, the prosecutor,
the supervising community corrections officer, and the superintendent
of the special commitment center if the person leaves the housing to
which he or she has been assigned without authorization; (4) the person
is willing to comply with the treatment provider and all requirements
imposed by the treatment provider and by the court; and (5) the person
will be under the supervision of the department of corrections and is
willing to comply with supervision requirements imposed by the
department of corrections.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.09.096 and 2001 c 286 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the court or jury determines that conditional release to a
less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
includes conditions that would adequately protect the community, and
the court determines that the minimum conditions set forth in RCW
71.09.092 and in this section are met, the court shall enter judgment
and direct a conditional release.
(2) The court shall impose any additional conditions necessary to
ensure compliance with treatment and to protect the community. If the
court finds that conditions do not exist that will both ensure the
person's compliance with treatment and protect the community, then the
person shall be remanded to the custody of the department of social and
health services for control, care, and treatment in a secure facility
as designated in RCW 71.09.060(1).
(3) If the service provider designated by the court to provide
inpatient or outpatient treatment or to monitor or supervise any other
terms and conditions of a person's placement in a less restrictive
alternative is other than the department of social and health services
or the department of corrections, then the service provider so
designated must agree in writing to provide such treatment, monitoring,
or supervision in accord with this section. Any person providing or
agreeing to provide treatment, monitoring, or supervision services
pursuant to this chapter may be compelled to testify and any privilege
with regard to such person's testimony is deemed waived.
(4) Prior to authorizing any release to a less restrictive
alternative, the court shall impose such conditions upon the person as
are necessary to ensure the safety of the community. The court shall
order the department of corrections to investigate the less restrictive
alternative and recommend any additional conditions to the court.
These conditions shall include, but are not limited to the following:
Specification of residence, prohibition of contact with potential or
past victims, prohibition of alcohol and other drug use, participation
in a specific course of inpatient or outpatient treatment that may
include monitoring by the use of polygraph and plethysmograph,
monitoring through the use of global positioning satellite technology,
supervision by a department of corrections community corrections
officer, a requirement that the person remain within the state unless
the person receives prior authorization by the court, and any other
conditions that the court determines are in the best interest of the
person or others. A copy of the conditions of release shall be given
to the person and to any designated service providers.
(5) Any service provider designated to provide inpatient or
outpatient treatment shall monthly, or as otherwise directed by the
court, submit to the court, to the department of social and health
services facility from which the person was released, to the
((prosecutor of the county in which the person was found to be a
sexually violent predator)) prosecuting agency, and to the supervising
community corrections officer, a report stating whether the person is
complying with the terms and conditions of the conditional release to
a less restrictive alternative.
(6) Each person released to a less restrictive alternative shall
have his or her case reviewed by the court that released him or her no
later than one year after such release and annually thereafter until
the person is unconditionally discharged. Review may occur in a
shorter time or more frequently, if the court, in its discretion on its
own motion, or on motion of the person, the secretary, or the
prosecuting ((attorney)) agency so determines. The sole question to be
determined by the court is whether the person shall continue to be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative. Absent the
written agreement of the parties, the court may not modify the
conditional release order through the annual review process. The court
in making its determination shall be aided by the periodic reports
filed pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and the opinions of
the secretary and other experts or professional persons.

Sec. 11 RCW 71.09.098 and 2006 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) Any service provider submitting reports pursuant to RCW
71.09.096(6), the supervising community corrections officer, the
prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general may petition the court,
or the court on its own motion may schedule an immediate hearing, for
the purpose of revoking or modifying the terms of the person's
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative if the petitioner
or the court believes the released person is not complying with the
terms and conditions of his or her release or is in need of additional
care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment.
(2) If the prosecuting attorney, the supervising community
corrections officer, or the court, based upon information received by
them, reasonably believes that a conditionally released person is not
complying with the terms and conditions of his or her conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative, the court or community
corrections officer may order that the conditionally released person be
apprehended and taken into custody until such time as a hearing can be
scheduled to determine the facts and whether or not the person's
conditional release should be revoked or modified. A law enforcement
officer, who has responded to a request for assistance from a
department employee, may apprehend and take into custody the
conditionally released person if the law enforcement officer reasonably
believes that the conditionally released person is not complying with
the terms and conditions of his or her conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative. The conditionally released person may be
detained in the county jail or returned to the secure community
transition facility. The court shall be notified before the close of
the next judicial day of the person's apprehension. Both the
prosecuting attorney and the conditionally released person shall have
the right to request an immediate mental examination of the
conditionally released person. If the conditionally released person is
indigent, the court shall, upon request, assist him or her in obtaining
a qualified expert or professional person to conduct the examination.
(3) The court, upon receiving notification of the person's
apprehension, shall promptly schedule a hearing. The issue to be
determined is whether the state has proven by a preponderance of the
evidence that the conditionally released person did not comply with the
terms and conditions of his or her release. Hearsay evidence is
admissible if the court finds it otherwise reliable. At the hearing,
the court shall determine whether the person shall continue to be
conditionally released on the same or modified conditions or whether
his or her conditional release shall be revoked and he or she shall be
committed to total confinement, subject to release only in accordance
with provisions of this chapter.))
(1) Any service provider submitting reports pursuant to RCW
71.09.096(6), the supervising community corrections officer, the
prosecuting agency, or the secretary's designee may petition the court
for an immediate hearing for the purpose of revoking or modifying the
terms of the person's conditional release to a less restrictive
alternative if the petitioner believes the released person (a) violated
or is in violation of the terms and conditions of the court's
conditional release order or (b) is in need of additional care,
monitoring, supervision, or treatment.
(2) The community corrections officer or the secretary's designee
may restrict the person's movement in the community until the petition
is determined by the court. The person may be taken into custody if:
(a) The supervising community corrections officer, the secretary's
designee, or a law enforcement officer reasonably believes the person
has violated or is in violation of the court's conditional release
order; or
(b) The supervising community corrections officer or the
secretary's designee reasonably believes that the person is in need of
additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment because the
person presents a danger to himself or herself or others if his or her
conditional release under the conditions imposed by the court's release
order continues.
(3) Persons taken into custody pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall:
(a) Not be released until such time as a hearing is held to
determine whether to revoke or modify the person's conditional release
order and the court has issued its decision;
(b) Be held in the county jail, at a secure community transition
facility, or at the total confinement facility, at the discretion of
the secretary's designee.
The court shall be notified before the close of the next judicial
day that the person has been taken into custody and shall promptly
schedule a hearing.
(4) Before any hearing to revoke or modify the person's conditional
release order, both the prosecuting agency and the released person
shall have the right to request an immediate mental examination of the
released person. If the conditionally released person is indigent, the
court shall, upon request, assist him or her in obtaining a qualified
expert or professional person to conduct the examination.
(5) At any hearing to revoke or modify the conditional release
order:
(a) The prosecuting agency shall represent the state, including
determining whether to proceed with revocation or modification of the
conditional release order;
(b) Hearsay evidence is admissible if the court finds that it is
otherwise reliable; and
(c) The state shall bear the burden of proving by a preponderance
of the evidence that the person has violated or is in violation of the
court's conditional release order or that the person is in need of
additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment.
(6) If the court determines that the state has met its burden
referenced in subsection (5)(c) of this section, and the issue before
the court is revocation of the court's conditional release order, the
court shall consider the evidence presented by the parties and the
following factors relevant to whether continuing the person's
conditional release is in the person's best interests or adequate to
protect the community:
(a) The nature of the condition that was violated by the person or
that the person was in violation of in the context of the person's
criminal history and underlying mental conditions;
(b) The degree to which the violation was intentional or grossly
negligent;
(c) The ability and willingness of the released person to strictly
comply with the conditional release order;
(d) The degree of progress made by the person in community-based
treatment; and
(e) The risk to the public or particular persons if the conditional
release continues under the conditional release order that was
violated.
Any factor alone, or in combination, shall support the court's
determination to revoke the conditional release order.
(7) If the court determines the state has met its burden referenced
in subsection (5)(c) of this section, and the issue before the court is
modification of the court's conditional release order, the court shall
modify the conditional release order by adding conditions if the court
determines that the person is in need of additional care, monitoring,
supervision, or treatment. The court has authority to modify its
conditional release order by substituting a new treatment provider,
requiring new housing for the person, or imposing such additional
supervision conditions as the court deems appropriate. The court shall
not reduce or eliminate supervision conditions in its release order
without the agreement of the person and the prosecuting agency.
(8) A person whose conditional release has been revoked shall be
remanded to the custody of the secretary for control, care, and
treatment in a total confinement facility as designated in RCW
71.09.060(1). The person is thereafter eligible for conditional
release only in accord with the provisions of RCW 71.09.090 and related
statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of social and health services shall provide to the
prosecuting agency a copy of all reports made by the department to law
enforcement in which a person detained or committed under this chapter
is named or listed as a suspect, witness, or victim, as well as a copy
of all reports received from law enforcement.

Sec. 13 RCW 71.09.112 and 2002 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person subject to court order under the provisions of this
chapter who is thereafter convicted of a criminal offense remains under
the jurisdiction of the department and shall be returned to the custody
of the department following: (1) Completion of the criminal sentence;
or (2) release from confinement in a state, federal, or local
correctional facility((, and shall be returned to the custody of the
department)). Any conditional release order shall be immediately
revoked upon conviction for a criminal offense.
This section does not apply to persons subject to a court order
under the provisions of this chapter who are thereafter sentenced to
life without the possibility of release.

Sec. 14 RCW 71.09.350 and 2004 c 38 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Examinations and treatment of sexually violent predators who
are conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative under this
chapter shall be conducted only by certified sex offender treatment
providers or certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers under
chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court or the department of social and
health services finds that: (a) The ((court-ordered less restrictive
alternative placement is located in another state; (b) the)) treatment
provider is employed by the department; or (((c))) (b)(i) all certified
sex offender treatment providers or certified affiliate sex offender
treatment providers become unavailable to provide treatment within a
reasonable geographic distance of the person's home, as determined in
rules adopted by the department of social and health services; and (ii)
the evaluation and treatment plan comply with the rules adopted by the
department of social and health services.
A treatment provider approved by the department of social and
health services under (((c))) (b) of this subsection, who is not
certified by the department of health, shall consult with a certified
sex offender treatment provider during the person's period of treatment
to ensure compliance with the rules adopted by the department of
health. The frequency and content of the consultation shall be based
on the recommendation of the certified sex offender treatment provider.
(2) A treatment provider, whether or not he or she is employed or
approved by the department of social and health services under
subsection (1) of this section or otherwise certified, may not perform
or provide treatment of sexually violent predators under this section
if the treatment provider has been:
(a) Convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under
the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030; or
(c) Suspended or otherwise restricted from practicing any health
care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or
foreign jurisdiction.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a qualified expert from
examining or evaluating a sexually violent predator who has been
conditionally released for purposes of presenting an opinion in court
proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act applies to all persons currently
committed or awaiting commitment under chapter 71.09 RCW either on,
before, or after the effective date of this act, whether confined in a
secure facility or on conditional release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---