BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.30.530 and 1984 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University shall
establish the Washington State University small business development
center and such satellite offices as the administrator of the center
deems appropriate.
(2) The center shall provide management and technical assistance
including but not limited to training, counseling, and research
services to small businesses throughout the state. The center shall
work with ((public and private community development and economic
assistance agencies and shall work towards the goal of coordinating
activities with such agencies)) the Washington economic development
commission, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the workforce training and education coordinating board,
the employment security department, the higher education coordinating
board, and the state board for community and technical colleges to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Facilitate the development of interinstitutional
entrepreneurial education, training, and assistance programs; and
(c) Coordinate services to avoid duplication of services.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business ((and)) development center may accept and
disburse federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or
donations from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out
the center's requirements and purposes. The center may use funds from
the business assistance account created in section 3 of this act to
support satellite offices, increase the assistance, including the
number of small business plan workshops and business counselors,
available to small and start-up businesses, and develop new assistance
programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 30.60.010 and 2008 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In conducting an examination of a bank chartered under Title 30
RCW, the director shall investigate and assess the record of
performance of the bank in meeting the credit needs of the bank's
entire community, including low and moderate-income neighborhoods. The
director shall accept, in lieu of an investigation or part of an
investigation required by this section, any report or document that the
bank is required to prepare or file with one or more federal agencies
by the act of Congress entitled the "Community Reinvestment Act of
1977" and the regulations promulgated in accordance with that act, to
the extent such reports or documents assist the director in making an
assessment based upon the factors outlined in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) In making an investigation required under subsection (1) of
this section, the director shall consider, independent of any federal
determination, the following factors in assessing the bank's record of
performance:
(a) Activities conducted by the institution to ascertain credit
needs of its community, including the extent of the institution's
efforts to communicate with members of its community regarding the
credit services being provided by the institution;
(b) The extent of the institution's marketing and special credit
related programs to make members of the community aware of the credit
services offered by the institution;
(c) The extent of participation by the institution's board of
directors in formulating the institution's policies and reviewing its
performance with respect to the purposes of the Community Reinvestment
Act of 1977;
(d) Any practices intended to discourage applications for types of
credit set forth in the institution's community reinvestment act
statement(s);
(e) The geographic distribution of the institution's credit
extensions, credit applications, and credit denials;
(f) Evidence of prohibited discriminatory or other illegal credit
practices;
(g) The institution's record of opening and closing offices and
providing services at offices;
(h) The institution's participation, including investments, in
local community and microenterprise development projects;
(i) The institution's origination of residential mortgage loans,
housing rehabilitation loans, home improvement loans, and small
business or small farm loans within its community, or the purchase of
such loans originated in its community;
(j) The institution's participation in governmentally insured,
guaranteed, or subsidized loan programs for housing, small businesses,
or small farms;
(k) The institution's ability to meet various community credit
needs based on its financial condition, size, legal impediments, local
economic condition, and other factors;
(l) The institution's sponsorship of small business development
center offices and their counseling, training, and other small business
assistance services; and
(m) Other factors that, in the judgment of the director, reasonably
bear upon the extent to which an institution is helping to meet the
credit needs of its entire community.
(3) The director shall include as part of the examination report,
a summary of the results of the assessment required under subsection
(1) of this section and shall assign annually to each bank a numerical
community reinvestment rating based on a one through five scoring
system. Such numerical scores shall represent performance assessments
as follows:

(a) Excellent performance: 1

(b) Good performance: 2

(c) Satisfactory performance: 3

(d) Inadequate performance: 4

(e) Poor performance: 5

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The business assistance account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the expansion of business assistance services delivered by the small
business development center created in RCW 28B.30.530. Only the
administrator of the center or the administrator's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

--- END ---