BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Any county legislative authority of a
county where a public utility district owns and operates a plant or
system for the generation, transmission, and distribution of electric
energy for sale within the county may construct, purchase, acquire,
operate, and maintain a facility to generate electricity from biomass
energy that is a renewable resource under RCW 19.285.030. The county
legislative authority has the authority to regulate and control the
use, distribution, sale, and price of the electricity produced from the
biomass facility authorized under this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "County legislative authority" means the board of county
commissioners or the county council; and
(b) "Public utility district" means a municipal corporation formed
under chapter 54.08 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---