BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health benefit plan that is issued or renewed on or after
January 1, 2010, and that provides coverage for organ and tissue
transplants, may not permit a separate lifetime limit on transplants of
any less than three hundred fifty thousand dollars. Benefits provided
are subject to all other terms and conditions of the health benefit
plan, including but not limited to any applicable coinsurances,
deductibles, and copayments.
(2) "Organ transplant" means the same as defined under the
applicable health benefit plan.

--- END ---