BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act is intended to affirm the
legislature's intent relating to HB 1933 adopted in 2003. This act is
intended to clarify that:
(1) Wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas
within the jurisdiction of the shoreline management act must be
governed by the shoreline management act as described in subsection (2)
of this section and that critical areas outside the jurisdiction of the
shoreline management act must be governed by the growth management act.
(2) As provided in RCW 36.70A.480 and 90.58.090:
(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the shoreline
management act applies to wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat
conservation areas only upon department of ecology approval of a
comprehensive updated shoreline master program meeting the requirements
of chapter 90.58 RCW and department of ecology guidelines effective on
or after January 17, 2004; and
(b) If a local government requests department of ecology approval
of a shoreline master program segment relating to wetlands and fish and
wildlife habitat conservation areas, the intended separation of
authority must occur upon department of ecology approval of a shoreline
master program segment protecting wetlands and fish and wildlife
habitat conservation areas that meets the requirements of chapter 90.58
RCW and department of ecology guidelines effective on or after January
17, 2004.
(3) A local government's critical area regulations adopted under
chapter 36.70A RCW that were in effect on January 14, 2004, or that
were amended on or after January 14, 2004, apply within the shoreline
jurisdiction until the local government's shoreline master program or
shoreline master program segment has been approved as provided in RCW
36.70A.480 and 90.58.090.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.480 and 2003 c 321 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the
shoreline management act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one
of the goals of this chapter as set forth in RCW 36.70A.020 without
creating an order of priority among the fourteen goals. The goals and
policies of a shoreline master program for a county or city approved
under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element of the county or
city's comprehensive plan. All other portions of the shoreline master
program for a county or city adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW, including
use regulations, shall be considered a part of the county or city's
development regulations.
(2) The shoreline master program shall be adopted pursuant to the
procedures of chapter 90.58 RCW rather than the goals, policies, and
procedures set forth in this chapter for the adoption of a
comprehensive plan or development regulations.
(3) The policies, goals, and provisions of chapter 90.58 RCW and
applicable guidelines shall be the sole basis for determining
compliance of a shoreline master program with this chapter except as
the shoreline master program is required to comply with the internal
consistency provisions of RCW 36.70A.070, 36.70A.040(4), 35.63.125, and
35A.63.105.
(a) As of the date the department of ecology approves a local
government's shoreline master program adopted or updated under
((applicable)) shoreline guidelines effective on or after January 17,
1994, the protection of ((critical)) wetlands and fish and wildlife
habitat conservation areas, as defined by RCW 36.70A.030(5), located
within shorelines of the state:
(i) Shall be accomplished only through the local government's
shoreline master program and shall not be subject to the procedural and
substantive requirements of this chapter, except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section((.
(b) Critical areas within shorelines of the state that have been
identified as meeting the definition of critical areas as defined by
RCW 36.70A.030(5), and that are subject to a shoreline master program
adopted under applicable shoreline guidelines)); and
(ii) Shall not be subject to the procedural and substantive
requirements of this chapter, except as provided in subsection (6) of
this section.
(b) Nothing in chapter 321, Laws of 2003 is intended to affect
whether or to what extent agricultural activities, as defined in RCW
90.58.065, are subject to chapter 36.70A RCW.
(c) The provisions of RCW 36.70A.172 shall not apply to the
adoption or subsequent amendment of a local government's shoreline
master program and shall not be used to determine compliance of a local
government's shoreline master program with chapter 90.58 RCW and
applicable guidelines. Nothing in this section, however, is intended
to limit or change the quality of information to be applied in
protecting critical areas within shorelines of the state, as required
by chapter 90.58 RCW and applicable guidelines.
(4) Shoreline master programs shall provide a level of protection
to ((critical)) wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas located within shorelines of the state that ((is at least equal
to the level of protection provided to critical areas by the local
government's critical area ordinances adopted and thereafter amended
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060(2))) assures no net loss of shoreline
ecological functions necessary to sustain shoreline natural resources
as defined by agency guidelines effective on or after January 17, 2004.
(5) Shorelines of the state shall not be considered critical areas
under this chapter except to the extent that specific areas located
within shorelines of the state qualify for critical area designation
based on the definition of critical areas provided by RCW 36.70A.030(5)
and have been designated as such by a local government pursuant to RCW
36.70A.060(2).
(6) If a local jurisdiction's master program does not include land
necessary for buffers for critical areas that occur within shorelines
of the state, as authorized by RCW 90.58.030(2)(f), then the local
jurisdiction shall continue to regulate those critical areas and their
required buffers pursuant to RCW 36.70A.060(2).

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.090 and 2003 c 321 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A master program, segment of a master program, or an amendment
to a master program shall become effective when approved by the
department. Within the time period provided in RCW 90.58.080, each
local government shall have submitted a master program, either totally
or by segments, for all shorelines of the state within its jurisdiction
to the department for review and approval.
(2) Upon receipt of a proposed master program or amendment, the
department shall:
(a) Provide notice to and opportunity for written comment by all
interested parties of record as a part of the local government review
process for the proposal and to all persons, groups, and agencies that
have requested in writing notice of proposed master programs or
amendments generally or for a specific area, subject matter, or issue.
The comment period shall be at least thirty days, unless the department
determines that the level of complexity or controversy involved
supports a shorter period;
(b) In the department's discretion, conduct a public hearing during
the thirty-day comment period in the jurisdiction proposing the master
program or amendment;
(c) Within fifteen days after the close of public comment, request
the local government to review the issues identified by the public,
interested parties, groups, and agencies and provide a written response
as to how the proposal addresses the identified issues;
(d) Within thirty days after receipt of the local government
response pursuant to (c) of this subsection, make written findings and
conclusions regarding the consistency of the proposal with the policy
of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, provide a response to
the issues identified in (c) of this subsection, and either approve the
proposal as submitted, recommend specific changes necessary to make the
proposal approvable, or deny approval of the proposal in those
instances where no alteration of the proposal appears likely to be
consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines. The written findings and conclusions shall be provided to
the local government, all interested persons, parties, groups, and
agencies of record on the proposal;
(e) If the department recommends changes to the proposed master
program or amendment, within thirty days after the department mails the
written findings and conclusions to the local government, the local
government may:
(i) Agree to the proposed changes. The receipt by the department
of the written notice of agreement constitutes final action by the
department approving the amendment; or
(ii) Submit an alternative proposal. If, in the opinion of the
department, the alternative is consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes originally submitted by the department and with this
chapter it shall approve the changes and provide written notice to all
recipients of the written findings and conclusions. If the department
determines the proposal is not consistent with the purpose and intent
of the changes proposed by the department, the department may resubmit
the proposal for public and agency review pursuant to this section or
reject the proposal.
(3) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to shorelines unless it determines that the submitted segments
are not consistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.
(4) The department shall approve the segment of a master program
relating to ((critical)) wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat
conservation areas as defined by RCW 36.70A.030(5) ((provided)) if the
master program segment is consistent with RCW 90.58.020 and applicable
shoreline guidelines, and if the segment provides a level of protection
of ((critical)) wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas ((at least equal to that provided by the local government's
critical areas ordinances adopted and thereafter amended pursuant to
RCW 36.70A.060(2))) that assures no net loss of shoreline ecological
functions necessary to sustain shoreline natural resources as defined
by chapter 173-26 WAC.
(5) As of the date the department of ecology approves a local
government's shoreline master program, or segment of the local
government's shoreline master program relating to wetlands and fish and
wildlife habitat conservation areas, adopted or updated under shoreline
guidelines effective on or after January 17, 2004, the protection of
wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas, as defined
by RCW 36.70A.030(5), located within shorelines of the state may be
accomplished only through the local government's shoreline master
program.
(6) The department shall approve those segments of the master
program relating to shorelines of statewide significance only after
determining the program provides the optimum implementation of the
policy of this chapter to satisfy the statewide interest. If the
department does not approve a segment of a local government master
program relating to a shoreline of statewide significance, the
department may develop and by rule adopt an alternative to the local
government's proposal.
(((6))) (7) In the event a local government has not complied with
the requirements of RCW 90.58.070 it may thereafter upon written notice
to the department elect to adopt a master program for the shorelines
within its jurisdiction, in which event it shall comply with the
provisions established by this chapter for the adoption of a master
program for such shorelines.
Upon approval of such master program by the department it shall
supersede such master program as may have been adopted by the
department for such shorelines.
(((7))) (8) A master program or amendment to a master program takes
effect when and in such form as approved or adopted by the department.
Shoreline master programs that were adopted by the department prior to
July 22, 1995, in accordance with the provisions of this section then
in effect, shall be deemed approved by the department in accordance
with the provisions of this section that became effective on that date.
The department shall maintain a record of each master program, the
action taken on any proposal for adoption or amendment of the master
program, and any appeal of the department's action. The department's
approved document of record constitutes the official master program.

--- END ---