BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the right to vote
is part of the foundation of representative democracy. The legislature
finds that efforts to mislead voters with false information regarding
the date or location of an election have risen in recent years.
Practices that were once limited to other states have now begun
occurring in Washington. Efforts to disseminate false information are
often conducted on a broad scale affecting many voters. When an action
to mislead a voter occurs shortly before an election, the likelihood
that a voter will fail to vote rises significantly. The legislature
finds that persons, entities, organizations, or others who disseminate
such false information should be held accountable for their
interference with the democratic process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she:
(a) Knowingly provides false information regarding any voter
registration requirements;
(b) Within the fifteen days preceding any special, primary, or
general election, knowingly provides false information to a registered
voter regarding the date of an election, the voter's poll site
location, or the date by which an absentee ballot must be mailed in
order for the ballot to be validly counted.
(2) A person who is injured by a violation of this chapter may
bring a civil action in the superior court in the county in which the
person resides to enjoin further violations, and to seek up to one
thousand dollars per violation.
(3) Upon the receipt of false information by any person, damages
are presumed and do not need to be proven. In an action under
subsection (2) of this section, a court may increase the damages up to
ten times the damages allowed by subsection (2) of this section if the
defendant has engaged in a pattern and practice of violating this
section. The court shall award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to
a prevailing party.

--- END ---