BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall submit a request to the federal department
of health and human services to expand and revise the medical
assistance program as codified in Title XIX of the federal social
security act. The department shall take such actions as may be
necessary to access federal financial participation for low-income
adults at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level.
To the extent permitted under federal law, the program revisions must
reflect the following policy considerations:
(a) The establishment of a single eligibility standard for low-income persons at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level, or if not permitted, expansion of the categorical eligibility to
include additional adults;
(b) The delivery of all low-income coverage programs as one
program, with a common core benefit package that may be similar to the
basic health benefit package or alternative benefit package that may be
approved by the secretary of the federal department of health and human
services, including the option of supplemental coverage for select
categorical groups like children, and the aged, blind, and disabled;
(c) A program design to include creative and innovative approaches
such as, but not limited to: Coverage for preventive services with
incentives to use appropriate preventive care; cost-sharing options;
use of care management and care coordination programs to prompt better
coordination of medical and behavioral health services; application of
an innovative predictive risk model to better target care management
services; and mandatory enrollment in managed care, as may be
necessary;
(d) The ability to impose enrollment limits or benefit design
changes for eligibility groups that were not eligible under the Title
XIX state plan in effect at the date of the waiver application.
(2) The department shall hold stakeholder discussions to allow
refinement and public comment on the proposal.
(3) Upon development of the proposal, the department and the health
care authority shall identify statutory changes that may be necessary
to ensure successful and timely implementation of an apple health
program for adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall submit a Title XXI state plan amendment to
the federal department of health and human services that would define
coverage for children between two hundred and two hundred-fifty percent
of the federal poverty level as benefits provided under the Title XIX
state plan, and coverage for children up to three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as coverage under section 2103 of Title XXI.
(2) The department shall work with the department of health to
maximize the state's ability to access the federal vaccines for
children program.
(3) The department shall submit a Title XXI state plan amendment or
waiver to the federal department of health and human services to allow
Title XIX children to participate in the department's employer-sponsored program, as may be necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent that federal funding becomes available for the
operation of a health insurance exchange mechanism to facilitate access
to health insurance coverage for individuals and small businesses, the
health care authority may seek such funding to support operation of an
exchange as authorized in federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall continue to submit applications for the family
planning waiver program. The department shall submit a request to the
federal department of health and human services to amend the current
family planning waiver program to allow:
(1) Coverage for sexually transmitted disease testing and
treatment;
(2) A return to the eligibility standards used in 2005, including
but not limited to citizenship determination based on a declaration,
insurance eligibility standards comparable to 2005, and confidential
service availability for minors and survivors of domestic and sexual
violence; and
(3) Increasing eligibility to two hundred fifty percent of the
federal poverty level, to correspond with the eligibility for publicly
funded pregnancy care services.

--- END ---