BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.510 and 2000 c 5 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A carrier that offers a health plan may not offer to sell a
health plan to an enrollee or to any group representative, agent,
employer, or enrollee representative without first offering to provide,
and providing upon request, the following information before purchase
or selection:
(a) A listing of covered benefits, including prescription drug
benefits, if any, a copy of the current formulary, if any is used,
definitions of terms such as generic versus brand name, and policies
regarding coverage of drugs, such as how they become approved or taken
off the formulary, and how consumers may be involved in decisions about
benefits;
(b) A listing of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered
benefits, and any definition of medical necessity or other coverage
criteria upon which they may be based;
(c) A statement of the carrier's policies for protecting the
confidentiality of health information;
(d) A statement of the cost of premiums and any enrollee cost-sharing requirements;
(e) A summary explanation of the carrier's grievance process;
(f) A statement regarding the availability of a point-of-service
option, if any, and how the option operates; and
(g) A convenient means of obtaining lists of participating primary
care and specialty care providers, including disclosure of network
arrangements that restrict access to providers within any plan network.
The offer to provide the information referenced in this subsection (1)
must be clearly and prominently displayed on any information provided
to any prospective enrollee or to any prospective group representative,
agent, employer, or enrollee representative.
(2) Upon the request of any person, including a current enrollee,
prospective enrollee, or the insurance commissioner, a carrier must
provide written information regarding any health care plan it offers,
that includes the following written information:
(a) Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in
the medical coverage agreement;
(b) A full description of the procedures to be followed by an
enrollee for consulting a provider other than the primary care provider
and whether the enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical
director, or another entity must authorize the referral;
(c) Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for
obtaining prior authorization for health care services;
(d) A written description of any reimbursement or payment
arrangements, including, but not limited to, capitation provisions,
fee-for-service provisions, and health care delivery efficiency
provisions, between a carrier and a provider or network;
(e) Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation
programs, including any incentives or penalties that are intended to
encourage providers to withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals
to specialists;
(f) An annual accounting of all payments made by the carrier which
have been counted against any payment limitations, visit limitations,
or other overall limitations on a person's coverage under a plan;
(g) A copy of the carrier's grievance process for claim or service
denial and for dissatisfaction with care; and
(h) Accreditation status with one or more national managed care
accreditation organizations, and whether the carrier tracks its health
care effectiveness performance using the health employer data
information set (HEDIS), whether it publicly reports its HEDIS data,
and how interested persons can access its HEDIS data.
(3) Each carrier shall provide to all enrollees and prospective
enrollees a list of available disclosure items.
(4) Nothing in this section requires a carrier or a health care
provider to divulge proprietary information to an enrollee, including
the specific contractual terms and conditions between a carrier and a
provider.
(5) No carrier may advertise or market any health plan to the
public as a plan that covers services that help prevent illness or
promote the health of enrollees unless it:
(a) Provides all clinical preventive health services provided by
the basic health plan, authorized by chapter 70.47 RCW;
(b) Monitors and reports annually to enrollees on standardized
measures of health care and satisfaction of all enrollees in the health
plan. The state department of health shall recommend appropriate
standardized measures for this purpose, after consideration of national
standardized measurement systems adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed
health care services; and
(c) Makes available upon request to enrollees its integrated plan
to identify and manage the most prevalent diseases within its enrolled
population, including cancer, heart disease, and stroke.
(6) No carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from
informing an enrollee of the care he or she requires, including various
treatment options, and whether in the providers' view such care is
consistent with the plan's health coverage criteria, or otherwise
covered by the enrollee's medical coverage agreement with the carrier.
No carrier may prohibit, discourage, or penalize a provider otherwise
practicing in compliance with the law from advocating on behalf of an
enrollee with a carrier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize a provider to bind a carrier to pay for any service.
(7) No carrier may preclude or discourage enrollees or those paying
for their coverage from discussing the comparative merits of different
carriers with their providers. This prohibition specifically includes
prohibiting or limiting providers participating in those discussions
even if critical of a carrier.
(8) Each carrier must communicate enrollee information required in
chapter 5, Laws of 2000 by means that ensure that a substantial portion
of the enrollee population can make use of the information. Carriers
may explore alternative, efficient methods to ensure enrollees have
access to information including, but not limited to, web site alerts,
postcard mailings, and electronic communication in lieu of printed
materials.
(9) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section. In
developing rules to implement this section, the commissioner shall
consider relevant standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed
health care services, as well as opportunities to reduce administrative
costs included in health plans.

--- END ---