BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A person who violates RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) in a
jurisdiction that does not have a relicensing diversion program shall
be provided with a certified abstract of his or her driving record by
the court or the prosecuting attorney, in addition to a list of his or
her unpaid traffic offense related fines and the contact information
for each jurisdiction or collection agency to which money is owed.
(b) A fee of up to twenty dollars may be imposed by the court in
addition to any fee required by the department for provision of the
driving abstract.
(2)(a) Superior courts or courts of limited jurisdiction in
counties with a population less than thirty thousand or cities with a
population less than twenty thousand are authorized to participate or
provide relicensing diversion programs to persons who violate RCW
46.20.342(1)(c)(iv).
(b) Eligibility for the diversion program shall be limited to
violators with no more than four warrants for failure to appear in the
last ten years, subject to a less restrictive rule imposed by the
presiding judge of the county district court or municipal court, and no
more than four violations of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) in the last ten
years. People subject to arrest under a warrant are not eligible for
the diversion program.
(c) The diversion option may be offered at the discretion of the
prosecuting attorney before charges are filed, or by the court after
charges are filed.
(d) A person who is the holder of a commercial driver's license or
who was operating a commercial motor vehicle at the time of the
violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) may not participate in the
diversion program under this section.
(e) A relicensing diversion program that is structured to occur
after charges are filed may charge participants a one-time fee of up to
one hundred dollars, which is not subject to chapters 3.50, 3.62, and
35.20 RCW, and shall be used to support administration of the program.
The fee of up to one hundred dollars shall be included in the total to
be paid by the participant in the relicensing diversion program.
(3)(a) Superior courts or courts of limited jurisdiction in
counties with a population of thirty thousand or more or cities with a
population of twenty thousand or more are required to participate or
provide relicensing diversion programs to persons who violate RCW
46.20.342(1)(c)(iv).
(b) Eligibility for the diversion program shall be limited to
violators with no more than four warrants for failure to appear in the
last ten years, subject to a less restrictive rule imposed by the
presiding judge of the county district court or municipal court, and no
more than four violations of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) in the last ten
years. People subject to arrest under a warrant are not eligible for
the diversion program.
(c) The diversion option may be offered at the discretion of the
prosecuting attorney before charges are filed, or by the court after
charges are filed.
(d) A person who is the holder of a commercial driver's license or
who was operating a commercial motor vehicle at the time of the
violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c)(iv) may not participate in the
diversion program under this section.
(e) A relicensing diversion program that is structured to occur
after charges are filed may charge participants a one-time fee of up to
one hundred dollars, which is not subject to chapters 3.50, 3.62, and
35.20 RCW, and shall be used to support administration of the program.
The fee of up to one hundred dollars shall be included in the total to
be paid by the participant in the relicensing diversion program.
(4) A relicensing diversion program shall be designed to assist
suspended drivers to regain their license and insurance and pay
outstanding fines.
(5)(a) Counties and cities that operate relicensing diversion
programs shall provide information to the administrative office of the
courts on an annual basis regarding the eligibility criteria used for
the program, the number of referrals from law enforcement, the number
of participants accepted into the program, the number of participants
who regain their driver's license and insurance, the total amount of
fines collected, the costs associated with the program, and other
information as determined by the office.
(b) The administrative office of the courts is directed to compile
and analyze the data required to be submitted in this section and
develop recommendations for a best practices model for relicensing
diversion programs.

--- END ---