BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit ((shall)) provided for in subsection (1) of this
section must be calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person, other than a public educational or research
institution, in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
((the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008,)) the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or ((1.0)) 1.25
percent((;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent)).
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, in computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all amounts paid by a person to a public educational,
economic development, or research institution located in this state to
conduct qualified research and development. The credit is equal to the
amount of such payments for qualified research and development,
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(4) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(((4))) (5) The credit allowed under subsections (1) and (3) of
this section, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, shall be claimed against taxes
due for the same calendar year in which the qualified research and
development expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section, for each calendar year ((shall)) may not exceed the lesser of
two million dollars or the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter for the calendar year.
(((5))) (6) For any person claiming the credit allowed under
subsections (1) and (3) of this section, including any credit assigned
to a person under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department ((shall)) must declare the taxes against which the
credit was claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department
((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against
which the credit was claimed. Interest ((shall be)) is assessed at the
rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and ((shall accrue))
accrues until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are
repaid. Any credit assigned to a person under subsection (((3))) (4)
of this section that is disallowed as a result of this section may be
claimed by the person who performed the qualified research and
development subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section.
(((6))) (7)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) A person claiming ((the)) a credit ((shall)) under this section
must file a complete annual survey with the department. The survey is
due by March 31st following any year in which a credit is claimed. The
department may extend the due date for timely filing of annual surveys
under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey ((shall))
must include the amount of the tax credit claimed, the qualified
research and development expenditures during the calendar year for
which the credit is claimed, the taxable amount during the calendar
year for which the credit is claimed, the number of new products or
research projects by general classification, the number of trademarks,
patents, and copyrights associated with the research and development
activities for which a credit was claimed, and whether the credit has
been assigned under subsection (((3))) (4) of this section and who
assigned the credit. The survey ((shall)) must also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (((6))) (7)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported
on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the
taxpayer's tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the
amount actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(((7))) (8) The department ((shall)) must use the information from
subsection (((6))) (7) of this section to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category. No fewer than three taxpayers ((shall)) may be
included in any category. The department shall report these statistics
to the legislature each year by September 1st.
(((8))) (9) The department ((shall)) must use the information from
subsection (((6))) (7) of this section to study the tax credit program
authorized under this section. The department ((shall)) must report to
the legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports
((shall)) must measure the effect of the program on job creation, the
number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.
(((9))) (10) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means:
(i) Operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a
proprietor or a partner in a partnership as determined under rules
adopted by the department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses,
directly incurred in qualified research and development by a person
claiming the credit provided in this section; and
(ii) Amounts paid to a public educational or research institution
to conduct qualified research and development. The term does not
include amounts paid to a person other than a public educational or
research institution to conduct qualified research and development.
Nor does the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses
for land, structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" ((shall have)) has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((10) This section expires January 1, 2015.))

--- END ---