BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2007 c 355 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
((2008-09)) 2014-15 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the
omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
((2008-09)) 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates, including summer school students and students in other
self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time
tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or
increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs,
campuses, courses, or students.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with ((2009-10)) 2015-16,
other than summer term, shall be as charged during the ((2008-09))
2014-15 academic year unless different rates are adopted by the
legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.

--- END ---