BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. (1) The legislature reaffirms the
state limits on greenhouse gas emissions adopted in RCW 70.235.020.
Despite the recent economic downturn, the output of greenhouse gas
emissions continues. It remains essential to fashion a long-term
strategy for reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, consistent with
previously enacted reduction goals of the state. The legislature
further finds that full implementation of current policies regarding
energy efficiency, new clean energy technologies, efficient building
practices, new energy efficient transportation technologies, and other
policies and programs may achieve nearly one-half of the estimated
statewide emissions reductions needed to meet the state's 2020
emissions limits, but that additional reduction strategies will be
needed.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature by this act to
provide a thorough review and set of recommendations to the 2011
legislature regarding the merits of implementing a multisector
emissions reduction program in the state, as well as recommended
additional complementary policies to achieve the state's emission
reduction requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 POLICY DECLARATION. When presenting the
state's position on any regional or national emissions reduction
program that relies on a multisector, market-based approach to
regulating greenhouse gas emissions, the state shall adhere to the
following policies:
(1) Assuring that biomass combustion for electricity or process
steam production is considered carbon neutral;
(2) Assuring equitable economic benefits and opportunities for
electric utilities operating in Washington that use hydroelectric
generation;
(3) Recognition must be provided to those emissions sources that
have taken early action to reduce their emissions;
(4) That the state's forest and agricultural lands that are managed
in ways that increase carbon sequestration be recognized for the use of
offsets to regulatory limits on emissions; and
(5) Assuring the protection of low and moderate income households.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 EMISSIONS CAPS. (1) In order to assist
Washington in meeting the requirements in RCW 70.235.020, the
department of ecology shall recommend a greenhouse gas emissions
reduction program that sets statewide and sector emission caps for
persons that annually emit at or above twenty-five thousand metric tons
of carbon dioxide equivalents. The emissions reduction program must
recognize early actions, complementary policies, and offsets as
specified in section 5 of this act. The emissions reduction program
must include protocols for directing technical and financial incentives
to those persons who monitor and demonstrate their emissions
reductions. No element of the program recommendations in this section
may be implemented unless specifically authorized by a future act of
the legislature.
(2) The department of ecology's recommendations must include the
following program design elements:
(a) Phase one of the emissions reduction program should be designed
to begin in 2012 and covers the following sectors: (i) Electricity
generated in the state or generated out-of-state and delivered to the
state by long-term financial commitments under chapter 80.80 RCW; (ii)
industrial and commercial fuel combustion; and (iii) industrial process
emissions;
(b) Phase two of the emissions reduction program should be designed
to begin in 2015 and covers the following sectors: (i) Transportation
fuel combustion; (ii) residential fuel combustion; and (iii) fuel
delivered or sold for industrial and commercial combustion where the
fuel is used by persons not otherwise covered by the program in 2012.
Phase two of the program may include complementary measures, except
that measures for transportation fuels must focus on emissions
reductions, not raising revenues, and consideration must be given to
differing rural and urban circumstances;
(c) For each compliance period, emissions caps must decline evenly
in each sector until the state greenhouse gas emissions are reduced as
required by RCW 70.235.020;
(d) Except for purposes of reporting, the following carbon dioxide
emissions are not covered by the program:
(i) Emissions from industrial combustion of biomass in the form of
fuel wood, wood waste, wood by-products, and wood residuals as long as
the region's silvicultural sequestration capacity is maintained or
increased; and
(ii) Emissions from the combustion of biofuels or the biofuel
component of blended fuels as the term "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010; and
(e) No more than forty-nine percent of a sector's total emissions
reductions from 2012 to 2020 may be satisfied with offsets.
(3) The recommendations in this section must be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 ALTERNATIVE STRATEGIES FOR ACHIEVING
EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS. (1) The department of ecology shall report to
the legislature on alternative strategies the state may implement to
meet the requirements in RCW 70.235.020. The report must include the
following: A comprehensive examination of all measures, not market-
based, that the state could employ to reduce the emissions of
greenhouse gases, such as:
(a) Regulatory emissions caps and other performance oriented
regulations;
(b) Economic and fiscal measures that would supplement a regulatory
approach;
(c) Measures for substantially reducing greenhouse gas emissions
from the electricity sector, including measures to facilitate the
transition from electricity generation derived from any coal-fired
facility to generation with significantly reduced emissions;
(d) Measures for reducing transportation emissions in urban areas
of the state, including programs providing incentives and assistance
for the deployment of electric vehicles and the necessary
infrastructure for such vehicles and policies directing the increased
use of these vehicles within state agency fleets; and
(e) Measures for reducing emissions by increasing energy efficiency
in buildings and commercial and industrial applications.
(2) The report must include an analysis of the alignment of
policies and standards among the participating jurisdictions in the
western climate initiative.
(3) The report must include recommendations for establishing a
performance auditing mechanism to monitor the effectiveness of
emissions reduction strategies.
(4) The report must include recommendations on complementary
measures the state may undertake to supplement a national emissions
reduction program.
(5) The report must incorporate an economic analysis by the
forecasting office of the office of financial management, in
consultation with members of the governor's council of economic
advisors, of the impact to Washington consumers, businesses, and
citizens if Washington entered into a regional or federal emissions
reduction program. The economic analysis must include:
(a) Various economic scenarios, such as when Washington has a
robust economy and when Washington is in an economic downturn;
(b) The economic impact sector by sector, including the impact to
the forest products manufacturing sector and Washington's port
districts;
(c) How to address trade competition from countries and states that
are not participating in an emissions reduction program;
(d) How to ensure that economic benefits are available to both
urban and rural communities; and
(e) The impact on the cost and affordability of food, housing,
energy, transportation, and other routine expenses on low and moderate-income households.
(6) The report must be submitted to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 OFFSETS. (1) The department of ecology
shall recommend criteria for issuing and accepting offset credits for
offset projects that may be used to meet a person's compliance
obligation in a state, regional, or national emissions reduction
program. The department must give priority to investigating and
developing criteria for offset projects within the forestry,
agriculture, and waste management sectors, but must also develop
criteria for recognizing offsets from all sources of emissions
reductions that are additional to existing regulatory requirements and
that are reductions beyond business as usual emission levels. The
department shall present the state's policy on forestry offset projects
established under section 6 of this act as the state's position when
developing the criteria for forestry offset projects within any other
regional or national cap and trade emissions reduction program.
(2) With regard to forestry offsets, the department of ecology must
give first priority for issuing offset credits for forestry offset
projects located in Washington. Second priority must be given to
offset projects within Washington, Oregon, Idaho, and Montana. Third
priority must be given to offset projects that are located in any other
jurisdiction in the United States. One offset credit must be issued
for up to each metric ton of emissions as measured in carbon dioxide
equivalent associated with an offset project.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the department of ecology
may accept offset credits for compliance purposes from other
jurisdictions as well as annex 1 countries from the United Nations
framework convention on climate change, but only if an offset project
is not available in Washington.
(4) The department of ecology may also accept for compliance
purposes offset credits from developing countries, but only if an
offset project is not available in Washington. Offset credits from
developing countries must be in accordance with the clean development
mechanism of the Kyoto protocol or if the clean development mechanism
is replaced, a protocol developed by the department. The department
may develop criteria for these offset projects to ensure similar rigor
to offset projects within the state.
(5) Any offset credit that is used to meet a compliance obligation
must conform to the rules adopted by the department of ecology.
(6) Upon receipt by the department of ecology of an offset credit
to meet a compliance obligation, the department shall retire the offset
credit.
(7) The department of ecology shall ensure that all offset credits
that it issues are tracked to ensure that the department knows who
holds a given offset credit and when it is retired.
(8) The department of ecology shall consult with tribal governments
upon request on any offset criteria that may affect tribal governments,
such as the voluntary development of offset projects by tribes.
(9) The recommendations in this section must be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FORESTRY OFFSET POLICY. The department of
ecology, in consultation with the forest practices board, the
department of natural resources, and the forest carbon working group,
shall develop the state's policy for forestry offset projects within
Washington. The agencies and the working group shall use the 2008
report of the forest carbon working group as the starting point in
developing the policy. The final policy must be completed by December
31, 2009, unless the department of ecology notifies the agencies and
working group that the policy is needed sooner. The public must be
provided with the opportunity to review and comment on the policy as it
is developed. The policy must include:
(1) Specific standards and guidelines that will support carbon
accounting in managed forests participating in an offset program;
(2) How to ensure that any carbon that is reduced or sequestered by
a forestry offset project will be eligible for an offset credit within
a regional or national cap and trade emissions reduction program;
(3) Recognition of management activities that increase carbon
stocks including, but not limited to, thinning, lengthening rotations,
increased retention of trees after harvest, fertilization, genetics,
timber stand improvement, fire management, and specific site class and
productivity of a managed forest;
(4) Specific standards and guidelines to support wood products
accounting, recognizing that carbon is stored in products after trees
are harvested including the use of the one hundred year method which
estimates the amount of carbon stored in the wood products that are
projected to remain in use after one hundred years;
(5) Guidelines on how forestry offset projects and forestry
financial incentive programs can work together so that Washington's
forest landowners will not be disadvantaged in comparison to other
jurisdictions participating in a regional or national cap and trade
emissions reduction program; and
(6) Recommendations for how to verify or certify carbon stocks that
will not be administratively burdensome.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 FINANCIAL INCENTIVES FOR FORESTRY. The
department of ecology, in consultation with the forest practices board,
the department of natural resources, and the forest carbon working
group, shall develop and deliver to the legislature by December 1,
2010, legislation to implement a financial incentives program for
forestry and forest products that will recognize activities such as:
(1) Forest landowners maintaining and actively managing their
forest land using management activities such as thinning, lengthening
of rotations, increased retention of trees at harvest, fertilization,
genetics, timber stand improvement, and fire management;
(2) Forest landowners continuing the production of wood products
while maintaining or increasing their carbon stocks on the ground;
(3) Retention by forest landowners of high carbon stocks where
there is no obligation to retain such stocks; and
(4) The use by developers and builders of wood building materials
instead of more intensive fossil fuel products such as concrete and
steel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 WESTERN CLIMATE INITIATIVE. The director of
the department of ecology is authorized to continue discussions with
other jurisdictions in the western climate initiative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As a necessary and desirable step to expedite the transition to
transportation technologies and infrastructure with reduced emissions,
the department shall implement an electric vehicle and alternative fuel
vehicle infrastructure program that accelerates planning and allocation
of funding for pilot projects to demonstrate the feasibility of large
scale deployment of charging and alternative fuels distribution
infrastructure. The program must include the provisions in this
section and other electric vehicle programs being implemented by the
department.
(2) The governor shall direct the department, in collaboration with
the states of Oregon and California, to develop a multistate electric
vehicle infrastructure initiative. The objective of the initiative is
to implement large scale demonstration projects that support the
charging and other necessary infrastructure for electric vehicles along
shared interstate highways and in major urban areas in the three
states. The governor shall work in a multistate collaboration to seek
major federal funding for planning and projects in the initiative.
(3) As an element of the program authorized under this section, the
legislature authorizes an alternative fuels corridor pilot project
capable of supporting electric vehicle charging and battery exchange
technologies. To the extent permitted under federal programs,
regulations, or laws, the department may enter into partnership
agreements with other public and private entities for the use of land
and facilities along state routes and within interstate highway rights-of-way for an alternative fuels corridor pilot project. The pilot
project may allow for commercial activities only as necessary to attain
basic economic sufficiency. The department is not responsible for
providing capital equipment nor operating refueling or recharging
services. At a minimum, the pilot project must:
(a) Limit renewable fuel and vehicle technology offerings to those
with a forecasted demand over the next fifteen years and approved by
the department;
(b) Ensure that a pilot project site does not compete with existing
retail businesses for the provision of the same refueling services or
recharging technologies in the same geographic area;
(c) Provide existing truck stop operators and retail truck
refueling businesses with an absolute right of first refusal over the
offering of refueling services to class six trucks with a maximum gross
vehicle weight of twenty-six thousand pounds within the same geographic
area identified for a possible pilot project site;
(d) Reach agreement with the department of services for the blind
ensuring that any commercial activities at host sites do not materially
affect the revenues forecasted from their vending operations at each
site;
(e) Regulate the internal rate of return from the partnership,
including provisions to reduce or eliminate the level of state support
once the partnership attains economic self-sufficiency;
(f) Be limited to not more than five locations on state-owned land
within federal interstate rights-of-way or state highway rights-of-way
in Washington; and
(g) Be limited in duration to a term of years reasonably necessary
for the partnership to recover the cost of capital investments, plus
the regulated internal rate of return.
(4) The department of transportation's obligations under this
section are subject to availability of amounts appropriated for the
specific purpose identified in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A regional transportation planning
organization containing any county with a population in excess of one
million in collaboration with representatives from the department of
ecology, the department of transportation, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, local governments, and the office of
regulatory affairs must seek federal or private funding for the
planning for, deployment of, or regulations concerning electric vehicle
infrastructure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 ACCOUNT CREATED. The emissions reduction
assistance account is created in the state treasury. All
appropriations to the account and twenty-five percent of all federal
funds received pursuant to H.R. 1, P.L. 111-5 for the purpose of
assisting with energy efficiency and renewable energy, including
federal funds received for the state energy program, must be deposited
in the account. Other funds, gifts, grants, and endowments from public
or private sources, in trust or otherwise, may be directed into the
account. Any moneys received from sponsor match payments must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the
following purposes, however at least ten percent of the revenues in the
account must be used for the purposes identified in subsection (5) of
this section:
(1) Assisting persons in achieving emissions reductions under
section 3 of this act;
(2) Assisting the transition of coal-fired facilities to cleaner-burning technologies;
(3) Reducing price impacts for consumers with incomes within two
hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level;
(4) Strategies to create jobs and provide for worker transition,
especially in and for those communities and workers that have been
disproportionately affected by economic downturns, through efforts to
reduce emissions, reduce energy use, and develop clean energy supplies;
(5) Supporting transit and transportation projects, including
telework projects, that will reduce greenhouse gas emissions;
(6) Energy efficiency and renewable energy incentives including
matching electric utility sponsored programs that support customer
energy efficiency investment, new renewable energy resource
development, including related transmission, energy storage, and
integration technologies;
(7) Promoting emissions reductions and carbon sequestration in
agriculture, forestry, waste management, and other uncapped sectors;
(8) Efforts funded by local governments to reduce community
greenhouse gas emissions;
(9) Adaptation to climate change impacts, including impacts on
affected species, habitats, and communities; and
(10) Research, development, demonstrations, and deployment of
technology to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 2 and 11 of this act are each
added to chapter 70.235 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act shall be in effect only to the
extent that funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of
this act.

--- END ---