BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.809 and 2005 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(2) The seller must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.
(3) As used in this section, "clean alternative fuel" means natural
gas, propane, or hydrogen, ((or electricity,)) when used as a fuel in
a motor vehicle that meets the California motor vehicle emission
standards in Title 13 of the California code of regulations, effective
January 1, 2005, and the rules of the Washington state department of
ecology.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
electric vehicles or electric vehicle batteries or to the installation
of electric vehicle infrastructure and its installation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Electric vehicle" means a passenger vehicle, as defined in RCW
46.04.382, that uses electricity as its primary source of power, such
as a plug-in electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle; and
(b) "Electric vehicle infrastructure" means structures, labor,
machinery, equipment, circuitry, and electrical appliances necessary to
support an electric vehicle, including battery recharging stations and
outlets and battery exchange stations.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of electric vehicles or electric vehicle batteries or to the use of
electric vehicle infrastructure and its installation.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "electric vehicle" and
"electric vehicle infrastructure" have the same meanings as provided in
section 2 of this act.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.809 and 2005 c 296 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger
vehicles, which are exclusively powered by a clean alternative fuel.
(2) "Clean alternative fuel" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.08.809.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, there is
levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each retail sale in
this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection shall be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6)(a) Beginning July 1, 2014, until June 30, 2016, there is levied
and collected a tax on each retail sale of an electric vehicle in this
state equal to one and three-tenths percent of the selling price.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2016, until June 30, 2018, there is levied
and collected a tax on each retail sale of an electric vehicle in this
state equal to two and six-tenths percent of the selling price.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2018, until June 30, 2020, there is levied
and collected a tax on each retail sale of an electric vehicle in this
state equal to three and nine-tenths percent of the selling price.
(d) Beginning July 1, 2020, until June 30, 2022, there is levied
and collected a tax on each retail sale of an electric vehicle in this
state equal to five and two-tenths percent of the selling price.
(e) Beginning July 1, 2022, and thereafter, there is levied and
collected a tax on each retail sale of an electric vehicle in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.
(f) As used in this subsection "electric vehicle" has the same
meaning as provided in section 2 of this act.
(7) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
vehicles which become part of a vehicle fleet that is certified by the
Puget Sound clean air agency or similar recognized certifying agency as
an evergreen fleet.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use of
vehicles which become part of a vehicle fleet that is certified by the
Puget Sound clean air agency or similar recognized certifying agency as
an evergreen fleet.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.813 (Exemptions -- High gas mileage vehicles) and 2005
c 296 s 2; and
(2) RCW 82.12.813 (Exemptions -- High gas mileage vehicles) and 2005
c 296 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 2005 c 296 s 6 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---