BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Within existing resources, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall review all annual
compliance reports required of school districts.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
make recommendations about which reports should be:
(a) Discontinued;
(b) Integrated into the longitudinal student data system
established in RCW 28A.300.500; or
(c) Maintained in their current form.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
also recommend which federal reporting requirements may be used to meet
state reporting requirements in order to avoid duplication of reports.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may
reconvene the work group used to assist in conducting the feasibility
study in chapter 401, Laws of 2007. The work group shall be comprised
of representatives of the following agencies and organizations: The
education data center established under RCW 43.41.400, the Washington
state institute for public policy, the professional educator standards
board, the state board of education, the joint legislative audit and
review committee, the center for analysis of longitudinal data in
education research, other research organizations as appropriate, school
districts of varying sizes and geographic locations, educational
service districts, the Washington school information processing
cooperative, at least one additional school information system vendor,
the association of Washington school principals, the Washington
association of school administrators, the Washington education
association, the Washington association of school business officials,
the Washington association of colleges for teacher education, and the
Washington state school directors' association.
(5) By December 1, 2009, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide a final report on the status of the annual
compliance reports to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of
the legislature.

--- END ---