BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that local
governments, landlords, and tenants working together to provide crime-free rental housing is beneficial to the public health, safety, and
welfare. The legislature is also concerned about activities and
provisions that serve to bar a person with a criminal background from
obtaining viable housing regardless of other factors that may indicate
rental stability, such as employment, rental references, or time in the
community with no further criminal activity. It is therefore the
intent of this act to provide certain requirements that a local
government must follow in adopting a crime-free rental housing program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Crime-free rental housing program" means a crime prevention
program designed to reduce crime, drugs, and gangs on rental housing
premises under the supervision of the local police department or a
crime prevention officer. The program may include, but is not limited
to: Property management and crime prevention training classes; crime
prevention through environmental design surveys; and community
awareness training.
(2) "Criminal activity" means a criminal act defined by statute or
ordinance that threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the tenants,
owner, guests, occupants, or property manager.
(3) "Premises" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.
(4) "Rental housing" means any tenancy subject to chapter 59.12,
59.18, or 59.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A city, town, or county may adopt and
implement a local government crime-free rental housing program in
accordance with this section.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a crime-free rental housing program must be voluntary.
(3)(a) Individual local jurisdictions may require a landlord to
participate in a crime-free rental housing program upon exceeding a
reasonable threshold of instances of criminal activity on the premises
if the landlord has not made a good faith effort to deter the criminal
activity.
(b) A good faith effort may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Service of notice on the tenant to comply or quit as allowed by
law or the commencement of an unlawful detainer action against the
tenant; and
(ii) Attendance and completion of a landlord training program
approved by the local jurisdiction.
(4)(a) As a prerequisite to subsection (3) of this section, upon
the occurrence of criminal activity on the premises, the local police
department must send a notice to the landlord setting forth the date of
the occurrence, the location of the occurrence, the nature of the
occurrence, and the name of the person who engaged in the occurrence.
(b) Notice must be deemed properly delivered when it is either
served upon the landlord or a property manager of the rental property,
or is delivered by first-class mail to the last known address of the
landlord.
(5) This section does not prevent a city, town, or county from
charging a fee for participation in a crime-free rental housing
program.
(6) This section does not affect a city, town, or county's
authority to enforce existing law in regard to rental housing, except
in regard to a crime-free rental housing program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A crime-free rental housing program may not
prohibit a landlord from hiring or renting to a person solely because
of the person's criminal background.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, sections 2 through 4 of this act supersede and preempt
all rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances of all cities,
counties, municipalities, and local agencies regarding the same subject
matter. The state preemption created in this section applies to all
rules, regulations, codes, statutes, and ordinances pertaining to
crime-free rental housing programs at any time.
(2) Section 3 of this act does not apply to rules, regulations,
codes, statutes, or ordinances adopted by cities, counties,
municipalities, or local agencies prior to July 1, 2010, except as
required by an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction
pursuant to litigation regarding the rules, regulations, codes,
statutes, or ordinances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

--- END ---