BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.16.010 and 2007 c 6 s 1023 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(3) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(4) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(5) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(6) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(7) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(8) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010((: PROVIDED, That)). However, "motor
transportation business" shall not mean or include: (a) A log
transportation business; or (b) the transportation of logs or other
forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.
(9) "Urban transportation business" means the business of operating
any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for
hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of
any city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof,
or (b) operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose
corporate limits are not more than five miles apart or within five
miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included herein, but
without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating
passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating
cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the
collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a
point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or
distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate
line-haul of such property.
(10) "Log transportation business" means the business of
transporting logs by truck, other than exclusively upon private roads.
(11)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), ((and))
(9), and 10 of this section, or any business subject to control by the
state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident
thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of
a public service nature, except telephone business and low-level
radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW
81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope
hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll
bridge, toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (((10))) (11)(b) apply
throughout this subsection (((10))) (11).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(((11))) (12) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating
tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or
pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(((12))) (13) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing
from the performance of the particular public service or transportation
business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without
any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or
sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount,
delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued
and without any deduction on account of losses.
(((13))) (14) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight hundredths
percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---