BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By December 31, 2009, the state noxious weed
control board shall amend WAC 16-750-003 as necessary to ensure that
its definitions of the terms "control," "contain," and "prevent the
spread of noxious weeds" adequately address the spread of noxious weeds
by seed as well as other reproductive propagules. At a minimum, the
board must ensure that these definitions adequately address the spread
of Bohemian knotweed (Polygonum bohemicum), giant knotweed (Polygonum
sachalinense), Himalayan knotweed (Polygonum polystachyum), and
Japanese knotweed (Polygonum cuspidatum) by propagules including, but
not limited to, rhizomes or fragments.

--- END ---