BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.04.030 and 2005 c 290 s 1 and 2005 c 238 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, the juvenile courts in this
state shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings:
(a) Under the interstate compact on placement of children as
provided in chapter 26.34 RCW;
(b) Relating to children alleged or found to be dependent as
provided in chapter 26.44 RCW and in RCW 13.34.030 through
((13.34.170)) 13.34.161;
(c) Relating to the termination of a parent and child relationship
as provided in RCW 13.34.180 through 13.34.210;
(d) To approve or disapprove out-of-home placement as provided in
RCW 13.32A.170;
(e) Relating to juveniles alleged or found to have committed
offenses, traffic or civil infractions, or violations as provided in
RCW 13.40.020 through 13.40.230, unless:
(i) The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction of a particular
juvenile to adult criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110;
(ii) The statute of limitations applicable to adult prosecution for
the offense, traffic or civil infraction, or violation has expired;
(iii) The alleged offense or infraction is a traffic, fish,
boating, or game offense, or traffic or civil infraction committed by
a juvenile sixteen years of age or older and would, if committed by an
adult, be tried or heard in a court of limited jurisdiction, in which
instance the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction shall have
jurisdiction over the alleged offense or infraction, and no guardian ad
litem is required in any such proceeding due to the juvenile's age((:
PROVIDED, That)). If such an alleged offense or infraction and an
alleged offense or infraction subject to juvenile court jurisdiction
arise out of the same event or incident, the juvenile court may have
jurisdiction of both matters((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The
jurisdiction under this subsection does not constitute "transfer" or a
"decline" for purposes of RCW 13.40.110(1) or (e)(i) of this
subsection((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Courts of limited
jurisdiction which confine juveniles for an alleged offense or
infraction may place juveniles in juvenile detention facilities under
an agreement with the officials responsible for the administration of
the juvenile detention facility in RCW 13.04.035 and 13.20.060;
(iv) The alleged offense is a traffic or civil infraction, a
violation of compulsory school attendance provisions under chapter
28A.225 RCW, or a misdemeanor, and a court of limited jurisdiction has
assumed concurrent jurisdiction over those offenses as provided in RCW
13.04.0301; or
(v) The juvenile is sixteen or seventeen years old on the date the
alleged offense is committed and the alleged offense is:
(A) A serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(B) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 and the juvenile
has a criminal history consisting of: (I) One or more prior serious
violent offenses; (II) two or more prior violent offenses; or (III)
three or more of any combination of the following offenses: Any class
A felony, any class B felony, vehicular assault, or manslaughter in the
second degree, all of which must have been committed after the
juvenile's thirteenth birthday and prosecuted separately;
(C) Robbery in the first degree, rape of a child in the first
degree, or drive-by shooting, committed on or after July 1, 1997;
(D) Burglary in the first degree committed on or after July 1,
1997, and the juvenile has a criminal history consisting of one or more
prior felony or misdemeanor offenses; or
(E) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 committed on or
after July 1, 1997, and the juvenile is alleged to have been armed with
a firearm.
(I) In such a case the adult criminal court shall have exclusive
original jurisdiction, except as provided in (e)(v)(E)(II) and (III) of
this subsection.
(II) The juvenile court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the
disposition of any remaining charges in any case in which the juvenile
is found not guilty in the adult criminal court of the charge or
charges for which he or she was transferred, or is convicted in the
adult criminal court of a lesser included offense that is not also an
offense listed in (e)(v) of this subsection. The juvenile court shall
enter an order extending juvenile court jurisdiction if the juvenile
has turned eighteen years of age during the adult criminal court
proceedings pursuant to RCW 13.40.300. However, once the case is
returned to juvenile court, the court may hold a decline hearing
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 to determine whether to retain the case in
juvenile court for the purpose of disposition or return the case to
adult criminal court for sentencing.
(III) The prosecutor and respondent may agree to juvenile court
jurisdiction and waive application of exclusive adult criminal
jurisdiction in (e)(v)(A) through (E) of this subsection and remove the
proceeding back to juvenile court with the court's approval. In
deciding whether or not to approve the motion to waive exclusive adult
jurisdiction, the court shall only consider the facts of the alleged
offense as they relate to: The seriousness of the alleged offense and
the extent to which the juvenile was involved; whether the alleged
offense was committed in an aggressive, violent, premeditated or
willful manner; and whether the alleged offense is against persons or
property, greater weight being given to offenses against persons,
especially if personal injury resulted from the offense.
If the juvenile challenges the state's determination of the
juvenile's criminal history under (e)(v) of this subsection, the state
may establish the offender's criminal history by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the criminal history consists of adjudications entered
upon a plea of guilty, the state shall not bear a burden of
establishing the knowing and voluntariness of the plea;
(f) Under the interstate compact on juveniles as provided in
chapter 13.24 RCW;
(g) Relating to termination of a diversion agreement under RCW
13.40.080, including a proceeding in which the divertee has attained
eighteen years of age;
(h) Relating to court validation of a voluntary consent to an out-of-home placement under chapter 13.34 RCW, by the parent or Indian
custodian of an Indian child, except if the parent or Indian custodian
and child are residents of or domiciled within the boundaries of a
federally recognized Indian reservation over which the tribe exercises
exclusive jurisdiction;
(i) Relating to petitions to compel disclosure of information filed
by the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW
74.13.042; and
(j) Relating to judicial determinations and permanency planning
hearings involving developmentally disabled children who have been
placed in out-of-home care pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement
between the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the
department of social and health services.
(2) The family court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the juvenile court over all proceedings under this section if the
superior court judges of a county authorize concurrent jurisdiction as
provided in RCW 26.12.010.
(3) The juvenile court shall have concurrent original jurisdiction
with the family court over child custody proceedings under chapter
26.10 RCW as provided for in RCW 13.34.155.
(4) A juvenile subject to adult superior court jurisdiction under
subsection (1)(e)(i) through (v) of this section, who is detained
pending trial, may be detained in a detention facility as defined in
RCW 13.40.020 pending sentencing or a dismissal.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.020 and 2004 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the
following: Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy
classes; counseling, outpatient substance abuse treatment programs,
outpatient mental health programs, anger management classes, education
or outpatient treatment programs to prevent animal cruelty, or other
services; or attendance at school or other educational programs
appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school district.
Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;
(2) Community-based sanctions may include one or more of the
following:
(a) A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;
(b) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours of
community restitution;
(3) "Community restitution" means compulsory service, without
compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community
restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or
through work crews;
(4) "Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the
court of an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an
order granting a deferred disposition. A community supervision order
for a single offense may be for a period of up to two years for a sex
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030 and up to one year for other
offenses. As a mandatory condition of any term of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to refrain from
committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the
mandatory school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to
inform the school of the existence of this requirement. Community
supervision is an individualized program comprised of one or more of
the following:
(a) Community-based sanctions;
(b) Community-based rehabilitation;
(c) Monitoring and reporting requirements;
(d) Posting of a probation bond;
(5) "Confinement" means physical custody by the department of
social and health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with the state, or physical custody in a detention facility
operated by or pursuant to a contract with any county. The county may
operate or contract with vendors to operate county detention
facilities. The department may operate or contract to operate
detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days
imposed as part of a disposition or modification order may be served
consecutively or intermittently, in the discretion of the court;
(6) "Court," when used without further qualification, means the
juvenile court judge(s) or commissioner(s);
(7) "Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the
respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:
(a) The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent
is convicted of two or more charges arising out of the same course of
conduct, only the highest charge from among these shall count as an
offense for the purposes of this chapter; or
(b) The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after
an advisement to the respondent that the criminal complaint would be
considered as part of the respondent's criminal history. A
successfully completed deferred adjudication that was entered before
July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be considered part of
the respondent's criminal history;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the
county, for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have
committed an offense or an adjudicated offender subject to a
disposition or modification order. "Detention facility" includes
county group homes, inpatient substance abuse programs, juvenile basic
training camps, and electronic monitoring;
(10) "Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into
a diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other
person, community accountability board, youth court under the
supervision of the juvenile court, or other entity except a law
enforcement official or entity, with whom the juvenile court
administrator has contracted to arrange and supervise such agreements
pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any person, community accountability
board, or other entity specially funded by the legislature to arrange
and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with the requirements
of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "community
accountability board" means a board comprised of members of the local
community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior court
shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include
a variety of representatives from the community, such as a law
enforcement officer, teacher or school administrator, high school
student, parent, and business owner, and should represent the cultural
diversity of the local community;
(11) "Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family
home or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by
the department, or other legally authorized care;
(12) "Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant
to chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;
(13) "Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that
requires intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of
individualized treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes
community involvement and support in order to reduce the likelihood a
juvenile offender will commit further offenses;
(14) "Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any individual who is
under the chronological age of eighteen years and who ((has not been
previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or
who)) is not otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;
(15) "Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by
the juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person
eighteen years of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended
under RCW 13.40.300;
(16) "Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0-30 days of confinement; (b) 0-12 months of community supervision; (c)
0-150 hours of community restitution; or (d) $0-$500 fine;
(17) "Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either
impose an excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious,
and clear danger to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;
(18) "Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of
the following: Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work,
or court-ordered treatment programs during specified hours;
restrictions from leaving or entering specified geographical areas;
requirements to report to the probation officer as directed and to
remain under the probation officer's supervision; and other conditions
or limitations as the court may require which may not include
confinement;
(19) "Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if
committed by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance
of any city or county of this state, under any federal law, or under
the law of another state if the act occurred in that state;
(20) "Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security
by a surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the
offender's appearance at required court proceedings and compliance with
court-ordered community supervision or conditions of release ordered
pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or 13.40.050. It also means a deposit of
cash or posting of other collateral in lieu of a bond if approved by
the court;
(21) "Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;
(22) "Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to
the victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for
injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical
treatment for physical injury to persons, lost wages resulting from
physical injury, and costs of the victim's counseling reasonably
related to the offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement
for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible
losses. Nothing in this chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies
or defenses available to the victim or offender;
(23) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant
secretary for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;
(24) "Services" means services which provide alternatives to
incarceration for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated
guilty of an offense or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to
this chapter;
(25) "Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW
9.94A.030;
(26) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which
the respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification;
(27) "Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws
or by the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property,
or probation bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the
superior court of the county having jurisdiction of the case;
(28) "Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an
adult, must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by
sanctions which do not include incarceration;
(29) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030;
(30) "Youth court" means a diversion unit under the supervision of
the juvenile court.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.110 and 1997 c 338 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Discretionary decline hearing - The prosecutor, respondent, or
the court on its own motion may, before a hearing on the information on
its merits, file a motion requesting the court to transfer the
respondent for adult criminal prosecution and the matter shall be set
for a hearing on the question of declining jurisdiction.
(2) Mandatory decline hearing - Unless waived by the court, the
parties, and their counsel, a decline hearing shall be held when:
(a) The respondent is ((fifteen,)) sixteen((,)) or seventeen years
of age and the information alleges a class A felony or an attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class A felony;
(b) The respondent is seventeen years of age and the information
alleges assault in the second degree, extortion in the first degree,
indecent liberties, child molestation in the second degree, kidnapping
in the second degree, or robbery in the second degree; or
(c) The information alleges an escape by the respondent and the
respondent is serving a minimum juvenile sentence to age twenty-one.
(((2))) (3) The court after a decline hearing may order the case
transferred for adult criminal prosecution upon a finding that the
declination would be in the best interest of the juvenile or the
public. The court shall consider the relevant reports, facts,
opinions, and arguments presented by the parties and their counsel.
(((3))) (4) When the respondent is transferred for criminal
prosecution or retained for prosecution in juvenile court, the court
shall set forth in writing its finding which shall be supported by
relevant facts and opinions produced at the hearing.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.40.308 and 2007 c 199 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a respondent is adjudicated of taking a motor vehicle
without permission in the first degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.070, the
court shall impose the following minimum sentence, in addition to any
restitution the court may order payable to the victim:
(a) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of zero to one-half points shall be sentenced to a standard range sentence that
includes no less than ((five days of home detention)) three months of
community supervision, forty-five hours of community restitution,
((and)) a two hundred dollar fine, and a requirement that the juvenile
remain at home such that the juvenile is confined to a private
residence for no less than five days. The juvenile may be subject to
electronic monitoring where available. If the juvenile is enrolled in
school, the confinement shall be served on nonschool days;
(b) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of three-quarters
to one and one-half points shall be sentenced to (([a])) a standard
range sentence that includes six months of community supervision, no
less than ten days of detention, ninety hours of community restitution,
and a four hundred dollar fine; and
(c) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of two or more
points shall be sentenced to no less than fifteen to thirty-six weeks
((of confinement, seven days of home detention)) commitment to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration, four months of parole
supervision, ninety hours of community restitution, ((and)) a four
hundred dollar fine, and a requirement that the juvenile remain at home
such that the juvenile is confined in a private residence for no less
than seven days. The juvenile may be subject to electronic monitoring
where available. If the juvenile is enrolled in school, the
confinement shall be served on nonschool days.
(2) If a respondent is adjudicated of theft of a motor vehicle as
defined under RCW 9A.56.065, or possession of a stolen vehicle as
defined under RCW 9A.56.068, the court shall impose the following
minimum sentence, in addition to any restitution the court may order
payable to the victim:
(a) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of zero to one-half points shall be sentenced to a standard range sentence that
includes ((either: (i) No less than five days of home detention and))
no less than three months of community supervision, forty-five hours of
community restitution((; or (ii) no home detention and ninety hours of
community restitution)), a two hundred dollar fine, and either ninety
hours of community restitution or a requirement that the juvenile
remain at home such that the juvenile is confined in a private
residence for no less than five days. The juvenile may be subject to
electronic monitoring where available;
(b) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of three-quarters
to one and one-half points shall be sentenced to (([a])) a standard
range sentence that includes no less than six months of community
supervision, no less than ten days of detention, ninety hours of
community restitution, and a four hundred dollar fine; and
(c) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of two or more
points shall be sentenced to no less than fifteen to thirty-six weeks
((of confinement, seven days of home detention)) commitment to the
juvenile rehabilitation administration, four months of parole
supervision, ninety hours of community restitution, ((and)) a four
hundred dollar fine, and a requirement that the juvenile remain at home
such that the juvenile is confined in a private residence for no less
than seven days. If the juvenile is enrolled in school, the
confinement shall be served on nonschool days. The juvenile may be
subject to electronic monitoring where available.
(3) If a respondent is adjudicated of taking a motor vehicle
without permission in the second degree as defined in RCW 9A.56.075,
the court shall impose a standard range as follows:
(a) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of zero to one-half points shall be sentenced to a standard range sentence that
includes ((either: (i) No less than one day of home detention, one))
three months of community supervision((, and)) fifteen hours of
community restitution((; or (ii) no home detention, one month of
supervision, and thirty hours of community restitution)) and a
requirement that the juvenile remain at home such that the juvenile is
confined in a private residence for no less than one day. If the
juvenile is enrolled in school, the confinement shall be served on
nonschool days. The juvenile may be subject to electronic monitoring
where available;
(b) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of three-quarters
to one and one-half points shall be sentenced to a standard range
sentence that includes no less than one day of detention, ((two days of
home detention, two)) three months of community supervision, thirty
hours of community restitution, ((and)) a one hundred fifty dollar fine
and a requirement that the juvenile remain at home such that the
juvenile is confined in a private residence for no less than two days.
If the juvenile is enrolled in school, the confinement shall be served
on nonschool days. The juvenile may be subject to electronic
monitoring where available; and
(c) Juveniles with a prior criminal history score of two or more
points shall be sentenced to no less than three days of detention,
((seven days of home detention, three)) six months of community
supervision, forty-five hours of community restitution, ((and)) a one
hundred fifty dollar fine, and a requirement that the juvenile remain
at home such that the juvenile is confined in a private residence for
no less than seven days. If the juvenile is enrolled in school, the
confinement shall be served on nonschool days. The juvenile may be
subject to electronic monitoring where available.

--- END ---