BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the production of
plastics worldwide consumes about two hundred seventy million metric
tons of fossil fuel each year. This production represents a
significant source of greenhouse gas emissions. It is the purpose of
this chapter to accomplish greenhouse gas reductions by reducing the
amount of plastics and plastic products and increasing the amount of
carbon stored in managed forests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to any other taxes, there is
hereby levied a plastics tax collected by the department from every
person engaging within the business of primary plastics manufacturing
or of primary plastic container manufacturing in this state; as to such
persons the amount of the tax is equal to the value of the products
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of .215 percent.
(2) "Primary" as used in "primary plastics manufacturing" and
"primary plastic container manufacturing" for the purposes of this
section must be defined by rule by the department.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Container" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.95F.010;
(b) "Plastic" and "plastics" have the same meaning as "plastic" in
RCW 70.95F.010; and
(c) "Plastics manufacturing" and "plastic container manufacturing"
means manufacturing industries within the following classifications
under the North American industry classification system: 3252, 3261,
3332, 3335, and 42.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Taxes collected under section 2 of this act
must be deposited in the climate protection forestry account for
financial incentives for the forestry sector created in section 4 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The climate protection forestry account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts from the tax applied to
primary plastics manufacturing or manufacturing plastic containers
products paid under section 2 of this act must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for reasonable
administrative costs to develop, implement, and enforce this chapter.
Additionally, moneys from the account may only be expended for the
purpose of promoting emission reductions and carbon sequestration in
forestry. The department of natural resources and the forest practices
board must establish financial incentives for: (1) Forest landowners
to maintain and actively manage their forest land using management
activities, including but not limited to, thinning, fertilization,
genetics, timber stand improvement, and fire management; (2) forest
landowners to continue the production of timber and/or wood products;
and (3) using wood in building materials instead of the more intensive
fossil fuel products such as concrete, plastic, and steel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To the extent applicable, all of the
definitions of chapter 82.04 RCW and all of the provisions of chapter
82.32 RCW apply to the tax imposed in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

--- END ---