BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.32.195 and 2005 c 454 s 1 and 2005 c 164 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The commission may, without examination, issue a license to persons
who possess the qualifications set forth in this section.
(1) The commission may, upon written request of the dean of the
school of dentistry of the University of Washington, issue a license to
practice dentistry in this state to persons who have been licensed or
otherwise authorized to practice dentistry in another state or country
and who have been accepted for employment by the school of dentistry as
faculty members. For purposes of this subsection, this means teaching
members of the faculty of the school of dentistry of the University of
Washington. Such license shall permit the holder thereof to practice
dentistry within the confines of the university facilities for a period
of one year while he or she is so employed as a faculty member by the
school of dentistry of the University of Washington. It shall
terminate whenever the holder ceases to be a faculty member. Such
license shall permit the holder thereof to practice dentistry only in
connection with his or her duties in employment with the school of
dentistry of the University of Washington. This limitation shall be
stated on the license.
(2) The commission may, upon written request of the dean of the
school of dentistry of the University of Washington or the director of
a postdoctoral dental residency program ((under RCW 18.32.040))
approved by the commission, issue a limited license to practice
dentistry in this state to university residents in postgraduate dental
education or postdoctorate residents in a dental residency program
((under RCW 18.32.040)) approved by the commission. The license shall
permit the resident dentist to provide dental care only in connection
with his or her duties as a university resident or a postdoctorate
resident in a program ((under RCW 18.32.040)) approved by the
commission.
(3) The commission may condition the granting of a license under
this section with terms the commission deems appropriate. All persons
licensed under this section shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the
commission to the same extent as other members of the dental
profession, in accordance with this chapter, and in addition the
licensee may be disciplined by the commission after a hearing has been
held in accordance with the provisions set forth in this chapter, and
determination by the commission that such licensee has violated any of
the restrictions set forth in this section.
(4) Persons applying for licensure pursuant to this section shall
pay the application fee determined by the secretary and, in the event
the license applied for is issued, a license fee at the rate provided
for licenses generally. After review by the commission, licenses
issued under this section may be renewed annually if the licensee
continues to be employed as a faculty member of the school of dentistry
of the University of Washington, or a university resident in
postgraduate dental education, or a postdoctorate resident in a dental
residency program ((under RCW 18.32.040)) approved by the commission,
and otherwise meets the requirements of the provisions and conditions
deemed appropriate by the commission. Any person who obtains a license
pursuant to this section may, without an additional application fee,
apply for licensure under this chapter, in which case the applicant
shall be subject to examination and the other requirements of this
chapter.

--- END ---