BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any disciplinary case pertaining to a dentist where there is
a contested hearing, if the commission or its hearing panel makes the
finding requisite for, and imposes upon the dentist, a disciplinary
sanction or fine under RCW 18.130.160, unless it determines to waive
the assessment of a hearing fee, it shall assess against the licensee
a partial recovery of the state's hearing expenses as follows:
(a) The partial recovery hearing fee must be:
(i) An amount equal to six thousand dollars for each full hearing
day in the proceeding and one-half of that amount for any partial
hearing day; and
(ii) A partial recovery of investigative and hearing preparation
expenses in an amount as found to be reasonable reimbursement under the
circumstances but no more than ten thousand dollars;
(b) Substantiation of investigative and hearing preparation
expenses for purposes of (a) of this subsection may be by affidavit or
declaration descriptive of efforts expended, which are reviewable in
the hearing as would be a cost bill;
(c) The commission or its hearing panel may waive the partial
recovery hearing fee if it determines the assessment of the fee (i)
would create substantial undue hardship for the dentist, or (ii) in all
the circumstances of the case, including the nature of the charges
alleged, it would be manifestly unjust to assess the fee.
Consideration of the waiver must be applied for and considered during
the hearing itself. This may be in advance of the decision related to
RCW 18.130.160.
(2) If the dentist seeks judicial review of the disciplinary action
and there was a partial recovery hearing fee assessed, then unless the
license holder achieves a substantial element of relief, the reviewing
trial court or appellate court shall further impose a partial cost
recovery fee in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars at the
superior court level, twenty-five thousand dollars at the court of
appeals level, and twenty-five thousand dollars at the supreme court
level. Application for waiver may be made to the court at each level
and must be considered by the court under the standards stated in
subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(3) In any disciplinary case pertaining to a dentist where the case
is resolved by agreement prior to completion of a contested hearing,
the commission shall assess against the dentist a partial recovery of
investigative and hearing preparation expenses in an amount as found to
be reasonable reimbursement in the circumstances but no more than ten
thousand dollars, unless it determines to waive this fee under the
standards stated in subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(4) In any stipulated informal disposition of allegations
pertaining to a dentist as contemplated under RCW 18.130.172, the
potential dollar limit of reimbursement of investigative and processing
costs may not exceed two thousand dollars per allegation.
(5) Should the dentist fail to pay any agreed reimbursement or
ordered cost recovery under the statute, the commission may seek
collection of the amount in the same manner as enforcement of a fine
under RCW 18.130.165.
(6) All fee recoveries and reimbursements under this statute must
be deposited to the health professions account for the portion of it
allocated to the commission. The fee recoveries shall be fully
credited in reduction of actual or projected expenditures used to
determine dentist license renewal fees.
(7) The authority of the commission under this section is in
addition to all of its authorities under RCW 18.130.160, elsewhere in
chapter 18.130 RCW, or in this chapter.

--- END ---