BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act may be known and cited as the
health care choice act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that, based upon
a comprehensive report by the national institutes of health and other
research data, hundreds of thousands of individuals in this state are
presently receiving a substantial amount of health care from providers
of health care services who are not licensed, registered, or certified
by this state. Such health care services are often referred to as
complementary and alternative health care practices or natural healing
therapies and modalities.
(2) The legislature, in RCW 18.120.010, confirms its intent that
all individuals should be permitted to enter into a health profession
unless there is an overwhelming need for the state to protect the
interests of the public by restricting entry into the profession and,
if such a need is identified, the regulation adopted by the state
should be set at the least restrictive level consistent with the public
interest to be protected.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to allow health care
practitioners who are not licensed, certified, or registered by the
state, to provide health care services, unless there is clear and
convincing evidence that the specific health care service causes
serious physical or mental harm or causes imminent and significant risk
of discernable, significant, and serious physical or mental injury,
under the circumstances in which the health care practitioner knew, or
in the exercise of reasonable care should have known, would result in
such injury.
(4) It is recognized that this chapter may authorize conduct by
health care practitioners who are not licensed, certified, or
registered by the state, which may be interpreted by the department of
health or regulatory boards or commissions as overlapping with the
statutory definition of the unlicensed practice of a health profession
in RCW 18.120.020(4). It is the intent of this chapter to provide
those practicing under this chapter safe harbor from violations of
other provisions in this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Health care services" means health care and healing therapies
and methods that are not prohibited by section 4 of this act and that
are provided by a person who is not licensed, certified, or registered
as a health care practitioner by this state. "Health care services"
include, but are not limited to, the use of:
(a) Natural elements such as air, heat, water, and light;
(b) Class I or class II medical devices approved by the federal
food and drug administration;
(c) Other medical devices, tools, or procedures that may be
nontraditional, unique, or experimental;
(d) Vitamins, minerals, herbs, natural food products and their
extracts, and nutritional supplements;
(e) Dietary supplements as defined by the federal dietary
supplement and health education act of 1994;
(f) Homeopathic remedies;
(g) Detoxification practices, including but not limited to sauna,
foot baths, baths including the addition of herbs or other substances,
colon hydrotherapy, and oxidative therapies; and
(h) Traditional cultural health care practices.
(2) "Diagnosis" means an intentional statement that someone has a
specific medical condition reflected in the ICD-10 coding scheme or set
out in an authoritative textbook relied upon by licensed practitioners
of a specific regulated health care discipline.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
a person who provides health care services in accordance with this
chapter, but who is not licensed, certified, or registered by this
state as a health care professional or practitioner, shall not be in
violation of a law based on the unlicensed practice of a health
profession as defined in RCW 18.120.020(4) unless the person:
(1) Holds out, states, indicates, advertises, or implies to any
person that he or she is a licensed, certified, or registered health
care practitioner under the laws of the state;
(2) Performs surgery or any other procedure that harmfully severs
or punctures the tissue of the body, except for finger pricking for
screening purposes;
(3) Prescribes or administers X-ray radiation or any other form of
ionizing radiation to any person;
(4) Prescribes or dispenses corrective vision lenses or prescribes
or administers vision therapy;
(5) Prescribes or administers a legend drug or controlled substance
that state or federal law requires be prescribed or dispensed to the
end user exclusively by a licensed, certified, or registered health
care practitioner;
(6) Performs a chiropractic adjustment of the articulations of
joints or the spine;
(7) Provides deep stroking of the muscle tissue of the human body,
or represents that a practice is massage therapy;
(8) Sets fractures;
(9) Performs a health care service that is specifically described
as the exclusive purview of the licensed practitioner in the individual
practice acts of health professions as defined in RCW 18.120.020(4) and
is included in the curriculum of the profession's required educational
programs, and is routinely practiced by members of that profession,
provided that it does not fall under any exception in this chapter and
is not routinely performed by laymen as self-care;
(10) Provides an initial diagnosis; or
(11) Diagnoses and treats a physical or mental condition of any
person that causes an individual serious physical or mental harm or
causes imminent and significant risk of physical or mental injury,
under the circumstances in which the health care practitioner knew, or
in the exercise of reasonable care should have known, would result in
such injury. Such injury or risk of injury must be proven by clear and
convincing evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any person providing health care
services who is not licensed, certified, or registered by this state
and who is advertising or charging a fee for health care services,
shall, prior to providing such services on a fee basis, disclose to the
individual, a written statement with the following provisions:
(a) A statement that the practitioner is not a state licensed,
certified, or registered practitioner;
(b) The practitioner's name, business address, and telephone
number;
(c) The nature of the health care services available;
(d) The highest academic degree or credential obtained by the
practitioner, the field of study or credential and the name of the
institution from which it was obtained.
(2) A written copy of this statement must be posted in a prominent
location in the office or treatment location of the practitioner
providing the service in at least a twelve-pitch font size, or shall be
incorporated in other written materials provided to the clients if the
practitioner does not physically meet with them in a fixed business
location. Reasonable accommodations shall be made for those clients
who cannot read or who have communication impairments and those who do
not read or speak English or the language of the providing
practitioner.
(3) The practitioner must also obtain informed consent prior to
providing services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1)(a) The legislature finds that the
practices covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable
in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.
(b) The attorney general may bring an action to obtain a cease and
desist order against a practitioner for a violation. In any proceeding
under this chapter, the attorney general bears the burden of proof and
must meet that burden with clear and convincing evidence. However,
before enforcement proceedings may commence, good faith mediation must
be utilized by the state in an attempt to bring a practitioner into
voluntary compliance with this section.
(2) Notwithstanding state laws that define the unlicensed practice
of a health profession as defined in RCW 18.120.020(4), any alternative
or complementary health care services that are being provided or
practitioners that are providing services in compliance with this
chapter are outside the scope and jurisdiction of the professional
quality assurance commissions or regulatory boards and the uniform
disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Any pending investigations or disciplinary
actions that could not be brought under the provisions of this chapter
shall be dismissed within thirty days of the effective date of this
act. Any disciplinary sanctions that have been imposed in pending or
final actions that could not be brought under the provisions of this
chapter, are revoked and must be expunged within sixty days of the
effective date of this act without application by the health care
practitioner. All fines or costs collected shall be refunded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act does not prevent any health care
professional who is licensed, certified, or registered by this state,
from providing health care services under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---