BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.031 and 2008 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An investigation
is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not the
result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation
reveals that a crime against a child may have been committed, the
department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor placements of children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care
being provided is within the scope of the intent of the legislature as
defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010. The policy for monitoring
placements under this section shall require that children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and their caregivers receive a
private and individual face-to-face visit each month.
(a) The department shall conduct the monthly visits with children
and caregivers required under this section unless the child's placement
is being supervised under a contract between the department and a
private agency accredited by a national child welfare accrediting
entity, in which case the private agency shall, within existing
resources, conduct the monthly visits with the child and with the
child's caregiver according to the standards described in this
subsection and shall provide the department with a written report of
the visits within fifteen days of completing the visits.
(b) In cases where the monthly visits required under this
subsection are being conducted by a private agency, the department
shall conduct a face-to-face health and safety visit with the child at
least once every ninety days.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(a) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group
care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to allow
up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh school
academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support and
transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) A youth who remains eligible for such placement and services
pursuant to department rules may continue in foster care or group care
until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Eligibility
requirements shall include active enrollment in a posthigh school
academic or vocational program and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point
average.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide
preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten
the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to
youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of age,
and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been in
foster care.
(15) Consult at least quarterly with foster parents, including
members of the foster parent association of Washington state, for the
purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the
department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.
(16)(a) Within current funding levels, place on the public web site
maintained by the department a document listing the duties and
responsibilities the department has to a child subject to a dependency
petition including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) Reasonable efforts, including the provision of services, toward
reunification of the child with his or her family;
(ii) Sibling visits subject to the restrictions in RCW
13.34.136(2)(b)(ii);
(iii) Parent-child visits;
(iv) Statutory preference for placement with a relative, if
appropriate; and
(v) Statutory preference that an out-of-home placement be found
that would allow the child to remain in the same school district, if
practical.
(b) The document must be prepared in conjunction with a community-based organization and must be updated as needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW
to read as follows:
Once a dependency is established under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
social worker assigned to the case shall provide the dependent child
with a document containing the information contained in RCW
74.13.031(16). The social worker shall also explain the content of the
document to the child and direct the child to the department's web site
for further information. The social worker shall document, in the
electronic data system, that this requirement was met.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At a disposition, review, or any other hearing that occurs
after a dependency is established under this chapter, the court shall
ensure that a dependent child over the age of twelve, who is otherwise
present in the courtroom, is aware of and understands the duties and
responsibilities the department has to a child subject to a dependency
including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Reasonable efforts, including the provision of services, toward
reunification of the child with his or her family;
(b) Sibling visits subject to the restrictions in RCW
13.34.136(2)(b)(ii);
(c) Parent-child visits;
(d) Statutory preference for placement with a relative, if
appropriate; and
(e) Statutory preference that an out-of-home placement be found
that would allow the child to remain in the same school district, if
practical.
(2) If the dependent child is already represented by counsel, the
court need not comply with subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---