BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the department of
natural resources has difficulty maintaining recreation sites they own
because of insufficient funds. These recreation sites are enjoyed not
only for family outings, but also by a wide variety of groups including
youth organizations, hunters, fishers, horsemen, hikers, bikers, people
who view wildlife, and other outdoor recreation groups. The
legislature finds that the lack of funds to maintain and repair these
recreation sites may result in the closure of some of these sites to
the public at a time when the demand for outdoor recreation areas
continues to increase.
The legislature recognizes that many state residents enjoy visiting
state-owned recreation sites throughout different parts of the state.
The legislature is aware that although the department of natural
resources currently does not charge a day-use fee at their recreation
sites, there is a possibility that these fees may be imposed at some
future date. The legislature also finds that the creation of a
renewable annual recreation pass may result in many more people
visiting a number of recreation sites within the state because of
better maintained facilities and increased awareness of recreation
opportunities. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to create
a recreation pass that will be available to serve as a renewable annual
recreation pass for recreation sites owned by the department of natural
resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(2) "Pass" or "recreation pass" means the recreation pass created
under section 3 of this act.
(3) "Recreation site" means those areas designated by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The recreation pass is created as a
renewable annual pass that is valid at any recreation site owned by the
department. The cost of the pass may not exceed fifteen dollars,
except that the amount of the fee may be adjusted for inflation by the
office of financial management subject to the limitation contained in
RCW 43.135.055(1).
(2) The department must encourage the person purchasing the pass to
answer optional questions regarding how often they are likely to use
the pass during the year and on which recreation sites they are likely
to use the pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person must purchase and display a recreation pass created
under section 3 of this act for access to recreation sites owned by the
department.
(2) The department may exempt nonprofits, youth groups, and other
persons from the requirements of chapter 79.-- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 9 of this act) if it is in the public interest to do
so.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The recreation pass must be displayed
from the interior of the motor vehicle so that it is clearly visible
from outside of the motor vehicle before entering upon or using the
motor vehicle on a recreation site. The pass can be transferred
between two vehicles and must contain space for the vehicle license
numbers of each vehicle.
(2) Failure to display the recreation pass in accordance with this
section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. Department employees
may issue a notice of infraction to the registered owner of any motor
vehicle entering upon or using the motor vehicle without the recreation
pass. The penalty for failure to clearly display the required pass or
permit is sixty-six dollars. This penalty is reduced to thirty dollars
if the registered owner provides proof to the court that he or she
purchased a recreation pass within fifteen days after the issuance of
the violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The department of natural resources
recreation pass account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from the sales of the recreation pass under
section 3 of this act and penalties collected under section 4 of this
act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account
may only be used by the department as provided in subsection (2) of
this section. Only the director of the department or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.
(2) The department must use at least seventy-five percent of the
funds for maintenance, repair, and equipment for the department's
recreation sites. No more than twenty-five percent of the funds may be
used for the costs of collecting the fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall determine the annual rent for any lease of
state-owned aquatic lands for a water-dependent use that qualifies for
a youth recreation aquatic lands lease rate by following the method set
forth in RCW 79.105.240 (1) through (6) and then multiplying the
resulting amount by one-half.
(2) To be eligible for a youth recreation aquatic lands lease rate,
an organization must: (a) Be exempt from federal income tax under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3); and (b) certify that the primary use of the
aquatic lands is boating and maritime recreation and instruction for
youth.
(3) Upon request, the department shall promptly redetermine under
subsection (1) of this section the annual rent for a lease of state-owned aquatic lands existing on the effective date of this section
that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If the department determines that a lease with an annual rent
determined under subsection (1) of this section no longer meets the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
promptly redetermine the annual rent under RCW 79.105.240.

Sec. 8 RCW 79.105.240 and 2005 c 155 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in section 7 of this act and by this
chapter, annual rent rates for the lease of state-owned aquatic lands
for water-dependent uses shall be determined as follows:
(1)(a) The assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in
conjunction with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of
the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided
by the parcel area equals the upland value.
(b) The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.
(2) As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the real capitalization rate to be applied
to water-dependent aquatic land leases commencing or being adjusted
under subsection (3)(a) of this section in that fiscal year. The real
capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return, except that until
June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five percent and
thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in any
one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.
(3) The annual rent shall be:
(a) Determined initially, and redetermined every four years or as
otherwise provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land value
times the real capitalization rate; and
(b) Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the rent is
not determined under (a) of this subsection.
(4) If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area
is not assessed or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes
of the lease, the nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar
purposes shall be substituted and the lease payment determined in the
same manner as provided in this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax
parcel, some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled
tidelands or shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as uplands in determining
aquatic land values.
(6) The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have
the characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with
RCW 79.105.270 in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has
a right to charge for the fill.
(7) For all new leases for other water-dependent uses, issued after
December 31, 1997, the initial annual water-dependent rent shall be
determined by the methods in subsections (1) through (6) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 3, 5, and 6 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

--- END ---