BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that the
practices of body piercing and body art involve an invasive procedure
with the use of needles, single-use disposable sharps, reusable sharps,
instruments, and jewelry. These practices may be dangerous when
improperly sterilized, presenting a risk of infecting the client with
bloodborne pathogens including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis B,
and hepatitis C. It is in the interests of the public health, safety,
and welfare to establish requirements in the commercial practice of
body piercing in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 and 3
through 5 of this act and RCW 5.40.050 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Body art" means the practice of physical cosmetic body
adornment including the use of branding and scarification. "Body art"
also includes the intentional production of scars upon the body. "Body
art" does not include any health-related procedures performed by
licensed health practitioners under their scope of practice.
(2) "Body piercing" means the process of penetrating the skin or
mucous membrane for the purpose of insertion of an object, including
jewelry, for cosmetic purposes. "Body piercing" also includes any scar
tissue resulting from or relating to the piercing. "Body piercing"
does not include the use of stud and clasp piercing systems to pierce
the earlobe in accordance with the manufacturer's directions and
applicable United States food and drug administration requirements.
"Body piercing" does not include any health-related procedures
performed by licensed health practitioners under their scope of
practice.
(3) "Local health jurisdiction" means a county board of health
organized under chapter 70.05 RCW, a health district organized under
70.46 RCW, or a combined city-county health department organized under
chapter 70.08 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of health shall adopt by rule requirements for
standard universal precautions, as recommended by the United States
centers for disease control and prevention, for preventing the spread
of disease and the sterilization of needles, single-use disposable
sharps, reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used by a person who
practices body piercing or body art.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person who practices body piercing or body art must comply
with the rules adopted by the department of health under section 3 of
this act.
(2) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
Local health jurisdictions shall develop rules and procedures to
monitor body piercing and tattooing facilities within their
jurisdictions to determine compliance with licensing, safety, infection
control, and sterilization requirements imposed by statute or rule of
the state and local boards of health.

Sec. 6 RCW 5.40.050 and 2001 c 194 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A breach of a duty imposed by statute, ordinance, or administrative
rule shall not be considered negligence per se, but may be considered
by the trier of fact as evidence of negligence; however, any breach of
duty as provided by statute, ordinance, or administrative rule relating
to electrical fire safety, the use of smoke alarms, sterilization of
needles and instruments used in tattooing or electrology as required
under RCW 70.54.350, standard universal precautions for preventing the
spread of disease and sterilization of needles, single-use disposable
sharps, reusable sharps, instruments, and jewelry used in body piercing
or body art as required under section 3 of this act, or driving while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, shall be
considered negligence per se.

--- END ---