BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.09.030 and 1988 c 254 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each horticultural pest and disease board shall be comprised of
five voting members, four of whom shall be appointed by the board of
county commissioners and one of whom shall be appointed by the
director. In addition, the chief county extension agent, or a county
extension agent appointed by the chief agent, shall be a nonvoting
member of the board.
Of the four members appointed by the board of county commissioners,
one of such members shall have at least a practical knowledge of
horticultural pests and diseases, and the other members shall be
residents of the county, shall own land within the county and shall be
engaged in the primary and commercial production of a horticultural
product or products. Such appointed members shall serve a term of two
years and shall serve without salary. If no such qualified candidate
resides in the county, a nonresident that owns property in the county
and is engaged in the primary and commercial production of a
horticultural product or products may be appointed as a member of the
horticultural pest and disease board.

--- END ---