BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 1997 c 368 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(((1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Thermal electric generation facilities play an important role
in providing jobs for residents of the communities where such plants
are located; and
(b) Taxes paid by thermal electric generation facilities help to
support schools and local and state government operations.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to assist thermal electric
generation facilities placed in operation after December 31, 1969, and
before July 1, 1975, to update their air pollution control equipment
and abate pollution by extending certain tax exemptions and credits so
that such plants may continue to play a long-term vital economic role
in the communities where they are located.)) (1) The legislature finds
that the tax policy of the state should be consistent with the green
house gas emissions reductions and clean energy jobs goals as
established in chapter 14 (Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2815), Laws of 2008.
(2) The legislature recognized the benefits of electric power and
employment opportunities provided by thermal electric generation
facilities when the legislature adopted tax incentives to encourage air
pollution control equipment updates and pollution abatement. However,
the unexpected closure of coal mining operations in the state in 2006
had an adverse impact on workers, families, and the economy of the
state. The tax incentives were originally based on continued
employment opportunities created by coal mining operations and, since
these operations were closed in 2006, the tax benefits for thermal
electric generation facilities are disproportionately high for the
number of jobs they now provide.
(3) The legislature finds that coal-powered thermal electric
generation facilities located in the state contribute approximately
twelve percent of the total greenhouse gas emissions of the state,
according to the December 2007 study, "greenhouse gas inventory and
reference case projections."
(4) The legislature, considering the environmental and economic
climate of the state, concludes that measures are necessary to address
climate change and potential closures of thermal electric generation
facilities in the state. Thus, it is the intent of the legislature
that the state will: (a) Develop programs to create new economic
opportunities in counties where coal-powered thermal electric
generation facilities are located; (b) identify strategies to replace
the energy generated by coal-powered thermal electric generation
facilities, including the use of energy conservation and energy
efficiency measures; and (c) repeal RCW 82.32.393 to provide funding
for the activities in this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.810 and 1997 c 368 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "air pollution control
facilities" mean any treatment works, control devices and disposal
systems, machinery, equipment, structures, property, property
improvements, and accessories, that are installed or acquired for the
primary purpose of reducing, controlling, or disposing of industrial
waste that, if released to the outdoor atmosphere, could cause air
pollution, or that are required to meet regulatory requirements
applicable to their construction, installation, or operation.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((does not apply to)) is
deferred for:
(a) Sales of tangible personal property to a light and power
business, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, for construction or installation
of air pollution control facilities at a thermal electric generation
facility; or
(b) Sales of, cost of, or charges made for labor and services
performed in respect to the construction or installation of air
pollution control facilities.
(3) The ((exemption)) deferral provided under this section applies
only to sales, costs, or charges:
(a) Incurred for air pollution control facilities constructed or
installed after May 15, 1997, and used in a thermal electric generation
facility placed in operation after December 31, 1969, and before July
1, 1975;
(b) If the air pollution control facilities are constructed or
installed to meet applicable regulatory requirements established under
state or federal law, including the Washington clean air act, chapter
70.94 RCW; and
(c) For which the purchaser provides the seller with ((an
exemption)) a deferral certificate, signed by the purchaser or
purchaser's agent, that includes a description of items or services for
which payment is made, the amount of the payment, and such additional
information as the department reasonably may require.
(4) This section does not apply to sales of tangible personal
property purchased or to sales of, costs of, or charges made for labor
and services used for maintenance or repairs of pollution control
equipment.
(5) ((If production of electricity at a thermal electric generation
facility for any calendar year after 2002 and before 2023 falls below
a twenty percent annual capacity factor for the generation facility,
all or a portion of the tax previously exempted under this section in
respect to construction or installation of air pollution control
facilities at the generation facility shall be due as follows:

Portion of previously

Year event occurs exempted tax due

2003 100%

2004 95%

2005 90%

2006 85%

2007 80%

2008 75%

2009 70%

2010 65%

2011 60%

2012 55%

2013 50%

2014 45%

2015 40%

2016 35%

2017 30%

2018 25%

2019 20%

2020 15%

2021 10%

2022 5%

2023 0%

(6) RCW 82.32.393 applies to this section.)) A taxpayer receiving
a deferral under this section must begin paying the deferred taxes on
July 1, 2013, with subsequent annual payments due on July 1st of the
succeeding four years. All taxes previously exempted under this
section are deferred as of August 1, 2009, and must be repaid under the
schedule in this subsection. The amounts of payment scheduled are as
follows:

Repayment Year % of Deferred Tax
to Repay

1 20%

2 20%

3 20%

4 20%

5 20%

(6) Interest is charged on any taxes deferred under this chapter
for the period of deferral. The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply
to the deferrals in this section, including penalties and interest for
assessed taxes and delinquent payments. The debt for deferred taxes is
not extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient.
(7) If a taxpayer receiving the deferral ceases operation and
decommissions the thermal electric generation facility before the first
payment of the deferral is due, the debt for deferred taxes need not be
repaid. However, any transfer of ownership occurring after August 1,
2009, terminates the deferral provided under this section and all
deferred taxes plus interest are immediately due.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.12.280 and 1997 c 368 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The displaced workers account is established. ((All moneys from
RCW 82.32.393 must be deposited into the account.)) Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only to provide for compensation and retraining of
displaced workers of the thermal electric generation facility and of
the coal mine that supplied coal to the facility. The benefits from
the account are in addition to all other compensation and retraining
benefits to which the displaced workers are entitled under existing
state law. The employment security department shall administer the
distribution of moneys from the account. Any funds remaining in the
account on June 30, 2020, must be deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The workforce training and education coordinating board, and local
associate development organizations, must develop a comprehensive plan
to increase employment opportunities for displaced workers receiving
assistance under section 5 of this act and improve the economic well-being in the county in which the thermal electric generation facility
is located. The plan is due to the governor and the legislature by
December 31, 2010. At minimum, the plan must consider:
(1) The need for increased investment for public infrastructure,
such as roads, rail, water systems, or sewer systems to support new
economic investments; and
(2) Opportunities and strategies to implement recommendations from
the studies related to the green economy jobs growth initiative
established in chapter 14, Laws of 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of community, trade, and economic development must
conduct an analysis to determine how the state can meet its energy
needs without using energy currently generated by thermal electric
generation facilities placed in operation after December 31, 1969, and
before July 1, 1975. The analysis must include strategies and
recommendations that are consistent with the state's greenhouse gas
emissions reductions and clean energy jobs goals established in chapter
14, Laws of 2008. The report is due to the governor and the
legislature by December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 84.36.487 (Air pollution control equipment in thermal
electric generation facilities -- Records -- Payments on cessation of
operation) and 1997 c 368 s 11;
(2) RCW 82.12.810 (Exemptions -- Air pollution control facilities at
a thermal electric generation facility -- Exceptions -- Payments on
cessation of operation) and 2003 c 5 s 12 & 1997 c 368 s 3;
(3) RCW 82.32.393 (Thermal electric generation facilities with tax
exemptions for air pollution control equipment -- Payments upon cessation
of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 12;
(4) RCW 82.08.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4; and
(5) RCW 82.12.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The sum of ten million dollars, which
reflects the increased revenue receipts from taxes repealed in section
6 of this act, or as much of the ten million dollars as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from
the general fund into the displaced workers account in RCW 50.12.280
for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---