BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this act is to make
technical, nonsubstantive changes to outdoor burning provisions of the
Washington clean air act, chapter 70.94 RCW, to improve clarity. No
provision of this act may be construed as a substantive change to the
Washington clean air act.

PART 1
OUTDOOR BURNING--GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW under the subchapter heading "outdoor burning" to read as follows:
As used in this subchapter, "outdoor burning" means the combustion
of material of any type in an open fire or in an outdoor container
without providing for the control of combustion or the control of
emissions from the combustion.

Sec. 102 RCW 70.94.775 and 1995 c 362 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in ((RCW 70.94.650(5))) section 601 of this act,
no person shall cause or allow any outdoor fire:
(1) Containing garbage, dead animals, asphalt, petroleum products,
paints, rubber products, plastics, or any substance other than natural
vegetation that normally emits dense smoke or obnoxious odors.
Agricultural heating devices that otherwise meet the requirements of
this chapter shall not be considered outdoor fires under this section;
(2) During a forecast, alert, warning or emergency condition as
defined in RCW 70.94.715 or impaired air quality condition as defined
in RCW 70.94.473.

Sec. 103 RCW 70.94.743 and 2004 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the policy of the state to reduce outdoor
burning to the greatest extent practical((:
(a))), outdoor burning shall not be allowed in:
(a) Any area of the state where federal or state ambient air
quality standards are exceeded for pollutants emitted by outdoor
burning((.
(b) Outdoor burning shall not be allowed in)); or
(b) Any urban growth area as defined by RCW 36.70A.030, or any city
of the state having a population greater than ten thousand people if
such cities are threatened to exceed state or federal air quality
standards, and alternative disposal practices consistent with good
solid waste management are reasonably available or practices
eliminating production of organic refuse are reasonably available.
((In no event shall such burning be allowed after December 31, 2000,
except that within the urban growth areas for cities having a
population of less than five thousand people, that are neither within
nor contiguous with any nonattainment or maintenance area designated
under the federal clean air act, in no event shall such burning be
allowed after December 31, 2006.
(c))) (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
outdoor burning may be allowed for the exclusive purpose of managing
storm or flood-related debris. The decision to allow burning shall be
made by the entity with permitting jurisdiction as determined under RCW
70.94.660 or 70.94.755 (as recodified by this act). If outdoor burning
is allowed in areas subject to subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this
((subsection)) section, a permit shall be required, and a fee may be
collected to cover the expenses of administering and enforcing the
permit. All conditions and restrictions pursuant to RCW 70.94.750(1)
and 70.94.775 (as recodified by this act) apply to outdoor burning
allowed under this section.
(((d)(i))) (3)(a) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and
customary to ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with
agricultural burning authorized under RCW 70.94.650 and 70.94.656 (as
recodified by this act), is allowed within the urban growth area ((as
defined in (b) of this subsection if the burning is not conducted
during air quality episodes, or where a determination of impaired air
quality has been made as provided in RCW 70.94.473, and the
agricultural activities preceded the designation as an urban growth
area)) in accordance with RCW 70.94.650(8)(a) (as recodified by this
act).
(((ii))) (b) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees((, whether
or not agricultural crops will be replanted on the land,)) shall be
allowed as an ongoing agricultural activity under this section ((if a
local horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09
RCW, an extension office agent with Washington State University that
has horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the
department of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an
appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural
pests or diseases)) in accordance with RCW 70.94.650(8)(b) (as
recodified by this act).
(((2) "Outdoor burning" means the combustion of material of any
type in an open fire or in an outdoor container without providing for
the control of combustion or the control of emissions from the
combustion.
(3))) (4) This section shall not apply to silvicultural burning
used to improve or maintain fire dependent ecosystems for rare plants
or animals within state, federal, and private natural area preserves,
natural resource conservation areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.

PART 2
OUTDOOR BURNING--PROGRAM
Sec. 201 RCW 70.94.755 and 1997 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each activated air pollution control authority, and the department
of ecology in those areas outside the jurisdictional boundaries of an
activated air pollution control authority, shall establish, through
regulations, ordinances, or policy, a program implementing the limited
burning policy authorized by RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.765 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec. 202 RCW 70.94.760 and 1986 c 100 s 55 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing contained in RCW ((70.94.740)) 70.94.743 through 70.94.765
(as recodified by this act) is intended to alter or change the
provisions of RCW 70.94.660 (as recodified by this act), 70.94.710
through 70.94.730, and 76.04.205.

Sec. 203 RCW 70.94.765 and 1972 ex.s. c 136 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
Nothing in RCW ((70.94.740)) 70.94.743 through 70.94.765 (as
recodified by this act) shall be construed as prohibiting a local air
pollution control authority or the department of ecology in those areas
outside the jurisdictional boundaries of an activated pollution control
authority from allowing the burning of outdoor fires.

PART 3
RESIDENTIAL AND LAND CLEARING BURNING
Sec. 301 RCW 70.94.745 and 1995 c 206 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be the responsibility and duty of the department of
natural resources, department of ecology, department of agriculture,
fire districts, and local air pollution control authorities to
establish, through regulations, ordinances, or policy, a limited
burning permit program.
(2) The permit program shall apply to residential and land clearing
burning in the following areas:
(a) In the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated
population of greater than fifty thousand; and
(b) In any city and urban growth area that is not otherwise
prohibited from burning pursuant to RCW 70.94.743 (as recodified by
this act).
(3) The permit program shall apply only to land clearing burning in
the nonurban areas of any county with an unincorporated population of
less than fifty thousand.
(4) The permit program may be limited to a general permit by rule,
or by verbal, written, or electronic approval by the permitting entity.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, neither a
permit nor the payment of a fee shall be required for outdoor burning
for the purpose of disposal of tumbleweeds blown by wind. Such burning
shall not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any stage of
impaired air quality declared under RCW ((70.94.714)) 70.94.715. This
subsection (5) shall only apply within counties with a population less
than two hundred fifty thousand.
(6) Burning shall be prohibited in an area when an alternate
technology or method of disposing of the organic refuse is available,
reasonably economical, and less harmful to the environment. It is the
policy of this state to foster and encourage development of alternate
methods or technology for disposing of or reducing the amount of
organic refuse.
(7) Incidental agricultural burning must be allowed without
applying for any permit and without the payment of any fee if:
(a) The burning is incidental to commercial agricultural
activities;
(b) The operator notifies the local fire department within the area
where the burning is to be conducted;
(c) The burning does not occur during an air pollution episode or
any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715; and
(d) Only the following items are burned:
(i) Orchard prunings;
(ii) Organic debris along fence lines or irrigation or drainage
ditches; or
(iii) Organic debris blown by wind.
(8) As used in this section, "nonurban areas" are unincorporated
areas within a county that ((is)) are not designated as ((an)) urban
growth areas under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(9) Nothing in this section shall require fire districts to enforce
air quality requirements related to outdoor burning, unless the fire
district enters into an agreement with the department of ecology,
department of natural resources, a local air pollution control
authority, or other appropriate entity to provide such enforcement.

Sec. 302 RCW 70.94.750 and 1991 c 199 s 412 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following outdoor fires described in this section may be burned
subject to the provisions of this chapter and also subject to city
ordinances, county resolutions, rules of fire districts and laws, and
rules enforced by the department of natural resources if a permit has
been issued by a fire protection agency, county, or conservation
district:
(1) Fires consisting of leaves, clippings, prunings and other yard
and gardening refuse originating on lands immediately adjacent and in
close proximity to a human dwelling and burned on such lands by the
property owner or his or her designee.
(2) Fires consisting of residue of a natural character such as
trees, stumps, shrubbery or other natural vegetation arising from land
clearing projects or agricultural pursuits for pest or disease control;
((provided)) except that the fires described in this subsection may be
prohibited in those areas having a general population density of one
thousand or more persons per square mile.

PART 4
AGRICULTURAL BURNING
Sec. 401 RCW 70.94.650 and 1998 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who proposes to set fires in the course of((:
(a) Weed abatement;
(b) Instruction in methods of fire fighting, except training to
fight structural fires as provided in RCW 52.12.150 or training to
fight aircraft crash rescue fires as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, and except forest fire training; or
(c))) agricultural activities((,)) shall obtain a permit from an
air pollution control authority, the department of ecology, or a local
entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654 (as
recodified by this act). General permit criteria of statewide
applicability shall be established by the department, by rule, after
consultation with the various air pollution control authorities.
(a) Permits shall be issued under this section based on seasonal
operations or by individual operations, or both. ((All permits shall
be conditioned))
(b) Incidental agricultural burning consistent with provisions
established in RCW 70.94.745 (as recodified by this act) is allowed
without applying for any permit and without the payment of any fee.
(2) The department of ecology, local air authorities, or a local
entity with delegated permit authority shall:
(a) Condition all permits to insure that the public interest in
air, water, and land pollution and safety to life and property is fully
considered((. In addition to any other requirements established by the
department to protect air quality pursuant to other laws, applicants
for permits must show that the setting of fires as requested is the
most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding life or property
under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary to
successfully carry out the enterprise in which the applicant is
engaged, or both.));
(b) Condition all burning permits ((will be designed)) to minimize
air pollution insofar as practical((. Nothing in this section shall
relieve the applicant from obtaining permits, licenses, or other
approvals required by any other law.));
(c) Act upon, within seven days from the date an application is
filed under this section, an application for a permit to set fires in
the course of agricultural burning for controlling diseases, insects,
weed abatement, or development of physiological conditions conducive to
increased crop yield((, shall be acted upon within seven days from the
date such application is filed. The department of ecology and local
air authorities shall));
(d) Provide convenient methods for issuance and oversight of
agricultural burning permits((. The department and local air
authorities shall,)); and
(e) Work, through agreement, ((work)) with counties and cities to
provide convenient methods for granting permission for agricultural
burning, including telephone, facsimile transmission, issuance from
local city or county offices, or other methods.
(3) A local air authority administering the permit program under
((this)) subsection (((1)(c))) (2) of this section shall not limit the
number of days of allowable agricultural burning, but may consider the
time of year, meteorological conditions, and other criteria specified
in rules adopted by the department to implement ((this)) subsection
(((1)(c))) (2) of this section.
(((2))) (4) In addition to following any other requirements
established by the department to protect air quality pursuant to other
laws, applicants for permits must show that the setting of fires as
requested is the most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding
life or property under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably
necessary to successfully carry out the enterprise in which the
applicant is engaged, or both. Nothing in this section relieves the
applicant from obtaining permits, licenses, or other approvals required
by any other law.
(5) The department of ecology, the appropriate local air authority,
or a local entity with delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW
70.94.654 (as recodified by this act) at the time the permit is issued
shall assess and collect permit fees ((shall be assessed)) for burning
under this section ((and shall be collected by the department of
ecology, the appropriate local air authority, or a local entity
delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.654 at the time
the permit is issued)). All fees collected shall be deposited in the
air pollution control account created in RCW 70.94.015, except for that
portion of the fee necessary to cover local costs of administering a
permit issued under this section. Fees shall be set by rule by the
permitting agency at the level determined by the task force created by
subsection (((4))) (6) of this section, but shall not exceed two
dollars and fifty cents per acre to be burned. After fees are
established by rule, any increases in such fees shall be limited to
annual inflation adjustments as determined by the state office of the
economic and revenue forecast council.
(((3) Conservation districts and the Washington State University
agricultural extension program in conjunction with the department shall
develop public education material for the agricultural community
identifying the health and environmental effects of agricultural
outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives to
agricultural outdoor burning.
(4))) (6) An agricultural burning practices and research task force
shall be established under the direction of the department. The task
force shall be composed of a representative from the department who
shall serve as chair; one representative of eastern Washington local
air authorities; three representatives of the agricultural community
from different agricultural pursuits; one representative of the
department of agriculture; two representatives from universities or
colleges knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of
the public health or medical community; and one representative of the
conservation districts. The task force shall:
(a) Identify best management practices for reducing air contaminant
emissions from agricultural activities and provide such information to
the department and local air authorities((. The task force shall));
(b) Determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting
agency pursuant to subsection (((2))) (5) of this section, based upon
the level necessary to cover the costs of administering and enforcing
the permit programs, to provide funds for research into alternative
methods to reduce emissions from such burning, and to the extent
possible be consistent with fees charged for such burning permits in
neighboring states. The fee level shall provide, to the extent
possible, for lesser fees for permittees who use best management
practices to minimize air contaminant emissions((. The task force
shall));
(c) Identify research needs related to minimizing emissions from
agricultural burning and alternatives to such burning((. Further, the
task force shall)); and
(d) Make recommendations to the department on priorities for
spending funds provided through this chapter for research into
alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning.
(((5) A permit is not required under this section, or under RCW
70.94.743 through 70.94.780, from an air pollution control authority,
the department, or any local entity with delegated permit authority,
for aircraft crash rescue fire training activities meeting the
following conditions:
(a) Firefighters participating in the training fires must be
limited to those who provide fire fighting support to an airport that
is either certified by the federal aviation administration or operated
in support of military or governmental activities;
(b) The fire training may not be conducted during an air pollution
episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW
70.94.715 for the area where training is to be conducted;
(c) The number of training fires allowed per year without a permit
shall be the minimum number necessary to meet federal aviation
administration or other federal safety requirements;
(d) The facility shall use current technology and be operated in a
manner that will minimize, to the extent possible, the air contaminants
generated during operation; and
(e) Prior to the commencement of the aircraft fire training, the
organization conducting training shall notify both the: (i) Local fire
district or fire department; and (ii) air pollution control authority,
department of ecology, or local entity delegated permitting authority
under RCW 70.94.654, having jurisdiction within the area where training
is to be conducted.
Written approval from the department or a local air pollution
control authority shall be obtained prior to the initial operation of
aircraft crash rescue fire training. Such approval will be granted to
fire training activities meeting the conditions in this subsection.
(6) Aircraft crash rescue fire training activities conducted in
compliance with this subsection are not subject to the prohibition, in
RCW 70.94.775(1), of outdoor fires containing petroleum products and
are not considered outdoor burning under RCW 70.94.743 through
70.94.780.
(7) To provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not
governed by subsection (6) of this section, or other actions to protect
public health and safety, the department or a local air pollution
control authority may issue permits that allow limited burning of
prohibited materials listed in RCW 70.94.775(1).))
(7) Conservation districts and the Washington State University
agricultural extension program in conjunction with the department shall
develop public education material for the agricultural community
identifying the health and environmental effects of agricultural
outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives to
agricultural outdoor burning.
(8)(a) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and customary to
ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with agricultural
burning authorized under this section and RCW 70.94.656 (as recodified
by this act), is allowed within the urban growth area as described in
RCW 70.94.743 (as recodified by this act) if the burning is not
conducted during air quality episodes, or where a determination of
impaired air quality has been made as provided in RCW 70.94.473, and
the agricultural activities preceded the designation as an urban growth
area.
(b) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees, whether or not
agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be allowed as
an ongoing agricultural activity under this section if a local
horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09 RCW, an
extension office agent with Washington State University that has
horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the department
of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an
appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural
pests or diseases.

Sec. 402 RCW 70.94.654 and 1993 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever an air pollution control authority, or the department of
ecology for areas outside the jurisdictional boundaries of an activated
air pollution control authority, shall find that any fire protection
agency, county, or conservation district is capable of effectively
administering the issuance and enforcement of permits for any or all of
the kinds of burning identified in RCW 70.94.650 (as recodified by this
act) and sections 601 and 704 of this act and desirous of doing so, the
authority or the department of ecology, as appropriate, may delegate
powers necessary for the issuance or enforcement, or both, of permits
for any or all of the kinds of burning to the fire protection agency,
county, or conservation district. Such delegation may be withdrawn by
the authority or the department of ecology upon finding that the fire
protection agency, county, or conservation district is not effectively
administering the permit program.

Sec. 403 RCW 70.94.656 and 1998 c 245 s 130 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state that strong
efforts should be made to minimize adverse effects on air quality from
the open burning of field and turf grasses grown for seed. To such end
this section is intended to promote the development of economical and
practical alternate agricultural practices to such burning, and to
provide for interim regulation of such burning until practical
alternates are found.
(1) The department shall approve of a study or studies for the
exploration and identification of economical and practical alternate
agricultural practices to the open burning of field and turf grasses
grown for seed. Any study conducted pursuant to this section shall be
conducted by Washington State University. The university may not
charge more than eight percent for administrative overhead. Prior to
the issuance of any permit for such burning under RCW 70.94.650 (as
recodified by this act), there shall be collected a fee not to exceed
one dollar per acre of crop to be burned. Any such fees received by
any authority shall be transferred to the department of ecology. The
department of ecology shall deposit all such acreage fees in a special
grass seed burning research account, hereby created, in the state
treasury.
(2) The department shall allocate moneys annually from this account
for the support of any approved study or studies as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section. Whenever the department of ecology
shall conclude that sufficient reasonably available alternates to open
burning have been developed, and at such time as all costs of any
studies have been paid, the grass seed burning research account shall
be dissolved, and any money remaining therein shall revert to the
general fund. The fee collected under subsection (1) of this section
shall constitute the research portion of fees required under RCW
70.94.650 (as recodified by this act) for open burning of grass grown
for seed.
(3) Whenever on the basis of information available to it, the
department after public hearings have been conducted wherein testimony
will be received and considered from interested parties wishing to
testify shall conclude that any procedure, program, technique, or
device constitutes a practical alternate agricultural practice to the
open burning of field or turf grasses grown for seed, the department
shall, by order, certify approval of such alternate. Thereafter, in
any case which any such approved alternate is reasonably available, the
open burning of field and turf grasses grown for seed shall be
disallowed and no permit shall issue therefor.
(4) Until approved alternates become available, the department or
the authority may limit the number of acres on a pro rata basis among
those affected for which permits to burn will be issued in order to
effectively control emissions from this source.
(5) Permits issued for burning of field and turf grasses may be
conditioned to minimize emissions insofar as practical, including
denial of permission to burn during periods of adverse meteorological
conditions.
(6) ((By November 1, 1996, and)) Every two years ((thereafter))
until grass seed burning is prohibited, Washington State University may
prepare a brief report assessing the potential of the university's
research to result in economical and practical alternatives to grass
seed burning.

PART 5
SILVICULTURAL BURNING
Sec. 501 RCW 70.94.660 and 1991 c 199 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of natural resources shall have the
responsibility for issuing and regulating burning permits required by
it relating to the following activities for the protection of life or
property and/or for the public health, safety, and welfare:
(a) Abating a forest fire hazard;
(b) Prevention of a fire hazard;
(c) Instruction of public officials in methods of forest fire
fighting;
(d) Any silvicultural operation to improve the forest lands of the
state; and
(e) Silvicultural burning used to improve or maintain fire
dependent ecosystems for rare plants or animals within state, federal,
and private natural area preserves, natural resource conservation
areas, parks, and other wildlife areas.
(2) The department of natural resources shall not retain such
authority, but it shall be the responsibility of the appropriate fire
protection agency for permitting and regulating outdoor burning on
lands where the department of natural resources does not have fire
protection responsibility.
(3) Permit fees shall be assessed for silvicultural burning under
the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources and collected
by the department of natural resources as provided for in this section.
All fees shall be deposited in the air pollution control account,
created in RCW 70.94.015. The legislature shall appropriate to the
department of natural resources funds from the air pollution control
account to enforce and administer the program under RCW 70.94.665 and
70.94.660, 70.94.670, and 70.94.690 (as recodified by this act). Fees
shall be set by rule by the department of natural resources at the
level necessary to cover the costs of the program after receiving
recommendations on such fees from the public and the forest fire
advisory board established by RCW 76.04.145.

Sec. 502 RCW 70.94.670 and 1991 c 199 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of natural resources in granting burning permits for
fires for the purposes set forth in RCW 70.94.660 (as recodified by
this act) shall condition the issuance and use of such permits to
comply with air quality standards established by the department of
ecology after full consultation with the department of natural
resources. Such burning shall not cause the state air quality
standards to be exceeded in the ambient air up to two thousand feet
above ground level over critical areas designated by the department of
ecology, otherwise subject to air pollution from other sources. Air
quality standards shall be established and published by the department
of ecology which shall also establish a procedure for advising the
department of natural resources when and where air contaminant levels
exceed or threaten to exceed the ambient air standards over such
critical areas. The air quality shall be quantitatively measured by
the department of ecology or the appropriate local air pollution
control authority at established monitoring stations over such
designated areas. Further, such permitted burning shall not cause
damage to public health or the environment. All permits issued under
this section shall be subject to all applicable fees, permitting,
penalty, and enforcement provisions of this chapter. The department of
natural resources shall set forth smoke dispersal objectives designed
consistent with this section to minimize any air pollution from such
burning and the procedures necessary to meet those objectives.
The department of natural resources shall encourage more intense
utilization in logging and alternative silviculture practices to reduce
the need for burning. The department of natural resources shall,
whenever practical, encourage landowners to develop and use alternative
acceptable disposal methods subject to the following priorities: (1)
Slash production minimization, (2) slash utilization, (3) nonburning
disposal, (4) silvicultural burning. Such alternative methods shall be
evaluated as to the relative impact on air, water, and land pollution,
public health, and their financial feasibility.
The department of natural resources shall not issue burning permits
and shall revoke previously issued permits at any time in any area
where the department of ecology or local board has declared a stage of
impaired air quality as defined in RCW 70.94.473.

Sec. 503 RCW 70.94.690 and 1991 c 199 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the regulation of outdoor burning not included in RCW 70.94.660
(as recodified by this act) requiring permits from the department of
natural resources, said department and the state, local, or regional
air pollution control authorities will cooperate in regulating such
burning so as to minimize insofar as possible duplicate inspections and
separate permits while still accomplishing the objectives and
responsibilities of the respective agencies. The department of natural
resources shall include any local authority's burning regulations with
permits issued where applicable pursuant to RCW ((70.94.740)) 70.94.743
through 70.94.775 (as recodified by this act). The department shall
develop agreements with all local authorities to coordinate
regulations.
Permits shall be withheld by the department of natural resources
when so requested by the department of ecology if a forecast, alert,
warning, or emergency condition exists as defined in the episode
criteria of the department of ecology.

Sec. 504 RCW 70.94.700 and 1971 ex.s. c 232 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
The department of natural resources and the department of ecology
may adopt rules ((and regulations)) necessary to implement their
respective responsibilities under the provisions of RCW 70.94.650
through 70.94.700 (as recodified by this act).

PART 6
AIRCRAFT CRASH RESCUE AND OTHER FIREFIGHTER TRAINING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW under the subchapter heading "outdoor burning" to read as follows:
(1) Aircraft crash rescue fire training activities meeting the
following conditions do not require a permit under this section, or
under RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.780 (as recodified by this act), from
an air pollution control authority, the department, or any local entity
with delegated permit authority:
(a) Firefighters participating in the training fires must be
limited to those who provide fire fighting support to an airport that
is either certified by the federal aviation administration or operated
in support of military or governmental activities;
(b) The fire training may not be conducted during an air pollution
episode or any stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW
70.94.715 for the area where training is to be conducted;
(c) The number of training fires allowed per year without a permit
shall be the minimum number necessary to meet federal aviation
administration or other federal safety requirements;
(d) The facility shall use current technology and be operated in a
manner that will minimize, to the extent possible, the air contaminants
generated during operation; and
(e) The organization conducting training shall notify both the:
(i) Local fire district or fire department; and (ii) air pollution
control authority, department of ecology, or local entity delegated
permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654 (as recodified by this act),
having jurisdiction within the area where training is to be conducted
before the commencement of aircraft fire training. Written approval
from the department or a local air pollution control authority shall be
obtained prior to the initial operation of aircraft crash rescue fire
training. Such approval will be granted to fire training activities
meeting the conditions in this subsection.
(2) Aircraft crash rescue fire training activities conducted in
compliance with subsection (1) of this section are not subject to the
prohibition, in RCW 70.94.775(1)(as recodified by this act), of outdoor
fires containing petroleum products and are not considered outdoor
burning under RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.780 (as recodified by this
act).
(3) Training to fight structural fires located outside urban growth
areas in counties that plan under the requirements of RCW 36.70A.040
and outside of any city with a population of ten thousand or more in
all other counties does not need a permit under this section from an
air pollution control authority or the department of ecology, but must
be conducted in accordance with RCW 52.12.150.
(4) Training to fight forest fires does not require a permit from
an air pollution control authority or the department of ecology.
(5) To provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not
governed by subsections (1) through (3) of this section, or other
actions to protect public health and safety, the department or a local
air pollution control authority may issue permits that allow limited
burning of prohibited materials listed in RCW 70.94.775(1) (as
recodified by this act).

PART 7
OUTDOOR BURNING--OTHER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW under the subchapter heading "outdoor burning" to read as follows:
Consistent with RCW 70.94.743 (as recodified by this act), outdoor
burning may be allowed anywhere in the state for the exclusive purpose
of managing storm or flood-related debris.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW under the subchapter heading "outdoor burning" to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits fires necessary for Indian
ceremonies or for the sending of smoke signals if part of a religious
ritual. Permits issued for burning under this section shall be drafted
to minimize emissions including denial of permission to burn during
periods of adverse meteorological conditions.

Sec. 703 RCW 70.94.651 and 1991 c 199 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing ((contained)) in this chapter ((shall)) prohibits fires
necessary((: (1))) to promote the regeneration of rare and endangered
plants found within natural area preserves as identified under chapter
79.70 RCW((; and (2) for Indian ceremonies or for the sending of smoke
signals if part of a religious ritual)). Permits issued for burning
under this section shall be drafted to minimize emissions including
denial of permission to burn during periods of adverse meteorological
conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW under the subchapter heading "outdoor burning" to read as follows:
Any person who proposes to set fires in the course of weed
abatement shall obtain a permit from an air pollution control
authority, the department of ecology, or a local entity delegated
permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654 (as recodified by this act).
General permit criteria of statewide applicability shall be established
by the department, by rule, after consultation with the various air
pollution control authorities. Permits shall be issued under this
section based on seasonal operations or by individual operations, or
both. All permits shall be conditioned to insure that the public
interest in air, water, and land pollution and safety to life and
property is fully considered. In addition to any other requirements
established by the department to protect air quality pursuant to other
laws, applicants for permits must show that the setting of fires as
requested is the most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding
life or property under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably
necessary to successfully carry out the enterprise in which the
applicant is engaged, or both. All burning permits will be designed to
minimize air pollution insofar as practical. Nothing in this section
relieves the applicant from obtaining permits, licenses, or other
approvals required by any other law. An application for a permit to
set fires in the course of weed abatement shall be acted upon within
seven days from the date such application is filed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to chapter 70.94
RCW under the subchapter heading "outdoor burning" to read as follows:
Consistent with RCW 70.94.745 (as recodified by this act), neither
a permit nor the payment of a fee shall be required for outdoor burning
for the purpose of disposal of tumbleweeds blown by wind. Such burning
shall not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any stage of
impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715. This section shall
only apply within counties with a population less than two hundred
fifty thousand.

PART 8
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 Part headings as used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 The following sections are recodified in
chapter 70.94 RCW in the following order under the subchapter heading
"outdoor burning."
RCW 70.94.775
RCW 70.94.743
RCW 70.94.780
RCW 70.94.755
RCW 70.94.760
RCW 70.94.765
RCW 70.94.745
RCW 70.94.750
RCW 70.94.650
RCW 70.94.654
RCW 70.94.656
RCW 70.94.660
RCW 70.94.665
RCW 70.94.670
RCW 70.94.690
RCW 70.94.700
RCW 70.94.651

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---