BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the replacement of the vulnerable
state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct is a matter of urgency for
the safety of Washington's traveling public and the needs of the
transportation system in central Puget Sound. The state route number
99 Alaskan Way viaduct is susceptible to damage, closure, or
catastrophic failure from earthquakes and tsunamis. Additionally, the
viaduct serves as a vital route for freight and passenger vehicles
through downtown Seattle.
Since 2001, the department has undertaken an extensive evaluation
of multiple options to replace the Alaskan Way viaduct, including an
initial evaluation of seventy-six conceptual alternatives and a more
detailed analysis of five alternatives in 2004. In addition to a
substantial technical review, the department has also undertaken
considerable public outreach, which included consultation with a
stakeholder advisory committee that met sixteen times over a thirteen-month period.
Therefore, it is the conclusion of the legislature that time is of
the essence, and that Washington state cannot wait for a disaster to
make it fully appreciate the urgency of the need to replace this
vulnerable structure. The state shall take the necessary steps to
expedite the environmental review and design processes to replace the
Alaskan Way viaduct with a deep bore tunnel under First Avenue from the
vicinity of the sports stadiums in Seattle to Aurora Avenue north of
the Battery Street tunnel. The tunnel must include four general
purpose lanes in a stacked formation.
(2) The state route number 99 Alaskan Way viaduct replacement
project finance plan must include state funding not to exceed two
billion four hundred million dollars and must also include at least
four hundred million dollars in toll revenue. These funds must be used
solely to build a replacement tunnel, as described in subsection (1) of
this section, and to remove the existing state route number 99 Alaskan
Way viaduct. All costs associated with city utility relocations for
state work as described in this section must be borne by the city of
Seattle and provided in a manner that meets project construction
schedule requirements as determined by the department. State funding
is not authorized for any utility relocation costs, or for central
seawall or waterfront promenade improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of transportation must
prepare a traffic and revenue study for a state route number 99 deep
bore tunnel for the purpose of determining the facility's potential to
generate toll revenue. The department shall regularly report to the
transportation commission regarding the progress of the study for the
purpose of guiding the commission's toll setting on the facility. The
study must include the following information:
(1) An analysis of the potential diversion from state route number
99 to other parts of the transportation system resulting from tolls on
the facility;
(2) An analysis of potential mitigation measures to offset or
reduce diversion from state route number 99;
(3) A summary of the amount of revenue generated from tolling the
deep bore tunnel; and
(4) An analysis of the impact of tolls on the performance of the
facility.
The department must provide the results of the study to the
governor and the legislature by January 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---