BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 53.36 RCW
to read as follows:
If a port district intends to levy a tax under RCW 53.36.100, the
port commission must hold a public hearing within twenty days of
publication of notice of the intention as required in RCW 53.36.100.
The port commission must also provide notice of the public hearing in
the official newspaper of record in the county in which the port
district is located at least ten days prior to the date of the public
hearing. The notice shall clearly state that the port district intends
to levy a tax under RCW 53.36.100, shall contain the date, time, and
location of the port district meeting at which the levy will be
considered and voted upon, and must include a statement describing the
amount the measure will increase or decrease taxes. For a levy
authorized under RCW 53.36.100(2), the notice must clearly state that
the public may gather a petition to submit the levy to the voters of
the port district under the procedures set forth in RCW 53.36.100(2).

--- END ---