BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the shortage
of health care professionals practicing in rural and medically
underserved areas of the state has created a severe public health and
safety problem. If unaddressed, this problem is expected to worsen
with health care reform because an increased demand for primary care
services will contribute to these shortages.
(2) The legislature further finds that the medical training
programs at universities within Washington state are important and
well-respected resources to the people of the state in the training of
health care professionals. Currently, only a small proportion of
medical school and other health professional graduates are Washington
residents who serve in certain parts of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of health, in concert with a
medical school located in central Washington, shall prepare a health
professional shortage plan that accomplishes the following:
(1) Identifies specific activities that the university shall pursue
to partner with existing health care professional programs specifically
situated in eastern Washington to increase the number of Washington
residents serving as health care professionals in rural and medically
underserved areas of the state, including establishing a goal that
assures that no less than fifty percent of health care professionals
who enter these programs are Washington state residents at the time of
matriculation and will be willing to serve, to the extent possible, in
Washington state rural and underserved communities.
(2) Establishes the goal of assuring that by the year 2013 the
annual number of graduates entering rural or medically underserved
practice shall be increased by forty percent over a baseline period
from 2004 through 2009.
(3) Establishes an additional goal of making operational by 2011 at
least two additional primary care programs and one emergency medicine
residency program within Washington state in geographic areas
identified by the plan as underserved. The geographic areas identified
by the plan as being underserved by primary care physicians shall be
consistent with any such similar designations made in the health
personnel research plan previously authorized by the legislature.
(4) Establishes, with the cooperation of existing community and
migrant health clinics in rural or medically underserved areas of the
state, three primary care residency training tracks. Furthermore, the
primary care shortage plan shall provide that these training tracks
shall be a joint American osteopathic association and American medical
association approved training site, coordinated with an accredited
college of osteopathic medicine established within the state of
Washington with oversight by the higher education coordinating board
for the purpose of training primary care physicians for the state of
Washington. Such a proposed joint accredited training track will have
at least fifty percent of its residency positions in osteopathic
medicine.
(5) Implements the plan, to include the expansion of the primary
care and emergency medicine residency network, with appropriations for
the department of health.
(6) The plan shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2009.

--- END ---