BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the
governor's proposed 2009-2011 operating budget would reduce school
district local effort assistance by one-third from current funding
levels and that such a proposal would disproportionately affect the
least affluent school districts in the state.
The legislature is further cognizant that, while commonly referred
to as the "lower class size" initiative, less than sixty percent of
"Initiative 728 funds" in the most recent school year were expended on
class size reduction efforts.
The legislature recognizes the sizable budget deficit in the
upcoming biennium, and it believes that a better educational policy is
to maintain local effort assistance funding, recognize the program as
currently set forth in statute as a part of basic education, and
instead eliminate the expenditure categories established by Initiative
No. 728, chapter 3, Laws of 2001, that are not related to reducing
class size.
In so doing, the legislature believes it is possible to maintain
existing school district statewide expenditure levels on class size
reduction efforts while preserving vital local effort assistance
funding for the least affluent districts in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.500.010 and 1999 c 317 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Commencing with calendar year 2000,)) In addition to a school
district's other general fund allocations, each eligible district shall
be provided local effort assistance funds. The purpose of these funds
is to mitigate the effect that above average property tax rates might
have on the ability of a school district to raise local revenues to
supplement the state's basic program of education. These funds serve
to equalize the property tax rates that individual taxpayers would pay
for such levies and to provide tax relief to taxpayers in high tax rate
school districts. Such funds are ((not)) part of the district's basic
education allocation.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.505.210 and 2005 c 497 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts shall have the authority to decide the best use of
student achievement funds to assist students in meeting and exceeding
the new, higher academic standards in each district consistent with the
provisions of chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(((1))) Student achievement funds shall be allocated for the
following uses:
(((a))) (1) To reduce class size by hiring certificated elementary
classroom teachers in grades K-4 and paying nonemployee-related costs
associated with those new teachers;
(((b))) (2) To make selected reductions in class size in grades 5-12, such as small high school writing classes;
(((c) To provide extended learning opportunities to improve student
academic achievement in grades K-12, including, but not limited to,
extended school year, extended school day, before-and-after-school
programs, special tutoring programs, weekend school programs, summer
school, and all-day kindergarten;
(d) To provide additional professional development for educators,
including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
alignment, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs
related to enhancing teaching skills and knowledge, and mentoring
programs to match teachers with skilled, master teachers. The funding
shall not be used for salary increases or additional compensation for
existing teaching duties, but may be used for extended year and
extended day teaching contracts;
(e) To provide early assistance for children who need
prekindergarten support in order to be successful in school;
(f))) (3) To provide improvements or additions to school building
facilities which are directly related to the class size reductions
((and extended learning opportunities)) under (((a) through (c) of
this)) subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(((2) Annually on or before May 1st, the school district board of
directors shall meet at the time and place designated for the purpose
of a public hearing on the proposed use of these funds to improve
student achievement for the coming year. Any person may appear or by
written submission have the opportunity to comment on the proposed plan
for the use of these funds. No later than August 31st, as a part of
the process under RCW 28A.505.060, each school district shall adopt a
plan for the use of these funds for the upcoming school year.
Annually, each school district shall provide to the citizens of their
district a public accounting of the funds made available to the
district during the previous school year under chapter 3, Laws of 2001,
how the funds were used, and the progress the district has made in
increasing student achievement, as measured by required state
assessments and other assessments deemed appropriate by the district.
Copies of this report shall be provided to the superintendent of public
instruction.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2008 c 170 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Total distributions from the student achievement fund to each
school district shall be based upon the average number of full-time
equivalent students in the school district during the previous school
year as reported to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction by August 31st of the previous school year. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that moneys generated
by skill center students are returned to skill centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
((three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08)) two hundred seventy-five dollars in the 2009-10 school year. For each subsequent school year, the amount allocated
per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted for inflation as
((defined in RCW 43.135.025(8))) measured by the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics. These allocations per full-time
equivalent student from the student achievement fund shall be supported
from ((the following sources:
(a))) distributions from state property tax proceeds deposited into
the student achievement fund ((under RCW 84.52.068; and
(b) Distributions from the education legacy trust account created
in RCW 83.100.230)).
(3) Any funds deposited in the student achievement fund under RCW
43.135.045 shall be allocated to school districts on a one-time basis
using a rate per full-time equivalent student. These funds are
provided in addition to any amounts allocated in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 84.52.068 (State levy -- Distribution to
school districts) and 2005 c 514 s 1104, 2003 1st sp.s. c 19 s 1, &
2001 c 3 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect September 1, 2009.

--- END ---