BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71A.045 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 322 are each amended
to read as follows:
((Foreign medical school graduates shall not be eligible for
licensing as physician assistants after July 1, 1989.)) Graduates of
foreign medical schools shall comply with the licensing requirements
set out in this chapter and by the commission in order to be licensed
as physician assistants.

--- END ---