BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.610 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.610 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to or affect any
student fee or charge which the students voluntarily maintain upon
themselves for student purposes only. Students are authorized to
create or increase voluntary student fees for each academic year when
passed by a majority vote of the student government or its equivalent,
or referendum presented to the student body or such other process that
has been adopted under this section. Notwithstanding RCW 42.17.190 (2)
and (3), voluntary student fees imposed under this section and services
and activities fees may be used for lobbying by a student government
association or its equivalent and may also be used to support a
statewide or national student organization or its equivalent that may
engage in lobbying.

--- END ---