BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.590 and 2007 c 457 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and The Evergreen State College,
and the boards of trustees of each community and technical college
district, in collaboration with affiliated bookstores and student and
faculty representatives, shall adopt rules requiring that:
(a) Affiliated bookstores:
(i) Provide students the option of purchasing materials that are
unbundled when possible, disclose to faculty and staff the costs to
students of purchasing materials, and disclose publicly how new
editions vary from previous editions;
(ii) Actively promote and publicize book buy-back programs; ((and))
(iii) Disclose retail costs for course materials on a per course
basis to faculty and staff and make this information publicly
available; and
(iv) Disclose information to students on required course materials
including but not limited to title, authors, edition, price, and
International Standard Book Number (ISBN) at least two weeks before the
start of the class for which the materials are required. The chief
academic officer may waive the disclosure requirement provided in this
subsection (1)(a)(iv), on a case-by-case basis, if students can
reliably expect that nearly all information regarding course materials
is available four weeks before the start of the class for which the
materials are required. The requirement provided in this subsection
(1)(a)(iv) does not apply if the faculty using the course materials is
hired two weeks or less before the start of class; and
(b) Faculty and staff members consider the least costly practices
in assigning course materials, such as adopting the least expensive
edition available, adopting free, open textbooks when available, and
working with college librarians to put together collections of free
online web and library resources, when educational content is
comparable as determined by the faculty ((and working closely with
publishers and local bookstores to create bundles and packages if they
deliver cost savings to students)).
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Materials" means any supplies or texts required or recommended
by faculty or staff for a given course.
(b) "Bundled" means a group of objects joined together by packaging
or required to be purchased as an indivisible unit.

--- END ---