BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.24.065 and 1989 c 286 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person owning or in control of any livestock shall willfully
or negligently allow ((such)) the livestock to run at large in any
stock restricted area or to wander or stray upon the right-of-way of
any public highway lying within a stock restricted area when not in the
charge of some person.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, livestock
may run at large upon lands belonging to the state of Washington or the
United States only when the owner of the livestock has been granted
grazing privileges in writing.
(b) For public lands owned or managed by the department of fish and
wildlife only, written grazing privileges are only required in stock
restricted areas or in areas that are adequately fenced to prevent
livestock from running at large.

--- END ---