BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the one
hundred five year old Western Washington University football program
has been an important part of the tradition and identity of Western
Washington University.
(2) The legislature declares there are significant concerns being
voiced by Western Washington University alumni and other affected
stakeholders that the university administration's process to suddenly
terminate the Western Washington University football program lacked
reasonable notice, transparency, and a public process.
(3) The legislature finds that athletic programs at colleges and
universities help to foster diversity and inclusion and help to create
and support an inclusive culture of equitable participation for
student-athletes and career opportunities for coaches and
administrators from diverse backgrounds. As such, the legislature is
concerned that the termination of the Western Washington University
football program could adversely impact student and employment
diversity at Western Washington University.
(4) In addition, the legislature is concerned that the termination
of the Western Washington University football program may cause
secondary negative consequences to other rival football programs in its
football league as there will be a smaller critical mass of schools
that will be able to compete against each other.
(5) Furthermore, the elimination of the football program will
result in a reduction of opportunities in athletics for women, as the
school will have to either eliminate women's teams or reduce roster
sizes to become compliant with Title IX of the education amendments of
1972 to the 1964 civil rights act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).
(6) The legislature is also concerned about the economic impact to
the region surrounding Western Washington University. The city of
Bellingham completed a ten million dollar remodel to Civic stadium,
with the Western Washington University football team intended as its
primary tenant. Also of concern is the lease agreement with the city,
totaling eight hundred thousand dollars over twenty years, which is now
in jeopardy. Further, local merchants, the city, and the surrounding
region stand to lose significant tourism dollars in the form of lost
hotel, restaurant, and other revenue associated with the program.
(7) The legislature is concerned about the economic impact to
member institutions of the greater northwest athletic conference,
specifically Central Washington University, which will be negatively
impacted by the loss of the rivalry, lost income from the "battle in
Seattle," and additional costs incurred from scheduling new opponents
who may require additional travel or guarantees.
(8) The legislature is concerned about recent reports of donors
canceling contributions and endowment pledges for education programs at
Western Washington University due to the negative publicity following
the announced cancellation of the program.
(9) The legislature has also recently learned that some of the
funding and related issues that led to the Western Washington
University administration's sudden decision to terminate the football
program may now have been resolved by fund-raising efforts of Western
Washington University alumni and other affected stakeholders. Given
the strong and immediate financial support being pledged to reinstate
the Western Washington University football program, the legislature
finds that more discussion and deliberation is needed regarding the
future of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A legislative task force to review
reinstatement of the Western Washington University football program is
established, with members as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2)(a) The president of the senate shall appoint two members: One
member from the forty-second legislative district, and one member from
either the thirty-ninth legislative district, the tenth legislative
district, or the fortieth legislative district.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint four
members: Two members from the forty-second legislative district, and
then two members from either the thirty-ninth legislative district, the
tenth legislative district, or the fortieth legislative district.
(c) Also, a representative from each of the following organizations
must be appointed to the task force: Western Washington University
alumni association, Bellingham-Whatcom chamber of commerce,
Bellingham/Whatcom county convention and visitors bureau, Western
Washington University administration, "save WWU football," the
Seattle/Puget Sound national association for the advancement of colored
people, and the Western Washington University football team.
(d) The task force shall choose its chair from among its membership
at its first meeting.
(3)(a) The task force must review whether current fund-raising
efforts by Western Washington University alumni and affected
stakeholders are sufficient to reinstate and sustain the Western
Washington University football program.
(b) The task force must also review the impact of both terminating
and reinstating the Western Washington University football program on
diversity and inclusion at Western Washington University.
(4) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(5)(a) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(b) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall immediately commence work on this issue
and hold meetings until June 30, 2009, and report its findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
July 1, 2009.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---