BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.011 and 2008 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees
of the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and
appointed officials of the executive branch of government, including
full-time members of boards, commissions, or committees; and includes
any or all part-time and temporary employees under the terms and
conditions established under this chapter by the authority; justices of
the supreme court and judges of the court of appeals and the superior
courts; and members of the state legislature or of the legislative
authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office after
February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if
the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of
the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with
the authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b)
employees of employee organizations representing state civil service
employees, at the option of each such employee organization, and,
effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee organizations
currently pooled with employees of school districts for the purpose of
purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by
contract with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350; ((and)) (d)
employees of a tribal government, if the governing body of the tribal
government seeks and receives the approval of the authority to provide
any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and (g); and (e) adult family home
providers, but only for the purpose of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.029.
(7) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(8) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(9) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(10) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(11) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(12) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(13) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan
3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(14) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(15) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(16) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government; a county, municipality, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision; and a
tribal government covered by this chapter.
(17) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(18) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(19) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(20) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.029 and 2007 c 184 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this
chapter applies to the governor with respect to adult family home
providers. Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer of adult family home providers who,
solely for the purposes of collective bargaining, are public employees.
The public employer shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the
governor or the governor's designee.
(2) There shall be collective bargaining, as defined in RCW
41.56.030, between the governor and adult family home providers, except
as follows:
(a) A statewide unit of all adult family home providers is the only
unit appropriate for purposes of collective bargaining under RCW
41.56.060.
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative of adult family home
providers in the unit specified in (a) of this subsection shall be the
representative chosen in an election conducted pursuant to RCW
41.56.070.
Bargaining authorization cards furnished as the showing of interest
in support of any representation petition or motion for intervention
filed under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under chapter
42.56 RCW.
(c) Notwithstanding the definition of "collective bargaining" in
RCW 41.56.030(4), the scope of collective bargaining for adult family
home providers under this section shall be limited solely to: (i)
Economic compensation, such as manner and rate of subsidy and
reimbursement, including tiered reimbursements; (ii) health and welfare
benefits, including eligibility and participation in the public
employees' benefits board under chapter 41.05 RCW; (iii) professional
development and training; (iv) labor-management committees; (v)
grievance procedures; and (vi) other economic matters. Retirement
benefits shall not be subject to collective bargaining. By such
obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal or
be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(d) In addition to the entities listed in the mediation and
interest arbitration provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and
41.56.480, the provisions apply to the governor or the governor's
designee and the exclusive bargaining representative of adult family
home providers, except that:
(i) In addition to the factors to be taken into consideration by an
interest arbitration panel under RCW 41.56.465, the panel shall
consider the financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement.
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and benefit provisions of
the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, the decision is not
binding on the state.
(e) Adult family home providers do not have the right to strike.
(3) Adult family home providers who are public employees solely for
the purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this
section are not, for that reason, employees of the state for any other
purpose. This section applies only to the governance of the collective
bargaining relationship between the employer and adult family home
providers as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) This section does not create or modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term care services
under chapter 70.128 RCW, including determination of the level of care
that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the request of
the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the governor's
designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective
bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive
bargaining representative over how the department's core responsibility
affects hours of work for adult family home providers. This subsection
shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining over an
individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services;
(c) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under chapter 70.128 RCW, including
standards of eligibility of consumers and adult family home providers
participating in the programs under chapter 70.128 RCW, and the nature
of services provided. The governor shall not enter into, extend, or
renew any agreement under this chapter that does not expressly reserve
the legislative rights described in this subsection (4)(c);
(d) The residents', parents', or legal guardians' right to choose
and terminate the services of any licensed adult family home provider;
and
(e) RCW 43.43.832, 43.20A.205, or 74.15.130.
(5) Upon meeting the requirements of subsection (6) of this
section, the governor must submit, as a part of the proposed biennial
or supplemental operating budget submitted to the legislature under RCW
43.88.030, a request for funds necessary to implement the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered
into under this section or for legislation necessary to implement the
agreement.
(6) A request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and
benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into
under this section shall not be submitted by the governor to the
legislature unless the request has been:
(a) Submitted to the director of financial management by October
1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are to be
considered; and
(b) Certified by the director of financial management as
financially feasible for the state or reflective of a binding decision
of an arbitration panel reached under subsection (2)(d) of this
section.
(7) The legislature must approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, any collective bargaining agreement must be
reopened for the sole purpose of renegotiating the funds necessary to
implement the agreement.
(8) If, after the compensation and benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(9) After the expiration date of any collective bargaining
agreement entered into under this section, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the agreement remain in effect until the
effective date of a subsequent agreement, not to exceed one year from
the expiration date stated in the agreement.
(10) In enacting this section, the legislature intends to provide
state action immunity under federal and state antitrust laws for the
joint activities of adult family home providers and their exclusive
bargaining representative to the extent the activities are authorized
by this chapter.

--- END ---