BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.104.040 and 2007 c 251 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board may approve
applications submitted by local governments for an area's designation
as a health sciences and services authority under this chapter. The
director shall determine the division to review applications submitted
by local governments under this chapter. The application for
designation shall be in the form and manner and contain such
information as the higher education coordinating board may prescribe,
provided the application shall:
(a) Contain sufficient information to enable the director to
determine the viability of the proposal;
(b) Demonstrate that an ordinance or resolution has been passed by
the legislative authority of a local government that delineates the
boundaries of an area that may be designated an authority;
(c) Be submitted on behalf of the local government, or, if that
office does not exist, by the legislative body of the local government;
(d) Demonstrate that the public funds directed to programs or
facilities in the authority will leverage private sector resources and
contributions to activities to be performed;
(e) Provide a plan or plans for the development of the authority as
an entity to advance as a cluster for health sciences education, health
sciences research, biotechnology development, biotechnology product
commercialization, and/or health care services; and
(f) Demonstrate that the state has previously provided funds to
health sciences and services programs or facilities in the applicant
city, town, or county.
(2) The director shall determine the division to develop criteria
to evaluate the application. The criteria shall include:
(a) The presence of infrastructure capable of spurring development
of the area as a center of health sciences and services;
(b) The presence of higher education facilities where undergraduate
or graduate coursework or research is conducted; and
(c) The presence of facilities in which health services are
provided.
(3) There shall be no more than ((one authority)) two authorities
statewide.
(4) An authority may only be created in a county with a population
of less than one million persons that is located east of the crest of
the Cascade mountains.
(5) The director may reject or approve an application. When
denying an application, the director must specify the application's
deficiencies. The decision regarding such designation as it relates to
a specific local government is final; however, a rejected application
may be resubmitted.
(6) Applications are due by December 31, ((2007)) 2009, and must be
processed within sixty days of submission.
(7) The director may, at his or her discretion, amend the
boundaries of an authority upon the request of the local government.
(8) The higher education coordinating board may adopt any rules
necessary to implement chapter 251, Laws of 2007 within one hundred
twenty days of July 22, 2007.
(9) The higher education coordinating board must develop evaluation
and performance measures in order to evaluate the effectiveness of the
programs in the authorities that are funded with public resources. A
report to the legislature shall be due on a biennial basis beginning
December 1, 2009. In addition, the higher education coordinating board
shall develop evaluation criteria that enables the local governments to
measure the effectiveness of the program.

--- END ---