BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.52.200 and 2003 c 53 s 113 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The sentence imposed for a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
violation of this chapter may be deferred or suspended in accordance
with RCW 3.66.067 and 3.66.068, however the probationary period shall
be two years.
(2) In case of multiple misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
convictions, the sentences shall be consecutive, however the
probationary period shall remain two years.
(3) In addition to the penalties imposed by the court, the court
shall order the forfeiture of all animals held by law enforcement or
animal care and control authorities under the provisions of this
chapter if any one of the animals involved dies as a result of a
violation of this chapter or if the defendant has a prior conviction
under this chapter. In other cases the court may enter an order
requiring the owner to forfeit the animal if the court deems the
animal's treatment to have been severe and likely to reoccur. If
forfeiture is ordered, the owner shall be prohibited from owning or
caring for any similar animals for a period of ((two years)) time as
follows:
(a) For an owner who has been convicted of animal cruelty in the
second degree under RCW 16.52.207, a period of two years;
(b) For an owner who has been convicted of animal cruelty in the
first degree under RCW 16.52.205, a period of five years;
(c) For an owner who has previously been convicted of animal
cruelty in the first degree under RCW 16.52.205 or animal cruelty in
the second degree under RCW 16.52.207, the prohibition from owning or
caring for any similar animals shall be permanent. The court may delay
its decision on forfeiture under this subsection until the end of the
probationary period.
(4) In addition to fines and court costs, the defendant, only if
convicted or in agreement, shall be liable for reasonable costs
incurred pursuant to this chapter by law enforcement agencies, animal
care and control agencies, or authorized private or public entities
involved with the care of the animals. Reasonable costs include
expenses of the investigation, and the animal's care, euthanization, or
adoption.
(5) If convicted, the defendant shall also pay a civil penalty of
one thousand dollars to the county to prevent cruelty to animals.
These funds shall be used to prosecute offenses under this chapter and
to care for forfeited animals pending trial.
(6) As a condition of the sentence imposed under this chapter or
RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078, the court may also order the defendant
to participate in an available animal cruelty prevention or education
program or obtain available psychological counseling to treat mental
health problems contributing to the violation's commission. The
defendant shall bear the costs of the program or treatment.

--- END ---