BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that small and medium
sized businesses find it difficult to offer retirement plans because of
the complexity and costs. Businesses offering retirement plans have a
better ability to recruit and retain employees. The Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program provides a simple and cost-effective way for employers to offer an important employee benefit.
The legislature also finds that many workers do not have access to an
employment-based retirement plan. Workers who are unable to build up
pensions and savings risk living on low incomes in their old age and
are more likely to become dependent on state services. The Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program provides a simple and inexpensive
way for workers to save for retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this subchapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of retirement systems.
(2) "Enrollee" means any worker in this state that is enrolled in
the program.
(3) "Participating employer" means any private employer, with a
place of business in this state, and with employees that have enrolled
in the program.
(4) "Program" means the Washington voluntary retirement accounts
program created under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington voluntary retirement accounts
program is created. The director is responsible for the implementation
and operation of the program, directly or by contract. Sections 4
through 6 of this act may not be implemented until appropriate federal
and/or philanthropic funds sufficient to support the program for the
first three years of the program's operation have been deposited in the
Washington voluntary retirement accounts program administrative
account. If, at the end of the third year after the program first
began accepting participating employees, one of the following has not
happened, either appropriate federal and/or philanthropic funds
sufficient to support the program for the next three years are
deposited in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account or the program has reached the size necessary to
be self-supporting with an appropriate level of administrative fees,
then the program terminates. If at the end of the sixth year after the
program first began accepting participating employees, the program has
not reached the size necessary to be self-supporting with an
appropriate level of administrative fees, the program terminates. In
the event that the program is terminated, the director shall, to the
extent permitted by federal law, enable members to transfer accumulated
funds into other tax-qualified retirement accounts. At no time shall
funds from the department of retirement systems expense account be used
to administer the program or to obtain program funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Prior to the enrollment of any worker or
employer in the program, the director shall design a plan for the
operation of the program. The program shall consist of a two-tier
system with one or more of the following: A deferred compensation
401(k)-type program; SIMPLE IRA-type program; or other internal revenue
service approved employer plan, open to all employers who choose to
participate for their employees, and workplace-based individual
retirement accounts open to all workers. Any deferred compensation
401(k)-type program or other employer-sponsored program shall be open
only to employers employing fewer than one hundred employees at the
time of enrollment. An employee enrolled in an individual retirement
account program shall not be permitted to contribute more than twenty-five thousand dollars to his or her individual retirement account. The
director shall then seek approval if necessary from the federal
internal revenue service to offer the plans and accounts to Washington
employers and workers on a tax-qualified basis. The plans and accounts
must include the option for enrollees to roll pretax contributions into
an individual retirement account or another eligible retirement plan
after ceasing participation in the program. A range of investment
options must be provided to meet the needs of investors with various
levels of risk tolerance and various ages. Funds offered should cover
a range of investment options from low risk to high risk and include
options for those that do not wish to actively manage their
investments, such as target date funds and annuities. The state
investment board shall provide investment options for participants to
choose from, and shall establish an investment plan for participants
who choose not to self-direct investments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Enrollment in the program is not an
entitlement and must not result in expenditures that exceed the amount
available in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account. If it appears that continued enrollment will
result in expenditures exceeding the amount available for a particular
fiscal year, the director may freeze new enrollments in the program and
establish a waiting list of eligible workers, or reduce enrollments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Following the design and approval of the
program under section 4 of this act, the director shall adopt all rules
necessary for the implementation and operation of the program. Rules
shall be written to comply with federal standards and may incorporate
federal recommendations that are in the best interests of enrollees and
the operations of the plan. As part of the rule development process,
the director shall consult with employers, workers, private sector
retirement plan administrators and providers, and any other individuals
or entities that the director determines relevant to the development of
an effective and efficient method for operating the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program principal account is created in the state treasury and
shall be administered in compliance with applicable federal law and as
set forth in this section. The department shall make arrangements with
financial institutions to serve as trustees or custodians of Washington
voluntary accounts as may be required or advisable to comply with
applicable federal law and to provide for the efficient implementation
and administration of the program.
(2) The contributions elected by participating employees in
accordance with section 4 of this act shall be paid into the Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program principal account and shall be
sufficient to cover costs of administration and staffing in addition to
such other amounts as may be determined by the director. The account
shall be used to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.
(3) All moneys in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts
program principal account and the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program administrative account, all property and rights
purchased therewith, and all income attributable thereto, shall be held
in trust by the state investment board, as set forth under RCW
43.33A.030, for the exclusive benefit of the program participants and
their beneficiaries, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this
or related acts, shall be held separate from other types of funds to
the extent required by federal law. Neither the participating
employee, nor the participant's beneficiary or beneficiaries, nor any
other designee, has any right to commute, sell, assign, transfer, or
otherwise convey the right to receive any payments under the program.
These payments and rights are nonassignable and nontransferable.
Account balances are not subject to attachment, garnishment, or
execution and are not transferable by operation of law in event of
bankruptcy or insolvency, except to the extent otherwise required by
law.
(4) The state investment board has the full power to invest moneys
in the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program principal
account and the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account in accordance with RCW 43.84.150, 43.33A.140,
and this subchapter, and cumulative investment directions received
under this subchapter. All investment and operating costs of the state
investment board associated with the investment of the program assets
shall be paid under RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception
of these expenses, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the Washington voluntary
retirement accounts program principal account.
(5) To the extent allowed under federal law:
(a) No state board, commission, or agency, or any officer,
employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency
resulting from participant investments selected under this subchapter;
and
(b) The state investment board, or any officer, employee, or member
thereof is not liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from
reasonable efforts to implement investment directions under this
subchapter.
(6) The Washington voluntary retirement accounts program
administrative account is created in the state treasury. Federal
appropriations or philanthropic grants received specifically for this
program shall be deposited in the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program administrative account. Expenses of the department
pertaining to the program including staffing and administrative
expenses shall be paid out of the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program administrative account. Any excess balances credited
to this account over administrative expenses disbursed from this
account shall be transferred to the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program principal account at such time and in such amounts as
may be determined by the director with the approval of the director of
financial management. Any deficiency in the Washington voluntary
retirement accounts program administrative account caused by an excess
of administrative expenses disbursed from this account shall be
transferred to this account from the Washington voluntary retirement
accounts program principal account.
(7)(a)(i) The director shall keep or cause to be kept full and
adequate accounts and records of the assets of each individual
participant, obligations, transactions, and affairs of the program.
The department shall account for and report on the investment of
program assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment
board for accounting and reporting.
(ii) The director's duties related to individual participant
accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction,
settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire
transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.
(iii) The director has sole responsibility for contracting with any
recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage the
performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.
(b)(i) The director's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do
not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its
responsibilities for asset management and balancing of program funds.
(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for
contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment
management for program funds and shall manage the performance of
investment managers under those contracts.
(c) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of
engagement for the custodial banks.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.33A.070 and 1981 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
No member of the state investment board is liable for the
negligence, default, or failure of any other person or other member of
the board to perform the duties of the member's office and no member of
the board shall be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or
assets of any of the trust and retirement funds, including funds or
assets of the Washington voluntary retirement accounts program, nor is
any nonvoting member liable for actions performed with the exercise of
reasonable diligence within the scope of the member's authorized
activities as a member of the board.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2008 c 128 s 19 and 2008 c 106 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the essential rail assistance
account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the
federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the
freight congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment
account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the health services account, the public health
services account, the health system capacity account, the personal
health services account, the high capacity transportation account, the
state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington
loan fund, the safety and education account, the site closure account,
the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled
trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the supplemental
pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the Washington
voluntary retirement accounts program administrative account, the
Washington voluntary retirement accounts program principal account, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be
distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Eligible private employers may provide
employees with the opportunity to enroll in the program, including
providing for payroll deductions for those employees that enroll in the
program. Employers with employees enrolled in the program are
authorized to contract with the enrolled employees to defer or
contribute a portion of the enrolled employees' compensation, in
accordance with the program rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The director shall report biennially to the
relevant committees of the legislature on the effectiveness and
efficiency of the program, including the levels of enrollment, the
financial status of the program, and the retirement savings levels of
participating enrollees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements, the conflicting part of this act is
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to
the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the
agencies concerned.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 7 and 10 through 12 of
this act are each added to chapter 41.50 RCW under the new subchapter
heading "Washington voluntary retirement accounts program."

--- END ---