BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the broad public
vista northward from the historic capitol campus, and the public view
of the state capitol from many points to the north of it, constitute a
vista of statewide and national historic significance.
The vista is an integral part of the design of the state capitol
campus. The state's founders sited the capitol campus in its location
principally to take advantage of this expansive vista. The vista is
representative of much of the physical characteristics of very large
areas of the state; it provides a visual and physical connection
between the capitol and Puget Sound; it inspires; and it promotes an
appreciation of the scenic grandeur and rich natural resources of our
state.
The city of Olympia was so named because of the spectacular vista
of the Olympic mountains from many locations in the city, including the
downtown, Budd Inlet, and capitol campus areas.
The vista is of national significance because it includes routes of
early exploring and mapping that contributed to this area becoming
incorporated into the United States of America rather than another
country. Within this vista, many historical events took place that
were significant for understanding of: Maritime history and early days
of Native American life; pioneer life; Washington territory; and the
state of Washington.
This state and national treasure has been passed down from one
generation to another. It includes public vistas of Budd Inlet, south
Puget Sound, the Olympic mountains, and a broad range of forested
hills.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to take steps to
protect this state and national scenic and historic asset.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A special height district is created to protect the scenic
beauty of the state capitol campus for the citizens of this state and
for out-of-state visitors.
(2) The state capitol campus special height district is located as
follows: The Olympia Isthmus--from the centerline of Water Street in
Olympia proceeding west to the shoreline of the Deschutes spillway
bounded by Capitol Lake shoreline and Budd Inlet shoreline.
(3) The maximum allowable height for a new or remodeled building or
structure located within the state capitol campus special height
district is thirty-five feet.

--- END ---