BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the shoreline
known as the "Olympia Isthmus" located in the city of Olympia between
Capitol Lake and Budd Inlet should be designated a "shoreline of
statewide significance."
(2) The legislature further finds that:
(a) The shoreline along Capitol Lake is part of the Heritage park
area of the state capitol campus, in which the state of Washington has
invested millions of dollars to improve and make available for
statewide public use, education, and appreciation. It is also an
important element of the scenic, historic vista northward from the
capitol campus, in which the state of Washington and nonprofit
organizations have invested millions of dollars to construct excellent
public viewing opportunities of the north capitol campus and other
sights of both statewide and national significance;
(b) The state of Washington is continuing to invest millions of
dollars in water quality improvements along both Capitol Lake and Budd
Inlet shorelines;
(c) The Olympia Isthmus as a whole is historically significant,
fragile, and a major contributor to significant changes to the natural
estuary area of the area. The Olympia Isthmus was constructed by fill
in early 1911, with the reflecting lake created in the 1950s when the
dam was constructed at what is now called the Deschutes spillway;
(d) The vista is an integral part of the design of the state
capitol campus. The state's founders sited the capitol campus in its
location principally to take advantage of this expansive vista. The
vista: Is representative of much of the physical characteristics of
very large areas of the state; provides a visual and physical
connection between the capitol and the Puget Sound; is inspirational;
and promotes an appreciation of the scenic grandeur and rich natural
resources of our state; and
(e) The Washington state capitol, together with its spectacular
location, is a state and national treasure that has been passed down
from one generation to another.
(3) The legislature intends that the Olympia Isthmus be declared to
be a shoreline of statewide significance through the shoreline
management act to advance the public interest and to protect public
investments.
(4) This state and national treasure has been passed down from one
generation to another. It includes public vistas of Budd Inlet, south
Puget Sound, the Olympic mountains, and a broad range of forested
hills.
(5) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to take steps to
protect this state and national scenic and historic asset.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.58.030 and 2007 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following definitions and concepts apply:
(1) Administration:
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology;
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology;
(c) "Local government" means any county, incorporated city, or town
which contains within its boundaries any lands or waters subject to
this chapter;
(d) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of the state or local governmental unit however
designated;
(e) "((Hearing[s])) Hearings board" means the ((shoreline[s]))
shorelines hearings board established by this chapter.
(2) Geographical:
(a) "Extreme low tide" means the lowest line on the land reached by
a receding tide;
(b) "Ordinary high water mark" on all lakes, streams, and tidal
water is that mark that will be found by examining the bed and banks
and ascertaining where the presence and action of waters are so common
and usual, and so long continued in all ordinary years, as to mark upon
the soil a character distinct from that of the abutting upland, in
respect to vegetation as that condition exists on June 1, 1971, as it
may naturally change thereafter, or as it may change thereafter in
accordance with permits issued by a local government or the department:
PROVIDED, That in any area where the ordinary high water mark cannot be
found, the ordinary high water mark adjoining salt water shall be the
line of mean higher high tide and the ordinary high water mark
adjoining fresh water shall be the line of mean high water;
(c) "Shorelines of the state" are the total of all "shorelines" and
"shorelines of statewide significance" within the state;
(d) "Shorelines" means all of the water areas of the state,
including reservoirs, and their associated shorelands, together with
the lands underlying them; except (i) shorelines of statewide
significance; (ii) shorelines on segments of streams upstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is twenty cubic feet per second or
less and the wetlands associated with such upstream segments; and (iii)
shorelines on lakes less than twenty acres in size and wetlands
associated with such small lakes;
(e) "Shorelines of statewide significance" means the following
shorelines of the state:
(i) The area between the ordinary high water mark and the western
boundary of the state from Cape Disappointment on the south to Cape
Flattery on the north, including harbors, bays, estuaries, and inlets;
(ii) Those areas of Puget Sound and adjacent salt waters and the
Strait of Juan de Fuca between the ordinary high water mark and the
line of extreme low tide as follows:
(A) Nisqually Delta -- from DeWolf Bight to Tatsolo Point,
(B) Birch Bay -- from Point Whitehorn to Birch Point,
(C) Hood Canal -- from Tala Point to Foulweather Bluff,
(D) Skagit Bay and adjacent area -- from Brown Point to Yokeko Point,
((and))
(E) Padilla Bay -- from March Point to William Point, and
(F) Budd Inlet--from the northwest extension of Capitol Waterway in
Olympia to the Deschutes spillway, and including the historic shoreline
of Budd Inlet contained in Capitol Lake from the Deschutes spillway to
the southwest extension of Capitol Waterway;
(iii) Those areas of Puget Sound and the Strait of Juan de Fuca and
adjacent salt waters north to the Canadian line and lying seaward from
the line of extreme low tide;
(iv) Those lakes, whether natural, artificial, or a combination
thereof, with a surface acreage of one thousand acres or more measured
at the ordinary high water mark;
(v) Those natural rivers or segments thereof as follows:
(A) Any west of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the mean annual flow is measured at one thousand cubic feet
per second or more,
(B) Any east of the crest of the Cascade range downstream of a
point where the annual flow is measured at two hundred cubic feet per
second or more, or those portions of rivers east of the crest of the
Cascade range downstream from the first three hundred square miles of
drainage area, whichever is longer;
(vi) Those shorelands associated with (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of
this subsection (2)(e);
(f) "Shorelands" or "shoreland areas" means those lands extending
landward for two hundred feet in all directions as measured on a
horizontal plane from the ordinary high water mark; floodways and
contiguous floodplain areas landward two hundred feet from such
floodways; and all wetlands and river deltas associated with the
streams, lakes, and tidal waters which are subject to the provisions of
this chapter; the same to be designated as to location by the
department of ecology.
(i) Any county or city may determine that portion of a one-hundred-year-flood plain to be included in its master program as long as such
portion includes, as a minimum, the floodway and the adjacent land
extending landward two hundred feet therefrom.
(ii) Any city or county may also include in its master program land
necessary for buffers for critical areas, as defined in chapter 36.70A
RCW, that occur within shorelines of the state, provided that forest
practices regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, except conversions to
nonforest land use, on lands subject to the provisions of this
subsection (2)(f)(ii) are not subject to additional regulations under
this chapter;
(g) "Floodway" means the area, as identified in a master program,
that either: (i) Has been established in federal emergency management
agency flood insurance rate maps or floodway maps; or (ii) consists of
those portions of a river valley lying streamward from the outer limits
of a watercourse upon which flood waters are carried during periods of
flooding that occur with reasonable regularity, although not
necessarily annually, said floodway being identified, under normal
condition, by changes in surface soil conditions or changes in types or
quality of vegetative ground cover condition, topography, or other
indicators of flooding that occurs with reasonable regularity, although
not necessarily annually. Regardless of the method used to identify
the floodway, the floodway shall not include those lands that can
reasonably be expected to be protected from flood waters by flood
control devices maintained by or maintained under license from the
federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state;
(h) "Wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by
surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to
support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence
of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas.
Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and
drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities,
wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities,
or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally
created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway.
Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland areas to mitigate the conversion of wetlands.
(3) Procedural terms:
(a) "Guidelines" means those standards adopted to implement the
policy of this chapter for regulation of use of the shorelines of the
state prior to adoption of master programs. Such standards shall also
provide criteria to local governments and the department in developing
master programs;
(b) "Master program" shall mean the comprehensive use plan for a
described area, and the use regulations together with maps, diagrams,
charts, or other descriptive material and text, a statement of desired
goals, and standards developed in accordance with the policies
enunciated in RCW 90.58.020;
(c) "State master program" is the cumulative total of all master
programs approved or adopted by the department of ecology;
(d) "Development" means a use consisting of the construction or
exterior alteration of structures; dredging; drilling; dumping;
filling; removal of any sand, gravel, or minerals; bulkheading; driving
of piling; placing of obstructions; or any project of a permanent or
temporary nature which interferes with the normal public use of the
surface of the waters overlying lands subject to this chapter at any
state of water level;
(e) "Substantial development" shall mean any development of which
the total cost or fair market value exceeds five thousand dollars, or
any development which materially interferes with the normal public use
of the water or shorelines of the state. The dollar threshold
established in this subsection (3)(e) must be adjusted for inflation by
the office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1,
2007, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area,
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the
bureau of labor and statistics, United States department of labor. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect. The following shall not be considered
substantial developments for the purpose of this chapter:
(i) Normal maintenance or repair of existing structures or
developments, including damage by accident, fire, or elements;
(ii) Construction of the normal protective bulkhead common to
single family residences;
(iii) Emergency construction necessary to protect property from
damage by the elements;
(iv) Construction and practices normal or necessary for farming,
irrigation, and ranching activities, including agricultural service
roads and utilities on shorelands, and the construction and maintenance
of irrigation structures including but not limited to head gates,
pumping facilities, and irrigation channels. A feedlot of any size,
all processing plants, other activities of a commercial nature,
alteration of the contour of the shorelands by leveling or filling
other than that which results from normal cultivation, shall not be
considered normal or necessary farming or ranching activities. A
feedlot shall be an enclosure or facility used or capable of being used
for feeding livestock hay, grain, silage, or other livestock feed, but
shall not include land for growing crops or vegetation for livestock
feeding and/or grazing, nor shall it include normal livestock wintering
operations;
(v) Construction or modification of navigational aids such as
channel markers and anchor buoys;
(vi) Construction on shorelands by an owner, lessee, or contract
purchaser of a single family residence for his own use or for the use
of his or her family, which residence does not exceed a height of
thirty-five feet above average grade level and which meets all
requirements of the state agency or local government having
jurisdiction thereof, other than requirements imposed pursuant to this
chapter;
(vii) Construction of a dock, including a community dock, designed
for pleasure craft only, for the private noncommercial use of the
owner, lessee, or contract purchaser of single and multiple family
residences. This exception applies if either: (A) In salt waters, the
fair market value of the dock does not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars; or (B) in fresh waters, the fair market value of the dock does
not exceed ten thousand dollars, but if subsequent construction having
a fair market value exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars occurs
within five years of completion of the prior construction, the
subsequent construction shall be considered a substantial development
for the purpose of this chapter;
(viii) Operation, maintenance, or construction of canals,
waterways, drains, reservoirs, or other facilities that now exist or
are hereafter created or developed as a part of an irrigation system
for the primary purpose of making use of system waters, including
return flow and artificially stored groundwater for the irrigation of
lands;
(ix) The marking of property lines or corners on state owned lands,
when such marking does not significantly interfere with normal public
use of the surface of the water;
(x) Operation and maintenance of any system of dikes, ditches,
drains, or other facilities existing on September 8, 1975, which were
created, developed, or utilized primarily as a part of an agricultural
drainage or diking system;
(xi) Site exploration and investigation activities that are
prerequisite to preparation of an application for development
authorization under this chapter, if:
(A) The activity does not interfere with the normal public use of
the surface waters;
(B) The activity will have no significant adverse impact on the
environment including, but not limited to, fish, wildlife, fish or
wildlife habitat, water quality, and aesthetic values;
(C) The activity does not involve the installation of a structure,
and upon completion of the activity the vegetation and land
configuration of the site are restored to conditions existing before
the activity;
(D) A private entity seeking development authorization under this
section first posts a performance bond or provides other evidence of
financial responsibility to the local jurisdiction to ensure that the
site is restored to preexisting conditions; and
(E) The activity is not subject to the permit requirements of RCW
90.58.550;
(xii) The process of removing or controlling an aquatic noxious
weed, as defined in RCW 17.26.020, through the use of an herbicide or
other treatment methods applicable to weed control that are recommended
by a final environmental impact statement published by the department
of agriculture or the department jointly with other state agencies
under chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A special height district is created on the Olympia Isthmus in
the area adjacent to the historic Budd Inlet named in RCW 90.58.030 in
order to protect the scenic beauty of the state capitol campus for the
citizens of this state and for out-of-state visitors.
(2) The Olympia Isthmus special height district is located as
follows: The Olympia Isthmus--from the western boundary of Capitol
Waterway in Olympia proceeding west to the shoreline of the Deschutes
spillway bounded by Capitol Lake shoreline and Budd Inlet shoreline.
(3) The maximum allowable height for a new or remodeled building or
structure located within the Olympia Isthmus special height district is
thirty-five feet. This section only applies to new construction, and
remodeling or restructuring that affects the height of the building.
This section is not intended to prevent normal repair, maintenance, and
internal remodeling of any building already exceeding the height
limitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---