BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Federally recognized Indian tribes providing K-12 education that
elect to receive funding directly from the superintendent of public
instruction shall report their student full-time equivalent served to
the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide funding directly to
the tribal schools using the state average basic education and
vocational education rates as used in the running start funding for
community and technical colleges. In addition to the basic education
moneys, tribal schools shall also receive the student achievement
funding provided under RCW 28A.505.220.
A federally recognized Indian tribe operating a tribal school may
choose to continue to receive allocations through a school district
pursuant to an interlocal agreement with the district.
Before any allocation of basic education moneys are paid directly
to a serving tribe, the superintendent of public instruction shall
enter into an agreement with the serving tribe. The agreement must
include required compliance with applicable state and federal laws.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall meet
with the tribes in accordance with the centennial accord and on a
government-to-government basis to develop a long-term proposal for the
Washington state public education system and tribal schools.

--- END ---