BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.109 and 1990 c 285 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue rules and regulations to assist in
the administration of the program of adoption support authorized by RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145.
(2) Disbursements from the appropriations available from the
general fund shall be made pursuant to such rules and regulations and
pursuant to agreements conforming thereto to be made by the secretary
with parents for the purpose of supporting the adoption of children in,
or likely to be placed in, foster homes or child caring institutions
who are found by the secretary to be difficult to place in adoption
because of physical or other reasons; including, but not limited to,
physical or mental handicap, emotional disturbance, ethnic background,
language, race, color, age, or sibling grouping.
(3) Such agreements shall meet the following criteria:
(((1))) (a) The child whose adoption is to be supported pursuant to
such agreement shall be or have been a child hard to place in adoption.
(((2))) (b) Such agreement must relate to a child who was or is
residing in a foster home or child-caring institution or a child who,
in the judgment of the secretary, is both eligible for, and likely to
be placed in, either a foster home or a child-caring institution.
(((3))) (c) Such agreement shall provide that adoption support
shall not continue beyond the time that the adopted child reaches
eighteen years of age, becomes emancipated, dies, or otherwise ceases
to need support, provided that if the secretary shall find that
continuing dependency of such child after such child reaches eighteen
years of age warrants the continuation of support pursuant to RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 the secretary may do so,
subject to all the provisions of RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through
74.13.145, including annual review of the amount of such support.
(((4))) (d) Any prospective parent who is to be a party to such
agreement shall be a person who has the character, judgment, sense of
responsibility, and disposition which make him or her suitable as an
adoptive parent of such child.
(4) Six months before an adoption is finalized under chapter 26.33
RCW and RCW 74.13.100 through 74.13.145, the department must provide to
the prospective adoptive parents, in writing, information describing
the limits of the adoption support program including the following
information:
(a) The limits on monthly in-cash payments to adoptive families;
(b) The limits on the availability of mental health services and
the funds with which to pay for these services;
(c) How to access mental health services for children receiving
adoption support services;
(d) The limits on the one-time cash payments to adoptive families
for expenses related to their adopted children;
(e) That payment for residential or group care is not available for
adopted children under this chapter;
(f) The risks inherent in adopting a child from the department.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13.250 and 1990 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Preservice training is recognized as a valuable tool to reduce
placement disruptions, the length of time children are in care, and
foster parent turnover rates. Preservice training also assists
potential foster parents in making their final decisions about foster
parenting and assists social service agencies in obtaining information
about whether to approve potential foster parents.
(2) Foster parent preservice training shall include information
about the potential impact of placement on foster children; social
service agency administrative processes; the requirements,
responsibilities, expectations, and skills needed to be a foster
parent; attachment, separation, and loss issues faced by birth parents,
foster children, and foster parents; child management and discipline;
birth family relationships; information on the limits of the adoption
support program as provided in RCW 74.13.109(4); and helping children
leave foster care. Preservice training shall assist applicants in
making informed decisions about whether they want to be foster parents.
Preservice training shall be designed to enable the agency to assess
the ability, readiness, and appropriateness of families to be foster
parents. As a decision tool, effective preservice training provides
potential foster parents with enough information to make an appropriate
decision, affords potential foster parents an opportunity to discuss
their decision with others and consider its implications for their
family, clarifies foster family expectations, presents a realistic
picture of what foster parenting involves, and allows potential foster
parents to consider and explore the different types of children they
might serve.
(3) Preservice training shall be completed prior to the issuance of
a foster care license, except that the department may, on a case by
case basis, issue a written waiver that allows the foster parent to
complete the training after licensure, so long as the training is
completed within ninety days following licensure.

--- END ---