BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.16.010 and 2009 c 4 s 906 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart
from all public moneys or funds of this state an unemployment
compensation fund, an administrative contingency fund, and a federal
interest payment fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner
exclusively for the purposes of this title, and to which RCW 43.01.050
shall not be applicable.
(2)(a) The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of:
(i) All contributions collected under RCW 50.24.010 and payments in
lieu of contributions collected pursuant to the provisions of this
title;
(ii) Any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund;
(iii) All earnings of such property or securities;
(iv) Any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in
the unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social
security act, as amended;
(v) All money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund;
(vi) All money credited to this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended;
(vii) All money received from the federal government as
reimbursement pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended
compensation act of 1970 (84 Stat. 708-712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304); and
(viii) All moneys received for the fund from any other source.
(b) All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be
commingled and undivided.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
administrative contingency fund shall consist of:
(i) All interest on delinquent contributions collected pursuant to
this title;
(ii) All fines and penalties collected pursuant to the provisions
of this title;
(iii) All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by
the fund; and
(iv) Revenue received under RCW 50.24.014.
(b) All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of this title or
rules adopted under this title shall be remitted as provided in chapter
3.62 RCW.
(c) During the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys available in the
administrative contingency fund, other than money in the special
account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as
appropriated by the legislature for the (i) cost of the job skills or
worker retraining programs at the community and technical colleges and
administrative costs at the state board for community and technical
colleges, and (ii) reemployment services such as business and project
development assistance, local economic development capacity building,
and local economic development financial assistance at the department
of community, trade, and economic development, and the remaining
appropriation upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval
of the governor, whenever it appears to him or her that such
expenditure is necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, provided, the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available.
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, provided, the administrative contingency fund will be
reimbursed upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation.
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
(d) For fiscal year 2010, moneys available in the administrative
contingency fund, other than money in the special account created under
RCW 50.24.014(1)(a), shall be expended as appropriated by the
legislature to serve individuals who are eligible for or have exhausted
entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and are enrolled in
a high employer demand program of study or a forest product industry
training program pursuant to section 2 of this act, and the remaining
appropriation upon the direction of the commissioner, with the approval
of the governor, whenever it appears to the commissioner that such
expenditure is necessary solely for:
(i) The proper administration of this title and that insufficient
federal funds are available for the specific purpose to which such
expenditure is to be made, if the moneys are not substituted for
appropriations from federal funds which, in the absence of such moneys,
would be made available;
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet
received, if the administrative contingency fund will be reimbursed
upon receipt of the requested federal appropriation; and
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance
and audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims
requiring the expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims
must be resolved in the following priority: First priority is to
provide services to eligible participants within the state; second
priority is to provide substitute services or program support; and last
priority is the direct payment of funds to the federal government.
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014(1)(a) may
only be expended, after appropriation, for the purposes specified in
this section and RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020, 50.62.030, 50.24.014,
50.44.053, and 50.22.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to availability of funds, high employer demand training
funds are available for use by the state board for community and
technical colleges to serve individuals who are eligible for or have
exhausted entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and are
enrolled in a high employer demand program of study or a forest product
industry training program. Preference must be given to individuals
enrolled in the forest product industry, health care, energy
efficiency, and aerospace worker training programs.
(2) Funds may be used for the following purposes for individuals
eligible under subsection (1) of this section: Expenses related to
educational and career counseling services, training plan development,
and referral to appropriate training programs in high-demand
occupations; increased capacity at community and technical colleges to
make training programs in high-demand occupations available; financial
aid for eligible students enrolled at an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as
defined in RCW 28C.04.410; and job development and referral services.
(3) After the first year of the program, if funds are not fully
expended, the state board for community and technical colleges may
broaden individual eligibility criteria.
(4) Funds available under this section cannot be used to replace or
supplant any existing enrollments, programs, support services, or
funding sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 50.22 RCW
to read as follows:
Consistent with the intent of the workforce investment act of 1998,
P.L. 105-220, administrative funds made available under the act shall
be used to serve individuals who are eligible for or have exhausted
entitlement to unemployment compensation benefits and are enrolled in
a high employer demand program of study or a forest product industry
training program pursuant to section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 50.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The employment security department shall encourage an increase in
education and training through grants and local plan modifications with
workforce development councils. Consistent with the intent of the
workforce investment act, adult and dislocated worker program
provisions in the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009, the
employment security department shall require workforce development
councils to determine the number of participants who will receive
education and training. The employment security department shall
encourage workforce development councils to:
(1) Increase the number of workforce investment act adult and
dislocated worker participants receiving education and training to
obtain employment in high-demand occupations as defined in RCW
50.22.--- (section 4, chapter 3, Laws of 2009), through institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or educational
institutions as defined in RCW 28C.04.410; and
(2) Use workforce investment act resources for the following
education and training purposes: The provision of individual training
accounts that provide student financial aid; to increase the number of
individuals receiving training benefits; and to enter into contracts
with institutions of higher education to increase capacity for training
low-income individuals for high-demand occupations and dislocated
workers for high-demand occupations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The employment security department, in
collaboration with the workforce training and education coordinating
board, workforce development councils, and state board for community
and technical colleges, shall submit reports as follows to the
appropriate committees of the legislature related to the American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 workforce investment act adult
and dislocated worker programs:
(1) A preliminary report by December 1, 2009, that includes
expenditures on education and training, the number of students
receiving training, the types of training received by the students,
student demographics, and institution/program demographics;
(2) A preliminary report by December 1, 2010, that includes the
innovations in training including new training capacity, new classes,
and alternative training times and locations; and
(3) A final report by December 1, 2011, that includes expenditures
on education and training, the number of certified full-time equivalent
students receiving training, the types of training received by the
students, student demographics, training completion rates, employment
rates, and comparisons of preprogram and postprogram wage levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---