BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent may not issue a
notice of default under RCW 61.24.030(7) until thirty days after
initial contact is made as required under (b) of this subsection or
thirty days after satisfying the due diligence requirements as
described in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall contact the borrower in
person or by telephone in order to assess the borrower's financial
ability to pay the debt secured by the deed of trust and explore
options for the borrower to avoid foreclosure. During the initial
contact, the beneficiary or authorized agent shall advise the borrower
that he or she has the right to request a subsequent meeting and, if
requested, the beneficiary or authorized agent shall schedule the
meeting to occur within fourteen days. The assessment of the
borrower's financial ability to repay the debt and a discussion of
options may occur during the initial contact or at the subsequent
meeting scheduled for that purpose. At the initial contact, the
borrower must be provided the toll-free telephone number made available
by the department to find a department-certified housing counseling
agency. Any meeting may occur telephonically.
(2) A notice of default issued under RCW 61.24.030(7) must include
a declaration, as provided in subsection (9) of this section, from the
beneficiary or authorized agent that it has contacted the borrower as
provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section, it has tried with due
diligence to contact the borrower under subsection (5) of this section,
or the borrower has surrendered the property to the trustee,
beneficiary, or authorized agent. The trustee is entitled to rely on
the declaration as conclusive evidence that the requirements of this
section have been satisfied, and the trustee is not liable for the
beneficiary or authorized agent failing to include the declaration.
(3) A beneficiary's or authorized agent's loss mitigation personnel
may participate by telephone during any contact required under this
section.
(4) Within fourteen days after the initial contact under subsection
(1) of this section, if a borrower has designated a department-certified housing counseling agency, attorney, or other advisor to
discuss with the beneficiary or authorized agent, on the borrower's
behalf, options for the borrower to avoid foreclosure, the borrower
shall inform the beneficiary or authorized agent and provide the
contact information. The beneficiary or authorized agent shall contact
the designated representative for the borrower for the discussion
within fourteen days after the representative is designated by the
borrower. Any deed of trust modification or workout plan offered at
the meeting with the borrower's designated representative by the
beneficiary or authorized agent is subject to approval by the borrower.
(5) A notice of default may be issued under RCW 61.24.030(7) if a
beneficiary or authorized agent has not contacted a borrower as
required under subsection (1)(b) of this section and the failure to
contact the borrower occurred despite the due diligence of the
beneficiary or authorized agent. Due diligence requires the following:
(a) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall first attempt to
contact a borrower by sending a first-class letter to the address of
the property encumbered by the deed of trust that includes the toll-free telephone number made available by the department to find a
department-certified housing counseling agency.
(b)(i) After the letter has been sent, the beneficiary or
authorized agent shall attempt to contact the borrower by telephone at
least three times at different hours and on different days. Telephone
calls must be made to the primary telephone number on file with the
beneficiary or authorized agent.
(ii) A beneficiary or authorized agent may attempt to contact a
borrower using an automated system to dial borrowers if the telephone
call, when answered, is connected to a live representative of the
beneficiary or authorized agent.
(iii) A beneficiary or authorized agent satisfies the telephone
contact requirements of this subsection (5)(b) if the beneficiary or
authorized agent determines, after attempting contact under this
subsection (5)(b), that the borrower's primary telephone number and
secondary telephone number or numbers on file, if any, have been
disconnected or are not good contact numbers for the borrower.
(c) If the borrower does not respond within fourteen days after the
telephone call requirements of (b) of this subsection have been
satisfied, the beneficiary or authorized agent shall send a certified
letter, with return receipt requested, to the borrower at the address
of the property encumbered by the deed of trust.
(d) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall provide a means for
the borrower to contact the beneficiary or authorized agent in a timely
manner, including a toll-free telephone number or charge-free
equivalent that will provide access to a live representative during
business hours.
(e) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall post a link on the
home page of the beneficiary's or authorized agent's internet web site,
if any, to the following information:
(i) Options that may be available to borrowers who are unable to
afford their mortgage payments and who wish to avoid foreclosure, and
instructions to borrowers advising them on steps to take to explore
those options;
(ii) A list of financial documents borrowers should collect and be
prepared to present to the beneficiary or authorized agent when
discussing options for avoiding foreclosure;
(iii) A toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent for
borrowers who wish to discuss options for avoiding foreclosure with
their beneficiary or authorized agent; and
(iv) The toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent made
available by the department to find a department-certified housing
counseling agency.
(6) Subsections (1) and (5) of this section do not apply if any of
the following occurs:
(a) The borrower has surrendered the property as evidenced by
either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of the keys to the
property to the trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent;
(b) The borrower has contracted with a distressed home consultant
as defined in RCW 61.34.020; or
(c) The borrower has filed for bankruptcy, and the bankruptcy stays
in place.
(7) This section applies only to deeds of trust made from January
1, 2003, to December 31, 2007, inclusive, that are secured by
residential real property and are for owner-occupied residences, and
not secured by a debt incurred primarily for business, investment, or
commercial purposes or secured by a guaranty. For purposes of this
subsection, "owner-occupied" means that the residence is the principal
residence of the borrower.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Borrower" includes a guarantor of a deed of trust who executed
a promissory note secured by the deed of trust.
(b) "Department" means the United States department of housing and
urban development.
(c) "Residential real property" means a one-to-four, single-family
residence, condominium unit, residential cooperative unit, residential
unit in any other type of planned unit development, or manufactured
home.
(d) "Seller-financed sales" means . . .
(9) The form of declaration to be provided by the beneficiary or
authorized agent as required under subsection (2) of this section must
be in substantially the following form:

"FORECLOSURE LOSS MITIGATION FORM

Please select applicable option(s) below.

The undersigned beneficiary or authorized agent for the beneficiary
hereby represents and declares that [check the applicable box and fill
in any blanks so that the trustee can insert, on the beneficiary's
behalf, the applicable declaration in the notice of default required
under chapter 61.24 RCW]:
(1) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
contacted the borrower under, and has complied with, section 1 of this
act (contact provision to "assess the borrower's financial ability to
pay the debt secured by the deed of trust and explore options for the
borrower to avoid foreclosure").
(2) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
exercised due diligence to contact the borrower as required in section
1(5) of this act and, after waiting fourteen days after the
requirements in section 1 of this act were satisfied, the beneficiary
or the beneficiary's authorized agent sent to the borrower(s), by
certified mail, return receipt requested, the letter required under
section 1 of this act.
(3) [ ] The borrower has surrendered the secured property as
evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or by delivery of
the keys to the secured property to the beneficiary, the beneficiary's
authorized agent or to the trustee.
(4) [ ] Under section 1 of this act, the beneficiary or
beneficiary's authorized agent has evidence in its file, and reasonably
believes, that the borrower has contracted with a distressed home
consultant as defined in RCW 61.34.020.
(5) [ ] Under section 1 of this act, the beneficiary or the
beneficiary's authorized agent has verified information that, on or
before the date of this declaration, the borrower(s) has filed for
bankruptcy, and there is no stay in place."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon posting a notice of sale under RCW 61.24.040, a trustee or
authorized agent shall also post the following notice, in the manner
required for posting the notice of sale on the property to be sold, and
a trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall mail at the same time
in an envelope addressed to the "Resident of property subject to
foreclosure sale" the following notice:

"The foreclosure process has begun on this property, which may
affect your right to continue to live in this property. Ninety days or
more after the date of this notice, this property may be sold at
foreclosure. If you are renting this property, the new property owner
may either give you a new lease or rental agreement or provide you with
a fifty-day eviction notice. You may wish to contact a lawyer or your
local legal aid or housing counseling agency to discuss any rights that
you may have."

(2) This section applies only to deeds of trust secured by
residential real property, as defined in section 1 of this act, and if
the billing address for the mortgage note is different than the
property address.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A tenant or subtenant in possession of a rental housing unit at
the time the property is sold in foreclosure must be given fifty days'
written notice before the tenant or subtenant may be removed from the
property as prescribed in chapter 59.12 RCW.
(2) This section does not apply if a party to the note secured by
the deed of trust remains on the property as a tenant, subtenant, or
occupant.
(3) A tenant may be evicted for waste or nuisance . . ., subject to
unlawful detainer under chapter 59.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act apply only to
the foreclosure of a nonowner-occupied one-to-four, single-family
residence, condominium unit, residential cooperative unit, residential
unit in any other type of planned unit development, or manufactured
home in which title has been eliminated under RCW 65.20.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The failure of the grantor to bring a civil action to enjoin a
foreclosure sale under this chapter may not be deemed a waiver of a
claim for damages asserting:
(a) Common law fraud and misrepresentation;
(b) A violation of RCW 19.144.080; or
(c) Failure of the trustee to materially comply with the provisions
of this chapter.
(2) The nonwaived claims listed under subsection (1) of this
section may be (a) asserted in an unlawful detainer action brought by
the lender against the grantor as a holdover tenant or (b)
independently brought against a lender or trustee if a third party is
the successful bidder at the foreclosure sale.
(3) The nonwaived claims listed under subsection (1) of this
section are subject to the following limitations:
(a) The claim must be asserted or brought within two years from the
date of the foreclosure sale;
(b) The claim may not seek any remedy at law or in equity other
than direct monetary damages, unless the property is owned by the
beneficiary at the time the action is filed;
(c) The claim may not affect the validity or finality of the
foreclosure sale;
(d) A grantor who files such a claim is prohibited from filing for
record a lis pendens without prior permission of a court, as provided
for in RCW 4.28.320, or any other document purporting to create a
similar effect, related to the real property foreclosed upon;
(e) The claim may not otherwise operate to encumber or cloud the
title to the property that was subject to the foreclosure sale, except
to the extent that a judgment on the claim in favor of the grantor may,
consistent with RCW 4.56.190, become a judgment lien on real property
then owned by the lender; and
(f) The relief that may be granted for judgment upon the claim is
limited to actual damages. However, if the grantor brings in the same
civil action a claim for violation of chapter 19.86 RCW, arising out of
the same alleged facts, relief under chapter 19.86 RCW is limited to
actual damages, treble damages as provided for in RCW 19.86.090, and
the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee.
(4) This section applies only to foreclosures of an owner-occupied
one-to-four, single-family residence, condominium unit, residential
cooperative unit, residential unit in any other type of planned unit
development, or manufactured home in which title has been eliminated
under RCW 65.20.040, which is the grantor's principal place of
residence.
(5) This section does not apply to the foreclosure of a deed of
trust used to secure a debt incurred for business, investment, or
commercial purposes or to secure a guaranty.

Sec. 6 RCW 61.24.010 and 2008 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The trustee of a deed of trust under this chapter shall be:
(a) Any domestic corporation incorporated under Title 23B, 30, 31,
32, or 33 RCW of which at least one officer is a Washington resident;
or
(b) Any title insurance company authorized to insure title to real
property under the laws of this state, or its agents; or
(c) Any attorney who is an active member of the Washington state
bar association at the time the attorney is named trustee; or
(d) Any professional corporation incorporated under chapter 18.100
RCW, any professional limited liability company formed under chapter
25.15 RCW, any general partnership, including limited liability
partnerships, formed under chapter 25.04 RCW, all of whose
shareholders, members, or partners, respectively, are either licensed
attorneys or entities, provided all of the owners of those entities are
licensed attorneys, or any domestic corporation wholly owned by any of
the entities under this subsection (1)(d); or
(e) Any agency or instrumentality of the United States government;
or
(f) Any national bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association chartered under the laws of the United States.
(2) The trustee may resign at its own election or be replaced by
the beneficiary. The trustee shall give prompt written notice of its
resignation to the beneficiary. The resignation of the trustee shall
become effective upon the recording of the notice of resignation in
each county in which the deed of trust is recorded. If a trustee is
not appointed in the deed of trust, or upon the resignation,
incapacity, disability, absence, or death of the trustee, or the
election of the beneficiary to replace the trustee, the beneficiary
shall appoint a trustee or a successor trustee. Upon recording the
appointment of a successor trustee in each county in which the deed of
trust is recorded, the successor trustee shall be vested with all
powers of an original trustee.
(3) The trustee or successor trustee shall have no fiduciary duty
or fiduciary obligation to the grantor or other persons having an
interest in the property subject to the deed of trust.
(4) The trustee or successor trustee shall act impartially between
the borrower, grantor, and beneficiary.
(5) The trustee or successor trustee has a duty of good faith to
the beneficiary, grantor, or other persons having an interest in the
property subject to the deed of trust.

Sec. 7 RCW 61.24.040 and 2008 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A deed of trust foreclosed under this chapter shall be foreclosed
as follows:
(1) At least ninety days before the sale, the trustee shall:
(a) Record a notice in the form described in ((RCW
61.24.040(1)))(f) of this subsection in the office of the auditor in
each county in which the deed of trust is recorded;
(b) To the extent the trustee elects to foreclose its lien or
interest, or the beneficiary elects to preserve its right to seek a
deficiency judgment against a borrower or grantor under RCW
61.24.100(3)(a), and if their addresses are stated in a recorded
instrument evidencing their interest, lien, or claim of lien, or an
amendment thereto, or are otherwise known to the trustee, cause a copy
of the notice of sale described in ((RCW 61.24.040(1)))(f) of this
subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified
or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the following persons
or their legal representatives, if any, at such address:
(i) The borrower and grantor;
(ii) The beneficiary of any deed of trust or mortgagee of any
mortgage, or any person who has a lien or claim of lien against the
property, that was recorded subsequent to the recordation of the deed
of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the notice of
sale;
(iii) The vendee in any real estate contract, the lessee in any
lease, or the holder of any conveyances of any interest or estate in
any portion or all of the property described in such notice, if that
contract, lease, or conveyance of such interest or estate, or a
memorandum or other notice thereof, was recorded after the recordation
of the deed of trust being foreclosed and before the recordation of the
notice of sale;
(iv) The last holder of record of any other lien against or
interest in the property that is subject to a subordination to the deed
of trust being foreclosed that was recorded before the recordation of
the notice of sale;
(v) The last holder of record of the lien of any judgment
subordinate to the deed of trust being foreclosed; and
(vi) The occupants of property consisting solely of a single-family
residence, or a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a
multiplex or other building containing fewer than five residential
units, whether or not the occupant's rental agreement is recorded,
which notice may be a single notice addressed to "occupants" for each
unit known to the trustee or beneficiary;
(c) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in ((RCW
61.24.040(1)))(f) of this subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified or registered mail, return receipt
requested, to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney of record, in
any court action to foreclose a lien or other encumbrance on all or any
part of the property, provided a court action is pending and a lis
pendens in connection therewith is recorded in the office of the
auditor of any county in which all or part of the property is located
on the date the notice is recorded;
(d) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in ((RCW
61.24.040(1))) (f) of this subsection to be transmitted by both first-class and either certified or registered mail, return receipt
requested, to any person who has recorded a request for notice in
accordance with RCW 61.24.045, at the address specified in such
person's most recently recorded request for notice;
(e) Cause a copy of the notice of sale described in ((RCW
61.24.040(1))) (f) of this subsection to be posted in a conspicuous
place on the property, or in lieu of posting, cause a copy of said
notice to be served upon any occupant of the property;
(f) The notice shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF TRUSTEE'S SALE

I.

NOTICE IS HEREBY GIVEN that the undersigned Trustee will on the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . ., at the hour of . . . . o'clock . . . . M. at
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . [street
address and location if inside a building] in the City of . . . . . .,
State of Washington, sell at public auction to the highest and best
bidder, payable at the time of sale, the following described real
property, situated in the County(ies) of . . . . . ., State of
Washington, to-wit:

[If any personal property is to be included in the trustee's
sale, include a description that reasonably identifies such
personal property]

which is subject to that certain Deed of Trust dated . . . . . .,
. . ., recorded . . . . . ., . . ., under Auditor's File No. . . . .,
records of . . . . . . County, Washington, from . . . . . . . . ., as
Grantor, to . . . . . . . . ., as Trustee, to secure an obligation in
favor of . . . . . . . . ., as Beneficiary, the beneficial interest in
which was assigned by . . . . . . . . ., under an Assignment recorded
under Auditor's File No. . . . . [Include recording information for
all counties if the Deed of Trust is recorded in more than one county.]

II.

No action commenced by the Beneficiary of the Deed of Trust is now
pending to seek satisfaction of the obligation in any Court by reason
of the Borrower's or Grantor's default on the obligation secured by the
Deed of Trust.

[If there is another action pending to foreclose other security
for all or part of the same debt, qualify the statement and
identify the action.]

III.

The default(s) for which this foreclosure is made is/are as follows:

[If default is for other than payment of money, set forth the
particulars]

Failure to pay when due the following amounts which are now in arrears:

IV.

The sum owing on the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust is:
Principal $ . . . . . ., together with interest as provided in the note
or other instrument secured from the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .,
and such other costs and fees as are due under the note or other
instrument secured, and as are provided by statute.

V.

The above-described real property will be sold to satisfy the expense
of sale and the obligation secured by the Deed of Trust as provided by
statute. The sale will be made without warranty, express or implied,
regarding title, possession, or encumbrances on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . The default(s) referred to in paragraph III must be
cured by the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale
date), to cause a discontinuance of the sale. The sale will be
discontinued and terminated if at any time on or before the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., (11 days before the sale date), the default(s)
as set forth in paragraph III is/are cured and the Trustee's fees and
costs are paid. The sale may be terminated any time after the . . . .
day of . . . . . ., . . . (11 days before the sale date), and before
the sale by the Borrower, Grantor, any Guarantor, or the holder of any
recorded junior lien or encumbrance paying the entire principal and
interest secured by the Deed of Trust, plus costs, fees, and advances,
if any, made pursuant to the terms of the obligation and/or Deed of
Trust, and curing all other defaults.

VI.

A written notice of default was transmitted by the Beneficiary or
Trustee to the Borrower and Grantor at the following addresses:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

by both first-class and certified mail on the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . ., proof of which is in the possession of the Trustee;
and the Borrower and Grantor were personally served on the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . ., with said written notice of default or the
written notice of default was posted in a conspicuous place on the real
property described in paragraph I above, and the Trustee has possession
of proof of such service or posting.

VII.

The Trustee whose name and address are set forth below will provide in
writing to anyone requesting it, a statement of all costs and fees due
at any time prior to the sale.

VIII.

The effect of the sale will be to deprive the Grantor and all those who
hold by, through or under the Grantor of all their interest in the
above-described property.

IX.

Anyone having any objection to the sale on any grounds whatsoever will
be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to those objections if they
bring a lawsuit to restrain the sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130.
Failure to bring such a lawsuit may result in a waiver of any proper
grounds for invalidating the Trustee's sale.

[Add Part X to this notice if applicable under RCW 61.24.040(9)]

[Acknowledgment]

(2) In addition to providing the borrower and grantor the notice of
sale described in ((RCW 61.24.040)) subsection (1)(f) of this section,
the trustee shall include with the copy of the notice which is mailed
to the grantor, a statement to the grantor in substantially the
following form:

NOTICE OF FORECLOSURE

Pursuant to the Revised Code of Washington,

Chapter 61.24 RCW

The attached Notice of Trustee's Sale is a consequence of
default(s) in the obligation to . . . . . ., the Beneficiary of your
Deed of Trust and owner of the obligation secured thereby. Unless the
default(s) is/are cured, your property will be sold at auction on the
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . .
To cure the default(s), you must bring the payments current, cure
any other defaults, and pay accrued late charges and other costs,
advances, and attorneys' fees as set forth below by the . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . [11 days before the sale date]. To date, these
arrears and costs are as follows:

Estimated amount

Currently due that will be due

to reinstate to reinstate

on. . . . . on. . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . .

(11 days before

the date set

for sale)

Delinquent payments

from. . . . . . ,

. . . , in the

amount of

$. . . . /mo.: $. . . . $. . . .

Late charges in

the total

amount of: $. . . . $. . . .

Estimated

Amounts

Attorneys' fees: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's fee: $. . . . $. . . .

Trustee's expenses:

(Itemization)

Title report $. . . . $. . . .

Recording fees $. . . . $. . . .

Service/Posting
of Notices
$. . . .
$. . . .

Postage/Copying
expense
$. . . .
$. . . .

Publication $. . . . $. . . .

Telephone
charges
$. . . . $. . . .

Inspection fees $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

. . . . . . $. . . . $. . . .

TOTALS $. . . . $. . . .

To pay off the entire obligation secured by your Deed of Trust as
of the . . . . . day of . . . . . . you must pay a total of $. . . . .
in principal, $. . . . . in interest, plus other costs and advances
estimated to date in the amount of $. . . . . . From and after the
date of this notice you must submit a written request to the Trustee to
obtain the total amount to pay off the entire obligation secured by
your Deed of Trust as of the payoff date.
As to the defaults which do not involve payment of money to the
Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust, you must cure each such default.
Listed below are the defaults which do not involve payment of money to
the Beneficiary of your Deed of Trust. Opposite each such listed
default is a brief description of the action necessary to cure the
default and a description of the documentation necessary to show that
the default has been cured.

You may reinstate your Deed of Trust and the obligation secured
thereby at any time up to and including the . . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . [11 days before the sale date], by paying the amount set forth or
estimated above and by curing any other defaults described above. Of
course, as time passes other payments may become due, and any further
payments coming due and any additional late charges must be added to
your reinstating payment. Any new defaults not involving payment of
money that occur after the date of this notice must also be cured in
order to effect reinstatement. In addition, because some of the
charges can only be estimated at this time, and because the amount
necessary to reinstate or to pay off the entire indebtedness may
include presently unknown expenditures required to preserve the
property or to comply with state or local law, it will be necessary for
you to contact the Trustee before the time you tender reinstatement or
the payoff amount so that you may be advised of the exact amount you
will be required to pay. Tender of payment or performance must be made
to: . . . . . ., whose address is . . . . . ., telephone ( )
. . . . . . AFTER THE . . . . DAY OF . . . . . ., . . ., YOU MAY NOT
REINSTATE YOUR DEED OF TRUST BY PAYING THE BACK PAYMENTS AND COSTS AND
FEES AND CURING THE OTHER DEFAULTS AS OUTLINED ABOVE. The Trustee will
respond to any written request for current payoff or reinstatement
amounts within ten days of receipt of your written request. In such a
case, you will only be able to stop the sale by paying, before the
sale, the total principal balance ($ . . . . . .) plus accrued
interest, costs and advances, if any, made pursuant to the terms of the
documents and by curing the other defaults as outlined above.
You may contest this default by initiating court action in the
Superior Court of the county in which the sale is to be held. In such
action, you may raise any legitimate defenses you have to this default.
A copy of your Deed of Trust and documents evidencing the obligation
secured thereby are enclosed. You may wish to consult a lawyer. Legal
action on your part may prevent or restrain the sale, but only if you
persuade the court of the merits of your defense.
The court may grant a restraining order or injunction to restrain
a trustee's sale pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 upon five days notice to the
trustee of the time when, place where, and the judge before whom the
application for the restraining order or injunction is to be made.
This notice shall include copies of all pleadings and related documents
to be given to the judge. Notice and other process may be served on
the trustee at:

If you do not reinstate the secured obligation and your Deed of
Trust in the manner set forth above, or if you do not succeed in
restraining the sale by court action, your property will be sold. The
effect of such sale will be to deprive you and all those who hold by,
through or under you of all interest in the property;
(3) In addition, the trustee shall cause a copy of the notice of
sale described in ((RCW 61.24.040)) subsection (1)(f) of this section
(excluding the acknowledgment) to be published in a legal newspaper in
each county in which the property or any part thereof is situated, once
on or between the thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the date of
sale, and once on or between the fourteenth and seventh day before the
date of sale;
(4) On the date and at the time designated in the notice of sale,
the trustee or its authorized agent shall sell the property at public
auction to the highest bidder. The trustee may sell the property in
gross or in parcels as the trustee shall deem most advantageous;
(5) The place of sale shall be at any designated public place
within the county where the property is located and if the property is
in more than one county, the sale may be in any of the counties where
the property is located. The sale shall be on Friday, or if Friday is
a legal holiday on the following Monday, and during the hours set by
statute for the conduct of sales of real estate at execution;
(6) The trustee has no obligation to, but may, for any cause the
trustee deems advantageous, continue the sale for a period or periods
not exceeding a total of one hundred twenty days by (a) a public
proclamation at the time and place fixed for sale in the notice of sale
and if the continuance is beyond the date of sale, by giving notice of
the new time and place of the sale by both first class and either
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the persons
specified in ((RCW 61.24.040)) subsection (1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this
section to be deposited in the mail (i) not less than four days before
the new date fixed for the sale if the sale is continued for up to
seven days; or (ii) not more than three days after the date of the
continuance by oral proclamation if the sale is continued for more than
seven days, or, alternatively, (b) by giving notice of the time and
place of the postponed sale in the manner and to the persons specified
in ((RCW 61.24.040)) subsection (1)(b), (c), (d), and (e) of this
section and publishing a copy of such notice once in the newspaper(s)
described in ((RCW 61.24.040)) subsection (3) of this section, more
than seven days before the date fixed for sale in the notice of sale.
No other notice of the postponed sale need be given;
(7) The purchaser shall forthwith pay the price bid and on payment
the trustee shall execute to the purchaser its deed; the deed shall
recite the facts showing that the sale was conducted in compliance with
all of the requirements of this chapter and of the deed of trust, which
recital shall be prima facie evidence of such compliance and conclusive
evidence thereof in favor of bona fide purchasers and encumbrancers for
value, except that these recitals shall not affect the lien or interest
of any person entitled to notice under ((RCW 61.24.040)) subsection (1)
of this section, if the trustee fails to give the required notice to
such person. In such case, the lien or interest of such omitted person
shall not be affected by the sale and such omitted person shall be
treated as if such person was the holder of the same lien or interest
and was omitted as a party defendant in a judicial foreclosure
proceeding;
(8) The sale as authorized under this chapter shall not take place
less than one hundred ninety days from the date of default in any of
the obligations secured;
(9) If the trustee elects to foreclose the interest of any occupant
or tenant of property comprised solely of a single-family residence, or
a condominium, cooperative, or other dwelling unit in a multiplex or
other building containing fewer than five residential units, the
following notice shall be included as Part X of the Notice of Trustee's
Sale:

X.

NOTICE TO OCCUPANTS OR TENANTS

The purchaser at the trustee's sale is entitled to possession of the
property on the 20th day following the sale, as against the grantor
under the deed of trust (the owner) and anyone having an interest
junior to the deed of trust, including occupants ((and)) who are not
tenants. After the 20th day following the sale the purchaser has the
right to evict occupants ((and)) who are not tenants by summary
proceedings under ((the unlawful detainer act,)) chapter 59.12 RCW.
For tenant-occupied property, the purchaser shall provide a tenant with
written notice in accordance with section 2 of this act;
(10) Only one copy of all notices required by this chapter need be
given to a person who is both the borrower and the grantor. All
notices required by this chapter that are given to a general
partnership are deemed given to each of its general partners, unless
otherwise agreed by the parties.

Sec. 8 RCW 61.24.060 and 1998 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purchaser at the trustee's sale shall be entitled to possession
of the property on the twentieth day following the sale, as against the
grantor under the deed of trust and anyone having an interest junior to
the deed of trust, including occupants ((and)) who are not tenants, who
were given all of the notices to which they were entitled under this
chapter. For tenant-occupied property, the purchaser shall provide a
tenant with written notice in accordance with section 2 of this act.
The purchaser shall also have a right to the summary proceedings to
obtain possession of real property provided in chapter 59.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 59.12 RCW
to read as follows:
An unlawful detainer action, commenced as a result of a trustee's
sale under chapter 61.24 RCW, must comply with the requirements of RCW
61.24.040 and 61.24.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 4, 7, and 8 of this act
expire December 31, 2012.

--- END ---