BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.46.031 and 1995 c 43 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health district to consist of one county may be created
whenever the county legislative authority of the county shall pass a
resolution or ordinance to organize such a health district under
chapter 70.05 RCW and this chapter.
(b) The resolution or ordinance may specify the membership,
representation on the district health board, or other matters relative
to the formation or operation of the health district. The county
legislative authority may appoint elected officials from cities and
towns and persons other than elected officials as members of the health
district board so long as persons other than elected officials do not
constitute a majority.
(c) Any single county health district existing on ((the effective
date of this act)) January 1, 1996, shall continue in existence unless
and until changed by affirmative action of the county legislative
authority.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the agency
originally established as the Spokane county health district in January
1970, when the city of Spokane and Spokane county merged their health
departments into one agency pursuant to this chapter, is comprised of
the following membership commencing August 1, 2009:
(a) Two members of the Spokane county commissioners;
(b) One elected official from the largest city in the district;
(c) Two local physicians nominated by the Spokane county medical
society;
(d) A local health care professional chosen by the Spokane county
commissioners;
(e) Two local business representatives nominated by the local
chamber of commerce, one representing the restaurant industry and one
representing the building industry; and
(f) One public member chosen by the Spokane county commissioners.

--- END ---