BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.20.030 and 2008 c 116 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Abandoned" as it relates to a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model owned by a tenant in a mobile home park, mobile home park
cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision or tenancy in a mobile
home lot means the tenant has defaulted in rent and by absence and by
words or actions reasonably indicates the intention not to continue
tenancy;
(2) "Eligible organization" includes local governments, local
housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of
Washington, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance
organizations;
(3) "Hook-ups" means the physical connection at the home;
(4) "Housing authority" or "authority" means any of the public body
corporate and politic created in RCW 35.82.030;
(((4))) (5) "Landlord" means the owner of a mobile home park and
includes the agents of a landlord;
(((5))) (6) "Local government" means a town government, city
government, code city government, or county government in the state of
Washington;
(((6))) (7) "Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling
built according to the United States department of housing and urban
development manufactured home construction and safety standards act,
which is a national preemptive building code. A manufactured home
also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical
systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and (c) can be
transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on
the site is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;
(((7))) (8) "Manufactured/mobile home" means either a manufactured
home or a mobile home;
(((8))) (9) "Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built
prior to June 15, 1976, to standards other than the United States
department of housing and urban development code, and acceptable under
applicable state codes in effect at the time of construction or
introduction of the home into the state. Mobile homes have not been
built since the introduction of the United States department of housing
and urban development manufactured home construction and safety act;
(((9))) (10) "Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home
park or manufactured housing community designated as the location of
one mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory
buildings, and intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by
the occupants of that mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;
(((10))) (11) "Mobile home park," "manufactured housing community,"
or "manufactured/mobile home community" means any real property which
is rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or
more mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models for the primary
purpose of production of income, except where such real property is
rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only and
is not intended for year-round occupancy;
(((11))) (12) "Mobile home park cooperative" or "manufactured
housing cooperative" means real property consisting of common areas and
two or more lots held out for placement of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, or park models in which both the individual lots and the common
areas are owned by an association of shareholders which leases or
otherwise extends the right to occupy individual lots to its own
members;
(((12))) (13) "Mobile home park subdivision" or "manufactured
housing subdivision" means real property, whether it is called a
subdivision, condominium, or planned unit development, consisting of
common areas and two or more lots held for placement of mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park models in which there is private ownership
of the individual lots and common, undivided ownership of the common
areas by owners of the individual lots;
(((13))) (14) "Notice of sale" means a notice required under RCW
59.20.300 to be delivered to all tenants of a manufactured/mobile home
community and other specified parties within fourteen days after the
date on which any advertisement, multiple listing, or public notice
advertises that a manufactured/mobile home community is for sale;
(((14))) (15) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle ((intended
for permanent or semi-permanent installation and)) that is used as a
primary residence;
(((15))) (16) "Qualified sale of manufactured/mobile home
community" means the sale, as defined in RCW 82.45.010, of land and
improvements comprising a manufactured/mobile home community that is
transferred in a single purchase to a qualified tenant organization or
to an eligible organization for the purpose of preserving the property
as a manufactured/mobile home community;
(((16))) (17) "Qualified tenant organization" means a formal
organization of tenants within a manufactured/mobile home community,
with the only requirement for membership consisting of being a tenant;
(((17))) (18) "Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor
home, truck camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and
used as temporary living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted
on or drawn by another vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a
primary residence, and is not immobilized or permanently affixed to a
mobile home lot;
(((18))) (19) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient, who
rents a mobile home lot;
(((19))) (20) "Transient" means a person who rents a mobile home
lot for a period of less than one month for purposes other than as a
primary residence;
(((20))) (21) "Occupant" means any person, including a live-in care
provider, other than a tenant, who occupies a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model and mobile home lot.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.20.045 and 1993 c 66 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
Rules are enforceable against a tenant only if:
(1) Their purpose is to promote the convenience, health, safety, or
welfare of the residents, protect and preserve the premises from
abusive use, or make a fair distribution of services and facilities
made available for the tenants generally;
(2) They are reasonably related to the purpose for which they are
adopted;
(3) They apply to all tenants in a fair manner;
(4) They are not for the purpose of evading an obligation of the
landlord; and
(5) They are not retaliatory or discriminatory in nature.
A landlord may only adopt or modify rules and regulations of the
mobile home park with the written consent of the tenant. Any mutually
agreed to changes or modifications to the rules and regulations take
effect at the end of the rental period if the landlord has notified the
tenant in writing three months prior to the end of the rental period.
This right cannot be waived by the tenant.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.20.073 and 2003 c 127 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any rental agreement shall be assignable by the tenant to any
person to whom he or she sells or transfers title to the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model.
(2) A tenant who sells a mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model within a park shall notify the landlord in writing of the date of
the intended sale and transfer of the rental agreement at least fifteen
days in advance of such intended transfer and shall notify the buyer in
writing of the provisions of this section. The tenant shall verify in
writing to the landlord payment of all taxes, rent, and reasonable
expenses due on the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model and
mobile home lot.
(3) The landlord shall notify the selling tenant, in writing, of a
refusal to permit transfer of the rental agreement at least seven days
in advance of such intended transfer.
(4) The landlord may require the mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model to meet applicable fire and safety standards if a state or
local agency responsible for the enforcement of fire and safety
standards has issued a notice of violation of those standards to the
tenant and those violations remain uncorrected. Upon correction of the
violation to the satisfaction of the state or local agency responsible
for the enforcement of that notice of violation, the landlord's refusal
to permit the transfer is deemed withdrawn.
(5) The landlord shall approve or disapprove of the assignment of
a rental agreement on the same basis that the landlord approves or
disapproves of any new tenant, and any disapproval shall be in writing.
Consent to an assignment shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(6) Failure to notify the landlord in writing, as required under
subsection (2) of this section; or failure of the new tenant to make a
good faith attempt to arrange an interview with the landlord to discuss
assignment of the rental agreement; or failure of the current or new
tenant to obtain written approval of the landlord for assignment of the
rental agreement, shall be grounds for disapproval of such transfer.
(7) A tenant who has sold or transferred title to his or her mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model, and the person who now has
title, may enforce this section in court and in chapter 59.30 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 59.20.080 and 2003 c 127 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a
tenant or the occupancy of an occupant, of whatever duration except for
one or more of the following reasons:
(a) Substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations of
the rules of the mobile home park as established by the landlord at the
inception of the tenancy or as assumed subsequently with the consent of
the tenant or for violation of the tenant's duties as provided in RCW
59.20.140. The tenant shall be given written notice to cease the rule
violation immediately. The notice shall state that failure to cease
the violation of the rule or any subsequent violation of that or any
other rule shall result in termination of the tenancy, and that the
tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen days: PROVIDED, That
for a periodic violation the notice shall also specify that repetition
of the same violation shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in the case of a violation of a "material change" in park rules
with respect to pets, tenants with minor children living with them, or
recreational facilities, the tenant shall be given written notice under
this chapter of a six month period in which to comply or vacate;
(b) Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental
agreement, upon five days written notice to pay rent and/or other
charges or to vacate;
(c) Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which
threatens the health, safety, or welfare of the other mobile home park
tenants. The tenant shall be given written notice of a fifteen day
period in which to vacate;
(d) Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances and state
laws and regulations relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or
park models or mobile home, manufactured homes, or park model living
within a reasonable time after the tenant's receipt of notice of such
noncompliance from the appropriate governmental agency;
(e) Change of land use of the mobile home park including, but not
limited to, conversion to a use other than for mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park models or conversion of the mobile home
park to a mobile home park cooperative or mobile home park subdivision:
PROVIDED, That the landlord shall give the tenants twelve months'
notice in advance of the effective date of such change((, except that
for the period of six months following April 28, 1989, the landlord
shall give the tenants eighteen months' notice in advance of the
proposed effective date of such change));
(f) Engaging in "criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means a
criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a
tenant or occupant under this subsection need not produce evidence of
a criminal conviction, even if the alleged misconduct constitutes a
criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement agency of criminal
activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for
an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the seizure of
illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity and
is grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that
any tenant or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130
is grounds for eviction under this subsection. If criminal activity is
alleged to be a basis of termination, the park owner may proceed
directly to an unlawful detainer action;
(g) The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material
misstatement that induced the park owner to approve the tenant as a
resident of the park, and the park owner discovers and acts upon the
misstatement within one year of the time the resident began paying
rent;
(h) If the landlord serves a tenant three fifteen-day notices
within a twelve-month period to comply or vacate for failure to
substantively comply with the material terms of the rental agreement or
park rules. The applicable twelve-month period shall commence on the
date of the first violation;
(i) Failure of the tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon
tenants by applicable provisions of municipal, county, and state codes,
statutes, ordinances, and regulations, including this chapter. The
landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately.
The notice must state that failure to comply will result in termination
of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within
fifteen days;
(j) The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying
conduct upon the park premises that results in the destruction of the
rights of others to the peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises.
The landlord shall give the tenant written notice to comply
immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply will result
in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the
premises within fifteen days;
(k) The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to cease the conduct that
constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must state that failure
to cease the conduct will result in termination of the tenancy and that
the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;
(l) Any other substantial just cause that materially affects the
health, safety, and welfare of other park residents. The landlord
shall give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice
must state that failure to comply will result in termination of the
tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen
days; or
(m) Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental
agreement three or more times in a twelve-month period, commencing with
the date of the first violation, after service of a five-day notice to
comply or vacate.
(2) Within five days of a notice ((of eviction)) as required by
subsection (1)(a) and (h) of this section, the landlord and tenant
shall submit any dispute to mediation. The parties may agree in
writing to mediation by an independent third party or through industry
mediation procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then mediation
shall be through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed upon
both parties to participate in the mediation process in good faith for
a period of ten days for an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this
section. It is a defense to an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of
this section that a landlord did not participate in the mediation
process in good faith.
(3) Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of
recreational vehicles, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, from mobile home
parks. This chapter governs the eviction of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, park models, and recreational vehicles used as a primary
residence from a mobile home park.

Sec. 5 RCW 59.20.130 and 1999 c 359 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the landlord to:
(1) Comply with codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative
rules applicable to the mobile home park;
(2) Maintain the common premises and prevent the accumulation of
stagnant water and to prevent the detrimental effects of moving water
when such condition is not the fault of the tenant;
(3) Keep any shared or common premises and vacant mobile home lots
reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from defects to reduce the hazards
of fire or accident;
(4) Keep all common premises of the mobile home park, and vacant
mobile home lots, not in the possession of tenants, free of weeds or
plant growth noxious and detrimental to the health of the tenants and
free from potentially injurious or unsightly objects and condition;
(5) Maintain all trees, shrubs, natural fencing, and other
landscaping not planted by the tenants, but situated on their lots;
(6) Exterminate or make a reasonable effort to exterminate rodents,
vermin, or other pests dangerous to the health and safety of the tenant
whenever infestation exists on the common premises or whenever
infestation occurs in the interior of a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model as a result of infestation existing on the common
premises;
(((6))) (7) Maintain and protect all utilities provided to the
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model in good working
condition. Maintenance responsibility shall be determined at that
point where the normal mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
utilities "hook-ups" connect to those provided by the landlord or
utility company;
(((7))) (8) Respect the privacy of the tenants and shall have no
right of entry to a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
without the prior written consent of the occupant, except in case of
emergency or when the occupant has abandoned the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model. Such consent may be revoked in
writing by the occupant at any time. The ownership or management shall
have a right of entry upon the land upon which a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model is situated for maintenance of
utilities, to insure compliance with applicable codes, statutes,
ordinances, administrative rules, and the rental agreement and the
rules of the park, and protection of the mobile home park at any
reasonable time or in an emergency, but not in a manner or at a time
which would interfere with the occupant's quiet enjoyment. The
ownership or management shall make a reasonable effort to notify the
tenant of their intention of entry upon the land which a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model is located prior to entry;
(((8))) (9) Allow tenants freedom of choice in the purchase of
goods and services, and not unreasonably restrict access to the mobile
home park for such purposes;
(((9))) (10) Maintain roads within the mobile home park in good
condition and take reasonable steps to prevent the accumulation of
water, snow, or ice that would prevent tenants from accessing their
homes or exiting the mobile home park; ((and
(10))) (11) Notify each tenant within five days after a petition
has been filed by the landlord for a change in the zoning of the land
where the mobile home park is located and make a description of the
change available to the tenant; and
(12) Ensure that on-site managers and other employees comply with
codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative rules applicable to the
mobile home park, including the park rules and regulations.
A landlord shall not have a duty to repair a defective condition
under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the
tenant under this chapter, if the defective condition complained of was
caused by the conduct of the tenant, the tenant's family, invitee, or
other person acting under the tenant's control, or if a tenant
unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the property for
purposes of repair.

Sec. 6 RCW 59.20.135 and 1999 c 359 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that some mobile home park owners
transfer the responsibility for the upkeep of permanent structures
within the mobile home park to the park tenants. This transfer
sometimes occurs after the permanent structures have been allowed to
deteriorate. Many mobile home parks consist entirely of senior
citizens who do not have the financial resources or physical capability
to make the necessary repairs to these structures once they have fallen
into disrepair. The inability of the tenants to maintain permanent
structures can lead to significant safety hazards to the tenants as
well as to visitors to the mobile home park. The legislature therefore
finds and declares that it is in the public interest and necessary for
the public health and safety to prohibit mobile home park owners from
transferring the duty to maintain permanent structures in mobile home
parks to the tenants.
(2) A mobile home park owner is prohibited from transferring
responsibility for the maintenance or care of permanent structures
within the mobile home park to the tenants of the park. A provision
within a rental agreement or other document transferring responsibility
for the maintenance or care of permanent structures within the mobile
home park to the park tenants is void.
(3) A "permanent structure" for purposes of this section includes
the clubhouse, carports, storage sheds, or other permanent structure.
A permanent structure does not include structures built or affixed by
a tenant. A permanent structure includes only those structures that
were provided as amenities to the park tenants.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a park
owner from requiring a tenant to maintain his or her mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model or yard. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to prohibit a park owner from transferring
responsibility for the maintenance or care of permanent structures
within the mobile home park to an organization of park tenants or to an
individual park tenant when requested by the tenant organization or
individual tenant.
(5) If the landlord chooses to remove any permanent structure,
including trees, shrubs, natural fencing, or other landscaping, the
tenant or tenants must receive an adjustment to rent or other
appropriate consideration. This right is enforceable in any court of
competent jurisdiction, including small claims court, and in chapter
59.30 RCW.
(6) If a recreational facility is removed or is no longer made
available to the tenants, the tenants must receive adjustment to rent
or other appropriate consideration. This right is enforceable in any
court of competent jurisdiction, including small claims court, and in
chapter 59.30 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 59.20.210 and 1999 c 359 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If at any time during the tenancy, the landlord fails to carry
out any of the duties imposed by RCW 59.20.130, and notice of the
defect is given to the landlord pursuant to RCW 59.20.200, the tenant
may submit to the landlord or the landlord's designated agent by
certified mail or in person at least two bids to perform the repairs
necessary to correct the defective condition from licensed or
registered persons, or if no licensing or registration requirement
applies to the type of work to be performed, from responsible persons
capable of performing such repairs. Such bids may be submitted to the
landlord at the same time as notice is given pursuant to RCW 59.20.200.
(2) If the landlord fails to commence repair of the defective
condition within a reasonable time after receipt of notice from the
tenant, the tenant may contract with the person submitting the lowest
bid to make the repair, and upon the completion of the repair and an
opportunity for inspection by the landlord or the landlord's designated
agent, the tenant may deduct the cost of repair from the rent in an
amount not to exceed the sum expressed in dollars representing one
month's rental of the tenant's mobile home space in any calendar year.
When, however, the landlord is required to begin remedying the
defective condition within thirty days under RCW 59.20.200, the tenant
cannot contract for repairs for at least fifteen days following receipt
of bids by the landlord. The total costs of repairs deducted by the
tenant in any calendar year under this subsection shall not exceed the
sum expressed in dollars representing one month's rental of the
tenant's mobile home space.
(3) Two or more tenants ((shall not)) may collectively initiate
remedies under this section. Remedial action under this section shall
not be initiated for conditions in the design or construction existing
in a mobile home park before June 7, 1984.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not:
(a) Create a relationship of employer and employee between landlord
and tenant; or
(b) Create liability under the worker's compensation act; or
(c) Constitute the tenant as an agent of the landlord for the
purposes of mechanics' and materialmen's liens under chapter 60.04 RCW.
(5) Any repair work performed under this section shall comply with
the requirements imposed by any applicable code, statute, ordinance, or
rule. A landlord whose property is damaged because of repairs
performed in a negligent manner may recover the actual damages in an
action against the tenant.
(6) Nothing in this section shall prevent the tenant from agreeing
with the landlord to undertake the repairs in return for cash payment
or a reasonable reduction in rent, the agreement to be between the
parties, and this agreement does not alter the landlord's obligations
under this chapter.

--- END ---