BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.20.300 and 2008 c 116 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A landlord must provide a written notice of sale of a
manufactured/mobile home community by certified mail or personal
delivery to:
(a) Each tenant of the manufactured/mobile home community;
(b) The officers of any known qualified tenant organization;
(c) The office of manufactured housing;
(d) The local government within whose jurisdiction all or part of
the manufactured/mobile home community exists;
(e) The housing authority within whose jurisdiction all or part of
the manufactured/mobile home community exists; and
(f) The Washington state housing finance commission.
(2) A notice of sale must include:
(a) A statement that the landlord intends to sell the
manufactured/mobile home community; and
(b) The contact information of the landlord or landlord's agent who
is responsible for communicating with the qualified tenant organization
or eligible organization regarding the sale of the property.
(3) Any failure to strictly comply with subsections (1) and (2) of
this section results in the sale being void or requires the new owner
to maintain the property as a manufactured/mobile home community for
the period required under RCW 59.20.060(1)(g)(i).

--- END ---