BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.09.182 and 2007 c 496 s 304 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before entering a permanent parenting plan, the court shall
determine the existence of any information and proceedings relevant to
the placement of the child that are available in the judicial
information system and databases. Unless specifically requested by a
party, the foregoing shall not apply to agreed permanent parenting
plans or those entered into by default.

--- END ---