BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.100 and 1991 c 238 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for each college
district as set forth in this chapter. Each board of trustees shall be
composed of five trustees, except as provided in section 2 of this act,
who shall be appointed by the governor for terms commencing October 1st
of the year in which appointed. In making such appointments the
governor shall give consideration to geographical diversity, and
representing labor, business, women, and racial and ethnic minorities,
in the membership of the boards of trustees. The boards of trustees
for districts containing technical colleges shall include at least one
member from business and one member from labor.
The successors of the trustees initially appointed shall be
appointed by the governor to serve for a term of five years except that
any person appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of any term shall be appointed only for the remainder of the
term. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
Every trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector of the
college district. No trustee may be an employee of the community and
technical college system, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, or a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution.
Each board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a chairman
from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and may adopt such
bylaws, rules and regulations as it deems necessary for its own
government. Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum, but
a lesser number may adjourn from time to time and may compel the
attendance of absent members in such manner as prescribed in its
bylaws, rules, or regulations. The district president, or if there be
none, the president of the college, shall serve as, or may designate
another person to serve as, the secretary of the board, who shall not
be deemed to be a member of the board.
Members of the boards of trustees may be removed for misconduct or
malfeasance in office in the manner provided by RCW 28B.10.500.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A pilot program is established for the
purposes of appointing a student member to the board of trustees at
Bellevue Community College, Clark College, South Seattle Community
College, Spokane Community College, and Yakima Valley Community College
for the period of two years beginning July 1, 2009, until June 30,
2011. Each board of trustees shall be composed of six trustees, one of
whom shall be a student. The governor shall select each student member
from a list of candidates, of at least three and not more than five,
submitted by the governing body of the associated students. The
student member shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate. The student member shall hold his or her office for a term
of one year, beginning July 1st and ending June 30th, or until the
student member's successor is appointed and qualified, whichever is
later. The student member shall be a full-time student in good
standing at the community college at the time of appointment.
(2) A student appointed under this section shall excuse himself or
herself from participation or voting on matters relating to the hiring,
discipline, or tenure of faculty members and personnel.
(3) Each community college in subsection (1) of this section and
governing body of the associated students shall create a criteria by
which the pilot program shall be evaluated. The community college and
the governing body of the associated students shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011, on the
success of the pilot program based on the criteria established. The
report shall include recommendations on whether the student member
trustee shall be made permanent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---