BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The secretary of the department of
health shall establish a pilot program to provide merit checks of no
more than one hundred dollars to no more than four hundred fifty
couples who complete a family preparation course. The department of
health must ensure that the administrative cost of the program does not
exceed five percent of the total allocation. The pilot program must
begin no later than January 1, 2012, and continue for no more than five
years, in a county with a population between seven hundred twenty
thousand and one million. Under the pilot program, a couple who intend
to apply for a marriage license may, together or separately, complete
a family preparation course of not less than four hours with a family
preparation course provider. The county auditor shall provide to
couples interested in applying for a marriage license in the county, or
to a qualified instructor, certificate of completion forms for the
family preparation course and information that includes a brief
explanation of the course of required instruction, the required length
of time of the course, and an explanation of the qualified instructor
requirements. Within ninety days of applying for a marriage license,
either applicant may verify completion of a family preparation course
by filing with the department of health a copy of the marriage
certificate and a valid certificate of completion from a registered
course provider. Completed forms must include names and addresses of
participants, the name and work address of the course provider,
signatures of participants attesting to the completion of the required
coursework and the required length of instruction, and the signature of
the qualified instructor attesting to being a qualified instructor and
providing the required coursework and time requirement for the
participants.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a family preparation course
must include instruction regarding:
(a) Conflict management;
(b) Communication skills;
(c) Financial responsibilities in a marriage; and
(d) Children and parenting responsibilities.
(3) The family preparation course must be at least four hours in
length and must be taken from a qualified instructor who is a:
(a) Licensed psychologist;
(b) Certified social worker;
(c) Certified marriage and family therapist;
(d) Certified mental health counselor;
(e) Registered counselor with relevant training or coursework;
(f) Provider designated by a family court judge or commissioner; or
(g) Official representative of a religious institution, if the
representative has relevant training in conflict management,
communication skills, financial responsibilities in marriage, and
children and parenting responsibilities.
(4) Any costs of the family preparation course must be paid by the
applicant.
(5) When the department of health receives a copy of a marriage
certificate and a certificate of completion of a family preparation
course issued by a qualified instructor consistent with this section,
the department shall, within sixty days, issue a merit check to the
couple, not to exceed one hundred dollars per married couple.
(6) The department of health's statistics center shall compile
information on divorced or annulled couples who had previously
participated in a family preparation course.
(7) The department of health shall notify county auditors if there
are no available funds for this pilot program.
(8) The department of health shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature five years after the completion of the
pilot program. The committees shall make recommendations on whether
the program should be initiated statewide based on the results of the
number of participants who are still married as opposed to the average
divorce rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 All costs associated with the family
preparation course, including clerical functions performed by the
county auditor, must be privately funded. The funding must be found
and the pilot program must begin within two years of the effective date
of this section, with a minimum of four hundred fifty couples, not to
exceed one thousand couples.

--- END ---