BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
There is established, within the office of the insurance
commissioner, the position of health care authority ombudsman. The
duties of this office are:
(1) To research and respond to subscriber calls and complaints in
a timely manner;
(2) To ensure that health care authority and public employees'
benefits board staff are responsive to subscribers' needs and problems;
and
(3) To monitor the quality control of services to ensure
satisfactory resolution of subscriber health care problems and
concerns.

--- END ---