BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.570 and 2004 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 59.18.575 through 59.18.585 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
26.50.010.
(2) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW
70.125.030.
(3) "Stalking" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 9A.46.110.
(4) "Qualified third party" means any of the following people
acting in their official capacity:
(a) Law enforcement officers;
(b) Persons subject to the provisions of chapter 18.120 RCW;
(c) Employees of a court of the state;
(d) Licensed mental health professionals or other licensed
counselors;
(e) Employees of crime victim/witness programs as defined in RCW
7.69.020 who are trained advocates for the program; and
(f) Members of the clergy as defined in RCW 26.44.020.
(5) "Household member" means a child or adult residing with the
tenant other than the perpetrator of domestic violence, stalking, or
sexual assault.
(6) "Tenant screening service provider" means any nongovernmental
agency that provides, for a fee, background information on prospective
tenants to landlords.
(7) "Credit reporting agency" has the same meaning as set forth in
RCW 19.182.010(5).
(8) "Unlawful harassment" has the same meaning as in RCW 10.14.020
and also includes any request for sexual favors to a tenant or
household member in return for a change in or performance of any or all
terms of a lease or rental agreement.
(9) "Landlord" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.l8.030 and
includes the landlord's employees.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.575 and 2006 c 138 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a tenant notifies the landlord in writing that he or she
or a household member was a victim of an act that constitutes a crime
of domestic violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking,
and either (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection applies, then subsection
(2) of this section applies:
(i) The tenant or the household member has a valid order for
protection under one or more of the following: Chapter 7.90, 26.50, or
26.26 RCW or RCW 9A.46.040, 9A.46.050, 10.14.080, 10.99.040 (2) or (3),
or 26.09.050; or
(ii) The tenant or the household member has reported the domestic
violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking to a
qualified third party acting in his or her official capacity and the
qualified third party has provided the tenant or the household member
a written record of the report signed by the qualified third party.
(b) When a copy of a valid order for protection or a written record
of a report signed by a qualified third party, as required under (a) of
this subsection, is made available to the landlord, the tenant may
terminate the rental agreement and quit the premises without further
obligation under the rental agreement or under chapter ((59.12)) 59.18
RCW. However, the request to terminate the rental agreement must occur
within ninety days of the reported act, event, or circumstance that
gave rise to the protective order or report to a qualified third party.
A record of the report to a qualified third party that is provided to
the tenant or household member shall consist of a document signed and
dated by the qualified third party stating: (i) That the tenant or the
household member notified him or her that he or she was a victim of an
act or acts that constitute a crime of domestic violence, sexual
assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking; (ii) the time and date the
act or acts occurred; (iii) the location where the act or acts
occurred; (iv) a brief description of the act or acts of domestic
violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking; and (v)
that the tenant or household member informed him or her of the name of
the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts. The record of the report
provided to the tenant or household member shall not include the name
of the alleged perpetrator of the act or acts of domestic violence,
sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or stalking. The qualified third
party shall keep a copy of the record of the report and shall note on
the retained copy the name of the alleged perpetrator of the act or
acts of domestic violence, sexual assault, unlawful harassment, or
stalking. The record of the report to a qualified third party may be
accomplished by completion of a form provided by the qualified third
party, in substantially the following form:

(2) A tenant who terminates a rental agreement under this section
is discharged from the payment of rent for any period following the
last day of the month of the quitting date. The tenant shall remain
liable for the rent for the month in which he or she terminated the
rental agreement unless the termination is in accordance with RCW
59.18.200(1). Notwithstanding lease provisions that allow for
forfeiture of a deposit for early termination, a tenant who terminates
under this section is entitled to the return of the full deposit,
subject to RCW 59.18.020 and 59.18.280. Other tenants who are parties
to the rental agreement, except household members who are the victims
of sexual assault, stalking, unlawful harassment, or domestic violence,
are not released from their obligations under the rental agreement or
other obligations under this chapter.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision under this section, if
a tenant or a household member is a victim of sexual assault, stalking,
or unlawful harassment by a landlord, the tenant may terminate the
rental agreement and quit the premises without further obligation under
the rental agreement or under this chapter prior to making a copy of a
valid order for protection or a written record of a report signed by a
qualified third party available to the landlord, provided that:
(i) The tenant must deliver a copy of a valid order for protection
or written record of a report signed by a qualified third party to the
landlord by mail, fax, or personal delivery by a third party within
seven days of quitting the tenant's dwelling unit; and
(ii) A written record of a report signed by the qualified third
party must be substantially in the form specified under subsection
(1)(b) of this section. The record of the report provided to the
landlord must not include the name of the alleged perpetrator of the
act. On written request by the landlord, the qualified third party
shall, within seven days, provide the name of the alleged perpetrator
of the act to the landlord only if the alleged perpetrator was a person
meeting the definition of the term "landlord" under RCW 59.18.570.
(b) A tenant who terminates his or her rental agreement under this
subsection is discharged from the payment of rent for any period
following the latter of: (i) The date the tenant vacates the unit; or
(ii) the date the record of the report of the qualified third party and
the written notice that the tenant has vacated are delivered to the
landlord by mail, fax, or personal delivery by a third party. The
tenant is entitled to a pro rata refund of any prepaid rent and must
receive a full and specific statement of the basis for retaining any of
the deposit together with any refund due in accordance with RCW
59.18.280.
(4) If a tenant or a household member is a victim of sexual
assault, stalking, or unlawful harassment by a landlord, the tenant may
change or add locks to the tenant's dwelling unit at the tenant's
expense. If a tenant exercises his or her rights to change or add
locks, the following rules apply:
(a) Within seven days of changing or adding locks, the tenant must
deliver to the landlord by mail, fax, or personal delivery by a third
party: (i) Written notice that the tenant has changed or added locks;
and (ii) a copy of a valid order for protection or a written record of
a report signed by a qualified third party. A written record of a
report signed by a qualified third party must be substantially in the
form specified under subsection (1)(b) of this section. The record of
the report provided to the landlord must not include the name of the
alleged perpetrator of the act. On written request by the landlord,
the qualified third party shall, within seven days, provide the name of
the alleged perpetrator to the landlord only if the alleged perpetrator
was a person meeting the definition of the term "landlord" under RCW
59.18.570.
(b) After the tenant provides notice to the landlord that the
tenant has changed or added locks, the tenant's rental agreement shall
terminate on the ninetieth day after providing the notice, unless:
(i) Within sixty days of providing notice that the tenant has
changed or added locks, the tenant notifies the landlord in writing
that the tenant does not wish to terminate his or her rental agreement.
If the perpetrator has been identified by the qualified third party and
is no longer an employee or agent of the landlord or owner and does not
reside at the property, the tenant shall provide the owner or owner's
designated agent with a copy of the key to the new locks at the same
time as providing notice that the tenant does not wish to terminate his
or her rental agreement. A tenant who has a valid protection,
antiharassment, or other protective order against the owner of the
premises or against an employee or agent of the landlord or owner is
not required to provide a key to the new locks until the protective
order expires or the tenant vacates; or
(ii) The tenant exercises his or her rights to terminate the rental
agreement under subsection (3) of this section within sixty days of
providing notice that the tenant has changed or added locks.
(c) After a landlord receives notice that a tenant has changed or
added locks to his or her dwelling unit under (a) of this subsection,
the landlord may not enter the tenant's dwelling unit except as
follows:
(i) In the case of an emergency, the landlord may enter the unit if
accompanied by a law enforcement or fire official acting in his or her
official capacity. If the landlord reasonably concludes that the
circumstances require immediate entry into the unit, the landlord may,
after notifying emergency services, use such force as necessary to
enter the unit if the tenant is not present; or
(ii) The landlord complies with the requirements of RCW 59.18.150
and clearly specifies in writing the time and date that the landlord
intends to enter the unit and the purpose for entering the unit. The
tenant must make arrangements to permit access by the landlord.
(d) The exercise of rights to change or add locks under this
subsection does not discharge the tenant from the payment of rent until
the rental agreement is terminated and the tenant vacates the unit.
(e) The tenant may not change any locks to common areas and must
make keys for new locks available to other household members.
(f) Upon vacating the dwelling unit, the tenant must deliver the
key and all copies of the key to the landlord by mail or personal
delivery by a third party.
(5) A tenant's remedies under this section do not preempt any other
legal remedy available to the tenant.
(6) The provision of verification of a report under subsection
(1)(b) of this section does not waive the confidential or privileged
nature of the communication between a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking with a qualified third party pursuant to
RCW 5.60.060, 70.123.075, or 70.125.065. No record or evidence
obtained from such disclosure may be used in any civil, administrative,
or criminal proceeding against the victim unless a written waiver of
applicable evidentiary privilege is obtained, except that the
verification itself, and no other privileged information, under
subsection (1)(b) of this section may be used in civil proceedings
brought under this section.

--- END ---