BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person commits negligent driving in the second degree with a
vulnerable user victim if, under circumstances constituting negligent
driving in the second degree, as defined in RCW 46.61.525, he or she
proximately causes the death, great bodily harm, or substantial bodily
harm of a vulnerable user of a public way.
(2) The law enforcement officer or prosecuting authority issuing
the notice of infraction for an offense under this section shall state
on the notice of infraction that the offense was a proximate cause of
death, great bodily harm, or substantial bodily harm, as defined in RCW
9A.04.110, of a vulnerable user of a public way. The court shall
notify the person in writing of the time, place, and date of the
hearing, and that date shall not be sooner than seven days from the
date of the notice, except by agreement. The form for the notice of
traffic infraction under this section shall be prescribed by rule of
the supreme court and, in addition to the requirements of RCW
46.63.060, shall:
(a) State that a hearing will be scheduled by the court to
determine the penalties under subsection (3) or (4) of this section
and, if necessary, provide an opportunity for the person to contest the
determination that the offense has been committed;
(b) State that (i) the person named in the notice of infraction is
required to appear at the scheduled hearing regardless of whether the
person named in the notice contests the determination that the offense
has been committed, (ii) failure to appear at the hearing will result
in the suspension of the person's driver's license or driving privilege
for a minimum of ninety days and continue thereafter until any
penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied; and
(iii) failure to appear at the hearing will result in the imposition of
a fine fixed by the court in an amount of at least one thousand dollars
and not to exceed five thousand dollars; and
(c) Include a statement of the monetary and nonmonetary penalties
established and available under this section and any other applicable
law.
(3) A person found to have committed negligent driving in the
second degree with a vulnerable user victim shall be required to:
(a) Pay a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars;
(b) Complete a traffic safety course approved by the court;
(c) Perform up to one hundred hours of community service, which
must be approved by the court and must include activities related to
driver improvement and providing public education on traffic safety;
and
(d) Submit certification to the court establishing that the
requirements of this subsection have been met.
(4) In lieu of the penalties imposed under subsection (3) of this
section, a person found to have committed a violation of this section
may elect to:
(a) Pay a fine fixed by the court in an amount of at least one
thousand dollars and not to exceed five thousand dollars; and
(b) Have his or her driving privileges suspended for ninety days.
(5) If a person found to have committed a violation of this section
does not complete all requirements of subsection (3) of this section
within one year of the date the violation of this section is found
committed and does not elect the penalties described in subsection (4)
of this section:
(a) The court shall impose a fine in an amount of at least one
thousand dollars and not to exceed five thousand dollars; and
(b) The person's driving privileges shall be suspended for ninety
days.
For good cause shown, the court may extend the period of time in
which the person must complete the requirements of subsection (3) of
this section before imposing the fine and driving privilege suspension
provided for in this subsection.
(6) If a person issued a notice of infraction for a violation of
this section fails to appear for a hearing scheduled pursuant to
subsection (2)(a) of this section:
(a) The court shall enter an order assessing the monetary penalty;
(b) The person's driving privileges shall be suspended for ninety
days; and
(c) The court shall notify the department in accordance with RCW
46.20.270 of the failure to respond to the notice of infraction or to
appear at a scheduled hearing.
For good cause shown, the court may reschedule or continue the
hearing scheduled pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(7) An offense under this section is a traffic infraction. To the
extent not inconsistent with this section, the provisions of chapter
46.63 RCW shall apply to infractions under this section. Procedures
for the conduct of all hearings provided for in this section may be
established by rule of the supreme court.
(8) If a person's driving privileges are suspended pursuant to
subsection (4)(b), (5)(b), or (6)(b) of this section, the court shall
send notice of such suspension to the department.
(9) For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable user of a public
way" means: (a) A pedestrian; (b) a person riding an animal; or (c) a
person operating any of the following on a public way:
(i) A farm tractor or implement of husbandry without an enclosed
shell;
(ii) A skateboard;
(iii) Roller skates or in-line skates;
(iv) A scooter;
(v) A bicycle or tricycle;
(vi) An electric assist bicycle;
(vii) An electric personal assistive mobility device; or
(viii) A wheelchair conveyance or other personal mobility device.
(10) Any act prohibited by this section that also constitutes a
crime under any other law of this state may be the basis of prosecution
under such other law notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for
prosecution under this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.342 and 2008 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be ((an)) a habitual offender under chapter
46.65 RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation
issued under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect,
is guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary
restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; ((or))
(xviii) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection; or
(xix) A finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction
under section 1 of this act and suspension of driving privileges
pursuant to section 1 (4)(b), (5)(b), or (6)(b) of this act.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a notice
of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v) the person has committed an offense in
another state that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds
for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi)
the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of
the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time
of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to infractions committed on
or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---