BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 58.17.310 and 1990 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a city, town, or county receives an application for
the approval of a plat of a subdivision that lies in whole or in part
in an irrigation district organized pursuant to chapter 87.03 RCW, the
responsible administrator shall give written notice of the application,
including a legal description of the short subdivision and a location
map, to the irrigation district. The irrigation district shall, after
receiving the notice, submit to the responsible administrator who
furnished the notice a statement with any information or conditions for
approval that the irrigation district deems to be necessary regarding
the proposed division's effect upon the structural integrity, including
lateral support, of the irrigation district facilities, other risk
exposures, and the safety of the public and irrigation district.
(2) In addition to any other requirements imposed by the provisions
of this chapter, the legislative authority of any city, town, or county
shall not approve a short plat or final plat, as defined in RCW
58.17.020, for any subdivision, short subdivision, lot, tract, parcel,
or site which lies in whole or in part in an irrigation district
organized pursuant to chapter 87.03 RCW unless there has been provided
an irrigation water right-of-way for each parcel of land in such
district. In addition, if the subdivision, short subdivision, lot,
tract, parcel, or site lies within land within the district classified
as irrigable, completed irrigation water distribution facilities for
such land may be required by the irrigation district by resolution,
bylaw, or rule of general applicability as a condition for approval of
the short plat or final plat by the legislative authority of the city,
town, or county. Rights-of-way shall be evidenced by the respective
plats submitted for final approval to the appropriate legislative
authority. In addition, if the subdivision, short subdivision, lot,
tract, parcel, or site to be platted is wholly or partially within an
irrigation district of two hundred thousand acres or more and has been
previously platted by the United States bureau of reclamation as a farm
unit in the district, the legislative authority shall not approve for
such land a short plat or final plat as defined in RCW 58.17.020
without the approval of the irrigation district and the administrator
or manager of the project of the bureau of reclamation, or its
successor agency, within which that district lies. Compliance with the
requirements of this section together with all other applicable
provisions of this chapter shall be a prerequisite, within the
expressed purpose of this chapter, to any sale, lease, or development
of land in this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 87.03.460 and 2007 c 469 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to their reasonable expenses in accordance with
chapter 42.24 RCW, the directors shall each receive ((an amount for
attending meetings and while performing other services for the
district. The amount shall be fixed by resolution and entered in the
minutes of the proceedings of the board. It shall not exceed)) ninety
dollars for each day or portion thereof spent by a director for such
actual attendance at official meetings of the district, or in
performance of other official services or duties on behalf of the
district. The total amount of such additional compensation received by
a director may not exceed eight thousand six hundred forty dollars in
a calendar year. The board shall fix the compensation of the secretary
and all other employees.
(2) Any director may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the director's election and prior to the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
shall specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
(3) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five
years, beginning July 1, 2008, based upon changes in the consumer price
index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
shall be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
(4) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

Sec. 3 RCW 89.12.050 and 1963 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A district may enter into repayment and other contracts with
the United States under the terms of the federal reclamation laws in
matters relating to federal reclamation projects, and may with respect
to lands within its boundaries include in the contract, among others,
an agreement that:
(((1))) (a) The district will not deliver water by means of the
project works provided by the United States to or for excess lands not
eligible therefor under applicable federal law.
(((2))) (b) As a condition to receiving water by means of the
project works, each excess landowner in the district, unless his excess
lands are otherwise eligible to receive water under applicable federal
law, shall be required to execute a recordable contract covering all of
his excess lands within the district.
(((3))) (c) All excess lands within the district not eligible to
receive water by means of the project works shall be subject to
assessment in the same manner and to the same extent as lands eligible
to receive water, subject to such provisions as the secretary may
prescribe for postponement in payment of all or part of the assessment
but not beyond a date five years from the time water would have become
available for such lands had they been eligible therefor.
(((4))) (d) The secretary is authorized to amend any existing
contract, deed, or other document to conform to the provisions of
applicable federal law as it now exists. Any such amendment may be
filed for record under RCW 89.12.080.
(2) A district may enter into a contract with the United States for
the transfer of operations and maintenance of the works of a federal
reclamation project, but the contract does not impute to the district
negligence for design or construction defects or deficiencies of the
transferred works.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An irrigation district may enter into any contract or agreement
with, or form a separate legal entity with, one or more of the entities
or utilities specified in subsection (3) of this section for any of the
following purposes:
(a) Purchasing and selling electric power; and
(b) Developing or owning, or both, electric power generating or
transmitting facilities, or both, including, but not limited to,
facilities for generating or transmitting electric power generated by
wind.
(2) The contract or agreement may provide:
(a) For purchasing the capability of a project to produce or
transmit electric power, in addition to actual output of a project;
(b) For making payments whether or not a project is completed,
operative, or operating, and notwithstanding the suspension,
interruption, interference, reduction, or curtailment of output or use
of a project or the use, power, and energy contracted for or agreed to;
(c) That payments are not subject to reduction, whether by offset
or otherwise; and
(d) That performance is not conditioned upon performance or
nonperformance of any party or entity.
(3) Pursuant to authority granted under this section, irrigation
districts may contract or enter into agreements with one or more:
(a) Agencies of the United States government;
(b) States;
(c) Municipalities;
(d) Public utility districts;
(e) Irrigation districts;
(f) Joint operating agencies;
(g) Rural electric cooperatives;
(h) Mutual corporations or associations;
(i) Investor-owned utilities; or
(j) Associations or legal entities composed of any such entities or
utilities.

--- END ---