BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47A.030 and 2008 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To the extent funding is appropriated in the operating budget
for this purpose, the health insurance partnership is established. The
administrator shall be responsible for the implementation and operation
of the health insurance partnership, directly or by contract. The
administrator shall offer premium subsidies to eligible partnership
participants under RCW 70.47A.040. ((The partnership shall begin to
offer coverage no later than March 1, 2009.))
(2) Consistent with policies adopted by the board under RCW
70.47A.110, the administrator shall, directly or by contract:
(a) Establish and administer procedures for enrolling small
employers in the partnership, including publicizing the existence of
the partnership and disseminating information on enrollment, and
establishing rules related to minimum participation of employees in
small groups purchasing health insurance through the partnership.
Opportunities to publicize the program for outreach and education of
small employers on the value of insurance shall explore the use of
online employer guides. As a condition of participating in the
partnership, a small employer must agree to establish a cafeteria plan
under section 125 of the federal internal revenue code that will enable
employees to use pretax dollars to pay their share of their health
benefit plan premium. The partnership shall provide technical
assistance to small employers for this purpose;
(b) Establish and administer procedures for health benefit plan
enrollment by employees of small employers during open enrollment
periods and outside of open enrollment periods upon the occurrence of
any qualifying event specified in the federal health insurance
portability and accountability act of 1996 or applicable state law.
Except to the extent authorized in RCW 70.47A.110(1)(e), neither the
employer nor the partnership shall limit an employee's choice of
coverage from among the health benefit plans offered through the
partnership;
(c) Establish and manage a system of collecting and transmitting to
the applicable carriers all premium payments or contributions made by
or on behalf of partnership participants, including employer
contributions, automatic payroll deductions for partnership
participants, premium subsidy payments, and contributions from
philanthropies;
(d) Establish and manage a system for determining eligibility for
and making premium subsidy payments under chapter 259, Laws of 2007;
(e) Establish a mechanism to apply a surcharge to each health
benefit plan purchased through the partnership, which shall be used
only to pay for administrative and operational expenses of the
partnership. The surcharge must be applied uniformly to all health
benefit plans purchased through the partnership. Any surcharge amount
may be added to the premium, but shall not be considered part of the
small group community rate, and shall be applied only to the coverage
purchased through the partnership. Surcharges may not be used to pay
any premium assistance payments under this chapter. The surcharge
shall reflect administrative and operational expenses remaining after
any appropriation provided by the legislature to support administrative
or operational expenses of the partnership during the year the
surcharge is assessed;
(f) Design a schedule of premium subsidies that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members based on a benchmark health benefit plan
designated by the board. The amount of an eligible partnership
participant's premium subsidy shall be determined by applying a sliding
scale subsidy schedule with the percentage of premium similar to that
developed for subsidized basic health plan enrollees under RCW
70.47.060. The subsidy shall be applied to the employee's premium
obligation for his or her health benefit plan, so that employees
benefit financially from any employer contribution to the cost of their
coverage through the partnership.
(3) The administrator may enter into interdepartmental agreements
with the office of the insurance commissioner, the department of social
and health services, and any other state agencies necessary to
implement this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.47A.040 and 2008 c 143 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning January 1, ((2009)) 2011, or earlier, subject to
sufficient state or federal funding being provided specifically for
this purpose, the administrator shall accept applications from eligible
partnership participants, on behalf of themselves, their spouses, and
their dependent children, to receive premium subsidies through the
health insurance partnership. Every effort shall be made to coordinate
premium subsidies for dependent children with federal funding available
under Title XIX and Title XXI of the federal social security act,
consistent with the requirements established in RCW 74.09.470(4) for
the employer-sponsored insurance program at the department of social
and health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47A.070 and 2008 c 143 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon implementation of the health insurance partnership program,
the administrator shall report biennially((, beginning November 1,
2010,)) to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
on the effectiveness and efficiency of the health insurance partnership
program, including enrollment trends, the services and benefits covered
under the purchased health benefit plans, consumer satisfaction, and
other program operational issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 2007 c 260 s 11 (uncodified) is repealed.

--- END ---