BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.15.010 and 2007 c 241 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Acquisition" means the purchase on a willing seller basis of
fee or less than fee interests in real property. These interests
include, but are not limited to, options, rights of first refusal,
conservation easements, leases, and mineral rights.
(2) "Board" means the recreation and conservation funding board.
(3) "Critical habitat" means lands important for the protection,
management, or public enjoyment of certain wildlife species or groups
of species, including, but not limited to, wintering range for deer,
elk, and other species, waterfowl and upland bird habitat, fish
habitat, and habitat for endangered, threatened, or sensitive species.
(4) "Farmlands" means any land defined as "farm and agricultural
land" in RCW 84.34.020(2).
(5) "Local agencies" means a city, county, town, federally
recognized Indian tribe, special purpose district, port district, or
other political subdivision of the state providing services to less
than the entire state.
(6) "Natural areas" means areas that have, to a significant degree,
retained their natural character and are important in preserving rare
or vanishing flora, fauna, geological, natural historical, or similar
features of scientific or educational value.
(7) "Nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association" means
an organization as defined in RCW 84.34.250.
(8) "Riparian habitat" means land adjacent to water bodies, as well
as submerged land such as streambeds, which can provide functional
habitat for salmonids and other fish and wildlife species. Riparian
habitat includes, but is not limited to, shorelines and near-shore
marine habitat, estuaries, lakes, wetlands, streams, and rivers.
(((8))) (9) "Special needs populations" means physically restricted
people or people of limited means.
(((9))) (10) "State agencies" means the state parks and recreation
commission, the department of natural resources, the department of
general administration, and the department of fish and wildlife.
(((10))) (11) "Trails" means public ways constructed for and open
to pedestrians, equestrians, or bicyclists, or any combination thereof,
other than a sidewalk constructed as a part of a city street or county
road for exclusive use of pedestrians.
(((11))) (12) "Urban wildlife habitat" means lands that provide
habitat important to wildlife in proximity to a metropolitan area.
(((12))) (13) "Water access" means boat or foot access to marine
waters, lakes, rivers, or streams.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.15.030 and 2007 c 241 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter shall be divided as
follows:
(a) Appropriations for a biennium of forty million dollars or less
must be allocated equally between the habitat conservation account and
the outdoor recreation account.
(b) If appropriations for a biennium total more than forty million
dollars, the money must be allocated as follows: (i) Twenty million
dollars to the habitat conservation account and twenty million dollars
to the outdoor recreation account; (ii) any amount over forty million
dollars up to fifty million dollars shall be allocated as follows: (A)
Ten percent to the habitat conservation account; (B) ten percent to the
outdoor recreation account; (C) forty percent to the riparian
protection account; and (D) forty percent to the farmlands preservation
account; and (iii) any amounts over fifty million dollars must be
allocated as follows: (A) Thirty percent to the habitat conservation
account; (B) thirty percent to the outdoor recreation account; (C)
thirty percent to the riparian protection account; and (D) ten percent
to the farmlands preservation account.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 303, Laws of 2005,
moneys deposited in these accounts shall be invested as authorized for
other state funds, and any earnings on them shall be credited to the
respective account.
(3) All moneys deposited in the habitat conservation, outdoor
recreation, riparian protection, and farmlands preservation accounts
shall be allocated as provided under RCW 79A.15.040, 79A.15.050,
79A.15.120, and 79A.15.130 as grants to state or local agencies or
nonprofit nature conservancy organizations or associations for
acquisition, development, and renovation within the jurisdiction of
those agencies, subject to legislative appropriation. The board may
use or permit the use of any funds appropriated for this chapter as
matching funds where federal, local, or other funds are made available
for projects within the purposes of this chapter. Moneys appropriated
to these accounts that are not obligated to a specific project may be
used to fund projects from lists of alternate projects from the same
account in biennia succeeding the biennium in which the moneys were
originally appropriated.
(4) Projects receiving grants under this chapter that are developed
or otherwise accessible for public recreational uses shall be available
to the public.
(5) The board may make grants to an eligible project from the
habitat conservation, outdoor recreation, riparian protection, and
farmlands preservation accounts and any one or more of the applicable
categories under such accounts described in RCW 79A.15.040, 79A.15.050,
79A.15.120, and 79A.15.130.
(6) The board may accept private donations to the habitat
conservation account, the outdoor recreation account, the riparian
protection account, and the farmlands preservation account for the
purposes specified in this chapter.
(7) The board may apply up to three percent of the funds
appropriated for this chapter for its office for the administration of
the programs and purposes specified in this chapter.
(8) Habitat and recreation land and facilities acquired or
developed with moneys appropriated for this chapter may not, without
prior approval of the board, be converted to a use other than that for
which funds were originally approved. The board shall adopt rules and
procedures governing the approval of such a conversion.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.15.060 and 2007 c 241 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and
priorities for distributions from the habitat conservation account.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this chapter may not be used by the board to fund staff positions
or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local agency to
fund operation or maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter.
(3) Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to acquisition, including, but not
limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and signing.
(4) ((Moneys appropriated for this section may be used to fund
mitigation banking projects involving the restoration, creation,
enhancement, or preservation of critical habitat and urban wildlife
habitat, provided that the parties seeking to use the mitigation bank
meet the matching requirements of subsection (5) of this section. The
moneys from this section may not be used to supplant an obligation of
a state or local agency to provide mitigation. For the purposes of
this section, a mitigation bank means a site or sites where critical
habitat or urban wildlife habitat is restored, created, enhanced, or in
exceptional circumstances, preserved expressly for the purpose of
providing compensatory mitigation in advance of authorized project
impacts to similar resources.
(5))) The board may not approve a local project where the local
agency share is less than the amount to be awarded from the habitat
conservation account.
(((6))) (5) In determining acquisition priorities with respect to
the habitat conservation account, the board shall consider, at a
minimum, the following criteria:
(a) For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:
(i) Community support for the project;
(ii) The project proposal's ongoing stewardship program that
includes control of noxious weeds, detrimental invasive species, and
that identifies the source of the funds from which the stewardship
program will be funded;
(iii) Recommendations as part of a watershed plan or habitat
conservation plan, or a coordinated regionwide prioritization effort,
and for projects primarily intended to benefit salmon, limiting
factors, or critical pathways analysis;
(iv) Immediacy of threat to the site;
(v) Uniqueness of the site;
(vi) Diversity of species using the site;
(vii) Quality of the habitat;
(viii) Long-term viability of the site;
(ix) Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;
(x) Enhancement of existing public property;
(xi) Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or
statewide recreational or resource plan, including projects that assist
in the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated according
to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated according to RCW
36.70A.130;
(xii) Educational and scientific value of the site;
(xiii) Integration with recovery efforts for endangered,
threatened, or sensitive species;
(xiv) For critical habitat proposals by local agencies, the
statewide significance of the site.
(b) For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the
criteria of (a) of this subsection:
(i) Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;
(ii) Proximity to other wildlife habitat;
(iii) Potential for public use; and
(iv) Potential for use by special needs populations.
(((7))) (6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
board shall recommend to the governor a prioritized list of all state
agency and local projects to be funded under RCW 79A.15.040(1) (a),
(b), and (c). The governor may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board and shall submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but
not be limited to, a description of each project and any particular
match requirement, and describe for each project any anticipated
restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the project.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.15.120 and 2007 c 241 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The riparian protection account is established in the state
treasury. The board must administer the account in accordance with
chapter 79A.25 RCW and this chapter, and hold it separate and apart
from all other money, funds, and accounts of the board.
(2) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the riparian protection
account must be distributed for the acquisition or enhancement or
restoration of riparian habitat. All enhancement or restoration
projects, except those qualifying under subsection (((10))) (9)(a) of
this section, must include the acquisition of a real property interest
in order to be eligible.
(3) State and local agencies and lead entities under chapter 77.85
RCW, nonprofit nature conservancy organizations or associations, and
the conservation commission may apply for acquisition and enhancement
or restoration funds for riparian habitat projects under subsection (1)
of this section. Other state agencies not defined in RCW 79A.15.010,
such as the department of transportation and the department of
corrections, may enter into interagency agreements with state agencies
to apply in partnership for funds under this section.
(4) The board may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and
priorities for distributions from the riparian protection account.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this section may not be used by the board to fund staff positions
or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local agency to
fund operation or maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter.
(6) Moneys appropriated for this section may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to restoration and acquisition,
including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.
(7) ((Moneys appropriated for this section may be used to fund
mitigation banking projects involving the restoration, creation,
enhancement, or preservation of riparian habitat, provided that the
parties seeking to use the mitigation bank meet the matching
requirements of subsection (8) of this section. The moneys from this
section may not be used to supplant an obligation of a state or local
agency to provide mitigation. For the purposes of this section, a
mitigation bank means a site or sites where riparian habitat is
restored, created, enhanced, or in exceptional circumstances, preserved
expressly for the purpose of providing compensatory mitigation in
advance of authorized project impacts to similar resources.
(8))) The board may not approve a local project where the local
agency or nonprofit nature conservancy organization or association
share is less than the amount to be awarded from the riparian
protection account. In-kind contributions, including contributions of
a real property interest in land, may be used to satisfy the local
agency's or nonprofit nature conservancy organization's or
association's share.
(((9))) (8) State agencies receiving grants for acquisition of land
under this section must pay an amount in lieu of real property taxes
equal to the amount of tax that would be due if the land were taxable
as open space land under chapter 84.34 RCW except taxes levied for any
state purpose, plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds
equal to that which would be paid if such lands were privately owned.
The county assessor and county legislative authority shall assist in
determining the appropriate calculation of the amount of tax that would
be due.
(((10))) (9) In determining acquisition priorities with respect to
the riparian protection account, the board must consider, at a minimum,
the following criteria:
(a) Whether the project continues the conservation reserve
enhancement program. Applications that extend the duration of leases
of riparian areas that are currently enrolled in the conservation
reserve enhancement program shall be eligible. Such applications are
eligible for a conservation lease extension of at least twenty-five
years of duration;
(b) Whether the projects are identified or recommended in a
watershed planning process under chapter 247, Laws of 1998, salmon
recovery planning under chapter 77.85 RCW, or other local plans, such
as habitat conservation plans, and these must be highly considered in
the process;
(c) Whether there is community support for the project;
(d) Whether the proposal includes an ongoing stewardship program
that includes control of noxious weeds, detrimental invasive species,
and that identifies the source of the funds from which the stewardship
program will be funded;
(e) Whether there is an immediate threat to the site;
(f) Whether the quality of the habitat is improved or, for projects
including restoration or enhancement, the potential for restoring
quality habitat including linkage of the site to other high quality
habitat;
(g) Whether the project is consistent with a local land use plan,
or a regional or statewide recreational or resource plan. The projects
that assist in the implementation of local shoreline master plans
updated according to RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated
according to RCW 36.70A.130 must be highly considered in the process;
(h) Whether the site has educational or scientific value; and
(i) Whether the site has passive recreational values for walking
trails, wildlife viewing, or the observation of natural settings.
(((11))) (10) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the
board will recommend to the governor a prioritized list of projects to
be funded under this section. The governor may remove projects from
the list recommended by the board and will submit this amended list in
the capital budget request to the legislature. The list must include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and any particular
match requirement.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.15.130 and 2007 c 241 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The farmlands preservation account is established in the state
treasury. The board will administer the account in accordance with
chapter 79A.25 RCW and this chapter, and hold it separate and apart
from all other money, funds, and accounts of the board. Moneys
appropriated for this chapter to the farmlands preservation account
must be distributed for the acquisition and preservation of farmlands
in order to maintain the opportunity for agricultural activity upon
these lands.
(2)(a) Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the farmlands
preservation account may be distributed for (i) the fee simple or less
than fee simple acquisition of farmlands; (ii) the enhancement or
restoration of ecological functions on those properties; or (iii) both.
In order for a farmland preservation grant to provide for an
environmental enhancement or restoration project, the project must
include the acquisition of a real property interest.
(b) If a city ((or)), county, nonprofit nature conservancy
organization or association, or the conservation commission acquires a
property through this program in fee simple, the city ((or)), county,
nonprofit nature conservancy organization or association, or the
conservation commission shall endeavor to secure preservation of the
property through placing a conservation easement, or other form of deed
restriction, on the property which dedicates the land to agricultural
use and retains one or more property rights in perpetuity. Once an
easement or other form of deed restriction is placed on the property,
the city ((or)), county, nonprofit nature conservancy organization or
association, or the conservation commission shall seek to sell the
property, at fair market value, to a person or persons who will
maintain the property in agricultural production. Any moneys from the
sale of the property shall either be used to purchase interests in
additional properties which meet the criteria in subsection (9) of this
section, or to repay the grant from the state which was originally used
to purchase the property.
(3) Cities ((and)), counties, nonprofit nature conservancy
organizations or associations, and the conservation commission may
apply for acquisition and enhancement or restoration funds for farmland
preservation projects within their jurisdictions under subsection (1)
of this section.
(4) The board may adopt rules establishing acquisition and
enhancement or restoration policies and priorities for distributions
from the farmlands preservation account.
(5) The acquisition of a property right in a project under this
section by a county ((or)), city, nonprofit nature conservancy
organization or association, or the conservation commission does not
provide a right of access to the property by the public unless
explicitly provided for in a conservation easement or other form of
deed restriction.
(6) Except as provided in RCW 79A.15.030(7), moneys appropriated
for this section may not be used by the board to fund staff positions
or other overhead expenses, or by a city ((or)), county, nonprofit
nature conservancy organization or association, or the conservation
commission to fund operation or maintenance of areas acquired under
this chapter.
(7) Moneys appropriated for this section may be used by grant
recipients for costs incidental to restoration and acquisition,
including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.
(8) The board may not approve a local project where the local
agency's or nonprofit nature conservancy organization's or
association's share is less than the amount to be awarded from the
farmlands preservation account. In-kind contributions, including
contributions of a real property interest in land, may be used to
satisfy the local agency's or nonprofit nature conservancy
organization's or association's share.
(9) In determining the acquisition priorities, the board must
consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:
(a) Community support for the project;
(b) A recommendation as part of a limiting factors or critical
pathways analysis, a watershed plan or habitat conservation plan, or a
coordinated regionwide prioritization effort;
(c) The likelihood of the conversion of the site to nonagricultural
or more highly developed usage;
(d) Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or
statewide recreational or resource plan. The projects that assist in
the implementation of local shoreline master plans updated according to
RCW 90.58.080 or local comprehensive plans updated according to RCW
36.70A.130 must be highly considered in the process;
(e) Benefits to salmonids;
(f) Benefits to other fish and wildlife habitat;
(g) Integration with recovery efforts for endangered, threatened,
or sensitive species;
(h) The viability of the site for continued agricultural
production, including, but not limited to:
(i) Soil types;
(ii) On-site production and support facilities such as barns,
irrigation systems, crop processing and storage facilities, wells,
housing, livestock sheds, and other farming infrastructure;
(iii) Suitability for producing different types or varieties of
crops;
(iv) Farm-to-market access;
(v) Water availability; and
(i) Other community values provided by the property when used as
agricultural land, including, but not limited to:
(i) Viewshed;
(ii) Aquifer recharge;
(iii) Occasional or periodic collector for storm water runoff;
(iv) Agricultural sector job creation;
(v) Migratory bird habitat and forage area; and
(vi) Educational and curriculum potential.
(10) In allotting funds for environmental enhancement or
restoration projects, the board will require the projects to meet the
following criteria:
(a) Enhancement or restoration projects must further the ecological
functions of the farmlands;
(b) The projects, such as fencing, bridging watercourses,
replanting native vegetation, replacing culverts, clearing of
waterways, etc., must be less than fifty percent of the acquisition
cost of the project including any in-kind contribution by any party;
(c) The projects should be based on accepted methods of achieving
beneficial enhancement or restoration results; and
(d) The projects should enhance the viability of the preserved
farmland to provide agricultural production while conforming to any
legal requirements for habitat protection.
(11) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board will
recommend to the governor a prioritized list of all projects to be
funded under this section. The governor may remove projects from the
list recommended by the board and must submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list must include, but
not be limited to, a description of each project and any particular
match requirement.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.34.250 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 22 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in RCW 84.34.210, as now or hereafter amended, ((and)) RCW
84.34.220, as now or hereafter amended, and RCW 79A.15.010, "nonprofit
nature conservancy corporation or association" means an organization
which qualifies as being tax exempt under 26 U.S.C. section 501(c) (of
the Internal Revenue Code) as it exists on June 25, 1976 and one which
has as one of its principal purposes the conducting or facilitating of
scientific research; the conserving of natural resources, including but
not limited to biological resources, for the general public; or the
conserving of open spaces, including but not limited to wildlife
habitat to be utilized as public access areas, for the use and
enjoyment of the general public.

--- END ---