BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.330 and 2007 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of trustees of college districts are empowered in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter to provide for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, demolition, and
major alterations of buildings and other capital assets, and the
acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements, or
appurtenances for the use of the aforementioned colleges as authorized
by the college board in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140; to be financed
by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived
from income received from such facilities, gifts, bequests, or grants,
and such additional funds as the legislature may provide, and payable
out of a bond retirement fund to be established by the respective
district boards in accordance with rules ((and regulations)) of the
state board. With respect to building, improvements, or repairs, or
other work, where the estimated cost exceeds ((fifty-five)) ninety
thousand dollars, or ((thirty-five)) forty-five thousand dollars if the
work involves one trade or craft area, complete plans and
specifications for the work shall be prepared, the work shall be put
out for a public bid, and the contract shall be awarded to the
responsible bidder who submits the lowest responsive bid. Any project
regardless of dollar amount may be put to public bid.
(2) This section does not apply when a contract is awarded by the
small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155.
(3) Where the estimated cost to any college of any building,
improvements, or repairs, or other work, is less than ((fifty-five))
ninety thousand dollars, or ((thirty-five)) forty-five thousand dollars
if the work involves one trade or craft area, the publication
requirements of RCW 39.04.020 do not apply.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.350 and 2007 c 495 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the cost to The Evergreen State College or any regional or
state university of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling,
or demolition, other than maintenance or repairs, will equal or exceed
the sum of ((fifty-five)) ninety thousand dollars, or ((thirty-five))
forty-five thousand dollars if the work involves one trade or craft
area, complete plans and specifications for the work shall be prepared,
the work shall be put out for public bid, and the contract shall be
awarded to the responsible bidder who submits the lowest responsive
bid.
(2) Any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or
demolition project that exceeds the dollar amounts in subsection (1) of
this section is subject to the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW.
(3) The Evergreen State College or any regional or state university
may require a project to be put to public bid even when it is not
required to do so under subsection (1) of this section. Any project
publicly bid under this subsection is subject to the provisions of
chapter 39.12 RCW.
(4) Where the estimated cost of any building, construction,
renovation, remodeling, or demolition is less than ((fifty-five))
ninety thousand dollars or the contract is awarded by the small works
roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155, the publication
requirements of RCW 39.04.020 do not apply.
(5) In the event of any emergency when the public interest or
property of The Evergreen State College or a regional or state
university would suffer material injury or damage by delay, the
president of such college or university may declare the existence of an
emergency and, reciting the facts constituting the same, may waive the
requirements of this section with reference to any contract in order to
correct the condition causing the emergency. For the purposes of this
section, "emergency" means a condition likely to result in immediate
physical injury to persons or to property of the college or university
in the absence of prompt remedial action or a condition which
immediately impairs the institution's ability to perform its
educational obligations.
(6) This section does not apply when a contract is awarded by the
small works roster procedure authorized in RCW 39.04.155 or under any
other procedure authorized for an institution of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.22.620 and 2002 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, the term "public works" means as
defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(2) A first-class city may have public works performed by contract
pursuant to public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by
subsection (3) of this section, a first-class city may have public
works performed by city employees in any annual or biennial budget
period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the public
works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental
public works construction budget, over the budget period. The amount
of public works that a first-class city has a county perform for it
under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent
limitation.
If a first-class city has public works performed by public
employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent
limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be
reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be
performed by public employees for that city in its next budget period.
Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions to that city
shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess
amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of
public works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so
withheld shall be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in
its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public works it has
performed by public employees has been so reduced.
Whenever a first-class city has had public works performed in any
budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget
period, all remaining public works within that budget period shall be
done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive
bids.
The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any
first-class city that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the
city has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed
by public employees in subsequent years.
(3) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection
(2) of this section, a first-class city ((with a population in excess
of one hundred fifty thousand)) shall not have public employees perform
a public works project in excess of ((seventy thousand dollars, or))
ninety thousand dollars ((after January 1, 2010,)) if more than a
single craft or trade is involved with the public works project, or a
public works project in excess of ((thirty-five thousand dollars, or))
forty-five thousand dollars ((after January 1, 2010,)) if only a single
craft or trade is involved with the public works project or the public
works project is street signalization or street lighting. ((In
addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (2) of
this section, a first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or less shall not have public employees perform a public works
project in excess of fifty thousand dollars, or sixty-five thousand
dollars after January 1, 2010, if more than one craft or trade is
involved with the public works project, or a public works project in
excess of thirty thousand dollars, or forty thousand dollars after
January 1, 2010, if only a single craft or trade is involved with the
public works project or the public works project is street
signalization or street lighting.)) A public works project means a
complete project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit
the division of the project into units of work or classes of work to
avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day labor on a
single project.
(4) In addition to the accounting and record-keeping requirements
contained in RCW 39.04.070, every first-class city annually shall
prepare a report for the state auditor indicating the total public
works construction budget and supplemental public works construction
budget for that year, the total construction costs of public works
performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent
of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a
biennial basis, this annual report shall indicate the amount of public
works that is performed by public employees within the current biennial
period that is above or below ten percent of the total biennial
construction budget.
Each first-class city with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or less shall use the form required by RCW 43.09.205 to
account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand
dollars that are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of
that project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value
of all the separate public works projects within the budget.
(6) The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be
waived by the city legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if
an exemption contained within that section applies to the work or
contract.
(7) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this
section, a first-class city may let contracts using the small works
roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from
a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.
(8) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.
(9) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(10) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first-class city
from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled
materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.23.352 and 2002 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any second-class city or any town may construct any public
works, as defined in RCW 39.04.010, by contract or day labor without
calling for bids therefor whenever the estimated cost of the work or
improvement, including cost of materials, supplies and equipment will
not exceed the sum of ((forty-five thousand dollars, or sixty thousand
dollars after January 1, 2010,)) sixty-five thousand dollars if more
than one craft or trade is involved with the public works, or ((thirty
thousand dollars, or)) forty thousand dollars ((after January 1,
2010,)) if a single craft or trade is involved with the public works or
the public works project is street signalization or street lighting.
A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in
this subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of
work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be
performed by day labor on a single project.
Whenever the cost of the public work or improvement, including
materials, supplies and equipment, will exceed these figures, the same
shall be done by contract. All such contracts shall be let at public
bidding upon publication of notice calling for sealed bids upon the
work. The notice shall be published in the official newspaper, or a
newspaper of general circulation most likely to bring responsive bids,
at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids will be
received. The notice shall generally state the nature of the work to
be done that plans and specifications therefor shall then be on file in
the city or town hall for public inspections, and require that bids be
sealed and filed with the council or commission within the time
specified therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by a bid proposal
deposit in the form of a cashier's check, postal money order, or surety
bond to the council or commission for a sum of not less than five
percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered unless
accompanied by such bid proposal deposit. The council or commission of
the city or town shall let the contract to the lowest responsible
bidder or shall have power by resolution to reject any or all bids and
to make further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.
When the contract is let then all bid proposal deposits shall be
returned to the bidders except that of the successful bidder which
shall be retained until a contract is entered into and a bond to
perform the work furnished, with surety satisfactory to the council or
commission, in accordance with RCW 39.08.030. If the bidder fails to
enter into the contract in accordance with his or her bid and furnish
a bond within ten days from the date at which he or she is notified
that he or she is the successful bidder, the check or postal money
order and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the council or
commission or the council or commission shall recover the amount of the
surety bond. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a
contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.
If no bid is received on the first call the council or commission
may readvertise and make a second call, or may enter into a contract
without any further call or may purchase the supplies, material or
equipment and perform the work or improvement by day labor.
(2) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city
or town employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(3) In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a
second-class city or a town may let contracts using the small works
roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the city or town shall invite at least one
proposal from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise
qualify under this section.
(4) The form required by RCW 43.09.205 shall be to account and
record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars that
are not let by contract.
(5) The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs
of the materials, equipment, supplies, and labor on that construction
project.
(6) Any purchase of supplies, material, or equipment, except for
public work or improvement, where the cost thereof exceeds seven
thousand five hundred dollars shall be made upon call for bids.
(7) Bids shall be called annually and at a time and in the manner
prescribed by ordinance for the publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the city or town of all notices or newspaper
publications required by law. The contract shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder.
(8) For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed
with as to purchases with an estimated value of fifteen thousand
dollars or less, the council or commission must authorize by
resolution, use of the uniform procedure provided in RCW 39.04.190.
(9) The city or town legislative authority may waive the
competitive bidding requirements of this section pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.
(10) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(4), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A
RCW.
(11) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any second class city
or any town from allowing for preferential purchase of products made
from recycled materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

Sec. 5 RCW 35A.40.210 and 1989 c 11 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Procedures for any public work or improvement contracts or
purchases for code cities shall be governed by ((the following
statutes, as indicated:
(1) For code cities of twenty thousand population or over, RCW
35.22.620; and
(2) For code cities under twenty thousand population;)) RCW
35.23.352.

Sec. 6 RCW 36.32.235 and 2000 c 138 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In each county with a population of one million or more which
by resolution establishes a county purchasing department, the
purchasing department shall enter into leases of personal property on
a competitive basis and purchase all supplies, materials, and equipment
on a competitive basis, for all departments of the county, as provided
in this chapter and chapter 39.04 RCW, except that the county
purchasing department is not required to make purchases that are paid
from the county road fund or equipment rental and revolving fund.
(2) As used in this section, "public works" has the same definition
as in RCW 39.04.010.
(3) Except as otherwise specified in this chapter or in chapter
36.77 RCW, all counties subject to these provisions shall contract on
a competitive basis for all public works after bids have been submitted
to the county upon specifications therefor. Such specifications shall
be in writing and shall be filed with the clerk of the county
legislative authority for public inspection.
(4) An advertisement shall be published in the county official
newspaper stating the time and place where bids will be opened, the
time after which bids will not be received, the character of the work
to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished, and that
specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk of the
county legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be published
in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as near as possible
to that part of the county in which such work is to be done. If the
county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation
covering at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the
county in which such public works are to be done, then the publication
of an advertisement of the applicable specifications in the county
official newspaper is sufficient. Such advertisements shall be
published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date
upon which bids will be received.
(5) The bids shall be in writing, shall be filed with the clerk,
shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named therefor
in the advertisements, and after being opened, shall be filed for
public inspection. No bid may be considered for public work unless it
is accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a surety bond, postal
money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified check in an amount
equal to five percent of the amount of the bid proposed.
(6) The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause.
The county legislative authority shall require from the successful
bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the amount and with
the conditions imposed by law.
(7) If the bidder to whom the contract is awarded fails to enter
into the contract and furnish the contractor's bond as required within
ten days after notice of the award, exclusive of the day of notice, the
amount of the bid deposit shall be forfeited to the county and the
contract awarded to the next lowest and best bidder. The bid deposit
of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the contract is
awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the successful
bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. Immediately
after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded
and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone
inquiry.
(8) As limited by subsection (10) of this section, a county subject
to these provisions may have public works performed by county employees
in any annual or biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not
exceeding ten percent of the public works construction budget,
including any amount in a supplemental public works construction
budget, over the budget period.
Whenever a county subject to these provisions has had public works
performed in any budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for
that budget period, all remaining public works except emergency work
under subsection (12) of this section within that budget period shall
be done by contract pursuant to public notice and call for competitive
bids as specified in subsection (3) of this section. The state auditor
shall report to the state treasurer any county subject to these
provisions that exceeds this amount and the extent to which the county
has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed by
public employees in subsequent years.
(9) If a county subject to these provisions has public works
performed by public employees in any budget period that are in excess
of this ten percent limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted
amount shall be reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of public
works that may be performed by public employees for that county in its
next budget period. Ten percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax
distributions to that county shall be withheld if two years after the
year in which the excess amount of work occurred, the county has failed
to so reduce the amount of public works that it has performed by public
employees. The amount withheld shall be distributed to the county when
it has demonstrated in its reports to the state auditor that the amount
of public works it has performed by public employees has been reduced
as required.
(10) In addition to the percentage limitation provided in
subsection (8) of this section, counties subject to these provisions
containing a population of one million or more shall not have public
employees perform a public works project in excess of ((seventy))
ninety thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is
involved with the public works project, or a public works project in
excess of ((twenty-five)) forty-five thousand dollars if only a single
craft or trade is involved with the public works project. A public
works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this
subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work
or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be
performed by public employees on a single project.
The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of
materials, supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that
project. The value of the public works budget shall be the value of
all the separate public works projects within the budget.
(11) In addition to the accounting and recordkeeping requirements
contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, any county which uses public employees
to perform public works projects under RCW 36.32.240(1) shall prepare
a year-end report to be submitted to the state auditor indicating the
total dollar amount of the county's public works construction budget
and the total dollar amount for public works projects performed by
public employees for that year.
The year-end report submitted pursuant to this subsection to the
state auditor shall be in accordance with the standard form required by
RCW 43.09.205.
(12) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, counties
may use public employees without any limitation for emergency work
performed under an emergency declared pursuant to RCW 36.32.270, and
any such emergency work shall not be subject to the limitations of this
section. Publication of the description and estimate of costs relating
to correcting the emergency may be made within seven days after the
commencement of the work. Within two weeks of the finding that such an
emergency existed, the county legislative authority shall adopt a
resolution certifying the damage to public facilities and costs
incurred or anticipated relating to correcting the emergency.
Additionally this section shall not apply to architectural and
engineering or other technical or professional services performed by
public employees in connection with a public works project.
(13) In lieu of the procedures of subsections (3) through (11) of
this section, a county may let contracts using the small works roster
process provided in RCW 39.04.155.
Whenever possible, the county shall invite at least one proposal
from a minority or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under
this section.
(14) The allocation of public works projects to be performed by
county employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(15) This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(((3))) (4), that are negotiated under chapter
39.35A RCW.
(16) Nothing in this section prohibits any county from allowing for
preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or
products that may be recycled or reused.
(17) This section does not apply to contracts between the public
stadium authority and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(4), or
development agreements between the public stadium authority and a team
affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW
36.102.060(8).

Sec. 7 RCW 36.32.250 and 2000 c 138 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
No contract for public works may be entered into by the county
legislative authority or by any elected or appointed officer of the
county until after bids have been submitted to the county upon
specifications therefor. Such specifications shall be in writing and
shall be filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority for
public inspection. An advertisement shall be published in the county
official newspaper stating the time and place where bids will be
opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the character
of the work to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished,
and that specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk
of the county legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be
published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as near as
possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done.
If the county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation
covering at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the
county in which such public works are to be done, then the publication
of an advertisement of the applicable specifications in the county
official newspaper shall be sufficient. Such advertisements shall be
published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date
upon which bids will be received. The bids shall be in writing, shall
be filed with the clerk, shall be opened and read in public at the time
and place named therefor in the advertisements, and after being opened,
shall be filed for public inspection. No bid may be considered for
public work unless it is accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a
surety bond, postal money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified
check in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid
proposed. The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the
lowest responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good
cause. The county legislative authority shall require from the
successful bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the
amount and with the conditions imposed by law. If the bidder to whom
the contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract and furnish
the contractor's bond as required within ten days after notice of the
award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount of the bid deposit
shall be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to the next
lowest and best bidder. A low bidder who claims error and fails to
enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if
a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. The bid
deposit of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the
contract is awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the
successful bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. In
the letting of any contract for public works involving less than
((ten)) forty thousand dollars, advertisement and competitive bidding
may be dispensed with on order of the county legislative authority.
Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall
be recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by
telephone inquiry.
As an alternative to requirements under this section, a county may
let contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.
This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as
defined in RCW 39.35A.020(((3))) (4), that are negotiated under chapter
39.35A RCW.

--- END ---