BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.58 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the requirements in RCW 70.58.082:
(1) The department shall not provide access to a birth certificate
that is less than one hundred twenty-five years old unless the
requester is one of the following: (a) The person named on the birth
certificate; (b) the legal parent or guardian of the person named on
the birth certificate; (c) a person or entity with a court order; or
(d) a person that is accessing the birth certificate for research
purposes as provided under chapter 42.48 RCW.
(2) The department shall require that every person requesting a
copy of a birth certificate or access to a birth certificate provide
proof that he or she is authorized to do so under subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---