BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.655 and 2005 c 431 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any public highway
unless such vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of
its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping
therefrom, except that sand or de-icer may be dropped for the purpose
of securing traction.
(2) No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with
any load unless the load and such covering as required thereon by
subsection (3) of this section is securely fastened to prevent the
covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a
hazard to other users of the highway.
(3)(a) Any vehicle operating on a paved public highway with a load
of dirt, sand, or gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked,
or otherwise escaping therefrom shall be covered so as to prevent
spillage. Covering of such loads is not required if six inches of
freeboard is maintained within the bed.
(b) Any vehicle with a model year of 2011 or later that has a gross
vehicle weight rating of 16,001 pounds or more, and is designed
primarily to haul loads of materials, such as dirt, sand, or gravel,
must be equipped with a permanently affixed manual or automated load
covering device, and any person operating the vehicle on a public
highway with a load of dirt, sand, or gravel must engage the load
covering device.
(c) Any person operating a vehicle on public highways is exempt
from this subsection (3) under the following circumstances:
(i) When operating a vehicle on any public highway in response to
emergency conditions, including flooding or natural disaster;
(ii) When operating a vehicle on any public highway that is closed
for repair or emergency purposes; or
(iii) When operating a vehicle on any public highway for the
purpose of dropping sand or de-icer on the roadway pursuant to
instruction from a state or local authority.
(4)(a) Any person operating a vehicle from which any glass or
objects have fallen or escaped, which would constitute an obstruction
or injure a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon such public
highway shall immediately cause the public highway to be cleaned of all
such glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor.
(b) Any vehicle with deposits of mud, rocks, or other debris on the
vehicle's body, fenders, frame, undercarriage, wheels, or tires shall
be cleaned of such material before the operation of the vehicle on a
paved public highway.
(5) The state patrol may make necessary rules to carry into effect
the provisions of this section, applying such provisions to specific
conditions and loads and prescribing means, methods, and practices to
effectuate such provisions.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a public
maintenance vehicle from dropping sand or de-icer on a highway to
enhance traction, or sprinkling water or other substances to clean or
maintain a highway.
(7)(a)(i) A person is guilty of failure to secure a load in the
first degree if he or she, with criminal negligence, fails to secure a
load or part of a load to his or her vehicle in compliance with
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section and causes substantial
bodily harm to another.
(ii) Failure to secure a load in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(b)(i) A person is guilty of failure to secure a load in the second
degree if he or she, with criminal negligence, fails to secure a load
or part of a load to his or her vehicle in compliance with subsection
(1) or (2) of this section and causes damage to property of another.
(ii) Failure to secure a load in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.
(c) A person who fails to secure a load or part of a load to his or
her vehicle in compliance with subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this
section is guilty of an infraction if such failure does not amount to
a violation of (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(8) Whenever a person who is operating a vehicle on a public
highway in the course of the person's employment violates this section,
the person's employer is liable for a monetary penalty of one thousand
dollars. A person's employer must not be charged a monetary penalty
under this subsection (8) if, prior to the violation, the person's
employer installed a permanently affixed load covering device to a
vehicle and the person failed to engage the load covering device when
hauling loads of dirt, sand, or gravel on a public highway.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.655 and 2005 c 431 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any public highway
unless such vehicle is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of
its load from dropping, sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping
therefrom, except that sand or de-icer may be dropped for the purpose
of securing traction.
(2) No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with
any load unless the load and such covering as required thereon by
subsection (3) of this section is securely fastened to prevent the
covering or load from becoming loose, detached, or in any manner a
hazard to other users of the highway.
(3)(a) Any vehicle operating on a paved public highway with a load
of dirt, sand, or gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked,
or otherwise escaping therefrom shall be covered so as to prevent
spillage. ((Covering of such loads is not required if six inches of
freeboard is maintained within the bed.))
(b) Any vehicle with a model year of 2011 or later that has a gross
vehicle weight rating of 16,001 pounds or more, and is designed
primarily to haul loads of materials, such as dirt, sand, or gravel,
must be equipped with a permanently affixed manual or automated load
covering device, and any person operating the vehicle on a public
highway with a load of dirt, sand, or gravel must engage the load
covering device.
(c) Any person operating a vehicle on public highways is exempt
from this subsection (3) under the following circumstances:
(i) When operating a vehicle on any public highway in response to
emergency conditions, including flooding or natural disaster;
(ii) When operating a vehicle on any public highway that is closed
for repair or emergency purposes; or
(iii) When operating a vehicle on any public highway for the
purpose of dropping sand or de-icer on the roadway pursuant to
instruction from a state or local authority.
(4)(a) Any person operating a vehicle from which any glass or
objects have fallen or escaped, which would constitute an obstruction
or injure a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon such public
highway shall immediately cause the public highway to be cleaned of all
such glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor.
(b) Any vehicle with deposits of mud, rocks, or other debris on the
vehicle's body, fenders, frame, undercarriage, wheels, or tires shall
be cleaned of such material before the operation of the vehicle on a
paved public highway.
(5) The state patrol may make necessary rules to carry into effect
the provisions of this section, applying such provisions to specific
conditions and loads and prescribing means, methods, and practices to
effectuate such provisions.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a public
maintenance vehicle from dropping sand or de-icer on a highway to
enhance traction, or sprinkling water or other substances to clean or
maintain a highway.
(7)(a)(i) A person is guilty of failure to secure a load in the
first degree if he or she, with criminal negligence, fails to secure a
load or part of a load to his or her vehicle in compliance with
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section and causes substantial
bodily harm to another.
(ii) Failure to secure a load in the first degree is a gross
misdemeanor.
(b)(i) A person is guilty of failure to secure a load in the second
degree if he or she, with criminal negligence, fails to secure a load
or part of a load to his or her vehicle in compliance with subsection
(1) or (2) of this section and causes damage to property of another.
(ii) Failure to secure a load in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.
(c) A person who fails to secure a load or part of a load to his or
her vehicle in compliance with subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this
section is guilty of an infraction if such failure does not amount to
a violation of (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(8) Whenever a person who is operating a vehicle on a public
highway in the course of the person's employment violates this section,
the person's employer is liable for a monetary penalty of one thousand
dollars. A person's employer must not be charged a monetary penalty
under this subsection (8) if, prior to the violation, the person's
employer installed a permanently affixed load covering device to a
vehicle and the person failed to engage the load covering device when
hauling loads of dirt, sand, or gravel on a public highway.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2014.

--- END ---