BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to promote positive health
outcomes for the children of the state by transferring to local health
jurisdictions those funds appropriated to the department of health for
the purpose of administering immunization protection to the citizens of
the state.
(2) Funds transferred to local health jurisdictions are for the
purpose of purchasing vaccines, promoting the use of immunization
protection for the reduction of diseases that may be prevented by
vaccines and educating health care providers and patients regarding
their use.
(3) It is the goal of the legislature that the department of health
and local health jurisdictions work collaboratively to ensure that
immunization rates are increased annually. Local health jurisdictions
are encouraged to collaborate with local providers and nonprofit
organizations to achieve this goal.
(4) Funds from the department of health for the purposes described
in this section shall be transferred effective July 1, 2009.
(5) Beginning on July 1, 2011, and each year thereafter, local
health jurisdictions shall report to the department of health and the
legislature, the immunization rates for the preceding year. Local
health jurisdictions shall also include in this report a description of
measures taken to improve immunization rates.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---