BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Domestic employers of foreign workers" means a person or
persons residing in the state of Washington who recruit or employ a
foreign worker to perform work in Washington state.
(2) "Foreign worker" or "worker" means a person who is not a
citizen of the United States and who comes to Washington state based on
an offer of employment. "Foreign worker" or "worker" does not include
persons who hold an H-1B visa and come to work in the state.
(3) "International labor recruitment agency" means a corporation,
partnership, business, or other legal entity, whether or not organized
under the laws of the United States or any state, that does business in
the United States and offers Washington state entities engaged in the
employment or recruitment of foreign workers, employment referral
services involving citizens of a foreign country or countries by acting
as an intermediary between these foreign workers and Washington
employers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Domestic employers of foreign workers
and international labor recruitment agencies must provide a disclosure
statement as described in this section to foreign workers who have been
referred to or hired by a Washington employer.
(2) The disclosure statement must:
(a) Be provided in the primary language spoken by the worker;
(b) State that the worker may be considered an employee under the
laws of the state of Washington and is subject to state worker health
and safety laws and may be eligible for workers' compensation insurance
and unemployment insurance;
(c) State that the worker may be subject to both state and federal
laws governing overtime and work hours, including the minimum wage act
under chapter 49.46 RCW;
(d) Include an itemized listing of any deductions the employer
intends to make from the worker's pay for food and housing;
(e) Include an itemized listing of the international labor
recruitment agency's fees;
(f) State that the worker has the right to control over his or her
travel and labor documents, including his or her visa, at all times and
that the employer may not require the employee to surrender those
documents to the employer or to the international labor recruitment
agency while the employee is working in the United States;
(g) Include a list of services or a hot line a worker may contact
if he or she thinks that he or she may be a victim of trafficking.
(3) The department of labor and industries may create a model
disclosure form and post the model form on its web site so that
domestic employers of foreign workers and international labor
recruitment agencies may download the form, or mail the form upon
request. The disclosure statement must be given to the worker no later
than the date that the worker arrives at the place of employment in
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 For purposes of establishing personal
jurisdiction under this chapter, an international labor recruitment
agency or a domestic employer of a foreign worker is deemed to be doing
business in Washington and is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts
of Washington state if the agency or employer contracts for employment
services with a Washington resident or is considered to be doing
business under any other provision or rule of law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.71.080 and 1996 c 191 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person licensed to practice medicine in this state shall
pay licensing fees and renew his or her license in accordance with
administrative procedures and administrative requirements adopted as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission may establish
rules governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall
be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. The rules shall
provide that mandatory continuing education requirements may be met in
part by physicians showing evidence of the completion of approved
activities relating to professional liability risk management.
(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the
commission with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The commission shall disseminate this information to
licensees by: Providing the information on the commission's web site;
including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings
attended by organization members; or through another distribution
method determined by the commission. The commission shall report to
the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses
to distribute information under this subsection.
(3) The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit an applicant
who has not renewed his or her license to be licensed without
examination if it is satisfied that such applicant meets all the
requirements for licensure in this state, and is competent to engage in
the practice of medicine.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.83.090 and 1996 c 191 s 68 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall establish rules governing mandatory continuing
education requirements which shall be met by any psychologist applying
for a license renewal.
(2) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the board
with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The board shall disseminate this information to
licensees by: Providing the information on the board's web site;
including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings
attended by organization members; or through another distribution
method determined by the board. The board shall report to the office
of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to
distribute information under this subsection.
(3) Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and
fees for renewal and reissue of licenses shall be established as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.225.040 and 2001 c 251 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter. Any rules adopted shall be in consultation with the
committee;
(2) Establish all licensing, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue licenses to applicants who have met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure and to deny a
license to applicants who do not meet the requirements;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals licensed
under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical
examinations;
(6) Administer and supervise the grading and taking of examinations
for applicants for licensure;
(7) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to
individuals credentialed in those states without examinations;
(8) Implement and administer a program for consumer education in
consultation with the committee;
(9) Adopt rules implementing a continuing education program in
consultation with the committee;
(10) The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the
committee with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The committee shall disseminate this information to
licensees by: Providing the information on the committee's web site;
including the information in newsletters; holding trainings at meetings
attended by organization members; or through another distribution
method determined by the committee. The committee shall report to the
office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses to
distribute information under this subsection;
(11) Maintain the official record of all applicants and licensees;
and
(((11))) (12) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---