BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.71.310 and 2001 c 109 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall enter into a contract with the entity to
implement an impaired physician program. The commission may enter into
a contract with the entity for up to six years in length. The impaired
physician program may include any or all of the following:
(a) Entering into relationships supportive of the impaired
physician program with professionals who provide either evaluation or
treatment services, or both;
(b) Receiving and assessing reports of suspected impairment from
any source;
(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment, or in cases where
there is reasonable cause to suspect impairment;
(d) Upon reasonable cause, referring suspected or verified impaired
physicians for evaluation or treatment;
(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired
physicians including those ordered by the commission;
(f) Providing monitoring and continuing treatment and
rehabilitative support of physicians;
(g) Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the
commission and the entity; and
(h) Providing prevention and education services.
(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section
shall be financed by a surcharge of not less than twenty-five and not
more than ((thirty-five)) fifty dollars per year on each license
renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department
of health from every physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter
in addition to other license fees. These moneys shall be placed in the
impaired physician account to be used solely for the implementation of
the impaired physician program.
(3) The department of health may not withhold any part of the
surcharge established in this section or assess any fees related to the
collection and administration of the impaired physician program.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.71A.020 and 1999 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and
the educational and training requirements for licensure as a physician
assistant or for those enrolled in any physician assistant training
program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited
physician assistant training program approved by the commission and
within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by
the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially
equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant
training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department
of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other
requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board of medical
examiners, or the medical quality assurance commission as of July 1,
1999, shall continue to be licensed.
(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to
which:
(i) Physician assistant students may practice medicine during
training; and
(ii) Physician assistants may practice after successful completion
of a physician assistant training course.
(b) Such rules shall provide:
(i) That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to
the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and
(ii) That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only
under the supervision and control of a physician licensed in this
state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to
necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physician
or physicians at the place where services are rendered.
(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the
commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the
commission, detailing the education, training, and experience of the
physician assistant and such other information as the commission may
require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by
the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge
of not less than twenty-five and not more than fifty dollars per year
shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license
to be collected by the department and deposited into the impaired
physician account for physician assistant participation in the impaired
physician program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to
the commission of the following:
(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician
assistant program approved by the commission and is eligible to take
the examination approved by the commission;
(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and
(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of
practicing medicine as a physician assistant with reasonable skill and
safety. The commission may require an applicant to submit to such
examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an
applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice
as a physician assistant.
(4) The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary
action upon the application for license as provided in the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as
determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission may
authorize the use of alternative supervisors who are licensed either
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.
(5) The department of health may not withhold any part of the
surcharge established in this section or assess any fees related to the
collection and administration of the impaired physician program.

--- END ---