BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that Washington's
marine container ports operate within a complex system of marine
terminal operations, truck and train transportation corridors, and
industrial services that together support a critical amount of our
state and national economy, including key parts of our state's
manufacturing and agricultural sectors, and directly creates thousands
of high-wage jobs throughout our region.
(2) The legislature further finds that the container port services
are increasingly challenged by the conversion of industrial properties
to nonindustrial uses, leading to competing and incompatible uses that
can hinder port operations, restrict efficient movement of freight, and
limit the opportunity for improvements to existing port-related
facilities.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that local land
use decisions are made in consideration of the long-term and widespread
economic contribution of our international container ports and related
industrial lands and transportation systems, and to ensure that
container ports continue to function effectively alongside vibrant city
waterfronts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For cities that include a marine container port with annual
operating revenues in excess of sixty million dollars, the city
comprehensive plan required by RCW 36.70A.070 shall include a container
port element.
(a) The container port element shall establish policies and
programs that define and protect the core areas of port and port-related industrial uses within the city, provide reasonably efficient
access to the core area through freight corridors within city limits,
identify and resolve key land use conflicts along the edge of the core
area, and minimize and mitigate incompatible uses along the edge of the
core to the extent practicable.
(b) The city and the port shall collaborate in the development of
the container port element.
(c) The container port element shall be completed and approved by
the city according to the schedule specified in RCW 36.70A.130.
(d) The container port element shall be consistent with the
economic development, transportation, and land use elements of the
city's comprehensive plan, and with the city's capital facilities plan.
(e) The city and the port shall work together to ensure consistency
between the container port element and the port comprehensive scheme
required by chapters 53.20 and 53.25 RCW, while retaining sufficient
planning flexibility to secure emerging economic opportunities.
(2) In developing the container port element required by subsection
(1) of this section, the city may include one or more of the following
approaches:
(a) Creation of a port overlay district that protects container
port uses;
(b) Industrial land banks;
(c) Buffers and transition zones between incompatible uses;
(d) Joint transportation funding agreements;
(e) Policies to encourage the retention of valuable warehouse and
storage facilities;
(f) Limitations on the location and/or size of nonindustrial uses
in the core and surrounding areas; and
(g) Other approaches by agreement between the city and the port.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide matching grant funds to the city to support development
of the container port element.
(4) Any planned improvements to the marine container ports
identified in the container port element shall be transmitted by the
city to the transportation commission for inclusion in the statewide
transportation plan required by RCW 47.01.071.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.06.140 and 2007 c 516 s 11 and 2007 c 512 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares the following transportation
facilities and services to be of statewide significance: Highways of
statewide significance as designated by the legislature under chapter
47.05 RCW, the interstate highway system, interregional state principal
arterials including ferry connections that serve statewide travel,
intercity passenger rail services, intercity high-speed ground
transportation, major passenger intermodal terminals excluding all
airport facilities and services, the freight railroad system, the
Columbia/Snake navigable river system, marine port facilities and
services that are related solely to marine activities affecting
international and interstate trade, key freight transportation
corridors serving these marine ports, and high capacity transportation
systems serving regions as defined in RCW 81.104.015. The department,
in cooperation with regional transportation planning organizations,
counties, cities, transit agencies, public ports, private railroad
operators, and private transportation providers, as appropriate, shall
plan for improvements to transportation facilities and services of
statewide significance in the statewide multimodal transportation plan.
Improvements to facilities and services of statewide significance
identified in the statewide multimodal transportation plan, or to
highways of statewide significance designated by the legislature under
chapter 47.05 RCW, are essential state public facilities under RCW
36.70A.200.
(2) The department of transportation, in consultation with local
governments, shall set level of service standards for state highways
and state ferry routes of statewide significance. Although the
department shall consult with local governments when setting level of
service standards, the department retains authority to make final
decisions regarding level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes of statewide significance. In establishing level of
service standards for state highways and state ferry routes of
statewide significance, the department shall consider the necessary
balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of
people and goods and the needs of local communities using these
facilities. When setting the level of service standards under this
section for state ferry routes, the department may allow for a standard
that is adjustable for seasonality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---