BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Beginning July 1, 2010, a food establishment
operating under a permit issued by a local public health officer may
not serve food containing artificial trans fat. The restriction of
artificial trans fat includes any food held for service, used in
preparation of any menu item, or served in any food establishment.
This restriction does not apply to food served directly to patrons in
a manufacturer's original sealed package or any food served in a
school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Except as otherwise provided in this
section, a food establishment must maintain on-site the original labels
for all food products that contain fats, oils, or shortenings that it
has purchased. Documentation from the manufacturers of such food
products, indicating whether they contain vegetable shortening,
margarine, or any kind of partially hydrogenated vegetable oil, or
indicating trans fat content, may be maintained instead of original
labels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director of a local public health
jurisdiction or the director's authorized representative is directed to
enforce the artificial trans fat restriction and requirements under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Food containing trans fat" means a food that is labeled as,
lists as an ingredient, or has vegetable shortening, margarine, or any
kind of partially hydrogenated vegetable oil. Food with a nutrition
facts label or other documentation from the manufacturer listing the
trans fat content of the food as less that 0.5 grams per serving shall
not be deemed to contain artificial trans fat.
(2) "Local public health officer" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.24.017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

--- END ---