BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.146.010 and 2008 c 78 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Affiliate" means any person who directly or indirectly through
one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with another person.
(2) "Application" means the same as in Regulation X, Real Estate
Settlement Procedures, 24 C.F.R. Sec. 3500.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
mortgage broker or loan originator in an effort to obtain or seek
advice or information on obtaining or applying to obtain a residential
mortgage loan for himself, herself, or persons including himself or
herself, regardless of whether the person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Computer loan information systems" or "CLI system" means a
real estate mortgage financing information system that facilitates the
provision of information to consumers by a mortgage broker, loan
originator, lender, real estate agent, or other person regarding
interest rates and other loan terms available from different lenders.
(5) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(6) "Designated broker" means a natural person designated as the
person responsible for activities of the licensed mortgage broker in
conducting the business of a mortgage broker under this chapter and who
meets the experience and examination requirements set forth in RCW
19.146.210(1)(e).
(7) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(8) "Employee" means an individual who has an employment
relationship with a mortgage broker, and the individual is treated as
an employee by the mortgage broker for purposes of compliance with
federal income tax laws.
(9) "Independent contractor" or "person who independently
contracts" means any person that expressly or impliedly contracts to
perform mortgage brokering services for another and that with respect
to its manner or means of performing the services is not subject to the
other's right of control, and that is not treated as an employee by the
other for purposes of compliance with federal income tax laws.
(10) "Loan originator" means a natural person who (a) takes a
residential mortgage loan application for a mortgage broker, or (b)
offers or negotiates terms of a mortgage loan, for direct or indirect
compensation or gain, or in the expectation of direct or indirect
compensation or gain. "Loan originator" also includes a person who
holds themselves out to the public as able to perform any of these
activities. "Loan originator" does not mean persons performing purely
administrative or clerical tasks for a mortgage broker. For the
purposes of this subsection, "administrative or clerical tasks" means
the receipt, collection, and distribution of information common for the
processing of a loan in the mortgage industry and communication with a
borrower to obtain information necessary for the processing of a loan.
A person who holds himself or herself out to the public as able to
obtain a loan is not performing administrative or clerical tasks.
(11) "Lock-in agreement" means an agreement with a borrower made by
a mortgage broker or loan originator, in which the mortgage broker or
loan originator agrees that, for a period of time, a specific interest
rate or other financing terms will be the rate or terms at which it
will make a loan available to that borrower.
(12) "Mortgage broker" means any person who for compensation or
gain, or in the expectation of compensation or gain (a) assists a
person in obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan
or (b) holds himself or herself out as being able to assist a person in
obtaining or applying to obtain a residential mortgage loan.
(13) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, company, limited
liability corporation, partnership, or association.
(14) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, or alone or in concert
with others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership,
company, association, or corporation, and the owner of a sole
proprietorship.
(15) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use secured by a mortgage or deed of
trust on residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended
to be constructed a single family dwelling or multiple family dwelling
of four or less units.
(16) "Third-party provider" means any person other than a mortgage
broker or lender who provides goods or services to the mortgage broker
in connection with the preparation of the borrower's loan and includes,
but is not limited to, credit reporting agencies, title companies,
appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or escrow companies.
(17) "Yield spread premium" means a direct payment by the lender to
the mortgage broker that is based on the difference between the
interest rate at which the broker originates the residential mortgage
loan and the wholesale par rate for which the borrower qualifies.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.146.070 and 2006 c 19 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise permitted by this section, a mortgage
broker shall not receive a fee, commission, or compensation of any kind
in connection with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a
residential mortgage loan unless a borrower actually obtains a loan
from a lender on the terms and conditions agreed upon by the borrower
and mortgage broker. A loan originator may not accept a fee,
commission, or compensation of any kind from borrowers in connection
with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a residential
mortgage loan.
(2) A mortgage broker may:
(a) If the mortgage broker has obtained for the borrower a written
commitment from a lender for a loan on the terms and conditions agreed
upon by the borrower and the mortgage broker, and the borrower fails to
close on the loan through no fault of the mortgage broker, charge a fee
not to exceed three hundred dollars for services rendered, preparation
of documents, or transfer of documents in the borrower's file which
were prepared or paid for by the borrower if the fee is not otherwise
prohibited by the Truth-in-Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601, and
Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Sec. 226, as now or hereafter amended; or
(b) Solicit or receive fees for third party provider goods or
services in advance. Fees for any goods or services not provided must
be refunded to the borrower and the mortgage broker may not charge more
for the goods and services than the actual costs of the goods or
services charged by the third party provider.
(3) A loan originator may not solicit or receive fees for a third-party provider of goods or services except that a loan originator may
transfer funds from a borrower to a licensed mortgage broker, exempt
mortgage broker, or third-party provider, if the loan originator does
not deposit, hold, retain, or use the funds for any purpose other than
the payment of bona fide fees to third-party providers.
(4) A mortgage broker may not receive a yield spread premium
payment prior to or after the closing of a residential mortgage loan.

--- END ---