BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that substantial
pavement damage is caused by studded tire use. Wisconsin and Minnesota
are among the states that have prohibited the use of studded tires for
this reason. Therefore, to offset pavement maintenance and
preservation costs, an annual fee is established to recognize and
recover the cost of studded tire damage to the roadways.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.37.420 and 2007 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of
this state unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires
except vehicles equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet
federal standards that are installed and used in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions.
(2) No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its
periphery any block, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance
of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of
the traction surface of the tire, except that it is permissible to use
farm machinery equipped with pneumatic tires or solid rubber tracks
having protuberances that will not injure the highway, and except also
that it is permissible to use tire chains or metal studs imbedded
within the tire of reasonable proportions and of a type conforming to
rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any vehicle when required for
safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a
vehicle to skid. It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the
tire between April 1st and November 1st, or at any time without a
permit, except that a vehicle may be equipped year-round with tires
that have retractable studs if: (a) The studs retract pneumatically or
mechanically to below the wear bar of the tire when not in use; and (b)
the retractable studs are engaged only between November 1st and April
1st. Retractable studs may be made of metal or other material and are
not subject to the lightweight stud weight requirements under RCW
46.04.272. The state department of transportation may, from time to
time, determine additional periods in which the use of tires with metal
studs imbedded therein is lawful.
(3) It is a traffic infraction to use metal studs imbedded within
the tire at any time without a permit. Upon the payment of an
additional fee of one hundred dollars at the time of initial vehicle
licensing or vehicle license renewal, the department of licensing shall
issue a permit for the use of studded tires on a particular vehicle for
the following year. In addition to any applicable penalties, a person
who violates this subsection must pay the one hundred-dollar permit
fee.
(4) The state department of transportation and local authorities in
their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing
the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having
movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the
movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation
of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this
section.
(((4))) (5) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used
between November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire
department vehicles, any law or regulation to the contrary
notwithstanding.

--- END ---