BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A contract for a wireless communications
device may be canceled upon the request of a subscriber for any reason
up to thirty days after entering into the contract without the
subscriber incurring any early termination fees.
(2) Any early termination fees beyond the initial thirty-day period
must be prorated equally among the remaining term of the wireless
communications device contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---