BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 30.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All payments made in person at the issuing bank, or any of its
subsidiaries or branches, shall be considered payment to the issuer and
shall be posted on the day received and at the time of day in the bank,
subsidiary, or branch at which the payment is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 31.12 RCW
to read as follows:
All payments made in person at the issuing credit union, or any of
its branches, shall be considered payment to the issuer and shall be
posted on the day received and at the time of day in the credit union
or branch at which the payment is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 32.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All payments made in person at the issuing savings bank, or any of
its subsidiaries or branches, shall be considered payment to the issuer
and shall be posted on the day received and at the time of day in the
savings bank, subsidiary, or branch at which the payment is made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 33.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All payments made in person at the issuing savings association, or
any of its subsidiaries or branches, shall be considered payment to the
issuer and shall be posted on the day received and at the time of day
in the savings association, subsidiary, or branch at which the payment
is made.

--- END ---