BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 If upon the termination of a wireless
communications device service, the consumer-requested cancellation date
and the billing cycle end dates are not the same, the wireless
communications device service ends and is billed at the earlier of the
two dates. For the purposes of this section, "cancellation date" means
(1) the date a wireless communications device contract ends or (2) the
date a consumer requests to cancel the wireless communications device
service if there is no contract in force at the time of the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---