BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall review and compare the state early childhood education
and assistance program and the federal head start program. At a
minimum, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide
comparative data on the following:
(a) Eligibility criteria, funding levels that reflect the amount
spent per child per hours of service, delivery methods, service hour
configurations, facilities, transportation requirements, performance
standards, professional development and training, and technical
assistance; and
(b) Educational outcomes, kindergarten readiness, and processes for
ensuring continuous improvement in program quality.
(2) Beginning with the work completed by the Washington state
institute for public policy under chapter 25, Laws of 2003 1st sp.
sess., the joint legislative audit and review committee shall evaluate
the latest research and information on early childhood development and
identify any new innovations that may further improve the quality of
state-supported early learning programs, resulting in improved outcomes
for low-income children and their families.
(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall seek
training or technical assistance from the appropriate regional office
of federal head start in order to maximize nonstate resources. The
joint legislative audit and review committee also shall solicit input
from:
(a) State early childhood education and assistance program
providers on Indian reservations and across the state, including
providers who operate solely state-supported programs;
(b) Tribal governments operating head start programs and early head
start programs in the state;
(c) Providers operating migrant and seasonal head start programs in
the state; and
(d) The early learning advisory council.
(4) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall deliver
its final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.125 (Washington head start
program proposal -- Report) and 2008 c 164 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---