BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Children's product" means a product including, but not limited
to, a full-size crib, nonfull-size crib, toddler bed, bed, car seat,
high chair, booster chair, hook-on chair, bath seat, gate or other
enclosure for confining a child or infant, play yard, stationary
activity center, carrier, stroller, walker, swing, or toy or play
equipment that meets the following criteria:
(a) The product is designed or intended for the care of, or use by,
any child under the age of twelve; and
(b) The product is designed or intended to come into contact with
the child while the product is used.
(2) "Product" means an item used by a consumer including, but not
limited to, a children's product, motor vehicles, boats, food,
medicine, cosmetics, and environmental products.
(3) "Retailer" means any business selling a product that has not
been used or has not been previously owned. "Retailer" does not
include a consignment, secondhand, or similar store; however, if the
consignment, secondhand, or other similar store sells a new product
that is subject to a product recall or safety warning, section 2 of
this act applies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If a product warning or recall is issued and
available through http://www.recalls.gov or its successor web site, the
retailer shall provide notice to its customers by posting a copy of the
actual recall notice, including posting the notice or a link to the
notice on the retailer's web site.
(1) The notice must be posted within five business days of becoming
available on http://www.recalls.gov or its successor web site.
(2) The notice must remain conspicuously posted for a minimum of
thirty days.
(3) The product for which the warning or recall is issued may not
be knowingly sold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this section are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This chapter may be known and cited as the
product safety recall act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---