BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Where land is divided into multiple lots for
the purpose of providing for the future residential and commercial
development of those lots, it is vital that the property owner work
closely with the general purpose local government and any water supply
utility providing service in that area in order to assure an adequate
water supply to those lots. Determining that an adequate water supply
exists should begin early in subdivision planning and be coordinated
with applicable land use, water supply, and capital facilities planning
by the general purpose local government and appropriate water supply
utilities. It is therefore the purpose of this act that adequate
provision for water supply to the subdivision be made at the time a
city or county approves the subdivision and that the applicant for
subdivision approval demonstrate that the water supply to the
subdivision is secured.

Sec. 2 RCW 58.17.070 and 1981 c 293 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A preliminary plat of proposed subdivisions and dedications
of land shall be submitted for approval to the legislative body of the
city, town, or county within which the plat is situated. The applicant
shall submit with the preliminary plat a written verification of water
supply as provided in subsection (2) of this section. A preliminary
plat may not be processed until such verification of water supply is
submitted.
(b) Unless an applicant for preliminary plat approval requests
otherwise, a preliminary plat shall be processed simultaneously with
applications for rezones, variances, planned unit developments, site
plan approvals, and similar quasi-judicial or administrative actions to
the extent that procedural requirements applicable to these actions
permit simultaneous processing.
(2) The verification of water supply required under subsection (1)
of this section must demonstrate that sufficient water supply for the
uses of all lots anticipated with full development of the subdivision,
and that such water supply will be available presently or before
development of the lots within the subdivision. The verification may
rely upon one or more of the following to demonstrate an adequate water
supply to the subdivision:
(a) Evidence of a water right appurtenant to the subdivision land
in which the uses and quantities allowable under the right are
sufficient and appropriate for purpose of the projected uses upon
development of the subdivision;
(b) Evidence that a public water supplier has provided written
confirmation that the supplier has the authority and will serve the
subdivision under an approved and currently valid water system plan;
(c) Evidence through written contracts or other proof that valid
water rights will be changed or transferred to serve the subdivision,
and documentation that the water rights remain valid, that the water
rights are eligible for any necessary change, transfer, or amendment
for the purposes of the plat, and that the water rights are sufficient
for the water supply requirements of the plat; or
(d) In the case of any subdivision into six or fewer lots, that the
subdivision uses may be served by groundwater withdrawal within the
limited purposes and quantities exempt from obtaining a permit as
provided for in chapter 90.44 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 58.17.110 and 1995 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The city, town, or county legislative body shall inquire into
the public use and interest proposed to be served by the establishment
of the subdivision and dedication. It shall determine: (a) If
appropriate provisions are made for, but not limited to, the public
health, safety, and general welfare, for open spaces, drainage ways,
streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops, ((potable
water supplies,)) an adequate water supply to the subdivision as
provided in subsection (4) of this section, sanitary wastes, parks and
recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider
all other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning
features that assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk
to and from school; and (b) whether the public interest will be served
by the subdivision and dedication.
(2) A proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved
unless the city, town, or county legislative body makes written
findings that: (a) Appropriate provisions are made for the public
health, safety, and general welfare and for such open spaces, drainage
ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit stops,
((potable water supplies,)) an adequate water supply to the subdivision
as provided in subsection (4) of this section, sanitary wastes, parks
and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other
relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that
assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from
school; and (b) the public use and interest will be served by the
platting of such subdivision and dedication. If it finds that the
proposed subdivision and dedication make such appropriate provisions
and that the public use and interest will be served, then the
legislative body shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication.
Dedication of land to any public body, provision of public improvements
to serve the subdivision, and/or impact fees imposed under RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be required as a condition of
subdivision approval. Dedications shall be clearly shown on the final
plat. No dedication, provision of public improvements, or impact fees
imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that
constitutes an unconstitutional taking of private property. The
legislative body shall not as a condition to the approval of any
subdivision require a release from damages to be procured from other
property owners.
(3) If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park
with an area of less than two acres and the donor has designated that
the park be named in honor of a deceased individual of good character,
the city, town, or county legislative body must adopt the designated
name.
(4) Before a subdivision may be approved, the legislative body must
determine that it will be served by an adequate water supply. An
adequate water supply may be demonstrated by substantial evidence in
the record that the water supply is available or will be available
before or simultaneous with the development of the subdivision. This
demonstration may be made through one or more of the following means:
(a) Evidence of a water right appurtenant to the subdivision land
in which the uses and quantities allowable under the right are
sufficient for the projected uses upon development of the subdivision;
(b) Evidence that the subdivision lies within the area covered by
an approved water system plan of a municipal water supplier having a
duty to provide water supply within the area; or
(c) In the case of any subdivision into six or fewer lots, that the
subdivision uses will be served by groundwater withdrawal within the
limited purposes and quantities exempt from obtaining a permit as
provided for in chapter 90.44 RCW.

--- END ---