BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.08.030 and 1929 c 198 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
It ((shall be the duty of any person owning or keeping any dog or
dogs which shall be found killing any domestic animal to kill such dog
or dogs within forty-eight hours after being notified of that fact, and
any person failing or neglecting to comply with the provisions of this
section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and it)) shall be the
duty of the sheriff or any deputy sheriff to kill any dog found running
at large (after the first day of August of any year and before the
first day of March in the following year) without a metal
identification tag.

--- END ---