BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.320 and 2007 c 437 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) ((and (c))) through (d) of this
subsection, from January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(b)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before July 1, 2007, for any public works by the department of
transportation.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2007, and
before July 1, 2008, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost five million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2008,
and before July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2009, for
all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost
two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no
less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices.
(c)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before January 1, 2008, for any public works by a school district, or
to any project funded in whole or in part by bond issues approved
before July 1, 2007.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2008,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost three
million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less
than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2009,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost two million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost one million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(d)(i) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1,
2010, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher
education estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications must require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2011,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2012,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(2) Awarding ((agency directors or school districts)) entities may
adjust the requirements of this section for a specific project for the
following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation;
(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310 and this
section; or
(d) Other criteria the awarding ((agency director or school
district)) entity deems appropriate, which are subject to review by the
office of the governor.
(3) The secretary of the department of transportation shall adjust
the requirements of this section for a specific project for the
following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas; or
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation.
(4) This section applies to public works contracts awarded by the
state ((and)), to public works contracts awarded by school districts,
and to public works contracts awarded by state four-year institutions
of higher education. However, this section does not apply to contracts
awarded by ((state four-year institutions of higher education or))
state agencies headed by a separately elected public official.
(5)(a) The department of general administration must provide
information and technical assistance to affected agencies and collect
the following data from affected agencies for each project covered by
this section:
(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;
(ii) The name of each project;
(iii) The dollar value of each project;
(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;
(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them,
categorized by trade or craft;
(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by
them, categorized by trade or craft; and
(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted
under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the
department of general administration in providing information and
technical assistance.
(6) The secretary of transportation shall establish an
apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, which shall include
statewide geographic representation and consist of equal numbers of
representatives of contractors and labor. The committee must include
at least one member representing contractor businesses with less than
thirty-five employees. The advisory committee shall meet regularly
with the secretary of transportation to discuss implementation of this
section by the department of transportation, including development of
the process to be used to adjust the requirements of this section for
a specific project. The committee shall provide a report to the
legislature by January 1, 2008, on the effects of the apprentice labor
requirement on transportation projects and on the availability of
apprentice labor and programs statewide.
(7) At the request of the senate labor, commerce, research and
development committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor
committee, or their successor committees, and the governor, the
department of general administration and the department of labor and
industries shall compile and summarize the agency data and provide a
joint report to both committees. The report shall include
recommendations on modifications or improvements to the apprentice
utilization program and information on skill shortages in each trade or
craft.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.04.350 and 2007 c 133 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before award of a public works contract, a bidder must meet the
following responsibility criteria to be considered a responsible bidder
and qualified to be awarded a public works project. The bidder must:
(a) At the time of bid submittal, have a certificate of
registration in compliance with chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) Have a current state unified business identifier number;
(c) If applicable, have industrial insurance coverage for the
bidder's employees working in Washington as required in Title 51 RCW;
an employment security department number as required in Title 50 RCW;
and a state excise tax registration number as required in Title 82 RCW;
((and))
(d) Not be disqualified from bidding on any public works contract
under RCW 39.06.010 or 39.12.065(3); and
(e) If bidding on a public works project subject to the
apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320, not have been
found out of compliance by the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council for working apprentices out of ratio, without
appropriate supervision, or outside their approved work processes as
outlined in their standards of apprenticeship under chapter 49.04 RCW
for the one-year period immediately preceding the date of the bid
solicitation.
(2) In addition to the bidder responsibility criteria in subsection
(1) of this section, the state or municipality may adopt relevant
supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility applicable
to a particular project which the bidder must meet.
(a) Supplemental criteria for determining bidder responsibility,
including the basis for evaluation and the deadline for appealing a
determination that a bidder is not responsible, must be provided in the
invitation to bid or bidding documents.
(b) In a timely manner before the bid submittal deadline, a
potential bidder may request that the state or municipality modify the
supplemental criteria. The state or municipality must evaluate the
information submitted by the potential bidder and respond before the
bid submittal deadline. If the evaluation results in a change of the
criteria, the state or municipality must issue an addendum to the
bidding documents identifying the new criteria.
(c) If the bidder fails to supply information requested concerning
responsibility within the time and manner specified in the bid
documents, the state or municipality may base its determination of
responsibility upon any available information related to the
supplemental criteria or may find the bidder not responsible.
(d) If the state or municipality determines a bidder to be not
responsible, the state or municipality must provide, in writing, the
reasons for the determination. The bidder may appeal the determination
within the time period specified in the bidding documents by presenting
additional information to the state or municipality. The state or
municipality must consider the additional information before issuing
its final determination. If the final determination affirms that the
bidder is not responsible, the state or municipality may not execute a
contract with any other bidder until two business days after the bidder
determined to be not responsible has received the final determination.
(3) The capital projects advisory review board created in RCW
((39.10.800)) 39.10.220 shall develop suggested guidelines to assist
the state and municipalities in developing supplemental bidder
responsibility criteria. The guidelines must be posted on the board's
web site.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.12.055 and 2008 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A contractor shall not be allowed to bid on any public works
contract for one year from the date of a final determination that the
contractor has committed any combination of two of the following
violations or infractions within a five-year period:
(1) Violated RCW 51.48.020(1) or 51.48.103; ((or))
(2) Committed an infraction or violation under chapter 18.27 RCW
for performing work as an unregistered contractor; or
(3) Determined to be out of compliance by the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council for working apprentices out of
ratio, without appropriate supervision, or outside their approved work
processes as outlined in their standards of apprenticeship under
chapter 49.04 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The Washington state apprenticeship and
training council shall adopt rules necessary to implement sections 2
and 3 of this act. Rules shall address due process protections for all
parties and shall strengthen the accountability for apprenticeship
committees approved under chapter 49.04 RCW in enforcing the
apprenticeship program standards adopted by the council.

--- END ---