BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.100.160 and 1995 c 396 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors of the public facilities district shall have
authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes
of preparing and distributing information to the general public and
promoting, advertising, improving, developing, operating, and
maintaining facilities of the district. Nothing contained in this
section may be construed to authorize preparation and distribution of
information to the general public for the purpose of influencing the
outcome of a district election. For promotional activities, the
district board shall identify the proposed expenditure in its annual
budget and adopt written rules governing promotional hosting by
employees, agents, and the board.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.57.060 and 1999 c 165 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of directors of the public facilities district shall have
authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes
of preparing and distributing information to the general public and
promoting, advertising, improving, developing, operating, and
maintaining a regional center. Nothing contained in this section may
be construed to authorize preparation and distribution of information
to the general public for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a
district election. For promotional activities, the district board
shall identify the proposed expenditure in its annual budget and adopt
written rules governing promotional hosting by employees, agents, and
the board.

--- END ---