BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.365.020 and 2008 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt criteria for an approved motion
picture competitiveness program with the sole purpose of revitalizing
the state's economic, cultural, and educational standing in the
national and international market of motion picture production. Rules
adopted by the department shall allow the program, within the
established criteria, to provide funding assistance only when it
captures economic opportunities for Washington's communities and
businesses and shall only be provided under a contractual arrangement
with a private entity. In establishing the criteria, the department
shall consider:
(a) The additional income and tax revenue to be retained in the
state for general purposes;
(b) The creation and retention of family wage jobs which provide
health insurance and payments into a retirement plan;
(c) The impact of motion picture projects to maximize in-state
labor and the use of in-state film production and film postproduction
companies;
(d) The impact upon the local economies and the state economy as a
whole, including multiplier effects;
(e) The intangible impact on the state and local communities that
comes with motion picture projects;
(f) The regional, national, and international competitiveness of
the motion picture filming industry;
(g) The revitalization of the state as a premier venue for motion
picture production and national television commercial campaigns;
(h) Partnerships with the private sector to bolster film production
in the state and serve as an educational and cultural purpose for its
citizens;
(i) The vitality of the state's motion picture industry as a
necessary and critical factor in promoting the state as a premier
tourist and cultural destination;
(j) Giving preference to additional seasons of television series
that have previously qualified;
(k) Other factors the department may deem appropriate for the
implementation of this chapter.
(2) The board of directors created under RCW 43.365.030 shall
create and administer an account for carrying out the purposes of
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Money received by an approved motion picture competitiveness
program shall be used only for: (a) Health insurance and payments into
a retirement plan, and other costs associated with film production; (b)
a tax credit marketer to market the tax credits authorized under RCW
82.04.4489; and (c) staff and related expenses to maintain the
program's proper administration and operation.
(4) Maximum funding assistance from an approved motion picture
competitiveness program is limited to an amount up to ((twenty)) thirty
percent of the total actual investment in the state of at least:
(a) Five hundred thousand dollars for a single feature film
produced in Washington state;
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars per television episode produced
in Washington state; or
(c) One hundred fifty thousand dollars for an infomercial or
television commercial associated with a national or regional
advertisement campaign produced in Washington state.
(5) Funding assistance approval must be determined by the approved
motion picture competitiveness program within a maximum of thirty
calendar days from when the application is received, if the application
is submitted after August 15, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---