BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.162.020 and 2007 c 232 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission shall:
(((1))) (a) Concentrate its major efforts on planning,
coordination, evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending
improvements to the state's economic development system using, but not
limited to, the "Next Washington" plan and the global competitiveness
council recommendations;
(((2))) (b) Develop and maintain on a biennial basis a state
comprehensive plan for economic development, including but not limited
to goals, objectives, and priorities for the state economic development
system; identify the elements local associate development organizations
must include in their countywide economic development plans; and review
the state system for consistency with the state comprehensive plan. In
developing the state comprehensive plan for economic development, the
commission shall use, but may not be limited to: Economic, labor
market, and populations trend reports in office of financial management
forecasts; the annual state economic climate report prepared by the
economic climate council; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome
evaluations; the needs of industry associations, industry clusters,
businesses, and employees as evidenced in formal surveys and other
input;
(((3))) (c) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of
the state economic development system and related state programs;
perform a biennial assessment of the ongoing and strategic economic
development needs of the state; and assess the extent to which the
economic development system and related programs represent a
consistent, coordinated, efficient, and integrated approach to meet
such needs; ((and
(4))) (d) Produce a biennial report to the governor and the
legislature on progress by the commission in coordinating the state's
economic development system and meeting the other obligations of this
chapter, as well as include recommendations for any statutory changes
necessary to enhance operational efficiencies or improve coordination;
and
(e) In conjunction with the workforce training and education
coordinating board:
(i) Establish and maintain an inventory of the entrepreneurial and
innovation education, training, and technical assistance services and
programs available in the state;
(ii) Evaluate the extent to which existing entrepreneurial and
innovation training and technical assistance programs in the state are
effective and represent a consistent, integrated approach to meeting
the needs of start-up and existing entrepreneurs;
(iii) Identify policies to reduce administrative and other barriers
to efficient delivery and coordination of entrepreneurial assistance;
(iv) Distribute awards for excellence in entrepreneurial training
and assistance;
(v) Distribute awards for excellence in innovation training; and
(vi) Report to the governor, the workforce training and education
coordinating board, and the appropriate legislative committees its
recommendations for statutory changes necessary to enhance operational
efficiencies or enhance coordination related to entrepreneurial and
innovation education, training, and assistance.
(2) The commission may delegate to the executive director any of
the functions of this section.

--- END ---