BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.150 and 2006 c 263 s 705 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall collect and
disseminate to school districts information on child abuse and neglect
prevention curriculum and shall adopt rules dealing with the prevention
of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.
The superintendent of public instruction and the departments of social
and health services and community, trade, and economic development
shall share relevant information. Providing online access to the
information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent
or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in written
form.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.160 and 1995 c 399 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be
the lead agency and shall assist the department of social and health
services, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
and school districts in establishing a coordinated primary prevention
program for child abuse and neglect.
(2) In developing the program, consideration shall be given to the
following:
(a) Parent, teacher, and children's workshops whose information and
training is:
(i) Provided in a clear, age-appropriate, nonthreatening manner,
delineating the problem and the range of possible solutions;
(ii) Culturally and linguistically appropriate to the population
served;
(iii) Appropriate to the geographic area served; and
(iv) Designed to help counteract common stereotypes about child
abuse victims and offenders;
(b) Training for school age children's parents and school staff,
which includes:
(i) Physical and behavioral indicators of abuse;
(ii) Crisis counseling techniques;
(iii) Community resources;
(iv) Rights and responsibilities regarding reporting;
(v) School district procedures to facilitate reporting and apprise
supervisors and administrators of reports; and
(vi) Caring for a child's needs after a report is made;
(c) Training for licensed day care providers and parents that
includes:
(i) Positive child guidance techniques;
(ii) Physical and behavioral indicators of abuse;
(iii) Recognizing and providing safe, quality day care;
(iv) Community resources;
(v) Rights and responsibilities regarding reporting; and
(vi) Caring for the abused or neglected child;
(d) Training for children that includes:
(i) The right of every child to live free of abuse;
(ii) How to disclose incidents of abuse and neglect;
(iii) The availability of support resources and how to obtain help;
(iv) Child safety training and age-appropriate self-defense
techniques; and
(v) A period for crisis counseling and reporting immediately
following the completion of each children's workshop in a school
setting which maximizes the child's privacy and sense of safety.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
not require annual training under subsection (2) of this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction may consider
offering training every four years, except for new employees who shall
receive training within the first year of their hire date. School
districts are encouraged to work with private or nonprofit entities
that have the ability to provide the appropriate training for staff in
accordance with this section.
(4) The primary prevention program established under this section
shall be a voluntary program and shall not be part of the basic program
of education.
(((4))) (5) Parents shall be given notice of the primary prevention
program and may refuse to have their children participate in the
program.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.300.270 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 602 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall, to the extent
funding is available, contract with school districts, educational
service districts, and approved in-service providers to conduct
training sessions for school certificated and classified employees in
conflict resolution and other violence prevention topics. The training
shall be developmentally and culturally appropriate for the school
populations being served and be research based. The training shall not
be based solely on providing materials, but also shall include
techniques on imparting these skills to students. The training
sessions shall be developed in coordination with school districts, the
superintendent of public instruction, parents, law enforcement
agencies, human services providers, and other interested parties. The
training shall be offered to school districts and school staff
requesting the training, and shall be made available at locations
throughout the state.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
not require annual training sessions. The training may be offered
every four years.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.300.450 and 2004 c 247 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A financial literacy public-private partnership is established,
composed of up to four members representing the legislature, one from
and appointed by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, one from and appointed by the department of financial
institutions, up to four from the financial services sector, and four
educators. One or two members of the senate, one of whom is a member
of the senate committee on financial services, insurance and housing,
shall be appointed by the president of the senate. One or two members
of the house of representatives, one of whom is a member of the house
committee on financial institutions and insurance, shall be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives. The superintendent of
public instruction shall appoint the members from the financial
services sector and educator members. The chair of the partnership
shall be selected by the members of the partnership.
(2) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this
purpose, technical and logistical support may be provided by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, the organizations
composing the partnership, and other participants in the financial
literacy public-private partnership. The superintendent of public
instruction shall compile the initial list of members and convene the
first meeting of the partnership.
(3) The members of the committee shall be appointed by July 1,
2004.
(4) Legislative members of the partnership shall receive per diem
and travel under RCW 44.04.120.
(5) Travel and other expenses of members of the partnership shall
be provided by the agency, association, or organization that member
represents.
(6) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.300.490 and 2007 c 406 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A task force on gangs in schools is created to examine current
adult and youth gang activities that are affecting school safety. The
task force shall work under the guidance of the superintendent of
public instruction school safety center, the school safety center
advisory committee, and the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs.
(2) The task force shall be comprised of representatives, selected
by the superintendent of public instruction, who possess expertise
relevant to gang activity in schools. The task force shall outline
methods for preventing new gangs, eliminating existing gangs, gathering
intelligence, and sharing information about gang activities.
(3) Beginning December 1, 2007, the task force shall annually
report its findings and recommendations to the education committees of
the legislature.
(4) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.300.520 and 2007 c 384 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall review current
policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted
at children who have a parent who is incarcerated in a department of
corrections facility. The superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt policies that support the children of incarcerated parents and
meet their needs with the goal of facilitating normal child
development, including maintaining adequate academic progress, while
reducing intergenerational incarceration.
(2) The superintendent shall conduct the following activities to
assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section:
(a) Gather information and data on the students who are the
children of inmates incarcerated in department of corrections
facilities; and
(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory
committee and report information obtained under this section to the
advisory committee.
(3) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.320.080 and 1995 c 77 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by
law, shall:
(1) Provide for the expenditure of a reasonable amount for suitable
commencement exercises;
(2) ((In addition to providing)) To the extent funds are available,
provide free instruction in lip reading for children disabled by
defective hearing((,)) and make arrangements for free instruction in
lip reading to adults disabled by defective hearing whenever in its
judgment such instruction appears to be in the best interests of the
school district and adults concerned;
(3) Join with boards of directors of other school districts or an
educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), or both
such school districts and educational service district in buying
supplies, equipment and services by establishing and maintaining a
joint purchasing agency, or otherwise, when deemed for the best
interests of the district, any joint agency formed hereunder being
herewith authorized and empowered to issue interest bearing warrants in
payment of any obligation owed: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That those agencies
issuing interest bearing warrants shall assign accounts receivable in
an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding interest bearing
warrants to the county treasurer issuing such interest bearing
warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the joint purchasing agency shall
consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the
agency to jointly buy supplies, equipment, and services including but
not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after considering
such request, may cooperate with and jointly make purchases with
private schools of supplies, equipment, and services, including but not
limited to school bus maintenance services, so long as such private
schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or
provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs
involved in such purchases;
(4) Consider the request of any one or more private schools
requesting the board to jointly buy supplies, equipment and services
including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and,
after considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing
services: PROVIDED, That such private schools pay in advance their
proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover
their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; and
(5) Prepare budgets as provided for in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.345.020 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.020 are each
amended to read as follows:
The membership of the school directors' association ((shall)) may
comprise the members of the boards of directors of the school districts
of the state.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.345.050 and 1983 c 187 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The school directors' association may establish a graduated
schedule of dues for members of the association based upon the number
of certificated personnel in each district. Dues shall be established
for the directors of each district as a group. The total of all dues
assessed shall not exceed twenty-seven cents for each one thousand
dollars of the statewide total of all school districts' general fund
receipts. The board of directors of a school district shall make
provision for payment out of the general fund of the district of the
dues of association members resident in the district, which payment
shall be made in the manner provided by law for the payment of other
claims against the general fund of the district. The dues for each
member school district shall be due and payable on the first day of
January of each year.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.625.020 and 1991 c 255 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish an
annual award program for excellence in education to recognize teachers,
principals, administrators, classified staff, school district
superintendents, and school boards for their leadership, contributions,
and commitment to education. The program shall recognize annually:
(((1))) (a) Five teachers from each congressional district of the
state. One individual must be an elementary level teacher, one must be
a junior high or middle school level teacher, and one must be a
secondary level teacher. Teachers shall include educational staff
associates;
(((2))) (b) Five principals or administrators from the state;
(((3))) (c) One school district superintendent from the state;
(((4))) (d) One school district board of directors from the state;
and
(((5))) (e) Three classified staff from each congressional district
of the state.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.625.042 and 1994 c 279 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All recipients of the Washington award for excellence in
education shall receive a certificate presented by the governor and the
superintendent of public instruction, or their designated
representatives, at a public ceremony or ceremonies in appropriate
locations.
(2) In addition to the certificate under subsection (1) of this
section, the award for teachers, classified employees, superintendents
employed by second-class school districts, and principals or
administrators shall include a recognition award of at least two
thousand five hundred dollars. The amount of the recognition award for
superintendents employed by first-class school districts shall be at
least one thousand dollars. The recognition award shall not be
considered compensation for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.200.
(3) In addition to the certificate under subsection (1) of this
section, the award for the school board shall include a recognition
award not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars. The school
board must use its recognition award for an educational purpose.
(4) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.625.050 and 1995 c 335 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the purposes of RCW 28A.625.010
through 28A.625.065. These rules shall include establishing the
selection criteria for the Washington award for excellence in education
program. The superintendent is encouraged to consult with teachers,
educational staff associates, principals, administrators, classified
employees, superintendents, and school board members in developing the
selection criteria. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
28A.625.020(1) (a) and (((2))) (b), such rules may allow for the
selection of individuals whose teaching or administrative duties, or
both, may encompass multiple grade level or building assignments, or
both.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.625.360 and 2006 c 263 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall establish an
annual award program for excellence in teacher preparation to recognize
higher education teacher educators for their leadership, contributions,
and commitment to education.
(2) The program shall recognize annually one teacher preparation
faculty member from one of the teacher preparation programs approved by
the professional educator standards board.
(3) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.625.370 and 2006 c 263 s 820 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The award for the teacher educator shall include:
(((1))) (a) A certificate presented to the teacher educator by the
governor, the chair of the professional educator standards board, and
the superintendent of public instruction at a public ceremony; and
(((2))) (b) A grant to the professional education advisory board of
the institution from which the teacher educator is selected, which
grant shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars and which
grant shall be awarded under RCW 28A.625.390.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.625.380 and 2006 c 263 s 821 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the purposes of RCW 28A.625.360
through 28A.625.390. These rules shall include establishing the
selection criteria for the Washington award for excellence in teacher
preparation. The board is encouraged to consult with teacher
educators, deans, and professional education advisory board members in
developing the selection criteria. The criteria shall include any role
performed by nominees relative to implementing innovative developments
by the nominee's teacher preparation program and efforts the nominee
has made to assist in communicating with legislators, common school
teachers and administrators, and others about the nominee's teacher
preparation program.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 16 RCW 28A.625.390 and 2006 c 263 s 822 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional education advisory board for the institution
from which the teacher educator has been selected to receive an award
shall be eligible to apply for an educational grant as provided under
RCW 28A.625.370. The professional educator standards board shall award
the grant after the board has approved the grant application as long as
the written grant application is submitted to the board within one year
after the award is received by the teacher educator. The grant
application shall identify the educational purpose toward which the
grant shall be used.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 17 RCW 28A.640.020 and 1994 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
((regulations)) rules and guidelines to eliminate sex discrimination as
it applies to public school employment, counseling and guidance
services to students, recreational and athletic activities for
students, access to course offerings, and in textbooks and
instructional materials used by students.
(a) Specifically with respect to public school employment, all
schools shall be required to:
(i) Maintain credential requirements for all personnel without
regard to sex;
(ii) Make no differentiation in pay scale on the basis of sex;
(iii) Assign school duties without regard to sex except where such
assignment would involve duty in areas or situations, such as but not
limited to a shower room, where persons might be disrobed;
(iv) Provide the same opportunities for advancement to males and
females; and
(v) Make no difference in conditions of employment including, but
not limited to, hiring practices, leaves of absence, hours of
employment, and assignment of, or pay for, instructional and
noninstructional duties, on the basis of sex.
(b) Specifically with respect to counseling and guidance services
for students, they shall be made available to all students equally.
All certificated personnel shall be required to stress access to all
career and vocational opportunities to students without regard to sex.
(c) Specifically with respect to recreational and athletic
activities, they shall be offered to all students without regard to
sex. Schools may provide separate teams for each sex. Schools which
provide the following shall do so with no disparities based on sex:
Equipment and supplies; medical care; services and insurance;
transportation and per diem allowances; opportunities to receive
coaching and instruction; laundry services; assignment of game
officials; opportunities for competition, publicity and awards;
scheduling of games and practice times including use of courts, gyms,
and pools: PROVIDED, That such scheduling of games and practice times
shall be determined by local administrative authorities after
consideration of the public and student interest in attending and
participating in various recreational and athletic activities. Each
school which provides showers, toilets, or training room facilities for
athletic purposes shall provide comparable facilities for both sexes.
Such facilities may be provided either as separate facilities or shall
be scheduled and used separately by each sex.
The superintendent of public instruction shall also be required to
develop a student survey to distribute every three years to each local
school district in the state to determine student interest for
male/female participation in specific sports.
(d) Specifically with respect to course offerings, all classes
shall be required to be available to all students without regard to
sex: PROVIDED, That separation is permitted within any class during
sessions on sex education or gym classes.
(e) Specifically with respect to textbooks and instructional
materials, which shall also include, but not be limited to, reference
books and audio-visual materials, they shall be required to adhere to
the guidelines developed by the superintendent of public instruction to
implement the intent of this chapter: PROVIDED, That this subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit the introduction of material deemed
appropriate by the instructor for educational purposes.
(2)(a) By December 31, 1994, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop criteria for use by school districts in
developing sexual harassment policies as required under (b) of this
subsection. The criteria shall address the subjects of grievance
procedures, remedies to victims of sexual harassment, disciplinary
actions against violators of the policy, and other subjects at the
discretion of the superintendent of public instruction. Disciplinary
actions must conform with collective bargaining agreements and state
and federal laws. The superintendent of public instruction also shall
supply sample policies to school districts upon request.
(b) By June 30, 1995, every school district shall adopt and
implement a written policy concerning sexual harassment. The policy
shall apply to all school district employees, volunteers, parents, and
students, including, but not limited to, conduct between students.
(c) School district policies on sexual harassment shall be reviewed
by the superintendent of public instruction considering the criteria
established under (a) of this subsection as part of the monitoring
process established in RCW 28A.640.030.
(d) The school district's sexual harassment policy shall be
conspicuously posted throughout each school building, and provided to
each employee. Employees may be provided the policy online. A copy of
the policy shall appear in any publication of the school or school
district setting forth the rules, ((regulations,)) procedures, and
standards of conduct for the school or school district.
(e) Each school shall develop a process for discussing the
district's sexual harassment policy. The process shall ensure the
discussion addresses the definition of sexual harassment and issues
covered in the sexual harassment policy.
(f) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
not require annual training to address the policies of this section.
Beginning in 2011, training may be offered every four years, except for
new employees who shall receive training within the first year of their
hire date.
(g) "Sexual harassment" as used in this section means unwelcome
sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, sexually motivated
physical contact, or other verbal or physical conduct or communication
of a sexual nature if:
(i) Submission to that conduct or communication is made a term or
condition, either explicitly or implicitly, of obtaining an education
or employment;
(ii) Submission to or rejection of that conduct or communication by
an individual is used as a factor in decisions affecting that
individual's education or employment; or
(iii) That conduct or communication has the purpose or effect of
substantially interfering with an individual's educational or work
performance, or of creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive
educational or work environment.

Sec. 18 RCW 28A.150.520 and 2005 c 12 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
To the extent funds are available, public school districts must
comply with high-performance public ((building[s])) buildings
requirements under RCW 39.35D.010, 39.35D.020, 39.35D.040, 39.35D.060,
and 28A.150.530.

Sec. 19 RCW 28A.210.370 and 2005 c 462 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of
the department of health shall develop a uniform policy for all school
districts providing for the in-service training for school staff on
symptoms, treatment, and monitoring of students with asthma and on the
additional observations that may be needed in different situations that
may arise during the school day and during school-sponsored events. To
the extent possible, the in-service training shall be offered online
and no more than once every three years. The policy shall include the
standards and skills that must be in place for in-service training of
school staff.
(2) All school districts shall adopt policies regarding asthma
rescue procedures for each school within the district.
(3) All school districts must require that each public elementary
school and secondary school grant to any student in the school
authorization for the self-administration of medication to treat that
student's asthma or anaphylaxis, if:
(a) A health care practitioner prescribed the medication for use by
the student during school hours and instructed the student in the
correct and responsible use of the medication;
(b) The student has demonstrated to the health care practitioner,
or the practitioner's designee, and a professional registered nurse at
the school, the skill level necessary to use the medication and any
device that is necessary to administer the medication as prescribed;
(c) The health care practitioner formulates a written treatment
plan for managing asthma or anaphylaxis episodes of the student and for
medication use by the student during school hours; and
(d) The student's parent or guardian has completed and submitted to
the school any written documentation required by the school, including
the treatment plan formulated under (c) of this subsection and other
documents related to liability.
(4) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section
must allow the student involved to possess and use his or her
medication:
(a) While in school;
(b) While at a school-sponsored activity, such as a sporting event;
and
(c) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.
(5) An authorization granted under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Must be effective only for the same school and school year for
which it is granted; and
(b) Must be renewed by the parent or guardian each subsequent
school year in accordance with this subsection.
(6) School districts must require that backup medication, if
provided by a student's parent or guardian, be kept at a student's
school in a location to which the student has immediate access in the
event of an asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(7) School districts must require that information described in
subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this section be kept on file at the
student's school in a location easily accessible in the event of an
asthma or anaphylaxis emergency.
(8) Nothing in this section creates a cause of action or in any
other way increases or diminishes the liability of any person under any
other law.

Sec. 20 RCW 28A.210.380 and 2008 c 173 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with the department of health, shall develop anaphylactic
policy guidelines for schools to prevent anaphylaxis and deal with
medical emergencies resulting from it. The policy guidelines shall be
developed with input from pediatricians, school nurses, other health
care providers, parents of children with life-threatening allergies,
school administrators, teachers, and food service directors.
The policy guidelines shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A procedure for each school to follow to develop a treatment
plan including the responsibilities ((for [of])) of school nurses and
other appropriate school personnel responsible for responding to a
student who may be experiencing anaphylaxis;
(b) The content of a training course for appropriate school
personnel for preventing and responding to a student who may be
experiencing anaphylaxis. To the extent possible, the training course
shall be offered online and no more than once every three years;
(c) A procedure for the development of an individualized emergency
health care plan for children with food or other allergies that could
result in anaphylaxis;
(d) A communication plan for the school to follow to gather and
disseminate information on students with food or other allergies who
may experience anaphylaxis;
(e) Strategies for reduction of the risk of exposure to
anaphylactic causative agents including food and other allergens.
(2) For the purpose of this section "anaphylaxis" means a severe
allergic and life-threatening reaction that is a collection of
symptoms, which may include breathing difficulties and a drop in blood
pressure or shock.
(3)(a) By October 15, 2008, the superintendent of public
instruction shall report to the select interim legislative task force
on comprehensive school health reform created in section 6, chapter 5,
Laws of 2007, on the following:
(i) The implementation within school districts of the 2008
guidelines for care of students with life-threatening food allergies
developed by the superintendent pursuant to section 501, chapter 522,
Laws of 2007, including a review of policies developed by the school
districts, the training provided to school personnel, and plans for
follow-up monitoring of policy implementation; and
(ii) Recommendations on requirements for effectively implementing
the school anaphylactic policy guidelines developed under this section.
(b) By March 31, 2009, the superintendent of public instruction
shall report policy guidelines to the appropriate committees of the
legislature and to school districts for the districts to use to develop
and adopt their policies.
(4) By September 1, 2009, each school district shall use the
guidelines developed under subsection (1) of this section to develop
and adopt a school district policy for each school in the district to
follow to assist schools to prevent anaphylaxis.

Sec. 21 RCW 39.35D.040 and 2006 c 263 s 331 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public school districts
receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed and
constructed to at least the LEED silver standard or the Washington
sustainable school design protocol. To the extent appropriate LEED
silver or Washington sustainable school design protocol standards exist
for the type of building or facility, this subsection applies to major
facility projects that have not received project approval from the
superintendent of public instruction prior to: (a) July 1, 2006, for
volunteering school districts; (b) July 1, 2007, for class one school
districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for class two school districts.
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
superintendent of public instruction shall also report on the
implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard
or Washington sustainable school design protocol was not used as
required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The superintendent of public
instruction shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing
implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives
and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public school
districts. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying compliance with the LEED silver
standard or the Washington sustainable school design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the
superintendent of public instruction, the department, and others at the
superintendent of public instruction's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the
superintendent of public instruction implement this chapter.
(6) School districts are required to comply with this section only
to the extent federal or state funds are available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.210.360 (Model policy on access to nutritious foods and
developmentally appropriate exercise -- School district policies) and
2004 c 138 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.210.365 (Food choice, physical activity, childhood
fitness -- Minimum standards -- District waiver or exemption policy) and
2007 c 5 s 5; and
(3) RCW 28A.170.050 (Advisory committee -- Members -- Duties) and 1997
c 13 s 3 & 1987 c 518 s 209.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 Sections 4 through 6, 10 through 16, 18,
and 21 of this act expire July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---