BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.020 and 1999 c 319 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school
in which the child is enrolled shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to
attend school after one unexcused absence within any month during the
current school year. School officials shall inform the parent of the
potential consequences of additional unexcused absences. If the
custodial parent, parents, or guardian is not fluent in English, the
preferred practice is to provide this information in a language in
which the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is fluent;
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent,
parents, or guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all
persons included for the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's
absences after two unexcused absences within any month during the
current school year. If a regularly scheduled parent-teacher
conference day is to take place within thirty days of the second
unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps shall include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school
program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized
or remedial instruction, providing appropriate vocational courses or
work experience, referring the child to a community truancy board, if
available, requiring the child to attend an alternative school or
program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary
services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the
absence from school. If the child's parent does not attend the
scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the student
and school official. However, the parent shall be notified of the
steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that
a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another during
the school year, the receiving school or school district shall include
the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the
previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW 28A.225.030,
and 28A.225.015.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.025 and 1999 c 319 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means
a board composed of members of the local community in which the child
attends school. Juvenile courts may establish and operate community
truancy boards. If the juvenile court and the school district agree,
a school district may establish and operate a community truancy board
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Juvenile courts may
create a community truancy board or may use other entities that exist
or are created, such as diversion units. However, a diversion unit or
other existing entity must agree before it is used as a truancy board.
Duties of a community truancy board shall include, but not be limited
to, recommending methods for improving school attendance such as
assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary services that
might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or suggesting
to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an
alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a
dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational
program.
(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community truancy
boards, or other diversion units that fulfill a similar function, is
the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods of notice
and parent conferences and taking appropriate steps to eliminate or
reduce unexcused absences have not been effective in securing the
child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and
support the development and expansion of community truancy boards and
other diversion programs which are effective in promoting school
attendance and preventing the need for more intrusive intervention by
the court. Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a
district from the obligation of filing a petition within the
requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.035 and 2001 c 162 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or
28A.225.015 shall consist of a written notification to the court
alleging that:
(a) The child has unexcused absences during the current school
year;
(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful
in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and
(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the
school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.
(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school,
address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and
addresses of the child's parents, and shall set forth whether the child
and parent are fluent in English and whether there is an existing
individualized education program.
(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations
in this section and shall generally request relief available under this
chapter and provide information about what the court might order under
RCW 28A.225.090.
(4) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015,
the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall
consider the petition, or if the court determines that a referral to an
available community truancy board would substantially reduce the
child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the case to a community
truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(5) If a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy
board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district
representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and
respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address
the child's truancy within ((thirty)) twenty days of the referral. If
the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be
required to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be
between the truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent.
((The agreement shall be presented to the juvenile court for its
approval.
(6) The court shall approve the agreement by order or schedule a
hearing.)) The court may((, if the school district and community
truancy board agree,)) permit the truancy board or truancy prevention
counselor to provide continued supervision over the student, or parent
if the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015((, and report on compliance
with the order)).
(((7))) (6) If the truancy board fails to reach an agreement, or
the parent or student does not comply with the agreement, the truancy
board shall return the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.
(((8))) (7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of
this section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the
court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When
a juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:
(((a))) (i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child,
and the school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in
English, the preferred practice is for notice to be provided in a
language in which the parent is fluent;
(((b))) (ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to
present evidence at the hearing; and
(((c))) (iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and
rights available under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(((9))) (b) If the child is not provided with counsel, the
advisement of rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy
between the court, the child if eight years old or older, and the
parent.
(8) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight
years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing
on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.
(((10))) (9) A school district is responsible for determining who
shall represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed
under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.
(((11))) (10) The court may permit the first hearing to be held
without requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel,
and to be held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW
4.08.050. At the request of the school district, the court shall
permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to
represent the school district at any future hearings.
(11) If the child is in a special education program or has a
diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to
what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in
attending school.
(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and
enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of
time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in
the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile
is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the
end of the school year in which it is entered.
(13) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall
regularly report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the
child.
(14) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to
the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who
are subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW
13.32A.191 or child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.
(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county
the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the
receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or
parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous
county.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.090 and 2008 c 171 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW
28A.225.035 to do one or more of the following:
(a) Attend the child's current school, and set forth minimum
attendance requirements, including suspensions;
(b) If there is space available and the program can provide
educational services appropriate for the child, order the child to
attend another public school, an alternative education program, center,
a skill center, dropout prevention program, or another public
educational program;
(c) Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an
education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved or
certified private nonsectarian school or program, the court shall: (i)
Consider the public and private programs available; (ii) find that
placement is in the best interest of the child; and (iii) find that the
private school or program is willing to accept the child and will not
charge any fees in addition to those established by contract with the
student's school district. If the court orders the child to enroll in
a private school or program, the child's school district shall contract
with the school or program to provide educational services for the
child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a
weekly rate that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars
calculated on a weekly basis generated by the child and received by the
district. A school district shall not be required to enter into a
contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A
school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a
contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;
(d) Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or
(e) Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or
alcohol based on a determination that such testing is appropriate to
the circumstances and behavior of the child and will facilitate the
child's compliance with the mandatory attendance law and, if any test
ordered under this subsection indicates the use of controlled
substances or alcohol, order the minor to abstain from the unlawful
consumption of controlled substances or alcohol and adhere to the
recommendations of the drug assessment at no expense to the school.
(2) If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court
may order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW
7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an order
issued under this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a
period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW. Detention ordered
under this subsection may be for no longer than seven days. A warrant
of arrest for a child under this subsection may not be served on a
child inside of school during school hours in a location where other
students are present.
(3) Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW
28A.225.010, 28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than
twenty-five dollars for each day of unexcused absence from school. The
court shall remit fifty percent of the fine collected under this
section to the child's school district. It shall be a defense for a
parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she
exercised reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or
her custody to attend school or that the child's school did not perform
its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the
parent to provide community restitution instead of imposing a fine.
Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the
child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend
a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of
analyzing the causes of a child's absence.
(4) If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the
juvenile court shall find the child in contempt, and the court may
order the child to be subject to detention, as provided in RCW
7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to detention such as
meaningful community restitution. Failure by a child to comply with an
order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention
for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(5) Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply
to a six or seven year-old child required to attend public school under
RCW 28A.225.015.

--- END ---