BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.86A.060 and 2008 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state treasurer shall establish a linked deposit program
for investment of deposits in qualified public depositaries. As a
condition of participating in the program, qualified public
depositaries must make qualifying loans as provided in this section.
The state treasurer may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal
to the amount of the qualifying loan made by the qualified public
depositary or may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal to
the aggregate amount of two or more qualifying loans made by one or
more qualified public depositaries.
(2) Qualifying loans made under this section are those:
(a) Having terms that do not exceed ten years;
(b) Where an individual loan does not exceed one million dollars;
(c)(i) That are made to a minority or women's business enterprise
that has received state certification under chapter 39.19 RCW; ((or))
(ii) That are made to a veteran-owned business that has received
state certification under RCW 43.60A.190; or
(iii) That are made to a community development financial
institution that is: (A) Certified by the United States department of
the treasury pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 4701 et seq.; and (B) using
that loan to make qualifying loans under (c)(i) of this subsection;
(d) Where the interest rate on the loan to the minority or women's
business enterprise or veteran-owned business does not exceed an
interest rate that is two hundred basis points below the interest rate
the qualified public depositary would charge for a loan for a similar
purpose and a similar term, except that, if the preference given by the
state treasurer to the qualified public depositary under subsection (3)
of this section is less than two hundred basis points, the qualified
public depositary may reduce the preference given on the loan by an
amount that corresponds to the reduction in preference below two
hundred basis points given to the qualified public depositary; and
(e) Where the points or fees charged at loan closing do not exceed
one percent of the loan amount.
(3) In setting interest rates of time certificate of deposits, the
state treasurer shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point
preference will be given to the qualified public depositary, except
that the treasurer shall lower the amount of the preference to ensure
that the effective interest rate on the time certificate of deposit is
not less than two percent.
(4) Upon notification by the state treasurer that a minority or
women's business enterprise is no longer certified under chapter 39.19
RCW or that a veteran-owned business is no longer certified under RCW
43.60A.190, the qualified public depositary shall reduce the amount of
qualifying loans by the outstanding balance of the loan made under this
section to the minority or women's business enterprise or the veteran-owned business, as applicable.
(5) The office of minority and women's business enterprises has the
authority to adopt rules to:
(a) Ensure that when making a qualified loan under the linked
deposit program, businesses that have never received a loan under the
linked deposit program are given first priority;
(b) Limit the total principal loan amount that any one business
receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit program over the
lifetime of the businesses;
(c) Limit the total principal loan amount that an owner of one or
more businesses receives in qualified loans under the linked deposit
program during the owner's lifetime; ((and))
(d) Limit the total amount of any one qualified loan made under the
linked deposit program; and
(e) Ensure that loans made by community development financial
institutions are qualifying loans under subsection (2)(c)(i) of this
section.

--- END ---