BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.053 and 2007 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner
and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such
taxes shall be held ((in the year in which the)) not more than eighteen
months prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to be made or,
in the case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year
levies for maintenance and operation support of a school district,
authorizing two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds
established in RCW 28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling
of school facilities, which includes the purposes of RCW
28A.320.330(2)(f), ((in the year in which the)) not more than eighteen
months prior to the date on which the proposed first annual levy is to
be made.
(2) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance
and operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no
further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of
the district for that period may be authorized. For the purpose of
applying the limitation of this subsection, a two-year through six-year
levy to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
school facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for maintenance
and operation support of a school district.
(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by
the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication
in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections,
at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010, if
the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution changing school levy timing provisions (S-0378/09) is
validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the
next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---