BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.050 and 2003 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public groundwaters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided((: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That)).
(2) After June 6, 1945, and until the effective date of this
section, any withdrawal of public groundwaters for stock-watering
purposes, or for the watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden
not exceeding one-half acre in area, or for single or group domestic
uses in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, or as
provided in RCW 90.44.052, or for an industrial purpose in an amount
not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be exempt from
the provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it is regularly
used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to that
established by a permit issued under the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the department from time to time may require
the person or agency making any such small withdrawal to furnish
information as to the means for and the quantity of that withdrawal:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of the party making withdrawals
of groundwaters of the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per
day, applications under this section or declarations under RCW
90.44.090 may be filed and permits and certificates obtained in the
same manner and under the same requirements as is in this chapter
provided in the case of withdrawals in excess of five thousand gallons
a day.
(3) After the effective date of this section, a withdrawal of
public groundwaters is exempt from the application and permit
requirements of this section as long as the beneficial use or uses of
the public groundwaters do not individually or collectively exceed five
thousand gallons a day for the following purposes:
(a) A single domestic use or a group domestic use by six or fewer
residences;
(b) Watering of a noncommercial lawn or garden not exceeding one-half acre in area;
(c) Stock watering use;
(d) Commercial irrigation not exceeding one-half acre in area; and
(e) Industrial or commercial use.
(4) For any new permit exempt use commenced after the effective
date of this section, the department shall require the person making
any such new small withdrawal to meter the water use and to retain
records of the amounts withdrawn. In areas in which instream flows are
being affected or in areas in which withdrawals are reduced pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, the department may require periodic
submittal to the department of the amounts withdrawn or the department
may require the installation of electronic data recording and
transmission devices.
(5) At the option of the person making a withdrawal of groundwaters
of the state not exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications
under this section may be filed and permits and certificates obtained
in the same manner and under the same requirements as provided for in
this chapter in the case of withdrawals in excess of five thousand
gallons a day.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the amount of
public groundwaters that may be withdrawn that are exempt from permit
requirements may be reduced to some lesser amount through rules adopted
by the department when the department determines, in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife and federally recognized Indian
tribes, that effective water management requires such a limitation.
The rules may only be adopted for the protection of public groundwaters
occurring in watersheds in which:
(a) Salmonid stocks are listed or proposed for listing as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act or
listed as critical or depressed under the state salmon and steelhead
stock inventory;
(b) Stream flows have been diminishing as a result of the reduction
of base flows due to well withdrawals;
(c) Surface waters or groundwaters have been fully appropriated;
(d) Existing water rights have been restricted or interrupted or
the basin has ever been closed;
(e) There is an ongoing stream adjudication; or
(f) The rules are necessary to prevent impairment of existing water
rights or harm to fish, wildlife, navigation, or an existing public
recreational use.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (3) through (5) of this section,
after the effective date of this section, no new permit exempt
withdrawal may be commenced or a new purpose of exempt use added by any
person whose place of use is within a service area of a water purveyor
that has sufficient capacity to provide water under existing water
rights, provided a purveyor determines that it can provide water
service on a timely and reasonable basis and the purveyor is willing to
provide the service.
(8) The priority date of a water right established through the
groundwater permit exemption in this section is the date that water is
first put to beneficial use for the exempt purpose in question. Permit
exempt groundwater rights may be relinquished or abandoned through
nonuse in the same manner as other water rights.
(9) Permit exempt groundwater rights are subject to regulation in
favor of senior water rights in the same manner as any other water
right on the basis of priority date.
(10) A permit exempt groundwater withdrawal may be supplied from
more than one well, but all the wells combined may not exceed a total
daily withdrawal of five thousand gallons under the exemption. An
exempt withdrawal may be made from a well that also supplies water for
a water right permit or certificate.
(11) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "stock
watering use" means providing water for domestic farm animals for
drinking and for maintenance of animal health and welfare. This
includes water for cleaning animals and the buildings that the animals
occupy and misting the animals for cooling purposes in hot weather.
This does not include the use of water to cool or process and produce,
irrigation of vegetation, or dust control, all of which constitute
industrial or commercial water uses under this section.
(12) By December 1, 2009, the department shall identify, and rank
in priority order, all areas of the state in which the metering of
existing groundwater withdrawals, including permit exempt withdrawals,
is needed to effectively manage the waters of the state. The
department shall convey that information in a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report must include an estimate of
the cost to the state to require such metering and to manage the
resulting data and the cumulative cost to water right holders to
implement comprehensive metering and reporting of groundwater in the
highest priority areas.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.44.105 and 1997 c 446 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of groundwater right, the holder of
a valid right to withdraw public groundwaters may consolidate that
right with a groundwater right exempt from the permit requirement under
RCW 90.44.050, without affecting the priority of either of the water
rights being consolidated. ((Such))
(b) Upon receiving the permission from the department and the
department of health, a group A water purveyor may consolidate the
water rights of consenting owners of permit exempt wells within its
service area. Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the
purveyor is not required to own a well in the same body of groundwater.
However, all other requirements of subsection (2) of this section
apply. The purveyor may furnish the water from a new well or wells
approved by the department or may with approval from the department
supply the water from one or more of the acquired wells. Once the
consolidation action is completed, the department shall issue a water
right certificate to the water purveyor.
(2) A consolidation amendment or approval shall be issued only
after publication of a notice of the application, a comment period, and
a determination made by the department, in lieu of meeting the
conditions required for an amendment under RCW 90.44.100, that:
(((1))) (a) The exempt well taps the same body of public groundwater as
the existing or future well to which the water right of the exempt well
is to be consolidated; (((2))) (b) use of the exempt well or wells
shall be discontinued upon approval of ((the)) a consolidation
amendment to the permit or certificate; (((3))) (c) legally enforceable
agreements have been entered to prohibit the construction of another
exempt well to serve the area previously served by the exempt well to
be discontinued, and such agreements are binding upon subsequent owners
of the land through appropriate binding limitations on the title to the
land; (((4))) (d) the exempt well or wells the use of which is to be
discontinued will be properly decommissioned in accordance with chapter
18.104 RCW and the rules of the department; ((and (5))) (e) other
existing rights, including ground and surface water rights and minimum
stream flows adopted by rule, shall not be impaired; and (f) no
detriment to the public interest shall occur. The notice shall be
published by the applicant in a newspaper of general circulation in the
county or counties in which the wells for the rights to be consolidated
are located once a week for two consecutive weeks. The applicant shall
provide evidence of the publication of the notice to the department.
The comment period shall be for thirty days beginning on the date the
second notice is published.
(3) The amount of the water to be added to the holder's permit or
certificate or the amount granted as a new water right certificate upon
discontinuance of the exempt well shall be the average withdrawal from
the well, in gallons per day, for the most recent five-year period
preceding the date of the application, except that the amount shall not
be less than eight hundred gallons per day for each residential
connection or such alternative minimum amount as may be established by
the department in consultation with the department of health, and shall
not exceed five thousand gallons per day. The department shall presume
that an amount identified by the applicant as being the average
withdrawal from the well during the most recent five-year period is
accurate if the applicant establishes that the amount identified for
the use or uses of water from the exempt well is consistent with the
average amount of water used for similar use or uses in the general
area in which the exempt well is located. The department shall
develop, in consultation with the department of health, a schedule of
average household and small-area landscaping water usages in various
regions of the state to aid the department and applicants in
identifying average amounts used for these purposes. The presumption
does not apply if the department finds credible evidence of nonuse of
the well during the required period or credible evidence that the use
of water from the exempt well or the intensity of the use of the land
supported by water from the exempt well is substantially different than
such uses in the general area in which the exempt well is located. The
department shall also accord a presumption in favor of approval of such
consolidation if the requirements of this subsection are met and the
discontinuance of the exempt well is consistent with an adopted
coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW, an adopted
comprehensive land use plan under chapter 36.70A RCW, or other
comprehensive watershed management plan applicable to the area
containing an objective of decreasing the number of existing and newly
developed small groundwater withdrawal wells. The department shall
provide a priority to reviewing and deciding upon applications subject
to this subsection, and shall make its decision within sixty days of
the end of the comment period following publication of the notice by
the applicant or within sixty days of the date on which compliance with
the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, is completed,
whichever is later. The applicant and the department may by prior
mutual agreement extend the time for making a decision.

--- END ---