BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.165.025 and 2004 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((By July 1st of each year,)) (1) A participating school district
shall submit the district's plan for using learning assistance funds to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction for approval, to
the extent required under subsection (2) of this section. ((For the
2004-05 school year, school districts must identify the program
activities to be implemented from RCW 28A.165.035 and are encouraged to
implement the elements in subsections (1) through (8) of this section.
Beginning in the 2005-06 school year,)) The program plan must identify
the program activities to be implemented from RCW 28A.165.035 and
implement all of the elements in ((subsections (1))) (a) through
(((8))) (h) of this ((section)) subsection. The school district plan
shall include the following:
(((1))) (a) District and school-level data on reading, writing, and
mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW and
relevant federal law;
(((2))) (b) Processes used for identifying the underachieving
students to be served by the program, including the identification of
school or program sites providing program activities;
(((3))) (c) How accelerated learning plans are developed and
implemented for participating students. Accelerated learning plans may
be developed as part of existing student achievement plan process such
as student plans for achieving state high school graduation standards,
individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans for groups
of students. Accelerated learning plans shall include:
(((a))) (i) Achievement goals for the students;
(((b))) (ii) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and
teachers in the plan;
(((c))) (iii) Communication procedures regarding student
accomplishment; and
(((d))) (iv) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(((4))) (d) How state level and classroom assessments are used to
inform instruction;
(((5))) (e) How focused and intentional instructional strategies
have been identified and implemented;
(((6))) (f) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed
and supported in the program and in participating schools;
(((7))) (g) How other federal, state, district, and school
resources are coordinated with school improvement plans and the
district's strategic plan to support underachieving students; and
(((8))) (h) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year.
(2) If a school district has received approval of its plan once, it
is not required to submit a plan for approval under RCW 28A.165.045 or
this section unless the district has made a significant change to the
plan. If a district has made a significant change to only a portion of
the plan the district need only submit a description of the changes
made and not the entire plan. Plans or descriptions of changes to the
plan must be submitted by July 1st as required under this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for what a "significant change" is.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.165.045 and 2004 c 20 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A participating school district shall ((annually)) submit a program
plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
approval to the extent required by RCW 28A.165.025. The program plan
must address all of the elements in RCW 28A.165.025 and identify the
program activities to be implemented from RCW 28A.165.035.
School districts achieving state reading and mathematics goals as
prescribed in chapter 28A.655 RCW shall have their program approved
once the program plan and activities submittal is completed.
School districts not achieving state reading and mathematics goals
as prescribed in chapter 28A.655 RCW and that are not in a state or
federal program of school improvement shall be subject to program
approval once the plan components are reviewed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of receiving
technical assistance in the final development of the plan.
School districts with one or more schools in a state or federal
program of school improvement shall have their plans and activities
reviewed and approved in conjunction with the state or federal program
school improvement program requirements.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.210.010 and 1971 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state board of health, after consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, shall adopt reasonable rules
((and regulations)) regarding the presence of persons on or about any
school premises who have, or who have been exposed to, contagious
diseases deemed by the state board of health as dangerous to the public
health. Such rules ((and regulations)) shall specify reasonable and
precautionary procedures as to such presence and/or readmission of such
persons and may include the requirement for a certificate from a
licensed physician that there is no danger of contagion. The
superintendent of public instruction shall ((print and distribute the))
provide to appropriate school officials and personnel, access and
notice of these rules ((and regulations)) of the state board of health
((above provided to appropriate school officials and personnel)).
Providing online access to these rules satisfies the requirements of
this section. The superintendent of public instruction is required to
provide this notice only when there are significant changes to the
rules.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.210.020 and 1971 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every board of school directors shall have the power, and it
shall be its duty to provide for and require screening for the visual
and auditory acuity of all children attending schools in their
districts to ascertain which if any of such children have defects
sufficient to retard them in their studies. Auditory and visual
screening shall be made in accordance with procedures and standards
adopted by rule or regulation of the state board of health. Prior to
the adoption or revision of such rules or regulations the state board
of health shall seek the recommendations of the superintendent of
public instruction regarding the administration of visual and auditory
screening and the qualifications of persons competent to administer
such screening.
(2) Except to the extent necessary to comply with the federal
individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA) or to serve children
who are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch, this section is
suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.210.030 and 1991 c 3 s 289 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The person or persons completing the screening prescribed in
RCW 28A.210.020 shall promptly prepare a record of the screening of
each child found to have, or suspected of having, reduced visual and/or
auditory acuity in need of attention, including the special education
services provided by RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, and send
copies of such records and recommendations to the parents or guardians
of such children and shall deliver the original records to the
appropriate school official who shall preserve such records and forward
to the superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of health
visual and auditory data as requested by such officials.
(2) Except to the extent necessary to comply with the federal
individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA) or to serve children
who are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch, this section is
suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.210.040 and 1990 c 33 s 189 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall ((print and
distribute)) provide access to appropriate school officials the rules
((and regulations)) adopted by the state board of health pursuant to
RCW 28A.210.020 and the recommended records and forms to be used in
making and reporting such screenings. Providing online access to the
materials satisfies the requirements of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.210.080 and 2007 c 276 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The attendance of every child at every public and private
school in the state and licensed day care center shall be conditioned
upon the presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance
at a particular school or center, of proof of either (a) full
immunization, (b) the initiation of and compliance with a schedule of
immunization, as required by rules of the state board of health, or (c)
a certificate of exemption as provided for in RCW 28A.210.090. The
attendance at the school or the day care center during any subsequent
school year of a child who has initiated a schedule of immunization
shall be conditioned upon the presentation of proof of compliance with
the schedule on the child's first day of attendance during the
subsequent school year. Once proof of full immunization or proof of
completion of an approved schedule has been presented, no further proof
shall be required as a condition to attendance at the particular school
or center.
(2)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public and private
school in the state shall provide parents and guardians with access to
information about meningococcal disease and its vaccine at the
beginning of every school year. Providing online access to the
information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent
or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in written
form. The information about meningococcal disease shall include:
(i) Its causes and symptoms, how meningococcal disease is spread,
and the places where parents and guardians may obtain additional
information and vaccinations for their children; and
(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for
disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for
meningococcal disease and where the vaccination can be received.
(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the
department of health or the school to provide meningococcal vaccination
to students.
(c) The department of health shall prepare the informational
materials and shall consult with the office of superintendent of public
instruction.
(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.
(3)(a) Beginning with sixth grade entry, every public school in the
state shall provide parents and guardians with access to information
about human papillomavirus disease and its vaccine at the beginning of
every school year. Providing online access to the information
satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian
specifically requests information to be provided in written form. The
information about human papillomavirus disease shall include:
(i) Its causes and symptoms, how human papillomavirus disease is
spread, and the places where parents and guardians may obtain
additional information and vaccinations for their children; and
(ii) Current recommendations from the United States centers for
disease control and prevention regarding the receipt of vaccines for
human papillomavirus disease and where the vaccination can be received.
(b) This subsection shall not be construed to require the
department of health or the school to provide human papillomavirus
vaccination to students.
(c) The department of health shall prepare the informational
materials and shall consult with the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.
(d) This subsection does not create a private right of action.
(4) Private schools are required by state law to notify parents
that information on the human papillomavirus disease prepared by the
department of health is available.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.225.005 and 1992 c 205 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each school within a school district shall inform the students and
the parents of the students enrolled in the school about the compulsory
education requirements under this chapter. The school shall
((distribute)) provide access to the information at least annually.
Providing online access to the information satisfies the requirements
of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically requests
information to be provided in written form.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.225.290 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and
annually ((distribute an)) provide access to information ((booklet))
outlining parents' and guardians' enrollment options for their
children. Providing online access to the information satisfies the
requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically
requests information to be provided in written form.
(2) ((Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be
distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the
information booklet available for public inspection at each school in
the district, at the district office, and in public libraries)) School
districts shall provide access to the information in this section to
the public. Providing online access to the information satisfies the
requirements of this subsection unless a parent or guardian
specifically requests the information be provided in written form.
(3) The booklet shall include:
(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities,
including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040,
28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250,
28A.175.090, 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school
cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160.
(b) Information about the running start - community college or
vocational-technical institute choice program under RCW 28A.600.300
through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.390; and
(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program
under RCW 28A.230.090.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.225.300 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
Each school district board of directors annually shall inform
parents of the district's intradistrict and interdistrict enrollment
options and parental involvement opportunities. Information on
intradistrict enrollment options and interdistrict acceptance policies
shall be provided to nonresidents on request. Providing online access
to the information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a
parent or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in
written form.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.230.095 and 2006 c 113 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools
assessments or other strategies to assure that students have an
opportunity to learn the essential academic learning requirements in
social studies, the arts, and health and fitness. Social studies
includes history, geography, civics, economics, and social studies
skills. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
annually submit an implementation verification report to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction. The verification report
shall require school districts to report only the information necessary
to comply with this section.
(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall
require students in ((the fourth or fifth grades [grade],)) the seventh
or eighth ((grades [grade])) grade, and the eleventh or twelfth
((grades [grade])) grade to each complete at least one classroom-based
assessment in civics. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, school
districts shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade to each
complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics
assessment may be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments
approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually
submit implementation verification reports to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction documenting the use of the
classroom-based assessments in civics. The verification report shall
require school districts to report only the information necessary to
comply with this section.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2006 c 263 s 401 and 2006 c 115 s 6
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the higher education coordinating board, the state board for community
and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education
coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public school
districts a standardized high school transcript. The superintendent
shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and "hours"
so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester, or
trimester system can be compared.
(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.
(((3) Transcripts are important documents to students who will
apply for admission to postsecondary institutions of higher education.
Transcripts are also important to students who will seek employment
upon or prior to graduation from high school. It is recognized that
student transcripts may be the only record available to employers in
their decision-making processes regarding prospective employees. The
superintendent of public instruction shall require school districts to
inform annually all high school students that prospective employers may
request to see transcripts and that the prospective employee's decision
to release transcripts can be an important part of the process of
applying for employment.))

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.300.040 and 2006 c 263 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the
powers and duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:
(1) To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public
schools of the state;
(2) To report to the governor and the legislature such information
and data as may be required for the management and improvement of the
schools;
(3) To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of
study, rules for the government of the common schools, and such other
material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the duties
of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to
educational service district superintendents;
(4) To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties
as superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending
educational meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, and of
consulting educational service district superintendents or other school
officials;
(5) To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the
Washington state common school code, copies of which shall be provided
in such numbers as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction at no cost to those public agencies within the common
school system and which shall be sold at approximate actual cost of
publication and distribution per volume to all other public and
nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules related to the common schools, and such other matter
as the state superintendent or the state board of education shall
determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be transmitted to
the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's account
within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount. This
subsection is suspended until July 1, 2011;
(6) To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to
the superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or
districts of the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers
filed in the superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official
acts, may, or upon request, shall be certified by the superintendent
and attested by the superintendent's official seal, and when so
certified shall be evidence of the papers or acts so certified to;
(7) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of
the president, manager, or principal of every educational institution
in this state, a report as required by the superintendent of public
instruction; and it is the duty of every president, manager, or
principal, to complete and return such forms within such time as the
superintendent of public instruction shall direct;
(8) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state;
(9) To issue certificates as provided by law;
(10) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the
state, all books and papers pertaining to the business of the
superintendent's office, and to keep and preserve in the
superintendent's office a complete record of statistics, as well as a
record of the meetings of the state board of education;
(11) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent
in writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that
may be submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal
from the decision of any educational service district superintendent;
and the superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions
from time to time for the information of school officials and teachers;
and the superintendent's decision shall be final unless set aside by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(12) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties;
(13) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents
and papers of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or
which may have been received by the superintendent's for the use of the
superintendent's office;
(14) To administer family services and programs to promote the
state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025;
(15) To promote the adoption of school-based curricula and policies
that provide quality, daily physical education for all students, and to
encourage policies that provide all students with opportunities for
physical activity outside of formal physical education classes;
(16) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.300.118 and 2000 c 126 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the ((2000-01)) 2011-12 school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall notify senior high schools
and any other public school that includes ninth grade of the names and
contact information of public and private entities offering programs
leading to college credit, including information about online advanced
placement classes, if the superintendent has knowledge of such entities
and if the cost of reporting these entities is minimal.
(2) Beginning with the ((2000-01)) 2011-12 school year, each senior
high school and any other public school that includes ninth grade shall
publish annually and deliver to each parent with children enrolled in
ninth through twelfth grades, information concerning the entrance
requirements and the availability of programs in the local area that
lead to college credit, including classes such as advanced placement,
running start, tech-prep, skill centers, college in the high school,
and international baccalaureate programs. The information may be
included with other information the school regularly mails to parents.
In addition, each senior high school and any other public school that
includes ninth grade shall enclose information of the names and contact
information of other public or private entities offering such programs,
including online advanced placement programs, to its ninth through
twelfth grade students if the school has knowledge of such entities.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.300.525 and 2008 c 297 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall provide an
annual aggregate report to the legislature on the educational
experiences and progress of students in children's administration out-of-home care. This data should be disaggregated in the smallest units
allowable by law that do not identify an individual student, in order
to learn which school districts are experiencing the greatest success
and challenges in achieving quality educational outcomes with students
in children's administration out-of-home care.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 16 RCW 28A.320.160 and 2005 c 274 s 244 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts must, at the first opportunity but in all cases
within forty-eight hours of receiving a report alleging sexual
misconduct by a school employee, notify the parents of a student
alleged to be the victim, target, or recipient of the misconduct.
School districts ((shall)) may provide parents with information
regarding their rights under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW,
to request the public records regarding school employee discipline.
This information shall be provided to ((all)) parents ((on an annual
basis)) upon their request.

Sec. 17 RCW 28A.320.165 and 2001 c 333 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Schools as defined in RCW 17.21.415 shall provide online notice of
pesticide use to parents or guardians of students and employees
pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW, and shall provide written notice upon
the request of the parent or guardian.

Sec. 18 RCW 28A.320.180 and 2007 c 396 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose and beginning
in the fall of 2009, school districts shall provide all high school
students enrolled in the district the option of taking the mathematics
college readiness test developed under RCW 28B.10.679 once at no cost
to the students. Districts shall encourage, but not require, students
to take the test in their junior or senior year of high school.
(2) Subject to funding appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse each district
for the costs incurred by the district in providing students the
opportunity to take the mathematics placement test.
(3) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 19 RCW 28A.600.160 and 1998 c 225 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any middle school, junior high school, or high school using
educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will
continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to
meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students
shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice.
Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the school
shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the
opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the
career objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the
pathway. Providing online access to the information satisfies the
requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically
request information to be provided in written form. Parents and
students dissatisfied with the opportunities available through the
selected educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity to
transfer the student to any other pathway provided in the school.
Schools may not develop educational pathways that retain students in
high school beyond the date they are eligible to graduate, and may not
require students who transfer between pathways to complete pathway
requirements beyond the date the student is eligible to graduate.
Educational pathways may include, but are not limited to, programs such
as work-based learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep,
vocational-technical education, running start, and preparation for
technical college, community college, or university education.

Sec. 20 RCW 28A.655.061 and 2008 c 321 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The high school assessment system shall include but need not be
limited to the Washington assessment of student learning, opportunities
for a student to retake the content areas of the assessment in which
the student was not successful, and if approved by the legislature
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, one or more objective
alternative assessments for a student to demonstrate achievement of
state academic standards. The objective alternative assessments for
each content area shall be comparable in rigor to the skills and
knowledge that the student must demonstrate on the Washington
assessment of student learning for each content area.
(2) Subject to the conditions in this section, a certificate of
academic achievement shall be obtained by most students at about the
age of sixteen, and is evidence that the students have successfully met
the state standard in the content areas included in the certificate.
With the exception of students satisfying the provisions of RCW
28A.155.045 or 28A.655.0611, acquisition of the certificate is required
for graduation from a public high school but is not the only
requirement for graduation.
(3) Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, with the exception
of students satisfying the provisions of RCW 28A.155.045, a student who
meets the state standards on the reading, writing, and mathematics
content areas of the high school Washington assessment of student
learning shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. If a
student does not successfully meet the state standards in one or more
content areas required for the certificate of academic achievement,
then the student may retake the assessment in the content area up to
four times at no cost to the student. If the student successfully
meets the state standards on a retake of the assessment then the
student shall earn a certificate of academic achievement. Once
objective alternative assessments are authorized pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section, a student may use the objective alternative
assessments to demonstrate that the student successfully meets the
state standards for that content area if the student has taken the
Washington assessment of student learning at least once. If the
student successfully meets the state standards on the objective
alternative assessments then the student shall earn a certificate of
academic achievement.
(4) Beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2013, a
student must meet the state standards in science in addition to the
other content areas required under subsection (3) of this section on
the Washington assessment of student learning or the objective
alternative assessments in order to earn a certificate of academic
achievement. The state board of education may adopt a rule that
implements the requirements of this subsection (4) beginning with a
graduating class before the graduating class of 2013, if the state
board of education adopts the rule by September 1st of the freshman
school year of the graduating class to which the requirements of this
subsection (4) apply. The state board of education's authority under
this subsection (4) does not alter the requirement that any change in
performance standards for the tenth grade assessment must comply with
RCW 28A.305.130.
(5) The state board of education may not require the acquisition of
the certificate of academic achievement for students in home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, for students enrolled in private
schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or for students satisfying the
provisions of RCW 28A.155.045.
(6) A student may retain and use the highest result from each
successfully completed content area of the high school assessment.
(7) School districts must make available to students the following
options:
(a) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a public school; or
(b) To retake the Washington assessment of student learning up to
four times in the content areas in which the student did not meet the
state standards if the student is enrolled in a high school completion
program at a community or technical college. The superintendent of
public instruction and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall jointly identify means by which students in these
programs can be assessed.
(8) Students who achieve the standard in a content area of the high
school assessment but who wish to improve their results shall pay for
retaking the assessment, using a uniform cost determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(9) Opportunities to retake the assessment at least twice a year
shall be available to each school district.
(10)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop options for implementing objective alternative
assessments, which may include an appeals process for students' scores,
for students to demonstrate achievement of the state academic
standards. The objective alternative assessments shall be comparable
in rigor to the skills and knowledge that the student must demonstrate
on the Washington assessment of student learning and be objective in
its determination of student achievement of the state standards.
Before any objective alternative assessments in addition to those
authorized in RCW 28A.655.065 or (b) of this subsection are used by a
student to demonstrate that the student has met the state standards in
a content area required to obtain a certificate, the legislature shall
formally approve the use of any objective alternative assessments
through the omnibus appropriations act or by statute or concurrent
resolution.
(b)(i) A student's score on the mathematics, reading or English, or
writing portion of the ((scholastic assessment test ())SAT(())) or the
((American college test ())ACT(())) may be used as an objective
alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating that a
student has met or exceeded the state standards for the certificate of
academic achievement. The state board of education shall identify the
scores students must achieve on the relevant portion of the SAT or ACT
to meet or exceed the state standard in the relevant content area on
the Washington assessment of student learning. The state board of
education shall identify the first scores by December 1, 2007. After
the first scores are established, the state board may increase but not
decrease the scores required for students to meet or exceed the state
standards.
(ii) Until August 31, 2008, a student's score on the mathematics
portion of the ((preliminary scholastic assessment test ())PSAT(()))
may be used as an objective alternative assessment under this section
for demonstrating that a student has met or exceeded the state standard
for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board of
education shall identify the score students must achieve on the
mathematics portion of the PSAT to meet or exceed the state standard in
that content area on the Washington assessment of student learning.
(iii) A student who scores at least a three on the grading scale of
one to five for selected AP examinations may use the score as an
objective alternative assessment under this section for demonstrating
that a student has met or exceeded state standards for the certificate
of academic achievement. A score of three on the AP examinations in
calculus or statistics may be used as an alternative assessment for the
mathematics portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
A score of three on the AP examinations in English language and
composition may be used as an alternative assessment for the writing
portion of the Washington assessment of student learning. A score of
three on the AP examinations in English literature and composition,
macroeconomics, microeconomics, psychology, United States history,
world history, United States government and politics, or comparative
government and politics may be used as an alternative assessment for
the reading portion of the Washington assessment of student learning.
(11) By December 15, 2004, the house of representatives and senate
education committees shall obtain information and conclusions from
recognized, independent, national assessment experts regarding the
validity and reliability of the high school Washington assessment of
student learning for making individual student high school graduation
determinations.
(((12) To help assure continued progress in academic achievement as
a foundation for high school graduation and to assure that students are
on track for high school graduation, each school district shall prepare
plans for and notify students and their parents or legal guardians as
provided in this subsection (12).
(a) Student learning plans are required for eighth through twelfth
grade students who were not successful on any or all of the content
areas of the Washington assessment for student learning during the
previous school year or who may not be on track to graduate due to
credit deficiencies or absences. The parent or legal guardian shall be
notified about the information in the student learning plan, preferably
through a parent conference and at least annually. To the extent
feasible, schools serving English language learner students and their
parents shall translate the plan into the primary language of the
family. The plan shall include the following information as
applicable:
(i) The student's results on the Washington assessment of student
learning;
(ii) If the student is in the transitional bilingual program, the
score on his or her Washington language proficiency test II;
(iii) Any credit deficiencies;
(iv) The student's attendance rates over the previous two years;
(v) The student's progress toward meeting state and local
graduation requirements;
(vi) The courses, competencies, and other steps needed to be taken
by the student to meet state academic standards and stay on track for
graduation;
(vii) Remediation strategies and alternative education options
available to students, including informing students of the option to
continue to receive instructional services after grade twelve or until
the age of twenty-one;
(viii) The alternative assessment options available to students
under this section and RCW 28A.655.065;
(ix) School district programs, high school courses, and career and
technical education options available for students to meet graduation
requirements; and
(x) Available programs offered through skill centers or community
and technical colleges.
(b) All fifth grade students who were not successful in one or more
of the content areas of the fourth grade Washington assessment of
student learning shall have a student learning plan.
(i) The parent or guardian of the student shall be notified,
preferably through a parent conference, of the student's results on the
Washington assessment of student learning, actions the school intends
to take to improve the student's skills in any content area in which
the student was unsuccessful, and provide strategies to help them
improve their student's skills.
(ii) Progress made on the student plan shall be reported to the
student's parents or guardian at least annually and adjustments to the
plan made as necessary.))

Sec. 21 RCW 28A.655.075 and 2007 c 396 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, by December 1,
2008, the superintendent of public instruction shall develop essential
academic learning requirements and grade level expectations for
educational technology literacy and technology fluency that identify
the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to know
and be able to do in the areas of technology and technology literacy.
The development process shall include a review of current standards
that have been developed or are used by other states and national and
international technology associations. To the maximum extent possible,
the superintendent shall integrate goal four and the knowledge and
skill areas in the other goals in the technology essential academic
learning requirements.
(a) As used in this section, "technology literacy" means the
ability to responsibly, creatively, and effectively use appropriate
technology to communicate; access, collect, manage, integrate, and
evaluate information; solve problems and create solutions; build and
share knowledge; and improve and enhance learning in all subject areas
and experiences.
(b) Technology fluency builds upon technology literacy and is
demonstrated when students: Apply technology to real-world
experiences; adapt to changing technologies; modify current and create
new technologies; and personalize technology to meet personal needs,
interests, and learning styles.
(2)(a) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, the
superintendent shall obtain or develop education technology assessments
that may be administered in the elementary, middle, and high school
grades to assess the essential academic learning requirements for
technology. The assessments shall be designed to be classroom or
project-based so that they can be embedded in classroom instruction and
be administered and scored by school staff throughout the regular
school year using consistent scoring criteria and procedures. By the
2010-11 school year, these assessments shall be made available to
school districts for the districts' voluntary use. If a school
district uses the assessments created under this section, then the
school district shall notify the superintendent of public instruction
of the use. The superintendent shall report annually to the
legislature on the number of school districts that use the assessments
each school year.
(b) Beginning December 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a report to the
relevant legislative committees regarding the use of the assessments.
(3) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 22 RCW 17.21.415 and 2001 c 333 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "school" means a licensed day care
center or a public kindergarten or a public elementary or secondary
school.
(2) A school shall provide online notification, or written
notification ((annually or upon enrollment)) upon request, to parents
or guardians of students and employees describing the school's pest
control policies and methods, including the posting and notification
requirements of this section.
(3) A school shall establish a notification system that, as a
minimum, notifies interested parents or guardians of students and
employees at least forty-eight hours before a pesticide application to
a school facility. The notification system shall include posting of
the notification in a prominent place in the main office of the school.
(4) All notifications to parents, guardians, and employees shall
include the heading "Notice: Pesticide Application" and, at a minimum,
shall state:
(a) The product name of the pesticide to be applied;
(b) The intended date and time of application;
(c) The location to which the pesticide is to be applied;
(d) The pest to be controlled; and
(e) The name and phone number of a contact person at the school.
(5) A school facility application must be made within forty-eight
hours following the intended date and time stated in the notification
or the notification process shall be repeated.
(6) A school shall, at the time of application, post notification
signs for all pesticide applications made to school facilities unless
the application is otherwise required to be posted by a certified
applicator under the provisions of RCW 17.21.410(1)(d).
(a) Notification signs for applications made to school grounds by
school employees shall be placed at the location of the application and
at each primary point of entry to the school grounds. The signs shall
be a minimum of four inches by five inches and shall include the words:
"THIS LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN RECENTLY SPRAYED OR TREATED WITH PESTICIDES BY
YOUR SCHOOL" as the headline and "FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as
the footer. The footer shall provide the name and telephone number of
a contact person at the school.
(b) Notification signs for applications made to school facilities
other than school grounds shall be posted at the location of the
application. The signs shall be a minimum of eight and one-half by
eleven inches and shall include the heading "Notice: Pesticide
Application" and, at a minimum, shall state:
(i) The product name of the pesticide applied;
(ii) The date and time of application;
(iii) The location to which the pesticide was applied;
(iv) The pest to be controlled; and
(v) The name and phone number of a contact person at the school.
(c) Notification signs shall be printed in colors contrasting to
the background.
(d) Notification signs shall remain in place for at least
twenty-four hours from the time the application is completed. In the
event the pesticide label requires a restricted entry interval greater
than twenty-four hours, the notification sign shall remain in place
consistent with the restricted entry interval time as required by the
label.
(7) A school facility application does not include the application
of antimicrobial pesticides or the placement of insect or rodent baits
that are not accessible to children.
(8) The prenotification requirements of this section do not apply
if the school facility application is made when the school is not
occupied by students for at least two consecutive days after the
application.
(9) The prenotification requirements of this section do not apply
to any emergency school facility application for control of any pest
that poses an immediate human health or safety threat, such as an
application to control stinging insects. When an emergency school
facility application is made, notification consistent with the school's
notification system shall occur as soon as possible after the
application. The notification shall include information consistent
with subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(10) A school shall make the records of all pesticide applications
to school facilities required under this chapter, including an annual
summary of the records, readily accessible to interested persons.
(11) A school is not liable for the removal of signs by
unauthorized persons. A school that complies with this section may not
be held liable for personal property damage or bodily injury resulting
from signs that are placed as required.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.210.130 (Immunization program -- Superintendent of public
instruction to provide information) and 1990 c 33 s 197 & 1985 c 49 s
4;
(2) RCW 28A.220.050 (Information on proper use of left-hand lane)
and 1986 c 93 s 4;
(3) RCW 28A.220.080 (Information on motorcycle awareness) and 2007
c 97 s 4 & 2004 c 126 s 1;
(4) RCW 28A.220.085 (Information on driving safely among bicyclists
and pedestrians) and 2008 c 125 s 4; and
(5) RCW 28A.300.412 (Washington civil liberties public education
program -- Report) and 2000 c 210 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Sections 4, 5, 13, 15, 18, and 21 of this
act expire July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---