BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.185.030 and 1984 c 278 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Local school districts may establish and operate, either separately
or jointly, programs for highly capable students. Such authority shall
include the right to employ and pay special instructors and to operate
such programs jointly with a public institution of higher education.
Local school districts which establish and operate programs for highly
capable students shall adopt identification procedures and provide
educational opportunities as follows, to the extent funds are
available:
(1) In accordance with rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, school districts shall implement
procedures for nomination, assessment and selection of their most
highly capable students. Nominations shall be based upon data from
teachers, other staff, parents, students, and members of the community.
Assessment shall be based upon a review of each student's capability as
shown by multiple criteria intended to reveal, from a wide variety of
sources and data, each student's unique needs and capabilities.
Selection shall be made by a broadly based committee of professionals,
after consideration of the results of the multiple criteria assessment.
(2) Students selected pursuant to procedures outlined in this
section shall be provided, to the extent feasible, an educational
opportunity which takes into account each student's unique needs and
capabilities and the limits of the resources and program options
available to the district, including those options which can be
developed or provided by using funds allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for that purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.215.010 and 2006 c 263 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors of any school district shall have the power
to establish and maintain preschools and to provide before-and-after-school and vacation care in connection with the common schools of said
district located at such points as the board shall deem most suitable
for the convenience of the public, for the care and instruction of
infants and children residing in said district. The board shall
establish such courses, activities, and rules((, and regulations))
governing preschools and before-and-after-school care as it may deem
best: PROVIDED, That these courses and activities ((shall)) are
encouraged to meet the minimum standard for such preschools as
established by the United States department of health, education and
welfare, or its successor agency, and the superintendent of public
instruction. Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the
board of directors may fix a reasonable charge for the care and
instruction of children attending such schools. The board may, if
necessary, supplement such funds as are received for the superintendent
of public instruction or any agency of the federal government, by an
appropriation from the general school fund of the district.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.220.030 and 2000 c 115 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to
establish a section of traffic safety education, and through such
section shall: Define a "realistic level of effort" required to
provide an effective traffic safety education course, establish a level
of driving competency required of each student to successfully complete
the course, and ensure that an effective statewide program is
implemented and sustained, administer, supervise, and develop the
traffic safety education program and shall assist local school
districts in the conduct of their traffic safety education programs.
The superintendent shall adopt necessary rules ((and regulations))
governing the operation and scope of the traffic safety education
program; and each school district shall submit a report in even-numbered years to the superintendent on the condition of its traffic
safety education program: PROVIDED, That the superintendent shall
monitor the quality of the program and carry out the purposes of this
chapter.
(2) The board of directors of any school district maintaining a
secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive,
may establish and maintain a traffic safety education course. If a
school district elects to offer a traffic safety education course and
has within its boundaries a private accredited secondary school which
includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, to the extent funds are
available, at least one class in traffic safety education shall be
given at times other than regular school hours if there is sufficient
demand therefor.
(3) The board of directors of a school district, or combination of
school districts, may contract with any drivers' school licensed under
the provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW to teach the laboratory phase of
the traffic safety education course. Instructors provided by any such
contracting drivers' school must be properly qualified teachers of
traffic safety education under the joint qualification requirements
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the director of
licensing.
(4) The superintendent shall establish a required minimum number of
hours of continuing traffic safety education for traffic safety
education instructors. The superintendent may phase in the requirement
over not more than five years.
(5) By January 1, 2010, the superintendent shall survey districts
regarding the impact of the rules and minimum hours of training
established under the authority of this section. The superintendent
shall revise the rules and minimum hours based on that survey in order
to reduce the burden on school districts.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.230.160 and 1990 c 33 s 241 are each amended to
read as follows:
During the school week preceding the eleventh day of November of
each year, there shall be presented in each common school as defined in
RCW 28A.150.020 educational activities suitable to the observance of
Veterans' Day.
The responsibility for the preparation and presentation of the
activities ((approximating at least sixty minutes total)) for
observance throughout the week shall be with the principal or head
teacher of each school building and such program shall embrace topics
tending to instill a loyalty and devotion to the institutions and laws
of this state and nation.
The superintendent of public instruction and each educational
service district superintendent, by advice and suggestion, shall aid in
the preparation of these activities if such aid be solicited.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.230.205 and 2007 c 459 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated or are available for this
purpose, the superintendent of public instruction and other members of
the partnership created in RCW 28A.300.455 shall make available to
school districts the list of identified financial literacy skills and
knowledge, instructional materials, assessments, and other relevant
information.
(2)(a) Each school district is encouraged to provide its students
with an opportunity to master the financial literacy skills and
knowledge developed under RCW 28A.300.460.
(b) This subsection is suspended until July 1, 2011.
(3) For the purposes of RCW 28A.300.455((,)) and 28A.300.460((,))
and this section, it is not necessary to evaluate and apply the office
of the superintendent of public instruction essential academic learning
requirements or to develop grade level expectations.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.300.405 and 2000 c 210 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Consistent with the legislative findings in RCW 28A.300.390,
the legislature shall establish the Washington civil liberties public
education program. The program provides grants for the purpose of
establishing a legacy of remembrance as part of a continuing process of
recovery from the World War II exclusion and detention of individuals
of Japanese ancestry. The program is created to do one or both of the
following:
(((1))) (a) Educate the public regarding the history and the
lessons of the World War II exclusion, removal, and detention of
persons of Japanese ancestry through the development, coordination, and
distribution of new educational materials and the development of
curriculum materials to complement and augment resources currently
available on this subject matter; and
(((2))) (b) Develop videos, plays, presentations, speaker bureaus,
and exhibitions for presentation to elementary schools, secondary
schools, community colleges, and to other interested parties.
(2) This section is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.300.410 and 2000 c 210 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate grants
under the program established in RCW 28A.300.390 through 28A.300.415
from private donations or within amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose. The grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may contract with
independent review panelists and establish an advisory panel to
evaluate and make recommendations to the superintendent of public
instruction based on grant applications.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select grant
recipients from applicants who meet all of the following criteria:
(a) The capability to administer and complete the proposed project
within specified deadlines and within the specified budget;
(b) The experience, knowledge, and qualifications necessary to
conduct quality educational activities regarding the exclusion and
detention of Japanese-Americans during World War II;
(c) Projects that relate the Japanese-American exclusion and
detention experience with civil rights included in the Declaration of
Independence and the Constitution so that this event may be illuminated
and understood in order to prevent similar violations of civil rights
in the future;
(d) Projects that are designed to maximize the long-term
educational impact of this chapter;
(e) Projects that build upon, contribute to, and expand upon the
existing body of educational and research materials on the exclusion
and detention of Japanese-Americans during World War II; and
(f) Projects that include the variety of experiences regarding the
exclusion and detention of Japanese-Americans and its impact before,
during, and after World War II including those Japanese-Americans who
served in the military and those who were interned in department of
justice camps.
(4) Applicants for grants under the program are encouraged to do
each of the following:
(a) Involve former detainees, those excluded from the military
area, and their descendants in the development and implementation of
projects;
(b) Develop a strategy and plan for raising the level of awareness
and understanding among the American public regarding the exclusion and
detention of Japanese-Americans during World War II so that the causes
and circumstances of this and similar events may be illuminated and
understood;
(c) Develop a strategy and plan for reaching the broad,
multicultural population through project activities;
(d) Develop local and regional consortia of organizations and
individuals engaged in similar educational, research, and development
efforts;
(e) Coordinate and collaborate with organizations and individuals
engaging in similar educational, research, and development endeavors to
maximize the effect of grants;
(f) Utilize creative and innovative methods and approaches in the
research, development, and implementation of their projects;
(g) Seek matching funds, in-kind contributions, or other sources of
support to supplement their proposal;
(h) Use a variety of media, including new technology, and the arts
to creatively and strategically appeal to a broad audience while
enhancing and enriching community-based educational efforts;
(i) Include in the grant application, scholarly inquiry related to
the variety of experiences and impact of the exclusion and detention of
persons of Japanese ancestry during World War II; and
(j) Add relevant materials to or catalogue relevant materials in
libraries and other repositories for the creation, publication, and
distribution of bibliographies, curriculum guides, oral histories, and
other resource directories and supporting the continued development of
scholarly work on this subject by making a broad range of archival,
library, and research materials more accessible to the American public.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt other
criteria as it deems appropriate for its review of grant proposals. In
reviewing projects for funding, scoring shall be based on an evaluation
of all application materials including narratives, attachments, support
letters, supplementary materials, and other materials that may be
requested of applicants.
(6)(a) In the review process, the superintendent of public
instruction shall assign the following order of priority to the
criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section:
(i) Subsection (3)(a) through (d) of this section, inclusive, shall
be given highest priority; and
(ii) Subsection (3)(e) ((through [and])) and (f) of this section,
inclusive, shall be given second priority.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall consider the
overall breadth and variety of the field of applicants to determine the
projects that would best fulfill its program and mission. Final grant
awards may be for the full amount of the grant requests or for a
portion of the grant request.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall determine the
types of applicants eligible to apply for grants under this program.
(8) The office may accept gifts, grants, or endowments from public
or private sources for the program and may spend any gifts, grants, or
endowments or income from public or private sources according to their
terms.
(9) Except to the extent private funds are available, this section
is suspended until July 1, 2011.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.300.455 and 2007 c 459 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 30, 2004, the financial literacy public-private
partnership shall adopt a definition of financial literacy to be used
in educational efforts.
(2) ((By June 30, 2009,)) Beginning July 1, 2011, the financial
literacy public-private partnership shall identify strategies to
increase the financial literacy of public school students in our state.
To the extent funds are available, strategies to be considered by the
partnership shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Identifying and making available to school districts:
(i) Important financial literacy skills and knowledge;
(ii) Ways in which teachers at different grade levels may integrate
financial literacy in mathematics, social studies, and other course
content areas;
(iii) Instructional materials and programs, including schoolwide
programs, that include the important financial literacy skills and
knowledge;
(iv) Assessments and other outcome measures that schools and
communities may use to determine whether students are financially
literate; and
(v) Other strategies for expanding and increasing the quality of
financial literacy instruction in public schools, including
professional development for teachers;
(b) Developing a structure and set of operating principles for the
financial literacy public-private partnership to assist interested
school districts in improving the financial literacy of their students
by providing such things as financial literacy instructional materials
and professional development; and
(c) Providing a report to the governor, the house and senate
financial institutions and education committees of the legislature, the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and
education stakeholder groups, on the results of work of the financial
literacy public-private partnership. An interim report shall be
submitted to the same parties by June 30, 2007, with a final report by
June 30, ((2009)) 2013.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.320.128 and 2002 c 206 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((By September 1, 2003,)) Each school district board of
directors shall ((adopt a)) have a policy that addresses ((the
following issues:
(a))) procedures for providing notice of threats of violence or
harm to the student or school employee who is the subject of the
threat. The policy shall define "threats of violence or harm((";
(b) Procedures for disclosing information that is provided to the
school administrators about a student's conduct, including but not
limited to the student's prior disciplinary records, official juvenile
court records, and history of violence, to classroom teachers, school
staff, and school security who, in the judgment of the principal,
should be notified; and
(c) Procedures for determining whether or not any threats or
conduct established in the policy may be grounds for suspension or
expulsion of the student.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
educators and representatives of law enforcement, classified staff, and
organizations with expertise in violence prevention and intervention,
shall adopt a model policy that includes the issues listed in
subsection (1) of this section by January 1, 2003. The model policy
shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's web site.
The school districts, in drafting their own policies, shall review the
model policy))."
(((3))) (2) School districts, school district boards of directors,
school officials, and school employees providing notice in good faith
as required and consistent with the board's policies adopted under this
section are immune from any liability arising out of such notification.
(((4))) (3) A person who intentionally and in bad faith or
maliciously, knowingly makes a false notification of a threat under
this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.230.150 (Temperance and Good Citizenship Day -- Aids in
programming) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.090;
(2) RCW 28A.300.280 (Conflict resolution program) and 1994 sp.s. c
7 s 611; and
(3) RCW 28A.320.185 (School gardens or farms) and 2008 c 215 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 5 through 7 of this act expire
July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 10 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---