BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature declares that the growth
of patient and family-centered primary care medical homes throughout
the state is desirable and an important strategy to improve quality of
care, particularly for those with chronic conditions, and to achieve
long-term cost reductions. The current largely fee-for-service payment
system for primary care undervalues that care, is ineffective in
supporting medical homes, and serves as a barrier in their development.
Creation of pilot projects to test the most promising alternative
reimbursement approaches is an appropriate strategy in search of a
payment system that supports primary care medical homes.
(2) The legislature declares that collaboration among public
payors, private health carriers, third-party purchasers, and providers
to identify appropriate reimbursement methods to align incentives in
support of primary care medical homes is in the best interest of the
public. The legislature therefore intends to exempt from state
antitrust laws, and to provide immunity from federal antitrust laws
through the state action doctrine, for activities undertaken pursuant
to pilots designed and implemented under section 2 of this act that
might otherwise be constrained by such laws. The legislature does not
intend and does not authorize any person or entity to engage in
activities or to conspire to engage in activities that would constitute
per se violations of state and federal antitrust laws including, but
not limited to, agreements among competing health care providers or
health carriers as to the price or specific level of reimbursement for
health care services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
The health care authority and the department of social and health
services shall design, oversee implementation, and evaluate one or more
primary care medical home reimbursement pilot projects in the state to
include as participants public payors, private health carriers, third-party purchasers, and health care providers. Based on input from
participants, the agencies shall:
(1) Determine the number and location of primary care medical home
reimbursement pilots;
(2) Determine criteria to select primary care clinics to serve as
pilot sites to facilitate testing of medical home reimbursement methods
in a variety of primary care settings;
(3) Select pilot sites from those primary care provider clinics
that currently employ a number of activities and functions typically
associated with medical homes, or from sites that have been selected by
the department of health to participate in a medical home collaborative
under section 2, chapter 295, Laws of 2008;
(4) Determine one or more reimbursement methods to be tested by the
pilots;
(5) Identify pilot performance measures for clinical quality,
chronic care management, cost, and patient experience through patient
self-reporting; and
(6) Appropriately coordinate during planning and operation of the
pilots with the department of health medical home collaboratives and
with other private and public efforts to promote adoption of medical
homes within the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---