BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.190 and 2006 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased health care
program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall substitute, where
identified, a preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given
therapeutic class, unless the endorsing practitioner has indicated on
the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
antidepressant, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive
drug, or for the refill of a immunomodulator/antiviral treatment for
hepatitis C for which an established, fixed duration of therapy is
prescribed for at least twenty-four weeks but no more than forty-eight
weeks, in which case the pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed
nonpreferred drug.
(((2))) (b) When a substitution is made under (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), the dispensing pharmacist shall
notify the prescribing practitioner of the specific drug and dose
dispensed.
(2)(a) A state purchased health care program may impose limited
restrictions on an endorsing practitioner's authority to write a
prescription to dispense as written only under the following
circumstances:
(i) There is statistical or clear data demonstrating the endorsing
practitioner's frequency of prescribing dispensed as written for
nonpreferred drugs varies significantly from the prescribing patterns
of his or her peers;
(ii) The medical director of a state purchased health program has:
(A) Presented the endorsing practitioner with data that indicates the
endorsing practitioner's prescribing patterns vary significantly from
his or her peers, (B) provided the endorsing practitioner an
opportunity to explain the variation in his or her prescribing patterns
to those of his or her peers, and (C) if the variation in prescribing
patterns cannot be explained, provided the endorsing practitioner
sufficient time to change his or her prescribing patterns to align with
those of his or her peers; and
(iii) The restrictions imposed under (a) of this subsection (2)
must be limited to the extent possible to reduce variation in
prescribing patterns and shall remain in effect only until such time as
the endorsing practitioner can demonstrate a reduction in variation in
line with his or her peers.
(b) A state purchased health care program may immediately designate
an available, less expensive generic product in a previously reviewed
drug class as a preferred drug, without first submitting the product to
review by the pharmacy and therapeutics committee established pursuant
to RCW 70.14.050.
(c) Subject to the refill provisions in subsection (1)(a) of this
section, for a patient's first course of treatment within a therapeutic
class of drugs, a state purchased health care program may impose
limited restrictions on endorsing practitioners' authority to write a
prescription to dispense as written, only under the following
circumstances:
(i) There is a less expensive therapeutic alternative generic
product available to treat the condition;
(ii) The drug use review board established under WAC 388-530-4000
reviews and provides recommendations as to the appropriateness of the
limitation;
(iii) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in (c)(ii) of this
subsection, the endorsing practitioner shall have an opportunity to
request as medically necessary, as defined in WAC 388-501-0165(3), that
the brand name drug be prescribed as the first course of treatment;
(iv) The state purchased health care program may provide, where
available, prescription, emergency room, diagnosis, and hospitalization
history with the endorsing practitioner; and
(v) Specifically for antipsychotic restrictions, the state
purchased health care program shall effectively guide good practice
without interfering with the timeliness of clinical decision making.
(d) If, within a therapeutic class, there is a therapeutic
alternative over-the-counter drug available, a state purchased health
care program may designate the over-the-counter drug as the preferred
drug.
(e) A state purchased health care program may impose limited
restrictions on endorsing practitioners' authority to prescribe
pharmaceuticals to be dispensed as written for a purpose outside the
scope of their approved labels only under the following circumstances:
(i) There is a less expensive on label product available to treat
the condition;
(ii) The drug use review board established under WAC 388-530-4000
reviews and provides recommendations as to the appropriateness of the
limitation; and
(iii) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in (e)(ii) of this
subsection, the endorsing practitioner shall have an opportunity to
request as medically necessary, as defined in WAC 388-501-0165(3), that
the drug be prescribed for an off-label purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---