BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.68.015 and 2007 c 234 s 47 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to corporations or persons, their
lessees, trustees, receivers, or trustees appointed by any court
whatsoever insofar as they own, control, operate, or manage taxicabs,
hotel buses, school buses, or any other carrier that does not come
within the term "auto transportation company" as defined in RCW
81.68.010.
This chapter does not apply to persons operating motor vehicles
when operated wholly within the limits of incorporated cities or towns,
and for a distance not exceeding three road miles beyond the corporate
limits of the city or town in Washington in which the original starting
point of the vehicle is located, and which operation either alone or in
conjunction with another vehicle or vehicles is not a part of any
journey beyond the three-mile limit.
This chapter does not apply to commuter ride sharing or ride
sharing for persons with special transportation needs in accordance
with RCW 46.74.010, so long as the ride-sharing operation does not
compete with or infringe upon comparable service actually being
provided before the initiation of the ride-sharing operation by an
existing auto transportation company certificated under this chapter.
This chapter does not apply to a service carrying passengers for
compensation over any public highway in this state between fixed
termini or over a regular route if the commission finds, with or
without a hearing, that the service does not serve an essential
transportation purpose, is solely for recreation, and would not
adversely affect the operations of the holder of a certificate under
this chapter, and that exemption from this chapter is otherwise in the
public interest. Companies providing these services must, however,
obtain a permit under chapter 81.70 RCW.
This chapter does not apply to a service carrying passengers for
compensation over any public highway in this state between fixed
termini or over a regular route if the commission finds, with or
without a hearing, that the service is provided pursuant to a contract
with a state agency, or funded by a grant issued by the department of
transportation, and that exemption from this chapter is otherwise in
the public interest. Companies providing these services must, however,
obtain a permit under chapter 81.70 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.84.010 and 2007 c 234 s 92 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commercial ferry may not operate any vessel or ferry for the
public use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular route upon
the waters within this state, including the rivers and lakes and Puget
Sound, without first applying for and obtaining from the commission a
certificate declaring that public convenience and necessity require
such operation. Service authorized by certificates issued ((before or
after July 25, 1993,)) to a commercial ferry operator must be exercised
by the operator in a manner consistent with the conditions established
in the certificate ((or)) and tariff((s)) filed under chapter 81.28
RCW. However, a certificate is not required for a vessel primarily
engaged in transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross
earnings from the transportation of passengers or vehicles, or both,
are not more than ten percent of the total gross annual earnings of
such vessel.
(2) If the commission finds, with or without a hearing, that an
existing or a proposed commercial ferry service does not serve an
essential transportation purpose and is solely for recreation, the
commission may, by order, exempt that service from the requirements of
certification and regulation under this chapter. If the nonessential
service is a proposed service not already provided by an existing
certificate holder, the commission must also find, after notice to any
existing certificate holder operating within the same territory and an
opportunity to be heard, that the proposed service would not adversely
affect the rates or services of any existing certificate holder.
(3) This section does not affect the right of any county public
transportation benefit area or other public agency within this state to
construct, condemn, purchase, operate, or maintain, itself or by
contract, agreement, or lease, with any person, firm, or corporation,
ferries or boats across the waters within this state, including rivers
and lakes and Puget Sound, if the operation is not over the same route
or between the same districts being served by a certificate holder
without first acquiring the rights granted to the certificate holder
under the certificate.
(((2))) (4) The holder of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity granted under this chapter must initiate service within five
years of obtaining the certificate, except that the holder of a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for passenger-only
ferry service in Puget Sound must initiate service within twenty months
of obtaining the certificate. The certificate holder shall report to
the commission every six months after the certificate is granted on the
progress of the certificated route. The reports shall include, but not
be limited to, the progress of environmental impact, parking, local
government land use, docking, and financing considerations. Except in
the case of passenger-only ferry service in Puget Sound, if service has
not been initiated within five years of obtaining the certificate, the
commission may extend the certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to
three years if the six-month progress reports indicate there is
significant advancement toward initiating service.

Sec. 3 RCW 81.66.010 and 1996 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Corporation" means a corporation, company, association, or
joint stock association.
(2) "Person" means an individual, firm, or a copartnership.
(3) "Private, nonprofit transportation provider" means any private,
nonprofit corporation providing transportation services for
compensation solely to persons with special transportation needs,
pursuant to a contract with a state agency, or funded by a grant issued
by the department of transportation.
(4) "Persons with special transportation needs" means those
persons, including their personal attendants, who because of physical
or mental disability, income status, or age are unable to transport
themselves or to purchase appropriate transportation.

Sec. 4 RCW 81.70.220 and 1989 c 163 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the business of a charter party carrier
or excursion service carrier of persons over any public highway without
first having obtained a certificate from the commission to do so or
having registered as an interstate carrier.
(2) An auto transportation company carrying passengers for
compensation over any public highway in this state between fixed
termini or over a regular route that is not required to hold an auto
transportation certificate because of a commission finding under RCW
81.68.015 must obtain a certificate under this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.74.010 and 1997 c 250 s 8 and 1997 c 95 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(1) "Commuter ride sharing" means a car pool or van pool
arrangement whereby one or more fixed groups not exceeding fifteen
persons each including the drivers, and (a) not fewer than five persons
including the drivers, or (b) not fewer than four persons including the
drivers where at least two of those persons are confined to wheelchairs
when riding, are transported in a passenger motor vehicle with a gross
vehicle weight not exceeding ten thousand pounds, excluding special
rider equipment, between their places of abode or termini near such
places, and their places of employment or educational or other
institutions, each group in a single daily round trip where the drivers
are also on the way to or from their places of employment or
educational or other institution.
(2) "Flexible commuter ride sharing" means a car pool or van pool
arrangement whereby a group of at least two but not exceeding fifteen
persons including the driver is transported in a passenger motor
vehicle with a gross vehicle weight not exceeding ten thousand pounds,
excluding special rider equipment, between their places of abode or
termini near such places, and their places of employment or educational
or other institutions, where the driver is also on the way to or from
his or her place of employment or educational or other institution.
(3) "Ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs"
means an arrangement whereby a group of persons with special
transportation needs, and their attendants, is transported by a public
social service agency or a private, nonprofit transportation provider,
as defined in RCW 81.66.010(3), serving persons with special needs, in
a passenger motor vehicle as defined by the department to include small
buses, cutaways, and modified vans not more than twenty-eight feet
long: PROVIDED, That the driver need not be a person with special
transportation needs.
(4) "Ride-sharing operator" means the person, entity, or concern,
not necessarily the driver, responsible for the existence and
continuance of commuter ride sharing, flexible commuter ride sharing,
or ride sharing for persons with special transportation needs. The
term "ride-sharing operator" includes but is not limited to an
employer, an employer's agent, an employer-organized association, a
state agency, a county, a city, a public transportation benefit area,
or any other political subdivision that owns or leases a ride-sharing
vehicle.
(5) "Ride-sharing promotional activities" means those activities
involved in forming a commuter ride-sharing arrangement or a flexible
commuter ride-sharing arrangement, including but not limited to
receiving information from existing and prospective ride-sharing
participants, sharing that information with other existing and
prospective ride-sharing participants, matching those persons with
other existing or prospective ride-sharing participants, and making
assignments of persons to ride-sharing arrangements.
(6) "Persons with special transportation needs" means those persons
defined in RCW 81.66.010(4).

--- END ---