BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of consumer education for home construction is
created in the office of the attorney general.
(2) The office of consumer education for home construction shall
examine issues involved in establishing a recovery fund to provide
compensation to residential real property homeowners through a claim
filing process. The office of consumer education for home construction
shall consult with appropriate agencies and representatives from
organizations involved in the area of residential construction. The
office of consumer education for home construction shall make
recommendations to the legislature on the creation of a recovery fund
by December 1, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.27.075 and 2001 c 159 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall charge a fee of one hundred dollars for
issuing or renewing a certificate of registration during the 2001-2003
biennium. The department shall revise this amount at least once every
two years for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as reflected
by the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW.
(2) The department shall also charge a consumer education fee of
one hundred dollars per year for issuing or renewing a certificate of
registration. The department shall deposit the fee in the consumer
education for home construction account created in section 3 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The consumer education for home construction account is created in
the custody of the state treasury for the purpose of funding the office
of consumer education for home construction. All fees charged under
RCW 18.27.075(2) and filing fees charged under section 9 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only to fund the office of consumer education for home
construction. Only the home construction board created under section
7 of this act or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c 128 s 20, and
2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, the consumer education for home
construction account, and the reading achievement account. However,
the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation
to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008 c
128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the Washington
state heritage center account, the reduced cigarette ignition
propensity account, the consumer education for home construction
account, and the reading achievement account. However, the earnings to
be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of sections 7 through 12 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Board" means the home construction board created in section 7
of this act.
(2) "Claim" means a claim filed with the board against a
construction professional under section 9 of this act and does not mean
a complaint as that term is used in section 1 of this act.
(3) "Construction professional" has the same meaning as in section
15 of this act.
(4) "Contractor" means a contractor, as defined in RCW 18.27.010,
that is registered with the department of labor and industries under
chapter 18.27 RCW.
(5) "Damages" means the cost of repairs, or if the cost of repairs
is clearly disproportionate to the loss in market value, damages is the
loss in market value.
(6) "Defect" means a deficiency, an inadequacy, or an insufficiency
arising out of or relating to the construction, alteration, or repair
of residential real property. "Defect" also includes a deficiency, an
inadequacy, or an insufficiency in a system, component, or material
incorporated into residential real property.
(7) "Homeowner" means a person or persons owning residential real
property. "Homeowner" does not include government agencies, political
subdivisions, financial institutions, and any other entity that
purchases, guarantees, or insures a loan secured by real property.
"Homeowner" also does not include the spouse, domestic partner, or
personal representative of the contractor named in the claim filed
under section 9 of this act.
(8) "Residential real property" has the same meaning as in section
15 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The home construction board is established within the office of
consumer education for home construction to administer a residential
real property homeowner and construction professional early resolution
mediation program.
(2) The purpose of the board is to provide homeowners and
construction professionals with a cost-effective and time efficient
process to resolve disputes arising from alleged construction.
(3) The board consists of the following seven members:
(a) Three members possessing a minimum of ten years of experience
in the construction of residences and directly, or as employees or
officers of a firm, registered under chapter 18.27 RCW;
(b) One member possessing a minimum of ten years of experience in
the remodeling of residences and directly, or as employees or officers
of a firm, registered under chapter 18.27 RCW;
(c) One architect licensed under chapter 18.08 RCW or professional
engineer registered under chapter 18.43 RCW;
(d) One building inspector employed by a city or county; and
(e) One member of the general public.
(4) Members of the board shall be appointed by the governor with
consent of the senate. The governor shall appoint initial members of
the board to staggered terms of from two to four years. Thereafter,
all members shall be appointed to full four-year terms. Members of the
board hold office until their successors are appointed. A vacancy
shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired
portion of the term in which the vacancy occurs.
(5) The board shall select from its members a chair person, vice-chair person, and any other officer the board determines is necessary
to perform its duties.
(6) The board shall meet a minimum of four times per year to carry
out its functions.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement the board's duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board shall investigate and mediate claims filed by a
homeowner against a construction professional for alleged construction
defects to residential real property.
(2) The board may use the services of neutral third-party experts
to assist the board in investigating, assessing, and mediating claims.
The board may rely on the national building standards and other
recognized standards or codes that the board finds appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A homeowner of residential real property alleging that a
construction professional has performed defective work must, prior to
commencing an action against the construction professional, file a
claim against the construction professional with the board.
(2) The claim shall be in the form required by the board, and shall
include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and mailing address of the homeowner or the
homeowner's legal representative, if any;
(b) The address and location of the residential real property;
(c) The names and addresses of the construction professionals, to
the extent known to the homeowner, who performed the work;
(d) Whether the work performed involved construction of new
residential real property or a substantial remodel of residential real
property and the date that the homeowner took possession of the new
residential real property or, for a substantial remodel, the date the
work was substantially completed or the project was terminated;
(e) A description of the defective work performed and the actual or
estimated costs of repair;
(f) Any report, estimates, and other documents evidencing the
defect and the costs of repair;
(g) Whether there is a written contract between the construction
professional and the homeowner and whether the contract contains
warranties related to the work performed or the materials used.
(3) The board may not process a claim against a construction
professional unless the claim is filed with the board within the
applicable statute of limitations.
(4) When a claim is filed with the board within the applicable
statute of limitations, the filing of the claim tolls any applicable
statute of limitations and any applicable statute of repose for
construction-related claims for the period of time until fifteen days
after the board provides written notice of completion of mediation.
(5) Any action commenced in court by a homeowner prior to
compliance with the requirements of this section shall be subject to
dismissal without prejudice, and may not be recommenced until the
homeowner has complied with the requirements of this section.
(6) The board by rule may impose a processing fee for claims filed
under this section not to exceed one hundred dollars. The fee shall be
deposited into the consumer education for home construction account
created under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a claim, the board shall give written notice to
the construction professional against whom the claim is made. The
notice of the claim shall describe the claim in reasonable detail
sufficient to determine the nature of the defect.
(2) Within twenty-one days after service of the notice of claim,
the construction professional shall serve a written response on the
homeowner by registered mail or personal service. The written response
shall:
(a) Propose to inspect the residence that is the subject of the
claim and to complete the inspection within a specified time frame.
The proposal shall include the statement that the construction
professional shall, based on the inspection, offer to remedy the
defect, compromise by payment, or dispute the claim;
(b) Offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary payment
without inspection. A construction professional's offer under this
subsection (2)(b) to compromise and settle a homeowner's claim may
include, but is not limited to, an express offer to purchase the
homeowner's residence that is the subject of the claim, and to pay the
homeowner's reasonable relocation costs; or
(c) State that the construction professional disputes the claim and
will neither remedy the defect nor compromise and settle the claim.
(3)(a) If the construction professional disputes the claim or does
not respond to the notice of claim within the time stated in subsection
(2) of this section, the board shall commence an investigation and
mediation of the claim.
(b) If the homeowner rejects the inspection proposal or the
settlement offer made by the construction professional pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, the homeowner shall serve written
notice of the rejection on the construction professional and the board.
After service of the rejection, the board shall commence an
investigation and mediation of the claim.
(c) If the construction professional has not received from the
homeowner, within thirty days after the homeowner's receipt of the
construction professional's response, either an acceptance or rejection
of the inspection proposal or settlement offer, then at anytime
thereafter the construction professional may terminate the proposal or
offer by serving written notice to the homeowner, and the board shall
commence an investigation and mediation of the claim.
(4)(a) If the homeowner elects to allow the construction
professional to inspect in accordance with the construction
professional's proposal pursuant to this section, the homeowner shall
provide the construction professional and its contractors or other
agents reasonable access to the homeowner's residence during normal
working hours to inspect the premises and the claimed defect.
(b) Within fourteen days following completion of the inspection,
the construction professional shall serve on the homeowner:
(i) A written offer to remedy the defect at no cost to the
homeowner, including a report of the scope of the inspection, the
findings and results of the inspection, a description of the additional
construction necessary to remedy the defect, and a timetable for the
completion of such construction;
(ii) A written offer to compromise and settle the claim by monetary
payment pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; or
(iii) A written statement that the construction professional will
not proceed further to remedy the defect.
(c) If the construction professional does not proceed further to
remedy the defect within the agreed timetable, or if the construction
professional fails to comply with the provisions of (b) of this
subsection, the homeowner shall provide written notification to the
board. The board shall commence an investigation and mediation of the
claim.
(d) If the homeowner rejects the offer made by the construction
professional pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection to either
remedy the defect or to compromise and settle the claim by monetary
payment, the homeowner shall serve written notice of the rejection on
the construction professional and the board. After service of the
rejection notice, the board shall commence an investigation and
mediation of the claim.
(e) If the construction professional has not received from the
homeowner, within thirty days after the homeowner's receipt of the
construction professional's response, either an acceptance or rejection
of the offer made pursuant to (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, then
at anytime thereafter the construction professional may terminate the
offer by serving written notice to the homeowner.
(5)(a) Any homeowner accepting the offer of a construction
professional to remedy the defect pursuant to subsection (4)(b)(i) of
this section shall do so by serving the construction professional with
a written notice of acceptance within a reasonable time period after
receipt of the offer, and no later than thirty days after receipt of
the offer. The homeowner shall also send a copy of the written notice
of acceptance to the board. The homeowner shall provide the
construction professional and its contractors or other agents
reasonable access to the homeowner's residence during normal working
hours to perform and complete the construction by the timetable stated
in the offer.
(b) The homeowner and construction professional may, by written
mutual agreement, alter the extent of construction or the timetable for
completion of construction stated in the offer including, but not
limited to, repair of additional defects.
(6) Compliance with this section satisfies the requirements of RCW
64.50.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If after compliance with the procedures established in section
10 of this act, a resolution has not been reached between the homeowner
and construction professional, the board shall investigate the claim.
(2) The board may use the services of neutral third-party experts
to conduct on-site investigations, make recommendations to the board,
and assist the board in investigating and mediating claims.
(3) After the investigation is complete, the board shall provide
the parties with notification of the findings of the investigation. If
the parties do not provide the board with written notification within
fourteen days after receipt of the findings that the parties have
resolved the claim, the board shall mediate the claim.
(4) The mediation shall be conducted by a panel of three members of
the board in accordance with rules adopted by the board.
(5) All proceedings of the mediation conference, including any
statement made by any party, attorney or other participant, shall be
privileged and not reported, recorded, placed in evidence, used for
impeachment, made known to a court or jury, or construed for any
purpose as an admission. No party shall be bound by anything done or
said at the mediation conference unless a settlement is reached, in
which event the agreement upon a settlement shall be reduced to writing
and shall be binding upon all parties to that agreement.
(6) At the conclusion of the mediation, the board shall provide a
written notice of the completion of mediation to the parties. The
notice shall include a statement of the results of the mediation and a
copy of any written settlement agreement between the parties. If the
parties did not reach an agreement, the notice shall include a
statement that the parties may pursue any other right or remedy
provided by statutory or common law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall maintain and make available to the office of
consumer education for home construction a record of all claims filed
with the board against construction professionals under this chapter
and the outcomes of those claims.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of RCW 64.50.020 do not apply to a claim filed with
the home construction board under sections 9 through 11 of this act.

PART II. RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY WARRANTIES,
LEGAL REMEDIES, AND THIRD-PARTY INSPECTIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends by this section to modify the common
law implied warranty of habitability to provide that this warranty may
not be contractually disclaimed, waived, modified, or limited. The
legislature does not intend to modify any other aspect of the common
law implied warranty of habitability as developed through case law.
(2) The common law implied warranty of habitability may not be
disclaimed, waived, modified, or limited by contractual agreement. A
provision of any contract for the purchase or sale of newly constructed
residential property that purports to disclaim, waive, modify, or limit
the implied warranty of habitability is void and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A construction professional involved in the construction of new
residential real property, or the substantial remodel of existing
residential real property, warrants that the work, and any part
thereof, will be suitable for the ordinary uses of real property of its
type and that the work will be:
(a) Free from defective materials;
(b) Constructed in accordance with sound engineering and
construction standards;
(c) Constructed in a work-like manner; and
(d) Constructed in compliance with all laws then applicable to the
improvements.
(2) If a construction professional breaches a warranty arising
under this section and the breach results in damage to any portion of
the residential real property, the current owner of the residential
real property may bring a cause of action for damages against the
construction professional. Absence of privity of contract between the
owner and the construction professional is not a defense to the
enforcement of a warranty arising under this section.
(3) In a judicial proceeding for breach of a warranty arising under
this section, the plaintiff must show that the alleged breach has
adversely affected or will adversely affect the performance of that
portion of the property alleged to be in breach. To establish an
adverse effect, the person alleging the breach is not required to prove
that the breach renders the property unfit for occupancy. As used in
this subsection, "adverse effect" must be more than technical and must
be significant to a reasonable person.
(4) Proof of breach of a warranty arising under this section is not
proof of damages. Damages awarded for a breach of a warranty arising
under this section are the cost of repairs. However, if it is
established that the cost of repairs is clearly disproportionate to the
loss in market value caused by the breach, damages are limited to the
loss in market value.
(5)(a) A judicial proceeding for breach of a warranty arising under
this section must be commenced within four years after the cause of
action accrues. This period may not be reduced by either oral or
written agreement, or through the use of contractual claims or notice
procedures that require the filing or service of any claim or notice
prior to the expiration of the period specified in this section.
(b) Except as provided under (c) of this subsection, a judicial
proceeding for breach of a warranty arising under this section accrues,
regardless of the owner's lack of knowledge of the breach:
(i) In the case of the purchase of newly constructed residential
real property, on the date the initial owner enters into possession of
the property; or
(ii) In the case of the substantial remodel of existing residential
real property, on the date of substantial completion of construction or
termination of the construction project, whichever is later.
(c) A cause of action for breach of a warranty arising under this
section that is based on a latent structural defect or a latent water
penetration defect accrues when the claimant discovers or reasonably
should have discovered the latent structural defect or latent water
penetration defect.
(d) An action for breach of warranty under this section is subject
to the time limitations provided in RCW 4.16.310.
(6) If a written notice of claim is served under RCW 64.50.020
within the time prescribed for the filing of an action under this
section, the statute of limitations in this section and any applicable
statute of repose for construction-related claims are tolled until
sixty days after the period of time during which the filing of an
action is barred under RCW 64.50.020.
(7) The warranties provided under this section are in addition to
any other rights or remedies available under statutory law or common
law or provided for under contract. The warranties provided under this
section may not be waived, disclaimed, modified, or limited.
(8) In a judicial proceeding under this section, the court may
award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the prevailing party.
(9) This section is not intended to create an independent right to
maintain a class action against any construction professional.
(10) This section does not apply to condominiums subject to chapter
64.34 RCW.
(11) This section does not affect the application of the notice and
opportunity to cure requirements and procedures imposed under RCW
64.50.010 through 64.50.050.
(12) An action for breach of a warranty created under this section
is subject to any requirements for mandatory arbitration imposed under
chapter 7.06 RCW or state or local court rules.
(13) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Construction professional" means an architect, builder,
builder vendor, contractor, subcontractor, engineer, or inspector,
performing or furnishing the design, supervision, inspection,
construction, or observation of the construction, of any improvement to
residential real property, whether operating as a sole proprietor,
partnership, corporation, or other business entity. "Construction
professional" does not include a supplier of materials who has
otherwise had no involvement in performing or furnishing the design,
supervision, inspection, construction, or observation of the
construction, of any improvement to residential real property.
(b) "Residential real property" means a single-family home, a
duplex, a triplex, or a quadraplex.
(c) "Substantial completion of construction" means the state of
completion reached when an improvement upon real property may be used
or occupied for its intended use.

Sec. 16 RCW 4.16.310 and 2002 c 323 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All claims or causes of action as set forth in RCW 4.16.300
shall accrue, and the applicable statute of limitation shall begin to
run only during the period within six years after substantial
completion of construction, or during the period within six years after
the termination of the services enumerated in RCW 4.16.300, whichever
is later. The phrase "substantial completion of construction" shall
mean the state of completion reached when an improvement upon real
property may be used or occupied for its intended use. Any cause of
action which has not accrued within six years after such substantial
completion of construction, or within six years after such termination
of services, whichever is later, shall be barred: PROVIDED, That this
limitation shall not be asserted as a defense by any owner, tenant or
other person in possession and control of the improvement at the time
such cause of action accrues. The limitations prescribed in this
section apply to all claims or causes of action as set forth in RCW
4.16.300 brought in the name or for the benefit of the state which are
made or commenced after June 11, 1986.
If a written notice is filed under RCW 64.50.020 within the time
prescribed for the filing of an action under this chapter, the period
of time during which the filing of an action is barred under RCW
64.50.020 plus sixty days shall not be a part of the period limited for
the commencement of an action, nor for the application of this section.
(2) Actions and claims for fraud arising from including, but not
limited to, construction, alteration, repair, design, planning, survey,
and the engineering of improvements upon real property are not subject
to the time limitations under subsection (1) of this section. Such
actions and claims are governed under RCW 4.16.080.

Sec. 17 RCW 64.50.010 and 2002 c 323 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Action" means any civil lawsuit or action in contract or tort
for damages or indemnity brought against a construction professional to
assert a claim, whether by complaint, counterclaim, or cross-claim, for
damage or the loss of use of real or personal property caused by a
defect in the construction of a residence or in the substantial remodel
of a residence. "Action" does not include any civil action in tort
alleging personal injury or wrongful death to a person or persons
resulting from a construction defect.
(2) "Association" means an association, master association, or
subassociation as defined and provided for in RCW 64.34.020(4),
64.34.276, 64.34.278, and 64.38.010(1).
(3) "Building enclosure" has the same meaning as in RCW 64.55.010.
(4) "Building enclosure design documents" has the same meaning as
in RCW 64.55.010.
(5) "Claimant" means a homeowner or association who asserts a claim
against a construction professional concerning a defect in the
construction of a residence or in the substantial remodel of a
residence.
(((4))) (6) "Construction professional" means an architect,
builder, builder vendor, contractor, subcontractor, engineer, or
inspector, including, but not limited to, a dealer as defined in RCW
64.34.020(((12))) (13) and a declarant as defined in RCW
64.34.020(((13))) (14), performing or furnishing the design,
supervision, inspection, construction, or observation of the
construction of any improvement to real property, whether operating as
a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other business entity.
(((5))) (7) "Homeowner" means: (a) Any person, company, firm,
partnership, corporation, or association who contracts with a
construction professional for the construction, sale, or construction
and sale of a residence; and (b) an "association" as defined in this
section. "Homeowner" includes, but is not limited to, a subsequent
purchaser of a residence from any homeowner.
(((6))) (8) "Qualified building inspector" has the same meaning as
in RCW 64.55.010.
(9) "Residence" means a building, including a single-family house,
duplex, triplex, quadraplex, or a unit in a multiunit residential
structure in which title to each individual unit is transferred to the
owner under a condominium or cooperative system, and shall include
common elements as defined in RCW 64.34.020(6) and common areas as
defined in RCW 64.38.010(4).
(((7))) (10) "Serve" or "service" means personal service or
delivery by certified mail to the last known address of the addressee.
(((8))) (11) "Stamped" has the same meaning as in RCW 64.55.010.
(12) "Substantial remodel" means a remodel of a residence, for
which the total cost exceeds one-half of the assessed value of the
residence for property tax purposes at the time the contract for the
remodel work was made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person applying for a building permit for construction of
a residential building or substantial remodel shall submit building
enclosure design documents to the appropriate building department prior
to the start of construction or substantial remodel. If construction
work on a building is not a substantial remodel because the cost of
thereof does not exceed one-half of the assessed value of the residence
for property tax purposes at the time the contract for the remodel work
was made, the person applying for a building permit shall submit to the
building department a letter so certifying. Any changes to the
building enclosure design documents that alter the manner in which the
building or its components is waterproofed, weatherproofed, and
otherwise protected from water or moisture intrusion must be stamped by
the architect or engineer and must be provided to the building
department and to the person conducting the course of construction
inspection in a timely manner to permit such person to inspect for
compliance therewith, and may be provided through individual updates,
cumulative updates, or as-built updates.
(2) The building department shall not issue a building permit for
construction of the building enclosure of a residential building or a
substantial remodel unless the building enclosure design documents
contain a stamped statement by the person stamping the building
enclosure design documents in substantially the following form: "The
undersigned has provided building enclosure documents that in my
professional judgment are appropriate to satisfy the requirements of
sections 18 through 24 of this act."
(3) The building department is not charged with determining whether
the building enclosure design documents are adequate or appropriate to
satisfy the requirements of this section and sections 19 through 24 of
this act. This section and sections 19 through 24 of this act do not
require a building department to review, approve, or disapprove
enclosure design documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
All residential buildings must have the building enclosure
inspected by a qualified inspector during the course of initial
construction and during a substantial remodel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualified building enclosure inspector:
(a) Must be a person with substantial and verifiable training and
experience in building enclosure design and construction;
(b) Must be free from improper interference or influence relating
to the inspections; and
(c) May not be an employee, officer, or director of, or have any
pecuniary interest in, the declarant, developer, association, or any
party providing services or materials for the project, or any of their
respective affiliates, except that the qualified inspector may be the
architect or engineer who approved the building enclosure design
documents or the architect or engineer of record. The qualified
inspector may, but is not required to, assist with the preparation of
the design documents.
(2) This section does not alter the requirements for licensure of
any architect, engineer, or other professional, and does not alter the
jurisdiction, authority, or scope of practice of architects, engineers,
other professionals, or general contractors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An inspection required under this chapter must include, at a
minimum, the following:
(a) Water penetration resistance testing of a representative sample
of windows and window installations. These tests must be conducted
according to industry standards. Where appropriate, tests must be
conducted with an induced air pressure difference across the window and
window installation. Additional testing is not required if the same
assembly has previously been tested in situ within the previous two
years in the project under construction by the builder, by another
member of the construction team such as an architect or engineer, or by
an independent testing laboratory; and
(b) An independent periodic review of the building enclosure during
the course of construction or rehabilitative construction to ascertain
whether the residential building has been constructed, or the
substantial remodel has been performed, in substantial compliance with
the building enclosure design documents.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to substantial
remodels if the windows and adjacent cladding are not altered in the
substantial remodel.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "project" means one or more
parcels of land in a single ownership, which are under development
pursuant to a single land use approval or building permit, where window
installation is performed by the owner with its own forces, or by the
same general contractor, or, if the owner is contracting directly with
trade contractors, is performed by the same trade contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon completion of an inspection required under this chapter, the
qualified inspector shall prepare and submit to the appropriate
building department a signed letter certifying that the building
enclosure has been inspected during the course of construction or
substantial remodel and that it has been constructed or reconstructed
in substantial compliance with the building enclosure design documents,
as updated under section 18 of this act. The building department shall
not issue a final certificate of occupancy or other equivalent final
acceptance until the letter required under this section has been
submitted. The building department is not charged with and has no
responsibility for determining whether the building enclosure
inspection is adequate or appropriate to satisfy the requirements of
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter is not intended to and does not:
(a) Create a private right of action against an inspector,
architect, or engineer based upon compliance or noncompliance with this
chapter; or
(b) Create an independent basis for liability against an inspector,
architect, or engineer.
(2) The qualified inspector, architect, or engineer and the
developer that retained the inspector, architect, or engineer may
contractually agree to the amount of their liability to the developer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 64.50 RCW
to read as follows:
A qualified inspector's report or testimony regarding an inspection
conducted under this chapter is not entitled to an evidentiary
presumption in any arbitration or court proceeding. This chapter does
not restrict the admissibility of the qualified inspector's report or
testimony, and questions of the admissibility of the report or
testimony are determined under the rules of evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state building code council must adopt rules requiring that
natural or manufactured wood framing members used in residential
construction be tested by a special inspector or the local building
jurisdiction for maximum allowable moisture content prior to enclosing
the framing. The rules adopted under this section must provide for the
maximum percentage of moisture allowed, the various locations in a
building that must be tested, the standards that need to be applied
during testing, and procedures for retesting the structure if the
moisture content exceeds the maximum allowable amount at the time of
inspection. The rules may include a requirement that the special
inspector be tested and certified by the Washington association of
building officials certification and registration program and be
approved by the local building official.
(2) After the inspection, the special inspector must provide a
certificate of compliance to the local building official showing
compliance with the requirements of this section and the rules adopted
under this section.

PART III. CONTRACTOR REGISTRATION,
WORKER CERTIFICATION, AND BONDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 (1) The legislature finds that there is
inadequate protection for consumers in the area of residential
construction. The legislature further finds that a significant amount
of the problems in the construction of new residential real property,
or the substantial remodel of existing residential real property,
pertain to water intrusion and unstable foundations and develop from
poor installation of roofing, siding, framing, foundations, doors, and
windows. The legislature recognizes that it is important to assure
consumers that those doing construction work are properly trained. The
legislature, therefore, intends to establish a worker certification
requirement for those doing construction work in the areas of roofing,
siding, framing, foundations, doors, and windows.
(2) The department of labor and industries shall contract for
consultant services to develop recommendations to the legislature on
the education, experience, and examination requirements of the program
to certify workers engaged in the installation of roofing, siding,
framing, foundations, doors, and windows. In developing the
recommendations, the consultant and the department shall closely
involve and consult with stakeholders. The recommendations must be
submitted to the legislature by November 1, 2009.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2009.

Sec. 27 RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an
application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and
which shall include the following information pertaining to the
applicant:
(a) Employer social security number.
(b) Unified business identifier number.
(c) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's
employees working in Washington, as follows:
(i) The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by
the department;
(ii) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department;
or
(iii) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada
subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(d) Employment security department number.
(e) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) and (d) of this
subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in Washington.
(f) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty
contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(g) Type of work performed, whether residential, commercial, or
both.
(h) The name ((and)), address, social security number, date of
birth, and driver's license number of each partner if the applicant is
a firm or partnership, or the name ((and)), address, social security
number, date of birth, and driver's license number of the owner if the
applicant is an individual proprietorship, or the name ((and)),
address, social security number, date of birth, and driver's license
number of the corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the
applicant is a corporation, or the name ((and)), address, social
security number, date of birth, and driver's license number of all
members of other business entities. The information contained in such
application is a matter of public record and open to public inspection.
(i) The registration numbers and unified business identifier
account numbers of previously or currently registered businesses
involving the same owner, principal, or officer as the applicant.
(j) Disclosure of any bankruptcy proceedings filed by or against
the applicant.
(k) Information about any construction licenses, certifications, or
registrations that have been issued to the applicant by other states.
The applicant shall also provide details about any denials,
suspensions, revocations, or any enforcement actions related to
construction against the applicant by other states.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny an application for registration
if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing work subject to
this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership, corporation, or other
entity and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on
work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant owes the
department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this chapter
as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an owner,
principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other entity
that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action
that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or owes
the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department
determines that the applicant has falsified information on the
application, unless the error was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the applicant
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue; or (vi) the department has determined that a
different state has taken enforcement action against the applicant for
activities that would be a violation of this chapter if they had
occurred in Washington state.
(b) The department shall suspend an active registration if: (i)
The department has determined that the registrant has an unsatisfied
final judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter;
(ii) the department has determined that the registrant is a sole
proprietor or an owner, principal, or officer of a registered
contractor that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work
within the scope of this chapter; (iii) the registrant does not
maintain a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the
department has determined that the registrant falsified information on
the application, unless the error was inadvertent; ((or)) (v) the
registrant does not have an active and valid certificate of
registration with the department of revenue; (vi) the department has
determined that a different state has taken enforcement action against
the registrant for activities that would be a violation of this chapter
if they had occurred in Washington state; or (vii) the department has
determined that the registrant failed to reasonably supervise
employees, agents, or subcontractors or performed negligently or in
breach of contract so as to cause injury or harm to the public.
(c) The department may suspend an active registration if the
department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or officer
of the registrant was an owner, principal, or officer of a previous
partnership, corporation, or other entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
registration because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was determined
by the director to be the result of the fraud or negligence of another
party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
A registered contractor, by or against whom a petition in
bankruptcy has been filed, shall notify the department of the
proceedings in bankruptcy, including the identity and location of the
court in which the proceedings are pending, within ten days of the
filing.

Sec. 29 RCW 18.27.040 and 2007 c 436 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of ((twelve)) twenty-four thousand dollars if the
applicant is a general contractor and ((six)) twelve thousand dollars
if the applicant is a specialty contractor. If no valid bond is
already on file with the department at the time the application is
filed, a bond must accompany the registration application. The bond
shall have the state of Washington named as obligee with good and
sufficient surety in a form to be approved by the department. The bond
shall be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety
giving written notice to the director. A cancellation or revocation of
the bond or withdrawal of the surety from the bond automatically
suspends the registration issued to the contractor until a new bond or
reinstatement notice has been filed and approved as provided in this
section. The bond shall be conditioned that the applicant will pay all
persons performing labor, including employee benefits, for the
contractor, will pay all taxes and contributions due to the state of
Washington, and will pay all persons furnishing material or renting or
supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all amounts that may
be adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of contract
including improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A
change in the name of a business or a change in the type of business
entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long
as one of the original applicants for such bond maintains partial
ownership in the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial registration or renewal, the contractor
shall provide a bond or other security deposit as required by this
chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of this chapter
before the department shall issue or renew the contractor's certificate
of registration. Any contractor registered as of July 1, 2001, who
maintains that registration in accordance with this chapter is in
compliance with this chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's
certificate of registration.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit against the contractor and the bond or deposit in the superior
court of the county in which the work was done or of any county in
which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety issuing
the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action
upon the bond or deposit brought by a residential homeowner for breach
of contract by a party to the construction contract shall be commenced
by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the appropriate
superior court within two years from the date the claimed contract work
was substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first.
Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any other authorized party
shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk
of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date the
claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes and
contributions owing the state of Washington became due, materials and
equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract work was
substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first.
Service of process in an action filed under this chapter against the
contractor and the contractor's bond or the deposit shall be
exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of the
summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than fifty
dollars to cover the costs shall be served by registered or certified
mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt, upon the
department at the time suit is started and the department shall
maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits so
commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives the
fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service shall
constitute service and confer personal jurisdiction on the contractor
and the surety for suit on claimant's claim against the contractor and
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and
complaint or a copy thereof to the contractor at the address listed in
the contractor's application and to the surety within two days after it
shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending and
provided to the department as required in subsection (3) of this
section, at any one time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired,
claims shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and attorneys' fees plaintiff may be
entitled to recover. The surety is not liable for any amount in excess
of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to the construction contract involving a
residential homeowner, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond or deposit is not liable in
an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond or
deposit nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter
for an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond or deposit so furnished that there is not in effect a bond or
deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the registration
of the contractor is automatically suspended until the bond or deposit
liability in the required amount unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment
claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department an assigned savings account,
upon forms provided by the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute
upon the security held by the department by serving a certified copy of
the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the
department within one year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon
the receipt of service of such certified copy the department shall pay
or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of the superior
court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the unsatisfied
judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the order
of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.
(10) Within ten days after resolution of the case, a certified copy
of the final judgment and order, or any settlement documents where a
case is not disposed of by a court trial, a certified copy of the
dispositive settlement documents must be provided to the department by
the prevailing party. Failure to provide a copy of the final judgment
and order or the dispositive settlement documents to the department
within ten days of entry of such an order constitutes a violation of
this chapter and a penalty adopted by rule of not less than two hundred
fifty dollars may be assessed against the prevailing party.
(11) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or
reinstate a registration or applying for a new registration to file a
bond of up to three times the normally required amount, if the director
determines that an applicant, or a previous registration of a corporate
officer, owner, or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past
five years a total of three final judgments in actions under this
chapter involving a residential single-family dwelling on two or more
different structures.
(12) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 Sections 6 through 13 of this act take
effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

--- END ---