BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state of
Washington is recognized as a leader in the life sciences, in
addressing global health issues, and in the commercialization of new
technologies. The legislature further finds that the research funded
by the life sciences discovery fund has the potential to lead to
innovations that will improve health care outcomes, efficiencies in
delivery, and cost-effectiveness as well as contributing to robust
industry development and economic growth. It is the purpose of this
chapter to establish the Washington innovation grant authority to act
as a financial conduit to provide access to needed capital for those
who have previously received life sciences discovery fund support or
other technology development grants and are in need of additional funds
to transfer their research and technology to the commercial
marketplace.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington innovation grant
authority is established as a public body corporate and politic, with
perpetual corporate succession, constituting an instrumentality of the
state of Washington exercising essential governmental functions. The
authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.
(2) The authority consists of nine members as follows: One member
from each caucus in the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one member from each caucus in
the senate appointed by the president of the senate, and five public
members. The public members must be residents of the state appointed
by the governor on the basis of their interest or expertise in life
sciences, technology transfer and commercialization, grant evaluation,
venture funding, and business planning. The governor shall appoint one
of the public members as chair of the authority and that member shall
serve as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The
authority may select from its membership such other officers as it
deems appropriate.
(3) The term of the persons appointed by the governor as public
members of the authority, including the public member appointed as
chair, is four years from the date of appointment, except that the term
of two of the initial appointees is for two years from the date of
appointment and the term of three of the initial appointees is for
three years from the date of appointment. The governor shall designate
the appointees who will serve the two-year and three-year terms.
(4) In the event of a vacancy on the authority due to death,
resignation, or removal of one of the public members, or upon the
expiration of the term of one of the public members, the governor shall
appoint a successor for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(5) The members of the authority shall serve without compensation
but are entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the
authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington innovation grant
authority shall operate the Washington innovation grant program. The
authority shall solicit, evaluate, and select grant proposals from
successful recipients of life sciences discovery fund awards or other
technology development grants. Grants will be awarded for: (a) Proof-
of-concept funding for transforming research and development concepts
into commercially viable products and services; (b) entrepreneurial
opportunities for persons interested in transforming research into
viable commercial ventures that create jobs in the state; and (c) other
activities as the authority deems necessary to continue the advancement
of previously funded efforts.
(2) The authority shall adopt a policy that prescribes the
requirements of the grant program and the requirements that a grant
recipient must meet in order to receive grant moneys.
(3) The authority is authorized to participate fully in federal and
other governmental programs and to take such actions as are necessary
and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the people of
the state the benefits of those programs and to meet their
requirements.
(4) The authority shall coordinate its programs with those
contributing to a common purpose found in federal or state agencies or
institutions.
(5) The authority may use any funds legally available to it for any
purpose specifically authorized elsewhere in this chapter, and for
otherwise improving the prospects for grant recipients to garner
financing for commercialization activities.
(6) The authority shall establish a Washington innovation grant
authority account for the receipt of funds from any source.
Disbursement of funds from the account must be authorized by the
authority only for purposes set out in this chapter.
(7) The authority shall adopt general operating procedures for the
authority including, but not limited to: (a) Appropriate minimum
reserve requirements to secure financing; (b) appropriate standards for
securing financing; and (c) strict standards for providing financing to
grant recipients that is consistent with any plan adopted by the
authority.
(8) The authority may:
(a) Maintain an office or offices;
(b) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded;
(c) Engage consultants, agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract
with federal, state, and local governmental entities for services, and
hire such employees, agents, and other personnel as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(d) Make and execute all manner of contracts, agreements, and
instruments and financing documents with public and private parties as
the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(e) Open and maintain accounts in qualified public depositaries and
otherwise provide for the investment of any funds not required for
immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;
(f) Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions,
departments, or agencies of federal, state, or local government;
(g) Procure insurance in amounts and from insurers as the authority
deems desirable, including, but not limited to, insurance against any
loss or damage to its property or other assets, public liability
insurance for injuries to persons or property, and directors and
officers liability insurance;
(h) Apply for and accept subventions, grants, loans, advances, and
contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other
things of value, to be held, used, and applied as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(i) Act as an agent, by agreement, for federal, state, or local
governmental entities to carry out the programs authorized in this
chapter;
(j) Establish, revise, and collect fees and charges as the
authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(k) Make expenditures as are appropriate for paying the
administrative costs and expenses of the authority in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter;
(l) Establish reserves and special funds, and controls on deposits
to and disbursements from them, as the authority deems necessary,
useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(m) Give assistance to public bodies by providing information,
guidelines, forms, and procedures for implementing their financing
programs;
(n) Prepare, publish, and distribute, with or without charge,
studies, reports, bulletins, and other material as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(o) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(p) Adopt rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by
this chapter; and
(q) Exercise any other power the authority deems necessary, useful,
or convenient to accomplish its purposes and exercise the powers
expressly granted in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed in an amount equal to the amount of contributions made to the
Washington innovation grant authority account established in section
3(6) of this act.
(2) The credit under this section must be earned, and claimed
against taxes due under this chapter, for the tax reporting period in
which the contribution was made by the person claiming credit under
this section. The credit may not exceed the tax otherwise due under
this chapter for the tax reporting period. Unused credit may be
carried over and used in subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds
may be granted for credits under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---