BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION. The legislature
declares that promoting the development of new technologies is a
fundamental purpose of state government. The legislature declares it
to be a clear public purpose and governmental function to promote
technological advances through commercialization of new discoveries at
the state's research institutions. The legislature finds that public
support for and promotion and commercialization of new research will
benefit the state and its residents through contributions to scientific
knowledge and economic development, and this research will lead to
breakthroughs and improvements that might not otherwise be discovered
due to lack of existing market incentives. The purpose of this chapter
is to establish a technology discovery fund authority, to grant that
authority the power to contract to receive funding from a variety of
sources, and to disburse those funds consistent with the purpose of
this chapter. The technology discovery fund is intended to promote the
best available research and commercialization activities through
diverse Washington institutions and to build upon existing research
strengths in order to spread economic benefits across the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the technology discovery fund authority
created in section 3 of this act.
(2) "Board" means the governing board of trustees of the authority.
(3) "Contribution agreement" means any agreement authorized under
this chapter in which a private entity or a public entity other than
the state agrees to provide contributions to the authority.
(4) "Technology research" means advanced and applied research and
development, including commercialization activities, vital to the
state's economy.
(5) "Public employee" means any person employed by the state of
Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof.
(6) "Public facilities" means any public institution, public
facility, public equipment, or any physical asset owned, leased, or
controlled by the state of Washington or any agency or political
subdivision thereof.
(7) "Public funds" means any funds received or controlled by the
state of Washington or any agency or political subdivision thereof,
including, but not limited to, funds derived from federal, state, or
local taxes, gifts or grants from any source, public or private,
federal grants or payments, or intergovernmental transfers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 TECHNOLOGY DISCOVERY FUND AUTHORITY--ESTABLISHED. (1) The technology discovery fund authority is created
and constitutes a public instrumentality and agency of the state,
separate and distinct from the state, exercising public and essential
governmental functions.
(2) The powers of the authority are vested in and must be exercised
by a board of trustees consisting of: Two members of either the house
of representatives committee on ways and means or the house of
representatives committee dealing with technology issues, one from each
caucus, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
two members of either the senate committee on ways and means or the
senate committee dealing with technology issues, one from each caucus,
to be appointed by the president of the senate; and seven members
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, one of whom
the governor shall appoint as chair of the authority and who shall
serve on the board and as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the
governor. The respective officials shall make the initial appointments
no later than thirty days after the effective date of this section.
The term of the trustees, other than the chair, is four years from the
date of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the
initial gubernatorial appointees, as determined by the governor, are
for two years from the date of their appointment. A trustee appointed
by the governor may be removed by the governor for cause under RCW
43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The appropriate official shall fill any
vacancy on the board by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term. The trustees appointed by the governor must be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the
funds of the authority, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their
duties under this chapter, subject to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The
trustees who are legislators must be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
(3) Seven members of the board constitute a quorum.
(4) The trustees shall elect a treasurer and secretary annually,
and other officers as the trustees determine necessary, and may adopt
bylaws or rules for their own government.
(5) Meetings of the board must be held in accordance with the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and at the call of the chair or
when a majority of the trustees so requests. Meetings of the board may
be held at any location within or out of the state, and trustees may
participate in a meeting of the board by means of a conference
telephone or similar communication equipment under RCW 23B.08.200.
(6) The authority is subject to audit by the state auditor.
(7) The attorney general must advise the authority and represent it
in all legal proceedings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 SPECIAL TRUST POWERS. In addition to other
powers and duties prescribed in this chapter, the authority is
empowered to:
(1) Use public moneys in the technology discovery fund, leveraging
those moneys with amounts received from other public and private
sources in accordance with contribution agreements;
(2) Solicit and receive gifts, grants, and bequests, and enter into
contribution agreements with private entities and public entities other
than the state to receive moneys in consideration of the authority's
promise to leverage those moneys with amounts received through
appropriations from the legislature and contributions from other public
entities and private entities, in order to use those moneys to promote
technology research. Nonstate moneys received by the authority for
this purpose must be deposited in the technology discovery fund created
in section 8 of this act;
(3) Hold funds received by the authority in trust for their use
pursuant to this chapter to promote technology research;
(4) Manage its funds, obligations, and investments as necessary and
as consistent with its purpose including the segregation of revenues
into separate funds and accounts;
(5) Make grants to entities pursuant to contract for the promotion
of technology research to be conducted in the state. Grant agreements
must specify deliverables to be provided by the recipient pursuant to
the grant. The authority shall solicit requests for funding and
evaluate the requests by reference to factors such as: (a) The quality
of the proposed research; (b) its potential to lead to new products,
production processes, or applications; (c) its potential for leveraging
additional funding; (d) its potential to provide economic benefits or
benefit human learning and development; (e) its potential to stimulate
manufacturing or information technology-related employment in the
state; (f) the geographic diversity of the grantees within Washington;
(g) evidence of potential royalty income and contractual means to
recapture such income for purposes of this chapter; and (h) evidence of
public and private collaboration;
(6) Create one or more advisory boards composed of scientists,
industrialists, and others familiar with technology research; and
(7) Adopt policies and procedures to facilitate the orderly process
of grant application, review, and reward.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 GENERAL POWERS--RESTRICTIONS. The authority
has all the general powers necessary to carry out its purposes and
duties and to exercise its specific powers. In addition to other
powers specified in this chapter, the authority may: (1) Sue and be
sued in its own name; (2) make and execute agreements, contracts, and
other instruments, with any public or private person or entity, in
accordance with this chapter; (3) employ, contract with, or engage
independent counsel, financial advisors, auditors, other technical or
professional assistants, and such other personnel as are necessary or
desirable to implement this chapter; (4) establish special funds, and
controls on deposits to and disbursements from them, as it finds
convenient for the implementation of this chapter; (5) enter into
contracts with public and private entities for technology research to
be conducted in the state; (6) adopt rules, consistent with this
chapter; (7) delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with
the purposes of this chapter; (8) exercise any other power reasonably
required to implement the purposes of this chapter; and (9) hire staff
and pay administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 LIMITATION OF LIABILITY. Members of the
board and persons acting on behalf of the authority, while acting
within the scope of their employment or agency, are not subject to
personal liability resulting from carrying out the powers and duties
conferred on them under this chapter. Neither the state nor the
authority is liable for any loss, damage, harm, or other consequence
resulting directly or indirectly from grants made by the authority or
by any technology research funded by such grants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 DISSOLUTION OF THE AUTHORITY. The authority
may petition the legislature to be dissolved upon a showing that it has
no reason to exist and that any assets it retains must be distributed
to one or more similar entities approved by the legislature. The
legislature reserves the right to dissolve the authority after its
contractual obligations to its funders and grant recipients have
expired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 TECHNOLOGY DISCOVERY FUND. The technology
discovery fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only
the board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the
fund. Expenditures from the fund may be made only for purposes of this
chapter. Administrative expenses of the authority, including staff
support, may be paid only from the fund. Revenues to the fund consist
of transfers made by the legislature, moneys received pursuant to
contribution agreements entered into pursuant to section 4 of this act,
moneys received from gifts, grants, and bequests, and interest earned
on the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX EXEMPTION. This chapter does not apply
to income received by the technology discovery fund authority under
chapter 43.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this act).

Sec. 10 RCW 42.30.110 and 2005 c 424 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prevent
a governing body from holding an executive session during a regular or
special meeting:
(a) To consider matters affecting national security;
(b) To consider the selection of a site or the acquisition of real
estate by lease or purchase when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of increased price;
(c) To consider the minimum price at which real estate will be
offered for sale or lease when public knowledge regarding such
consideration would cause a likelihood of decreased price. However,
final action selling or leasing public property shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(d) To review negotiations on the performance of publicly bid
contracts when public knowledge regarding such consideration would
cause a likelihood of increased costs;
(e) To consider, in the case of an export trading company,
financial and commercial information supplied by private persons to the
export trading company;
(f) To receive and evaluate complaints or charges brought against
a public officer or employee. However, upon the request of such
officer or employee, a public hearing or a meeting open to the public
shall be conducted upon such complaint or charge;
(g) To evaluate the qualifications of an applicant for public
employment or to review the performance of a public employee. However,
subject to RCW 42.30.140(4), discussion by a governing body of
salaries, wages, and other conditions of employment to be generally
applied within the agency shall occur in a meeting open to the public,
and when a governing body elects to take final action hiring, setting
the salary of an individual employee or class of employees, or
discharging or disciplining an employee, that action shall be taken in
a meeting open to the public;
(h) To evaluate the qualifications of a candidate for appointment
to elective office. However, any interview of such candidate and final
action appointing a candidate to elective office shall be in a meeting
open to the public;
(i) To discuss with legal counsel representing the agency matters
relating to agency enforcement actions, or to discuss with legal
counsel representing the agency litigation or potential litigation to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party, when public knowledge
regarding the discussion is likely to result in an adverse legal or
financial consequence to the agency.
This subsection (1)(i) does not permit a governing body to hold an
executive session solely because an attorney representing the agency is
present. For purposes of this subsection (1)(i), "potential
litigation" means matters protected by RPC 1.6 or RCW 5.60.060(2)(a)
concerning:
(((A))) (i) Litigation that has been specifically threatened to
which the agency, the governing body, or a member acting in an official
capacity is, or is likely to become, a party;
(((B))) (ii) Litigation that the agency reasonably believes may be
commenced by or against the agency, the governing body, or a member
acting in an official capacity; or
(((C))) (iii) Litigation or legal risks of a proposed action or
current practice that the agency has identified when public discussion
of the litigation or legal risks is likely to result in an adverse
legal or financial consequence to the agency;
(j) To consider, in the case of the state library commission or its
advisory bodies, western library network prices, products, equipment,
and services, when such discussion would be likely to adversely affect
the network's ability to conduct business in a competitive economic
climate. However, final action on these matters shall be taken in a
meeting open to the public;
(k) To consider, in the case of the state investment board,
financial and commercial information when the information relates to
the investment of public trust or retirement funds and when public
knowledge regarding the discussion would result in loss to such funds
or in private loss to the providers of this information;
(l) To consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information related to the development, acquisition, or implementation
of state purchased health care services as provided in RCW 41.05.026;
(m) To consider in the case of the life sciences discovery fund
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information;
(n) To consider in the case of the technology discovery fund
authority, the substance of grant applications and grant awards when
public knowledge regarding the discussion would reasonably be expected
to result in private loss to the providers of this information.
(2) Before convening in executive session, the presiding officer of
a governing body shall publicly announce the purpose for excluding the
public from the meeting place, and the time when the executive session
will be concluded. The executive session may be extended to a stated
later time by announcement of the presiding officer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this
chapter does not apply to employees of the technology discovery fund
authority under chapter 43.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section
18 of this act).

Sec. 12 RCW 42.56.270 and 2008 c 306 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
community, trade, and economic development:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of community, trade, and economic
development or the office of the governor in connection with the
siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development based on information as described in (a)(i) of
this subsection, any work product is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of community, trade, and economic development from a
person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in (a)(ii)
of this subsection will be available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information; ((and))
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business; and
(20) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the technology
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 18 of this
act), to the extent that such information, if revealed, would
reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the providers of
this information.

Sec. 13 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2007 c 341 s 48, 2007 c 241 s 2, and
2007 c 15 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
community, trade, and economic development, the secretary of
corrections, the director of early learning, the director of ecology,
the commissioner of employment security, the chair of the energy
facility site evaluation council, the secretary of the state finance
committee, the director of financial management, the director of fish
and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals
board, the director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the department of information services,
the executive director of the state investment board, the director of
labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the
lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's
business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the
director of personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure
commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the
director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of
retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social
and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the
executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of
transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation
commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of
the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen
State College, and each district and each campus president of each
state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, technology
discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health care
facilities authority, each member of the Washington health services
commission, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, ((recreation and conservation funding board,)) state investment
board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board, liquor
control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, board of pilotage commissioners, pollution
control hearings board, public disclosure commission, public pension
commission, shorelines ((hearing[s])) hearings board, public employees'
benefits board, recreation and conservation funding board, salmon
recovery funding board, board of tax appeals, transportation
commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and
transportation commission, Washington state maritime commission,
Washington personnel resources board, Washington public power supply
system executive board, Washington State University board of regents,
Western Washington University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife
commission.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2008 c 239 s 9, 2008 c 208 s 9, 2008
c 128 s 20, and 2008 c 122 s 24 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund account, the Washington horse racing commission
class C purse fund account, the individual development account program
account, the Washington horse racing commission operating account
(earnings from the Washington horse racing commission operating account
must be credited to the Washington horse racing commission class C
purse fund account), the life sciences discovery fund, the technology
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account. However, the earnings to be distributed shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are
not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION. This act, being
necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be
liberally construed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 8 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 ALPHABETIZATION. The code reviser shall
alphabetize the accounts and funds listed in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(b).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---