BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state apple health community care council is
created as an emergency working group within the department. The
emergency working group will work to preserve critical publicly funded
medical assistance programs that provide medical coverage to families
and adults while providing a solution for a single entry way for all
medical programs available to the low-income populations in Washington
state. The council shall operate with the secretary of the department
or his or her designee and the administrator of the health care
authority or his or her designee, acting as cochairs. The council
shall also include four members of the legislature, appointed by their
respective caucuses in the house of representatives and the senate,
and additional members in the discretion of the cochairs, such that a
viable working group can be established to accomplish the goals set
forth in this section. The council shall function within the
department's current appropriation and make use of any available
private, public, or other grant funding. The primary duties of the
council shall include:
(a) Subject to appropriation, the immediate redesign,
reintroduction, and possible consolidation of state medical assistance
and subsidized coverage programs that will preserve current enrollment
levels for eligible enrollees and capture any additional federal
funding;
(b) By September 1, 2009, submit to the federal department of
health and human services a proposal to establish one seamless coverage
program to encompass state medical assistance programs, the state
children's health insurance program, general assistance unemployable
medical, and the basic health plan, to the extent allowed by the
federal department of health and human services. The council shall
explore alternative benefit packages including health savings accounts,
alternative cost-sharing arrangements, utilization review, and other
cost controlling measures to achieve cost neutrality among currently
served populations. The council shall also examine income and asset
eligibility requirements for programs currently funded by state only
funds. The council shall take such actions as may be necessary to
ensure the broadest federal financial participation under Title XIX and
XXI of the federal social security act;
(c) Creation of one seamless application and entry way for all
state medical assistance programs to include medicaid, the state
children's health insurance program, general assistance unemployable
medical, and the basic health plan. The application must include all
necessary items for eligibility determinations for any current medical
offerings without regard for the funding source. Applications may be
electronic and may include an electronic signature for verification and
authentication. In creating a single portal by which individuals can
seek state-sponsored or subsidized coverage, the council shall
consider:
(i) Transparent and streamlined medical assistance programs, with
seamless transition between coverage programs financed through various
funding sources;
(ii) Seamless coverage options that allow individuals to move from
medical assistance to subsidized coverage to premium subsidy programs
and ultimately to private nonsubsidized coverage while maintaining the
same provider network and wellness incentive programs for the whole
family;
(iii) Eligibility determinations that direct enrollees to the
appropriate program to maximize federal financing where possible, and
that do not permit persons to enroll in two programs simultaneously;
and
(iv) Improved reimbursement methodologies and rates to enhance
access to health care and quality of care delivery that include
enhanced medical home reimbursement and bundled payment methodologies;
and
(d) Develop a premium assistance program to be called the apple
health employer cooperative whereby employers can participate in
coverage options for employees and dependents of employees otherwise
eligible for state subsidized programs. The council shall make every
effort to maximize enrollment in employer-sponsored health insurance
when it is cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is
consistent with the requirements of Title XIX and XXI of the federal
social security act. To the extent allowable under federal law, the
council shall require enrollment in available employer-sponsored
coverage as a condition of participating in the program. The council
may use current infrastructure within the health care authority as may
be necessary to coordinate payments and sliding scale premium
contributions, and to explore the further expansions of employer
involvement in state subsidized insurance products. Such expansions
may entail creative alternatives that seek additional employer-sponsored financing, such as section 125 cafeteria plans with a defined
contribution in partnership with a state premium subsidy as well as
fully funded health savings accounts or health reimbursement
arrangements that provide incentives to reduce overutilization and
control costs.
(2) By January 1, 2010, the apple health community care council
shall produce a proposal to the legislature and the federal department
of health and human services for a broadened apple health employer
cooperative which will be accessible to employers of enrollees in any
of the federally matched or state-sponsored medical assistance
programs.
(3) By January 1, 2011, the apple health community care council
shall produce a proposal that would consolidate the major medical
offerings describe in subsection (1)(b) of this section to streamline
all operations and eliminate duplication while maximizing federal
funds.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "bundled payment" means
providing a single payment for all services related to a treatment or
condition, possibly spanning multiple providers in multiple settings.

--- END ---