BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.300.230 and 1991 c 238 s 140 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that global competition requires an alignment
between economic development, workforce development and education, and
that the needs of the workforce and the economy necessitate enhanced
((vocational education)) educational opportunities in primary and
secondary education ((including curriculum which integrates)) in
entrepreneurial training, financial literacy, innovation, and other
curricula that integrate innovative vocational and traditional academic
education. In order for the state's workforce to be competitive in the
world market, employees need to understand how businesses operate and
become successful, and how to manage personal and business finances.
They also need competencies in both vocational((/)) and technical
skills, and in core essential competencies such as English, math,
science((/)) and technology, geography, history, and critical thinking.
Curriculum ((which)) that integrates ((vocational and)) youth
innovation education and traditional academic education reflects that
many students learn best through applied learning, and that students
should be offered flexible education opportunities ((which)) that
prepare them for both the world of work and for higher education.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.300.235 and 1991 c 238 s 141 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall, with the advice
of the workforce training and education coordinating board, develop
model ((curriculum integrating vocational and academic)) youth
innovation education ((at the)) curricula for both the primary and
secondary levels. The ((curriculum)) curricula shall:
(a) Integrate ((vocational education for gainful employment with
education in)) youth innovation education with the academic subjects of
English, math, science((/)) and technology, geography, ((and)) history,
and ((with education in)) critical thinking((.));
(b) Include grade level benchmarks for financial literacy,
innovation, and entrepreneurship; and
(c) Upon completion, ((the model curriculum shall)) be provided for
consideration and use by school districts.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall solicit funds to
fund grant programs as described in this section. All such funds shall
be deposited in the youth innovation education account.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall, with the advice
of the workforce training and education coordinating board, distribute
grants from the youth innovation education account to youth innovation
education programs. School districts may apply for and administer
these grants independently or jointly with other school districts or
educational service districts.
(a) These grants may be expended on programs including:
Specialized curricula for youth innovation education, offered either as
stand-alone classes or integrated into existing subjects; extended
learning activities and use of volunteer instructors for classroom
instruction, including business week programs; internships or
externships; summer camps; weekend or evening workshops; creation of
student enterprises; business plan competitions; mentoring; and teacher
training in entrepreneurship or financial literacy education.
(b) In selecting projects for grant awards, the superintendent of
public instruction shall give additional consideration to applicants
whose proposals include:
(i) Collaboration with community or business organizations,
financial institutions, or other public or private section partners,
including but not limited to four-year institutions of higher education
and community and technical colleges;
(ii) An outreach component directed toward school-age youth not
currently enrolled in school; and
(iii) The involvement of all in-school youth in preparation for
postsecondary education, training, or employment.
(c) Grant awards must be for new projects or expansion of existing
projects. Those grant applicants with existing projects must show that
the funds awarded will not go to the maintenance of effort of existing
projects but will be used to carry out new or expanded activities.
(4) As used in this chapter, "youth innovation education" means
integrated academic and vocation instruction for primary and secondary
education in financial literacy, entrepreneurship, and innovation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to any youth training activities that federal
regulations require of local workforce development councils, the
councils shall offer entrepreneurial training opportunities to youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The youth innovation education account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from fund-raising under section 2(2) of this
act must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account
may only be used for grants under section 2(3) of this act. Only the
superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general
fund to the youth innovation education account for use by the
superintendent of public instruction for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2009, for the purposes of this act.

--- END ---