BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.102.020 and 2008 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means seven million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) (("Base year" means the first calendar year following the
calendar year in which a sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, receives approval by the board for a
project award, provided that the approval is granted before October
15th. If approval by the board is received on or after October 15th
but on or before December 31st, the "base year" is the second calendar
year following the calendar year in which a sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, receives approval by
the board for a project award.
(4))) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board
under chapter 43.160 RCW.
(((5))) (4) "Demonstration project" means one of the following
projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(((6))) (5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(((7))) (6) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning
July 1st and ending the following June 30th.
(((8))) (7) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from
the imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 ((at
the tax rate that was in effect at the time the revenue development
area was approved by the board, except that if a local government
reduces the rate of such tax after the revenue development area was
approved by the board, "local excise taxes" means the local revenues
derived from the imposition of the sales and use taxes authorized in
RCW 82.14.030 at the lower tax rate)).
(((9))) (8) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means ((the
amount of local excise taxes received by the local government during
the measurement year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area over and above the amount of local excise taxes
received by the local government during the base year from taxable
activity within the revenue development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "local excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of local excise taxes
received by the sponsoring local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
approval of the revenue development area by the board and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter;
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "local excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of local excise taxes received by the
sponsoring local government during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the revenue development area over and above an amount
of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local government
during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case may be, adjusted by the
department for any estimated impacts from retail sales and use tax
sourcing changes effective in 2008. The amount of base year adjustment
determined by the department is final; and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "local excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local
government during a calendar year period beginning with 2009 and
continuing with each measurement year thereafter)) an amount of local
excise taxes equal to some or all of the sponsoring local government's
local excise tax increment, amounts of local excise taxes equal to some
or all of any participating local government's excise tax increment as
agreed upon in the written agreement under RCW 39.102.080(1), or both,
and dedicated to local infrastructure financing.
(9) "Local excise tax increment" means an amount equal to the
estimated annual increase in local excise taxes in each calendar year
following the approval of the revenue development area by the board
from taxable activity within the revenue development area, as set forth
in the application provided to the board under RCW 39.102.040, and
updated in accordance with RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(14) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(15) (("Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure state and local excise tax
allocation revenues.
(16))) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking
legislative action by a local government.
(((17))) (16) "Participating local government" means a local
government having a revenue development area within its geographic
boundaries that has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring
local government as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all
or some of its local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues
from local public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(((18))) (17) "Participating taxing district" means a local
government having a revenue development area within its geographic
boundaries that has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring
local government as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some
or all of its local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues
from local public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(((19))) (18)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(((20))) (19) "Taxing district" means a government entity that
levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property
located within a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(((21))) (20) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(((22))) (21) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a)
Design, planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site
preparation including land clearing, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) demolishing, relocating, maintaining, and operating property
pending construction of public improvements; (c) the local government's
portion of relocating utilities as a result of public improvements; (d)
financing public improvements, including interest during construction,
legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and
interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance public
improvements, and any necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e)
assessments incurred in revaluing real property for the purpose of
determining the property tax allocation revenue base value that are in
excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with the
revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning
the taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable law; (f)
administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary
and related to these costs; and (g) any of the above-described costs
that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance
authorizing the public improvements and the use of local infrastructure
financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.
(((23))) (22) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes
as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied
by public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (c) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
"Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax levies that
are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing
districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(((24))) (23) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means
the assessed value of real property located within a revenue
development area ((for taxes levied in the year in which the revenue
development area is adopted for collection in the following year, plus
one hundred percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property located within a revenue development area that is placed on
the assessment rolls after the revenue development area is adopted,))
less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(((25))) (24) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a
business and the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new
business that engages in the same activities as the previous business,
in a different location within a one-year period, when an individual or
entity has an ownership interest in the business at the time of closure
and at the time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does
not include the closing and reopening of a business in a new location
where the business has been acquired and is under entirely new
ownership at the new location, or the closing and reopening of a
business in a new location as a result of the exercise of the power of
eminent domain.
(((26))) (25) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area
adopted by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board,
from which local excise and property tax allocation revenues are
derived for local infrastructure financing.
(((27))) (26) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 19.85.020.
(((28))) (27) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or
county, and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized
Indian tribe or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue
development area and applies to the board to use local infrastructure
financing.
(((29))) (28) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) ((The state excise tax allocation revenue and state property
tax allocation revenue received by the state during the preceding
calendar year;
(c))) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues,
local property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local
public sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government,
any participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, in the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal
and interest on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public
improvement costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195,
or both; or
(((d))) (c) The amount of project award granted by the board in the
notice of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW
39.102.040.
(((30))) (29) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from
state retail sales and use taxes under ((chapters 82.08 and 82.12)) RCW
82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1),
less the amount of tax distributions from all local retail sales and
use taxes, other than the local sales and use taxes authorized by RCW
82.14.475 for the applicable revenue development area, imposed on the
same taxable events that are credited against the state retail sales
and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(((31))) (30) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means ((the))
an amount ((of)) equal to the annual increase in state excise taxes
estimated to be received by the state ((during the measurement year))
in each calendar year following the approval of the revenue development
area by the board, from taxable activity within the revenue development
area ((over and above the amount of state excise taxes received by the
state during the base year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "state excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during a calendar year period beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter;
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "state excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of state excise taxes received by the state
during the measurement year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area over and above an amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case
may be, adjusted by the department for any estimated impacts from
retail sales and use tax sourcing changes effective in 2008. The
amount of base year adjustment determined by the department is final;
and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "state excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of state excise taxes received by the state during a
calendar year period beginning with 2009 and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter)) as set forth in the application provided
to the board under RCW 39.102.040 and periodically updated and reported
as required in RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(((32))) (31) "State property tax allocation revenue" means
((those)) an amount equal to the estimated tax revenues derived from
the imposition of property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065 on the property tax allocation
revenue value, as set forth in the application submitted to the board
under RCW 39.102.040 and updated annually in the report required under
RCW 39.102.140(1)(f).
(((33))) (32) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.090 and also includes any privately owned improvements located on
publicly owned land that are subject to property taxation.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.102.070 and 2006 c 181 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
The use of local infrastructure financing under this chapter is
subject to the following conditions:
(1) No funds may be used to finance, design, acquire, construct,
equip, operate, maintain, remodel, repair, or reequip public facilities
funded with taxes collected under RCW 82.14.048 or 82.14.390;
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection no funds may be
used for public improvements other than projects identified within the
capital facilities, utilities, housing, or transportation element of a
comprehensive plan required under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Funds may be used for public improvements that are historical
preservation activities as defined in RCW 39.89.020;
(3) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using local infrastructure financing are expected to encourage
private development within the revenue development area and to increase
the fair market value of real property within the revenue development
area;
(4) A sponsoring local government, participating local government,
or participating taxing district has entered or expects to enter into
a contract with a private developer relating to the development of
private improvements within the revenue development area or has
received a letter of intent from a private developer relating to the
developer's plans for the development of private improvements within
the revenue development area;
(5) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
revenue development area, as a result of the public improvements, will
be consistent with the countywide planning policy adopted by the county
under RCW 36.70A.210 and the local government's comprehensive plan and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(6) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, must make a finding that local
infrastructure financing:
(a) Is not expected to be used for the purpose of relocating a
business from outside the revenue development area, but within this
state, into the revenue development area; and
(b) Will improve the viability of existing business entities within
the revenue development area;
(7) The governing body of the sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, finds that the public improvements
proposed to be financed in whole or in part using local infrastructure
financing are reasonably likely to:
(a) Increase private residential and commercial investment within
the revenue development area;
(b) Increase employment within the revenue development area;
(c) Improve the viability of any existing communities that are
based on mixed-use development within the revenue development area; and
(d) Generate, over the period of time that the local option sales
and use tax will be imposed under RCW 82.14.475, state excise tax
allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues derived
from the revenue development area that are equal to or greater than the
respective state contributions made under this chapter;
(8) The sponsoring local government may only use local
infrastructure financing in areas deemed in need of economic
development or redevelopment within boundaries of the sponsoring local
government.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.102.110 and 2007 c 229 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government or participating local government
that has received approval by the board to use local infrastructure
financing may use annually its local excise tax allocation revenues to
finance public improvements in the revenue development area financed in
whole or in part by local infrastructure financing. The use of local
excise tax allocation revenues dedicated by participating local
governments must cease on the date specified in the written agreement
required in RCW 39.102.080(1), or if no date is specified then the date
when the local tax under RCW 82.14.475 expires. Any participating
local government is authorized to dedicate local excise tax allocation
revenues to the sponsoring local government as authorized in RCW
39.102.080(1).
(2) A sponsoring local government shall provide the board accurate
information describing the geographical boundaries of the revenue
development area at the time of application. The information shall be
provided in an electronic format or manner as prescribed by the
department. The sponsoring local government shall ensure that the
boundary information provided to the board and department is kept
current.
(3) In the event a city annexes a county area located within a
county-sponsored revenue development area, the city shall remit to the
county the portion of the local excise tax allocation revenue that the
county would have received had the area not been annexed to the
((county)) city. The city shall remit such revenues until such time as
the bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 are retired.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.102.120 and 2007 c 229 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Commencing in the second calendar year following board approval
of a revenue development area, the county treasurer shall distribute
receipts from regular taxes imposed on real property located in the
revenue development area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring local
government shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes
produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the
property tax allocation revenue base value for that local
infrastructure financing project in the taxing district((, or upon the
total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever
is smaller)); and
(b) The sponsoring local government shall receive an additional
portion of the regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each
participating taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue
value within the revenue development area. However, if there is no
property tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring local government
shall not receive any additional regular property taxes under this
subsection (1)(b). The sponsoring local government may agree to
receive less than the full amount of the additional portion of regular
property taxes under this subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt
service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied,
in which case the balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to
the participating taxing districts that levied regular property taxes,
or have regular property taxes levied for them, in the revenue
development area for collection that year in proportion to their
regular tax levy rates for collection that year. The sponsoring local
government may request that the treasurer transfer this additional
portion of the property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of
the tax receipts distributed to the sponsoring local government or its
agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance
public improvement costs associated with the public improvements
financed in whole or in part by local infrastructure financing.
(2) The county assessor shall ((allocate any increase in the
assessed value of real property occurring in the revenue development
area to)) determine the property tax allocation revenue value and
property tax allocation revenue base value ((as appropriate)). This
section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the
assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the
assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other
authorized revaluation procedures.
(3) The ((apportionment of increases in assessed valuation in a
revenue development area, and the associated)) distribution of local
property tax allocation revenue to the sponsoring local government ((of
receipts from regular property taxes that are imposed on the property
tax allocation revenue value,)) must cease when local property tax
allocation revenues are no longer obligated to pay the costs of the
public improvements. Any excess local property tax allocation revenues
((derived from regular property taxes)) and earnings on ((these tax
allocation)) such revenues((,)) remaining at the time the ((allocation
of tax receipts)) distribution of local property tax allocation revenue
terminates((,)) must be returned to the county treasurer and
distributed to the participating taxing districts that imposed regular
property taxes, or had regular property taxes imposed for it, in the
revenue development area for collection that year, in proportion to the
rates of their regular property tax levies for collection that year.
(4) The allocation to the revenue development area of that
portion((s)) of the sponsoring local government's and each
participating taxing district's regular property taxes levied by or for
each taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue value
within that revenue development area is declared to be a public purpose
of and benefit to the sponsoring local government and each ((such))
participating taxing district.
(5) The ((allocation)) distribution of local property tax
allocation revenues pursuant to this section shall not affect or be
deemed to affect the rate of taxes levied by or within any sponsoring
local government and participating taxing district or the consistency
of any such levies with the uniformity requirement of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution.
(6) This section does not apply to those revenue development areas
that include any part of an increment area created under chapter 39.89
RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.102.140 and 2007 c 229 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government shall provide a report to the
board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report shall
contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public
sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475 received by the sponsoring local
government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to
pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
((and))
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW
39.102.070; and
(f) Beginning with the reports due March 1, 2010, the following
must also be included:
(i) A list of public improvements financed on a pay-as-you-go basis
in previous calendar years and by indebtedness issued under this
chapter;
(ii) The date when any indebtedness issued under this chapter is
expected to be retired;
(iii) At least once every three years, updated estimates of state
excise tax allocation revenues, state property tax allocation revenues,
and local excise tax increments, as determined by the sponsoring local
government, that are estimated to have been received by the state, any
participating local government, sponsoring local government, and
cosponsoring local government, since the approval of the project award
under RCW 39.102.040 by the board; and
(iv) Any other information required by the department or the board
to enable the department or the board to fulfill its duties under this
chapter and RCW 82.14.475.
(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the
legislature by June 1st of each year. The report shall include a list
of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local governments and
financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing and it
shall also include a summary of the information provided to the
department by sponsoring local governments under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government in estimating the amount of state excise tax allocation
revenues and local excise tax increments required in subsection
(1)(f)(iii) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.102.150 and 2007 c 229 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government that has designated a revenue
development area and been authorized the use of local infrastructure
financing may incur general indebtedness, ((and issue)) including
issuing general obligation bonds, to finance the public improvements
and retire the indebtedness in whole or in part from local excise tax
allocation revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, and sales
and use taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 that it
receives, subject to the following requirements:
(a)(i) The ordinance adopted by the sponsoring local government and
authorizing the use of local infrastructure financing indicates an
intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of this
indebtedness that is contemplated; and
(((b))) (ii) The sponsoring local government includes this
statement of the intent in all notices required by RCW 39.102.100; or
(b) The sponsoring local government adopts a resolution, after
opportunity for public comment, that indicates an intent to incur this
indebtedness and the maximum amount of this indebtedness that is
contemplated.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the general
indebtedness incurred under subsection (1) of this section may be
payable from other tax revenues, the full faith and credit of the local
government, and nontax income, revenues, fees, and rents from the
public improvements, as well as contributions, grants, and nontax money
available to the local government for payment of costs of the public
improvements or associated debt service on the general indebtedness.
(b) A sponsoring local government that issues bonds under this
section shall not pledge any money received from the state of
Washington for the payment of such bonds, other than the local sales
and use taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.475 and
collected by the department.
(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, a sponsoring local government designating a revenue
development area and authorizing the use of local infrastructure
financing may require the nonpublic participant to provide adequate
security to protect the public investment in the public improvement
within the revenue development area.
(4) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by
ordinance of the governing body of the sponsoring local government and
may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates,
be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest
at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in
such form either coupon or registered as provided in RCW 39.46.030,
carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or
priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of
payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of
redemption with or without premium, be secured in such manner, and have
such other characteristics, as may be provided by such ordinance or
trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.
(5) The sponsoring local government may annually pay into a fund to
be established for the benefit of bonds issued under this section a
fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any local excise tax allocation
revenues and local property tax allocation revenues derived from
property or business activity within the revenue development area
containing the public improvements funded by the bonds, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full. The
local government may also annually pay into the fund established in
this section a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of any revenues
derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475, such payment to
continue until all bonds payable from the fund are paid in full.
Revenues derived from taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.475 are subject to
the use restriction in RCW 39.102.130.
(6) In case any of the public officials of the sponsoring local
government whose signatures appear on any bonds or any coupons issued
under this chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery
of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and
sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained
in office until such delivery. Any provision of any law to the
contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued under this chapter are fully
negotiable.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (4) through (6) of this section,
bonds issued under this section may be issued and sold in accordance
with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.102.195 and 2007 c 229 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
To the extent that amounts received as local excise tax allocation
revenues, local property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from
local public sources, that are dedicated to local infrastructure
financing, and revenues received from the local option sales and use
tax authorized in RCW 82.14.475, are set aside in a debt service fund
that is pledged to the repayment of bonds, those amounts so set aside
and pledged may not be used to pay for public improvement costs on a
pay-as-you-go basis after the date that the sponsoring local government
that issued the bonds as provided in RCW 39.102.150 is required to
begin paying debt service on those bonds, unless and until those bonds
to which the amounts have been so pledged have been retired.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.14.475 and 2007 c 229 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government, and any cosponsoring local
government, that has been approved by the board to use local
infrastructure financing may impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter and subject to the criteria set forth in
this section. Except as provided in this section, the tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing
jurisdiction of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local
government. ((The rate of tax shall not exceed the rate provided in
RCW 82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any other local sales and
use taxes imposed on the same taxable events that are credited against
the state sales and use taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW. The rate of tax may be changed only on the first day of a fiscal
year as needed. Notice of rate changes must be provided to the
department on the first day of March to be effective on July 1st of the
next fiscal year.))
(2) The tax authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall
be credited against the state taxes imposed under ((chapter 82.08 or
82.12)) RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 at the rate provided in RCW
82.08.020(1). The department shall perform the collection of such
taxes on behalf of the sponsoring local government or cosponsoring
local government at no cost to the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government and shall remit the taxes as provided in
RCW 82.14.060.
(3) The aggregate rate of tax imposed by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, must not exceed the
lesser of:
(a) The rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1) less:
(i) The aggregate rates of all other local sales and use taxes
imposed by any taxing authority on the same taxable events;
(ii) The aggregate rates of all taxes under RCW 82.14.465 and this
section that are authorized to be imposed on the same taxable events
but have not yet been imposed by a sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government that has been approved by the department
or the community economic revitalization board to receive a state
contribution under chapters 39.100 or 39.102 RCW; and
(iii) The percentage amount of distributions required under RCW
82.08.020(5) multiplied by the rate of state taxes imposed under RCW
82.08.020(1); and
(b) The rate, as determined by the sponsoring local government, and
any cosponsoring local government, in consultation with the department,
reasonably necessary to receive the state contribution over ten months.
(4) Sponsoring local governments that have been approved before
October 1, 2008, by the community economic revitalization board for a
state contribution must select the rate of tax under this section no
later than September 1, 2009.
(5) The department, upon request, must assist a sponsoring local
government and cosponsoring local government in establishing their tax
rate in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. Once the rate
of tax is selected, it may not be increased.
(6)(a) No tax may be imposed under the authority of this section:
(i) Before July 1, 2008;
(ii) Before July 1st of the second calendar year following the year
approval by the board under RCW 39.102.040 was made; and
(iii) ((Before the sponsoring local government has received local
excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax allocation revenues,
or both, during the preceding calendar year)) Before the state excise
tax allocation revenues and state property tax allocation revenues for
the preceding calendar year equal or exceed the amount of project award
approved by the board under RCW 39.102.040.
(b) The tax imposed under this section shall expire when ((the
bonds)) all indebtedness issued under the authority of RCW 39.102.150
((are)) is retired and all other contractual obligations relating to
the financing of public improvements under chapter 39.102 RCW are
satisfied, but not more than twenty-five years after the tax is first
imposed.
(((4))) (7) An ordinance adopted by the legislative authority of a
sponsoring local government or cosponsoring local government imposing
a tax under this section shall provide that:
(a) The tax shall first be imposed on the first day of a fiscal
year;
(b) The cumulative amount of tax received by the sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, in any fiscal year
shall not exceed the amount of the state contribution;
(c) The tax shall cease to be distributed for the remainder of any
fiscal year in which either:
(i) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government,
and any cosponsoring local government, equals the amount of the state
contribution;
(ii) The amount of revenue from taxes imposed under this section by
all sponsoring and cosponsoring local governments equals the annual
state contribution limit; or
(iii) The amount of tax received by the sponsoring local government
equals the amount of project award granted in the approval notice
described in RCW 39.102.040;
(d) Neither the local excise tax allocation revenues nor the local
property tax allocation revenues may constitute more than eighty
percent of the total local funds as described in RCW
39.102.020(((29)(c))) (28)(b). This requirement applies beginning
January 1st of the fifth calendar year after the calendar year in which
the sponsoring local government begins allocating local excise tax
allocation revenues under RCW 39.102.110;
(e) The tax shall be distributed again, should it cease to be
distributed for any of the reasons provided in (c) of this subsection,
at the beginning of the next fiscal year, subject to the restrictions
in this section; and
(f) Any revenue generated by the tax in excess of the amounts
specified in (c) of this subsection shall belong to the state of
Washington.
(((5))) (8) If a county and city cosponsor a revenue development
area, the ((combined rates of the city and county tax shall not exceed
the rate provided in RCW 82.08.020(1), less the aggregate rates of any
other local sales and use taxes imposed on the same taxable events that
are credited against the state sales and use taxes imposed under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The)) combined amount of distributions
received by both the city and county may not exceed the state
contribution.
(((6))) (9) The department shall determine the amount of tax
receipts distributed to each sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, imposing sales and use tax under this
section and shall advise a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government
when tax distributions for the fiscal year equal the amount of state
contribution for that fiscal year as provided in subsection (((8)))
(11) of this section. Determinations by the department of the amount
of tax distributions attributable to each sponsoring or cosponsoring
local government are final and shall not be used to challenge the
validity of any tax imposed under this section. The department shall
remit any tax receipts in excess of the amounts specified in subsection
(((4))) (7)(c) of this section to the state treasurer who shall deposit
the money in the general fund.
(((7))) (10) If a sponsoring or cosponsoring local government fails
to comply with RCW 39.102.140, no tax may be distributed in the
subsequent fiscal year until such time as the sponsoring or
cosponsoring local government complies and the department calculates
the state contribution amount for such fiscal year.
(((8))) (11) Each year, the amount of taxes approved by the
department for distribution to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government in the next fiscal year shall be equal to the state
contribution and shall be no more than the total local funds as
described in RCW 39.102.020(((29)(c))) (28)(b). The department shall
consider information from reports described in RCW 39.102.140 when
determining the amount of state contributions for each fiscal year. A
sponsoring or cosponsoring local government shall not receive, in any
fiscal year, more revenues from taxes imposed under the authority of
this section than the amount approved annually by the department. The
department shall not approve the receipt of more distributions of sales
and use tax under this section to a sponsoring or cosponsoring local
government than is authorized under subsection (((4))) (7) of this
section.
(((9))) (12) The amount of tax distributions received from taxes
imposed under the authority of this section by all sponsoring and
cosponsoring local governments is limited annually to not more than
seven million five hundred thousand dollars.
(((10))) (13) The definitions in RCW 39.102.020 apply to this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(((11))) (14) If a sponsoring local government is a federally
recognized Indian tribe, the distribution of the sales and use tax
authorized under this section shall be authorized through an interlocal
agreement pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(((12))) (15) Subject to RCW 39.102.195, the tax imposed under the
authority of this section may be applied either to provide for the
payment of debt service on bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 by the
sponsoring local government or to pay public improvement costs on a
pay-as-you-go basis, or both.
(((13))) (16) The tax imposed under the authority of this section
shall cease to be imposed if the sponsoring local government or
cosponsoring local government fails to issue ((bonds)) indebtedness
under the authority of RCW 39.102.150, and fails to commence
construction on public improvements, by June 30th of the fifth fiscal
year in which the local tax authorized under this section is imposed.
(17) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Local sales and use taxes" means sales and use taxes imposed
by cities, counties, public facilities districts, and other local
governments under the authority of this chapter, chapter 67.28 or
67.40 RCW, or any other chapter, and that are credited against the
state sales and use taxes.
(b) "State sales and use taxes" means the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020(1) and the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 at the rate provided
in RCW 82.08.020(1).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act expires June 30, 2039.

--- END ---