BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.030 and 1989 c 12 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The specifications for every contract for the construction,
reconstruction, maintenance or repair of any public work to which the
state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by
its laws is a party, shall contain a provision stating the hourly
minimum rate of wage, not less than the prevailing rate of wage, which
may be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics in each trade or
occupation required for such public work employed in the performance of
the contract either by the contractor, subcontractor or other person
doing or contracting to do the whole or any part of the work
contemplated by the contract, and the contract shall contain a
stipulation that such laborers, workers, or mechanics shall be paid not
less than such specified hourly minimum rate of wage. If the awarding
agency determines that the work contracted for meets the definition of
residential construction, the contract must include that information.
(2) If the hourly minimum rate of wage stated in the contract
specifies residential construction rates and it is later determined
that the work performed is commercial and subject to commercial
construction rates, the state, county, municipality, or political
subdivision that entered into the contract must pay the difference
between the residential rate stated and the actual commercial rate to
the contractor, subcontractor, or other person doing or contracting to
do the whole or any part of the work under the contract.

--- END ---