BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Employee" means a corrections officer or sergeant employed by
a county jail located in a county with a population of more than one
million five hundred thousand.
(b) "Employer" means a county that is primarily responsible for the
operation of a jail.
(c) "Jail" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.48.020.
(d) "Overtime" means the hours worked in excess of an agreed upon,
predetermined, regularly scheduled shift within a twenty-four hour
period not to exceed eight and seventeen one-hundredths hours in a
twenty-four hour period or forty and eighty-five one-hundredths hours
in a seven-day period, where the hours are worked in only five out of
the seven days.
(e) "Reasonable efforts" means that the employer, to the extent
reasonably possible, does all of the following but is unable to obtain
staffing coverage:
(i) Seeks individuals to volunteer to work extra time from all
available qualified staff who are working; and
(ii) Contacts qualified employees who have made themselves
available to work extra time.
(f) "Unforeseeable emergent circumstance" means any unforeseen (i)
declared national, state, or municipal emergency; or (ii) event that
poses a substantial risk for public safety or the safety of other
corrections officers.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an
employee may not be required to work more than four hours of overtime
per day. An employee may volunteer for additional overtime. The
refusal of an employee to volunteer for overtime work is not grounds
for discrimination, dismissal, discharge, or any other penalty, threat
of reports for discipline, or employment decision adverse to the
employee.
(3) An employee may be required to work more than four hours of
overtime per day if the employer has sought employee volunteers and has
not had enough employees volunteer to meet sufficient staffing levels
and:
(a) The work is due to an unforeseeable emergent circumstance; or
(b) The employer documents that the employer has used reasonable
efforts to obtain staffing. An employer has not used reasonable
efforts to obtain staffing if overtime work is used to fill vacancies
resulting from chronic staff shortages.

--- END ---