BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature has long recognized that
high-wage, high-skilled jobs are vital to the economic health of the
state and its citizens. The legislature also recognizes that targeted
tax incentives encourage the formation of high-wage, high-skilled jobs.
For that and related reasons, the legislature established the tax
deferral program in chapter 82.63 RCW for high-technology research and
development and pilot scale manufacturing. In doing so, the
legislature ensured that the deferral applies to the construction or
renovation of one or more buildings by an owner who engages in
qualifying research and development or pilot scale manufacturing. The
legislature also ensured that the deferral applies to owners who lease
newly constructed or renovated buildings to one or more lessees that
conduct qualifying research and development or pilot scale
manufacturing, if the owner passes on the economic benefit of the
deferral to the lessee or lessees. However, current language could be
interpreted to deny the deferral to multiple lessors of separate
buildings leasing to a single qualifying lessee under the umbrella of
one project and a single deferral application, unless the lessors form
a joint venture or similar entity. Because the legislature did not
intend to deny the deferral for such projects, the legislature by this
act, amends chapter 82.63 RCW to clarify that the deferral applies to
an otherwise qualifying project involving a single deferral application
covering multiple lessors leasing separate buildings to a single
qualifying lessee.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.63.010 and 2004 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing
and developing of computing hardware and software, including
innovations in designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held
calculators to super computers, and peripheral equipment.
(2) "Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic
materials, composites, polymers, and biomaterials.
(3) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(4) "Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular
biology, genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and
new bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to
produce or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small
molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems
into useful processes and products or to develop microorganisms for
specific uses.
(5) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(6) "Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and
instrumentation; radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter
electronics; optical and optic-electrical devices; and data and digital
communications and imaging devices.
(7) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project which
either initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current
operation by expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility.
The lessor or owner of the qualified building is not eligible for a
deferral unless:
(a) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(b)(i) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(ii) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.63.020(2); and
(iii) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is
no less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced
by written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(8) "Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of
threats or damage to human health or the environment, environmental
cleanup, and the development of alternative energy sources.
(9) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction or improvement
of the project.
(10) "Multiple qualified buildings" means qualified buildings
leased to the same person when such structures: (a) Are located within
a five-mile radius; and (b) the initiation of construction of each
building begins within a sixty-month period.
(11) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030 and includes
state universities as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(((11))) (12) "Pilot scale manufacturing" means design,
construction, and testing of preproduction prototypes and models in the
fields of biotechnology, advanced computing, electronic device
technology, advanced materials, and environmental technology other than
for commercial sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sale"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(((12))) (13) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the
purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for pilot
scale manufacturing or qualified research and development, including
plant offices and other facilities that are an essential or an integral
part of a structure used for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified
research and development. If a building ((is)) or buildings are used
partly for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and
development, and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral
shall be determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under
rules adopted by the department. Such rules may include provisions for
determining the amount of the deferral based on apportionment of costs
of construction of an investment project consisting of a building or
multiple buildings, where qualified research and development or pilot
scale manufacturing activities are shifted within a building or from
one building to another building.
(((13))) (14) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures,
equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and necessary
part of a pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment,
instrumentation, and other devices used in a process of experimentation
to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant process, product,
formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies;
vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For
purposes of this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be
either new to the taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the
certificate holder, except that used machinery and equipment may be
treated as qualified machinery and equipment if the certificate holder
either brings the machinery and equipment into Washington or makes a
retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in Washington or
elsewhere.
(((14))) (15) "Qualified research and development" means research
and development performed within this state in the fields of advanced
computing, advanced materials, biotechnology, electronic device
technology, and environmental technology.
(((15))) (16) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((16))) (17) "Research and development" means activities performed
to discover technological information, and technical and nonroutine
activities concerned with translating technological information into
new or improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, inventions,
or software. The term includes exploration of a new use for an
existing drug, device, or biological product if the new use requires
separate licensing by the federal food and drug administration under
chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include adaptation
or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the
term include surveys and studies, social science and humanities
research, market research or testing, quality control, sale promotion
and service, computer software developed for internal use, and research
in areas such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(((17))) (18)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that
a building permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW
19.27.031 for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (7) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" shall apply separately to each phase.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.63.020 and 2004 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of construction of, or acquisition of equipment
or machinery for the investment project. In the case of an investment
project involving multiple qualified buildings, applications must be
made for, and before the initiation of construction of, each qualified
building. The application shall be made to the department in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the investment project, the
applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department shall rule on
the application within sixty days.
(2)(a) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness
are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for deferral of taxes under this chapter shall
((agree to)) complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee shall ((agree to)) complete the annual survey and the
applicant is not required to complete the annual survey. The survey is
due by March 31st of the year following the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally complete and the seven succeeding calendar years. The
survey shall include the amount of tax deferred, the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at
the investment project. The survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(4) The department shall use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2009, and December 1, 2013.
The reports shall measure the effect of the program on job creation,
the number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth,
the introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the case of multiple qualified buildings, if the lessee who
will conduct the qualified research and development or pilot scale
manufacturing within the multiple qualified buildings desires to treat
the multiple qualified buildings as a single investment project, the
lessee must make a preliminary election to treat the multiple qualified
buildings as a single investment project. The lessee must make the
preliminary election before a temporary certificate of occupancy, or
its equivalent, is issued for any of the multiple qualified buildings.
(2)(a) A final election whether or not to treat the multiple
qualified buildings as a single investment project must be made by the
date that is the earlier of:
(i) Sixty months following the date that the lessee made the
preliminary election under subsection (1) of this section; or
(ii) Thirty days after the issuance of the temporary certificate of
occupancy, or its equivalent, for the last qualified building to be
completed and that will be included in the final election.
(b) All buildings included in a final election to treat multiple
qualified buildings as a single investment project must have been
issued a temporary certificate of occupancy or its equivalent.
(c) Before the final election is made, the lessee may remove one or
more of the qualified buildings included in the preliminary election
from the investment project.
(d) When a qualified building for which a preliminary election has
been made under subsection (1) of this section is, for any reason, not
included in a final election to treat the multiple qualified buildings
as a single investment project, the qualified building will be treated
as an individual investment project under the original application for
that building.
(e) If a final election is made not to treat the multiple qualified
buildings as a single investment project or a final election is not
made by the deadline in (a) of this subsection, the qualified buildings
will each be treated as individual investment projects under the
original applications for those buildings.
(3) When a final election is made to treat multiple qualified
buildings as a single investment project, the department must review
the investment project to determine whether to certify the investment
project as being operationally complete. If the department certifies
that an investment project is operationally complete, the certification
is deemed to have occurred in the calendar year in which the final
election is made.
(4) The department may not certify as operationally complete an
investment project consisting of multiple qualifying buildings unless
the lessee furnishes the department with a bond, letter of credit, or
other security acceptable to the department in an amount equal to the
repayment obligation as determined by the department. The department
may decrease the secured amount each year as the repayment obligation
decreases under the provisions of RCW 82.63.045. If the lessee does
not furnish the department with a bond, letter of credit, or other
security acceptable to the department equal to the amount of deferred
tax, the qualified buildings will each be treated as individual
investment projects under the original applications for those
buildings.
(5) The preliminary election and final election must be made in a
form and manner prescribed by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.63.045 and 2004 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, taxes
deferred under this chapter need not be repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of survey under RCW 82.63.020 or other
information, the department finds that an investment project is used
for purposes other than qualified research and development or pilot
scale manufacturing at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes shall be
immediately due according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.63.020 by the date due, 12.5 percent of
the deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee ((shall be)) is responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit.
(c) If an investment project is used for purposes other than
qualified research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any
time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified as having been operationally complete and the recipient of
the deferral fails to complete the annual survey due under RCW
82.63.020, the portion of deferred taxes immediately due is the amount
on the schedule in (a) of this subsection. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee ((shall be)) is responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, in the case
of an investment project consisting of multiple qualified buildings,
the lessee is solely liable for payment of any deferred tax determined
by the department to be due and payable under this section beginning on
the date the department certifies that the project is operationally
complete.
(b) This subsection does not relieve the lessors of its obligation
to the lessee under RCW 82.63.010(7) to pass the economic benefit of
the deferral to the lessee.
(4) The department shall assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(((4))) (5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section,
deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.63 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may adopt rules as may be necessary to administer
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act applies to deferral applications
received by the department of revenue after June 30, 2007.

--- END ---