BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Part I.
Income Limit for Business and Occupation
Tax Exemptions for Agricultural Products
Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.330 and 2001 c 118 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to amounts under two hundred
thousand dollars derived by any farmer that sells any agricultural
product at wholesale or to any farmer who grows, raises, or produces
agricultural products owned by others, such as custom feed operations.
This exemption ((shall)) does not apply to any person selling such
products at retail or to any person selling manufactured substances or
articles.
This chapter ((shall)) also does not apply to any persons who
participate in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture
with respect to land enrolled in that program.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.410 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 15 are each amended
to read as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to amounts under two hundred
thousand dollars derived by persons engaged in the production and sale
of hatching eggs or poultry for use in the production for sale of
poultry or poultry products.

Part II.
Public Utility Tax--Removing Urban Category
Sec. 201 RCW 82.16.010 and 2007 c 6 s 1023 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It ((shall)) does not, however,
include any business herein defined as ((an urban)) a transportation
business.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(3) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(4) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(5) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(6) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(7) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(8) "((Motor)) Transportation business" means the business
(((except urban transportation business))) of operating any motor
propelled vehicle by which persons or property of others are conveyed
for hire, and includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any
motor propelled vehicle as an auto transportation company (((except
urban transportation business))), common carrier or contract carrier as
defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
"((motor)) transportation business" ((shall)) does not mean or include
the transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon
private roads or private highways.
(((9) "Urban)) "Transportation business" also means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire((, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the
corporate limits of any city or town, or within five miles of the
corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating entirely within and between
cities and towns whose corporate limits are not more than five miles
apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of either thereof)).
Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the business
of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or
destined to a point within or without the state, whether or not such
collection or distribution be made by the person performing a local or
interstate line-haul of such property.
(((10))) (9)(a) "Public service business" means any of the
businesses defined in subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7),
and (8)((, and (9))) of this section or any business subject to control
by the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the duties
incident thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature
to be of a public service nature, except telephone business and low-
level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW
81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope
hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll
bridge, toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (((10))) (9)(b) apply
throughout this subsection (((10))) (9).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(((11))) (10) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating
tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or
pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(((12))) (11) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing
from the performance of the particular public service or transportation
business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without
any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or
sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount,
delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued
and without any deduction on account of losses.
(((13))) (12) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) ((Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor)) Transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and ((eight-tenths)) seventy-five hundredths of one
percent;
(((g))) (e) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths
percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on the act or privilege of
engaging within this state in any one or more of the businesses
mentioned in subsection (1)(a) through (c), and (e) of this section
equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030 multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Part III.
Membership Dues and Fees
Sec. 301 RCW 82.04.4282 and 1994 c 124 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) dues and initiation fees paid to
nonprofit organizations exempt from the federal income tax under Title
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(8), (c)(10), or
(c)(19) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended as of January
1, 2009, (2) ((dues, (3))) contributions, (((4))) (3) donations,
(((5))) (4) tuition fees, (((6))) (5) charges made by a nonprofit trade
or professional organization for attending or occupying space at a
trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by the
nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show,
convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public,
(((7))) (6) charges made for operation of privately operated
kindergartens, and (((8))) (7) endowment funds. This section shall not
be construed to exempt any person, association, or society from tax
liability upon selling tangible personal property or upon providing
facilities or services for which a special charge is made to members or
others. If dues are in exchange for any significant amount of goods or
services rendered by the recipient thereof to members without any
additional charge to the member, or if the dues are graduated upon the
amount of goods or services rendered, the value of such goods or
services shall not be considered as a deduction under this section.

Part IV.
Public Utility Tax Deduction for Irrigation
Sec. 401 RCW 82.16.050 and 2007 c 330 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the gross income the
following items:
(1) Amounts derived by municipally owned or operated public service
businesses, directly from taxes levied for the support or maintenance
thereof. This subsection may not be construed to exempt service
charges which are spread on the property tax rolls and collected as
taxes;
(2) Amounts derived from the sale of commodities to persons in the
same public service business as the seller, for resale as such within
this state. This deduction is allowed only with respect to water
distribution, gas distribution or other public service businesses which
furnish water, gas or any other commodity in the performance of public
service businesses;
(3) Amounts actually paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable
under this chapter as the latter's portion of the consideration due for
services furnished jointly by both, if the total amount has been
credited to and appears in the gross income reported for tax by the
former;
(4) The amount of cash discount actually taken by the purchaser or
customer;
(5) The amount of bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003, on which tax was
previously paid under this chapter;
(6) Amounts derived from business which the state is prohibited
from taxing under the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or
laws of the United States;
(7) Amounts derived from the distribution of water through an
irrigation system, for ((irrigation)) agricultural purposes;
(8) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in this state to final destination outside this state,
or from points of origin outside this state to final destination in
this state, with respect to which the carrier grants to the shipper the
privilege of stopping the shipment in transit at some point in this
state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing, milling, or other
processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or its
equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate
from point of origin to final destination;
(9) Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from
points of origin in the state to an export elevator, wharf, dock or
ship side on tidewater or its navigable tributaries to be forwarded,
without intervening transportation, by vessel, in their original form,
to interstate or foreign destinations. No deduction is allowed under
this subsection when the point of origin and the point of delivery to
the export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side are located within the
corporate limits of the same city or town;
(10) Amounts derived from the transportation of agricultural
commodities, not including manufactured substances or articles, from
points of origin in the state to interim storage facilities in this
state for transshipment, without intervening transportation, to an
export elevator, wharf, dock, or ship side on tidewater or its
navigable tributaries to be forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations. If agricultural commodities are transshipped
from interim storage facilities in this state to storage facilities at
a port on tidewater or its navigable tributaries, the same agricultural
commodity dealer must operate both the interim storage facilities and
the storage facilities at the port.
(a) The deduction under this subsection is available only when the
person claiming the deduction obtains a certificate from the
agricultural commodity dealer operating the interim storage facilities,
in a form and manner prescribed by the department, certifying that:
(i) More than ninety-six percent of all of the type of agricultural
commodity delivered by the person claiming the deduction under this
subsection and delivered by all other persons to the dealer's interim
storage facilities during the preceding calendar year was shipped by
vessel in original form to interstate or foreign destinations; and
(ii) Any of the agricultural commodity that is transshipped to
ports on tidewater or its navigable tributaries will be received at
storage facilities operated by the same agricultural commodity dealer
and will be shipped from such facilities, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or
foreign destinations.
(b) As used in this subsection, "agricultural commodity" has the
same meaning as agricultural product in RCW 82.04.213;
(11) Amounts derived from the production, sale, or transfer of
electrical energy for resale within or outside the state or for
consumption outside the state;
(12) Amounts derived from the distribution of water by a nonprofit
water association and used for capital improvements by that nonprofit
water association;
(13) Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business taxable under
RCW 82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the
treatment or disposal of sewage;
(14) Amounts derived from fees or charges imposed on persons for
transit services provided by a public transportation agency. For the
purposes of this subsection, "public transportation agency" means a
municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and urban public
transportation systems, as defined in RCW 47.04.082. Public
transportation agencies shall spend an amount equal to the reduction in
tax provided by this tax deduction solely to adjust routes to improve
access for citizens using food banks and senior citizen services or to
extend or add new routes to assist low-income citizens and seniors.

Part V.
Tax Exemption Repeals
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.350 (Exemptions -- Racing) and 2005 c 369 s 7 & 1961 c
15 s 82.04.350;
(2) RCW 82.08.0261 (Exemptions -- Sales of personal property for use
connected with private or common carriers in interstate or foreign
commerce) and 1980 c 37 s 28; and
(3) RCW 82.08.0257 (Exemptions -- Auction sales of tangible personal
property used in farming) and 1980 c 37 s 25.

Part V.
Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 201 and 202 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2009.

--- END ---