BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the current
student transportation funding formula is outdated and does not
adequately address the costs incurred by school districts in
transporting students. The legislature further finds that an
appropriate new formula based on reliable data from a uniform reporting
system used by all districts, providing incentives for efficient use of
state resources, and maintaining local school district control over
operational decisions within the transportation program has been
developed under a contract with the office of financial management.
Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to respond to the findings of
the 2006 pupil transportation funding study by the joint legislative
audit and review committee by providing additional payments to
districts to mitigate funding discrepancies identified by the study,
until such time as the new funding formula can be implemented in a
thoughtful and deliberative manner no later than the 2011-12 school
year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.160.150 and 1996 c 279 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds allocated for transportation costs shall be in addition to
the basic education allocation. The distribution formula developed in
RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be for allocation purposes
only and shall not be construed as mandating specific levels of pupil
transportation services by local districts. Operating costs as
determined under RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.180 shall be funded at
one hundred percent or as close thereto as reasonably possible for
transportation of an eligible student to and from school as defined in
RCW 28A.160.160(3). In addition, funding shall be provided for
transportation services for students living within ((one radius mile
from)) the walk to school area as determined under RCW
((28A.160.180(2))) 28A.160.160(5).

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.160.160 and 1996 c 279 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.190, except where
the context shall clearly indicate otherwise, the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Eligible student" means any student served by the
transportation program of a school district or compensated for
individual transportation arrangements authorized by RCW 28A.160.030
whose route stop is ((more than one radius mile from the)) outside the
walk area for a student's school, except if the student to be
transported is disabled under RCW 28A.155.020 and is either not
ambulatory or not capable of protecting his or her own welfare while
traveling to or from the school or agency where special education
services are provided, in which case no mileage distance restriction
applies.
(2) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of public
instruction.
(3) "To and from school" means the transportation of students for
the following purposes:
(a) Transportation to and from route stops and schools;
(b) Transportation to and from schools pursuant to an interdistrict
agreement pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160;
(c) Transportation of students between schools and learning centers
for instruction specifically required by statute; and
(d) Transportation of students with disabilities to and from
schools and agencies for special education services.
Academic extended day transportation for programs provided under
RCW 28A.150.200 (basic education act), chapter 28A.155 RCW (special
education), RCW 28A.165.015 through 28A.165.075 (learning assistance
program), or RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 (transitional
bilingual instruction program) shall ((not)) be considered part of
transportation of students "to and from school" for the purposes of
((chapter 61, Laws of 1983 1st ex. sess)) this section. Transportation
for field trips may not be considered part of transportation of
students "to and from school" under this section.
(4) "Transportation services" for students living within one radius
mile from school means school transportation services including the use
of buses, funding of crossing guards, and matching funds for local and
state transportation projects intended to mitigate hazardous walking
conditions. Priority for transportation services shall be given to
students in grades kindergarten through five.
(5) The "walk area" means that area around a school with an
adequate roadway configuration to provide students access to school
with a walking distance of less than one mile. Mileage must be
measured along the shortest roadway or maintained public walkway where
hazardous conditions do not exist. The hazardous conditions must be
documented by a process established in rule by the superintendent of
public instruction and must include roadway, environmental, and social
conditions. Each elementary school shall identify walk routes within
the walk area.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.160.170 and 2007 c 139 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each district shall submit three times each year to the
superintendent of public instruction during October, February, and May
of each year a report containing the following:
(1)(a) The number of eligible students transported to and from
school as provided for in RCW 28A.160.150 ((for the current school year
and the number of miles estimated to be driven for pupil transportation
services)), along with ((a map describing student route))
identification of stop locations and school locations, and (b) the
number of miles driven for pupil transportation services as authorized
in RCW 28A.160.150 the previous school year; and
(2) Other operational data and descriptions as required by the
superintendent to determine allocation requirements for each district.
The superintendent shall require that districts separate the costs of
operating the program for the transportation of eligible students to
and from school as defined by RCW 28A.160.160(3) from non-to-and-from-school pupil transportation costs in the annual financial statement.
The cost, quantity, and type of all fuel purchased by school districts
for use in to-and-from-school transportation will be included in the
annual financial statement.
Each district shall submit the information required in this section
on a timely basis as a condition of the continuing receipt of school
transportation moneys.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.160.180 and 1996 c 279 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each district's annual student transportation allocation shall be
((based on differential rates)) determined by the superintendent of
public instruction in the following manner:
(1) The superintendent shall annually calculate ((a standard
student mile allocation rate for determining)) the transportation
allocation for those services provided for in RCW 28A.160.150.
(("Standard student mile allocation rate," as used in this chapter,
means the per mile allocation rate for transporting an eligible
student.)) The ((standard student mile)) allocation ((rate)) formula
may be adjusted to include such additional differential factors as
((distance; restricted)) basic and special passenger ((load;
circumstances that require use of special types of transportation
vehicles; student with disabilities load; and small fleet maintenance))
counts, average distance to school, and number of locations served.
(2) ((For transportation services for students living within one
radius mile from school,)) The allocation shall be based on a
regression analysis of the number of basic and special students ((in
grades kindergarten through five living within one radius mile as
specified in the biennial appropriations act)) transported and as many
other site characteristics that are identified as being statistically
significant.
(3) ((The superintendent of public instruction shall annually
calculate allocation rate(s), which shall include vehicle amortization,
for determining)) The transportation allocation for transporting
students in district-owned passenger cars, as defined in RCW 46.04.382,
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.010 for services provided for in RCW
28A.160.150 if a school district deems it advisable to use such
vehicles after the school district board of directors has considered
the safety of the students being transported as well as the economy of
utilizing a district-owned passenger car in lieu of a school bus is the
private vehicle reimbursement rate in effect on September 1st of each
school year. Students transported in district-owned passenger cars
must be included in the corresponding basic or special passenger
counts.
(4) Prior to June 1st of each year the superintendent shall submit
to the office of financial management, and the education and fiscal
committees ((on education and ways and means of the senate and house of
representatives)) of the legislature, a report outlining the
methodology and rationale used in determining the statistical
coefficients for each site characteristic used to determine the
allocation ((rates to be used)) for the following year.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.160.190 and 1990 c 33 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent shall notify districts of their student
transportation allocation before January 15th. ((If the number of
eligible students in a school district changes ten percent or more from
the October report, and the change is maintained for a period of twenty
consecutive school days or more, the district may submit revised
eligible student data to the superintendent of public instruction.))
The superintendent shall((, to the extent funds are available,))
recalculate and prorate the district's allocation for the
transportation of pupils to and from school.
The superintendent shall make the student transportation allocation
in accordance with the apportionment payment schedule in RCW
28A.510.250. Such allocation payments may be based on ((estimated
amounts)) the prior school year's ridership report for payments to be
made in September, October, November, December, and January.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that the
allocation formula results in adequate appropriation for low enrollment
districts, nonhigh districts, districts involved in cooperative
transportation agreements, and cooperative special transportation
services operated by educational service districts. If necessary, the
superintendent shall develop a separate process to adjust the
allocation of the districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall encourage efficient
use of state resources by providing a linear programming process that
compares school district transportation operations. If a school
district's operation is calculated to be less than ninety percent
efficient, the regional transportation coordinators shall provide an
individual review to determine what measures are available to the
school district to improve efficiency. The evaluation will include
such measures as:
(1) Efficient routing of buses;
(2) Efficient use of vehicle capacity; and
(3) Reasonable controls on compensation costs.
The superintendent shall submit to the fiscal and education
committees of the legislature no later than December 1st of each year
a report summarizing the efficiency reviews and the resulting changes
implemented by school districts in response to the recommendations of
the regional transportation coordinators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The superintendent of public instruction
shall implement the new distribution formula for allocating state funds
to school districts for transportation of students to and from school,
beginning with the 2011-12 school year.
(a) The formula must be developed and revised on an ongoing basis
using the major cost factors in student transportation, including basic
and special student loads, school district land area, average distance
to school, roadway miles, and number of locations served. Factors will
include all those site characteristics that are statistically
significant after analysis of the data required by the revised
reporting process.
(b) The formula must allocate funds to school districts based on
the average predicted costs of transporting students to and from
school, using a regression analysis.
(2) The superintendent shall develop, implement, and provide a copy
of the rules specifying the student transportation reporting
requirements to the legislature and school districts no later than
December 1, 2009.
(3) Beginning in December 2009, and continuing until December 2014,
the superintendent shall provide quarterly updates and progress reports
to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation and
testing of the distribution formula.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 2 through 7 of this act take
effect September 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 8 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2013.

--- END ---