BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) The deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and
technology advancements enhance economic development and public safety
for the state's communities, and offers improved health care, access to
consumer and legal services, increased educational and civic
participation opportunities, and a better quality of life for the
state's residents.
(2) Improvements in the deployment and adoption of high-speed
internet services and the strategic inclusion of technology
advancements and technology education are critical to ensuring that
Washington remains competitive and continues to provide a skilled
workforce, attract businesses, and stimulate job growth.
(3) The state must encourage and support strategic partnerships of
public, private, nonprofit, and community-based sectors in the
continued growth and development of high-speed internet services and
information technology for state residents and businesses. This
includes ensuring digital inclusion in internet access, computer
literacy, and information content, so that all Washingtonians are able
to obtain and utilize broadband fully, regardless of location, economic
status, literacy level, age, disability, size of business, or business
entity structure.
(4) In light of the importance of broadband deployment and adoption
to the economy, health, safety, and welfare of the people of
Washington, it is essential that the legislature authorize a broadband
programs management structure and an advisory council capable of
developing and ensuring the implementation of statewide broadband
strategies.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.32.010 and 2008 c 262 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The community technology opportunity program is created to support
the efforts of community technology programs throughout the state. The
community technology opportunity program must be administered by the
((Washington State University extension, in consultation with the))
department of information services. The ((Washington State University
extension)) department may contract for services in order to carry out
the ((extension's)) department's obligations under this section.
(1) In implementing the community technology opportunity program
the administrator must, to the extent funds are appropriated for this
purpose:
(a) Provide organizational and capacity building support to
community technology programs throughout the state, and identify and
facilitate the availability of other public and private sources of
funds to enhance the purposes of the program and the work of community
technology programs. No more than fifteen percent of funds received by
the administrator for the program may be expended on these functions;
(b) Establish a competitive grant program and provide grants to
community technology programs to provide training and skill-building
opportunities; access to hardware and software; internet connectivity;
assistance in the adoption of information and communication
technologies in low-income and underserved areas of the state; and
development of locally relevant content and delivery of vital services
through technology.
(2) Grant applicants must:
(a) Provide evidence that the applicant is a nonprofit entity or a
public entity that is working in partnership with a nonprofit entity;
(b) Define the geographic area or population to be served;
(c) Include in the application the results of a needs assessment
addressing, in the geographic area or among the population to be
served: The impact of inadequacies in technology access or knowledge,
barriers faced, and services needed;
(d) Explain in detail the strategy for addressing the needs
identified and an implementation plan including objectives, tasks, and
benchmarks for the applicant and the role that other organizations will
play in assisting the applicant's efforts;
(e) Provide evidence of matching funds and resources, which are
equivalent to at least one-quarter of the grant amount committed to the
applicant's strategy;
(f) Provide evidence that funds applied for, if received, will be
used to provide effective delivery of community technology services in
alignment with the goals of this program and to increase the
applicant's level of effort beyond the current level; and
(g) Comply with such other requirements as the administrator
establishes.
(3) The administrator may use no more than ten percent of funds
received for the community technology opportunity program to cover
administrative expenses.
(4) The administrator must establish expected program outcomes for
each grant recipient and must require grant recipients to provide an
annual accounting of program outcomes.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.32.020 and 2008 c 262 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the community technology opportunity
program administrator designated by the ((Washington State University
extension)) department.
(2) "Community technology programs" means ((a program, including a
digital inclusion program, engaged in diffusing information and
communications technology in local communities, particularly in
underserved areas. These programs may include, but are not limited to,
programs that provide education and skill-building opportunities,
hardware and software, internet connectivity, and development of
locally relevant content and delivery of vital services through
technology)) programs that are engaged in diffusing information and
communications technology in local communities, particularly in
unserved and underserved areas of the state. These programs may
include, but are not limited to, programs that provide education and
skill-building opportunities, hardware and software, internet
connectivity, development of locally relevant content, and delivery of
vital services through technology. Community technology programs are
usually provided by nonprofit or public agencies in public community
settings, including youth and community centers, small business and
workforce training centers, mutual assistance associations and
settlement houses, low-income housing units, libraries, or schools
opened for community programs.
(3) "Department" means the department of information services.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.32.030 and 2008 c 262 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington community technology opportunity account is
established in the state treasury. Donated funds from private and
public sources may be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for the operation of the community
technology opportunity program as provided in RCW 28B.32.010 (as
recodified by this act). Only the administrator or the administrator's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies with a minimum download
speed greater than or equal to seven hundred sixty-eight kilobits per
second and an upload speed greater than two hundred kilobits per
second.
(2) "Council" means the advisory council on digital inclusion
created in section 7 of this act.
(3) "Department" means the department of information services.
(4) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(5) "Underserved areas" means: (a) Areas in which high-speed
internet download speeds are less than seven hundred sixty-eight
kilobits per second and upload speeds are less than two hundred
kilobits per second; (b) any census tract that is located in a
federally designated empowerment zone, enterprise community, renewal
community, or low-income community; (c) an area with a significant
population of economically disadvantaged residents; or (d) an area in
which a significant population of the residents are not able to adopt
broadband because of disability, affordability of computers or
software, or a lack of technological literacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The authority for overseeing broadband
adoption and deployment efforts in the state is vested in the
department of information services.
(a) The department is the single eligible entity in the state to
receive a grant under the federal broadband data improvement act, P.L.
110-385.
(b) Funding received by the department under the federal broadband
data improvement act, P.L. 110-385, must be used in accordance with the
requirements of that act and, subject to those requirements, may be
distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities
in the state to achieve the purposes of that act.
(2) The department may apply for and oversee implementation of
federally funded or mandated broadband programs and may adopt rules to
administer the programs. These programs may include but are not
limited to the following:
(a) Contracting for and purchasing a completed map of privately
controlled or owned broadband infrastructure. The map may include, but
is not limited to, adoption information, availability information,
types of technology used, the physical location of broadband
infrastructure, and available speed tiers for high-speed internet;
(b) Engaging in periodic statewide surveys of residents,
businesses, and nonprofit organizations concerning their use and
adoption of high-speed internet and related information technology for
the purpose of identifying barriers to adoption;
(c) Working with communities to identify barriers to the adoption
of broadband service and related information technology services by
individuals, nonprofit organizations, and businesses;
(d) Identifying broadband demand opportunities in communities by
working cooperatively with local organizations, government agencies,
and businesses;
(e) Creating, implementing, and administering programs to improve
computer ownership, technology literacy, and high-speed internet access
for populations not currently served or underserved in the state. This
may include programs to provide low-income families, community-based
nonprofit organizations, nonprofit entities, and public entities that
work in partnership with nonprofit entities to provide increased access
to computers and broadband, with reduced cost internet access;
(f) Administering the community technology opportunity program
under chapter 28B.32 RCW (as recodified by this act); and
(g) Creating additional programs to spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the state, which may include, but is not
limited to:
(i) Applying for and receiving funding in the form of grants or
donations which may be deposited into the Washington community
technology opportunity account created in RCW 28B.32.030 (as recodified
by this act);
(ii) Establishing technology literacy and digital inclusion
programs and establishing low-cost hardware and software purchasing
programs;
(iii) Developing last-mile technology loan programs targeting small
businesses or businesses located in unserved and underserved areas; and
(iv) Including community technology organizations in state hardware
and software purchasing programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department shall reconvene the high-speed internet work group previously established by chapter 262, Laws
of 2008. The work group is renamed the advisory council on digital
inclusion, and is an advisory group to the department. The council
must include, but is not limited to, volunteer representatives from
community technology organizations, telecommunications providers,
higher education institutions, K-12 education institutions, public
health institutions, public housing entities, and governmental
entities that are engaged in community technology activities.
(2) The council shall prepare a report by January 15th of each year
and submit it to the department, the governor, and the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The report must contain:
(a) An analysis of how support from public and private sector
partnerships, the philanthropic community, and other not-for-profit
organizations in the community, along with strong relationships with
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and higher education institutions, could
establish a variety of high-speed internet access alternatives for
citizens;
(b) Proposed strategies for continued broadband deployment and
adoption efforts, as well as further development of advanced
telecommunications applications;
(c) Recommendations on methods for maximizing the state's research
and development capacity at universities and in the private sector for
developing advanced telecommunications applications;
(d) An identification of regulatory barriers that hinder the
advancement of technology entrepreneurship in the state and
recommendations on incentives to stimulate the demand for and
development of these applications and services; and
(e) An evaluation of programs designed to advance digital literacy
and computer access that are made available by the federal government,
local agencies, telecommunications providers, and business and
charitable entities.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.105.350 and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of compliance with section 2, chapter 262, Laws of
2008 or any subsequent high-speed internet deployment and adoption
initiative, the department ((of information services)), the department
of community, trade, and economic development, the utilities and
transportation commission, and any other government agent or agency
((shall not)) engaged in the high-speed internet mapping, deployment,
or adoption activities prescribed in this chapter may gather or request
any information related to high-speed internet infrastructure or
service from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services that is classified by the provider as proprietary or
competitively sensitive, as long as the proprietary or competitively
sensitive components of such information is maintained in a
confidential manner solely by a nongovernmental third-party mapping
entity as described in this chapter and as long as the relevant
aggregated information is made available to the department or
government agent or agency.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
authority of a state agency or local government to gather or request
information from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services for other purposes pursuant to its statutory authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1, 5, 6, 7, and 9 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 28B.32.010, 28B.32.020, 28B.32.030,
28B.32.900, and 28B.32.901 are each recodified as a new chapter in
Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

--- END ---