BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(a) The deployment and adoption of high-speed internet services and
information technology has resulted in enhanced economic development
and public safety for the state's communities, improved health care and
educational opportunities, stimulated business and job growth,
increased the amount of valuable information available to residents,
businesses, and institutions, and served to provide a better quality of
life for the state's residents.
(b) Continued progress in the deployment and adoption of
affordable, reliable high-speed internet services and other advanced
telecommunications services will benefit all citizens and businesses
within the state.
(2) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to conduct a
statewide assessment of the availability, location, service levels, and
other characteristics of high-speed internet services and other
advanced telecommunications services in the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.105.020 and 2003 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of information services((;)).
(2) "Board" means the information services board((;)).
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee((;)).
(4) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately((;)).
(5) "Director" means the director of the department((;)).
(6) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing((;)).
(7) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network((;)).
(8) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means((;)).
(9) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video((;)).
(10) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions((;)).
(11) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems((;)).
(12) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, such as computers, word
processors, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment((;)).
(13) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications
investments((;)).
(14) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications((;)).
(15) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license((;)).
(16) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330
RCW((;)).
(17) "K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800((;)).
(18) "K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW
43.105.810((;)).
(19) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820((;)).
(20) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board((;)).
(21) "Bandwidth" means the transmission capacity of an electronic
communications device or system.
(22) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high-capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies with a minimum download
speed greater than or equal to seven hundred sixty-eight kilobits per
second and an upload speed greater than two hundred kilobits per
second.
(23) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(24) "High-speed internet strategy work group" means the group
convened by the department as authorized by chapter 262, Laws of 2008.
(25) "Public entity" includes, but is not limited to, the
following: State departments and agencies; public schools and school
districts; public universities; counties, cities, and municipalities in
the state; and state and local police agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall protect data that is vital to governmental
security interests. Based upon the final recommendations of the high-speed internet strategy work group, and subject to available funding
and RCW 42.56.210, the department shall accomplish the following
objectives:
(a) Based on a determination of cost-effectiveness, create or
purchase a detailed geographic information system map of the high-speed
internet services and other relevant telecommunications and information
technology services owned or leased by public entities in the state.
The map must be updated on a regular basis and must, at a minimum,
detail the following information:
(i) The physical location of all high-speed internet infrastructure
owned or leased by public entities;
(ii) To the extent that such information would not lead to the
disclosure of competitively sensitive data or proprietary data
belonging to a nongovernmental entity, the type of delivery technology
used;
(iii) The existence of unused conduits;
(iv) The amount of bandwidth capacity available in the presently
deployed high-speed internet infrastructure;
(v) The average amount of bandwidth capacity utilized; and
(vi) The extent to which the high-speed internet infrastructure is
active or inactive;
(b) Purchase from a nongovernmental, third-party mapping entity a
geographic information system map of the privately owned high-speed
internet infrastructure in the state. The map must be updated on a
regular basis and must be designed so that it is easily integrated with
the map of the public infrastructure in the state as indicated in (c)
of this subsection and, at a minimum, detail the following information:
(i) To the extent possible, the physical location of all high-speed
internet infrastructure owned or leased by private entities;
(ii) To the extent that such information would not lead to the
disclosure of competitively sensitive data or proprietary data, the
type of delivery technology used;
(iii) To the extent possible, the existence of unused conduits;
(iv) The amount of bandwidth capacity available in the presently
deployed high-speed internet infrastructure;
(v) The average amount of bandwidth capacity utilized;
(vi) The extent to which the high-speed internet infrastructure is
active or inactive;
(vii) Specific download and upload speeds as reported in the
provider's most recent report to the federal communications commission;
(viii) Specific adoption levels as reported in the provider's most
recent report to the federal communications commission; and
(ix) Provide detail at the census tract level or at the level
specified by the federal communications commission, whichever is more
comprehensive;
(c) Based on a determination of cost-effectiveness, create or
purchase a complete statewide geographic information system inventory
map of both the public and private high-speed internet infrastructure
in the state. Without disclosing competitively sensitive data or
proprietary data, the combined map of both public and privately owned
or leased high-speed internet service must:
(i) Aggregate the information from (a) and (b) of this subsection;
(ii) Be made available in interactive form, online, to the general
public;
(iii) Be able to pan, zoom, and identify available specific high-speed internet service types and levels;
(iv) Be able to display specific adoption rates by delivery
technology and service levels;
(v) Meet other criteria as determined by the department, subject to
available funding;
(d) Make available to the public quarterly reports on the
department's progress in developing the geographic information system
map;
(e) Use the aggregated geographic information system map of all
high-speed internet infrastructure in the state, both public and
privately owned or leased, to identify and regularly update the
geographic gaps in high-speed internet service, including an assessment
of the population demographic located in each of those geographic gaps;
(f) Track statewide residential, nonprofit, and business adoption
of high-speed internet, computers, and related information technology,
including an identification of barriers to adoption;
(g) Spur the development of high-speed internet resources in the
state, which may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Receiving funding in the form of grants or donations from
private or public entities; and
(ii) Applying for and receiving funding from the federal
government.
(A) The department is the single eligible entity in the state to
receive a grant under the federal broadband data improvement act, P.L.
110-385.
(B) Funding received by the department under the federal broadband
data improvement act, P.L. 110-385, must be used in accordance with the
requirements of that act and, subject to those requirements, may be
distributed by the department on a competitive basis to other entities
in the state to achieve the purposes of that act.
(2) Contingent upon available funding, the department may update
the geographic information system map of high-speed internet
infrastructure to include detail at the census block level.
(3) State agencies shall respond to any request for information
from the department in a reasonable and timely manner, not to exceed
one hundred twenty days.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The broadband development and deployment account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from state, federal, or
private sources for the purposes of accomplishing this act must be
deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the purposes of this act. Only the director of the department
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as indicated in section 3(1)(g)(ii)(A) of this act, nothing
in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability of any
municipality, county, other unit of local government, or any
nongovernmental organization to apply for and receive funds or
technical assistance to undertake projects that address the level of
high-speed internet access available to businesses and residents or any
similar high-speed internet deployment project in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, in coordination with the department of
community, trade, and economic development and the utilities and
transportation commission, shall reconvene the high-speed internet work
group previously established by chapter 262, Laws of 2008. In
consultation with the work group, the department shall prepare regular
reports that identify the following:
(a) The geographic areas of greatest priority for the deployment of
advanced telecommunications infrastructure in the state;
(b) A detailed explanation of how any amount of funding received
from the federal government for the purposes of broadband mapping,
deployment, and adoption will be or have been used; and
(c) A determination of how nonfederal sources may be utilized to
achieve the purposes of broadband mapping, deployment, and adoption
activities in the state.
(2) To the greatest extent possible, the initial report should be
based upon the information identified in the geographic system maps
developed under the requirements of this chapter.
(3) The initial report must be delivered to the appropriate
committees of the legislature as soon as feasible, but no later than
January 18, 2010.
(4) Future reports based upon the requirements of subsection (1) of
this section must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 15th of each year.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.105.350 and 2008 c 262 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of compliance with section 2, chapter 262, Laws of
2008 or any subsequent high-speed internet deployment and adoption
initiative, the department ((of information services)), the department
of community, trade, and economic development, the utilities and
transportation commission, and any other government agent or agency
((shall not)) engaged in the high-speed internet mapping, deployment,
or adoption activities prescribed in this chapter may gather or request
any information related to high-speed internet infrastructure or
service from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services that is classified by the provider as proprietary or
competitively sensitive, as long as the proprietary or competitively
sensitive components of such information is maintained in a
confidential manner solely by a nongovernmental third-party mapping
entity as described in this chapter and as long as the relevant
aggregated information is made available to the department, government
agent, or agency.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting the
authority of a state agency or local government to gather or request
information from providers of telecommunications or high-speed internet
services for other purposes pursuant to its statutory authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 If funding for the purpose of accomplishing
this act is not provided either through federal or private sources by
June 30, 2011, this act is null and void. The office of financial
management must provide the code reviser's office with written notice
by June 30, 2011, concerning the status of funds referenced in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The code reviser's office is directed to put
the defined terms in RCW 43.105.020 in alphabetical order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---