BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
recognizes the accomplishments of classroom paraeducators to attain
professional growth development standards in order to increase
students' learning achievement; and
(b) There is a growing need to provide support for struggling
students who have been identified as not meeting state academic
standards. Highly trained paraeducators can have a significant impact
on those students who fall short of grade level standards but do not
meet the criteria to qualify for special education or Title I
resources. Increasing the knowledge and skills of paraeducators will
result in students reaching their highest potential.
(2) The purpose of this act is to develop standards for
paraeducators to increase their knowledge of learning disabilities,
addressing different learning styles, teaching strategies, and decoding
skills that will result in a positive impact on student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
establishing paraeducator tutor certification requirements.
Certification shall be for five-year periods.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop:
(a) Paraeducator tutor certification standards, a certification
process, and certification requirements; and
(b) Professional development courses required for persons with
paraeducator tutor certification to maintain certification, in order to
maximize the effectiveness of providing resources for students to
achieve state standards and reach their highest possible academic
potential.
(3) Professional development courses developed under this section
must be available in many different formats, including online and at
the summer and winter institutes, for paraeducators to learn the
standards and acquire the skills necessary for paraeducator tutor
certification.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a plan to provide incentives for people to pursue paraeducator
tutor certification. The plan shall be submitted to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---