BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington is
recognized as a leader in sustainability and climate change and has the
foundation to become a leader in the clean energy technologies,
products, and services that will be required throughout the world to
provide reliable reduced emission energy. However, to become a leader,
Washington will need to develop policies and strategies to develop new
clean energy technologies, attract federal and private investments,
attract and grow clean energy companies, and create green jobs.
The legislature further finds that positioning Washington to be
competitive for federal and private sector clean energy investments
will require collaboration between Washington's clean energy technology
companies, research institutions, national laboratory, and workforce
development system to identify our strengths and develop the requisite
policies and strategies.
It is the intent of the legislature to create a clean energy
leadership initiative that will set the path to leverage Washington's
energy infrastructure and make Washington a hub for clean energy
technology and a leader in the creation of green jobs and the
development, deployment, and export of clean energy technologies and
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The office of the governor shall create
a clean energy leadership initiative in collaboration with a statewide,
public-private alliance focused specifically on growing the clean
energy technology sector in Washington state. The clean energy
leadership initiative is to be supported by public and private
resources including, to the extent available, the resources of the
state energy office and Washington State University's energy program.
In carrying out the clean energy leadership initiative, the public-private alliance shall appoint and be guided by a clean energy
leadership council.
(2) The clean energy leadership council must develop strategies and
recommendations for growing Washington's clean energy sector. The
clean energy leadership council consists of not more than fifteen clean
energy leaders as follows: Up to ten representatives of companies in
the clean energy sector, up to two organizations providing support to
clean energy companies, one representative from a public university,
one representative from the Pacific Northwest national laboratory, one
representative from venture capital firms making investments in clean
energy companies, and one representative from professional services
firms serving clean energy technology. The clean energy leadership
council may appoint such advisory groups as it deems necessary to carry
out its work.
(3) The clean energy leadership council shall:
(a) Conduct a strategic analysis to identify the clean energy
industry segments where Washington can either provide national
leadership or become one of the top ten states in that segment. The
council shall engage the highest caliber consultants with detailed
knowledge of energy markets and other state's operations to conduct the
strategic analysis. The strategic analysis must:
(i) Identify where Washington has a competitive advantage or
emerging strength in research, development, or deployment of clean
energy solutions;
(ii) Evaluate Washington's competitiveness in its business
environment, including regulatory barriers, as it relates to supporting
clean energy projects and companies, compared to other states and
regions; and
(iii) Evaluate Washington's ability to provide national leadership
in reducing carbon emissions, developing and deploying utility-scale
clean energy applications, and creating exportable products and
applications;
(b) Develop a set of strategic recommendations, including
implementation steps and responsible parties for carrying them out.
The strategic recommendations must provide direction for positioning
each clean energy segment identified to provide national leadership and
must include a delineation of clear, specific outcomes for each segment
to achieve. The strategic recommendations must include recommendations
on:
(i) Consistent policy frameworks that provide stability to
encourage investment through a combination of incentives, regulation,
taxation, and use of government purchasing power to build viable
markets;
(ii) The steps necessary for increasing Washington's ability to
obtain available federal funds;
(iii) The development of public-private partnerships that can help
grow each sector, including partnerships to facilitate development and
deployment of new technologies at scale;
(iv) Necessary investments in universities;
(v) Management, entrepreneurial, and emerging business needs;
(vi) Workforce training requirements;
(vii) Joint use facilities, demonstration facilities, and signature
research centers that are needed for leadership;
(viii) Market access requirements;
(ix) Infrastructure needs; and
(x) Capital and financing requirements;
(c) Identify an institutional mechanism to foster effective
implementation of its recommendations, including organizational
structure, staffing, and funding;
(d) Review investments made by the state energy office, Washington
State University's energy program, utilities, and other entities to
identify ways to leverage, increase the effectiveness of, or redirect
those funds to increase the state's competitiveness in clean energy
technology;
(e) Provide initial recommendations to the governor and legislature
on how to procure and leverage federal stimulus funding as soon as
feasible;
(f) Complete its analysis and submit recommendations to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2009;
(g) Convene a clean energy summit with the governor and legislative
leaders within one month of submitting its analysis and
recommendations. The summit's purpose is to engage the public and
outline the process for implementing the recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---