BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that residential
landlords frequently use a type of credit report more commonly known as
a tenant screening report in evaluating and selecting tenants for their
rental properties. These tenant screening reports frequently contain
misleading, incomplete, or inaccurate information about: Eviction
lawsuits where the landlord was unsuccessful and the tenant prevailed;
protection orders the tenant obtained for protection against domestic
violence, stalking, or sexual assault; or other court records that,
although not predictive of an applicant's suitability for a residential
tenancy, are often cited by housing providers as a basis for rejecting
rental applicants. This use of court records unfairly diminishes the
housing opportunities of many qualified rental applicants, and impairs
the access of residential tenants to their day in court. These court
records threaten a tenant's future housing prospects irrespective as to
the outcome of an action. The costs of tenant screening are passed on
to applicants in the form of screening fees, and applicants who apply
at multiple housing providers must pay repeated screening fees for
successive reports containing the same information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the fair
tenant screening act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 19.182.005 through 19.182.150 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Comprehensive screening report" means a tenant screening
report that contains all of the following:
(a) A consumer report concerning the prospective tenant prepared by
a nationwide consumer reporting agency no more than ninety days
preceding the date of the tenant screening;
(b) A report containing the prospective tenant's criminal history;
and
(c) A report containing the prospective tenant's eviction history.
(2) "Criminal history" means a report containing or summarizing the
contents of any records of the prospective tenant's arrest, indictment,
criminal conviction, or other adjudication of a crime, including
registration or duty to register as a sex offender with any state, if
any, obtained after a search for such records in every state where the
prospective tenant has reported living in the seven years preceding the
report date.
(3) "Eviction history" means a report containing or summarizing the
contents of any records of eviction suits or judicial foreclosure
actions concerning the prospective tenant, obtained after a search for
such records in every state where the prospective tenant has reported
living in the seven years preceding the report date.
(4) "Eviction suit" means a civil action for unlawful detainer,
forcible detainer, ejectment, or other claim in which the plaintiff
seeks to gain or recover possession of residential real property from
one or more defendants.
(5) "Nationwide consumer reporting agency" has the same meaning as
the term "consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files
on consumers on a nationwide basis" is defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec.
1681a(p).
(6) "Prospective landlord" means a landlord, as defined in RCW
59.18.030, or a person who advertises, solicits, offers, or otherwise
holds a dwelling unit out as available for rent to a prospective
tenant.
(7) "Prospective tenant" means a tenant or a person who has applied
for residential housing governed under chapter 59.18 RCW.
(8) "Qualified victim protection records" means:
(a) Records or information concerning any judicial or
administrative proceeding in which the person, about whom the records
or information pertains, sought to obtain any order of protection from
domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, harassment, or other
violent crime, including any petition or action for a protection order
under chapter 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any
other law;
(b) Records or information concerning any judicial or
administrative proceeding in which the person, about whom the records
or information pertains, exercised or attempted to exercise any right
or obtain any benefit available specifically or exclusively to victims
of violence, such as, but not limited to, the early termination of a
rental agreement under RCW 59.18.575;
(c) Records or information indicating that the person, about whom
the records or information pertains, asserted that a claim or defense
was available to the person in any judicial or administrative
proceeding by reason of the person's status as a victim of violence,
such as in a proceeding under chapter 49.60 RCW; or
(d) Any other records or information indicating that the person,
about whom the records or information pertains, is a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or protected by a court order.
"Qualified victim protection records" does not include records or
information tending to indicate that the person, about whom the records
or information pertains, was a perpetrator of sexual assault,
harassment, or violent crime.
(9) "Report date" means the date on which a tenant screening report
is sent to a person or entity.
(10) "Revised tenant screening report" means a tenant screening
report that corrects, updates, or otherwise modifies a prior tenant
screening report.
(11) "Screening service" means any consumer reporting agency that
provides a tenant screening report to any person or entity.
(12) "Tenant" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.18.030.
(13) "Tenant screening" means seeking or obtaining a consumer
report about a prospective tenant or using the consumer report in
deciding whether to make or accept an offer for residential rental
property to or from a prospective tenant.
(14) "Tenant screening report" means a consumer report concerning
a prospective tenant that is prepared, transmitted, accessed, used, or
expected to be used or collected in whole or in part for tenant
screening purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before sending a tenant screening report to any person or
entity, the screening service shall require the person requesting the
screening report to specify the mailing address, fax number, or other
alternative address, which may be an electronic mail address, at which
the prospective tenant has agreed to receive the materials required
under this section, as well as any other communications from the
screening service.
(2) If a screening service provides a tenant screening report to a
person or entity concerning a prospective tenant, the screening service
shall:
(a) Within forty-eight hours of the report date, provide the
prospective tenant with an identical copy of the tenant screening
report's entire written contents; and
(b) Within forty-eight hours of the report date, provide the
prospective tenant with a verbatim transcript or detailed written
summary of the tenant screening report's nonwritten contents, if any.
(3) If a screening service has issued a tenant screening report
concerning a prospective tenant, the screening service shall, for sixty
days following the report date:
(a) Provide the prospective tenant with a revised tenant screening
report within forty-eight hours of making any update, correction, or
other change in the contents of the original tenant screening report;
and
(b) Provide a copy of the tenant screening report or most recently
revised tenant screening report to any prospective landlord who has
been authorized by the prospective tenant to receive the report within
forty-eight hours of a request.
(4) A screening service that has accepted a fee for issuing a
tenant screening report concerning a prospective tenant shall not, for
sixty days following the report date, accept any additional
compensation for providing any reports required under subsection (3) of
this section. A screening service shall maintain reasonable procedures
to ensure that it does not collect more than one fee for issuing tenant
screening reports concerning the same prospective tenant within a
sixty-day period.
(5) A screening service or prospective landlord shall promptly
refund any fee collected in violation of this section. If a screening
service or prospective landlord fails within one week to refund a fee
collected in violation of this section, a rebuttable presumption arises
that the violation was willful.
(6) This section does not limit a prospective tenant's rights or
the duties of a screening service as otherwise provided in this chapter
or chapter 59.18 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.182.110 and 1993 c 476 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a person takes an adverse action with respect to a consumer that
is based, in whole or in part, on information contained in a consumer
report, the person shall:
(1) Provide written notice of the adverse action to the consumer,
except verbal notice may be given by a person in an adverse action
involving a business regulated by the Washington utilities and
transportation commission ((or involving an application for the rental
or leasing of residential real estate)) if such verbal notice does not
impair a consumer's ability to obtain a credit report without charge
under RCW 19.182.100(2); ((and))
(2) Provide the consumer with the name, address, and telephone
number of the consumer reporting agency that furnished the report to
the person; and
(3) If the adverse action involves an application for the rental or
leasing of residential real estate, the written notice must contain the
reasons for the adverse action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A consumer reporting agency may not make a tenant screening
report that contains any of the following items of information about a
prospective tenant:
(a) Eviction suits, unless the eviction suit resulted in a judgment
or other adjudication that is less than seven years old in which the
consumer was found to be a responsible party. For the purposes of this
subsection, a consumer is deemed to have been a responsible party only
if:
(i) The consumer's right to possession of the premises to which the
eviction suit related had not been terminated by a foreclosure sale
within ninety days of the eviction suit;
(ii) A judgment or other order was entered in the eviction suit
finding that the party was guilty of unlawful detainer or otherwise in
unlawful possession of the premises; and
(iii) The judgment or order has not been vacated, expunged, sealed,
or similarly impaired;
(b) Qualified victim protection records; or
(c) Other information prohibited from disclosure under RCW
19.182.040.
(2) Any person who violates this section is liable to the consumer
for any other amount as authorized under this section and the amount of
the consumer's actual damages and costs of the action together with
reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court. A screening
service that willfully fails to comply with any requirement imposed
under this section in connection with a tenant or prospective tenant is
liable to the tenant or prospective tenant in the amount of one
thousand dollars for each willful violation.

Sec. 7 RCW 59.18.257 and 1991 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before requesting or obtaining a tenant screening report about
a prospective tenant, a prospective landlord shall obtain from the
prospective tenant a mailing address, fax number, or other alternative
address, which may be an electronic mail address, at which the
prospective tenant has agreed to receive communications from the
screening service, including copies of any tenant screening reports.
(2) If a prospective landlord uses a tenant screening service,
((then)) the prospective landlord may only charge for the costs
incurred for using the ((tenant)) screening service under this section.
A prospective landlord may not charge any tenant screening costs to a
prospective tenant who provided the prospective landlord with a
comprehensive screening report within sixty days of the report date.
If a prospective landlord conducts his or her own screening of
prospective tenants, ((then)) the prospective landlord may charge his
or her actual costs in obtaining the background information, but the
amount may not exceed the customary costs charged by a screening
service in the general area. The prospective landlord's actual costs
include costs incurred for long distance phone calls and for time spent
calling landlords, employers, and financial institutions.
(((2))) (3) A prospective landlord may not charge a prospective
tenant for the cost of obtaining background information under this
section unless the prospective landlord first notifies the prospective
tenant in writing of what a tenant screening entails, the prospective
tenant's rights to dispute the accuracy of information provided by the
((tenant)) screening service or provided by the entities listed on the
tenant application who will be contacted for information concerning the
tenant, ((and)) the name and address of the ((tenant)) screening
service used by the prospective landlord((.
(3))), and, if the prospective landlord uses a screening service,
the prospective tenant's right to avoid tenant screening fees by
providing a comprehensive screening report.
(4) This section does not preclude a prospective landlord from
seeking or obtaining background information about a prospective tenant
at the prospective landlord's own expense.
(5) A prospective landlord who takes any adverse action toward a
prospective tenant shall make the disclosures as required under chapter
19.182 RCW and 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681m.
(6) Nothing in this section requires a landlord to disclose
information to a prospective tenant that was obtained from a ((tenant))
screening service or from entities listed on the tenant application
which is not required under chapter 19.182 RCW or the federal fair
credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(((4))) (7) Any prospective landlord who violates this section
((may be)) is liable to the prospective tenant for ((an)) the amount
((not to exceed one hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also
recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.)) of the
prospective tenant's actual damages and costs of the action together
with reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the court. However,
where a prospective landlord has willfully failed to comply with any
requirement imposed under this section, the prospective tenant must
also be awarded a monetary penalty of one thousand dollars for each
willful violation.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "tenant screening," "tenant
screening report," "screening service," "prospective landlord," "report
date," "prospective tenant," and "comprehensive screening report" all
have the same meanings as provided in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A defendant in any action for the possession of real property
under Title 59 RCW, or for ejectment under chapter 7.28 RCW, may, at
any time after the action is commenced, apply to the court for an order
directing the plaintiff to appear and show cause why an order should
not issue sealing or redacting the court records. The application must
identify the grounds upon which the defendant seeks to seal or redact
the records and, if less than the entire court file, which records the
moving party seeks to seal or redact. Upon application, the court
shall by order fix a time and place for a hearing of the motion, which
must not be less than seven days from the date of service of the order
and application upon the plaintiff. The order must state that if any
person opposing the sealing of the court records fails to appear and
show cause at the time and place specified by the order, the court may
order the records sealed as requested by the application.
(2) At the hearing on the motion, the court shall order the court
files and records in the proceeding, or any part of the files or
records, to be sealed or redacted in the manner minimally necessary to
protect the moving party, if the court finds that the moving party has
compelling privacy or safety concerns that outweigh the public interest
in access to the court record, or if the sealing or redaction is
necessary to preserve the integrity of the court's adjudicatory
functions.
(3) A person is found to have a compelling privacy and safety
concern if the court records that he or she wishes to seal or redact
are likely to diminish his or her ability to obtain access to rental
housing. This privacy and safety concern alone outweighs the public
interest in access to the court record if:
(a) The court has entered a final order in the action and the
moving party was not found guilty of unlawful detainer or otherwise in
unlawful possession of the disputed premises;
(b) The person seeking the order of redaction or sealing occupied
the real property as a tenant prior to a foreclosure sale concerning
the same premises, and the action was filed less than ninety days after
the foreclosure sale;
(c) Notwithstanding any other findings or orders in the case, the
moving party prevailed on any affirmative defense, counterclaim, or
setoff asserted in the action, such as a claim for breach of an implied
warranty of habitability or breach of the covenant of quiet enjoyment;
(d) A judgment entered solely for the nonpayment of rent has been
fully cured and the moving party's tenancy reinstated under RCW
59.12.170, 59.12.190, or 59.18.410, or any other law; or
(e) Another circumstance shows that public access to the court
record would unjustly diminish the moving party's future housing
opportunities.
(4) A person for whose benefit an order to seal or redact court
records is entered under this section, when engaged in an effort to
secure possession of residential rental property:
(a) Does not have a duty to disclose the action to any prospective
landlord or provider of any services in connection with housing on any
written or nonwritten application; and
(b) Must not be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, for making to any prospective landlord or provider of any
services in connection with housing a statement denying the existence
of the action or denying knowledge of its existence.
(5) Once the court has ordered the court file or records of an
action sealed under this section, a person having notice of the order
to seal shall not, either directly or through any agent, disclose the
existence of the action, or other information expected to enable
discovery of the action, to any tenant screening service or prospective
landlord seeking information about the person for whose benefit the
order to seal was entered, unless the court has authorized the
disclosure after notice to the person for whose benefit the order to
seal was entered. The duty imposed under this subsection may not be
waived by the person for whose benefit the order to seal was entered,
and any purported or attempted waiver, whether written or nonwritten,
is void and has no effect.
(6) A person who violates the duty imposed under subsection (5) of
this section is liable to the person for whose benefit the order to
seal was entered for the amount of such person's actual damages and
costs of suit, together with reasonable attorneys' fees as determined
by the court, and if the violation was willful, for a monetary penalty
of one thousand dollars for each willful violation.
(7) This section does not limit or impair the right of the moving
party or any other person from pursuing, or of the court from ordering,
the sealing or redaction of court records under any other provision of
law in the event a person is not entitled to an order sealing or
redacting the court records as of right under this section.

--- END ---