BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.270 and 2004 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as
security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a lease or
rental agreement shall promptly be deposited by the landlord in a trust
account, maintained by the landlord for the purpose of holding such
security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a financial
institution as defined by RCW 30.22.041 or licensed escrow agent
located in Washington. ((Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the
landlord shall be entitled to receipt of interest paid on such trust
account deposits.)) The landlord shall provide the tenant with a
written receipt for the deposit and shall provide written notice of the
name and address and location of the depository and any subsequent
change thereof. If during a tenancy the status of landlord is
transferred to another, any sums in the deposit trust account affected
by such transfer shall simultaneously be transferred to an equivalent
trust account of the successor landlord, and the successor landlord
shall promptly notify the tenant of the transfer and of the name,
address, and location of the new depository. The tenant's claim to any
moneys paid under this section shall be prior to that of any creditor
of the landlord, including a trustee in bankruptcy or receiver, even if
such moneys are commingled.
(2) The interest accrued on trust account deposits in subsection
(1) of this section must be deposited monthly in the affordable housing
for all account created under RCW 43.185C.190, for the purpose of
funding affordable housing programs that are limited to low-income
households as defined in RCW 43.185A.010, by the financial institution
or licensed escrow agent, less reasonable deposit processing charges
that may only include an items deposited charge, a monthly maintenance
fee, a per check item charge, and a per deposit charge.

--- END ---