BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.660 and 1993 sp.s. c 9 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of any of the state's institutions of
higher education may make available liability, life, health, health
care, accident, disability and salary protection or insurance or any
one of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of insurance, or any
other type of insurance or protection, for the regents or trustees and
students of the institution. Except as provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, the premiums due on such protection or insurance
shall be borne by the assenting regents, trustees, or students. The
regents or trustees of any of the state institutions of higher
education may make liability insurance available for employees of the
institutions. The premiums due on such liability insurance shall be
borne by the university or college.
(2) A governing board of a public four-year institution of higher
education may make available, and pay the costs of, health benefits for
graduate students holding graduate service appointments, designated as
such by the institution. Such health benefits may provide coverage for
spouses and dependents of such graduate student appointees.
(3) A governing board of a state institution of higher education
may require its students who participate in studies or research outside
of the United States sponsored, arranged, or approved by the
institution to purchase, as a condition of participation, insurance
approved by the governing board, that will provide coverage for
expenses incurred as a result of injury, illness, or death sustained
while participating in the study or research abroad. The governing
board of the institution may bear all or part of the costs of the
insurance. A student shall not be required to purchase insurance if
the student is covered under an insurance policy that will provide
coverage for expenses incurred as a result of injury, illness, or death
sustained while participating in the study or research abroad.

--- END ---