BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.65.410 and 1993 c 340 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every diver engaged in the commercial harvest of subtidal
geoduck clams ((shall obtain a nontransferable geoduck diver license))
in the state shall obtain a geoduck diver license. An individual may
only own one license.
(2) After July 1, 2009, the director may not issue new geoduck
diver licenses. A person may renew an existing license only if the
person held a geoduck diver license in 2007 and also held a geoduck
diver license in either 2005 or 2006. The license holder must also
have been listed on a department of natural resources' geoduck harvest
agreement plan of operation during this period.
(3) Any license issued after January 1, 2009, that does not meet
the requirements of this section must be revoked.
(4) The annual license fee is two hundred thirty dollars for
residents and two hundred eighty-five dollars for nonresidents.
(5) Geoduck diver licenses held by persons who were listed on a
department of natural resources' geoduck harvest agreement plan of
operation during 2007 are transferable after July 1, 2010, and are
subject to a transfer of ownership fee payable by the acquiring person
in the amount of two thousand three hundred dollars for a resident and
two thousand eight hundred fifty dollars for a nonresident. The
transfer fee must be paid to the department. Geoduck diver licenses
held by persons not listed on a department of natural resources'
geoduck harvest agreement plan of operation during 2007 are
nontransferable.
(6) The license holder must perform all geoduck harvesting
personally.
(7) The department shall revoke a geoduck diver license not renewed
each year by December 31st. However, the director may reissue the
geoduck diver license, subject to a reissue fee of two thousand three
hundred dollars for a resident and two thousand eight hundred fifty
dollars for a nonresident, in addition to the annual license fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively to geoduck
diver licenses issued on or after January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---