BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.58.010 and 1996 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Public funds" means moneys under the control of a treasurer,
the state treasurer, or custodian belonging to, or held for the benefit
of, the state or any of its political subdivisions, public
corporations, municipal corporations, agencies, courts, boards,
commissions, or committees, including moneys held as trustee, agent, or
bailee belonging to, or held for the benefit of, the state or any of
its political subdivisions, public corporations, municipal
corporations, agencies, courts, boards, commissions, or committees;
(2) "Public depositary" means a financial institution which does
not claim exemption from the payment of any sales or compensating use
or ad valorem taxes under the laws of this state, which has been
approved by the commission to hold public deposits, and which has
segregated for the benefit of the commission eligible collateral having
a value of not less than its maximum liability((. Addition of the word
"bank" denotes a bank, trust company, or national banking association
and the word "thrift" denotes a savings association or savings bank));
(3) "Loss" means the issuance of an order by a regulatory or
supervisory authority or a court of competent jurisdiction (a)
restraining a public depositary from making payments of deposit
liabilities or (b) appointing a receiver for a public depositary;
(4) "Commission" means the Washington public deposit protection
commission created under RCW 39.58.030;
(5) "Eligible collateral" means securities which are enumerated in
RCW 39.58.050 (5) and (6) as eligible collateral for public deposits;
(6) ((The)) "Maximum liability," ((of a)) with reference to a
public depositary's liability under this chapter for loss per
occurrence by another public depositary, on any given date means:
(a) A sum equal to ten percent of (((a))):
(i) All uninsured public deposits held by ((the qualified)) a
public depositary ((on)) that has not incurred a loss by the then most
recent commission report date((, or
(b))); or
(ii) The average of the balances of said uninsured public deposits
on the last four immediately preceding reports required pursuant to RCW
39.58.100, whichever amount is greater((, less any assessments paid to
the commission pursuant to this chapter since the then most recent
commission report date)); or
(b) Such other sum or measure as the commission may from time to
time set by resolution according to criteria established by rule,
consistent with the commission's broad administrative discretion to
achieve the objective of RCW 39.58.020.
As long as the uninsured public deposits of a public depositary are
one hundred percent collateralized by eligible collateral as provided
for in RCW 39.58.050, the "maximum liability" of a public depositary
that has not incurred a loss may not exceed the amount set forth in (a)
of this subsection.
This definition of "maximum liability" does not limit the authority
of the commission to adjust the collateral requirements of public
depositaries pursuant to RCW 39.58.040;
(7) "Public funds available for investment" means such public funds
as are in excess of the anticipated cash needs throughout the duration
of the contemplated investment period;
(8) "Investment deposits" means time deposits, money market deposit
accounts, and savings deposits of public funds available for
investment;
(9) "Treasurer" ((shall)) means ((the state treasurer,)) a county
treasurer, a city treasurer, a treasurer of any other municipal
corporation, and any other custodian of public funds, except the state
treasurer;
(10) "Financial institution" means any national or state chartered
commercial bank or trust company, savings bank, or savings association,
or branch or branches thereof, located in this state and lawfully
engaged in business;
(11) "Commission report" means a formal accounting rendered by all
public depositaries to the commission in response to a demand for
specific information made by the commission detailing pertinent affairs
of each public depositary as of the close of business on a specified
date, which is the "commission report date." "Commission report due
date" is the last day for the timely filing of a commission report;
(12) "Director of the department of financial institutions" means
the Washington state director of the department of financial
institutions;
(13) "Net worth" of a public depositary means (a) the equity
capital as reported to its primary regulatory authority on the
quarterly report of condition or statement of condition, or other
required report required by its primary regulatory authority or federal
deposit insurer, and may include capital notes and debentures which are
subordinate to the interests of depositors, or (b) equity capital
adjusted by rule or resolution of the commission after consultation
with the director of the department of financial institutions;
(14) "Depositary pledge agreement" means a tripartite agreement
executed by the commission with a financial institution and its
designated trustee. Such agreement shall be approved by the directors
or the loan committee of the financial institution and shall
continuously be a record of the financial institution. New securities
may be pledged under this agreement in substitution of or in addition
to securities originally pledged without executing a new agreement;
(15) "Trustee" means a third-party safekeeping agent which has
completed a depositary pledge agreement with a public depositary and
the commission. Such third-party safekeeping agent may be the federal
reserve bank of San Francisco, the federal home loan bank of Seattle,
((the trust department of the public depositary,)) or such other third-party safekeeping agent approved by the commission;
(16) "Capitalization" means the measure or measures of
capitalization, other than net worth, of a depositary applying for
designation as or operating as a public depositary pursuant to this
chapter, based upon regulatory standards of financial institution
capitalization adopted by rule or resolution of the commission after
consultation with the director of the department of financial
institutions;
(17) "Collateral" means the particular assets pledged as security
to insure payment or performance of the obligations under this chapter
as enumerated in RCW 39.58.050;
(18) "Liquidity" means the measure or measures of liquidity of a
depositary applying for designation as or operating as a public
depositary pursuant to this chapter, based upon regulatory standards of
financial institution liquidity adopted by rule or resolution of the
commission after consultation with the director of the department of
financial institutions;
(19) "Public deposit" means public funds on deposit with a public
depositary;
(20)"State public depositary" means a Washington state-chartered
financial institution that is authorized as a public depositary under
this chapter;
(21) "State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of
Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.58.040 and 1996 c 256 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power and broad administrative
discretion:
(1) To make and enforce regulations necessary and proper to the
full and complete performance of its functions under this chapter;
(2) To require any public depositary to furnish such information
dealing with public deposits and the exact status of its
capitalization, collateral, liquidity, and net worth as the commission
shall request((. Any public depositary which refuses or neglects to
give promptly and accurately or to allow verification of any
information so requested shall no longer be a public depositary and
shall be excluded from the right to receive or hold public deposits
until such time as the commission shall acknowledge that such
depositary has furnished the information requested));
(3) To take such action as it deems best for the protection,
collection, compromise or settlement of any claim arising in case of
loss;
(4) To ((prescribe regulations, subject to this chapter, fixing))
fix by rule or resolution, consistent with this chapter, the
requirements for initial and continued qualification of financial
institutions as public depositaries on the basis of a depositary's
financial condition, including its capitalization, collateral,
liquidity, and net worth, and fixing other terms and conditions
consistent with this chapter, under which public deposits may be
received and held;
(5) To make and enforce ((regulations)) rules setting forth
criteria ((establishing minimum standards for the financial condition
of bank and thrift depositaries and, if the minimum)) for the
establishment by policy of standards governing matters that are subject
to the commission's powers to fix requirements, terms, and conditions
under subsection (4) of this section for a public depositary, and, if
these standards are not met, providing for additional collateral or
other conditional or unconditional requirements or restrictions
((regarding)) applicable to the public depositary's right to receive or
hold public deposits;
(6) To require additional or different types and amounts of
collateral, or to restrict a public depositary's right to receive or
hold public deposits if the standards for the financial condition of
public depositaries are not met;
(((6))) (7) To fix the official date on which any loss shall be
deemed to have occurred taking into consideration the orders, rules,
and regulations of the supervisory authority of a public depositary's
primary regulatory authority and federal deposit insurer as they affect
the failure or inability of a public depositary to repay public
deposits in full; ((and (7)))
(8) In case loss occurs in more than one public depositary, to
determine the allocation and time of payment of any sums due to public
depositors under this chapter; and
(9) To make and enforce sanctions against a public depositary for
noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules or policies
of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, the commission shall include all
public depositaries in a single public depositary pool. All public
depositaries, as defined in RCW 39.58.010, shall be treated uniformly
by the commission without regard to distinctions in the nature of its
financial institution charter.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.58.050 and 1996 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every public depositary shall complete a depositary pledge
agreement with the commission and a trustee, and shall at all times
maintain, segregated from its other assets, eligible collateral in the
form of securities enumerated in this section having a value at least
equal to its maximum liability and as otherwise prescribed in this
chapter. Such collateral shall be segregated by deposit with the
depositary's trustee and shall be clearly designated as security for
the benefit of public depositors under this chapter.
(2) Securities eligible as collateral shall be valued at market
value, and the total market value of securities pledged in accordance
with this chapter shall not be reduced by withdrawal or substitution of
securities except by prior authorization, in writing, by the
commission.
(3) The public depositary shall have the right to make
substitutions of an equal or greater amount of such collateral at any
time.
(4) The income from the securities which have been segregated as
collateral shall belong to the public depositary without restriction.
(5) Each of the following enumerated classes of securities,
providing there has been no default in the payment of principal or
interest thereon, shall be eligible to qualify as collateral:
(a) Certificates, notes or bonds of the United States, or other
obligations of the United States or its agencies, or of any corporation
wholly owned by the government of the United States;
(b) State, county, municipal, or school district bonds or warrants
of taxing districts of the state of Washington or any other state of
the United States, provided that such bonds and warrants shall be only
those found to be within the limit of indebtedness prescribed by law
for the taxing district issuing them and to be general obligations;
(c) The obligations of any United States government-sponsored
corporation whose obligations are or may become eligible as collateral
for advances to member banks as determined by the board of governors of
the federal reserve system;
(d) Bonds, notes, letters of credit, or other securities or
evidence of indebtedness constituting the direct and general obligation
of a federal home loan bank or federal reserve bank;
(e) Revenue bonds of this state or any authority, board,
commission, committee, or similar agency thereof, and any municipality
or taxing district of this state;
(f) Direct and general obligation bonds and warrants of any city,
town, county, school district, port district, or other political
subdivision of any state, having the power to levy general taxes, which
are payable from general ad valorem taxes;
(g) Bonds issued by public utility districts as authorized under
the provisions of Title 54 RCW, as now or hereafter amended;
(h) Bonds of any city of the state of Washington for the payment of
which the entire revenues of the city's water system, power and light
system, or both, less maintenance and operating costs, are irrevocably
pledged, even though such bonds are not general obligations of such
city;
(6) In addition to the securities enumerated in this section, every
public depositary may also segregate such bonds, securities, and other
obligations as are designated to be authorized security for public
deposits under the laws of this state.
(7) The commission may ((at any time or times declare any
particular security as ineligible to qualify)) determine by rule or
resolution whether any security, whether or not enumerated in this
section, is or shall remain eligible as collateral when in the
commission's judgment it is ((deemed)) desirable or necessary to do so.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.58.060 and 1996 c 256 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
When the commission determines that a loss has occurred in a
((bank)) public depositary, it shall as soon as possible make payment
to the proper public officers of all funds subject to such loss,
pursuant to the following procedures:
(1) For the purposes of determining the sums to be paid, the
director of the department of financial institutions or the receiver
shall, within twenty days after issuance of a restraining order or
taking possession of any ((bank)) public depositary, ascertain the
amount of public funds on deposit therein as disclosed by its records
and the amount thereof covered by deposit insurance and ((certify))
provide written verification of the amounts thereof to the commission
and each ((such)) public depositor;
(2) Within ten days after receipt of ((such certification)) written
verification, each ((such)) public depositor shall furnish to the
commission verified statements of its deposits in ((such bank)) the
public depositary, including the uninsured and uncollateralized status
of the public deposits, as disclosed by its records;
(3) Upon receipt of ((such certificate)) written verification and
statements, the commission shall ascertain and fix the amount of
((such)) the public deposits, net after deduction of any amount
received from deposit insurance and held collateral, and, after
determining and declaring the apparent net loss, assess the same
against all ((then bank)) public depositaries, as follows: First,
against the public depositary in which the loss occurred, to the extent
of the full value of collateral segregated pursuant to this chapter;
second, against all other ((bank)) public depositaries pro rata in
proportion to the maximum liability of each ((such)) depositary as it
existed on the date of loss;
(4) Assessments made by the commission shall be payable on the
second business day following demand, and in case of the failure of any
public depositary so to pay, the commission shall ((forthwith)) take
possession of the securities segregated as collateral by ((such)) the
depositary pursuant to this chapter and liquidate the same for the
purpose of paying such assessment;
(5) Upon receipt of ((such)) the assessment payments, the
commission shall reimburse the public depositors of the public
depositary in which the loss occurred to the extent of the depositary's
net deposit liability to them;
(6) Any owner of public deposits receiving assessment proceeds
shall provide a receivership certificate to the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 39.58.065 (Loss in a thrift public
depositary -- Procedure for payment) and 1996 c 256 s 6 & 1983 c 66 s 10
are each repealed.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.58.100 and 1996 c 256 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On or before each commission report due date, each public
depositary shall render to the commission a written report, certified
under oath, indicating the total amount of public funds on deposit held
by it, the uninsured amount of those funds, the net worth of the
depositary, and the amount and nature of eligible collateral then
segregated for the benefit of the commission.
(2) The commission may instruct the director of the department of
financial institutions to examine and thereafter certify as to the
accuracy of any statement to the commission by any state public
depositary, or to provide such other examination report information or
data as may be required by the commission. The type, content, and
frequency of the reports may be determined by the director of the
department of financial institutions, consistent with the requirements
of the commission as defined by rule.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.58.103 and 1983 c 66 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each public depositary shall notify the commission in writing
within ((five working days)) forty-eight hours, or by close of business
of the next business day thereafter, of the happening of an event which
causes its net worth to be reduced by an amount greater than ten
percent of the amount shown as its net worth on the most recent report
submitted pursuant to RCW 39.58.100.

Sec. 9 RCW 39.58.105 and 1996 c 256 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may require the state auditor or the director of
the department of financial institutions, to the extent of their
respective authority under applicable federal and Washington state law,
to thoroughly investigate and report to it concerning the condition of
any financial institution which makes application to become a public
depositary, and may also as often as it deems necessary require the
state auditor or the director of the department of financial
institutions, to the extent of their respective authority under
applicable federal and Washington state law, to make such investigation
and report concerning the condition of any financial institution which
has been designated as a public depositary. The expense of all such
investigations or reports shall be borne by the financial institution
examined.
(2) In lieu of any such investigation or report, the commission may
rely upon information made available to it or the director of the
department of financial institutions by the office of the comptroller
of the currency, the office of thrift supervision, the federal deposit
insurance corporation, the federal reserve board, ((or)) any state
((bank or thrift)) financial institutions regulatory agency, or any
successor state or federal financial institutions regulatory agency,
and any such information or data received by the commission shall be
kept and maintained in the same manner and have the same protections as
examination reports received by the commission from the director of the
department of financial institutions pursuant to RCW 30.04.075(2)(h)
and 32.04.220(2)(h).
(3) The director of the department of financial institutions shall
in addition advise the commission of any action he or she has directed
any state public depositary to take which will result in a reduction of
greater than ten percent of the net worth of such depositary as shown
on the most recent report it submitted pursuant to RCW 39.58.100.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.58.108 and 1996 c 256 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any financial institution may become ((a)), and thereafter operate
as, a public depositary upon approval by the commission and segregation
of collateral in the manner as set forth in this chapter, and ((upon))
subject to compliance with all rules ((as promulgated)) and policies
adopted by the commission. ((For the first twelve-month period
following qualification as a public depositary, the)) A public
depositary shall at all times pledge and segregate eligible securities
in an amount ((equal to not less than ten percent of all public funds
on deposit in the depositary)) established by the commission by rule or
noticed resolution.

Sec. 11 RCW 39.58.130 and 1996 c 256 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
A treasurer ((is)) and the state treasurer are authorized to
deposit in a public depositary any public funds available for
investment and secured by collateral in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter, and receive interest thereon. The authority provided
by this section is additional to any authority now or hereafter
provided by law for the investment or deposit of public funds by any
such treasurer: PROVIDED, That in no case shall the aggregate of
demand and investment deposits of public funds by any such treasurer in
any one public depositary exceed at any time the net worth of that
depositary. If a public depositary's net worth is reduced, a treasurer
and the state treasurer may allow public funds on deposit in excess of
the reduced net worth to remain until maturity upon pledging by the
depositary of eligible securities valued at market value in an amount
at least equal to the amount of the excess deposits. The collateral
shall be segregated as provided in RCW 39.58.050. If the additional
securities required by this section are not pledged by the depositary,
the depositary shall permit withdrawal prior to maturity by the
treasurer of deposits, including accrued interest, in accordance with
applicable statutes and governmental regulations.

Sec. 12 RCW 39.58.135 and 1996 c 256 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 39.58.130, (1) aggregate deposits received by
a public depositary from all ((public)) treasurers and the state
treasurer shall not exceed at any time one hundred fifty percent of the
value of the depositary's net worth, nor (2) shall the aggregate
deposits received by any public depositary exceed thirty percent of the
total aggregate deposits of all public treasurers in all depositaries
as determined by the public deposit protection commission. However, a
public depositary may receive deposits in excess of the limits provided
in this section if eligible securities, as prescribed in RCW 39.58.050,
are pledged as collateral in an amount equal to one hundred percent of
the value of deposits received in excess of the limitations prescribed
in this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 39.58.140 and 1996 c 256 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
When deposits are made in accordance with this chapter, a treasurer
and the state treasurer shall not be liable for any loss thereof
resulting from the failure or default of any public depositary without
fault or neglect on his or her part or on the part of his or her
assistants or clerks.

Sec. 14 RCW 39.58.750 and 1996 c 256 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state
treasurer or any ((county, city, or other municipal)) treasurer or
other custodian of public funds may receive, disburse, or transfer
public funds under his or her jurisdiction by means of wire or other
electronic communication in accordance with accounting standards
established by the state auditor under RCW 43.09.200 with regard to
((municipal)) treasurers of municipalities or other custodians or by
the office of financial management under RCW 43.88.160 in the case of
the state treasurer and other state custodians to safeguard and insure
accountability for the funds involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW
to read as follows:
If a depositary neglects or refuses to promptly and accurately
furnish, or to allow verification of, any required information
requested by the commission or by the director of the department of
financial institutions when acting on behalf of the commission pursuant
to this chapter, or if a public depositary otherwise fails to comply
with this chapter or any rules or policies of the commission, the
commission may at its option deny or revoke the authority of such
depositary to act as a public depositary pursuant to this chapter, or
otherwise suspend such depositary from receiving or holding public
deposits until such time as the depositary receives the information or
complies with the commission's rules and policies. The commission
shall have the authority to assess by rule costs for a depositary's
noncompliance with this chapter and rules and resolutions adopted
pursuant to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The commission may by resolution delegate all of its authority to
the state treasurer except rule making.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The liability of a public depositary under this chapter shall not
be altered by any merger, takeover, or acquisition, except to the
extent that such liability is assumed by agreement or operation of law
by the successor entity or resulting financial institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2009, and each December 1st thereafter, the office
of the state treasurer shall report to the legislature actions taken by
the public deposit protection commission and the state treasurer
regarding public deposit protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 39.58.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---