BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.128.040 and 2007 c 184 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules and standards with respect to
adult family homes and the operators thereof to be licensed under this
chapter to carry out the purposes and requirements of this chapter.
The rules and standards relating to applicants and operators shall
address the differences between individual providers and providers that
are partnerships, corporations, associations, or companies. The rules
and standards shall also recognize and be appropriate to the different
needs and capacities of the various populations served by adult family
homes such as but not limited to persons who are developmentally
disabled or elderly. In developing rules and standards the department
shall recognize the residential family-like nature of adult family
homes and not develop rules and standards which by their complexity
serve as an overly restrictive barrier to the development of the adult
family homes in the state. Procedures and forms established by the
department shall be developed so they are easy to understand and comply
with. Paper work requirements shall be minimal. Easy to understand
materials shall be developed for applicants and providers explaining
licensure requirements and procedures.
(2)(a) In developing the rules and standards, the department shall
consult with all divisions and administrations within the department
serving the various populations living in adult family homes, including
the division of developmental disabilities and the aging and adult
services administration. Involvement by the divisions and
administration shall be for the purposes of assisting the department to
develop rules and standards appropriate to the different needs and
capacities of the various populations served by adult family homes.
During the initial stages of development of proposed rules, the
department shall provide notice of development of the rules to
organizations representing adult family homes and their residents, and
other groups that the department finds appropriate. The notice shall
state the subject of the rules under consideration and solicit written
recommendations regarding their form and content.
(b) In addition, the department shall engage in negotiated rule
making pursuant to RCW 34.05.310(2)(a) with the exclusive
representative of the adult family home licensees selected in
accordance with RCW 70.128.043 and with other affected interests before
adopting requirements that affect adult family home licensees.
(3) Except where provided otherwise, chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern
all department rule-making and adjudicative activities under this
chapter.
(4) The department shall establish a specialty license to include
geriatric specialty certification for providers who have successfully
completed the University of Washington school of nursing certified
geriatric certification program and testing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
Restrictive covenants are void if they have the effect of limiting,
in any way, directly or indirectly, the ability of persons with
disabilities to live in the residence of their choice in the community,
or limit, in any way, directly or indirectly, the ability of any
persons associated with the disabled, including persons and legal
entities operating adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW
as for-profit businesses to provide housing, personal care, special
care, and room and board to more than one but not more than six
disabled, elderly, or vulnerable adults who are not related by blood or
marriage to the person or persons providing the services to the
disabled. This section shall apply to all adult family homes licensed
under chapter 70.128 RCW and apply to existing adult family homes as
well as future adult family homes.

--- END ---