BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.
(2) "Occupant" means a person, or his or her sublessee, successor,
or assign, who is entitled to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement, to the exclusion of
others.
(3) "Owner" means the owner, operator, property management company,
lessor, or sublessor of a self-service storage facility. "Owner" does
not mean an occupant.
(4) "Personal property" means movable property not affixed to land,
and includes, but is not limited to, goods, merchandise, furniture, and
household items.
(5) "Self-service storage insurance producer" means any owner of a
facility that is licensed as a specialty lines insurance producer under
chapter 48.17 RCW to offer, sell, or solicit self-service storage
insurance under this chapter.
(6) "Self-service storage facility" or "facility" means any real
property designed and used for the purpose of renting or leasing
individual storage space to occupants who are to have access to the
space for the purpose of storing and removing personal property on a
self-service basis, but does not include a garage or other storage area
in a private residence.
(7) "Self-service storage insurance" is insurance that in
connection with and incidental to the rental of space at a facility
provides coverage to occupants at the facility for the loss of or
damage to stored personal property that occurs at that facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) An owner; or officer, director, or
employee of an owner; may not offer, sell, or solicit the purchase of
self-service storage insurance unless that person is licensed under
chapter 48.17 RCW or is in compliance with this chapter.
(2) The commissioner may issue a specialty line insurance producer
license to an owner that is in compliance with this chapter authorizing
the owner to act as a self-service storage insurance producer under
this chapter, in connection with and incidental to rental agreements,
on behalf of any insurer authorized to write self-service storage
insurance in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An owner may apply to be licensed as a self-service storage insurance producer under, and if in compliance with,
this chapter by filing the following documents with the commissioner:
(1) A written application for licensure, signed by the applicant or
by an officer of the applicant, in the form prescribed by the
commissioner that includes a listing of all locations at which the
owner intends to offer, sell, or solicit self-service storage
insurance; and
(2)(a) A certificate by the insurer that is to be named in self-service storage insurance producer license, stating that the insurer:
(i) Has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy
and competent to act as its self-service storage insurance producer,
limited to this purpose;
(ii) Has reviewed the employee training and education program
required by section 8(1)(c) of this act and that it satisfies the
statutory requirements; and
(iii) Will appoint the applicant to act as its self-service storage
insurance producer to offer, sell, or solicit self-service storage
insurance, if the license for which the applicant is applying is issued
by the commissioner.
(b) The certification shall be subscribed by an authorized
representative of the insurer on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An owner issued a self-service storage
insurance producer license under this chapter is not subject to the
prelicensure or continuing education requirements in chapter 48.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A self-service storage insurance
producer license authorizes a self-service storage insurance producer
and its employees to offer and sell to, enroll in, and bill and collect
premiums from occupants for insurance covering the loss of or damage to
personal property stored at a facility on a master, corporate, group,
or individual policy basis.
(2) A self-service storage insurance producer is not required to
treat moneys collected from occupants purchasing insurance under this
chapter as funds received in a fiduciary capacity, if:
(a) The insurer represented by the self-service storage insurance
producer has consented in writing, signed by an officer of the insurer,
that the premiums need not be segregated from funds received by the
self-service storage insurance producer; and
(b) The charges for insurance coverage are itemized and ancillary
to the rental agreement.
(3) An owner is not required to be licensed pursuant to this
section merely to display and make available to prospective occupants
brochures and other promotional materials created by or on behalf of an
authorized insurer, provided that either the owner or its employees, or
both, are not paid a commission or other consideration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A self-service storage insurance producer
may not solicit insurance under section 2 of this act unless:
(1) At every location where occupants are enrolled in self-service
storage insurance programs, written disclosure material regarding the
program is made available to prospective occupants; and
(2) All employees who offer and sell to, enroll in, and bill and
collect premiums from occupants for insurance have completed a training
program for employees of the licensed self-service storage insurance
producer as approved by the commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The written disclosure material required in
section (6)(1) of this act must:
(1) Summarize the material terms of insurance coverage offered to
occupants, including the name, address, telephone number of the
insurer, price, benefits, exclusions, and conditions;
(2) Prominently and conspicuously disclose that the policies
offered by the self-service storage insurance producer may provide a
duplication of coverage already provided by an occupant's homeowner's
insurance policy, renter's insurance policy, vehicle insurance policy,
watercraft insurance policy, or other source of property insurance
coverage;
(3) State that if self-service storage insurance is required as a
condition of rental, the requirement may be satisfied by the occupant
purchasing the insurance being offered to the occupant by the owner or
by presenting evidence of other applicable insurance coverage;
(4) Describe the process for filing a claim;
(5) State in writing all costs related to the insurance; and
(6) Disclose any other information required by rule by the
commissioner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) An employee of a self-service storage
insurance producer may be authorized to offer, sell, or solicit self-service storage insurance under the authority of the self-service
storage insurance producer's license, if all of the following
conditions have been satisfied:
(a) The employee is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) The employee is a trustworthy person and has not committed any
act set forth in RCW 48.17.530;
(c) The employee has completed a training and education program;
(d) The self-service storage insurance producer, at the time it
submits its self-service storage insurance producer license
application, also submits a list of the names of all employees to its
self-service storage insurance producer license on forms prescribed by
the commissioner. The list shall be submitted to the commissioner
annually and kept current by reporting all changes, deletions, or
additions within thirty days after the end of the month in which the
change, deletion, or addition occurred. Each list shall be retained by
the self-service storage insurance producer for a period of three years
from submission; and
(e) The self-service storage insurance producer submits to the
commissioner with its initial self-service storage insurance producer
license application, and annually thereafter, a certification
subscribed by an officer of the self-service storage insurance producer
on a form prescribed by the commissioner, stating all of the following:
(i) No person other than an employee offers, sells, or solicits
self-service storage insurance on its behalf or while working as an
employee of the self-service storage insurance producer; and
(ii) All employees have completed the training and education
program under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) A self-service storage insurance producer's employee may only
act on behalf of the self-service storage insurance producer in the
offer, sale, or solicitation of self-service storage insurance. A
self-service storage insurance producer is responsible for, and must
supervise, all actions of its employees related to the offering, sale,
or solicitation of self-service storage insurance. The conduct of an
employee is the same as the conduct of the self-service storage
insurance producer for purposes of this chapter.
(3) The manager at each location of a self-service storage
insurance producer, or the direct supervisor of the self-service
storage insurance producer's employees at each location, must be an
employee of that self-service storage insurance producer and is
responsible for the supervision of each additional employee at that
location. Each self-service storage insurance producer shall identify
the employee who is the manager or direct supervisor at each location
in the employee list that it submits under subsection (1)(d) of this
section.
(4) Each self-service storage insurance producer shall provide a
training and education program for each employee prior to allowing an
employee to offer, sell, or solicit self-service storage insurance.
Details of the program must be submitted to the commissioner, along
with the license application, for approval prior to use, and
resubmitted for approval of any changes prior to use. This training
program shall meet the following minimum standards:
(a) Each employee shall receive instruction about the insurance
authorized under this chapter that may be offered for sale to
prospective occupants; and
(b) Each employee shall receive training about the requirements and
limitations imposed on self-service storage insurance producer and
employees under this chapter. The training must include specific
instruction that the employee is prohibited by law from making any
statement or engaging in any conduct express or implied, that would
lead a consumer to believe that the:
(i) Occupant does not have insurance policies in place that already
provide the coverage being offered by the self-service storage producer
under this chapter; or
(ii) Employee is qualified to evaluate the adequacy of the
occupant's existing insurance coverages.
(5) The training and education program submitted to the
commissioner is approved if no action is taken within thirty days of
its submission.
(6) An employee's authorization to offer, sell, or solicit self-service storage insurance expires when the employee's employment with
the self-service storage insurance producer is terminated.
(7) The self-service storage insurance producer shall retain for a
period of one year from the date of each transaction records which
enable it to identify the name of the employee involved in each rental
transaction when an occupant purchases self-service storage insurance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The commissioner may adopt rules necessary
to implement and administer this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 48.14.010 and 2007 c 117 s 37 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall collect in advance the following fees:

(a) For filing charter documents:

(i) Original charter documents, bylaws
or record of organization of
insurers, or certified copies thereof,
required to be filed . . . . . . . . . . . . $250.00

(ii) Amended charter documents, or
certified copy thereof, other than
amendments of bylaws . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10.00

(iii) No additional charge or fee shall be
required for filing any of such
documents in the office of the
secretary of state.

(b) Certificate of authority:

(i) Issuance . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(ii) Renewal . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(c) Annual statement of insurer, filing . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(d) Organization or financing of domestic insurers and
affiliated corporations:

(i) Application for solicitation permit,
filing . . . . . . . . . . . . $100.00

(ii) Issuance of solicitation permit . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25.00

(e) Insurance producer licenses:

(i) License application . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

(ii) License renewal, every two years

. . . . . . . . . . . . $ 55.00

(iii) Initial appointment and renewal of
appointment of each insurance
producer, every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(iv) Limited line insurance producer
license application and renewal,
every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(f) Reinsurance intermediary licenses:

(i) Reinsurance intermediary-broker,
each year . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) Reinsurance intermediary-
manager, each year . . . . . . . . . . . . $100.00

(g) Surplus line broker license application
and renewal, every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $200.00

(h) Adjusters' licenses:

(i) Independent adjuster, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50.00

(ii) Public adjuster, every two
years . . . . . . . . . . . .
$ 50.00

(i) Managing general agent appointment,
every two years . . . . . . . . . . . . $200.00

(j) Examination for license, each examination:

All examinations, except examinations
administered by an independent
testing service, the fees for which are
to be approved by the commissioner
and collected directly by and retained
by such independent testing service

. . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20.00

(k) Miscellaneous services:

(i) Filing other documents . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(ii) Commissioner's certificate under
seal . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5.00

(iii) Copy of documents filed in the
commissioner's office, reasonable
charge therefor as determined by
the commissioner.

(l) Self-service storage specialty insurance producer
license application and renewal:

Every two years, $130.00 for an owner
with under fifty employees or
$375.00 for an owner with fifty or
more employees; plus a location fee
of $35.00 for each additional location
of an owner.

(2) All fees so collected shall be remitted by the commissioner to
the state treasurer not later than the first business day following,
and shall be placed to the credit of the general fund.
(a) Fees for examinations administered by an independent testing
service that are approved by the commissioner under subsection (1)(j)
of this section shall be collected directly by the independent testing
service and retained by it.
(b) Fees for copies of documents filed in the commissioner's office
shall be remitted by the commissioner to the state treasurer not later
than the first business day following, and shall be placed to the
credit of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---