BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.040 and 1993 c 476 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no
consumer reporting agency may make a consumer report containing any of
the following items of information:
(a) Bankruptcies that, from date of adjudication of the most recent
bankruptcy, antedate the report by more than ten years;
(b) Suits and judgments that, from date of entry, antedate the
report by more than seven years or until the governing statute of
limitations has expired, whichever is the longer period;
(c) Paid tax liens that, from date of payment, antedate the report
by more than seven years;
(d) Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss
that antedate the report by more than seven years;
(e) Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of crime that,
from date of disposition, release, or parole, antedate the report by
more than seven years;
(f) Any other adverse item of information that antedates the report
by more than seven years.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section is not applicable in the case of
a consumer report to be used in connection with:
(a) A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be
expected to involve, a principal amount of fifty thousand dollars or
more;
(b) The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may
reasonably be expected to involve, a face amount of fifty thousand
dollars or more; ((or))
(c) The employment of an individual at an annual salary that
equals, or that may reasonably be expected to equal, twenty thousand
dollars or more; or
(d) Any prospective employee or volunteer who will or may have
unsupervised access to children, individuals with developmental
disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

--- END ---