BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.41.400 and 2007 c 401 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative ((education [evaluation])) evaluation and
accountability program committee, conduct collaborative analyses of
early learning, K-12, and higher education programs and education
issues across the P-20 system, which includes the department of early
learning, the superintendent of public instruction, the professional
educator standards board, the state board of education, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and
education coordinating board, the higher education coordinating board,
public and private nonprofit four-year institutions of higher
education, and the employment security department. The education data
center shall conduct collaborative analyses under this section with the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee and provide
data electronically to the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee, to the extent permitted by state and federal
confidentiality requirements. The education data center shall be
considered an authorized representative of the state educational
agencies in this section under applicable federal and state statutes
for purposes of accessing and compiling student record data for
research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the agencies and organizations
participating in the education data center, identify the critical
research and policy questions that are intended to be addressed by the
education data center and the data needed to address the questions;
(b) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(((b))) (c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the education and fiscal
committees of the legislature in identifying the data to be compiled
and analyzed to ensure that legislative interests are served;
(((c))) (d) Annually provide to the K-12 data governance group a
list of data elements and data quality improvements that are necessary
to answer the research and policy questions identified by the education
data center and have been identified by the legislative committees in
(c) of this subsection. Within three months of receiving the list, the
K-12 data governance group shall develop and transmit to the education
data center a feasibility analysis of obtaining or improving the data,
including the steps required, estimated time frame, and the financial
and other resources that would be required. Based on the analysis,
the education data center shall submit, if necessary, a recommendation
to the legislature regarding any statutory changes or resources that
would be needed to collect or improve the data;
(e) Monitor and evaluate the education data collection systems of
the organizations and agencies represented in the education data center
ensuring that data systems are flexible, able to adapt to evolving
needs for information, and to the extent feasible and necessary,
include data that are needed to conduct the analyses and provide
answers to the research and policy questions identified in (a) of this
subsection;
(f) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(((d))) (g) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative
efforts to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education
including estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs; ((and
(e))) (h) Provide research that focuses on student transitions
within and among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors
in the P-20 system; and
(i) Make recommendations to the legislature as necessary to help
ensure the goals and objectives of this section and sections 2 and 3 of
this act are met.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges, workforce
training and education coordinating board, higher education
coordinating board, public four-year institutions of higher education,
and employment security department shall work with the education data
center to develop data-sharing and research agreements, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements, to facilitate the
work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions of higher
education that provide programs of education beyond the high school
level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are accredited
by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or their peer
accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and research
agreements with the education data center, consistent with applicable
security and confidentiality requirements. The education data center
shall make data from collaborative analyses available to the education
agencies and institutions that contribute data to the education data
center to the extent allowed by federal and state security and
confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of each
contributing agency or institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the legislature's intent to establish a comprehensive K-
12 education data improvement system for financial, student, and
educator data. The objective of the system is to monitor student
progress, have information on the quality of the educator workforce,
monitor and analyze the costs of programs, provide for financial
integrity and accountability, and have the capability to link across
these various data components by student, by class, by teacher, by
school, by district, and statewide. Education data systems must be
flexible and able to adapt to evolving needs for information, but there
must be an objective and orderly data governance process for
determining when changes are needed and how to implement them. It is
the further intent of the legislature to provide independent review and
evaluation of a comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system by
assigning the review and monitoring responsibilities to the education
data center and the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee.
(2) It is the intent that the data system specifically service
reporting requirements for teachers, parents, superintendents, school
boards, the legislature, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the public.
(3) It is the legislature's intent that the K-12 education data
improvement system used by school districts and the state include but
not be limited to the following information and functionality:
(a) Comprehensive educator information, including grade level and
courses taught, building or location, program, job assignment, years of
experience, the institution of higher education from which the educator
obtained his or her degree, compensation, class size, mobility of class
population, socioeconomic data of class, number of languages and which
languages are spoken by students, general resources available for
curriculum and other classroom needs, and number and type of
instructional support staff in the building;
(b) The capacity to link educator assignment information with
educator certification information such as certification number, type
of certification, route to certification, certification program, and
certification assessment or evaluation scores;
(c) Common coding of secondary courses and major areas of study at
the elementary level or standard coding of course content;
(d) Robust student information, including but not limited to
student characteristics, course and program enrollment, performance on
statewide and district summative and formative assessments to the
extent district assessments are used, and performance on college
readiness tests;
(e) A subset of student information elements to serve as a dropout
early warning system;
(f) The capacity to link educator information with student
information;
(g) A common, standardized structure for reporting the costs of
programs at the school and district level with a focus on the cost of
services delivered to students;
(h) Separate accounting of state, federal, and local revenues and
costs;
(i) Information linking state funding formulas to school district
budgeting and accounting, including procedures:
(i) To support the accuracy and auditing of financial data; and
(ii) Using the prototypical school model for school district
financial accounting reporting;
(j) The capacity to link program cost information with student
performance information to gauge the cost-effectiveness of programs;
(k) Information that is centrally accessible and updated regularly;
and
(l) An anonymous, nonidentifiable replicated copy of data that is
updated at least quarterly, and made available to the public by the
state.
(4) It is the legislature's goal that all school districts have the
capability to collect state-identified common data and export it in a
standard format to support a statewide K-12 education data improvement
system under this section.
(5) It is the legislature's intent that the K-12 education data
improvement system be developed to provide the capability to make
reports as required under section 3 of this act available.
(6) It is the legislature's intent that school districts collect
and report new data elements to satisfy the requirements of RCW
43.41.400, this section, and section 3 of this act, only to the extent
funds are available for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A K-12 data governance group shall be established within the
educational data center to assist in the design and implementation of
a K-12 education data improvement system for financial, student, and
educator data. It is the intent that the data system reporting
specifically serve requirements for teachers, parents, superintendents,
school boards, the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the legislature, and the public.
(2) The K-12 data governance group shall include representatives of
the education data center, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, and school district staff, including information
technology staff. Additional entities with expertise in education data
may be included in the K-12 data governance group.
(3) The K-12 data governance group shall:
(a) Identify the critical research and policy questions that need
to be addressed by the K-12 education data improvement system;
(b) Identify reports and other information that should be made
available on the internet in addition to the reports identified in
subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Create a comprehensive needs requirement document detailing the
specific information and technical capacity needed by school districts
and the state to meet the legislature's expectations for a
comprehensive K-12 education data improvement system as described under
section 2 of this act;
(d) Conduct a gap analysis of current and planned information
compared to the needs requirement document, including an analysis of
the strengths and limitations of an education data system and programs
currently used by school districts and the state, and specifically the
gap analysis must look at the extent to which the existing data can be
transformed into canonical form and where existing software can be used
to meet the needs requirement document;
(e) Focus on financial and cost data necessary to support the new
K-12 financial models and funding formulas, including any necessary
changes to school district budgeting and accounting, and on assuring
the capacity to link data across financial, student, and educator
systems; and
(f) Define the operating rules and governance structure for K-12
data collections, ensuring that data systems are flexible and able to
adapt to evolving needs for information, within an objective and
orderly data governance process for determining when changes are needed
and how to implement them. Strong consideration must be made to the
current practice and cost of migration to new requirements. The
operating rules should delineate the coordination, delegation, and
escalation authority for data collection issues, business rules, and
performance goals for each K-12 data collection system, including:
(i) Defining and maintaining standards for privacy and
confidentiality;
(ii) Setting data collection priorities;
(iii) Defining and updating a standard data dictionary;
(iv) Ensuring data compliance with the data dictionary;
(v) Ensuring data accuracy; and
(vi) Establishing minimum standards for school, student, financial,
and teacher data systems. Data elements may be specified "to the
extent feasible" or "to the extent available" to collect more and
better data sets from districts with more flexible software. Nothing
in RCW 43.41.400, this section, or section 2 of this act should be
construed to require that a data dictionary or reporting should be
hobbled to the lowest common set. The work of the K-12 data
governance group must specify which data are desirable. Districts that
can meet these requirements shall report the desirable data. Funding
from the legislature must establish which subset data are absolutely
required.
(4)(a) The K-12 data governance group shall provide updates on its
work as requested by the education data center and the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee.
(b) The work of the K-12 data governance group shall be
periodically reviewed and monitored by the educational data center and
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.
(5) To the extent data is available, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall make the following minimum
reports available on the internet. The reports must either be run on
demand against current data, or, if a static report, must have been run
against the most recent data:
(a) The percentage of data compliance and data accuracy by school
district;
(b) The magnitude of spending per student, by student estimated by
the following algorithm and reported as the detailed summation of the
following components:
(i) An approximate, prorated fraction of each teacher or human
resource element that directly serves the student. Each human resource
element must be listed or accessible through online tunneling in the
report;
(ii) An approximate, prorated fraction of classroom or building
costs used by the student;
(iii) An approximate, prorated fraction of transportation costs
used by the student; and
(iv) An approximate, prorated fraction of all other resources
within the district that support any component of which makes up more
than five percent;
(c) The cost of K-12 basic education, per student, by student, by
school district, estimated by the algorithm in (b) of this subsection,
and reported in the same manner as required in (b) of this subsection;
(d) The cost of K-12 special education services per student, by
student receiving those services, by school district, estimated by the
algorithm in (b) of this subsection, and reported in the same manner as
required in (b) of this subsection;
(e) Improvement on the statewide assessments computed as both a
percentage change and absolute change on a scale score metric by
district, by school, and by teacher that can also be filtered by a
student's length of full-time enrollment within the school district;
(f) Number of K-12 students per classroom teacher on a per teacher
basis;
(g) Number of K-12 classroom teachers per student on a per student
basis;
(h) Percentage of a classroom teacher per student on a per student
basis; and
(i) The cost of K-12 education per student by school district
sorted by federal, state, and local dollars.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a
preliminary report to the legislature by November 15, 2009, including
the analyses by the K-12 data governance group under subsection (3) of
this section and preliminary options for addressing identified gaps.
A final report, including a proposed phase-in plan and preliminary cost
estimates for implementation of a comprehensive data improvement system
for financial, student, and educator data shall be submitted to the
legislature by September 1, 2010.
(7) All reports and data referenced in this section, RCW 43.41.400,
and section 2 of this act shall be made available in a manner
consistent with the technical requirements of the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee and the education data
center so that selected data can be provided to the legislature,
governor, school districts, and the public.
(8) Reports shall contain data to the extent it is available. All
reports must include documentation of which data are not available or
are estimated. Reports must not be suppressed because of poor data
accuracy or completeness. Reports may be accompanied with
documentation to inform the reader of why some data are missing or
inaccurate or estimated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The education data center and the
superintendent of public instruction shall take all actions necessary
to secure federal funds to implement this act.

--- END ---