BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing((, and of)); (2) publishing ((newspapers,))
periodicals((,)) or magazines; (((2))) (3) building, repairing or
improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any
readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any
public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the
course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which
readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of
the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved;
(((3))) (4) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons
taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under another
section of this chapter; (((4))) (5) operating a cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers; (((5))) (6) representing and performing services for fire or
casualty insurance companies as an independent resident managing
general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (((6)))
(7) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and
regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the
national average thereof as annually reported by the Federal
Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (((7))) (8) engaging in
activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer
contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on
such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing((, and of)); (2) publishing ((newspapers,))
periodicals((,)) or magazines; (((2))) (3) building, repairing or
improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any
readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any
public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the
course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which
readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of
the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved;
(((3))) (4) extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons
taxable as extractors for hire or processors for hire under another
section of this chapter; (((4))) (5) operating a cold storage warehouse
or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage
lockers; (((5))) (6) representing and performing services for fire or
casualty insurance companies as an independent resident managing
general agent licensed under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (((6)))
(7) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network, national and
regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the
national average thereof as annually reported by the Federal
Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the
station's total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal
strength and delivery by wire, if any; (((7))) (8) engaging in
activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer
contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on
such business shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon every person in this state engaged in the printing and
publishing of newspapers, or the publishing of newspapers; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the
gross income of such activity multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.102.150 and 2006 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax shall allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines, have the same meanings as attributed to those terms in
section 3 of this act and/or RCW 82.04.280 (1) or (2) by the department
of revenue.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.806 and 2004 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under section 3 of this act and/or RCW
82.04.280 (1) or (2).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
shall be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes
of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for
administrative purposes.

Sec. 6 2006 c 300 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) ((This act and)) Section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2009
(section 2 of this act), section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and
commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip
fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) ((This act)) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first
day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a
significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined
by the director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide notice of
the effective date of this act to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the
department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not
take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the
department ((shall)) must make a determination that ((this act))
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that
would have been otherwise due ((shall be)) are deemed deferred taxes
and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax
under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under section
2 or 5 through 10 ((of this act)), chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Section 2 of this act takes effect if
the contingency in section 6 of this act occurs.
(2) Section 1 of this act expires on the date that section 2 of
this act takes effect.

--- END ---