BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Nationally and locally health care costs are inflating faster
than the consumer price index and wages;
(2) Since 1980, health care costs have increased from nine percent
to sixteen percent of the nation's gross domestic product, and are
expected to exceed twenty percent by 2016;
(3) Other industrialized nations provide universal health care
coverage, but spend much less. Some spend less than half as much per
person;
(4) In 2007, the average annual premium for family coverage was
more than twelve thousand dollars, of which over three thousand dollars
are paid by the worker;
(5) In 2008, of Washingtonians under the age of sixty-five, over
one million three hundred thousand will spend more than ten percent of
their pretax family income on health care costs. Eighty-four percent
of these people have insurance;
(6) Every thirty seconds, someone in this country files for
bankruptcy in the aftermath of a serious health problem. Of those who
file for bankruptcy, sixty-eight percent had health insurance;
(7) In Washington state, approximately thirty cents of every dollar
received by hospitals and doctors' offices is consumed by the
administrative expenses of the health plans and the providers. Before
the doctors and hospitals receive the funds for delivering the care,
approximately fourteen percent of the insurance premium has already
been consumed by health plan administration;
(8) In 2006, hospitals, physicians, community clinics, and other
providers spent a combined total of five hundred eighty-four million
dollars in uncompensated care for the uninsured, a twenty-eight percent
increase since 2002;
(9) The institute of medicine estimates that between thirty and
forty cents associated with every health care dollar is spent on costs
related to poor quality, such as overuse, underuse, misuse,
duplication, system failures, unnecessary repetition, poor
communication, and adverse events attributable to medical errors;
(10) Rising costs have led to a decline in employer-provided health
benefits. In Washington, since 1993, employer-based coverage declined
from seventy-one percent to sixty-five percent;
(11) In 2009, fewer than half of small employers in Washington are
able to offer coverage to their employees;
(12) In the face of a major recession, the health care system is
eroding at an accelerating rate. As businesses suffer, they are
compelled to shed workers and reduce health care coverage. Tax
receipts have declined at the same time, making it increasingly
difficult for the state to maintain existing safety net programs, even
as demand for those programs grows;
(13) Despite the general economic downturn, the rate of health care
inflation is projected to exceed ten percent per year for the next two
years, further stressing the health care system;
(14) A new federal administration has promised to address expanded
coverage, but prospects for federal reform are uncertain;
(15) In view of the rapid and continuing erosion of the health care
system, the legislature must act rapidly to reverse the decline in
coverage and control health care costs in order to preserve the health
and well-being of all Washingtonians.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington health partnership is hereby established and is
intended to attain the following goals, consistent with the
recommendations of the blue ribbon commission, chapter 372, Laws of
2006:
(a) By 2012, every resident of this state shall have access to
affordable, comprehensive health care services;
(b) Services shall be provided through the private health care
sector;
(c) The health reform plan shall maintain and improve choice of
health care providers and high quality health care services in this
state; and
(d) The health reform plan shall include cost-containment
strategies that retain and assure affordable coverage for all
Washingtonians.
(2) Pursuant to sections 3 through 6 of this act, the Washington
health partnership shall implement health reform in overlapping phases
that include (a) extending health coverage to individuals below two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level in an apple health
program; (b) consolidating the state's purchasing of health coverage
into a smaller number of pools and streamlining administration where
possible; (c) selecting a health care reform proposal to be considered
for legislative action; and (d) maximizing federal funding for
immunizations for low-income children and family planning services.
(3) Members of the Washington health partnership at a minimum shall
include representatives from the department of social and health
services, the health care authority, the office of financial
management, and the committees of the house of representatives and the
senate responsible for health care matters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall submit a request to the federal department
of health and human services to expand and revise the medical
assistance program as codified in Title XIX of the federal social
security act. The department shall take such actions as may be
necessary to access federal financial participation for low-income
adults at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level.
To the extent permitted under federal law, the program revisions must
reflect the following policy considerations:
(a) The establishment of a single eligibility standard for low-income persons at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level, or if not permitted, expansion of the categorical eligibility to
include additional adults;
(b) The delivery of all low-income coverage programs as one
program, with a common core benefit package that may be similar to the
basic health benefit package or alternative benefit package that may be
approved by the secretary of the federal department of health and human
services, including the option of supplemental coverage for select
categorical groups like children, and the aged, blind, and disabled;
(c) A program design to include creative and innovative approaches
such as, but not limited to: Coverage for preventive services with
incentives to use appropriate preventive care; cost-sharing options;
use of care management and care coordination programs to prompt better
coordination of medical and behavioral health services; application of
an innovative predictive risk model to better target care management
services; and mandatory enrollment in managed care, as may be
necessary;
(d) The ability to impose enrollment limits or benefit design
changes for eligibility groups that were not eligible under the Title
XIX state plan in effect at the date of the waiver application.
(2) The department shall hold stakeholder discussions to allow
refinement and public comment on the proposal.
(3) Upon development of the proposal, the department and the health
care authority shall identify statutory changes that may be necessary
to ensure successful and timely implementation of an apple health
program for adults.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 By December 1, 2009, the office of financial
management shall, in collaboration with the Washington health
partnership established in section 2 of this act:
(1) Review the findings of the study commissioned under chapter
311, Laws of 2008;
(2) Identify those proposals in the study predicted to
significantly lower overall costs and cover the largest percentage of
uninsured individuals;
(3) Examine each proposal using different funding scenarios and,
based on those scenarios, identify one proposal best suited to meet the
health care needs of Washingtonians. The selected proposal may include
elements from other proposals and shall be consistent with any health
care reform legislation passed by congress;
(4) Make recommendations regarding the consolidation of the state's
purchasing of health coverage into a smaller number of pools as part of
the implementation of the selected proposal;
(5) Refer the selected proposal and any recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature to be considered for
legislative action; and
(6) Work with the state's congressional delegation to seek federal
flexibility needed to assist the state to implement the selected
proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.95M RCW
to read as follows:
The department, in collaboration with the department of social and
health services, shall maximize the use of federal funds, including
section 317 of the federal public health services act direct assistance
as well as federal funds that may become available under the "American
recovery and reinvestment act," in order to continue to provide
immunizations for low-income, nonmedicaid eligible children up to three
hundred percent of the federal poverty level in state-sponsored health
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall submit a Title XXI state plan amendment or
waiver to the federal department of health and human services to allow
Title XXI children to participate in the department's employer-sponsored program, as may be necessary. To the extent allowable under
federal law, the department shall require families to enroll in
available employer-sponsored coverage when it is cost-effective for the
state to do so.
(2)(a) The department shall continue to submit applications for the
family planning waiver program. The department shall submit a request
to the federal department of health and human services to amend the
current family planning waiver program to allow:
(i) Coverage for sexually transmitted disease testing and
treatment;
(ii) A return to the eligibility standards used in 2005, including
but not limited to citizenship determination based on a declaration,
insurance eligibility standards comparable to 2005, and confidential
service availability for minors and survivors of domestic and sexual
violence; and
(iii) Increasing eligibility to two hundred fifty percent of the
federal poverty level, to correspond with the eligibility for publicly
funded pregnancy care services.
(b) The implementation of (a)(iii) of this subsection is subject to
funds provided specifically for this purpose.

--- END ---