BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that freedom of
expression and freedom of the press are fundamental principles in our
democratic society granted to every citizen of this state and the
nation by the First Amendment of the United States Constitution and by
Article I, section 5 of the state Constitution. These freedoms provide
all citizens, including students, with the right to engage in robust
and uninhibited discussion of issues. The legislature finds that court
decisions have not provided adequate protection for the free speech and
free press rights of students. The legislature intends to ensure free
speech and free press protections for both high school and college
students in the state in order to encourage students to become
educated, informed, and responsible members of society.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, public
high school students have the right to exercise freedom of speech and
of the press in school-sponsored media, whether or not the media are
supported financially by the school or by use of school facilities, or
are produced in conjunction with a class.
(2) Student editors of school-sponsored media are responsible for
determining the news, opinion, feature, and advertising content of the
media subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section.
This subsection does not prevent a student media adviser from teaching
professional standards of English and journalism to the student
journalists. A student media adviser may not be terminated,
transferred, removed, or otherwise disciplined for refusing to suppress
the protected free expression rights of student journalists.
(3) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to authorize
expression by students that:
(a) Is obscene as to minors;
(b) Is libelous or slanderous;
(c) Constitutes an unwarranted invasion of privacy;
(d) Violates the federal communications act or any rule or
regulation of the federal communications commission; or
(e) So incites students as to create a clear and present danger of:
(i) The commission of unlawful acts on school premises;
(ii) The violation of lawful school regulations; or
(iii) The material and substantial disruption of the orderly
operation of the school. A school official must base a forecast of
material and substantial disruption on specific facts, including past
experience in the school and current events influencing student
behavior, and not on undifferentiated fear or apprehension.
(4) Any student, individually or through his or her parent or
guardian, enrolled in a public high school may commence a civil action
to obtain appropriate injunctive and declaratory relief as determined
by a court for a violation of subsection (1) of this section. Upon a
motion, a court may award reasonable attorneys' fees to a prevailing
plaintiff in a civil action brought under this section.
(5) Expression made by students in school-sponsored media is not
the expression of school policy. Neither a school official nor the
governing board of the school or school district may be held
responsible in any civil or criminal action for any expression made or
published by students in school-sponsored media unless school officials
or the governing board have interfered with or altered the content of
the student expression.
(6) Each school district that includes a high school shall adopt
regulations in the form of a written student freedom of expression
policy in accordance with this section. The policy shall include
reasonable provisions for the time, place, and manner of student
expression.
(7) This section does not apply to correctional institution
education programs under chapter 28A.193 RCW or to residential
education programs under chapter 28A.190 RCW operating in department of
social and health services facilities for the confinement and
rehabilitation of juveniles committed by the courts.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Obscene as to minors" means material that the average person,
applying community standards, finds as a whole appeals to a minor's
prurient interest in sex, and that depicts or describes in an offensive
way sexual conduct or sexual acts, and that lacks serious literary,
artistic, political, or scientific value.
(b) "School-sponsored media" means any matter that is prepared,
substantially written, published, or broadcast by student journalists,
that is distributed or generally made available, either free-of-charge
or for a fee, to members of the student body, and that is prepared
under the direction of a student media adviser. "School-sponsored
media" does not include media that is intended for distribution or
transmission solely in the classrooms in which they are produced.
(c) "Student journalist" means a student who gathers, compiles,
writes, edits, photographs, records, or prepares information for
dissemination in school-sponsored media.
(d) "Student media adviser" means a person who is employed,
appointed, or designated by the school to supervise, or provide
instruction relating to, school-sponsored media.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Students at public institutions of higher education have the
right to exercise freedom of speech and of the press in school-sponsored media, whether or not the media are supported financially by
the school or by use of school facilities, or are produced in
conjunction with a class. All school-sponsored media produced
primarily by students at a public institution of higher education are
public forums for expression by the student journalists and student
editors at the particular institution. Student media, whether school-sponsored or nonschool-sponsored, are not subject to mandatory prior
review by school officials.
(2) Student editors of school-sponsored media are responsible for
determining the news, opinion, feature, and advertising content of the
media. This subsection does not prevent a student media adviser from
teaching professional standards of English and journalism to the
student journalists. A student media adviser may not be terminated,
transferred, removed, or otherwise disciplined for refusing to suppress
the protected free expression rights of student journalists.
(3) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to authorize
expression by students that violates the federal communications act or
any rule or regulation of the federal communications commission.
(4) Any student enrolled in a public institution of higher
education may commence a civil action to obtain appropriate injunctive
and declaratory relief as determined by a court for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section by the public institution of higher
education. Upon a motion, a court may award reasonable attorneys' fees
to a prevailing plaintiff in a civil action brought under this section.
(5) Expression made by students in school-sponsored media is not
the expression of school policy. Neither a school official nor the
governing board of any public institution of higher education may be
held responsible in any civil or criminal action for any expression
made or published by students in school-sponsored media unless school
officials or the governing board have interfered with or altered the
content of the student expression.
(6) This section does not apply to educational programs operated by
institutions of higher education in adult correctional institutions or
in secure facilities operated by the department of social and health
services under chapter 71.09 RCW.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "School-sponsored media" means any matter that is prepared,
substantially written, published, or broadcast by student journalists,
that is distributed or generally made available, either free-of-charge
or for a fee, to members of the student body, and that is prepared
under the direction of a student media adviser. "School-sponsored
media" does not include media that is intended for distribution or
transmission solely in the classrooms in which they are produced.
(b) "Student journalist" means a student who gathers, compiles,
writes, edits, photographs, records, or prepares information for
dissemination in school-sponsored media.
(c) "Student media adviser" means a person who is employed,
appointed, or designated by the school to supervise, or provide
instruction relating to, school-sponsored media.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---