BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The centers of occupational health and
education program has been very successful at reducing costs associated
with workers' compensation claims. These savings have come through
implementation of best practices by health care providers, employers,
and health services coordinator staff, supported by an effective
information technology tool. The centers of occupational health and
education program has been operating on a pilot basis, limiting access
to these services to a small percentage of the Washington employee
population and reducing potential cost savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall, in consultation with the workers'
compensation advisory committee, create a statewide centers of
occupational health and education program. To establish a statewide
program, the department shall by July 1, 2010, contract with one or
more qualified vendors to operate the statewide centers of occupational
health and education program.
(2) The statewide centers of occupational health and education
program must:
(a) Be modeled on the department's pilot project program developed
in the Spokane region;
(b) Continue and build upon the centers of occupational health and
education currently in place;
(c) Preserve a worker's choice of physician;
(d) Improve communication between physicians, employers, workers,
union, and the department;
(e) Make clinical and administrative resources available when and
where physicians and workers need them most;
(f) Foster community-based workplace injury and illness prevention;
(g) Provide reimbursement to physicians for specific services
demonstrated through research to improve worker outcomes;
(h) Promote free continuing medical education in occupational
health practices to help physicians in the community to gain expertise
in disability prevention; and
(i) Track quality indicators and worker outcomes and provide
feedback to participating physicians.
(3) A vendor or vendors who are contracted under subsection (1) of
this section must use best practices in implementing and operating the
centers of occupational health and education program. This includes,
but is not limited to:
(a) Having available for immediate implementation a web-based
information technology tool that allows multiple parties to have access
to a claim;
(b) Conducting health services coordination in a manner that meets
the needs and challenges of geographic disparities; and
(c) Supporting provider and office staff education through academic
detailing rather than a dependence on didactic continuing education
formats.
(4) The department must report annually beginning December 31,
2009, on the implementation of this section. The report must include:
The centers of occupational health and education payment model; an
analysis of the system-wide changes or improvements, or both, and their
impact on operations costs and resources; and program outcomes.

--- END ---