BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.39A.009 and 2009 c 2 s 2 (Initiative Measure No.
1029) are each amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128
RCW.
(2) "Adult residential care" means services provided by a boarding
home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW and that has a contract
with the department under RCW 74.39A.020 to provide personal care
services.
(3) "Assisted living services" means services provided by a
boarding home that has a contract with the department under RCW
74.39A.010 to provide personal care services, intermittent nursing
services, and medication administration services, and the resident is
housed in a private apartment-like unit.
(4) "Background check" or "fingerprint-based background check"
means a fingerprint check submitted for the purpose of investigating
conviction records both through the Washington state patrol and the
federal bureau of investigation.
(5) "Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW.
(((5))) (6) "Core competencies" means basic training topics,
including but not limited to, communication skills, worker self-care,
problem solving, maintaining dignity, consumer directed care, cultural
sensitivity, body mechanics, fall prevention, skin and body care, long-term care worker roles and boundaries, supporting activities of daily
living, and food preparation and handling.
(((6))) (7) "Cost-effective care" means care provided in a setting
of an individual's choice that is necessary to promote the most
appropriate level of physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being
consistent with client choice, in an environment that is appropriate to
the care and safety needs of the individual, and such care cannot be
provided at a lower cost in any other setting. But this in no way
precludes an individual from choosing a different residential setting
to achieve his or her desired quality of life.
(((7))) (8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((8))) (9) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 71A.10.020.
(((9))) (10) "Direct care worker" means a paid caregiver who
provides direct, hands-on personal care services to persons with
disabilities or the elderly requiring long-term care.
(((10))) (11) "Enhanced adult residential care" means services
provided by a boarding home that is licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW
and that has a contract with the department under RCW 74.39A.010 to
provide personal care services, intermittent nursing services, and
medication administration services.
(((11))) (12) "Functionally disabled person" or "person who is
functionally disabled" is synonymous with chronic functionally disabled
and means a person who because of a recognized chronic physical or
mental condition or disease, or developmental disability, including
chemical dependency, is impaired to the extent of being dependent upon
others for direct care, support, supervision, or monitoring to perform
activities of daily living. "Activities of daily living", in this
context, means self-care abilities related to personal care such as
bathing, eating, using the toilet, dressing, and transfer.
Instrumental activities of daily living may also be used to assess a
person's functional abilities as they are related to the mental
capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.
(((12))) (13) "Home and community services" means adult family
homes, in-home services, and other services administered or provided by
contract by the department directly or through contract with area
agencies on aging or similar services provided by facilities and
agencies licensed by the department.
(((13))) (14) "Home care aide" means a long-term care worker who
has obtained certification as a home care aide by the department of
health.
(((14))) (15) "Individual provider" is defined according to RCW
74.39A.240.
(((15))) (16) "Long-term care" is synonymous with chronic care and
means care and supports delivered indefinitely, intermittently, or over
a sustained time to persons of any age disabled by chronic mental or
physical illness, disease, chemical dependency, or a medical condition
that is permanent, not reversible or curable, or is long-lasting and
severely limits their mental or physical capacity for self-care. The
use of this definition is not intended to expand the scope of services,
care, or assistance by any individuals, groups, residential care
settings, or professions unless otherwise expressed by law.
(((16))) (17)(a) "Long-term care workers for the elderly or persons
with disabilities" or "long-term care workers" includes all persons who
are long-term care workers for the elderly or persons with
disabilities, including but not limited to individual providers of home
care services, direct care employees of home care agencies, providers
of home care services to persons with developmental disabilities under
Title 71 RCW, all direct care workers in state-licensed boarding homes,
assisted living facilities, and adult family homes, respite care
providers, community residential service providers, and any other
direct care worker providing home or community-based services to the
elderly or persons with functional disabilities or developmental
disabilities.
(b) "Long-term care workers" do not include: (i) Persons employed
in nursing homes subject to chapter 18.51 RCW, hospitals or other acute
care settings, hospice agencies subject to chapter 70.127 RCW, adult
day care centers, and adult day health care centers; or (ii) persons
who are not paid by the state or by a private agency or facility
licensed by the state to provide personal care services.
(((17))) (18) "Nursing home" means a facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW.
(((18))) (19) "Personal care services" means physical or verbal
assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities
of daily living provided because of a person's functional disability.
(((19))) (20) "Population specific competencies" means basic
training topics unique to the care needs of the population the long-term care worker is serving, including but not limited to, mental
health, dementia, developmental disabilities, young adults with
physical disabilities, and older adults.
(((20))) (21) "Qualified instructor" means a registered nurse or
other person with specific knowledge, training, and work experience in
the provision of direct, hands-on personal care and other assistance
services to the elderly or persons with disabilities requiring
long-term care.
(((21))) (22) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.
(((22))) (23) "Secretary of health" means the secretary of health
or the secretary's designee.
(((23))) (24) "Training partnership" means a joint partnership or
trust that includes the office of the governor and the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270
with the capacity to provide training, peer mentoring, and workforce
development, or other services to individual providers.
(((24))) (25) "Tribally licensed boarding home" means a boarding
home licensed by a federally recognized Indian tribe which home
provides services similar to boarding homes licensed under chapter
18.20 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20A.710 and 2001 c 296 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending
charges and disciplinary board final decisions of:
(a) Any current employee or applicant seeking or being considered
for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised
access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental
illness or developmental disabilities. This includes, but is not
limited to, positions conducting comprehensive assessments, financial
eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities,
investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions
otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards;
(b) Individual providers who are paid by the state and providers
who are paid by home care agencies to provide in-home services
involving unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, including but not limited to services
provided under chapter 74.39 or 74.39A RCW; and
(c) Individuals or businesses or organizations for the care,
supervision, case management, or treatment of children,
((developmentally disabled)) persons with developmental disabilities,
or vulnerable adults, including but not limited to services contracted
for under chapter 18.20, ((18.48,)) 70.127, 70.128, 72.36, or 74.39A
RCW or Title 71A RCW.
(2) The investigation may include an examination of state and
national criminal identification data. The secretary shall use the
information solely for the purpose of determining the character,
suitability, and competence of these applicants.
(3)(a) On or before January 1, 2010, an individual provider or home
care agency provider who has resided in the state less than three years
before applying for employment involving unsupervised access to a
vulnerable adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must be fingerprinted
for the purpose of investigating conviction records both through the
Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation. This
subsection applies only with respect to the provision of in-home
services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520,
community options program entry system waiver services under RCW
74.39A.030, or chore services under RCW 74.39A.110. However, this
subsection does not supersede RCW 74.15.030(2)(b).
(b) After January 1, 2010, state and federal criminal background
checks for long-term care workers for the elderly or persons with
disabilities are governed by RCW 74.39A.055.
(4) An individual provider or home care agency provider hired to
provide in-home care for and having unsupervised access to a vulnerable
adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW must have no conviction for a
disqualifying crime under RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842. An individual
or home care agency provider must also have no conviction for a crime
relating to drugs as defined in RCW 43.43.830. This subsection applies
only with respect to the provision of in-home services funded by
medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520, community options program
entry system waiver services under RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services
under RCW 74.39A.110.
(5) Beginning January 1, 2010, pursuant to chapter 18.88B RCW, the
department of health shall have concurrent responsibility with the
department for suitability determinations regarding disqualifying
crimes.
(6) To the extent authorized by law, the secretary shall provide
the results of the background check on individual providers to the
persons hiring them or to their legal guardians, if any, for their
determination of the character, suitability, and competence of the
applicants. If the person elects to hire or retain an individual
provider after receiving notice from the department that the applicant
has a conviction for an offense that would disqualify the applicant
from having unsupervised access to persons with physical, mental, or
developmental disabilities or mental illness, or to vulnerable adults
as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW, then the secretary shall deny payment
for any subsequent services rendered by the disqualified individual
provider.
(((6))) (7) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary
such information as they may have and that the secretary may require
for such purpose.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "background check" or
"fingerprint-based background check" means the same as defined in RCW
74.39A.009.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.43.837 and 2007 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to determine the character, competence, and
suitability of any applicant or service provider to have unsupervised
access, the secretary may require a fingerprint-based background check
through the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation at anytime, but shall require a fingerprint-based
background check when the applicant or service provider has resided in
the state less than three consecutive years before application, and:
(a) Is an applicant or service provider providing services to
children or people with developmental disabilities under RCW 74.15.030;
(b) Is an individual residing in an applicant or service provider's
home, facility, entity, agency, or business or who is authorized by the
department to provide services to children or people with developmental
disabilities under RCW 74.15.030; or
(c) Is an applicant or service provider providing in-home services
funded by:
(i) Medicaid personal care under RCW 74.09.520;
(ii) Community options program entry system waiver services under
RCW 74.39A.030;
(iii) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110; or
(iv) Other home and community long-term care programs, established
pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW, administered by the
department.
(2) The secretary shall require a fingerprint-based background
check:
(a) For long-term care workers pursuant to RCW 74.39A.055; and
(b) Through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal
history section and the federal bureau of investigation when the
department seeks to approve an applicant or service provider for a
foster or adoptive placement of children in accordance with federal and
state law.
(3) Any secure facility operated by the department under chapter
71.09 RCW shall require applicants and service providers to undergo a
fingerprint-based background check through the Washington state patrol
identification and criminal history section and the federal bureau of
investigation.
(4) Service providers and service provider applicants who are
required to complete a fingerprint-based background check may be hired
for a one hundred twenty-day provisional period as allowed under law or
program rules when:
(a) A fingerprint-based background check is pending; and
(b) The applicant or service provider is not disqualified based on
the immediate result of the background check.
(5) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal
bureau of investigation for fingerprint-based background checks shall
be paid by the department for applicants or service providers
providing:
(a) Services to people with a developmental disability under RCW
74.15.030;
(b) In-home services funded by medicaid personal care under RCW
74.09.520;
(c) Community options program entry system waiver services under
RCW 74.39A.030;
(d) Chore services under RCW 74.39A.110;
(e) Services under other home and community long-term care
programs, established pursuant to chapters 74.39 and 74.39A RCW,
administered by the department;
(f) Services in, or to residents of, a secure facility under RCW
71.09.115; and
(g) Foster care as required under RCW 74.15.030.
(6) Service providers licensed under RCW 74.15.030 must pay fees
charged by the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation for conducting fingerprint-based background checks.
(7) Children's administration service providers licensed under RCW
74.15.030 may not pass on the cost of the background check fees to
their applicants unless the individual is determined to be disqualified
due to the background information.
(8) The department shall develop rules identifying the financial
responsibility of service providers, applicants, and the department for
paying the fees charged by law enforcement to roll, print, or scan
fingerprints-based for the purpose of a Washington state patrol or
federal bureau of investigation fingerprint-based background check.
(9) For purposes of this section, unless the context plainly
indicates otherwise:
(a) "Applicant" means a current or prospective department or
service provider employee, volunteer, student, intern, researcher,
contractor, or any other individual who will or may have unsupervised
access because of the nature of the work or services he or she
provides. "Applicant" includes but is not limited to any individual
who will or may have unsupervised access and is:
(i) Applying for a license or certification from the department;
(ii) Seeking a contract with the department or a service provider;
(iii) Applying for employment, promotion, reallocation, or
transfer;
(iv) An individual that a department client or guardian of a
department client chooses to hire or engage to provide services to
himself or herself or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and
who might be eligible to receive payment from the department for
services rendered; or
(v) A department applicant who will or may work in a department-covered position.
(b) "Authorized" means the department grants an applicant, home, or
facility permission to:
(i) Conduct licensing, certification, or contracting activities;
(ii) Have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults, juveniles, and
children;
(iii) Receive payments from a department program; or
(iv) Work or serve in a department-covered position.
(c) "Background check" or "fingerprint-based background check"
means the same as defined in RCW 74.39A.009.
(d) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((d))) (e) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of
social and health services.
(((e))) (f) "Secure facility" has the meaning provided in RCW
71.09.020.
(((f))) (g) "Service provider" means entities, facilities,
agencies, businesses, or individuals who are licensed, certified,
authorized, or regulated by, receive payment from, or have contracts or
agreements with the department to provide services to vulnerable
adults, juveniles, or children. "Service provider" includes
individuals whom a department client or guardian of a department client
may choose to hire or engage to provide services to himself or herself
or another vulnerable adult, juvenile, or child and who might be
eligible to receive payment from the department for services rendered.
"Service provider" does not include those certified under chapter
70.96A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2009.

--- END ---