BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.08.100 and 2005 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
On contracts for construction, maintenance, or repair of a marine
vessel, the department of transportation or any county may permit,
subject to specified format and conditions, the substitution of one or
more of the following alternate forms of security in lieu of all or
part of the bond: Certified check, replacement bond, cashier's check,
treasury bills, an irrevocable bank letter of credit, assignment of a
savings account, or other liquid assets specifically approved by the
secretary of transportation or county engineer, for their respective
projects. The secretary of transportation or county engineer,
respectively, shall predetermine and include in the special provisions
of the bid package the amount of this alternative form of security or
bond, or a combination of the two, on a case-by-case basis((, in an
amount adequate to protect one hundred percent of the state's or
county's exposure to loss)). Assets used as an alternative form of
security shall not be used to secure the bond. By October 1, 1989, the
department shall develop and adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that
establish the procedures for determining the state's exposure to loss
on contracts for construction, maintenance, or repair of a marine
vessel. Prior to awarding any contract limiting security to the
county's exposure to loss, a county shall develop and adopt an
ordinance that establishes the procedure for determining the county's
exposure to loss on contracts for construction, maintenance, or repair
of a marine vessel.

--- END ---