BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state is projected to experience substantial population and
employment growth in the next two decades and this growth will require
substantial new housing, places of employment, community facilities,
and supporting local, subregional, and regional infrastructure;
(2) In most areas of the state projected to accommodate substantial
growth, there are inadequate community facilities and infrastructure to
facilitate and support such growth. In addition, there is inadequate
public financing and public financing mechanisms available to provide
the needed community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure;
(3) A more flexible type of financing mechanism known as a
community facilities district should be available to counties, cities,
and towns so that needed community facilities and local, subregional,
and regional infrastructure can be provided; and
(4) This act is intended to facilitate landowner financing of
community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure by authorizing community facilities districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a community facilities
district.
(2) "Community facilities district" or "district" means a municipal
corporation, an independent taxing authority within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a taxing district
within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution
that has been created by a vote of the people under this title to
implement a regional community facilities authority plan.
(3) "Community facilities jurisdiction" means a community
facilities district, city, town, port district, or Indian tribe.
(4) "Regional board" means the governing body of a regional
community facilities authority.
(5) "Regional community facilities authority" or "authority" means
a municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within the
meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution that has been created by a vote of the people under
this title to implement a regional community facilities authority plan.
(6) "Regional community facilities authority plan" or "plan" means
a plan to develop and finance a regional community facilities authority
project or projects including, but not limited to, facilities listed in
section 801(2) of this act.
(7) "Regional community facilities authority planning committee" or
"planning committee" means the advisory committee created under section
1001 of this act to create and propose to community facilities
jurisdictions a regional community facilities authority plan to design,
finance, and develop community facilities district projects.
(8) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

PART II
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS FORMATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Community facilities districts for the
provision of community facilities operations and projects are
authorized to be established as provided in this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) For the purpose of the formation of a
community facilities district, a petition designating the boundaries of
the proposed district, by metes and bounds, or by describing the lands
to be included in the proposed district by United States townships,
ranges, and legal subdivisions, signed by not less than ten percent of
the registered voters who reside within the boundaries of the proposed
district who voted in the last general municipal election, and setting
forth the object for the creation of the proposed district and alleging
that the establishment of the proposed district will be conducive to
the public safety, welfare, and convenience, and will be a benefit to
the property included in the proposed district, must be filed with the
county auditor of the county in which all, or the largest portion of,
the proposed district is located, accompanied by an obligation signed
by two or more petitioners, agreeing to pay the cost of the publication
of the notice required by this title.
(2) The county auditor must, within thirty days from the date of
filing the petition, examine the signatures and certify to the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. If the proposed
community facilities district is located in more than one county, the
auditor of the county in which the largest portion of the proposed
community facilities district is located must be the lead auditor and
must transmit a copy of the petition to the auditor or auditors of the
other county or counties within which the proposed community facilities
district is located. Each of these other auditors must certify to the
lead auditor both the total number of registered voters residing in
that portion of the proposed community facilities district that is
located in the county and the number of valid signatures of such voters
who have signed the petition. The lead auditor must certify the
sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures. The books and records
of the auditor are prima facie evidence of the truth of the
certificate. No person having signed the petition is allowed to
withdraw his or her name after the filing of the petition with the
county auditor.
(3) If the petition is found to contain a sufficient number of
signatures of registered voters residing within the proposed district,
the county auditor must transmit the petition, together with the
auditor's certificate of sufficiency, to the county legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties in which the
proposed community facilities district is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 The county auditor who certifies the
sufficiency of the petition must notify the person or persons who
submitted the petition of its sufficiency or insufficiency within five
days of when the determination of sufficiency or insufficiency is made.
Notice must be by certified mail and additionally may be made by
telephone. If a boundary review board exists in the county or counties
in which the proposed community facilities district is located and the
petition has been certified as being sufficient, the petitioners must
file notice of the proposed incorporation with the boundary review
board or boards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) A public hearing on the petition must
be held by the county legislative authority of the county in which the
proposed community facilities district is located if: (a) No boundary
review board exists in the county; (b) jurisdiction by the boundary
review board over the proposal has not been invoked; or (c) the
boundary review board fails to take action on the proposal over which
its jurisdiction has been invoked within the time period that the board
must act or a proposal is deemed to have been approved. If such a
public hearing is held by the county legislative authority, the hearing
must be held not less than twenty nor more than forty days from the
date of receipt of the petition with the certificate of sufficiency
from the county auditor if there is no boundary review board in the
county, or not more than one hundred days from when the notice of the
proposal was submitted to the boundary review board if the jurisdiction
of the boundary review board was not invoked, or not less than forty
days after the date that the boundary review board that has had its
jurisdiction invoked over the proposal must act if the proposal is
deemed to have been approved. The hearing by the county legislative
authority may be completed at the scheduled time or may be adjourned
from time to time as may be necessary for a determination of the
petition, but such adjournment or adjournments may not extend the time
for considering the petition more than twenty days from the date of the
initial hearing on the petition.
(2) If the proposed community facilities district is located in
more than one county, a public hearing must be held in each of the
counties by the county legislative authority or boundary review board.
Joint public hearings may be held by two or more county legislative
authorities, or two or more boundary review boards, on the proposal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 Notice of the public hearing by the county
legislative authority on such a proposal must be published for three
consecutive weeks in the official paper of the county prior to the date
set for the hearing and must be posted for not less than fifteen days
prior to the date of the hearing in each of three public places within
the boundaries of the proposed district. The notices must contain the
time, date, and place of the public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 At the time and place of the hearing on
the petition or at any adjournment thereof, the county legislative
authority must consider the petition and must receive evidence as it
deems material in favor of or opposed to the formation of the district
or to the inclusion or exclusion of any lands. No lands outside of the
boundaries of the proposed district as described in the petition may be
included within the district without a written petition describing the
land, executed by all persons having an interest of record in the
lands, and filed with the proceedings on the petition. No land within
the boundaries described in the petition, except that land which the
county legislative authority finds will receive no benefits from the
proposed district, may be excluded from the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 The county legislative authority has the
authority to consider the petition and, if it finds that the lands or
any portion of the lands described in the petition, and any lands added
thereto by petition of those interested, will be benefited and that the
formation of the district will be conducive to the public safety,
welfare, and convenience, it must make a finding by resolution;
otherwise it must deny the petition. The county legislative authority
must consider only those areas located within the county when
considering the petition. If the county legislative authority approves
the petition, it must designate the name and number of the district,
fix the boundaries of the district that are located within the county,
and direct that an election be held within the proposed district for
the purpose of determining whether the district must be organized under
this title and for the purpose of the election of its first community
facilities commissioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 (1) The election on the formation of the
district and to elect the initial community facilities commissioners
must be conducted by the election officials of the county or counties
in which the proposed district is located in accordance with the
general election laws of the state. This election must be held at the
next general election date according to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330,
which occurs after the date of the action by the boundary review board,
or county legislative authority or authorities, approving the proposal.
(2) Where a proposed community facilities district is located in
more than a single county, the community facilities district must be
identified by the name of each county in which the proposed community
facilities district is located, listed alphabetically, followed by a
number that is the next highest number available for a community
facilities district in one of the counties that has the greatest number
of community facilities districts. An election on a proposed community
facilities district that is located in more than one county may not be
held unless the proposed district has been approved by the county
legislative authorities, or boundary review boards, of each county
within which the proposed district is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 If three-fifths of all the votes cast at
the election were cast in favor of the ballot proposition to create the
proposed community facilities district, the county legislative
authority of the county in which all, or the largest portion of, the
proposed district is located must by resolution declare the territory
organized as a community facilities district under the name designated
and must declare the candidate for each community facilities
commissioner position who receives the highest number of votes for that
position to be an initial community facilities commissioner of the
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 Any person or entity having a substantial
interest and feeling aggrieved by any finding, determination, or
resolution of the county legislative authority in the proceedings for
the organization of a community facilities district under this title
may appeal within five days after the action of the county legislative
authority to the superior court of the county, in the same manner as
provided by law for appeals from the orders and determinations of the
county legislative authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 After the expiration of five days from the
approval of the resolution of the county legislative authority
declaring the district to be organized, and the filing of the certified
copies of the resolution of the county legislative authority with the
county auditor and the county assessor, the creation of the district is
complete and its legal existence cannot thereafter be questioned by any
person by reason of a defect in the proceedings for the organization of
the district.

PART III
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS MERGER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Actions taken under this chapter may be
subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter
36.93 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A community facilities district may merge
with another adjacent community facilities district, on such terms and
conditions as they agree upon, in the manner provided in this title.
The community facilities districts may be located in different
counties. The district desiring to merge with another district, or the
district from which it is proposed that a portion of the district be
merged with another district, must be called the "merging district."
The district into which the merger is to be made must be called the
"merger district." The merger of any districts under this chapter is
subject to potential review by the boundary review board or boards of
the county in which the merging district, or the portion of the merging
district that is proposed to be merged with another district, is
located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 To effect such a merger, a petition to
merge must be filed with the board of the merger district by the
commissioners of the merging district. The commissioners of the
merging district may sign and file the petition on their own
initiative, and they must file a petition when it is signed by ten
percent of the registered voters resident in the merging district who
voted in the last general municipal election and presented to the board
of commissioners. The petition must state the reasons for the merger,
state the terms and conditions under which the merger is proposed, and
request the merger.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) The board of the merger district may,
by resolution, reject or approve the petition as presented, or it may
modify the terms and conditions of the proposed merger, and shall
transmit the petition, together with a copy of its resolution to the
merging district.
(2) If the petition is approved as presented or as modified, the
board of the merging district shall send an elector-signed petition, if
there is one, to the auditor or auditors of the county or counties in
which the merging district is located, who shall within thirty days
examine the signatures and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency
of the signatures. If the merging district is located in more than one
county, the auditor of the county within which the largest portion of
the merging district is located is the lead auditor. Each other
auditor must certify to the lead auditor the number of valid signatures
and the number of registered voters of the merging district who reside
in the county. The lead auditor must certify as to the sufficiency or
insufficiency of the signatures. No signatures may be withdrawn from
the petition after the filing. A certificate of sufficiency must be
provided to the board of the merging district, which must adopt a
resolution requesting the county auditor or auditors to call a special
election, as provided in RCW 29A.04.330, for the purpose of presenting
the question of merging the districts to the voters of the merging
district.
(3) If there is no elector-signed petition, the merging district
board must adopt a resolution requesting the county auditor or auditors
to call a special election in the merging district, as specified under
RCW 29A.04.330, for the purpose of presenting the question of the
merger to the electors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The board of the merging district must
notify the board of the merger district of the results of the election.
If a majority of the votes cast at the election favor the merger, the
respective district boards must adopt concurrent resolutions, declaring
the districts merged, under the name of the merger district.
Thereupon, the districts are merged into one district, under the name
of the merger district; the merging district is dissolved without
further proceedings; and the boundaries of the merger district are
thereby extended to include all the area of the merging district.
Thereafter, the legal existence cannot be questioned by any person by
reason of any defect in the proceedings for the merger.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 If three-fifths of all the qualified
electors in the merging district sign the petition to merge, no
election on the question of the merger is necessary and the auditor, or
lead auditor if the merging district is located in more than a single
county, must return the petition, together with a certificate of
sufficiency to the board of the merging district. The boards of the
respective districts must then adopt resolutions declaring the
districts merged in the same manner and to the same effect as if the
merger had been authorized by an election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 None of the obligations of the merged
districts or of a local improvement district located in the merged
districts may be affected by the merger and dissolution, and all land
liable to be assessed to pay any of the indebtedness shall remain
liable to the same extent as if the districts had not been merged and
any assessments previously levied against the land must remain
unimpaired and must be collected in the same manner as if the districts
had not merged. The commissioners of the merged district must have all
the powers of the two districts to levy, assess, and cause to be
collected all assessments against any land in both districts that may
be necessary to pay for the indebtedness thereof, and until the
assessments are collected and all indebtedness of the districts paid,
separate funds shall be maintained for each district as were maintained
before the merger. However, the board of the merged district may, with
the consent of the creditors of the districts merged, cancel any or all
assessments previously levied, in accordance with the terms and
conditions of the merger, so that the lands in the respective districts
bear their fair and proportionate share of the indebtedness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 The commissioners of the merging district
must, upon completion of the merger, transfer, convey, and deliver to
the merged district all property and funds of the merging district,
together with all interest in and right to collect any assessments
previously levied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 (1) Whenever two or more community
facilities districts merge, the board of community facilities
commissioners of the merged community facilities district consists of
all of the community facilities commissioners of the districts that are
merging, including a person who is elected as a community facilities
commissioner of one of the merging districts at that same election that
the ballot proposition was approved authorizing the merger, who must
retain the same terms of office they would possess as if the merger had
not been approved. The number of members on the board of the merged
district must be reduced to either three or five members as provided in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, depending on whether the
district has chosen to eventually have either a three-member or a five-member board under section 705 of this act.
(2) The number of members on the board of the merged district must
be reduced by one whenever a community facilities commissioner resigns
from office or a vacancy otherwise occurs on the board, until the
number of remaining members is reduced to the number of members that is
chosen for the board eventually to have. The reduction of membership
on the board may not be considered to be a vacancy that is to be filled
until the number of remaining members is less than the number of
members on the board that is chosen for the board eventually to have.
(3)(a) At the next three district general elections after the
merger is approved, the number of community facilities commissioners
for the merged district that are elected must be as follows,
notwithstanding the number of community facilities commissioners whose
terms expire:
(i) In the first election after the merger, only one position must
be filled, whether the new community facilities district be a three-member district or a five-member district.
(ii) In each of the two subsequent elections, one position must be
filled if the new community facilities district is a three-member
district and two positions must be filled if the new community
facilities district is a five-member district.
(b) After the elections specified in (a) of this subsection, the
community facilities commissioners must be elected in the same manner
as prescribed for the community facilities districts of the state.
(4) A ballot proposition to create commissioner districts may be
submitted to the voters of the community facilities districts proposed
to be merged at the same election the ballot proposition is submitted
authorizing the merging of the community facilities districts. The
procedure to create commissioner districts must conform with section
702 of this act, except that: (a) Resolutions proposing the creation
of commissioner districts must be adopted by unanimous vote of the
boards of community facilities commissioners of each of the community
facilities districts that are proposed to be merged; and (b)
commissioner districts will be authorized only if the ballot
propositions to authorize the merger and to create commissioner
districts are both approved. A ballot proposition authorizing the
creation of commissioner districts is approved if it is approved by a
simple majority vote of the combined voters of all the community
facilities districts proposed to be merged. The commissioner districts
may not be drawn until the number of commissioners in the community
facilities district has been reduced under subsections (1) through (3)
of this section to either three or five commissioners. After this
reduction of community facilities commissioners has occurred the
commissioner districts must be drawn and used for the election of the
successor community facilities commissioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 (1) A part of one district may be
transferred and merged with an adjacent district if the area can be
better served by the merged district. To effect such a merger, a
petition, signed by a majority of the commissioners of the merging
district or signed by not less than fifteen percent of the qualified
electors residing in the area to be merged, must be filed with the
commissioners of the merging district, if signed by electors, or with
the commissioners of the merger district if signed by commissioners of
the merging district. If the commissioners of the merging district
approve the petition, the petition must be presented to the
commissioners of the merger district. If the commissioners of the
merger district approve the petition, an election must be called in the
area to be merged.
(2) In the event that either board of community facilities
commissioners does not approve the petition, the petition may be
approved by the boundary review board of the county or the county
legislative authority of the county in which the area to be merged is
situated, and may approve the merger if it decides the area can be
better served by a merger. If the part of the merging district that is
proposed to merge with the merger district is located in more than one
county, the approval must be by the boundary review board or county
legislative authority of each county. If there is an affirmative
decision, an election must be called in the area to be merged.
(3) A majority of the votes cast is necessary to approve the
transfer under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 If three-fifths of the qualified electors
in the area to be merged sign a petition to merge the districts, no
election on the question of the merger is necessary, in which case the
auditor or lead auditor must return the petition, together with a
certificate of sufficiency, to the board of the merger district. The
board of the merger district must then adopt a resolution declaring the
portion of the district merged in the same manner and to the same
effect as if the same had been authorized by an election.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 (1) When any portion of a community
facilities district merges with another community facilities district,
any employee of the merging district who: (a) Was at the time of
merger employed exclusively or principally in performing the powers,
duties, and functions which are to be performed by the merger district;
(b) will, as a direct consequence of the merger, be separated from the
employ of the merging district; and (c) can perform the duties and meet
the minimum requirements of the position to be filled, then such
employee may transfer employment to the merger district as provided in
this section and sections 313 and 314 of this act.
(2) For purposes of this section and sections 313 and 314 of this
act, employee means an individual whose employment with a community
facilities district has been terminated because the community
facilities district merged with another community facilities district
for purposes of providing community facilities operations and projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 (1) An eligible employee may transfer into
the merger district by filing a written request with the board of
community facilities commissioners of the merger district and by giving
written notice to the board of community facilities commissioners of
the merging district. Upon receipt of such request by the board of the
merger district the transfer of employment must be made. The employee
so transferring will (a) be on probation for the same period as are new
employees of the merger district in the position filled, but if the
transferring employee has already completed a probationary period as a
community facilities employee prior to the transfer, then the employee
may only be terminated during the probationary period for failure to
adequately perform assigned duties, not meeting the minimum
qualifications of the position, or behavior that would otherwise be
subject to disciplinary action, (b) be eligible for promotion no later
than after completion of the probationary period, (c) receive a salary
at least equal to that of other new employees of the merger district in
the position filled, and (d) in all other matters, such as retirement,
vacation, and sick leave, have all the rights, benefits, and privileges
to which he or she would have been entitled to as an employee of the
merger district from the beginning of employment with the merging
district. However, for purposes of layoffs by the merger district,
only the time of service accrued with the merger district must apply
unless an agreement is reached between the collective bargaining
representatives of the employees of the merging and merger districts
and the merging and merger districts. The board of the merging
district must, upon receipt of such notice, transmit to the board of
the merger district a record of the employee's service with the merging
district, which must be credited to such employee as a part of the
period of employment in the merger district. All accrued benefits are
transferable provided that the recipient district provides comparable
benefits. All benefits must then accrue based on the combined
seniority of each employee in the recipient district.
(2) As many of the transferring employees must be placed upon the
payroll of the merger district as the merger district determines are
needed to provide services. These needed employees must be taken in
order of seniority and the remaining employees who transfer as provided
in this section and sections 312 and 314 of this act must head the list
for employment in order of their seniority, to the end that they must
be the first to be reemployed in the merger district when appropriate
positions become available. However, employees who are not immediately
hired by the community facilities district must be placed on a
reemployment list for a period not to exceed thirty-six months unless
a longer period is authorized by an agreement reached between the
collective bargaining representatives of the employees of the merging
and merged community facilities districts and the merging and merged
community facilities districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 If, as a result of merging of districts
any employee is laid off who is eligible to transfer to the merger
district under this section and sections 312 and 313 of this act, the
merging district must notify the employee of the right to transfer and
the employee must have ninety days to transfer employment to the merger
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 A merger district located in a single
county, that merged with a merging district located in another county
or counties, must be identified by the name of each county in which the
community facilities district is located, listed alphabetically,
followed by a number that is the next highest number available for a
community facilities district in one of the counties that has the
greatest number of community facilities districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 A community facilities district resulting
from the merger of two or more community facilities districts located
in the same county must be identified by the name of the county and the
number of the merger district. However, the community facilities
district resulting from such a merger must be identified by the number
of the merging district or one of the merging districts if a resolution
providing for this number change is adopted by the board of community
facilities commissioners of the district resulting from the merger or
if resolutions providing for this number change are adopted by each of
the boards of community facilities commissioners of the districts
proposed to be merged.

PART IV
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS WITHDRAWAL
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 Actions taken under this chapter may be
subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter
36.93 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 Territory within a community facilities
district may be withdrawn from the district in the same manner provided
by law for withdrawal of territory from water-sewer districts, as
provided by chapter 57.28 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The provisions of RCW 57.28.110 apply to
territory withdrawn from a community facilities district under the
provision of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 Community facilities commissioners
residing in territory withdrawn from a community facilities district
must be replaced in the manner provided for the filling of vacancies in
section 707 of this act.

PART V
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS DISSOLUTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Actions taken under this chapter may be
subject to potential review by a boundary review board under chapter
36.93 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Community facilities districts may be
dissolved by a majority vote of the registered electors of the district
at an election conducted by the election officials of the county or
counties in which the district is located in accordance with the
general election laws of the state. The proceedings for dissolution
may be initiated by the adoption of a resolution by the board of
commissioners of the district calling for the dissolution. The
dissolution of the district does not cancel outstanding obligations of
the district and the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties in which the district was located may make annual
levies against the lands within the district until the obligations of
the districts are paid. When the obligations are fully paid, all
moneys in district funds and all collections of unpaid district taxes
must be transferred to the expense fund of the county. Where the
community facilities district that was dissolved was located in more
than one county, the amount of money transferred to the expense fund of
each county must be in direct proportion to the amount of assessed
valuation of the community facilities district that was located in each
county at the time of its dissolution.

PART VI
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS POWERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Community facilities districts created
under this title are political subdivisions of the state and are held
to be municipal corporations within the laws and Constitution of the
state of Washington. A community facilities district constitutes a
body corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for
public purposes as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter
be specifically conferred by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Community facilities districts have full
authority to carry out their purposes and to that end may acquire,
purchase, hold, lease, manage, occupy, and sell real and personal
property, or any interest therein, to enter into and to perform any and
all necessary contracts, to appoint and employ the necessary officers,
agents, and employees, to sue and be sued, to levy and enforce the
collection of assessments and special taxes in the manner and subject
to the limitations provided in this title against the lands within the
district for district revenues, and to do any and all lawful acts
required and expedient to carry out the purpose of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 Any community facilities district
organized under this title may:
(1) Lease, acquire, own, maintain, operate, and provide community
facilities apparatus and all other necessary or proper facilities,
machinery, and equipment for community facilities operations and
projects;
(2) Lease, acquire, own, maintain, and operate real property,
improvements, and fixtures for housing, repairing, and maintaining the
apparatus, facilities, machinery, and equipment described in subsection
(1) of this section;
(3) Contract with any governmental entity under chapter 39.34 RCW
or private person or entity to consolidate, provide, or cooperate for
community facilities operations and projects. In so contracting, the
district or governmental entity is deemed for all purposes to be acting
within its governmental capacity;
(4) Encourage uniformity and coordination of community facilities
district operations. The community facilities commissioners of
community facilities districts may form an association to secure
information of value regarding district purposes, to hold and attend
meetings, and to promote more economical and efficient operation of the
associated community facilities districts. The commissioners of
community facilities districts in the association must adopt articles
of association or articles of incorporation for a nonprofit
corporation, select a chairman, secretary, and other officers as they
may determine, and may employ and discharge agents and employees as the
officers deem convenient to carry out the purposes of the association.
The expenses of the association may be paid from funds paid into the
association by community facilities districts. However, the aggregate
contributions made to the association by a district in a calendar year
may not exceed two and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation; and
(5) Perform acts consistent with this title and not otherwise
prohibited by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 (1) In addition to other authority that a
community facilities district possesses, a community facilities
district may provide any public improvement as defined under RCW
39.89.020, but this additional authority is limited to participating in
the financing of the public improvements as provided under RCW
39.89.050.
(2) This section does not limit the authority of a community
facilities district to otherwise participate in the public improvements
if that authority exists elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 605 (1) Community facilities districts may
execute executory conditional sales contracts, installment promissory
notes secured by a deed of trust, or mortgages with a governmental
entity or a private party for the purchase or sale of any real or
personal property, or property rights.
(2) The purchase price specified in a contract or promissory note
to purchase property under this section may not result in a total
indebtedness in excess of three-eighths of one percent of the value of
the taxable property in the community facilities district.
(3) If a proposed purchase contract or promissory note under this
section would result in a total indebtedness in excess of that amount,
a proposition to determine whether that contract or promissory note may
be executed must be submitted to the voters for approval or rejection
in the same manner that bond issues for capital purposes are submitted
to the voters.
(4) A community facilities district may jointly execute contracts,
promissory notes, deeds of trust, or mortgages authorized by this
section with any governmental entity.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "value of the taxable
property" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606 The board of commissioners of each
community facilities district may purchase liability insurance with
limits it deems reasonable for the purpose of protecting its officials
and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and
property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing
or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

PART VII
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS COMMISSIONERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 (1) The affairs of the district must be
managed by a board of community facilities commissioners composed of
three registered voters residing in the district except as provided in
sections 703 and 705 of this act. Each member must each receive ninety
dollars per day or portion thereof, not to exceed eight thousand six
hundred forty dollars per year, for time spent in actual attendance at
official meetings of the board or in performance of other services or
duties on behalf of the district.
(2) In addition, they must receive necessary expenses incurred in
attending meetings of the board or when otherwise engaged in district
business, and are entitled to receive the same insurance available to
all employees of the district. However, the premiums for such
insurance, except liability insurance, must be paid by the individual
commissioners who elect to receive it.
(3) Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her
compensation payable under this section as to any month or months
during his or her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the
secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be effective,
must be filed any time after the commissioner's election and prior to
the date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver
must specify the month or period of months for which it is made.
(4) The board must fix the compensation to be paid the secretary
and all other agents and employees of the district.
(5) The dollar thresholds established in this section must be
adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management every five
years, beginning July 1, 2010, based upon changes in the consumer price
index during that time period. "Consumer price index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's annual average consumer price index, for
Washington state, for wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor and statistics, United States
department of labor. If the bureau of labor and statistics develops
more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the
index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
must be used for the adjustments for inflation in this section. The
office of financial management must calculate the new dollar threshold
and transmit it to the office of the code reviser for publication in
the Washington State Register at least one month before the new dollar
threshold is to take effect.
(6) A person holding office as commissioner for two or more
districts shall receive only that per diem compensation authorized for
one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation for attending
an official meeting or conducting official services or duties while
representing more than one of his or her districts. However, such
commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation if approved
by resolution of all boards of the affected districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 (1) The board of community facilities
commissioners of a community facilities district may adopt a resolution
by unanimous vote causing a ballot proposition to be submitted to
voters of the district authorizing the creation of commissioner
districts. The board of community facilities commissioners must create
commissioner districts if the ballot proposition authorizing the
creation of commissioner districts is approved by a simple majority
vote of the voters of the community facilities district voting on the
proposition. Three commissioner districts must be created for a
community facilities district with three commissioners, and five
commissioner districts must be created for a community facilities
district with five commissioners. No two commissioners may reside in
the same commissioner district.
(2) No change in the boundaries of any commissioner district may be
made within one hundred twenty days next before the date of a general
district election, nor within twenty months after the commissioner
districts have been established or altered. However, if a boundary
change results in one commissioner district being represented by two or
more commissioners, those commissioners having the shortest unexpired
terms must be assigned by the board to commissioner districts where
there is a vacancy, and the commissioners so assigned are deemed to be
residents of the commissioner districts to which they are assigned for
purposes of determining whether those positions are vacant.
(3) The population of each commissioner district must include
approximately equal population. Commissioner districts must be redrawn
as provided in chapter 29A.76 RCW. Commissioner districts must be used
as follows: (a) Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner
district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a commissioner of the
commissioner district; and (b) only voters of a commissioner district
may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a commissioner of the
commissioner district. Voters of the entire community facilities
district may vote at a general election to elect a person as a
commissioner of the commissioner district.
(4) When a board of community facilities commissioners that has
commissioner districts has been increased to five members under section
703 of this act, the board of community facilities commissioners must
divide the community facilities district into five commissioner
districts before it appoints the two additional community facilities
commissioners. The two additional community facilities commissioners
who are appointed must reside in separate commissioner districts in
which no other community facilities commissioner resides.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 (1) In the event a three-member board of
commissioners of any community facilities district determines by
resolution that it would be in the best interest of the district to
increase the number of commissioners from three to five, or in the
event the board is presented with a petition signed by ten percent of
the registered voters resident within the district who voted in the
last general municipal election calling for such an increase in the
number of commissioners of the district, the board must submit a
resolution to the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties in which the district is located requesting that an
election be held. Upon receipt of the resolution, the legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties must call a special
election to be held within the community facilities district at which
election the following proposition must be submitted to the voters
substantially as follows:

"Shall the board of commissioners of . . . . . county community
facilities district No . . . . be increased from three members to five
members?
YES
. . . . . . .
NO
. . . . . . ."

(2) If the community facilities district is located in more than a
single county, this proposition must indicate the name of the district.
(3) If the proposition receives a majority approval at the
election, the board of commissioners of the community facilities
district shall be increased to five members. The two additional
members must be appointed in the same manner as provided in section 705
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 (1) Except as provided in section 705 of
this act, in the event a five-member board of commissioners of any
community facilities district determines by resolution that it would be
in the best interest of the community facilities district to decrease
the number of commissioners from five to three, or in the event the
board is presented with a petition signed by ten percent of the
registered voters resident within the district who voted in the last
general municipal election calling for such a decrease in the number of
commissioners of the district, the board must submit a resolution to
the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties in which the district is located requesting that an election
be held. Upon receipt of the resolution, the legislative authority or
authorities of the county or counties must call a special election to
be held within the community facilities district at which election the
following proposition must be submitted to the voters substantially as
follows:

"Shall the board of commissioners of . . . . . county community
facilities district No . . . . be decreased from five members to three
members?
YES
. . . . . . .
NO
. . . . . . ."

(2) If the community facilities district has commissioner
districts, the commissioners of the district must pass a resolution,
before the submission of the proposition to the voters, to either
redistrict from five commissioner districts to three commissioner
districts or eliminate the commissioner districts. The resolution
takes effect upon approval of the proposition by the voters.
(3) If the community facilities district is located in more than a
single county, this proposition must indicate the name of the district.
(4) If the proposition receives a majority approval at the
election, the board of commissioners of the community facilities
district shall be decreased to three members. The two members shall be
decreased in accordance with RCW 52.06.085.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 In a community facilities district
maintaining a community facilities department consisting wholly of
personnel employed on a full-time, fully paid basis, there must be five
community facilities commissioners. The two positions created on
boards of community facilities commissioners by this section must be
filled initially as for a vacancy, except that the appointees shall
draw lots, one appointee to serve until the next community facilities
district general election after the appointment, at which two
commissioners must be elected for six-year terms, and the other
appointee to serve until the second community facilities district
general election after the appointment, at which two commissioners must
be elected for six-year terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 The polling places for a community
facilities district election may be located inside or outside the
boundaries of the district, as determined by the auditor of the county
in which the community facilities district is located, and the
elections of the community facilities district may not be held to be
irregular or void on that account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 Vacancies on a board of community
facilities commissioners must occur as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.
In addition, if a community facilities commissioner is absent from the
district for three consecutive regularly scheduled meetings unless by
permission of the board, the office must be declared vacant by the
board of commissioners. However, such an action may not be taken
unless the commissioner is notified by mail after two consecutive
unexcused absences that the position will be declared vacant if the
commissioner is absent without being excused from the next regularly
scheduled meeting. Vacancies on a board of community facilities
commissioners must be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 (1) The initial three members of the board
of community facilities commissioners must be elected at the same
election as when the ballot proposition is submitted to the voters
authorizing the creation of the community facilities district. If the
district is not authorized to be created, the election of the initial
community facilities commissioners is null and void. If the district
is authorized to be created, the initial community facilities
commissioners must take office immediately when qualified. Candidates
must file for each of the three separate community facilities
commissioner positions. Elections must be held as provided in chapter
29A.52 RCW, with the county auditor opening up a special filing period
as provided in RCW 29A.24.171 and 29A.24.181, as if there were a
vacancy. The person who receives the greatest number of votes for each
position must be elected to that position. The terms of office of the
initial community facilities commissioners must be staggered as
follows: (a) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number
of votes is elected to a six-year term of office if the election is
held in an odd-numbered year or a five-year term of office if the
election is held in an even-numbered year; (b) the person who is
elected receiving the next greatest number of votes is elected to a
four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered
year or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected is elected to a
two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year
or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The initial commissioners must take office immediately
when elected and qualified and their terms of office must be calculated
from the first day of January in the year following their election.
(2) The term of office of each subsequent commissioner is six
years. Each commissioner must serve until a successor is elected and
qualified and assumes office in accordance with RCW 29A.20.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 Before beginning the duties of office,
each community facilities commissioner must take and subscribe the
official oath for the faithful discharge of the duties of office as
required by RCW 29A.04.133, which oath must be filed in the office of
the auditor of the county in which all, or the largest portion of, the
district is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 (1) The community facilities commissioners
must elect a chairman from their number and must appoint a secretary of
the district, who may or may not be a member of the board, for such
term as they determine by resolution. The secretary, if a member of
the board, may not receive additional compensation for serving as
secretary.
(2) The secretary of the district must keep a record of the
proceedings of the board, must perform other duties as prescribed by
the board or by law, and must take and subscribe an official oath
similar to that of the community facilities commissioners, which oath
must be filed in the same office as that of the commissioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 (1) The office of the community facilities
commissioners and principal place of business of the district must be
at some place within the county in which the district is situated, to
be designated by the board of community facilities commissioners.
(2) The board must hold regular monthly meetings at a place and
date as it determines by resolution, and may adjourn its meetings as
required for the proper transaction of business. Special meetings of
the board may be called at any time under the provisions of RCW
42.30.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 All meetings of the board of community
facilities commissioners must be conducted in accordance with chapter
42.30 RCW and a majority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business. All records of the board must be open to inspection in
accordance with chapter 42.56 RCW. The board has the power and duty to
adopt a seal of the district, to manage and conduct the business
affairs of the district, to make and execute all necessary contracts,
to employ any necessary services, and to adopt reasonable rules to
govern the district and to perform its functions, and generally to
perform all such acts as may be necessary to carry out the objects of
the creation of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 Insofar as practicable, purchases and any
public works by the district must be based on competitive bids. A
formal sealed bid procedure must be used as standard procedure for
purchases and contracts for purchases executed by the board of
commissioners. Formal sealed bidding may not be required for:
(1) The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the
cost will not exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars. However,
whenever the estimated cost does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, the
commissioners may by resolution use the process provided in RCW
39.04.190 to award contracts;
(2) Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or
improvement of buildings where the estimated cost will not exceed the
sum of two thousand five hundred dollars, which includes the costs of
labor, material, and equipment;
(3) Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW
39.04.155; and
(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW
39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies to the
purchase or public work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 (1) Notice of the call for bids must be
given by publishing the notice in a newspaper of general circulation
within the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon
which bids will be received. If no bid is received on the first call,
the commissioners may readvertise and make a second call, or may enter
into a contract without a further call.
(2) A public work involving three or more specialty contractors
requires that the district retain the services of a general contractor
as defined in RCW 18.27.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 A low bidder who claims error and fails to
enter into a contract with a community facilities district for a public
works project is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a
second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

PART VIII
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS FINANCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 (1) A community facilities district may
finance, as provided in this title, the cost of purchase, construction,
expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of any facility with an
estimated life of five years or longer or may finance planning and
design work that is directly related to the purchase, construction,
expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of any facility.
(2) A community facilities district may finance facilities
including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Facilities listed in RCW 35.43.040 to the extent not specified
in this section;
(b) Sanitary sewage systems, including collection, transport,
storage, treatment, dispersal, effluent use, and discharge;
(c) Drainage and flood control systems, including collection,
transport, diversion, storage, detention, retention, dispersal, use,
and discharge;
(d) Water systems for domestic, industrial, irrigation, municipal
or community facilities purposes, including production, collection,
storage, treatment, transport, delivery, connection, and dispersal;
(e) Highways, streets, roadways, and parking facilities, including
all areas for vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(f) Areas for pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle, or other nonmotor
vehicle use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(g) Pedestrian malls, parks, recreational facilities, and open-space facilities for the use of members of the public for
entertainment, assembly, and recreation;
(h) Landscaping, including earthworks, structures, lakes, and other
water features, plants, trees, and related water delivery systems;
(i) Public buildings, public safety facilities, and community
facilities;
(j) Natural gas transmission and distribution facilities,
facilities for the transmission or distribution of electrical energy,
and communication facilities including, but not limited to, telephone
and internet lines and cables and wireless systems;
(k) Lighting systems;
(l) Traffic control systems and devices, including signals,
controls, markings, and signage;
(m) Systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways,
tramways, buses, or any other means of mass transportation facilities,
including passenger, terminal, station parking, and related facilities
and areas for passenger and vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress,
and parking;
(n) Libraries, educational, and cultural facilities; and
(o) Facilities similar to those listed in this section.
(3) This chapter does not authorize a district to finance general
government operations and services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 802 It is the duty of the county treasurer of
the county in which all, or the largest portion, of any community
facilities district created under this title is located to receive and
disburse district revenues, to collect taxes and assessments authorized
and levied under this title, and to credit district revenues to the
proper fund. However, where a community facilities district is located
in more than one county, the county treasurer of each other county in
which the district is located must collect the community facilities
district's taxes and assessments that are imposed on property located
within the county and transfer these funds to the county treasurer of
the county in which the largest portion of the district is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 803 In each county in which a community
facilities district is situated, there must be in the county
treasurer's office of each district the following funds: (1) Expense
fund; (2) reserve fund; (3) local improvement district No. . . . .
fund; (4) general obligation bond fund; and (5) such other funds as the
board of commissioners of the district may establish. Taxes levied for
administrative, operative, and maintenance purposes, for the purchase
of machinery and equipment, and for the purchase of real property, when
collected, and proceeds from the sale of general obligation bonds must
be placed by the county treasurer in the proper fund. Taxes levied for
the payment of general obligation bonds and interest thereon, when
collected, must be placed by the county treasurer in the general
obligation bond fund. The board of community facilities commissioners
may include in its annual budget items of possible outlay to be
provided for and held in reserve for any district purpose, and taxes
must be levied therefor. Such taxes, when collected, must be placed by
the county treasurer in the reserve fund. The reserve fund, or any
part of it, may be transferred by the county treasurer to other funds
of the district at any time by order of the board of community
facilities commissioners. Special assessments levied against the lands
in any improvement district within the district, when collected, must
be placed by the county treasurer in the local improvement district
fund for the local improvement district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 804 Annually after the county board or boards
of equalization of the county or counties in which the district is
located have equalized the assessments for general tax purposes in that
year, the secretary of the district must prepare and certify a budget
of the requirements of each district fund, and deliver it to the county
legislative authority or authorities of the county or counties in which
the district is located in ample time for the tax levies to be made for
district purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805 At the time of making general tax levies
in each year the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties in which a community facilities district is located
shall make the required levies for district purposes against the real
and personal property in the district in accordance with the equalized
valuations of the property for general tax purposes and as a part of
the general taxes. The tax levies shall be a part of the general tax
roll and shall be collected as a part of the general taxes against the
property in the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 806 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, the county treasurer must pay out money
received for the account of the district on warrants issued by the
county auditor against the proper funds of the district. The warrants
must be issued on vouchers approved and signed by a majority of the
district board and by the district secretary.
(2) The board of community facilities commissioners of a district
that had an annual operating budget of five million or more dollars in
each of the preceding three years may by resolution adopt a policy to
issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of
the community facilities district. The board of community facilities
commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and bills, may authorize the
issuing of one general certificate to the county treasurer, to be
signed by the chair of the board of community facilities commissioners,
authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by
date, number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which the
warrants must be drawn; thereupon the district secretary may issue the
warrants specified in the general certificate.
(3) The board of community facilities commissioners of a district
that had an annual operating budget of greater than two hundred fifty
thousand dollars and under five million dollars in each of the
preceding three years may, upon agreement between the county treasurer
and the board of community facilities commissioners, with approval of
the board of community facilities commissioners by resolution, adopt a
policy to issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other
obligations of the community facilities district. The board of
community facilities commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and
bills, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the
county treasurer, to be signed by the chair of the board of community
facilities commissioners, authorizing the county treasurer to pay all
the warrants specified by date, number, name, and amount, and the
accounting funds on which the warrants must be drawn. The district
secretary may then issue the warrants specified in the general
certificate.
(4) The county treasurer may also pay general obligation bonds and
the accrued interest thereon in accordance with their terms from the
general obligation bond fund when interest or principal payments become
due. The county treasurer must report in writing monthly to the
secretary of the district the amount of money held by the county in
each fund and the amounts of receipts and disbursements for each fund
during the preceding month.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 807 The board of community facilities
commissioners of the district has the authority to contract
indebtedness and to refund the same for any general district purpose,
including expenses of maintenance, operation, and administration, and
the acquisition of facilities, and evidence the same by the issuance
and sale of general obligation bonds of the district payable at such
time or times not longer than twenty years from the issuing date of the
bonds. Such bonds must be issued and sold in accordance with chapter
39.46 RCW. Such bonds may not exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to
three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property
within the community facilities district, as the term "value of the
taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 808 Except as authorized by the issuance and
sale of general obligation bonds, the creation of local improvement
districts, and the issuance of local improvement bonds and warrants of
the community facilities district, the board of community facilities
commissioners may not incur expenses or other financial obligations
payable in any year in excess of the aggregate amount of taxes levied
for that year, revenues derived from all other sources, and the cash
balances on hand in the expense and reserve funds of the district on
the first day of that year. In the event that there are any unpaid
warrants drawn on any district funds for expenses and obligations
incurred and outstanding at the end of any calendar year, the warrants
may be paid from taxes collected in the subsequent year or years and
from other income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809 Community facilities districts
additionally are authorized to incur general indebtedness for capital
purposes and to issue general obligation bonds not to exceed an amount,
together with any outstanding general obligation indebtedness, equal to
three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property
within such district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is
defined in RCW 39.36.015, and to provide for the retirement thereof by
excess property tax levies, when the voters of the district have
approved a proposition authorizing such indebtedness and levies by an
affirmative vote of three-fifths of those voting on the proposition at
such election, at which election the total number of persons voting
constitutes not less than forty percent of the voters in the community
facilities district who voted at the last preceding general state
election. The maximum term of such bonds may not exceed twenty years.
Such bonds must be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW. Such elections must be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 810 To carry out the purposes for which
community facilities districts are created, the board of community
facilities commissioners of a district may levy each year, in addition
to the levy or levies provided in section 809 of this act for the
payment of the principal and interest of any outstanding general
obligation bonds, an ad valorem tax on all taxable property located in
the district not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value. However, in no case may the total general levy for all
purposes, except the levy for the retirement of general obligation
bonds, exceed one dollar per thousand dollars of assessed value.
Levies in excess of one dollar per thousand dollars of assessed value
or in excess of the aggregate dollar rate limitations or both may be
made for any district purpose when so authorized at a special election
under RCW 84.52.130. Any such tax when levied must be certified to the
proper county officials for the collection of the tax as for other
general taxes. The taxes when collected must be placed in the
appropriate district fund or funds as provided by law, and must be paid
out on warrants of the auditor of the county in which all, or the
largest portion of, the district is located, upon authorization of the
board of community facilities commissioners of the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 811 Notwithstanding the limitation of dollar
rates contained in section 810 of this act, the board of community
facilities commissioners of any district may levy, in addition to any
levy for the payment of the principal and interest of outstanding
general obligation bonds, an ad valorem tax on all property located in
the district of not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value and which will not cause the combined levies to exceed
the constitutional or statutory limitations, and the additional levy,
or any portion of the levy, may also be made when dollar rates of other
taxing units are released by agreement with the other taxing units from
their authorized levies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 812 A community facilities district may accept
and receive in behalf of the district any money or property donated,
devised, or bequeathed to the district, and may carry out the terms of
the donation, devise, or bequest, if within the powers granted by law
to community facilities districts. In the absence of such terms, a
community facilities district may expend or use the money or property
for district purposes as determined by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 813 Notwithstanding the limitation of dollar
rates contained in section 810 of this act, and in addition to any levy
for the payment of the principal and interest of any outstanding
general obligation bonds and in addition to any levy authorized by
sections 810 and 811 of this act or any other statute, the board of
community facilities commissioners of any community facilities district
within such county, which community facilities district has at least
one full-time, paid employee, or contracts with another municipal
corporation for the services of at least one full-time, paid employee,
is hereby authorized to levy each year an ad valorem tax on all taxable
property within such district of not to exceed fifty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, which levy may be made only if it will not
affect dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully claim nor
cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional and/or statutory
limitations.

PART IX
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICTS BENEFIT CHARGES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 (1) The board of community facilities
commissioners of a community facilities district may by resolution, for
community facilities district purposes authorized by law, fix and
impose a benefit charge on personal property and improvements to real
property which are located within the community facilities district on
the date specified and which have or will receive the benefits provided
by the community facilities district, to be paid by the owners of the
properties. However, a benefit charge may not apply to personal
property and improvements to real property owned or used by any
recognized religious denomination or religious organization as, or
including, a sanctuary or for purposes related to the bona fide
religious ministries of the denomination or religious organization,
including schools and educational facilities used for kindergarten,
primary, or secondary educational purposes or for institutions of
higher education and all grounds and buildings related thereto, but not
including personal property and improvements to real property owned or
used by any recognized religious denomination or religious organization
for business operations, profit-making enterprises, or activities not
including use of a sanctuary or related to kindergarten, primary, or
secondary educational purposes or for institutions of higher education.
The aggregate amount of such benefit charges in any one year may not
exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of the operating budget for the
year in which the benefit charge is to be collected. It is the duty of
the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties in which the community facilities district is located to make
any necessary adjustments to assure compliance with such limitation and
to immediately notify the board of community facilities commissioners
of any changes thereof.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the services afforded by
the district. It is acceptable to apportion the benefit charge to the
values of the properties as found by the county assessor or assessors
modified generally in the proportion that community facilities
operations and projects provide benefits to real property within the
district. Any other method that reasonably apportions the benefit
charges to the actual benefits resulting from the improved value of
real properties within the district due to community facilities
operations and projects may be specified in the resolution and are
subject to contest on the ground of unreasonable or capricious action
or action in excess of the measurable benefits to the property
resulting from services afforded by the district. The board of
community facilities commissioners may determine that certain
properties or types or classes of properties are not receiving
measurable benefits based on criteria they establish by resolution.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the district, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 (1) The term "personal property" for the
purposes of this chapter includes every form of tangible personal
property including, but not limited to, all goods, chattels, stock in
trade, estates, or crops.
(2) All personal property not assessed and subjected to ad valorem
taxation under Title 84 RCW, all property under contract or for which
the district is receiving payment for as authorized by RCW 52.30.020
and all property subject to the provisions of chapter 54.28 RCW, or all
property that is subject to a contract for services with a community
facilities district is exempt from the benefit charge imposed under
this chapter.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "personal property" does not
include any personal property used for farming, field crops, farm
equipment, or livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 The resolution establishing benefit
charges as specified in section 901 of this act must specify, by legal
geographical areas or other specific designations, the charge to apply
to each property by location, type, or other designation, or other
information that is necessary to the proper computation of the benefit
charge to be charged to each property owner subject to the resolution.
The county assessor of each county in which the district is located
must determine and identify the personal properties and improvements to
real property which are subject to a benefit charge in each community
facilities district and must furnish and deliver to the county
treasurer of that county a listing of the properties with information
describing the location, legal description, and address of the person
to whom the statement of benefit charges is to be mailed, the name of
the owner, and the value of the property and improvements, together
with the benefit charge to apply to each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Each community facilities district must
contract, prior to the imposition of a benefit charge, for the
administration and collection of the benefit charge by each county
treasurer, who must deduct a percent, as provided by contract to
reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county assessor and
county treasurer in the administration of the resolution and this
chapter. The county treasurer must make distributions each year, as
the charges are collected, in the amount of the benefit charges imposed
on behalf of each district, less the deduction provided for in the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 (1) Any benefit charge authorized by this
chapter is not effective unless a proposition to impose the benefit
charge is approved by a sixty percent majority of the voters of the
district voting at a general election or at a special election called
by the district for that purpose, held within the community facilities
district. An election held pursuant to this section must be held not
more than twelve months prior to the date on which the first such
charge is to be assessed. However, a benefit charge approved at an
election may not remain in effect for a period of more than six years
nor more than the number of years authorized by the voters if fewer
than six years unless subsequently reapproved by the voters.
(2) The ballot must be submitted so as to enable the voters
favoring the authorization of a community facilities district benefit
charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "No," and the
ballot must be:

"Shall . . . . . . . county community facilities district No . . .
. be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . . .
(insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an
amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under section 813
of this act?
YES
. . . . . . .
NO
. . . . . . ."

(3) Districts renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot:

"Shall . . . . . . . county community facilities district No . . .
. be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each year
for . . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to
exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under section 813
of this act?
YES
. . . . . . .
NO
. . . . . . ."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 (1) Not less than ten days nor more than
six months before the election at which the proposition to impose the
benefit charge is submitted as provided in this chapter, the board of
community facilities commissioners of the district must hold a public
hearing specifically setting forth its proposal to impose benefit
charges for the support of its legally authorized activities which will
maintain or improve the services afforded in the district. A report of
the public hearing must be filed with the county treasurer of each
county in which the property is located and be available for public
inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year the board of community
facilities commissioners must hold a public hearing to review and
establish the community facilities district benefit charges for the
subsequent year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer or treasurers of each county in
which the property is located, together with the record of each public
hearing, before November 30th immediately preceding the year in which
the benefit charges are to be collected on behalf of the district.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 907 A community facilities district that
imposes a benefit charge under this chapter may not impose all or part
of the property tax authorized under section 813 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 908 After notice has been given to the
property owners of the amount of the charge, the board of community
facilities commissioners of a community facilities district imposing a
benefit charge under this chapter must form a review board for at least
a two-week period and shall, upon complaint in writing of a party
aggrieved owning property in the district, reduce the charge of a
person who, in their opinion, has been charged too large a sum, to a
sum or amount as they believe to be the true, fair, and just amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 909 A person who is receiving the exemption
contained in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 is exempt from any legal
obligation to pay a portion of the charge imposed by this chapter
according to the following.
(1) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(a) and does not meet the income limitation contained in
RCW 84.36.381(5)(b) (i) or (ii) shall be exempt from twenty-five
percent of the charge.
(2) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(i) shall be exempt from fifty percent of the charge.
(3) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(ii) shall be exempt from seventy-five percent of the
charge.

PART X
REGIONAL COMMUNITY FACILITIES AUTHORITIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 Regional community facilities authority
planning committees are advisory entities that are created, convened,
and empowered as follows:
(1) Any two or more community facilities jurisdictions may create
a regional community facilities authority and convene a regional
community facilities authority planning committee. No community
facilities jurisdiction may participate in more than one district.
(2) Each governing body of the community facilities jurisdictions
participating in planning under this chapter must appoint three elected
officials to the planning committee. Members of the planning committee
may receive compensation of seventy dollars per day, or portion
thereof, not to exceed seven hundred dollars per year, for attendance
at planning committee meetings and for performance of other services in
behalf of the district, and may be reimbursed for travel and incidental
expenses at the discretion of their respective governing body.
(3) A regional community facilities authority planning committee
may receive state funding, as appropriated by the legislature, or
county funding provided by the affected counties for start-up funding
to pay for salaries, expenses, overhead, supplies, and similar expenses
ordinarily and necessarily incurred. Upon creation of a regional
community facilities authority, the authority must within one year
reimburse the state or county for any sums advanced for these start-up
costs from the state or county.
(4) The planning committee must conduct its affairs and formulate
a regional community facilities authority plan as provided under
section 1002 of this act.
(5) At its first meeting, a regional community facilities authority
planning committee may elect officers and provide for the adoption of
rules and other operating procedures.
(6) The planning committee may dissolve itself at any time by a
majority vote of the total membership of the planning committee. Any
participating community facilities jurisdiction may withdraw upon
thirty calendar days' written notice to the other jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 (1) A regional community facilities
authority planning committee must adopt a regional community facilities
authority plan providing for the design, financing, and development of
community facilities projects. The planning committee may consider the
following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria; and
(b) The input of cities and counties located within, or partially
within, a participating community facilities jurisdiction.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with
neighboring cities, towns, and other local governments that engage in
community facilities planning.
(3) The planning committee must:
(a) Create opportunities for public input in the development of the
plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the creation of a community facilities
district and recommending design, financing, and development of the
facilities and operations of community facilities districts, including
maintenance and preservation of facilities or systems; and
(c) In the plan, recommend sources of revenue authorized by section
1003 of this section, identify the portions of the plan that may be
amended by the board of the district without voter approval, consistent
with section 1003 of this section, and recommend a financing plan to
fund selected community facilities projects.
(4) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the participating
community facilities jurisdictions' governing bodies to initiate the
election process under section 1005 of this act.
(5) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected regional community facilities authority
projects, financing plan, and the ballot measure. The community
facilities jurisdictions' governing bodies may approve the new plan and
ballot measure, and may then submit the revised proposition to the
voters at a subsequent election or a special election. If a ballot
measure is not approved by the voters by the third vote, the planning
committee is dissolved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 (1) A regional community facilities
authority planning committee may, as part of a regional community
facilities authority plan, recommend the imposition of some or all of
the following revenue sources, which a regional community facilities
authority may impose upon approval of the voters as provided in this
chapter:
(a) Benefit charges under sections 1015 through 1023 of this act;
(b) Property taxes under sections 1012 through 1014 and 1101 of
this act, and RCW 84.09.030, 84.52.010, and 84.52.052; or
(c) Both (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) The authority may impose taxes and benefit charges as set forth
in the regional community facilities authority plan upon creation of
the authority, or as provided for in this chapter after creation of the
authority. If the plan authorizes the authority to impose benefit
charges or sixty percent voter-approved taxes, the plan and creation of
the authority must be approved by an affirmative vote of sixty percent
of the voters within the boundaries of the authority voting on a ballot
proposition as provided in section 1004 of this act. However, if the
plan provides for alternative sources of revenue that become effective
if the plan and creation of the authority is approved only by a
majority vote, then the plan with alternative sources of revenue and
creation of the authority may be approved by an affirmative vote of the
majority of those voters. If the plan does not authorize the authority
to impose benefit charges or sixty percent voter-approved taxes, the
plan and creation of the authority must be approved by an affirmative
vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of the
authority voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in section 1004
of this act. Except as provided in this section, all other voter
approval requirements under law for the levying of property taxes or
the imposition of benefit charges apply. Revenues from these taxes and
benefit charges may be used only to implement the plan as set forth in
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 The governing bodies of two or more
community facilities jurisdictions, upon receipt of the regional
community facilities authority plan under section 1002 of this act, may
certify the plan to the ballot, including identification of the revenue
options specified to fund the plan. The governing bodies of the
community facilities jurisdictions may draft a ballot title, give
notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform other duties
as required to put the plan before the voters of the proposed authority
for their approval or rejection as a single ballot measure that both
approves formation of the authority and approves the plan. Authorities
may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to implement the plan.
The electorate is the voters voting within the boundaries of the
proposed regional community facilities authority. A simple majority of
the total persons voting on the single ballot measure to approve the
plan and establish the authority is required for approval. However, if
the plan authorizes the authority to impose benefit charges or sixty
percent voter-approved taxes, then the percentage of total persons
voting on the single ballot measure to approve the plan and establish
the authority is the same as in section 1003 of this act. The
authority must act in accordance with the general election laws of the
state. The authority is liable for its proportionate share of the
costs when the elections are held under RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 If the voters approve the plan, including
creation of a regional community facilities authority and imposition of
taxes and benefit charges, if any, the authority is formed on the next
January 1st or July 1st, whichever occurs first. The appropriate
county election officials must, within fifteen days of the final
certification of the election results, publish a notice in a newspaper
or newspapers of general circulation in the authority declaring the
authority formed. A party challenging the procedure or the formation
of a voter-approved authority must file the challenge in writing by
serving the prosecuting attorney of each county within, or partially
within, the regional community facilities authority and the attorney
general within thirty days after the final certification of the
election. Failure to challenge within that time forever bars further
challenge of the authority's valid formation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 (1) The regional board must adopt rules
for the conduct of business. The regional board must adopt bylaws to
govern authority affairs, which may include:
(a) The time and place of regular meetings;
(b) Rules for calling special meetings;
(c) The method of keeping records of proceedings and official acts;
(d) Procedures for the safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and
(e) Any other provisions the regional board finds necessary to
include.
(2) The governing regional board must be determined by the plan and
consist solely of elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 The governing regional board of the
authority is responsible for the execution of the voter-approved plan.
Participating jurisdictions must review the plan every ten years. The
regional board may:
(1) Levy taxes and impose benefit charges as authorized in the plan
and approved by authority voters;
(2) Enter into agreements with federal, state, local, and regional
entities and departments as necessary to accomplish authority purposes
and protect the authority's investments;
(3) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the authority;
(4) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of community
facilities projects to protect the investment of the public and
annually make public its findings;
(5) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts;
(6) Hire, manage, and terminate employees; and
(7) Exercise powers and perform duties as the regional board
determines necessary to carry out the purposes, functions, and projects
of the authority in accordance with this chapter if one of the
community facilities jurisdictions is a community facilities district,
unless provided otherwise in the regional community facilities
authority plan, or in accordance with the statutes identified in the
plan if none of the community facilities jurisdictions is a regional
community facilities authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the
regional community facilities authority plan, all powers, duties, and
functions of a participating community facilities jurisdiction
pertaining to regional community facilities authority projects be
transferred to the regional community facilities authority on its
creation date.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in the regional community
facilities authority plan, and on the creation date of the regional
community facilities authority, all reports, documents, surveys, books,
records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the
participating community facilities jurisdiction pertaining to community
facilities' powers, functions, and duties must be delivered to the
regional community facilities authority; all real property and personal
property including cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the participating
community facilities jurisdiction in carrying out the community
facilities jurisdictions' powers, functions, and duties must be
transferred to the regional community facilities authority; and all
funds, credits, or other assets held by the participating community
facilities jurisdiction in connection with the community facilities
jurisdictions' powers, functions, and duties must be transferred and
credited to the regional community facilities authority.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in the regional community
facilities authority plan, any appropriations made to the participating
community facilities jurisdiction for carrying out the community
facilities jurisdictions' powers, functions, and duties must be
transferred and credited to the regional community facilities
authority.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in the regional community
facilities authority plan, whenever any question arises as to the
transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers,
files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the
exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the governing body of the participating community
facilities jurisdiction must make a determination as to the proper
allocation.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the regional community
facilities authority plan, all rules and all pending business before
the participating community facilities jurisdiction pertaining to the
powers, functions, and duties transferred must be continued and acted
upon by the regional community facilities authority, and all existing
contracts and obligations must remain in full force and must be
performed by the regional community facilities authority.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the participating community facilities jurisdiction may not affect the
validity of any act performed before creation of the regional community
facilities authority.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers, the treasurer for the authority must certify the
apportionments.
(6)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, all employees of the
participating community facilities jurisdictions are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the regional community facilities authority on its
creation date. Upon transfer, unless an agreement for different terms
of transfer is reached between the collective bargaining
representatives of the transferring employees and the participating
community facilities jurisdictions, an employee is entitled to the
employee rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have
been entitled as an employee of a participating community facilities
jurisdiction, including rights to:
(i) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of
transfer;
(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.
(b) If any or all of the participating community facilities
jurisdictions provide for civil service for the transferring employees,
the collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees
and the participating community facilities jurisdictions must negotiate
regarding the establishment of a civil service system within the
authority. This subsection does not apply if none of the participating
community facilities jurisdictions provide for civil service.
(c) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 (1) As provided in this section, a
regional community facilities authority may withdraw areas from its
boundaries into the authority areas that previously had been withdrawn
from the authority under this section.
(2)(a) The withdrawal of an area is authorized upon: (i) Adoption
of a resolution by the regional board approving the withdrawal and
finding that, in the opinion of the regional board, inclusion of this
area within the regional community facilities authority will result in
a reduction of the authority's tax levy rate under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.010; or (ii) adoption of a resolution by the city or town
council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the
city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the governing body of the
community facilities district within which the area is located
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or
town, but within a community facilities district.
(b) A withdrawal under this section is effective at the end of the
day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolution under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection is adopted, but for
purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries must be established immediately upon the adoption of the
resolution.
(c) The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of an authority
does not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the authority
existing at the time of withdrawal.
(3)(a) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
regional community facilities authority under this section may be
readmitted into the authority upon: (i) Adoption of a resolution by
the regional board proposing the readmittance; and (ii) adoption of a
resolution by the city or town council approving the readmittance, if
the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the governing body of the community facilities district
within which the area is located approving the readmittance, if the
area is located outside of a city or town but within a community
facilities district.
(b) A readmittance under this section is effective at the end of
the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the resolution under (a)(ii) of this subsection occurs, but
for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries must be established immediately upon the adoption of the
resolution.
(c)(i) Referendum action on the proposed readmittance under this
section may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be
readmitted if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the
city or town council, or governing body of the community facilities
district, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the
resolution under (a)(ii) of this subsection, which petition has been
signed by registered voters of the area proposed to be readmitted equal
in number to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters
residing in that area.
(ii) If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of
registered voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions must
be held in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the
readmittance must be submitted to the voters of the area at the next
special election date specified in RCW 29A.04.330 that occurs forty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated. Approval of
the ballot proposition authorizing the readmittance by a simple
majority vote authorizes the readmittance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 Any community facilities district within
the authority may be dissolved by a majority vote of the registered
electors of the district at an election conducted by the election
officials of the county or counties in which the district is located in
accordance with the general election laws of the state. The
proceedings for dissolution may be initiated by the adoption of a
resolution by the regional board. The dissolution of the district may
not cancel outstanding obligations of the district or of a local
improvement district within the district, and the county legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties in which the
district was located may make annual levies against the lands within
the district until the obligations of the districts are paid. All
powers, duties, and functions of a dissolved community facilities
jurisdiction within the authority boundaries, pertaining to providing
community facilities projects and operations may be transferred, by
resolution, to the regional community facilities authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 (1) An authority may incur general
indebtedness for authority purposes, issue bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation debt, equal to three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the
authority. The maximum term of the obligations may not exceed twenty
years. The obligations may pledge benefit charges and may pledge
payments to an authority from the state, the federal government, or any
community facilities jurisdiction under an interlocal contract. The
interlocal contracts pledging revenues and taxes are binding for a term
not to exceed twenty-five years, and taxes or other revenue pledged by
an interlocal contract may not be eliminated or modified if it would
impair the pledge of the contract.
(2) An authority may also issue general obligation bonds for
capital purposes not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
general obligation debt, equal to one and one-half percent of the value
of the taxable property within the authority. The authority may
provide for the retirement of the bonds by excess property tax levies.
The voters of the authority must approve a proposition authorizing the
bonds and levies by an affirmative vote of three-fifths of those voting
on the proposition at an election. At the election, the total number
of persons voting must constitute not less than forty percent of the
voters in the authority who voted at the last preceding general state
election. The maximum term of the bonds may not exceed twenty-five
years. Elections must be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.
(3) Obligations of an authority must be issued and sold in
accordance with chapters 39.46 and 39.50 RCW, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 (1) To carry out the purposes for which
a regional community facilities authority is created, as authorized in
the plan and approved by the voters, the governing regional board of an
authority may annually levy the following taxes:
(a) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
authority not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value;
(b) An ad valorem tax on all property located within the authority
not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value and
which will not cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional
or statutory limitations. This levy, or any portion of this levy, may
also be made when dollar rates of other taxing units are released by
agreement with the other taxing units from their authorized levies; and
(c) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
authority not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value if the authority has at least one full-time, paid employee, or
contracts with another municipal corporation for the services of at
least one full-time, paid employee. This levy may be made only if it
will not affect dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully
claim nor cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional or
statutory limitations or both.
(2) Levies in excess of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of
this section or in excess of the aggregate dollar rate limitations or
both may be made for any authority purpose when so authorized at a
special election under RCW 84.52.052. Any such tax when levied must be
certified to the proper county officials for the collection of the tax
as for other general taxes. The taxes when collected must be placed in
the appropriate authority fund or funds as provided by law, and must be
paid out on warrants of the auditor of the county in which all, or the
largest portion, of the authority is located, upon authorization of the
governing regional board of the authority.
(3) Authorities may provide for the retirement of general
indebtedness by excess property tax levies as set forth in section 1011
of this act.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, the term "value of the taxable
property" has the same meaning as in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 At the time of making general tax levies
in each year, the county legislative authority or authorities of the
county or counties in which a regional community facilities authority
is located must make the required levies for authority purposes against
the real and personal property in the authority in accordance with the
equalized valuations of the property for general tax purposes and as a
part of the general taxes. The tax levies are part of the general tax
roll and must be collected as a part of the general taxes against the
property in the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 It is the duty of the county treasurer of
the county in which the regional community facilities authority created
under this chapter is located to collect taxes authorized and levied
under this chapter. However, when a regional community facilities
authority is located in more than one county, the county treasurer of
each county in which the authority is located must collect the regional
community facilities authority's taxes that are imposed on property
located within the county and transfer these funds to the treasurer of
the county in which the majority of the authority lies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 (1) The governing board of a regional
community facilities authority may by resolution, as authorized in the
plan and approved by the voters, for authority purposes authorized by
law, fix and impose a benefit charge on personal property and
improvements to real property which are located within the authority on
the date specified and which have received or will receive the benefits
provided by the authority, to be paid by the owners of the properties.
A benefit charge does not apply to personal property and improvements
to real property owned or used by any recognized religious denomination
or religious organization as, or including, a sanctuary or for purposes
related to the bona fide religious ministries of the denomination or
religious organization, including schools and educational facilities
used for kindergarten, primary, or secondary educational purposes or
for institutions of higher education and all grounds and buildings
related thereto. However, a benefit charge does apply to personal
property and improvements to real property owned or used by any
recognized religious denomination or religious organization for
business operations, profit-making enterprises, or activities not
including use of a sanctuary or related to kindergarten, primary, or
secondary educational purposes or for institutions of higher education.
The aggregate amount of these benefit charges in any one year may not
exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of the operating budget for the
year in which the benefit charge is to be collected. It is the duty of
the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties in which the regional community facilities authority is
located to make any necessary adjustments to assure compliance with
this limitation and to immediately notify the governing regional board
of an authority of any changes thereof.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the facilities and
operations afforded by the authority. Any method that reasonably
apportions the benefit charges to the actual benefits resulting from
the degree of improvements to real property provided to the community
from the community facilities may be specified in the resolution and is
subject to contest on the grounds of unreasonable or capricious action
or action in excess of the measurable benefits to the property
resulting from services afforded by the authority. The governing
regional board of an authority may determine that certain properties or
types or classes of properties are not receiving measurable benefits
based on criteria they establish by resolution.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the authority, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.
(4) For the purposes of this section and sections 1016 through 1023
of this act, "personal property" includes every form of tangible
personal property including, but not limited to, all goods, chattels,
stock in trade, estates, or crops. "Personal property" does not
include any personal property used for farming, field crops, farm
equipment, or livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 All personal property not assessed and
subjected to ad valorem taxation under Title 84 RCW, all property under
contract or for which the regional community facilities authority is
receiving payment for as authorized by law, all property subject to
chapter 54.28 RCW, and all property that is subject to a contract for
services with an authority is exempt from the benefit charge imposed
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 (1) The resolution establishing benefit
charges as specified in section 1015 of this act must specify, by legal
geographical areas or other specific designations, the charge to apply
to each property by location, type, or other designation, or other
information that is necessary to the proper computation of the benefit
charge to be charged to each property owner subject to the resolution.
(2) The county assessor of each county in which the regional
community facilities authority is located must determine and identify
the personal properties and improvements to real property that are
subject to a benefit charge in each authority and must furnish and
deliver to the county treasurer of that county a listing of the
properties with information describing the location, legal description,
and address of the person to whom the statement of benefit charges is
to be mailed, the name of the owner, and the value of the property and
improvements, together with the benefit charge to apply to each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 Each regional community facilities
authority must contract, prior to the imposition of a benefit charge,
for the administration and collection of the benefit charge by each
county treasurer, who must deduct a percentage, as provided by contract
to reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county assessor
and county treasurer in the administration of the resolution and this
chapter. The county treasurer must make distributions each year, as
the charges are collected, in the amount of the benefit charges imposed
on behalf of each authority, less the deduction provided for in the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision
in this chapter to the contrary, any benefit charge authorized by this
chapter is not effective unless a proposition to impose the benefit
charge is approved by a sixty percent majority of the voters of the
regional community facilities authority voting at a general election or
at a special election called by the authority for that purpose, held
within the authority. A ballot measure that contains an authorization
to impose benefit charges and that is approved by the voters pursuant
to section 1004 of this act meets the proposition approval requirement
of this section. An election held under this section must be held not
more than twelve months prior to the date on which the first charge is
to be assessed. A benefit charge approved at an election expires in
six years or fewer as authorized by the voters, unless subsequently
reapproved by the voters.
(2) The ballot must be submitted so as to enable the voters
favoring the authorization of a regional community facilities authority
benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The ballot
question is as follows:
"Shall . . . . the regional community facilities authority composed
of (insert the participating community facilities jurisdictions)
. . . . be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . .
(insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not to exceed an
amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under section
1012(1)(c) of this act?
YES
. . . . . . .
NO
. . . . . . ."

(3) Authorities renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot:
"Shall . . . . the regional community facilities authority composed
of (insert the participating community facilities jurisdictions)
. . . . be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each
year for . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed six) years, not
to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and
be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under section
1012(1)(c) of this act?

YES
. . . . . . .
NO
. . . . . . ."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 (1) Not fewer than ten days nor more than
six months before the election at which the proposition to impose the
benefit charge is submitted as provided in this chapter, the governing
regional board of the regional community facilities authority must hold
a public hearing specifically setting forth its proposal to impose
benefit charges for the support of its legally authorized activities
that will maintain or improve the services afforded in the authority.
A report of the public hearing must be filed with the county treasurer
of each county in which the property is located and be available for
public inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year the governing regional
board of the authority must hold a public hearing to review and
establish the regional community facilities authority benefit charges
for the subsequent year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer or treasurers of each county in
which the property is located, together with the record of each public
hearing, before November 30th immediately preceding the year in which
the benefit charges are to be collected on behalf of the authority.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 A regional community facilities authority
that imposes a benefit charge under this chapter may not impose all or
part of the property tax authorized under section 1012(1)(c) of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 After notice has been given to the
property owners of the amount of the charge, the governing regional
board of a regional community facilities authority imposing a benefit
charge under this chapter must form a review board for at least a two-week period and must, upon complaint in writing of an aggrieved party
owning property in the authority, reduce the charge of a person who, in
their opinion, has been charged too large a sum, to a sum or amount as
they believe to be the true, fair, and just amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 A person who is receiving the exemption
contained in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 is exempt from any legal
obligation to pay a portion of the benefit charge imposed under this
chapter as follows:
(1) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(a) and does not meet the income limitation contained in
RCW 84.36.381(5)(b) (i) or (ii) is exempt from twenty-five percent of
the charge;
(2) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(i) is exempt from fifty percent of the charge; and
(3) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(ii) shall be exempt from seventy-five percent of the
charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this
section, a regional community facilities authority may, by resolution
of its regional board, provide for civil service for its employees in
the same manner, with the same powers, and with the same force and
effect as provided by chapter 41.08 RCW for cities, towns, and
municipalities, including restrictions against the discharge of an
employee because of residence outside the limits of the regional
community facilities authority.
(2) If an agreement is reached to provide for civil service under
section 1008(6) of this act, the regional community facilities
authority must establish such a system as is required by the agreement.

PART XI
AMENDMENTS TO CHAPTER 84.52 RCW
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 A new section is added to chapter 84.52
RCW to read as follows:
(1) If a community facilities district is a participating community
facilities jurisdiction in a regional community facilities authority,
the regular property tax levies of the community facilities district
are limited as follows:
(a) The regular levy of the district under section 810 of this act
may not exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of
taxable property in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by
the authority under section 1012(1)(a) of this act;
(b) The levy of the district under section 810 of this act may not
exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable
property in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the
authority under section 1012(1)(b) of this act; and
(c) The levy of the district under section 810 of this act may not
exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable
property in the district less the amount of any levy imposed by the
authority under section 1012(1)(c) of this act.
(2) If a city or town is a participating community facilities
jurisdiction in a regional community facilities authority, the regular
levies of the city or town may not exceed the applicable rates provided
in RCW 27.12.390 and 84.52.043(1) less the aggregate rates of any
regular levies made by the authority under section 1012(1) of this act.
(3) If a port district is a participating community facilities
jurisdiction in a regional community facilities authority, the regular
levy of the port district under RCW 53.36.020 may not exceed forty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable property in the
district less the aggregate rates of any regular levies imposed by the
authority under section 1012(1) of this act.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Community facilities district," "community facilities
jurisdiction," and "regional community facilities authority" have the
same meanings as provided in section 102 of this act; and
(b) "Participating community facilities jurisdiction" means a
community facilities district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port
district that is represented on the governing board of a regional
community facilities authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1102 A new section is added to chapter 84.52
RCW to read as follows:
The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and
84.52.043 do not prevent the levy of taxes by a community facilities
district, when authorized so to do by the voters of a community
facilities district in the manner and for the purposes and number of
years allowable under Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of
this state. Elections for taxes must be held in the year in which the
levy is made, or in the case of propositions authorizing two-year
through four-year levies for maintenance and operation support of a
community facilities district, or authorizing two-year through six-year
levies to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of
community facilities district facilities, in the year in which the
first annual levy is made. Once additional tax levies have been
authorized for maintenance and operation support of a community
facilities district for a two-year through four-year period, no further
additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of the
district for that period may be authorized.
A special election may be called and the time fixed by the
community facilities district commissioners, by giving notice by
publication in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general
elections, at which special election the proposition authorizing the
excess levy shall be submitted in a form as to enable the voters
favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed to vote "no."

Sec. 1103 RCW 84.52.052 and 2004 c 129 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056((,)) and
((RCW)) 84.52.043 ((shall)) do not prevent the levy of additional taxes
by any taxing district, except school districts ((and)), fire
protection districts, and community facilities districts, in which a
larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of the
obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing
district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer
district, solid waste disposal district, public facilities district,
flood control zone district, county rail district, service district,
public hospital district, road district, rural county library district,
island library district, rural partial-county library district,
intercounty rural library district, cemetery district, city, town,
transportation benefit district, emergency medical service district
with a population density of less than one thousand per square mile,
cultural arts, stadium, and convention district, ferry district, city
transportation authority, ((or)) regional fire protection service
authority, community facilities district, or regional community
facilities authority.
Any such taxing district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the
rate specified in RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or
84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when authorized so to do by the voters of
such taxing district in the manner set forth in Article VII, section
2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a special or general election
to be held in the year in which the levy is made.
A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
county legislative authority, or council, board of commissioners, or
other governing body of any such taxing district, by giving notice
thereof by publication in the manner provided by law for giving notices
of general elections, at which special election the proposition
authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

PART XII
IMPACT FEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1201 A new section is added to chapter 82.02
RCW to read as follows:
A community facilities district or regional community facilities
authority may not be required to pay an impact fee under the provisions
of RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090.

PART XIII
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1301 Sections 101 through 1024 of this act
constitute a new title in the Revised Code of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1302 Parts I through X of this act constitute
new chapters in the new title created under section 1301 of this act
and are to be codified as new chapters in the new title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1303 Part headings used in this act are not
any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1304 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---