BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.122.020 and 2007 c 142 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(2) "Damage" includes the substantial weakening of structural or
lateral support of an underground facility, penetration, impairment, or
destruction of any underground protective coating, housing, or other
protective device, or the severance, partial or complete, of any
underground facility to the extent that the project owner or the
affected utility owner determines that repairs are required.
(3) "Emergency" means any condition constituting a clear and
present danger to life or property, or a customer service outage.
(4) "Excavation" means any operation in which earth, rock, or other
material on or below the ground is moved or otherwise displaced by any
means, except the tilling of soil less than twelve inches in depth for
agricultural purposes, or road and ditch maintenance that does not
change the original road grade or ditch flowline.
(5) "Excavation confirmation code" means a code or ticket issued by
the one-number locator service for the site where an excavation is
planned. The code must be accompanied by the date and time it was
issued.
(6) "Excavator" means any person who engages directly in
excavation.
(7) "Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or toxic or corrosive
gas.
(8) "Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum products,
or anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195
as in effect on March 1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide. The utilities
and transportation commission may by rule incorporate by reference
other substances designated as hazardous by the secretary of
transportation.
(9) "Identified facility" means any underground facility which is
indicated in the project plans as being located within the area of
proposed excavation.
(10) "Identified but unlocatable underground facility" means an
underground facility which has been identified but cannot be located
with reasonable accuracy.
(11) "Locatable underground facility" means an underground facility
which can be field-marked with reasonable accuracy.
(12) "Marking" means the use of stakes, paint, or other clearly
identifiable materials to show the field location of underground
facilities, in accordance with the current color code standard of the
American public works association. Markings shall include
identification letters indicating the specific type of the underground
facility.
(13) "Notice" or "notify" means contact in person or by telephone
or other electronic methods that results in the receipt of a valid
excavation confirmation code.
(14) "One-number locator service" means a service through which a
person can notify utilities and request field-marking of underground
facilities.
(15) "Operator" means the individual conducting the excavation.
(16) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision
or instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.
(17) "Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all or parts of a
pipeline facility through which hazardous liquid or gas moves in
transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, valves, and
other appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units, fabricated
assemblies associated with pumping or compressor units, metering and
delivery stations and fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout
tanks. "Pipeline" or "pipeline system" does not include process or
transfer pipelines.
(18) "Pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing,
owning, or operating a pipeline for transporting hazardous liquid or
gas. A pipeline company does not include: (a) Distribution systems
owned and operated under franchise for the sale, delivery, or
distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation contractors or
other contractors that contract with a pipeline company.
(19) "Reasonable accuracy" means location within twenty-four inches
of the outside dimensions of both sides of an underground facility.
(20) "Service lateral" means an individual customer service line
providing connection or conveyance to or from one or more building
units to an underground facility.
(21) "Transfer pipeline" means a buried or aboveground pipeline
used to carry hazardous liquid between a tank vessel or transmission
pipeline and the first valve inside secondary containment at the
facility provided that any discharge on the facility side of that first
valve will not directly impact waters of the state. A transfer
pipeline includes valves, and other appurtenances connected to the
pipeline, pumping units, and fabricated assemblies associated with
pumping units. A transfer pipeline does not include process pipelines,
pipelines carrying ballast or bilge water, transmission pipelines, or
tank vessel or storage tanks.
(((21))) (22) "Transmission pipeline" means a pipeline that
transports hazardous liquid or gas within a storage field, or
transports hazardous liquid or gas from an interstate pipeline or
storage facility to a distribution main or a large volume hazardous
liquid or gas user, or operates at a hoop stress of twenty percent or
more of the specified minimum yield strength.
(((22))) (23) "Underground facility" means any item buried or
placed below ground for use in connection with the storage or
conveyance of water, sewage, electronic, telephonic or telegraphic
communications, cablevision, electric energy, petroleum products, gas,
gaseous vapors, hazardous liquids, or other substances and including
but not limited to pipes, sewers, service laterals, conduits, cables,
valves, lines, wires, manholes, attachments, and those parts of poles
or anchors below ground. This definition does not include pipelines as
defined in subsection (17) of this section, but does include
distribution systems owned and operated under franchise for the sale,
delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.122.030 and 2000 c 191 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before commencing any excavation, excluding agriculture tilling
less than twelve inches in depth, the excavator shall provide notice of
the scheduled commencement of excavation to all owners of underground
facilities through a one-number locator service.
(2) All owners of underground facilities within a one-number
locator service area shall subscribe to the service. One-number
locator service rates for cable television companies will be based on
the amount of their underground facilities. An underground facility
owner who is required to subscribe to the one-number locator service
and fails to do so is liable for all damages to the owner's underground
facilities and for any other damages that occur as a result of proper
notice of a scheduled excavation through the one-number locator
service.
(3) If no one-number locator service is available, notice shall be
provided individually to those owners of underground facilities known
to or suspected of having underground facilities within the area of
proposed excavation. The notice shall be communicated to the owners of
underground facilities not less than two business days or more than ten
business days before the scheduled date for commencement of excavation,
unless otherwise agreed by the parties.
(((3))) (4) Upon receipt of the notice provided for in this
section, the owner of the underground facility shall provide the
excavator with reasonably accurate information as to its locatable
underground facilities by surface-marking the location of the
facilities. If there are identified but unlocatable underground
facilities, the owner of such facilities shall provide the excavator
with the best available information as to their locations. The owner
of the underground facility providing the information shall respond no
later than two business days after the receipt of the notice or before
the excavation time, at the option of the owner, unless otherwise
agreed by the parties. Excavators shall not excavate until all known
facilities have been marked. Once marked by the owner of the
underground facility, the excavator is responsible for maintaining the
markings. Excavators shall have the right to receive compensation from
the owner of the underground facility for costs incurred if the owner
of the underground facility does not locate its facilities in
accordance with this section.
(((4))) (5) The owner of the underground facility shall have the
right to receive compensation for costs incurred in responding to
excavation notices given less than two business days prior to the
excavation from the excavator.
(((5) An owner of underground facilities is not required to
indicate the presence of existing service laterals or appurtenances if
the presence of existing service laterals or appurtenances on the site
of the construction project can be determined from the presence of
other visible facilities, such as buildings, manholes, or meter and
junction boxes on or adjacent to the construction site.))
(6) The owner of the underground facility shall promptly notify the
one-number locator service when the owner of the underground facility
has fulfilled the requirements of this section. The notification may
be made available by any means including, but not limited to,
telephonic communication, voicemail, e-mail, text messaging, or
internet or web-based communication protocol. Upon receiving the
notification from affected underground facility owners, the one-number
locator service shall promptly make the information available to the
excavator that affected underground facility owners have fulfilled the
requirements of this section. The information may be made available by
any means including, but not limited to, telephonic communication,
voicemail, e-mail, text messaging, or internet or web-based
communication protocol.
(7) Emergency excavations are exempt from the time requirements for
notification provided in this section.
(((7))) (8) If the excavator, while performing the contract,
discovers underground facilities which are not identified, the
excavator shall cease excavating in the vicinity of the facility and
immediately notify the owner or operator of such facilities, or the
one-number locator service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.122 RCW
to read as follows:
An owner of an underground facility located within a one-number
locator service area that does not subscribe to the one-number locator
service is guilty of a misdemeanor.

--- END ---