BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Voluntary participation in any state or national animal
identification system must be obtained with informed written consent.
(2) No officer, agency, or instrumentality of the state, in
conjunction with the implementation of any state or national animal
identification system, may:
(a) Mandate, coerce, use exclusionary tactics, support, or
otherwise force participation in a state or national animal
identification system;
(b) Register real property, assign real property identification
numbers, or otherwise enroll any person in a state or national animal
identification system without the person's prior knowledge and written
consent;
(c) Withhold, from any person, indemnity based on the person's
status of participation in a state or national animal identification
system; or
(d) Deny, revoke, or limit services, certificates, licenses,
permits, grants, or other benefits or incentives to any person based on
the person's status of participation in a state or national animal
identification system.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits:
(a) The state from establishing or participating in disease control
programs specifically designed to address a specific disease in a
specific species of livestock;
(b) Private agricultural industry organizations from establishing
any source verification program; or
(c) Any person from voluntarily participating in a state or
national animal identification system.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "voluntary" means acting or
done without compulsion or obligation.

--- END ---