BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that fundamental state
legal obligations with respect to state lands managed for designated
trust beneficiaries can continue to be met, while adapting to the
changing circumstances of the state and of management of state lands.
Most western states owning and managing federally granted trust lands
are examining the management constraints and opportunities for these
lands and making prudent adjustments that are in the ongoing interests
of the beneficiaries of the lands and of the state.
The legislature finds that the state department of natural
resources has traditional and long-term strengths as a manager of
natural resources and lands on behalf of trust beneficiaries and the
people of the state, and that these strengths are well-suited to the
general natural resource character of the state lands and state forest
lands. This general natural resource character is expected to
predominate on these lands in the future.
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the trust
beneficiaries of these lands and of the state for the department to
pursue a prudent land asset management strategy of diversification
within and among various types of natural resource land assets.
The legislature finds that prior to and following passage of
chapter 222, Laws of 1984, the department pursued a limited series of
acquisitions of urban commercial real estate property, as part of a
broader property diversification strategy directed by that 1984
legislation. Recent studies, including the 2006 report to the
legislature, "A Review of the Department of Natural Resources'
Commercial Lands Program," confirmed the general prudence of a land
asset diversification strategy for state lands, but recommended that to
be truly diversifying in effect, the department's program would need to
be larger and possessing greater capabilities in professional
commercial real estate management. These enhanced capabilities are
inconsistent with the traditional and desirable strengths of the
department in natural resources and land management.
The legislature finds that increases in state population and urban
development are putting pressure on working forest and farmlands.
Continuing loss of these working lands threatens the many
environmental, social, and economic benefits these lands provide to the
citizens of the state.
The legislature finds that on state lands managed by the department
of natural resources, there is the potential for long-term economic
value from nontraditional products and services derived from the
natural resources associated with these lands. In addition to income
from the sustainable harvest of timber, agricultural products, energy,
and other natural resource commodities, these lands also provide water
storage, improved water quality, carbon sequestration, biodiversity,
habitat, and recreation. These additional values may yield significant
long-term returns to the beneficiaries of state lands in the future.
The legislature further finds that beneficiaries of these trust lands
will have a continuing need for revenue from these lands in the future,
and that diversifying in both traditional and new sources of natural
resource revenue is a prudent trust management strategy.
It is the intent of the legislature to confirm the long-term
natural resource and land management authority and direction for the
department of natural resources, to provide new direction to focus
state land management attention on natural resource and land management
opportunities best suited to current and future circumstances, and to
facilitate land transactions that are in the interests of the state and
the beneficiaries of these lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
under the subchapter heading "general provisions" to read as follows:
The department may not acquire additional urban commercial
properties as state lands after the effective date of this section.
The department shall develop a long-term strategy to dispose of the
nine existing urban commercial properties and reinvest the proceeds in
working natural resource lands that are at risk of conversion or
working natural resource lands that will protect and enhance the value
of existing trust land holdings and provide a comparable rate of return
as the disposed lands. The department shall provide a progress report
on the status of divestiture of the urban commercial properties to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012, and
shall submit progress reports every five years thereafter.
When acquiring lands at risk of conversion, the department shall
evaluate the investment return for these natural resource lands at risk
of conversion by separately determining the investment value of the
lands for natural resource management and the value of the lands for
development. The department shall provide a report listing the
purchases made, and detailing the difference in investment values for
the purpose of selling, transferring, or leasing the development rights
as permitted in chapter 79.13 RCW. The report must be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2009, and
every even year thereafter.
The department shall also identify in its biennial budget request
any added purchase costs from these lands due to the investment in the
development value of lands at risk of conversion.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.17.010 and 2008 c 328 s 6012 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands;
(b) Consolidate and block-up state lands;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands; or
(e) ((Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f))) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by
the board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state
land is held.
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4) ((During the biennium ending June 30, 2009,)) For the purposes
of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring natural
resource lands at risk of development, the department, with approval of
the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land and any
timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when it can be
demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be better
fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in the form
of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes established in
this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction
shall be deposited in the resource management cost account to pay for
((administrative)) expenses incurred in ((carrying out)) implementing
an exchange transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(5) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 79.17.020 and 2008 c 328 s 6013 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of any county and/or the
mayor and city council or city commission of any city or town and/or
the board shall have authority to exchange, each with the other, or
with the federal forest service, the federal government or any proper
agency thereof and/or with any private landowner, county land of any
character, land owned by municipalities of any character, and state
forest land owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the
department, for real property of equal value for the purpose of
consolidating and blocking up the respective land holdings of any
county, municipality, the federal government, or the state of
Washington or for the purpose of obtaining lands having commercial
recreational leasing potential.
(2) ((During the biennium ending June 30, 2009,)) For the purposes
of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring natural
resource lands at risk of development, the department, with approval of
the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land and any
timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when it can be
demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be better
fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in the form
of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes established in
this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange transaction
shall be deposited in the forest development account to pay for
((administrative)) expenses incurred in ((carrying out)) implementing
an exchange transaction. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(3) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues, and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.17.200 and 1992 c 167 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "public agency" means any
agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this
state including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, special purpose districts, and local service
districts; any agency of the state government; any agency of the United
States; and any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal
government.
(2) With the approval of the board of natural resources, the
department of natural resources may directly transfer, lease, or
dispose of real property, without public auction, in the following
circumstances:
(a) Transfers in lieu of condemnations;
(b) Transfers or leases to public agencies; ((and))
(c) Transfers to resolve trespass and property ownership disputes;
and
(d) Transfers to convey currently leased homesites to the owner of
the home and improvements.
(3) Real property to be transferred, leased, or disposed of under
this section shall be transferred, leased, or disposed of only after
appraisal and for at least fair market value, and only if such
transaction is in the best interest of the state or affected trust.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.19.010 and 2003 c 334 s 525 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that from time to time it may be desirable
for the department to sell state lands ((which)) or development rights
from state natural resource lands at risk of conversion that have low
potential for natural resource management or low income-generating
potential or which, because of geographic location or other factors,
are inefficient for the department to manage. However, it is also
important to acquire lands for long-term management to replace those
sold so that the publicly owned natural resource land base will ((not))
be ((depleted)) enhanced and the publicly owned forest land base will
not be reduced. The purpose of this chapter is to provide a means to
facilitate such sales and purchases so that the diversity of public
uses on the trust lands will be maintained. In making the
determinations, the department shall comply with local land use plans
and applicable growth management principles.

Sec. 7 RCW 79.19.020 and 2003 c 334 s 526 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department, with the approval of the board, may purchase
property at fair market value to be held in a land bank, which is
hereby created within the department. Property so purchased shall be
property which would be desirable for addition to the public lands of
the state because of the potential for natural ((resource or))
resource-based income production of the property. The total acreage
held in the land bank shall not exceed one thousand five hundred acres.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 79.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall manage forest lands acquired under this
chapter under the sustainable harvest plan. Lands that were at risk of
conversion, and that were acquired or retained as working forest lands,
and for which development rights were transferred or leased must be
managed at a level equal to or greater than seventy-five percent of the
expected harvest under the sustainable harvest plan. The department
shall identify in its biennial budget request any shortfall in income
from these lands due to harvest levels less than the expected
sustainable harvest level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act does not affect any existing right
acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the sections amended
or under any rule or order adopted under those sections nor does it
affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---