BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that, among other
causes, students who, from one semester to the next, exhibit striking
behavior or discipline changes or a sudden drop in academic performance
may have vision impairments. It is the goal of the legislature that,
to the extent that funds are available, such children be given
additional vision screening.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.210.020 and 1971 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every board of school directors shall have the power, and it shall
be its duty to provide for and require screening for the visual and
auditory acuity of all children attending schools in their districts to
ascertain which if any of such children have defects sufficient to
retard them in their studies. Auditory and visual screening shall be
made in accordance with procedures and standards adopted by rule ((or
regulation)) of the state board of health. Those students who exhibit
a striking behavior or discipline change, or a sudden drop in academic
performance may be subject to additional visual screening in order to
determine whether the change in behavior, discipline, or grades is due
to visual impairment. Personnel conducting the additional visual
screening shall use the following screenings, in addition to screening
required by the state board of health: Near vision; distance vision;
and stereo vision. "Personnel" may include, but is not limited to,
ophthalmologists, optometrists, or opticians who donate their
professional services to schools or school districts. Prior to the
adoption or revision of such rules ((or regulations)) the state board
of health shall seek the recommendations of the superintendent of
public instruction regarding the administration of visual and auditory
screening and the qualifications of persons competent to administer
such screening.

--- END ---