BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Telephone utility" means a person providing telecommunications
services as defined in RCW 82.04.065.
(2) "Water utility" means a water distribution business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010.
(3) "Sewer utility" means a sewerage collection business as defined
in RCW 82.16.020.
(4) "Solid waste utility" means a solid waste collection business
as defined in RCW 82.18.010.
(5) "Cable service utility" means a person providing cable service
as defined in the federal telecommunications act of 1996.
(6) "Electric utility" means a light and power business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010.
(7) "Natural gas utility" means a gas distribution business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010.
(8) "Utility" means a telephone utility, water utility, sewer
utility, solid waste utility, cable service utility, electric utility,
or natural gas utility.
(9) "Gross income of the business" is defined as provided in RCW
82.04.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislative authority of a county,
by resolution or ordinance, may impose an excise tax on the privilege
of engaging in business as a utility within the unincorporated
territory of the county. The tax is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by a rate not exceeding six percent.
(2) Taxes imposed under this section must apply uniformly
throughout the unincorporated territory of the county.
(3) The utility must add a tax imposed under this section to the
rates or charges it makes for utility services and separately state the
amount of tax on billings.
(4) The resolution or ordinance adopted must provide a credit
against the county utility tax imposed under this chapter for the full
amount of any city utility tax imposed upon the same taxable event so
that the combined utilities' taxes do not exceed six percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Thirty percent of the revenues received from
taxes imposed under this chapter must be used exclusively for criminal
justice purposes as defined in RCW 82.14.340.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any county in which a public utility
district operates works, plants, or facilities for the distribution and
sale of electricity has the power to levy and collect from such
district a tax on the gross revenues derived by such district from the
sale of electricity within the county, exclusive of the revenues
derived from the sale of electricity for purposes of resale. Such tax
when levied is a debt of the district, and may be collected as such.
Any such district has the power to add the amount of such tax to the
rates or charges it makes for electricity so sold within the limits of
such city or town.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.14.450 and 2007 c 380 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Until July 1, 2009, a county legislative authority may submit
an authorizing proposition to the county voters at a primary or general
election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons
voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the
purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used.
((Funds raised under this tax shall not supplant existing funds used
for these purposes. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds
means the actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which
the ballot measure is approved by voters. Actual operating
expenditures excludes lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants
or loans, extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions beyond the control of the county or city receiving
the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.)) The rate
of tax under this section shall not exceed three-tenths of one percent
of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, a county legislative authority may, by
resolution or ordinance, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter, provided that such sales and use tax is
subject to repeal by referendum, using the procedures provided in RCW
82.14.036. The referendum procedure provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the
exclusive method for subjecting any county sales and use tax ordinance
or resolution to a referendum vote. The rate of tax under this
subsection may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax.
(3) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(((3))) (4) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease
of motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease,
are exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(((4))) (5) One-third of all money received under this section
shall be used solely for criminal justice purposes and fire protection
purposes. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice
purposes" ((means additional police protection, mitigation of congested
court systems, or relief of overcrowded jails or other local
correctional facilities)) has the same meaning as in RCW 82.14.340.
(((5))) (6)(a) Money received under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section shall be shared between the county and the cities as follows:
Sixty percent shall be retained by the county and forty percent shall
be distributed on a per capita basis to cities in the county.
(b) A tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section continues
until repealed or expires.
(c) If a county has imposed a sales and use tax with a rate of tax
equal to three-tenths of one percent under subsection (1) of this
section, the tax authorized in subsection (2) of this section is not
available to the county or any city within the county.
(d) If a county has imposed a sales and use tax with a rate of tax
less than three-tenths of one percent under subsection (1) of this
section, a county may impose an additional sales and use tax under
subsection (2) of this section so that the combined rate of tax does
not exceed three-tenths of one percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---