BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.260 and 2008 c 296 s 1, 2008 c 217 s 100, and
2008 c 81 s 4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts,
or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola byproduct
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured or
the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business shall be equal
to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business shall be equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the
gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall
be equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied
by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter
82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to
the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or
foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed
under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state shall be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities shall be equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business shall, in the case of manufacturers, be equal
to the value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of
sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for
hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through the later of June
30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured and
the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case
of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (11) must report
as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business shall, in the case of extractors, be equal to the value of
products, including byproducts, extracted, or in the case of extractors
for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by
the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007,
and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of products, including byproducts,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, be equal to the
gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent
from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July
1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to the
gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
shall be equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines,
the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
((newspapers,)) periodicals((,)) or magazines; (2) building, repairing
or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any
readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any
public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the
course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which
readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of
the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (3)
extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons taxable as
extractors for hire or processors for hire under another section of
this chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage
warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5)
representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance
companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed
under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television
broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising
computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof
as annually reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in
lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and
excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state
audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as
measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if
any; (7) engaging in activities which bring a person within the
definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such
persons, the amount of tax on such business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.04.280 and 2006 c 300 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of:
(1) Printing materials other than newspapers, and of publishing
((newspapers,)) periodicals((,)) or magazines; (2) building, repairing
or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind and including any
readjustment, reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any
public, private or cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the
course of such building, repairing or improving, the cost of which
readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility of
the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (3)
extracting for hire or processing for hire, except persons taxable as
extractors for hire or processors for hire under another section of
this chapter; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage
warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5)
representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance
companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed
under the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television
broadcasting, excluding network, national and regional advertising
computed as a standard deduction based on the national average thereof
as annually reported by the Federal Communications Commission, or in
lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting station, and
excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state
audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as
measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if
any; (7) engaging in activities which bring a person within the
definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such
persons, the amount of tax on such business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
As used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or
vegetables, meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination
thereof, at a desired temperature to maintain the quality of the
product for orderly marketing.
As used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise
are received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses,
fruit warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under
chapter 22.09 RCW, public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight
sheds, docks and wharves, and "self-storage" or "mini storage"
facilities whereby customers have direct access to individual storage
areas by separate entrance. "Storage warehouse" does not include a
building or structure, or that part of such building or structure, in
which an activity taxable under RCW 82.04.272 is conducted.
As used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated
intervals at least once every three months, including any supplement or
special edition of the publication.

Sec. 4 RCW 35.102.150 and 2006 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax ((shall)) must allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines((, have the same meanings as attributed to those terms in
RCW 82.04.280(1) by the department of revenue)) are those activities to
which the tax rates in RCW 82.04.260(14) and 82.04.280(1) apply.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.806 and 2004 c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales, to a printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including
repair parts and replacement parts for such equipment, when the
computer equipment is used primarily in the printing or publishing of
any printed material, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the computer equipment. This exemption applies
only to computer equipment not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(14) or
82.04.280(1).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
shall be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes
of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for
administrative purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(14) must file a complete annual report with the department.
The report is due by March 31st of the year following any calendar year
in which a person is eligible to claim the preferential rate provided
in RCW 82.04.260(14). The department may extend the due date for
timely filing of annual reports under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the preferential
rate was claimed. The report must not include names of employees. The
report must also detail employment by the total number of full-time,
part-time, and temporary positions for the year that the tax preference
was claimed.
(c) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(14) was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the preferential rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(14).
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims the
preferential rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(14) but fails to submit a
report by the due date or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the
department must declare the amount of the tax preference claimed for
the previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The
department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due
under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter, retroactively to the
date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues until the taxes for
which the tax preference was claimed are repaid. Amounts due under
this subsection are not subject to the confidentiality provisions of
RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(5) By November 1, 2014, and November 1, 2016, the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate, in
consultation with the department, must report to the legislature on the
effectiveness of the preferential rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(14).
The report must measure the effect of the preferential rate provided in
RCW 82.04.260(14) on job retention, net jobs created for Washington
residents, industry growth, and other factors as the committees select.
The report must include a discussion of principles to apply in
evaluating whether the legislature should continue the preferential
rate provided in RCW 82.04.260(14).

Sec. 7 RCW 82.32.590 and 2008 c 81 s 13 and 2008 c 15 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.650, 82.32.630, 82.32.610, 82.82.020, section 6 of this act, or
82.74.040 by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the
control of the taxpayer, the department shall extend the time for
filing the survey or report. Such extension shall be for a period of
thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
shall be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.32.600 and 2008 c 81 s 14 and 2008 c 15 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.545, 82.32.610, 82.32.630, 82.82.020,
section 6 of this act, or 82.74.040 must electronically file with the
department all surveys, reports, returns, and any other forms or
information the department requires in an electronic format as provided
or approved by the department. As used in this section, "returns" has
the same meaning as "return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

Sec. 9 2006 c 300 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) ((This act and)) Section 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 2009
(section 3 of this act), section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and
section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are contingent upon the siting and
commercial operation of a significant semiconductor microchip
fabrication facility in the state of Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) ((This act)) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first
day of the month in which a contract for the construction of a
significant semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined
by the director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue ((shall)) must provide notice of
the effective date of this act to affected taxpayers, the legislature,
and others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the
department discovers that commencement of commercial production did not
take place within three years of the date the contract was signed, the
department ((shall)) must make a determination that ((this act))
chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer effective, and all taxes that
would have been otherwise due ((shall be)) are deemed deferred taxes
and are immediately assessed and payable from any person reporting tax
under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit under section
2 or 5 through 10 ((of this act)), chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of ((this act)) chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government
and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009.
(2) Section 3 of this act takes effect if the contingency in
section 9 of this act occurs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 2 of this act expires on the date
that section 3 of this act takes effect.

--- END ---