BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state
environmental policy act is an important mechanism to ensure that, in
all state and local governmental actions or approvals, the responsible
agency considers the potential environmental consequences of the
proposed action. Where an agency determines that the proposal may have
a significant adverse impact upon the quality of the human environment,
the agency is required to conduct an analysis of the potential impacts
and consider alternatives that may reduce or eliminate those impacts.
The state environmental policy act procedures in preparing such an
environmental impact statement require a draft and affording an
opportunity to the public to review and comment upon the agency's
analysis. These procedures promote openness and accountability in
government and involve the public in important ways in making
governmental decisions that will affect the state and their
communities. But there have been instances in which agencies have
avoided such analysis by improperly defining a series of related
actions as separate proposals under the state environmental policy act.
Such improper "segmenting" under the state environmental policy act is
contrary to judicial decisions interpreting the state environmental
policy act and undermines the objectives of thorough environmental
analysis of the cumulative impacts from the overall project or
proposal.
For these reasons it is appropriate that the state agency charged
by law with maintaining guidelines for state and local compliance with
the state environmental policy act review this issue and make
recommendations for administrative and legislative actions to prevent
improper segment or piecemailing of proposals to avoid full
environmental analysis under the state environmental policy act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By December 31, 2009, the department of
ecology shall provide a report to the environmental policy committees
of the senate and house of representatives that examines the state
environmental policy act procedures, case law, and recent governmental
actions subject to the state environmental policy act in which there
have been charges that the responsible agency improperly segmented the
action with the result that the state environmental policy act
compliance was avoided.
(2) The report must address at least the following:
(a) The "phased review" procedures under WAC 197-11-060;
(b) Data on the number of projects completed through phased review;
(c) Examination of phased review proposals and assessments to
determine if a single comprehensive review should have been completed;
(d) An examination of projects that were broken into a series of
projects regardless of the cumulative effect;
(e) An examination of the independence of each project and any
subsequent related project;
(f) The role of the lead agency;
(g) The potential conflict of interest of the lead agency
conducting the environmental review where the agency is a proponent or
sponsor of the project subject to the review; and
(h) Any recommendations regarding restructuring of the state
environmental policy act phased review procedures or other
recommendations to prevent inappropriate segment of the state
environmental policy act actions to avoid required environmental
analysis of the cumulative impacts of related actions.

--- END ---