BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.70A.103 and 2002 c 68 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
State agencies shall comply with the local comprehensive plans and
development regulations and amendments thereto adopted pursuant to this
chapter except as otherwise provided in RCW 71.09.250 (1) through (3),
71.09.342, and 72.09.333. Except for the acquisition of land for
highway rights-of-way, no state agency may acquire in fee simple or
provide funds to other entities to acquire in fee simple agricultural
lands, designated by a county under this chapter as agricultural lands
of long-term commercial significance, for conversion to nonagricultural
activities without prior written approval by the county legislative
authority. The county legislative authority may require the state
agency or other entity receiving funds from a state agency to acquire
property, to submit information including, but not limited to, the
property's legal description, the proposed use of the property to be
acquired, and an analysis of the impact on adjacent lands and the
continued viability of the region's agricultural industry.
The provisions of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. do not
affect the state's authority to site any other essential public
facility under RCW 36.70A.200 in conformance with local comprehensive
plans and development regulations adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A
RCW.

--- END ---