BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.30.060 and 2003 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every invitation to bid on a prime contract that is expected to
cost one million dollars or more for the construction, alteration, or
repair of any public building or public work of the state or a state
agency or municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or an institution
of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 shall require each
prime contract bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour
after the published bid submittal time, the names of the subcontractors
with whom the bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract for
performance of the work of: HVAC (heating, ventilation, and air
conditioning); plumbing as described in chapter 18.106 RCW; and
electrical as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to name itself for the
work.
(2) The prime contract bidder shall not list more than one
subcontractor for each category of work identified, unless
subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in which case the prime
contract bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for
which alternate. Failure of the prime contract bidder to submit as
part of the bid the names of such subcontractors or to name itself to
perform such work, or ((the naming of)) to name two or more
subcontractors to perform the same work shall render the prime contract
bidder's bid nonresponsive and, therefore, void.
(((2))) (3) Substitution of a listed subcontractor ((in furtherance
of bid shopping or bid peddling)) before or after the award of the
prime contract is prohibited, except as provided under subsection (4)
of this section, and the originally listed subcontractor is entitled to
recover monetary damages from the prime contract bidder who executed a
contract with the public entity and the substituted subcontractor but
not from the public entity inviting the bid. It is the original
subcontractor's burden to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
bid shopping or bid peddling occurred.
(4) Substitution of a listed subcontractor may be made by the prime
contractor for the following reasons:
(a) ((Refusal of)) The listed subcontractor refuses to sign a
contract with the prime contractor;
(b) ((Bankruptcy or insolvency of)) The listed subcontractor is
bankrupt or insolvent;
(c) ((Inability of)) The listed subcontractor is unable to perform
the requirements of the proposed contract or the project;
(d) ((Inability of)) The listed subcontractor is unable to obtain
the necessary licenses, certifications, bonding, insurance, or to meet
any other statutory requirements necessary to perform the work detailed
in the contract; ((or))
(e) The listed subcontractor ((is barred from participating in the
project as a result of a court order or summary judgment)) fails to
meet the requirements established in RCW 39.04.350 for responsible
bidders;
(f) The listed subcontractor is barred from bidding on or
participating in the project as a result of a court order or summary
judgment, or in accordance with the terms established in RCW
39.12.065(3); or
(g) For any other reason that an arbitrator or court determines to
be good cause for substitution such as, but not limited to, clerical
errors or misinterpretation of the scope of the project.
(((3))) (5) The requirement of this section to name the prime
contract bidder's proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical
subcontractors applies only to proposed HVAC, plumbing, and electrical
subcontractors who will contract directly with the prime contract
bidder submitting the bid to the public entity.
(((4))) (6) A violation of this section entitles the prevailing
plaintiff to recover damages. Any action brought under this section
may be resolved through binding arbitration or in the superior court of
the county in which the public work is located.
(7) This section does not apply to job order contract requests for
proposals under RCW ((39.10.130)) 39.10.420.

--- END ---