BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to promote
uniformity in the procedures and practices related to telephonic
hearings in civil cases and traffic cases in the courts of limited
jurisdiction. In order to improve access to the courts and reduce
litigation costs, the courts of limited jurisdiction shall permit
telephonic hearings at appropriate proceedings in civil cases and
traffic cases.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, in all civil cases and traffic cases, a party that has
provided notice to the court may participate by telephone in lieu of
personal appearance in the following proceedings: All motions except
motions in limine; trial assignments; show cause proceedings; status
conferences; compliance and review hearings; and any other proceeding,
if the court determines that participation by telephone is appropriate.
(2) The court may require a party to appear in person at a
proceeding listed in subsection (1) of this section if the court finds
that a personal appearance would materially assist in the determination
of the proceeding or in the effective management or resolution of a
case.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The administrator for the courts shall
develop rules to implement section 2 of this act by December 30, 2009.
The rules shall include, but are not limited to, the notice to be given
by a party requesting to participate in a proceeding by telephone; the
manner in which a proceeding by telephone is to be conducted; the
conditions required for a party to be permitted to participate in a
proceeding by telephone; and the use by the courts of private vendors
to provide telephone services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 3.02 RCW.

--- END ---