BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.780 and 2008 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington state has a strong
shipbuilding industry, which can be competitive with the best shipyards
across the nation. The federal government is poised to deliver a
sizable transportation investment package to the states in the form of
economic stimulus funds. In order to best position Washington's
shipbuilding industry to receive some of those stimulus dollars to
build ferry vessels, it is necessary to allow Washington's shipbuilding
industry to compete with other shipyards across the nation for the
construction of these vessels.
(2) The department shall construct one or more new ferry vessels
((for service on routes that require a vessel that carries)) that carry
no more than one hundred motor vehicles. ((The department shall
include in the procurement of the new vessels a requirement that the
vessels be constructed within the boundaries of the state of
Washington, except that equipment furnished by the state and
components, products, and systems that are standard manufactured items
are not subject to the in-state requirement under this subsection.
(2) For purposes of this section, "constructed" means: The
fabrication, by the joining together by welding or fastening, of all
steel parts from which the total vessel is constructed including, but
not limited to, all shell frames, longitudinals, bulkheads, webs,
piping runs, wire ways, and ducting. "Constructed" also means (a) the
installation of all components and systems including, but not limited
to, equipment and machinery, castings, electrical, electronics, deck
covering, lining, paint, and joiner work required by the contract and
(b) the interconnection of all equipment, machinery, and services, such
as piping, wiring, and ducting.
(3) The procurement of the new ferry vessels must also include a
requirement that all warranty work on the vessels be performed within
the boundaries of the state of Washington, insofar as practicable.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---