BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds compelling
evidence from five commissioned studies that additional progress must
be made to address the achievement gap. The studies also contain
specific recommendations for action by the legislature, colleges of
education, school leadership, teachers, and communities. These
recommendations are data-driven and drawn from education research, as
well as the personal, professional, and cultural experience of those
who contributed to the studies. The legislature finds there is no
better opportunity to make a strong commitment to closing the
achievement gap than in legislation affirming the state's
constitutional obligation to provide opportunities to learn for all
students without distinction or preference on account of race,
ethnicity, socioeconomic status, or gender.
(2) Therefore, following the priority recommendations from the
achievement gap studies, the legislature intends to:
(a) Provide resources to support parent and community involvement
and outreach efforts by public schools, including such items as
additional notices and communication to parents, translations,
translators, parent and community meetings, and school events within
the community;
(b) Require that teachers demonstrate cultural competency in the
classroom and with students at each level of state teacher
certification and provide additional opportunities for professional
development in cultural competency for current teachers;
(c) Create local alternative routes to teacher certification for
paraeducators and individuals in the communities surrounding schools
and school districts that are struggling to address the achievement
gap; and
(d) Reexamine the study recommendations regarding data and
accountability and identify ways for the education data accountability
system to address these needs.
(3) The legislature encourages school districts to consult with the
office of the education ombudsman in developing plans for parent and
community involvement and outreach.
(4) Comprehensive and consistent collection and review of data, by
the superintendent of public instruction, that is disaggregated in the
smallest units allowable by law that do not identify an individual
student is an important factor in closing the achievement gap. This
disaggregation of information is important to compile in order to see
exactly where each subgroup lies. Establishing a single, streamlined
discipline data collection system will reduce the administrative burden
on schools and districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
All student data related reports required of the superintendent of
public instruction in this title must be disaggregated by at least the
following subgroups of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American
Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, low
income, transitional bilingual, migrant, special education, and
students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board shall convene a working
group with expertise in a wide array of cultures and cultural contexts
to identify a list of model standards for cultural competency and make
recommendations to the education committees of the legislature on the
strengths and weaknesses of those standards. For the purposes of this
section, "cultural competency" includes knowledge of student cultural
histories and contexts, as well as family norms and values in different
cultures; knowledge and skills in accessing community resources and
community and parent outreach; and skills in adapting instruction to
students' experiences and identifying cultural contexts for individual
students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.660
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide guidance to school districts where data indicates significant
achievement gaps among subgroups of students and for large numbers of
those students. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
is responsible for identifying the school districts that have the
largest achievement gap and should receive priority for assistance in
advancing cultural competence skills in their workforce. The
guidelines shall also take into consideration the recommendations of
the achievement gap task force report to the 2009 legislature. The
purpose of the assistance is to develop partnership grant programs
between the districts and teacher preparation programs to provide one
or more of the four alternative route programs under RCW 28A.660.040
and recruit paraeducators and other individuals in the local community
to become certified as teachers. To the maximum extent possible, the
board shall coordinate the recruiting Washington teachers program under
RCW 28A.415.370 with the alternative route programs under this
subsection.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.300.137 and 2008 c 298 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Beginning)) (1) The center shall work in collaboration with the
commissions established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW
and representatives from the five achievement gap study groups
commissioned in 2008 to review the challenges and solutions addressed
by the five achievement gap study group's reports and develop a plan
for implementation of strategies intended to address the achievement
gap. The implementation plan must establish clear benchmarks that are
to be achieved.
(2) In January 2010, the center for the improvement of student
learning shall report ((annually)) to the superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, the governor, the P-20
council, and the education committees of the legislature on the
implementation plan required under subsection (1) of this section and
shall, thereafter, annually report on the implementation status of
strategies to address the achievement gap ((for African-American
students)) and on the progress in improvement of education performance
measures for African-American, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan
Native, Asian, and Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---