BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.36.116 and 2007 c 71 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person found transporting animals on the public roads of
this state that are not accompanied by valid health certificates,
permits, or other documents as required by this chapter or its rules
has committed a class 1 civil infraction.
(2) Any person who knowingly transports or accepts delivery of live
nonambulatory livestock to, from, or between any livestock market,
feedlot, slaughtering facility, or similar facility that trades in
livestock has committed a civil infraction and shall be assessed a
monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars. The transport or
acceptance of each nonambulatory livestock animal is considered a
separate and distinct violation. Livestock that was ambulatory prior
to transport to a feedlot and becomes nonambulatory because of an
injury sustained during transport may be unloaded and placed in a
separate pen for rehabilitation at the feedlot. For the purposes of
this section, "nonambulatory livestock" has the same meaning as in RCW
16.52.225.
(3) The director is authorized to issue notices of and enforce
civil infractions in the manner prescribed under chapter 7.80 RCW.

--- END ---