BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.030 and 2007 c 6 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
if any person engages in any business or performs any act upon which a
tax is imposed by the preceding chapters, he or she shall, under such
rules as the department of revenue shall prescribe, apply for and
obtain from the department a registration certificate. Such
registration certificate shall be personal and nontransferable and
shall be valid as long as the taxpayer continues in business and pays
the tax accrued to the state. In case business is transacted at two or
more separate places by one taxpayer, a separate registration
certificate for each place at which business is transacted with the
public shall be required. Each certificate shall be numbered and shall
show the name, residence, and place and character of business of the
taxpayer and such other information as the department of revenue deems
necessary and shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the place of
business for which it is issued. Where a place of business of the
taxpayer is changed, the taxpayer must return to the department the
existing certificate, and a new certificate will be issued for the new
place of business. No person required to be registered under this
section shall engage in any business taxable hereunder without first
being so registered. The department, by rule, may provide for the
issuance of certificates of registration to temporary places of
business.
(2) Unless the person is a dealer as defined in RCW 9.41.010,
registration under this section is not required if the following
conditions are met:
(a) A person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income of the business, from all business activities taxable under
chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than ((twelve)) twenty-four thousand dollars
per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than ((twelve)) twenty-four
thousand dollars per year;
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect; and
(d) The person is not otherwise required to obtain a license
subject to the master application procedure provided in chapter 19.02
RCW.
(3) All persons who agree to collect and remit sales and use tax to
the department under the agreement must register through the central
registration system authorized under the agreement. Persons required
to register under subsection (1) of this section are not relieved of
that requirement because of registration under this subsection (3).
(4) Persons registered under subsection (3) of this section who are
not required to register under subsection (1) of this section and who
are not otherwise subject to the requirements of chapter 19.02 RCW are
not subject to the fees imposed by RCW 19.02.075.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. The maximum credit for a taxpayer for a
reporting period is thirty-five dollars multiplied by the number of
months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection shall be used by all
taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.
(5) Beginning in calendar year 2012, the department must increase
the monthly dollar amount under subsection (1) of this section in use
for that calendar year by the consumer price index. If any increase
under this subsection is not a multiple of one dollar, the increase
must be rounded to the next lowest multiple of one dollar. The monthly
amount determined under this subsection must be used for reporting
periods in the next calendar year.
(6) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index compiled
by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor
for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics
develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state,
the index covering the greatest number of people, covering areas
exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including all items
must be used as the consumer price index in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.045 and 2006 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than ((twenty-eight thousand dollars))
per year the maximum credit under RCW 82.04.4451 for a year divided by
the tax rate for other business services under RCW 82.04.290(2);
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act applies to the entire
reporting period for reporting periods ending after July 1, 2011.

--- END ---