BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature restates its goal to fully
clean up unauthorized waste tire piles in Washington state in an
expeditious fashion. In partnership with local governments and the
private sector, the legislature encourages ongoing efforts to prevent
the creation of future unauthorized waste tire piles. The legislature
notes a positive trend in tire recycling in recent years and encourages
all parties to continue these strong recycling efforts.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95.510 and 2005 c 354 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied a one dollar per tire fee on the retail sale of
new replacement vehicle tires ((for a period of five years, beginning
July 1, 2005)). The fee imposed in this section ((shall)) must be paid
by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the
buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by
the seller less the ten percent amount retained by the seller as
provided in RCW 70.95.535(1) ((shall)) must be paid to the department
of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.
(2) The department of revenue shall incorporate into the agency's
regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and
the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new
replacement vehicle tires at retail. The department of revenue shall
collect on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling
new replacement vehicle tires at retail:
(a) The number of tires sold; and
(b) The fee levied in this section.
(3) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full
force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this
section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "new replacement vehicle
tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and
does not include retreaded vehicle tires.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95.521 and 2007 c 518 s 708 are each amended to
read as follows:
The waste tire removal account is created in the state treasury.
((All receipts from tire fees imposed under RCW 70.95.510 must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation.)) Expenditures from the account may be used for
the cleanup of unauthorized waste tire piles ((and)), measures that
prevent future accumulation of unauthorized waste tire piles, and road
wear related maintenance on state and local public highways. During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
waste tire removal account to the motor vehicle fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the waste tire removal account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All receipts from tire fees imposed under RCW 70.95.510, except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, must be deposited in the
waste tire removal account created under RCW 70.95.521. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used for the cleanup of unauthorized waste tire piles
and measures that prevent future accumulation of unauthorized waste
tire piles.
(2) On September 1st of odd-numbered years, the state treasurer
must transfer any cash balance in excess of one million dollars from
the waste tire removal account created under RCW 70.95.521 to the motor
vehicle account for the purpose of road wear related maintenance on
state and local public highways.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95.530 and 2005 c 354 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys in the waste tire removal account may be appropriated to
the department of ecology:
(a) To provide for funding to state and local governments for the
removal of discarded vehicle tires from unauthorized tire dump sites;
and
(b) To accomplish the other purposes of RCW 70.95.020 as they
relate to waste tire cleanup under this chapter((; and
(c) To conduct a study of existing tire cleanup sites. The office
of financial management shall oversee the study process and approve the
completed study. The completed study shall be delivered to the house
of representatives and senate transportation committees by November 15,
2005. In conducting the study, the department shall consult on a
regular basis with interested parties. The following identified
elements at a minimum shall be included in the completed study:
(i) Identification of existing tire cleanup sites in the state of
Washington;
(ii) The estimated number of tires in each tire cleanup site;
(iii) A map identifying the location of each one of the tire
cleanup sites;
(iv) A photograph of each one of the tire cleanup sites;
(v) The estimated cost for cleanup of each tire [cleanup] site by
cost component;
(vi) The estimated reimbursement of costs to be recovered from
persons or entities that created or have responsibility for the tire
cleanup site;
(vii) Identification of the type of reimbursements for recovery by
each of the tire cleanup sites;
(viii) The estimated time frame to begin the cleanup project and
the estimated completion date for each tire cleanup site;
(ix) An assessment of local government functions relating to
unauthorized tire piles, including cleanup, enforcement, and public
health;
(x) Identification of needs in the areas in (c)(ix) of this
subsection for each one of the counties; and
(xi) A statewide cleanup plan based on multiple funding options
between twenty cents and sixty cents for each new tire sold at retail
in the state starting on July 1, 2005. The plan shall include the
estimated time frame to begin each of the tire cleanup sites and the
estimated completion date for each one of the sites. In addition, the
plan must include a process to be followed in selecting entities to
perform the tire site cleanups. The 2006 legislature shall determine
the final distribution of the tire cleanup fee and the appropriations
for this statewide tire cleanup plan)).
(2) In spending funds in the account under this section, the
department of ecology shall identify communities with the most severe
problems with waste tires and provide funds first to those communities
to remove accumulations of waste tires.
(3) ((Immediately after July 1, 2005, the department of ecology
shall initiate a pilot project in a city with a population between
three and four thousand within a county with a population less than
twenty thousand to contract to clean up a formerly licensed tire pile
in existence for ten or more years. To begin the project, the
department shall seek to use financial assurance funds set aside for
clean up of the tire pile. For purposes of this subsection, population
figures are the official 2004 population as estimated by the office of
financial management for purposes of state revenue allocation.)) On
September 1st of even-numbered years, the department of ecology shall
provide a report to the house and senate transportation committees on
the progress being made on the cleanup of unauthorized waste tire piles
in the state and efforts underway to prevent the formation of future
unauthorized waste tire piles. The report must detail any additional
unauthorized waste tire piles discovered since the last report and
present a plan to clean up these new unauthorized waste tire piles if
they have not already done so, as well as include a listing of
authorized waste tire piles and transporters. The report must also
include the status of funds available to the program and a needs
assessment of the program. On September 1, 2010, the department shall
also make recommendations to the committees for an ongoing program to
prevent the formation of future unauthorized waste tire piles. Such a
program, if required, must include joint efforts with local governments
and the tire industry.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95.555 and 2005 c 354 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person engaged in the business of transporting or storing waste
tires shall be licensed by the department. To obtain a license, each
applicant must:
(1) Provide assurances that the applicant is in compliance with
this chapter and the rules regarding waste tire storage and
transportation;
(2) Accept liability for and authorize the department to recover
any costs incurred in any cleanup of waste tires transported or newly
stored by the applicant in violation of this section, or RCW 70.95.560,
70.95.515, or 70.95.570, or rules adopted thereunder, after July 1,
2005;
(3) ((Until January 1, 2006, post a bond in the sum of ten thousand
dollars in favor of the state of Washington for waste tires transported
or stored before July 1, 2005. In lieu of the bond, the applicant may
submit financial assurances acceptable to the department;
(4))) After January 1, 2006, for waste tires transported or stored
before July 1, 2005, or for waste tires transported or stored after
July 1, 2005, post a bond in an amount to be determined by the
department sufficient to cover the liability for the cost of cleanup of
the transported or stored waste tires, in favor of the state of
Washington. In lieu of the bond, the applicant may submit financial
assurances acceptable to the department;
(((5))) (4) Be registered in the state of Washington as a business
and be in compliance with all state laws, rules, and local ordinances;
(((6))) (5) Have a federal tax identification number and be in
compliance with all applicable federal codes and regulations; and
(((7))) (6) Report annually to the department the amount of tires
transported and their disposition. Failure to report shall result in
revocation of the license.

--- END ---