BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) According to the state fire marshal's 2007 report there is one
structure fire reported every one hour six minutes in the state of
Washington, the financial loss reported as a result of fire is over six
hundred thirteen thousand dollars per day, and structure fires
accounted for twenty-nine percent of all fires reported;
(b) Operating equipment remains the leading known heat source for
fires, accounting for twenty-eight percent of the total fire incidents
and twenty-six percent of the reported dollar loss. Operating
equipment acts as a heat source for fires in a variety of ways:
Sparks, embers, or flames; radiated or conducted heat; and electrical
arcing and heat;
(c) Over the past five years, seventy-three percent of the fire
fatalities in Washington state occurred in residential properties such
as one and two-family dwellings, multifamily dwellings, board and care
facilities, hotels and motels, and college housing, barracks, and
dormitories. While the number of fires at residential properties
decreased seven percent compared to the previous year, the reported
dollar loss decreased by eleven percent;
(d) Fires caused by electrical appliances and electricity
distribution, on a five-year average, are the second leading cause of
fires, resulting in nearly fourteen percent of the total. Many
electrical-related fires are caused by misuse or poor maintenance of
electrical appliances, improperly installed wiring, circuits being
overloaded, or the use of extension cords in place of permanent wiring;
and
(e) While it asked the state department of ecology and the
department of health to review risk assessments, scientific studies,
and other relevant findings regarding alternatives to the use of
commercial deca-bde in residential upholstered furniture, televisions,
and computers, there still exists among retailers uncertainty as to
whether or not products that are deca-bde free that provide the same
level of fire safety will be readily and commercially available and if
testing methods exist to properly ensure compliance with the law.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to promote fire safety and
environmental health, in a balanced manner backed with sound science.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature directs the joint
legislative audit and review committee to review commercially available
testing methods for the detection of deca-bde in proposed banned
products and a reasonable time frame for the full integration of such
testing by retailers.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.76.030 and 2007 c 65 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 70.76.090, no person may manufacture,
knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for
use in this state mattresses containing commercial deca-bde after
January 1, 2008.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 70.76.090, no person may manufacture,
knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for
use in this state residential upholstered furniture that contains
commercial deca-bde, or any television or computer that has an
electronic enclosure that contains commercial deca-bde after the
effective date established in subsection (3) of this section. This
prohibition may not take effect until the department and the department
of health identify that a safer and technically feasible alternative is
available, and the fire safety committee, created in RCW 70.76.040,
determines that the identified alternative meets applicable fire safety
standards. The effective date of the prohibition must be established
according to the following process:
(a) The department and the department of health shall review risk
assessments, scientific studies, and other relevant findings regarding
alternatives to the use of commercial deca-bde in residential
upholstered furniture, televisions, and computers.
(b) If the department and the department of health jointly find
that safer and technically feasible alternatives are available for any
of these uses, the department shall convene the fire safety committee
created in RCW 70.76.040 to determine whether the identified
alternatives meet applicable fire safety standards.
(c) By majority vote, the fire safety committee created in RCW
70.76.040 shall make a finding whether an alternative identified under
(b) of this subsection meets applicable fire safety standards. The
fire safety committee shall report their finding to the state fire
marshal. After reviewing the finding of the fire safety committee, the
state fire marshal shall determine whether an alternative identified
under (b) of this subsection meets applicable fire safety standards.
The determination of the fire marshal must be based upon the finding of
the fire safety committee. The state fire marshal shall report the
determination to the department.
(d) The department shall seek public input on their findings, the
findings of the fire safety committee, and the determination by the
state fire marshal. The department shall publish these findings in the
Washington State Register, and submit them in a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature. The department shall
initially report these findings by December 31, 2008.
(3) The effective date of the prohibition is as follows:
(a) If the December 31, 2008, report required in subsection (2)(d)
of this section finds that a safer and technically feasible alternative
that meets applicable fire safety standards is available, the
prohibition takes effect January 1, ((2011)) 2013;
(b) If the December 31, 2008, report required in subsection (2)(d)
of this section does not find that a safer and technically feasible
alternative that meets applicable fire safety standards is available,
the prohibition does not take effect January 1, ((2011)) 2013.
Beginning in 2009, by December 31st of each year, the department shall
review and report on alternatives as described in subsection (2) of
this section. The prohibition in subsection (2) of this section takes
effect two years after a report submitted to the legislature required
under subsection (2)(d) of this section finds that a safer and
technically feasible alternative that meets applicable fire safety
standards is available.

--- END ---