BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.86.010.
(2) "Rebate" means an offer to provide cash, credit, or credit
towards future purchases, that is offered to consumers who acquire or
purchase a specified product or service and that is conditioned upon
the customer submitting a request for redemption after satisfying the
terms and conditions of the offer. "Rebate" does not include: Any
discount from the purchase price that is taken at the time of purchase;
any discount, cash, credit, or credit towards a future purchase that is
automatically provided to a consumer without the need to submit a
request for redemption; or any refund that may be given to a consumer
in accordance with a company's return, guarantee, adjustment, or
warranty policies, or any company's frequent shopper customer reward
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person who offers a consumer rebate
shall allow a minimum of fourteen days from the date the consumer
purchases the product, or becomes eligible for the rebate upon
satisfying the terms and conditions of the offer, for the submission of
a request for redemption by the customer.
(2) Upon receipt of a request for redemption meeting the terms and
conditions of the rebate offer, the person offering or processing the
rebate shall transmit the rebate funds to the consumer within ninety
days.
(3) If a rebate is sent to a consumer as a check, the check must be
mailed in a manner that identifies the piece of mail as the expected
rebate check.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---