BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to adopt more
accurate and descriptive names for the components of the state funding
formula for the allotment of appropriations for school plant
facilities, as recommended by the joint legislative task force on
school construction funding, to promote clarity and transparency in the
funding formula. It is not the intent of this act to make substantive
changes to the funding formula or policies.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.230 and 2006 c 263 s 328 are each amended to
read as follows:
School districts shall be required to lease for a reasonable fee
vacant school plant facilities from a contiguous school district
wherever possible.
No school district with unhoused students may be eligible for
((the)) state ((matching funds)) funding assistance for the
construction of school plant facilities if:
(1) The school district contiguous to the school district applying
for the state ((matching)) funding assistance percentage has vacant
school plant facilities;
(2) The superintendent of public instruction has determined the
vacant school plant facilities available in the contiguous district
will fulfill the needs of the applicant district in housing unhoused
students. In determining whether the contiguous district school plant
facilities meet the needs of the applicant district, consideration
shall be given, but not limited to the geographic location of the
vacant facilities as they relate to the applicant district; and
(3) A lease of the vacant school plant facilities can be
negotiated.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.525.040 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.075 are each
amended to read as follows:
State ((matching funds)) funding assistance shall not be denied to
any school district undertaking any construction, repairs or
improvements for school district purposes solely on the ground that
said construction, repairs and improvements are in connection with
portable buildings or classrooms.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.525.090 and 2006 c 263 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy
recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel,
shall adopt rules for appropriate use of the following construction
management techniques: Value engineering, constructibility review,
building commissioning, and construction management. Rules adopted
under this section shall:
(a) Define each technique as it applies to school buildings;
(b) Describe the scope of work for each technique;
(c) Define the timing for implementing each technique in the
construction process;
(d) Determine the appropriate size of projects for the use of each
technique; and
(e) Determine standards for qualification and performance for each
technique.
(2) Except as provided in rules adopted under subsection (1)(d) of
this section, in allocating state moneys provided under this chapter,
the superintendent of public instruction shall include in funding for
each project, at the state ((matching)) funding assistance percentage,
the cost of each of the construction management techniques listed in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) When assigning priority and allocating state funds for
construction of common school facilities, the superintendent shall
consider the adequacy of the construction management techniques used by
a district and the compliance with the rules adopted under subsection
(1) of this section.
(4) Except as provided in rules adopted under subsection (1)(d) of
this section, the construction management techniques in subsection (1)
of this section shall be used on each project submitted for approval by
the superintendent.
(5)(a) School districts applying for state funding assistance for
school facilities shall:
(i) Cause value engineering, constructibility review, and building
commissioning to be performed by contract with a professional firm
specializing in those construction management techniques; and
(ii) Contract or employ personnel to perform professional
construction management.
(b) All recommendations from the value engineering and
constructibility review construction techniques for a school project
shall be presented to the school district's board of directors for
acceptance or rejection. If the board of directors rejects a
recommendation it shall provide a statement explaining the reasons for
rejecting the recommendation and include the statement in the
application for state funding assistance to the superintendent of
public instruction.
(6) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide:
(a) An information and training program for school districts on the
use of the construction management techniques; and
(b) Consulting services to districts on the benefits and best uses
of these construction management techniques.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.525.162 and 2006 c 263 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Funds appropriated to the superintendent of public instruction
from the common school construction fund shall be allotted by the
superintendent of public instruction in accordance with student
enrollment and the provisions of RCW 28A.525.200.
(2) No allotment shall be made to a school district until such
district has provided ((matching)) local funds equal to or greater than
the difference between the total approved project cost and the amount
of state funding assistance to the district for financing the project
computed pursuant to RCW 28A.525.166, with the following exceptions:
(a) The superintendent of public instruction may waive the
((matching)) local requirement for state funding assistance for
districts which have provided funds for school building construction
purposes through the authorization of bonds or through the
authorization of excess tax levies or both in an amount equivalent to
two and one-half percent of the value of its taxable property, as
defined in RCW 39.36.015.
(b) No such ((matching)) local funds shall be required as a
condition to the allotment of funds from the state for the purpose of
making major or minor structural changes to existing school facilities
in order to bring such facilities into compliance with the barrier free
access requirements of section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 706) and rules implementing the act.
(3) For the purpose of computing the state ((matching)) funding
assistance percentage under RCW 28A.525.166 when a school district is
granted authority to enter into contracts, adjusted valuation per pupil
shall be calculated using headcount student enrollments from the most
recent October enrollment reports submitted by districts to the
superintendent of public instruction, adjusted as follows:
(a) In the case of projects for which local bonds were approved
after May 11, 1989:
(i) For districts which have been designated as serving high school
districts under RCW 28A.540.110, students residing in the nonhigh
district so designating shall be excluded from the enrollment count if
the student is enrolled in any grade level not offered by the nonhigh
district;
(ii) The enrollment of nonhigh school districts shall be increased
by the number of students residing within the district who are enrolled
in a serving high school district so designated by the nonhigh school
district under RCW 28A.540.110, including only students who are
enrolled in grade levels not offered by the nonhigh school district;
and
(iii) The number of preschool students with disabilities included
in the enrollment count shall be multiplied by one-half;
(b) In the case of construction or modernization of high school
facilities in districts serving students from nonhigh school districts,
the adjusted valuation per pupil shall be computed using the combined
adjusted valuations and enrollments of each district, each weighted by
the percentage of the district's resident high school students served
by the high school district; and
(c) The number of kindergarten students included in the enrollment
count shall be multiplied by one-half.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction, considering policy
recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel,
shall prescribe such rules as are necessary to equate insofar as
possible the efforts made by school districts to provide capital funds
by the means aforesaid.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "preschool students with
disabilities" means ((developmentally disabled)) children of preschool
age who have developmental disabilities who are entitled to services
under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100 and are not included in the
kindergarten enrollment count of the district.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.525.166 and 2006 c 263 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
Allocations to school districts of state funds provided by RCW
28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be made by the superintendent of
public instruction and the amount of state funding assistance to a
school district in financing a school plant project shall be determined
in the following manner:
(1) The boards of directors of the districts shall determine the
total cost of the proposed project, which cost may include the cost of
acquiring and preparing the site, the cost of constructing the building
or of acquiring a building and preparing the same for school use, the
cost of necessary equipment, taxes chargeable to the project, necessary
architects' fees, and a reasonable amount for contingencies and for
other necessary incidental expenses: PROVIDED, That the total cost of
the project shall be subject to review and approval by the
superintendent.
(2) The state ((matching)) funding assistance percentage for a
school district shall be computed by the following formula:
The ratio of the school district's adjusted valuation per pupil
divided by the ratio of the total state adjusted valuation per pupil
shall be subtracted from three, and then the result of the foregoing
shall be divided by three plus (the ratio of the school district's
adjusted valuation per pupil divided by the ratio of the total state
adjusted valuation per pupil).

District adjusted Total state

3-valuation ÷ adjusted valuation State

Computed per pupil per pupil Funding

State
- % Assistance

Ratio District adjusted Total state

3+valuation ÷ adjusted valuation

per pupil per pupil

PROVIDED, That in the event the state funding assistance percentage
((of state assistance)) to any school district based on the above
formula is less than twenty percent and such school district is
otherwise eligible for state funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.162
through 28A.525.180, the superintendent may establish for such district
a state funding assistance percentage ((of state assistance)) not in
excess of twenty percent of the approved cost of the project, if the
superintendent finds that such additional assistance is necessary to
provide minimum facilities for housing the pupils of the district.
(3) In addition to the computed ((percent of state assistance))
state funding assistance percentage developed in subsection (2) of this
section, a school district shall be entitled to additional percentage
points determined by the average percentage of growth for the past
three years. One percent shall be added to the computed ((percent of
state assistance)) state funding assistance percentage for each percent
of growth, with a maximum of twenty percent.
(4) The approved cost of the project determined in the manner
prescribed in this section multiplied by the state funding assistance
percentage ((of state assistance)) derived as provided for in this
section shall be the amount of state funding assistance to the district
for the financing of the project: PROVIDED, That need therefor has
been established to the satisfaction of the superintendent: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That additional state funding assistance may be allowed if it
is found by the superintendent, considering policy recommendations from
the school facilities citizen advisory panel that such assistance is
necessary in order to meet (a) a school housing emergency resulting
from the destruction of a school building by fire, the condemnation of
a school building by properly constituted authorities, a sudden
excessive and clearly foreseeable future increase in school population,
or other conditions similarly emergent in nature; or (b) a special
school housing burden resulting from industrial projects of statewide
significance or imposed by virtue of the admission of nonresident
students into educational programs established, maintained and operated
in conformity with the requirements of law; or (c) a deficiency in the
capital funds of the district resulting from financing, subsequent to
April 1, 1969, and without benefit of the state funding assistance
provided by prior state assistance programs, the construction of a
needed school building project or projects approved in conformity with
the requirements of such programs, after having first applied for and
been denied state funding assistance because of the inadequacy of state
funds available for the purpose, or (d) a condition created by the fact
that an excessive number of students live in state owned housing, or
(e) a need for the construction of a school building to provide for
improved school district organization or racial balance, or (f)
conditions similar to those defined under (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e)
of this subsection, creating a like emergency.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.525.168 and 2006 c 263 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the voters of a school district authorize the issuance of
bonds and/or the levying of excess taxes in an amount sufficient to
meet the requirements of RCW 28A.525.162 respecting eligibility for
state funding assistance in providing school facilities, the taxable
valuation of the district and the state funding assistance percentage
((of state assistance)) in providing school facilities prevailing at
the time of such authorization shall be the valuation and the
percentage used for the purpose of determining the eligibility of the
district for an allotment of state funds and the amount or amounts of
such allotments, respectively, for all projects for which the voters
authorize capital funds as aforesaid, unless a higher state funding
assistance percentage ((of state assistance)) prevails on the date that
state funds for assistance in financing a project are allotted by the
superintendent of public instruction in which case the percentage
prevailing on the date of allotment by the superintendent of funds for
each project shall govern: PROVIDED, That if the superintendent of
public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school
facilities citizen advisory panel, determines at any time that there
has been undue or unwarranted delay on the part of school district
authorities in advancing a project to the point of readiness for an
allotment of state funds, the taxable valuation of the school district
and the state funding assistance percentage ((of state assistance))
prevailing on the date that the allotment is made shall be used for the
purposes aforesaid: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the date specified in this
section as applicable in determining the eligibility of an individual
school district for state funding assistance and in determining the
amount of such assistance shall be applicable also to cases where it is
necessary in administering chapter 28A.540 RCW to determine eligibility
for and the amount of state funding assistance for a group of school
districts considered as a single school administrative unit.

--- END ---