BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced diagnostic imaging services" means magnetic resonance
imaging services, computed tomography services, positron emission
tomography services, and cardiac nuclear medicine services.
(2) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Payor" means public purchasers and carriers licensed under
chapters 48.21, 48.41, 48.44, 48.46, and 48.62 RCW.
(4) "Public purchaser" means the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the department of labor and
industries, the authority, and the Washington state health insurance
pool.
(5) "State purchased health care" has the same meaning as in RCW
41.05.011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The speaker of the house of
representatives and the majority leader of the senate shall convene a
work group to analyze and identify nationally accepted best practice
guidelines or protocols applicable to advanced diagnostic imaging
services and any decision and support tools available to implement the
guidelines or protocols.
(2) The work group shall consist of the following members appointed
jointly by the speaker of the house and the majority leader of the
senate:
(a) One member of the authority's health technology clinical
committee;
(b) One representative of the Washington state medical association;
(c) One representative of the Washington state radiological
society;
(d) One representative of the Puget Sound health alliance; and
(e) One representative of the Washington health care forum.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) No later than November 15, 2009, identify nationally accepted
best practice guidelines or protocols applicable to advanced diagnostic
imaging services, and decision and support tools to implement the
guidelines or protocols, to be used by all state purchased health care
programs. When identifying the guidelines or protocols, the work group
may consult with organizations such as the Minnesota institute for
clinical systems improvement; and
(b) Explore the feasibility of mandating the use of the guidelines
or protocols for all payors in the state by January 1, 2011, for the
reimbursement of advanced diagnostic imaging services.
(4) Staff support to the work group shall be provided by the office
of program research and senate committee services.
(5) The expenses of the work group shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Work group expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(6) The work group shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later
than November 15, 2009.
(7) The work group shall expire on January 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 No later than January 1, 2010, the authority
shall implement for all state purchased health care programs the
nationally accepted best practice guidelines or protocols applicable to
advanced diagnostic imaging services, and the decision and support
tools to implement the guidelines or protocols, identified under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Any current or future time frames,
procedures, rules, regulations, or guidance regarding accreditation
requirements for advanced diagnostic imaging services established in,
or promulgated pursuant to, section 135(a) of the medicare improvements
for patients and providers act of 2008, shall also be applicable to any
person or entity in this state not already subject to its provisions
that receives payment for the furnishing of the technical component of
advanced diagnostic imaging services as defined under that act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---