BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to the entities listed in RCW 41.56.020, this chapter
applies to full-time and part-time University of Washington extension
lecturers in English language programs holding annual and quarterly
contracts.

--- END ---