BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of the legislature is that all
corrections personnel employed by the Washington department of
corrections are prepared to carry out the demands of their position
that they are likely to encounter during their daily duties. The
protection of the public, department employees, and inmates are a
primary reason to ensure that everyone is adequately trained and
knowledgeable in routine and emergency procedures.
To best carry out this mission it is necessary for the Washington
state department of corrections to have the authority, discretion, and
ability to design and conduct mandatory training that best meets the
needs of its changing offender population.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.101.220 and 2007 c 382 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The corrections personnel of the state and all counties and
municipal corporations initially employed on or after January 1, 1982,
shall engage in basic corrections training which complies with
standards adopted by the commission. The training shall be
successfully completed during the first six months of employment of the
personnel, unless otherwise extended or waived by the commission, and
shall be requisite to the continuation of employment.
(2) The commission shall provide the training required in this
section, together with facilities, supplies, materials, and the room
and board for noncommuting attendees.
(3)(a) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the
Washington state department of corrections prisons division. The
Washington state department of corrections is responsible for
identifying training standards, designing curricula and programs, and
providing the training for those corrections personnel employed by it.
In doing so, the secretary of the department of corrections shall
consult with staff development experts and correctional professionals
both inside and outside of the agency, to include soliciting input from
labor organizations.
(b) The commission and the department of corrections share the
responsibility of developing and defining training standards and
providing training for community corrections officers employed within
the community corrections division of the department of corrections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All new corrections personnel employed by the Washington state
department of corrections shall, within a period to be determined by
the secretary of the department of corrections, successfully complete
core training requirements prescribed or obtain a waiver or extension
of the core training requirements from the secretary.
(2) Within a period to be determined by the secretary of the
Washington state department of corrections after completion of the core
training requirements of this section, corrections personnel employed
by the department shall successfully complete all remaining
requirements for career level certification prescribed by the secretary
applicable to their position or rank, or obtain a waiver or extension
of the career level training requirements from the secretary.
(3) The secretary of the department of corrections is responsible
for assuring that the training needs of the corrections personnel are
met by the department's training program. Once a year, the secretary
is responsible for conducting an assessment of the training programs
for the corrections personnel employed by the department.

--- END ---