BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.80.060 and 2007 c 307 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No electrical company may enter into a long-term financial
commitment unless the baseload electric generation supplied under such
a long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse gases
emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040.
(2) In order to enforce the requirements of this chapter, the
commission shall review in a general rate case or as provided in
subsection (5) of this section any long-term financial commitment
entered into by an electrical company after June 30, 2008, to determine
whether the baseload electric generation to be supplied under that
long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse gases
emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040.
(3) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for
baseload electric generation, the commission shall consider the design
of the power plant and its intended use, based upon the electricity
purchase contract, if any, permits necessary for the operation of the
power plant, and any other matter the commission determines is relevant
under the circumstances.
(4) Upon application by an electric utility, the commission may
provide a case-by-case exemption from the greenhouse gases emissions
performance standard to address: (a) Unanticipated electric system
reliability needs; or (b) catastrophic events or threat of significant
financial harm that may arise from unforeseen circumstances.
(5) Upon application by an electrical company, the commission shall
determine whether the company's proposed decision to acquire electric
generation or enter into a power purchase agreement for electricity
complies with the greenhouse gases emissions performance standard
established under RCW 80.80.040((, whether the company has a need for
the resource, and whether the specific resource selected is
appropriate. The commission shall take into consideration factors such
as the company's forecasted loads, need for energy, power plant
technology, expected costs, and other associated investment
decisions)). The commission shall not decide in a proceeding under
this subsection (5) issues involving the actual costs to construct and
operate the selected resource, cost recovery, or other issues reserved
by the commission for decision in a general rate case or other
proceeding for recovery of the resource or contract costs. ((A
proceeding under this subsection (5) shall be conducted pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW (part IV). The commission shall adopt rules to
provide that the schedule for a proceeding under this subsection takes
into account both (a) the needs of the parties to the proposed resource
acquisition or power purchase agreement for timely decisions that allow
transactions to be completed; and (b) the procedural rights to be
provided to parties in chapter 34.05 RCW (part IV), including
intervention, discovery, briefing, and hearing.))
(6) An electrical company may account for and defer for later
consideration by the commission costs incurred in connection with
((the)) a long-term financial commitment, including operating and
maintenance costs, depreciation, taxes, and cost of invested capital.
The deferral begins with the date on which the power plant begins
commercial operation or the effective date of the power purchase
agreement and continues for a period not to exceed twenty-four months;
provided that if during such period the company files a general rate
case or other proceeding for the recovery of such costs, deferral ends
on the effective date of the final decision by the commission in such
proceeding. Creation of such a deferral account does not by itself
determine the actual costs of the long-term financial commitment,
whether recovery of any or all of these costs is appropriate, or other
issues to be decided by the commission in a general rate case or other
proceeding for recovery of these costs. For the purpose of this
subsection (6) only, the term "long-term financial commitment" also
includes an electric company's ownership or power purchase agreement
with a term of five or more years associated with an eligible renewable
resource as defined in RCW 19.285.030.
(7) The commission shall consult with the department to apply the
procedures adopted by the department to verify the emissions of
greenhouse gases from baseload electric generation under RCW 80.80.040.
The department shall report to the commission whether baseload electric
generation will comply with the greenhouse gases emissions performance
standard for the duration of the period the baseload electric
generation is supplied to the electrical company.
(8) The commission shall adopt rules for the enforcement of this
section with respect to electrical companies and adopt procedural rules
for approving costs incurred by an electrical company under subsection
(4) of this section.
(9) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section by December 31, 2008.

--- END ---