BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.710 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on ((the thirtieth day before)) the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or
acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may solicit or
accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions
received through the mail on or after ((the thirtieth day before)) the
date a regular legislative session convenes may be accepted if the
contribution is postmarked prior to ((the thirtieth day before)) the
date the session convenes.
(2) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

--- END ---