BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.205 and 2007 c 415 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Applications for licensure shall require, at a minimum, the
following information:
(((1))) (a) The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of
operation for carrying out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a
license;
(((2))) (b) The character, suitability, and competence of an agency
and other persons associated with an agency directly responsible for
the care of children;
(((3))) (c) The number of qualified persons required to render the
type of care for which an agency seeks a license;
(((4))) (d) The health, safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy
of the premises to provide for the comfort, care, and well-being of
children;
(((5))) (e) The provision of necessary care and early learning,
including food, supervision, and discipline; physical, mental, and
social well-being; and educational and recreational opportunities for
those served;
(((6))) (f) The financial ability of an agency to comply with
minimum requirements established under this chapter; and
(((7))) (g) The maintenance of records pertaining to the care of
children.
(2) The intent of the legislature is to improve the health, safety,
learning, and well-being of the child in Washington state licensed
child care by:
(a) Establishing preservice training and education requirements in
the child care industry for persons applying to be granted a child care
license in family home child care, center child care, and/or school age
program child care;
(b) Giving support and resources to the more than ten thousand
child care businesses in Washington state, many of which are
established without previous business experience;
(c) Establishing preservice training requirements for child care
center owners, child care center directors, school age program
directors, other program supervisors and/or managers, and licensed
family child care providers who will improve management and personnel
practices and enhance their chances of having a successful business
that provides a safe and positive environment for children;
(d) Having owners, directors, program managers, and program
supervisors who are highly trained in the provision of quality child
care and who improve the child care profession; and providing that
those with decision-making power have the highest of levels of training
and competency;
(e) Understanding that a statistically significant link exists
between a child's receipt of high quality care from adults, especially
in a child's early years, and avoidance of risk factors associated with
social and educational failure;
(f) Understanding that a statistically significant link exists
between a child's receipt of high quality care from adults and
avoidance of risk factors associated with injury, disability, and
death;
(g) Acknowledging and using important small business resources in
Washington state such as the small business administration, SCORE
counselors to America's small businesses chapters, and other small
business resources;
(h) Defining preservice training as completing and having
certification and/or documentation for the following requirements:
(i) Attending a six-hour orientation class given by the department,
including but not limited to training on the public disclosure law, on
the criminal history search and on the state's computer systems that
hold character, competence, and suitability data used by the department
to assess whether to approve applicants to be licensed or others
associated with the license to be in contact with and work with
children; and how applicants can access that information in order to
prepare their business plans;
(ii) Training on and completion of a business plan using the small
business association, SCORE counselors to America's small businesses
chapters, or other small business resources; requiring a letter of
confirmation that the business plan was completed at the time the
application is submitted to the department, but not making it a
requirement for the business plan to be submitted because it is an
assessment tool for the applicant to decide whether setting up a child
care business is feasible for them and/or their families (in the case
of home care);
(iii) Adult/child/infant CPR card;
(iv) Basic standard first aid card;
(v) Food handler's card;
(vi) HIV/AIDS training card;
(vii) Bloodborne pathogens training card;
(viii) Safety hazards identification in child care facilities
training;
(ix) Tuberculosis testing and clearance to work around children;
(x) Poison control training;
(xi) Sewage, water, lead, blind cords, water hazards, toxic
hazards, choking hazards, and soil safety training;
(xii) Fire safety and fire drill training;
(xiii) A class of a minimum of two hours in child abuse mandatory
reporting law;
(xiv) Nutritional training;
(xv) Review and study of chapter 43.215 RCW and chapters 170-295,
170-296, and 170-151 WAC; and
(xvi) Forty hours of early childhood education, with twenty of
those hours to interface with and join the following subject matter
together:
(A) Setting up the physical learning and play environments indoors
and outdoors at the facility;
(B) Learning and play materials for indoor and outdoor learning;
(C) Identification of the individual characteristics of children
from birth through twelve years old, including child development,
social/emotional development, intellectual development, and the
acquisition of meaningful and useful academic skills;
(D) Learning the newest early childhood education theories of
constructivist versus instructivist, and what that means for children
and those teaching children;
(E) Learning the history and concepts of how one learns to read;
(F) Guidance tools, knowledge, and techniques that are kind and
supportive within a comforting structure of routines, and play for
children in care from birth through age twelve years old; and
(G) Supervision of children and the reduction of injury in child
care settings training.
(i) Having applicants submit their names, addresses, phone numbers,
and if applicable, the web site of the trainers for the requirement in
(h)(xv) of this subsection, which will enable the state through
research means to track the quality of training that is given and make
changes as required to meet the goal of improving child care;
(j) Having owners, directors, program managers, and program
supervisors who are highly trained in the provision of quality child
care by completing (h)(i) thru (h)(xv) of this subsection will improve
the child care profession; that those with decision-making power have
the highest of levels of training and competency in order to train and
guide the staff they hire for their facilities;
(k) Having owners, directors, program managers, supervisors, and
family home child care providers complete preservice requirements prior
to issuance of the license;
(l) Having child care staff complete training requirements in
(h)(iii) through (h)(xv) of this subsection; that with child care
owners, directors, program managers, and supervisors having received
the training, their own on-site training can be started immediately
when new staff start; documentation will be kept on the training of
their staff;
(m) Owners, directors, managers, supervisors, and family home
providers having a checklist for new employees to fill out as to their
present level of training areas; and having a plan made to complete the
requirements in (h)(iii) through (h)(xv) of this subsection, but no
longer than three months from the start date; with training on
supervision, safety hazard identification, behavior guidance, and child
development characteristics that tie into behavior guidance be done in
the first week of employment; that the training on child guidance be
through role modeling by educated and experienced staff; and
(n) Having child care owners, directors, program managers,
supervisors, and caregiver staff conduct a yearly review of what
training made an improvement in the child care program and to identify
the areas that training is needed, which will then be reported back to
the department to further find resources or ideas to continue the
improvement of child care in Washington state.

--- END ---