BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 is provided
for sales to qualifying businesses of server equipment, to be
installed, in an eligible computer data center, and for sales of labor
and services rendered in respect to installing such server equipment.
The exemption also applies to the sales of temperature and climate
control infrastructure and power infrastructure, including labor and
services rendered in respect to constructing, installing, repairing,
altering, or improving such infrastructure.
(2)(a) A person claiming the exemption under this section must
present the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files. A seller's failure to retain a
copy of the certificate does not disqualify the buyer's exemption
claim.
(b) In order to claim the exemption under this act, a qualifying
business must submit an application to the department. The application
must include the information necessary, as required by the department,
to determine that a business qualifies for the exemption under this
act. The department must issue a decision on the application within
ninety days of receipt. If the department fails to issue a decision,
the application for the exemption is deemed to have been approved.
(c) In the event that the person claiming the exemption did not
claim the exemption in advance of the first qualifying purchase and
paid the vendor the sales tax, the department must accept an
application after the purchase for purposes of refunding the sales tax
paid on the equipment and services described in subsection (1) of this
section. The department must issue a decision on the application
within ninety days of receipt. If the department fails to issue a
decision, the application for the exemption is deemed to have been
approved.
(3) A person who claims an exemption under this section must make
an annual report to the department.
(a) This report must include:
(i) Information detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided
health and retirement benefits per job;
(ii) Employment by the number of full-time and part-time positions;
and
(iii) The cost of qualifying expenditures for the eligible computer
data center.
(b) The first report filed under this subsection must include
employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month period
immediately before the installation of any equipment described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(c) Subsequent reports are due by March 31st following the year the
eligible computer data center is first placed in commercial service or
in the case of a computer data center placed into commercial service
prior to the effective date of this act, then the report is due by
March 31st following the year of the installation of any equipment
described in subsection (1) of this section. The report must be filed
annually for the period the eligible computer data center, or the
equipment described in subsection (1) of this section that was
installed in a computer data center existing prior to the effective
date of this act, remains in commercial service.
(d) Employment, wage, and benefit information is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(4) If a person fails to fulfill the requirements of this section,
the department must declare the amount of taxes exempted under this
section immediately due and payable. However, the department may not
declare the amount of taxes immediately due and payable if the failure
was the result of illness, death, natural disasters, or unforeseen
computer system failures. Excise taxes payable under this section are
subject to interest, as provided under this chapter. Requirements
under this section exclusively include:
(a) The person must submit an annual report as required by
subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The person must increase employment in the state by a minimum
of thirty-five family wage jobs no later than six years after the
installation of equipment of the computer data center. For purposes of
the report required by this section, family wage jobs are new permanent
employment positions requiring forty hours of weekly work, or their
equivalent, on a full-time basis and paying a wage equivalent to or
greater than one hundred fifty percent of the per capita personal
income of the county in which the qualified project is located. The
person must provide health insurance coverage for the employee.
This requirement does not apply to existing computer data centers
if the equipment and services are those described in subsection (1) of
this section and are for the purpose of refreshing, maintaining, or
replacing existing equipment due to changes in technology,
obsolescence, or defect.
(c) No later than six years following the date the eligible
computer data center begins to provide commercial service, or the date
the installation of the equipment is final, the person must document
qualifying expenditures equal to or exceeding two hundred million
dollars.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Commercial service" means the point at which the equipment
described in subsection (1) of this section becomes operational for its
intended purposes and excludes testing or other activities in
preparation for the same to become operational.
(b) "Computer data center" means a facility comprised of one or
more buildings constructed or refurbished specifically, and used
primarily, to house servers and related equipment and support staff,
where the facility has the following characteristics:
(i) Uninterruptible power supplies, generator backup power, or
both;
(ii) Sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and
(iii) Enhanced physical security, such as: (A) Restricted access
to the facility to selected personnel; (B) permanent security guards;
video camera surveillance; or an electronic system requiring passcodes,
keycards, or biometric scans, such as hand scans and retinal or
fingerprint recognition; or (C) security features similar to those in
(b)(iii)(A) and (B) of this subsection (5). A computer data center
includes, but is not limited to, a web search portal business.
(c) "Store or manage electronic data" includes, but is not limited
to: Providing data storage and backup services, providing computer
processing power, and hosting enterprise software applications. The
term also includes hosting web sites that provide free or subscription
services such as e-mail, web browsing and searching, media
applications, and other related online services.
(d) "Eligible computer data center" means a physical location in
the state consisting of a single parcel of real property or adjacent
parcels of real property owned by the same taxpayer, acquired or
improved through construction of a computer data center with at least
twenty thousand square feet of floor space dedicated to housing working
servers and located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370(5).
(e) "Installation of equipment" means when the first piece of
equipment described in subsection (1) of this section is installed at
the site and ordering the equipment, preparing the equipment for
installation, or other activities in preparation for the installation
of such equipment.
(f) "Power infrastructure" means all fixtures, equipment, and
facilities necessary for the transformation, distribution, or
management of electricity at an eligible data center. The term
includes, but is not limited to, exterior taxpayer-owned electrical
substations, generators, wiring, back-up power generation systems,
battery systems, and related infrastructure and cogeneration equipment.
(g)(i) "Qualifying business" means a business entity that: Exists
for the primary purpose of engaging in commercial activity for profit;
and purchases server equipment, power infrastructure, or temperature
and climate control infrastructure on or after July 1, 2011, for use in
a computer data center.
(ii) For purposes of this definition, "business entity" means a
corporation, other than a municipal, quasi-municipal, and public or
other corporation created by the state or federal government, tribal
government, municipality, or political subdivision of the state;
association; limited liability company; partnership, including general
partnership, limited partnership, and limited liability partnership; or
other legal entity. Consistent with this definition, "business entity"
does not include the state or federal government or any of their
departments, agencies, and institutions; tribal governments; and
political subdivisions of this state.
(h) "Qualifying expenditure" means an investment in real and
personal property of two hundred million dollars for capital expenses
including, but not limited to, land acquisition, preparation, and
improvement, facility design, engineering and construction, and
installation of server equipment, temperature and climate control
infrastructure, and power infrastructure. Expenditures made prior to
July 1, 2011, are deemed qualifying expenditures for purposes of
determining eligibility of a computer data center for the exemption
offered under this chapter.
(i) "Server" includes:
(i) Blade or rack-mount servers and means a computer that is used
in a computer data center solely to store or manage electronic data, to
provide internet access, navigation, or search functions for the owner
or lessee of the computer data center, or for clients of the owner or
lessee of the computer data center, or both; or
(ii) Computers used for research and development to support
capabilities to store or manage electronic data or provide internet
access, navigation, or search functions.
(j) "Server equipment" means the server chassis and all computer
hardware and software contained within the server chassis. Consistent
with this definition, "server equipment" includes the racks upon which
the server chassis is installed, cables, and computer peripherals such
as keyboards, monitors, printers, mice, and other devices that work
outside of the computer.
(k) "Temperature and climate control infrastructure" means all
fixtures, equipment, and facilities necessary for controlling the
temperature and humidity at an eligible computer data center. The term
includes heating, ventilation, and air conditioning fixtures and
equipment; cooling systems; cooling towers; temperature sensors;
humidity sensors; fans; and perforated floor tiles.
(l) "Web search portal business" means an entity among whose
primary business is to provide a content and search portal to organize
information; to access, search, or navigate the internet, including
researching or developing technologies to support capabilities to
organize information; and to provide internet access, navigation, and
search functionalities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption from the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 is provided
for sales to qualifying businesses of server equipment, to be
installed, in an eligible computer data center, and to charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such server
equipment. The exemption also applies to the sales of temperature and
climate control infrastructure and power infrastructure, including
labor and services rendered in respect to constructing, installing,
repairing, altering, or improving such infrastructure. However, this
exemption does not apply if the server equipment is withdrawn from an
eligible computer data center and not reused in an eligible computer
data center. Such item must be taxed at its fair market value at the
time of first taxable use in Washington.
(2) In order to claim the exemption under this act, a qualifying
business must submit an application to the department. The application
must include the information necessary, as required by the department,
to determine that a business qualifies for the exemption under this
act. The department must issue a decision on the application within
ninety days of its receipt. If the department fails to issue a
decision, the application for the exemption is deemed to have been
approved.
(3) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.
(4) If a person fails to fulfill the requirements of section 1 of
this act, all taxes exempt under this section become immediately due
and payable. Excise taxes payable under this section are subject to
interest, as provided under this chapter.

--- END ---