BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.30.140 and 2008 c 217 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except to the extent provided for in an applicable filing with
the commissioner then in effect, no insurer, insurance producer, or
title insurance agent shall, as an inducement to insurance, or after
insurance has been effected, directly or indirectly, offer, promise,
allow, give, set off, or pay to the insured or to any employee of the
insured, any rebate, discount, abatement, or reduction of premium or
any part thereof named in any insurance contract, or any commission
thereon, or earnings, profits, dividends, or other benefit, or any
other valuable consideration or inducement whatsoever which is not
expressly provided for in the policy.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply as to
commissions paid to a licensed insurance producer, or title insurance
agent for insurance placed on that person's own property or risks.
(3) This section shall not apply to the allowance by any marine
insurer, or marine insurance producer, to any insured, in connection
with marine insurance, of such discount as is sanctioned by custom
among marine insurers as being additional to the insurance producer's
commission.
(4) This section shall not apply to advertising or promotional
programs conducted by insurers, insurance producers, or title insurance
agents whereby prizes, goods, wares, or merchandise, not exceeding
twenty-five dollars in value per person in the aggregate in any twelve
month period, are given to all insureds or prospective insureds under
similar qualifying circumstances.
(5) This section does not apply to an offset or reimbursement of
all or part of a fee paid to an insurance producer as provided in RCW
48.17.270.
(6)(a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to
prohibit a health carrier or disability insurer from including as part
of a health benefit plan or contract containing health benefits, a
wellness program which meets the requirements of the health insurance
portability and accountability act (P.L. 104-191; 110 Stat. 1936) and
regulations adopted pursuant to that act.
(b) For purposes of this subsection: (i) "Health carrier" and
"health benefit plan" have the same meaning as provided in RCW
48.43.005; and (ii) "wellness program" has the same meaning as provided
in 45 CFR 146.121(f).

Sec. 2 RCW 48.30.150 and 2008 c 217 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No insurer, insurance producer, title insurance agent, or other
person shall, as an inducement to insurance, or in connection with any
insurance transaction, provide in any policy for, or offer, or sell,
buy, or offer or promise to buy or give, or promise, or allow to, or on
behalf of, the insured or prospective insured in any manner whatsoever:
(((1))) (a) Any shares of stock or other securities issued or at
any time to be issued on any interest therein or rights thereto; or
(((2))) (b) Any special advisory board contract, or other contract,
agreement, or understanding of any kind, offering, providing for, or
promising any profits or special returns or special dividends; or
(((3))) (c) Any prizes, goods, wares, or merchandise of an
aggregate value in excess of twenty-five dollars.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit
the sale or purchase of securities as a condition to or in connection
with surety insurance insuring the performance of an obligation as part
of a plan of financing found by the commissioner to be designed and
operated in good faith primarily for the purpose of such financing, nor
shall it be deemed to prohibit the sale of redeemable securities of a
registered investment company in the same transaction in which life
insurance is sold.
(3)(a) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to
prohibit a health carrier or disability insurer from including as part
of a health benefit plan or contract providing health benefits, a
wellness program which meets the requirements of the health insurance
portability and accountability act (P.L. 104-191; 110 Stat. 1936) and
regulations adopted pursuant to that act.
(b) For purposes of this subsection: (i) "Health carrier" and
"health benefit plan" have the same meaning as provided in RCW
48.43.005; and (ii) "wellness program" has the same meaning as provided
in 45 CFR 146.121(f).

--- END ---