BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.06.015 and 2007 c 107 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of unimproved residential real
property, the seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the
right to receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or
unless the transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to
the buyer a completed seller disclosure statement in the following
format and that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If
necessary, use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, or access limitations that
may affect the Buyer's use of the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any study, survey project,
or notice that would adversely affect the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any pending or existing
assessments against the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Are there any zoning violations,
nonconforming uses, or any unusual
restrictions on the property that would
affect future construction or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Is there a boundary survey for the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions which affect
the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Does the property have potable
water supply?

(2) If yes, the source of water for the
property is:

[ ] Private or publicly owned water
system

[ ] Private well serving only the
property

*[ ] Other water system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *If shared, are there any written
agreements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Is there an easement (recorded or
unrecorded) for access to and/or
maintenance of the water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(4) Are there any known problems or
repairs needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (5) Is there a connection or hook-up
charge payable before the property can
be connected to the water main?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (6) Have you obtained a certificate of
water availability from the water
purveyor serving the property? (If yes,
please attach a copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (7) Is there a water right permit,
certificate, or claim associated with
household water supply for the
property? (If yes, please attach a copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (a) If yes, has the water right permit,
certificate, or claim been assigned,
transferred, or changed?

(b) If yes, has all or any portion of the
water right not been used for five or
more successive years? (If yes, please
explain.)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (c) If no or don't know, is the water
withdrawn from the water source less
than 5,000 gallons a day?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(8) Are there any defects in the
operation of the water system (e.g.,
pipes, tank, pump, etc.)?

B. Irrigation Water

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any irrigation water rights
for the property, such as a water right
permit, certificate, or claim? (If yes,
please attach a copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (a) If yes, has all or any portion of the
water right not been used for five or
more successive years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (b) If yes, has the water right permit,
certificate, or claim been assigned,
transferred, or changed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) Does the property receive irrigation
water from a ditch company, irrigation
district, or other entity? If so, please
identify the entity that supplies
irrigation water to the property:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler system
for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) If yes, are there any defects in the
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If yes, is the sprinkler system
connected to irrigation water?

3. SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A. The property is served by:
[ ] Public sewer system
[ ] On-site sewage system (including
pipes, tanks, drainfields, and all other
component parts)
[ ] Other disposal system, please
describe:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Is the property subject to any
sewage system fees or charges in
addition to those covered in your
regularly billed sewer or on-site sewage
system maintenance service?

C. If the property is connected to an
on-site sewage system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) Was a permit issued for its
construction?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Was it approved by the local
health department or district following
its construction?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (3) Is the septic system a pressurized
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) Is the septic system a gravity
system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(5) Have there been any changes or
repairs to the on-site sewage system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (6) Is the on-site sewage system,
including the drainfield, located entirely
within the boundaries of the property?
If no, please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (7) Does the on-site sewage system
require monitoring and maintenance
services more frequently than once a
year? If yes, please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

4. ELECTRICAL/GAS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is the property served by natural
gas?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Is there a connection charge for gas?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Is the property served by electricity?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Is there a connection charge for
electricity?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know E. Are there any electrical problems on
the property? If yes, please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

5. FLOODING

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Are there any flooding, standing
water, or drainage problems on the
property or affecting access to the
property? If yes, please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Is the property located in a
government designated flood zone or
floodplain?

6. SOIL STABILITY

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Are there any settlement, earth
movement, slides, or similar soil
problems on the property? If yes,
please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Does any part of the property
contain fill dirt, waste, or other fill
material? If yes, please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

7. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any drainage
problems on the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does the property contain fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive
soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products on the property
that may be environmental concerns,
such as asbestos, formaldehyde, radon
gas, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical
storage tanks, or contaminated soil or
water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used for
commercial or industrial purposes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there transmission poles,
transformers, or other utility equipment
installed, maintained, or buried on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any radio towers in the
area that may cause interference with
telephone reception?

8. HOMEOWNERS'
ASSOCIATION/COMMON
INTERESTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a homeowners' association?
Name of association and contact
information for an officer, director,
employee, or other authorized agent, if
any, who may provide the association's
financial statements, minutes, bylaws,
fining policy, and other information that
is not publicly available:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year

[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared "common
areas" or any joint maintenance
agreements (facilities such as walls,
fences, landscaping, pools, tennis
courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with
others)?

9. OTHER FACTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Are there any disagreements,
disputes, encroachments, or legal
actions concerning the property? If yes,
please explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Does the property have any plants
or wildlife that are designated as
species ((or [of])) of concern, or listed
as threatened or endangered by the
government?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Is the property classified or
designated as forest land or open space?
If so, specify:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Do you have a forest management
plan? If yes, attach.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know E. Have any development-related
permit applications been submitted to
any government agencies? If so,
specify:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

If the answer to E is "yes," what is the
status or outcome of those applications?

. . . . . . . . . . . .

10. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY BE
OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS NOTICE
IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN THIS
INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller
and not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

Sec. 2 RCW 64.06.020 and 2007 c 107 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a transaction for the sale of improved residential real
property, the seller shall, unless the buyer has expressly waived the
right to receive the disclosure statement under RCW 64.06.010, or
unless the transfer is otherwise exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to
the buyer a completed seller disclosure statement in the following
format and that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER
Please complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If
the question clearly does not apply to the property write "NA." If the
answer is "yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets.
Please refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide
your explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each
page of this disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the
disclosure statement must occur not later than five business days,
unless otherwise agreed, after mutual acceptance of a written contract
to purchase between a buyer and a seller.

NOTICE TO THE BUYER
THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY SELLER ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE
PROPERTY LOCATED AT . . . . . . . . . . . .
("THE PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES OF EXISTING MATERIAL FACTS OR
MATERIAL DEFECTS TO BUYER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE
PROPERTY AT THE TIME SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT.
UNLESS YOU AND SELLER OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, YOU HAVE THREE
BUSINESS DAYS FROM THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO YOU TO RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A
SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S
AGENT. IF THE SELLER DOES NOT GIVE YOU A COMPLETED DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT, THEN YOU MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER
THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE AGREEMENT.

THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS
INFORMATION IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF
ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER.

FOR A MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS
PROPERTY YOU ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF
QUALIFIED EXPERTS TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE, WITHOUT
LIMITATION, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS,
ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, ON-SITE WASTEWATER
TREATMENT INSPECTORS, OR STRUCTURAL PEST INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE
BUYER AND SELLER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS
OF THE PROPERTY OR TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT
BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION, DEFECTS OR
WARRANTIES.

Seller . . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the property.

I. SELLER'S DISCLOSURES:

*If you answer "Yes" to a question with an asterisk (*), please explain your answer
and attach documents, if available and not otherwise publicly recorded. If necessary,
use an attached sheet.

1. TITLE

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Do you have legal authority to sell
the property? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Is title to the property subject to
any of the following?

(1) First right of refusal

(2) Option

(3) Lease or rental agreement

(4) Life estate?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any encroachments,
boundary agreements, or boundary
disputes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Is there a private road or easement
agreement for access to the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any rights-of-way,
easements, or access limitations that
may affect the Buyer's use of the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any written agreements
for joint maintenance of an easement or
right-of-way?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any study, survey project,
or notice that would adversely affect the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there any pending or existing
assessments against the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Are there any zoning violations,
nonconforming uses, or any unusual
restrictions on the property that would
affect future construction or
remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Is there a boundary survey for the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any covenants,
conditions, or restrictions which affect
the property?

2. WATER

A. Household Water

(1) The source of water for the
property is:
[ ] Private or publicly owned water
system
[ ] Private well serving only the
subject property . . . . . .
*[ ] Other water system

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *If shared, are there any written
agreements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) Is there an easement (recorded
or unrecorded) for access to and/or
maintenance of the water source?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any known problems
or repairs needed?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (4) During your ownership, has the
source provided an adequate
year-round supply of potable
water? If no, please explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(5) Are there any water treatment
systems for the property? If yes,
are they [ ]Leased [ ]Owned

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(6) Are there any water rights for
the property associated with its
domestic water supply, such as a
water right permit, certificate, or
claim?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (a) If yes, has the water right
permit, certificate, or claim been
assigned, transferred, or changed?

(b) If yes, has all or any portion of
the water right not been used for
five or more successive years? (If
yes, please explain.)

. . . . . . . . . . . .

B. Irrigation Water

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Are there any irrigation water
rights for the property, such as a
water right permit, certificate, or
claim?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(a) If yes, has all or any portion of
the water right not been used for
five or more successive years?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(b) If so, is the certificate
available? (If yes, please attach a
copy.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (c) If so, has the water right
permit, certificate, or claim been
assigned, transferred, or changed?
If so, explain:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) Does the property receive
irrigation water from a ditch
company, irrigation district, or
other entity? If so, please identify
the entity that supplies water to the
property:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

C. Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (1) Is there an outdoor sprinkler
system for the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know (2) If yes, are there any defects in
the system? . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) If yes, is the sprinkler system
connected to irrigation water?

3. SEWER/ON-SITE SEWAGE
SYSTEM

A. The property is served by:
[ ] Public sewer system,
[ ] On-site sewage system (including
pipes, tanks, drainfields, and all other
component parts)
[ ] Other disposal system, please
describe:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. If public sewer system service is
available to the property, is the house
connected to the sewer main? If no,
please explain.

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know C. Is the property subject to any
sewage system fees or charges in
addition to those covered in your
regularly billed sewer or on-site sewage
system maintenance service?

D. If the property is connected to an
on-site sewage system:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) Was a permit issued for its
construction, and was it approved
by the local health department or
district following its construction?

(2) When was it last pumped:

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(3) Are there any defects in the
operation of the on-site sewage
system?

[ ] Don't know (4) When was it last inspected?

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

By whom: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Don't know (5) For how many bedrooms was
the on-site sewage system
approved?

. . . . . . . . . . . . bedrooms

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know E. Are all plumbing fixtures, including
laundry drain, connected to the
sewer/on-site sewage system? If no,
please explain: . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Have there been any changes or
repairs to the on-site sewage system?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know G. Is the on-site sewage system,
including the drainfield, located entirely
within the boundaries of the property?
If no, please explain.
. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know H. Does the on-site sewage system
require monitoring and maintenance
services more frequently than once a
year? If yes, please explain.
. . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE: IF THIS RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT IS BEING COMPLETED FOR NEW CONSTRUCTION WHICH
HAS NEVER BEEN OCCUPIED, THE SELLER IS NOT REQUIRED TO
COMPLETE THE QUESTIONS LISTED IN ITEM 4. STRUCTURAL OR ITEM
5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

4. STRUCTURAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Has the roof leaked?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Has the basement flooded or
leaked?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Have there been any conversions,
additions, or remodeling?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(1) If yes, were all building
permits obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *(2) If yes, were all final
inspections obtained?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Do you know the age of the house?
If yes, year of original construction:

. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Has there been any settling,
slippage, or sliding of the property or its
improvements?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Are there any defects with the
following: (If yes, please check
applicable items and explain.)

□ Foundations
□ Decks
□ Exterior Walls

□ Chimneys □ Interior Walls □ Fire Alarm

□ Doors □ Windows □ Patio

□ Ceilings □ Slab Floors □ Driveways

□ Pools □ Hot Tub □ Sauna

□ Sidewalks □ Outbuildings □ Fireplaces

□ Garage Floors □ Walkways □ Siding

□ Other □ Wood Stoves

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Was a structural pest or "whole
house" inspection done? If yes, when
and by whom was the inspection
completed? . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know H. During your ownership, has the
property had any wood destroying
organism or pest infestation?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know I. Is the attic insulated?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know J. Is the basement insulated?

5. SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

*A. If any of the following systems or
fixtures are included with the transfer,
are there any defects? If yes, please
explain.

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Electrical system, including
wiring, switches, outlets, and
service

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Plumbing system, including pipes,
faucets, fixtures, and toilets

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Hot water tank

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Garbage disposal

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Appliances

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Sump pump

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Heating and cooling systems

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Security system
[ ] Owned [ ] Leased

Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

*B. If any of the following fixtures or
property is included with the transfer,
are they leased? (If yes, please attach
copy of lease.)

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Security system . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Tanks (type): . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know Satellite dish . . . . . .
Other: . . . . . .

6. HOMEOWNERS'
ASSOCIATION/COMMON
INTERESTS

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know A. Is there a Homeowners'
Association? Name of Association and
contact information for an officer,
director, employee, or other authorized
agent, if any, who may provide the
association's financial statements,
minutes, bylaws, fining policy, and other
information that is not publicly
available:
. . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know B. Are there regular periodic
assessments:

$. . . per [ ] Month [ ] Year
[ ] Other . . . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Are there any pending special
assessments?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *D. Are there any shared "common
areas" or any joint maintenance
agreements (facilities such as walls,
fences, landscaping, pools, tennis
courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with
others)?

7. ENVIRONMENTAL

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Have there been any drainage
problems on the property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Does the property contain fill
material?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. Is there any material damage to the
property from fire, wind, floods, beach
movements, earthquake, expansive
soils, or landslides?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know D. Are there any shorelines, wetlands,
floodplains, or critical areas on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *E. Are there any substances,
materials, or products on the property
that may be environmental concerns,
such as asbestos, formaldehyde, radon
gas, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical
storage tanks, or contaminated soil or
water?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *F. Has the property been used for
commercial or industrial purposes?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *G. Is there any soil or groundwater
contamination?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *H. Are there transmission poles,
transformers, or other utility equipment
installed, maintained, or buried on the
property?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *I. Has the property been used as a
legal or illegal dumping site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *J. Has the property been used as an
illegal drug manufacturing site?

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *K. Are there any radio towers in the
area that may cause interference with
telephone reception?

8. MANUFACTURED AND
MOBILE HOMES

If the property includes a manufactured
or mobile home,

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *A. Did you make any alterations to the
home? If yes, please describe the
alterations: . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *B. Did any previous owner make any
alterations to the home? If yes, please
describe the alterations: . . . . . . . . . .

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *C. If alterations were made, were
permits or variances for these alterations
obtained?

9. FULL DISCLOSURE BY
SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ] Yes [ ] No [ ] Don't know *Are there any other existing material
defects affecting the property that a
prospective buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and attached
explanations (if any) are complete and
correct to the best of my/our knowledge
and I/we have received a copy hereof.
I/we authorize all of my/our real estate
licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of
this disclosure statement to other real
estate licensees and all prospective
buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . . . .

NOTICE TO THE BUYER

INFORMATION REGARDING REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS MAY
BE OBTAINED FROM LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES. THIS
NOTICE IS INTENDED ONLY TO INFORM YOU OF WHERE TO OBTAIN
THIS INFORMATION AND IS NOT AN INDICATION OF THE PRESENCE OF
REGISTERED SEX OFFENDERS.

II. BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A. Buyer hereby acknowledges that: Buyer has a duty to pay
diligent attention to any material defects that are known to
Buyer or can be known to Buyer by utilizing diligent
attention and observation.

B. The disclosures set forth in this statement and in any
amendments to this statement are made only by the Seller and
not by any real estate licensee or other party.

C. Buyer acknowledges that, pursuant to RCW 64.06.050(2),
real estate licensees are not liable for inaccurate information
provided by Seller, except to the extent that real estate
licensees know of such inaccurate information.

D. This information is for disclosure only and is not intended to
be a part of the written agreement between the Buyer and
Seller.

E. Buyer (which term includes all persons signing the "Buyer's
acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement below) has
received a copy of this Disclosure Statement (including
attachments, if any) bearing Seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES CONTAINED IN THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT ARE PROVIDED BY
SELLER BASED ON SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME
SELLER COMPLETES THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT. UNLESS BUYER AND SELLER
OTHERWISE AGREE IN WRITING, BUYER SHALL HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS FROM
THE DAY SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT DELIVERS THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO
RESCIND THE AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING A SEPARATELY SIGNED WRITTEN
STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT. YOU MAY WAIVE THE
RIGHT TO RESCIND PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE TIME YOU ENTER INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT.
BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE
OF THE SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.
DATE . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . BUYER . . . . . . . . . . . .

(2) If the disclosure statement is being completed for new
construction which has never been occupied, the disclosure statement is
not required to contain and the seller is not required to complete the
questions listed in item 4. Structural or item 5. Systems and
Fixtures.
(3) The seller disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the
buyer and seller of residential property. The seller disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any
real estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be
construed as a warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate
licensee involved in the transaction.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.06.040 and 1996 c 301 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, after the date that a seller of residential real property
completes a real property transfer disclosure statement, the seller
becomes aware of additional information, or an adverse change occurs
which makes any of the disclosures made inaccurate, the seller shall
amend the real property transfer disclosure statement, and deliver the
amendment to the buyer. No amendment shall be required, however, if
the seller takes whatever corrective action is necessary so that the
accuracy of the disclosure is restored, or the adverse change is
corrected, at least three business days prior to the closing date.
Unless the corrective action is completed by the seller prior to the
closing date, the buyer shall have the right to exercise one of the
following two options: (a) Approving and accepting the amendment, or
(b) rescinding the agreement of purchase and sale of the property
within three business days after receiving the amended real property
transfer disclosure statement. Acceptance or recision shall be subject
to the same procedures described in RCW 64.06.030. If the closing date
provided in the purchase and sale agreement is scheduled to occur
within the three-business-day rescission period provided for in this
section, the closing date shall be extended until the expiration of the
three-business-day rescission period. The buyer shall have no right of
rescission if the seller takes whatever action is necessary so that the
accuracy of the disclosure is restored at least three business days
prior to the closing date.
(2) In the event any act, occurrence, or agreement arising or
becoming known after the closing of a residential real property
transfer causes a real property transfer disclosure statement to be
inaccurate in any way, the seller of such property shall have no
obligation to amend the disclosure statement, and the buyer shall not
have the right to rescind the transaction under this chapter.
(3) If the seller in a residential real property transfer fails or
refuses to provide to the prospective buyer a real property transfer
disclosure statement as required under this chapter, the prospective
buyer's right of rescission under this section shall apply until the
earlier of three business days after receipt of the real property
transfer disclosure statement or the date the transfer has closed,
unless the buyer has otherwise waived the right of rescission in
writing. Closing is deemed to occur when the buyer has paid the
purchase price, or down payment, and the conveyance document, including
a deed or real estate contract, from the seller has been delivered and
recorded. After closing, the seller's obligation to deliver the real
property transfer disclosure statement and the buyer's rights and
remedies under this chapter shall terminate.
(4) Failure of a homeowners' association or its officers,
directors, employees, or authorized agents to provide requested
information in part 8 of the disclosure statement form in RCW 64.06.015
or part 6 of the disclosure statement form in RCW 64.06.020 does not
constitute a seller's failure or refusal to provide a real property
transfer disclosure statement under subsection (3) of this section.

--- END ---