BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.380 and 2005 c 384 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in RCW 43.17.385 and 43.17.390:
(1) "State agency" or "agency" means a state agency, department,
office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution, or
institution of higher education, and all offices of executive branch
state government-elected officials, except agencies with less than one
hundred full-time equivalent employees and agricultural commissions
under Title 15 RCW.
(2) "Quality management, accountability, and performance system"
means a nationally recognized integrated, interdisciplinary system of
measures, tools, and reports used to improve the performance of a work
unit or organization.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.385 and 2005 c 384 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each state agency shall, within available funds, develop and
implement a quality management, accountability, and performance system
to improve the public services it provides.
(2) Each agency shall ensure that managers and staff at all levels,
including those who directly deliver services, are engaged in the
system and shall provide managers and staff with the training necessary
for successful implementation.
(3) Each agency shall, within available funds, ensure that its
quality management, accountability, and performance system:
(a) Uses strategic business planning to establish goals,
objectives, and activities consistent with the priorities of
government, as provided in statute;
(b) Engages stakeholders and customers in establishing service
requirements and improving service delivery systems;
(c) Includes clear, relevant, and easy-to-understand measures for
each activity;
(d) Gathers, monitors, and analyzes activity data;
(e) Uses the data to evaluate the effectiveness of programs to
manage process performance, improve efficiency, and reduce costs;
(f) Establishes performance goals and expectations for employees
that reflect the organization's objectives; and provides for regular
assessments of employee performance;
(g) Uses activity measures to report progress toward agency
objectives to the agency director at least quarterly;
(h) Where performance is not meeting intended objectives, holds
regular problem-solving sessions to develop and implement a plan for
addressing gaps; and
(i) Allocates resources based on strategies to improve performance.
(4) Each agency shall conduct a yearly assessment of its quality
management, accountability, and performance system.
(5) State agencies whose chief executives are appointed by the
governor shall report to the governor on agency performance at least
quarterly. The reports shall be included on the agencies', the
governor's, and the office of financial management's web sites.
(6) The governor shall report annually to citizens on the
performance of state agency programs. The governor's report shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Progress made toward the priorities of government as a result
of agency activities; and
(b) Improvements in agency quality management systems, fiscal
efficiency, process efficiency, asset management, personnel management,
statutory and regulatory compliance, and management of technology
systems.
(7) Each state agency shall integrate efforts made under this
section with other management, accountability, and performance systems
undertaken under executive order or other authority.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.17.390 and 2005 c 384 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Starting no later than 2008, and at least once every three years
thereafter,)) (1) Each agency ((shall)) may apply to the Washington
state quality award, or similar organization, for an independent
assessment of its quality management, accountability, and performance
system. The assessment ((shall evaluate)) may include an evaluation of
the effectiveness of all elements of ((its)) the agency's management,
accountability, and performance system, including: Leadership,
strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and information, employee
performance management, and process improvement. The purpose of the
assessment is to recognize best practice and identify improvement
opportunities.
(2) All agency assessments under this section shall be made
available for public review on agency web sites or through other easily
accessible formats.

--- END ---