BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.56.030 and 2007 c 259 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Receive and investigate, where necessary, notifications and
reports of adverse events, including root cause analyses and corrective
action plans submitted as part of reports, and communicate to
individual facilities the department's conclusions, if any, regarding
an adverse event reported by a facility; and
(b) ((Provide to the Washington state quality forum established in
RCW 41.05.029 such information from the adverse health events and
incidents reports made under this chapter as the department and the
Washington state quality forum determine will assist in the Washington
state quality forum's research regarding health care quality, evidence-based medicine, and patient safety. Any shared information must be
aggregated and not identify an individual medical facility. As
determined by the department and the Washington state quality forum,
selected shared information may be disseminated on the Washington state
quality forum's web site and through other appropriate means; and
(c))) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.
(2) The department may enforce the reporting requirements of RCW
70.56.020 using its existing enforcement authority provided in chapter
18.46 RCW for childbirth centers, chapter 70.41 RCW for hospitals, and
chapter 71.12 RCW for psychiatric hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.029 (Washington state quality
forum -- Established -- Duties) and 2007 c 259 s 9 are each repealed.

--- END ---