BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) Washington has made significant investments in watershed-based
activities, including the establishment of water resource inventory
area (WRIA) planning units and lead agencies, lead entities, and
regional salmon recovery organizations across the state. Washington
watersheds have developed subbasin plans under the Northwest power and
conservation council and national oceanic and atmospheric
administration-approved regional salmon recovery plans that include
locally prioritized salmon recovery projects;
(2) The governor's salmon recovery office was established to
support the development and implementation of regional salmon recovery
plans, to assist local governments in obtaining federal assurances, and
to issue a biennial state of the salmon report;
(3) The salmon recovery funding board provides grants for salmon
recovery and the forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health works to provide greater coordination on monitoring.
Administrative support for the board and the forum are provided by the
recreation and conservation office;
(4) Lead entity funding to support infrastructure and capacity
needs is provided through the recreation and conservation office, which
contracts with the department of fish and wildlife to implement the
program. Funding for WRIA planning units and lead agencies to develop
and implement watershed-based plans under RCW 90.82.040 is provided by
the department of ecology; and
(5) Currently, state watershed and salmon recovery-based programs
are split among several state agencies or offices. Efficient
implementation of these efforts will be enhanced by promoting
consolidation and integration of their activities and programs. In
addition, consolidation of reporting benefits the public and decision
makers regarding watershed health, which includes salmon recovery. It
is also the intent of the legislature, in cooperation with local and
regional officials, and respecting the ability of local citizens and
officials to organize in ways best suited to address local needs, to
encourage the development of incentives that consolidate existing
processes and promote more effective implementation of salmon recovery
plans and watershed planning and implementation.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.85.030 and 2007 c 444 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor's salmon recovery office ((is created within the
office of the governor to)) shall coordinate state strategy to allow
for salmon recovery to healthy sustainable population levels with
productive commercial and recreational fisheries. ((The)) A primary
purpose of the office is to coordinate and assist in the development,
implementation, and revision of regional salmon recovery plans as an
integral part of a statewide strategy developed consistent with the
guiding principles and procedures under RCW 77.85.150.
(2) The governor's salmon recovery office is also responsible for
maintaining the statewide salmon recovery strategy to reflect
applicable provisions of regional recovery plans, habitat protection
and restoration plans, water quality plans, and other private, local,
regional, state agency and federal plans, projects, and activities that
contribute to salmon recovery.
(3) ((The governor's salmon recovery office shall also gather
regional recovery plans from regional recovery organizations and submit
the plans to the federal fish services for adoption as federal recovery
plans.)) The governor's salmon recovery office shall also work with
regional salmon recovery organizations on salmon recovery issues in
order to ensure a coordinated and consistent statewide approach to
salmon recovery((. The governor's salmon recovery office)) and shall
work with federal agencies to accomplish implementation of federal
commitments in the recovery plans.
(4) The governor's salmon recovery office may also:
(a) Assist state agencies, local governments, landowners, and other
interested parties in obtaining federal assurances that plans,
programs, or activities are consistent with fish recovery under the
federal endangered species act;
(b) Act as liaison to local governments, the state congressional
delegation, the United States congress, federally recognized tribes,
and the federal executive branch agencies for issues related to the
state's salmon recovery plans;
(c) Provide periodic reports pursuant to RCW 77.85.020;
(d) Provide, as appropriate, technical and administrative support
to ((the independent)) science panels ((or other science-related
panels)) on issues pertaining to salmon recovery;
(e) In cooperation with the regional recovery organizations,
prepare a timeline and implementation plan that, together with a
schedule and recommended budget, identifies specific actions in
regional recovery plans for state agency actions and assistance
necessary to implement local and regional recovery plans; and
(f) As necessary, provide recommendations to the legislature that
would further the success of salmon recovery, including recommendations
for state agency actions in the succeeding biennium and state financial
and technical assistance for projects and activities to be undertaken
in local and regional salmon recovery plans. The recommendations may
include:
(i) The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs and
activities; and
(ii) The need for state funding assistance to recovery activities
and projects.
(5) ((This section expires June 30, 2015.)) For administrative
purposes, the governor's salmon recovery office is located within the
recreation and conservation office.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.85.050 and 2005 c 309 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Counties, cities, and tribal governments must jointly
designate, by resolution or by letters of support, the area for which
a habitat project list is to be developed and the lead entity that is
to be responsible for submitting the habitat project list. No project
included on a habitat project list shall be considered mandatory in
nature and no private landowner may be forced or coerced into
participation in any respect. The lead entity may be a county, city,
conservation district, special district, tribal government, regional
recovery organization, or other entity.
(b) The lead entity shall establish a committee that consists of
representative interests of counties, cities, conservation districts,
tribes, environmental groups, business interests, landowners, citizens,
volunteer groups, regional fish enhancement groups, and other habitat
interests. The purpose of the committee is to provide a citizen-based
evaluation of the projects proposed to promote salmon habitat.
(c) The committee shall compile a list of habitat projects,
establish priorities for individual projects, define the sequence for
project implementation, and submit these activities as the habitat
project list. The committee shall also identify potential federal,
state, local, and private funding sources.
(2) The area covered by the habitat project list must be based, at
a minimum, on a WRIA, combination of WRIAs, or any other area as agreed
to by the counties, cities, and tribes in resolutions or in letters of
support meeting the requirements of this subsection. Preference will
be given to projects in an area that contain a salmon species that is
listed or proposed for listing under the federal endangered species
act.
(3) The lead entity shall submit the habitat project list to the
(([salmon recovery funding])) salmon recovery funding board in
accordance with procedures adopted by the board.
(4) The recreation and conservation office shall administer funding
to support the functions of lead entities.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.85.020 and 2007 c 444 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((No later than January 31, 2009, and every odd-numbered year
until and including 2015, the governor's salmon recovery office shall
submit a biennial state of the salmon report to the legislature and the
governor regarding the implementation of the state's salmon recovery
strategy. The report must include the following:
(a) A summary of habitat projects including but not limited to:
(i) A summary of accomplishments in removing barriers to salmon
passage and an identification of existing barriers;
(ii) A summary of salmon restoration efforts undertaken in the past
two years;
(iii) A summary of the role which private volunteer initiatives
contribute in salmon habitat restoration efforts; and
(iv) A summary of efforts taken to protect salmon habitat;
(b) A summary of harvest and hatchery management activities
affecting salmon recovery;
(c) A summary of the number and types of violations of existing
laws pertaining to salmon. The summary may include information about
the types of sanctions imposed for these violations.
(2) The report may include the following:
(a) A description of the amount of in-kind financial contributions,
including volunteer, private, state, federal, tribal, as available, and
local government funds directly spent on salmon recovery in response to
endangered species act listings; and
(b) Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new habitat
created pursuant to chapter 246, Laws of 1998.
(3) The report shall summarize the monitoring data coordinated by
the forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health. The
summary may include but is not limited to data and analysis related to:
(a) Measures of progress in fish recovery;
(b) Measures of factors limiting recovery as well as trends in such
factors; and
(c) The status of implementation of projects and activities.
(4))) Beginning December 2010, the recreation and conservation
office shall produce a biennial report on the statewide status of
salmon recovery and watershed health, summarize projects and programs
funded by the salmon recovery funding board, and summarize progress as
measured by high-level indicators and state agency compliance with
applicable protocols established by the forum for monitoring salmon
recovery and watershed health. The report must be a consolidation of
the current reporting activities, including the salmon recovery funding
board and the forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health,
on the status of salmon recovery and watershed health in Washington
state, in accordance with RCW 77.85.250(8). The report shall also
include a high-level status report on watershed planning efforts under
chapter 90.82 RCW as summarized by the department of ecology and on
salmon recovery and watershed planning as summarized by the Puget Sound
partnership. The report's introduction must include a list of high-level questions related to the status of watershed health and salmon
recovery to help decision makers and the public respond to salmon
recovery and watershed health management needs.
(2) The department, the department of ecology, the department of
natural resources, and the state conservation commission((, and the
forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health)) shall
provide to the ((governor's salmon recovery)) recreation and
conservation office information requested by the office necessary to
prepare the ((state of the salmon report and other reports produced by
the office)) consolidated report on salmon recovery and watershed
health.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.85.250 and 2007 c 444 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The legislature finds that pursuant to chapter 298, Laws of
2001, and acting upon recommendations of the state's independent
science panel, the monitoring oversight committee developed
recommendations for a comprehensive statewide strategy for monitoring
watershed health, with a focus upon salmon recovery, entitled The
Washington Comprehensive Monitoring Strategy and Action Plan for
Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery. The legislature further finds
that funding to begin implementing the strategy and action plan was
provided in the 2003-2005 biennial budget, and that executive order 04-03 was issued to coordinate state agency implementation activities. It
is therefore the purpose of this section to adopt the strategy and
action plan and to provide guidance to ensure that the coordination
activities directed by executive order 04-03 are effectively carried
out.
(2))) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health
is created to implement the Washington Comprehensive Monitoring
Strategy and Action Plan for Watershed Health and Salmon Recovery. For
administrative purposes, the forum is located within the recreation and
conservation office. The governor shall appoint a person with
experience and expertise in natural resources and environmental quality
monitoring to chair the forum. The chair shall serve four-year terms
and may serve successive terms. The forum shall include
representatives of the following state agencies and regional entities
that have responsibilities related to monitoring of salmon recovery and
watershed health:
(a) Department of ecology;
(b) Salmon recovery funding board;
(c) Governor's salmon recovery office;
(d) Department of fish and wildlife;
(e) Department of natural resources;
(f) Puget Sound ((action team, or a successor state agency))
partnership;
(g) Conservation commission;
(h) Department of agriculture;
(i) Department of transportation; and
(j) Each of the regional salmon recovery organizations.
(((3))) (2) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall provide a multiagency venue for coordinating technical and
policy issues and actions related to monitoring salmon recovery and
watershed health.
(((4))) (3) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall recommend a set of ((measures)) high-level indicators for
use ((by the governor's salmon recovery office)) in the ((state of the
salmon report)) consolidated report on salmon recovery and watershed
health required by RCW 77.85.020 to convey results and progress on
salmon recovery and watershed health in ways that are easily understood
by the general public.
(((5))) (4) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall invite the participation of federal, tribal, regional, and
local agencies and entities that carry out salmon recovery and
watershed health monitoring, and work toward coordination and
standardization of measures used.
(((6))) (5) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall periodically report to the governor and the appropriate
standing committees of the senate and house of representatives on the
forum's activities and recommendations for improving monitoring
programs by state agencies((, coordinating with the governor's salmon
recovery office biennial report as)). This information must be
included within the consolidated report on salmon recovery and
watershed health required by RCW 77.85.020.
(((7))) (6) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall review pilot monitoring programs including those that
integrate (a) data collection, management, and access; and (b)
information regarding habitat projects and project management.
(((8))) (7) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and watershed
health shall review and make recommendations to the office of financial
management and the appropriate legislative committees on agency budget
requests related to monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health.
These recommendations must be made no later than September 15th of each
year. The goal of this review is to prioritize and integrate budget
requests across agencies.
(((9))) (8)(a) The forum on monitoring salmon recovery and
watershed health shall adopt general high-level indicators for salmon
recovery and watershed health in Washington by December 1, 2009. By
July 1, 2010, the forum shall also adopt the protocols for monitoring
these high-level indicators that will enable state-conducted or state-funded monitoring efforts to be capable of reporting results that will
ensure reporting consistency and agency compliance under the
consolidated reporting requirement of RCW 77.85.020. The forum on
monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health shall indicate how the
general high-level indicators are consistent with, and complement, the
more detailed regional and local metrics used to measure watershed
health and salmon recovery.
(b) High-level indicators shall inform a nontechnical summary of
key metrics that indicate the state of salmon recovery and provide an
index of watershed health in Washington.
(9) This section expires June 30, ((2015)) 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) By December 1, 2009, the recreation and
conservation office, in consultation with the department of ecology,
the department of fish and wildlife, regional fisheries enhancement
groups, lead entities, planning units and lead agencies, and regional
salmon recovery organizations shall provide an assessment to the
governor on additional coordination and incentive opportunities with
lead entities, regional salmon recovery organizations, lead agencies,
and WRIA planning units, and shall include any additional coordination
and incentive opportunities for those organizations that exist and
operate within a shared watershed boundary or portions of a shared
watershed boundary.
(2) By December 1, 2009, the recreation and conservation office and
the office of regulatory assistance, working in coordination with the
departments of ecology and fish and wildlife, must identify and
recommend one pilot project outside of Puget Sound that will
effectively integrate salmon recovery and watershed planning missions
and objectives. The pilot project's purpose is to demonstrate ways to
achieve efficient permitting processes to implement projects identified
in local or regional salmon recovery or WRIA-based watershed plans.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) By December 1, 2009, the department of
ecology must provide recommendations to the legislature on grant
programs related to restoration and protection of water quality and for
increases, augmentation, or conservation of water quantity supplies
that may be more effectively and efficiently funded through the salmon
recovery funding board. The recommendations should include ways to
integrate salmon recovery data into reporting of watershed health.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2009.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.85.140 and 2007 c 241 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Habitat project lists shall be submitted to the salmon recovery
funding board for funding at least once a year on a schedule
established by the board. The board shall provide the legislature with
a list of the proposed projects and a list of the projects funded by
October 1st of each year for informational purposes. Project sponsors
who complete salmon habitat projects approved for funding from habitat
project lists and have met grant application deadlines will be paid by
the salmon recovery funding board within thirty days of project
completion.
(2) The recreation and conservation office shall track all funds
allocated for salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities on
behalf of the board, including both funds allocated by the board and
funds allocated by other state or federal agencies for salmon recovery
or water quality improvement.
(((3) Beginning in December 2000, the board shall provide a
biennial report to the governor and the legislature on salmon recovery
expenditures. This report shall be coordinated with the state of the
salmon report required under RCW 77.85.020.))

Sec. 9 RCW 77.85.005 and 2005 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that repeated attempts to improve salmonid
fish runs throughout the state of Washington have failed to avert
listings of salmon and steelhead runs as threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).
These listings threaten the sport, commercial, and tribal fishing
industries as well as the economic well-being and vitality of vast
areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature to begin
activities required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as
possible, although the legislature understands that successful recovery
efforts may not be realized for many years because of the life cycle of
salmon and the complex array of natural and human-caused problems they
face.
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the citizens of
the state of Washington for the state to retain primary responsibility
for managing the natural resources of the state, rather than abdicate
those responsibilities to the federal government, and that the state
may best accomplish this objective by integrating local and regional
recovery activities into a statewide strategy that can make the most
effective use of provisions of federal laws allowing for a state lead
in salmon recovery, delivered through implementation activities
consistent with regional and watershed recovery plans. The legislature
also finds that a statewide salmon recovery strategy must be developed
and implemented through an active public involvement process in order
to ensure public participation in, and support for, salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that there is a substantial link between the
provisions of the federal endangered species act and the federal clean
water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.). The legislature further finds
that habitat restoration is a vital component of salmon recovery
efforts. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
specifically address salmon habitat restoration in a coordinated manner
and to develop a structure that allows for the coordinated delivery of
federal, state, and local assistance to communities for habitat
projects that will assist in the recovery and enhancement of salmon
stocks. A strong watershed-based locally implemented plan is essential
for local, regional, and statewide salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that credible scientific review and
oversight is essential for any salmon recovery effort to be successful.
The legislature further finds that it is important to monitor the
overall health of the salmon resource to determine if recovery efforts
are providing expected returns. It is important to monitor salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities to determine their
effectiveness in order to secure federal acceptance of the state's
approach to salmon recovery. Adaptive management cannot exist without
monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes that a
coordinated and integrated monitoring system should be developed and
implemented.
The legislature therefore finds that a coordinated framework for
responding to the salmon crisis is needed immediately. To that end,
the governor's salmon recovery office should be created ((within the
governor's office)) to provide overall coordination of the state's
response; an independent science panel is needed to provide scientific
review and oversight; a coordinated state funding process should be
established through a salmon recovery funding board; the appropriate
local or tribal government should provide local leadership in
identifying and sequencing habitat projects to be funded by state
agencies; habitat projects should be implemented without delay; and a
strong locally based effort to restore salmon habitat should be
established by providing a framework to allow citizen volunteers to
work effectively.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.85.090 and 2007 c 444 s 5 and 2007 c 341 s 49 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The southwest Washington salmon recovery region, whose
boundaries are provided in chapter 60, Laws of 1998, is created.
(2) Lead entities within a salmon recovery region that agree to
form a regional salmon recovery organization may be recognized by the
governor's salmon recovery office created in RCW 77.85.030((, during
the time it is constituted,)) as a regional recovery organization. The
regional recovery organization may plan, coordinate, and monitor the
implementation of a regional recovery plan in accordance with RCW
77.85.150. Regional recovery organizations existing as of July 24,
2005, that have developed draft recovery plans approved by the
governor's salmon recovery office by July 1, 2005, may continue to
plan, coordinate, and monitor the implementation of regional recovery
plans.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2008, the leadership council, created
under chapter 90.71 RCW, shall serve as the regional salmon recovery
organization for Puget Sound salmon species, except for the program
known as the Hood Canal summer chum evolutionarily significant unit
area, which the Hood Canal coordinating council shall continue to
administer under chapter 90.88 RCW.

Sec. 11 RCW 77.85.150 and 2007 c 444 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governor shall, with the assistance of the governor's
salmon recovery office, ((during the time it is constituted,)) maintain
and revise, as appropriate, a statewide salmon recovery strategy.
(2) The governor and the governor's salmon recovery office shall be
guided by the following considerations in maintaining and revising the
strategy:
(a) The strategy should identify statewide initiatives and
responsibilities with regional recovery plans and local watershed
initiatives as the principal means for implementing the strategy;
(b) The strategy should emphasize collaborative, incentive-based
approaches;
(c) The strategy should address all factors limiting the recovery
of Washington's listed salmon stocks, including habitat and water
quality degradation, harvest and hatchery management, inadequate
streamflows, and other barriers to fish passage. Where other limiting
factors are beyond the state's jurisdictional authorities to respond
to, such as some natural predators and high seas fishing, the strategy
shall include the state's requests for federal action to effectively
address these factors;
(d) The strategy should identify immediate actions necessary to
prevent extinction of a listed salmon stock, establish performance
measures to determine if restoration efforts are working, recommend
effective monitoring and data management, and recommend to the
legislature clear and certain measures to be implemented if performance
goals are not met;
(e) The strategy shall rely on the best scientific information
available and provide for incorporation of new information as it is
obtained;
(f) The strategy should seek a fair allocation of the burdens and
costs upon economic and social sectors of the state whose activities
may contribute to limiting the recovery of salmon; and
(g) The strategy should seek clear measures and procedures from the
appropriate federal agencies for removing Washington's salmon stocks
from listing under the federal act.
(3) If the strategy is updated, an active and thorough public
involvement process, including early and meaningful opportunity for
public comment, must be utilized. In obtaining public comment, the
governor's salmon recovery office shall work with regional salmon
recovery organizations throughout the state and shall encourage
regional and local recovery planning efforts to ensure an active public
involvement process.
(4) This section shall apply prospectively only and not
retroactively. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
invalidate actions taken in recovery planning at the local, regional,
or state level prior to July 1, 1999.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.41.270 and 2007 c 444 s 7 and 2007 c 241 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural
resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance
measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally
based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be
used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and
performance assessment.
(2) The office of financial management and the ((governor's salmon
recovery)) recreation and conservation office((, during the time it is
constituted,)) shall assist natural resource-related agencies in
developing recommendations for a monitoring program to measure outcome-focused performance measures required by this section. The
recommendations must be consistent with the framework and coordinated
monitoring strategy developed by the monitoring oversight committee
established in RCW 77.85.210.
(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan
recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental
organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office
of financial management on the implementation of this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation
commission, the recreation and conservation funding board, the salmon
recovery funding board, and the public works board within the
department of community, trade, and economic development.
(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the
conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management
grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation commission water
quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention grants,
public participation grants, and remedial action grants under RCW
70.105D.070; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter
70.146 RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW 79.105.150;
habitat grants under the Washington wildlife and recreation program
under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon recovery grants under chapter 77.85 RCW;
and the public works trust fund program under chapter 43.155 RCW. The
term also includes programs administered by the department of fish and
wildlife related to protection or recovery of fish stocks which are
funded with moneys from the capital budget.

Sec. 13 RCW 79A.25.240 and 2007 c 241 s 57 are each amended to
read as follows:
The recreation and conservation office shall provide necessary
grants and loan administration support to the salmon recovery funding
board as provided in RCW 77.85.120. The office shall also be
responsible for tracking salmon recovery expenditures under RCW
77.85.140. The office shall provide all necessary administrative
support to the salmon recovery funding board, and the salmon recovery
funding board shall be located with the office. ((The office shall
provide necessary coordination with the salmon recovery office.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Nothing in this act is intended to amend
chapter 90.71 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 77.85.100 (Work group -- Evaluation of
mitigation alternatives) and 2000 c 107 s 100 & 1998 c 246 s 16 are
each repealed.

--- END ---