BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that not
only is the Washington state ferry system a part of the state highway
system, it is one of Washington's major tourist attractions, and
therefore of great economic significance to the state, bringing in over
five billion dollars in tourism revenue in 2007 in the Puget Sound
region alone. The legislature further finds and declares that
maintaining and preserving Washington state ferry vessels is vital to
sustaining this economic resource. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature that a portion of the tax revenues that are generated by
the tourism industry be used for the acquisition of Washington state
ferry system auto ferry vessels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall purchase ferry vessels to be used in a county
with a population of one million or more using the revenues generated
in RCW 67.28.180(3)(d) to pay the principal and interest on any bonds
used to purchase the vessels. The purchased vessels must be included
in the most recent Washington state ferry long-range plan approved by
the legislature.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.28.180 and 2007 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the conditions set forth in subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, the legislative body of any county or any city, is
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax of not to exceed
two percent on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging
that is subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW.
(2) Any levy authorized by this section shall be subject to the
following:
(a) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section shall contain, in addition to all other provisions required to
conform to this chapter, a provision allowing a credit against the
county tax for the full amount of any city tax imposed pursuant to this
section upon the same taxable event.
(b) In the event that any county has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, either pledged the tax
revenues for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or
general obligation bonds authorized and issued pursuant to RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and issued revenue or
general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150
through 67.28.160, such county shall be exempt from the provisions of
(a) of this subsection, to the extent that the tax revenues are pledged
for payment of principal and interest on bonds issued at any time
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160:
PROVIDED, That so much of such pledged tax revenues, together with any
investment earnings thereon, not immediately necessary for actual
payment of principal and interest on such bonds may be used: (i) In
any county with a population of one million or more, for repayment
either of limited tax levy general obligation bonds or of any county
fund or account from which a loan was made, the proceeds from the bonds
or loan being used to pay for constructing, installing, improving, and
equipping stadium capital improvement projects, and to pay for any
engineering, planning, financial, legal and professional services
incident to the development of such stadium capital improvement
projects, regardless of the date the debt for such capital improvement
projects was or may be incurred; (ii) in any county with a population
of one million or more, for repayment or refinancing of bonded
indebtedness incurred prior to January 1, 1997, for any purpose
authorized by this section or relating to stadium repairs or
rehabilitation, including but not limited to the cost of settling legal
claims, reimbursing operating funds, interest payments on short-term
loans, and any other purpose for which such debt has been incurred if
the county has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium
and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.030; or (iii) in other counties,
for county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion until January 1,
2009, and thereafter for any purpose authorized in this chapter.
A county is exempt under this subsection with respect to city
revenue or general obligation bonds issued after April 1, 1991, only if
such bonds mature before January 1, 2013. If any county located east
of the crest of the Cascade mountains has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, pledged the tax revenue
for payment of principal and interest on city revenue or general
obligation bonds, the county is exempt under this subsection with
respect to revenue or general obligation bonds issued after January 1,
2007, only if the bonds mature before January 1, 2021. Such a county
may only use funds under this subsection (2)(b) for constructing or
improving facilities authorized under this chapter, including county-owned facilities for agricultural promotion, and must perform an annual
financial audit of organizations receiving funding on the use of the
funds.
As used in this subsection (2)(b), "capital improvement projects"
may include, but not be limited to a stadium restaurant facility,
restroom facilities, artificial turf system, seating facilities,
parking facilities and scoreboard and information system adjacent to or
within a county owned stadium, together with equipment, utilities,
accessories and appurtenances necessary thereto. The stadium
restaurant authorized by this subsection (2)(b) shall be operated by a
private concessionaire under a contract with the county.
(c)(i) No city within a county exempt under subsection (2)(b) of
this section may levy the tax authorized by this section so long as
said county is so exempt.
(ii) If bonds have been issued under RCW 43.99N.020 and any
necessary property transfers have been made under RCW 36.102.100, no
city within a county with a population of one million or more may levy
the tax authorized by this section before January 1, 2021.
(iii) However, in the event that any city in a county described in
(i) or (ii) of this subsection (2)(c) has levied the tax authorized by
this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975, authorized and issued
revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions of RCW
67.28.150 through 67.28.160, such city may levy the tax so long as the
tax revenues are pledged for payment of principal and interest on bonds
issued at any time pursuant to the provisions of RCW 67.28.150 through
67.28.160.
(3) Any levy authorized by this section by a county that has levied
the tax authorized by this section and has, prior to June 26, 1975,
either pledged the tax revenues for payment of principal and interest
on city revenue or general obligation bonds authorized and issued
pursuant to RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 or has authorized and
issued revenue or general obligation bonds pursuant to the provisions
of RCW 67.28.150 through 67.28.160 shall be subject to the following:
(a) Taxes collected under this section in any calendar year before
2013 in excess of five million three hundred thousand dollars shall
only be used as follows:
(i) Seventy-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and seventy percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for art museums, cultural museums, heritage museums, the arts,
and the performing arts. Moneys spent under this subsection (3)(a)(i)
shall be used for the purposes of this subsection (3)(a)(i) in all
parts of the county.
(ii) Twenty-five percent from January 1, 1992, through December 31,
2000, and thirty percent from January 1, 2001, through December 31,
2012, for the following purposes and in a manner reflecting the
following order of priority: Stadium purposes as authorized under
subsection (2)(b) of this section; acquisition of open space lands;
youth sports activities; and tourism promotion. If all or part of the
debt on the stadium is refinanced, all revenues under this subsection
(3)(a)(ii) shall be used to retire the debt.
(b) From January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2015, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be used to retire the debt on the stadium, or deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 after
the debt on the stadium is retired.
(c) From January 1, 2016, through December 31, 2020, in a county
with a population of one million or more, all revenues under this
section shall be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account
under RCW 43.99N.060.
(d) On and after January 1, 2021, if bonds have been issued for one
or more ferry vessels as described in section 2 of this act, the
revenues under this section in a county with a population of one
million or more must be used for, and may be pledged to, the purpose of
paying principal and interest payments on those bonds, including
funding reserves for this purpose, until the bonds are retired or
defeased.
(e) At least seventy percent of moneys spent under (a)(i) of this
subsection for the period January 1, 1992, through December 31, 2000,
shall be used only for the purchase, design, construction, and
remodeling of performing arts, visual arts, heritage, and cultural
facilities, and for the purchase of fixed assets that will benefit art,
heritage, and cultural organizations. For purposes of this subsection,
fixed assets are tangible objects such as machinery and other equipment
intended to be held or used for ten years or more. Moneys received
under this subsection (3)(((d))) (e) may be used for payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects.
Qualifying organizations receiving moneys under this subsection
(3)(((d))) (e) must be financially stable and have at least the
following:
(i) A legally constituted and working board of directors;
(ii) A record of artistic, heritage, or cultural accomplishments;
(iii) Been in existence and operating for at least two years;
(iv) Demonstrated ability to maintain net current liabilities at
less than thirty percent of general operating expenses;
(v) Demonstrated ability to sustain operational capacity subsequent
to completion of projects or purchase of machinery and equipment; and
(vi) Evidence that there has been independent financial review of
the organization.
(((e))) (f) At least forty percent of the revenues distributed
pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection for the period January 1, 2001,
through December 31, 2012, shall be deposited in an account and shall
be used to establish an endowment. Principal in the account shall
remain permanent and irreducible. The earnings from investments of
balances in the account may only be used for the purposes of (a)(i) of
this subsection.
(((f))) (g) School districts and schools shall not receive revenues
distributed pursuant to (a)(i) of this subsection.
(((g))) (h) Moneys distributed to art museums, cultural museums,
heritage museums, the arts, and the performing arts, and moneys
distributed for tourism promotion shall be in addition to and may not
be used to replace or supplant any other funding by the legislative
body of the county.
(((h))) (i) As used in this section, "tourism promotion" includes
activities intended to attract visitors for overnight stays, arts,
heritage, and cultural events, and recreational, professional, and
amateur sports events. Moneys allocated to tourism promotion in a
class AA county shall be allocated to nonprofit organizations formed
for the express purpose of tourism promotion in the county. Such
organizations shall use moneys from the taxes to promote events in all
parts of the class AA county.
(((i))) (j) No taxes collected under this section may be used for
the operation or maintenance of a public stadium that is financed
directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged.
Expenditures for operation or maintenance include all expenditures
other than expenditures that directly result in new fixed assets or
that directly increase the capacity, life span, or operating economy of
existing fixed assets.
(((j))) (k) No ad valorem property taxes may be used for debt
service on bonds issued for a public stadium that is financed by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, unless the taxes collected under this
section are or are projected to be insufficient to meet debt service
requirements on such bonds.
(((k))) (l) If a substantial part of the operation and management
of a public stadium that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds to
which the tax is pledged is performed by a nonpublic entity or if a
public stadium is sold that is financed directly or indirectly by bonds
to which the tax is pledged, any bonds to which the tax is pledged
shall be retired. This subsection (3)(((k))) (l) does not apply in
respect to a public stadium under chapter 36.102 RCW transferred to,
owned by, or constructed by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW or a stadium and exhibition center.
(((l))) (m) The county shall not lease a public stadium that is
financed directly or indirectly by bonds to which the tax is pledged
to, or authorize the use of the public stadium by, a professional major
league sports franchise unless the sports franchise gives the right of
first refusal to purchase the sports franchise, upon its sale, to local
government. This subsection (3)(((l))) (m) does not apply to contracts
in existence on April 1, 1986.
If a court of competent jurisdiction declares any provision of this
subsection (3) invalid, then that invalid provision shall be null and
void and the remainder of this section is not affected.

--- END ---