BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.52.050 and 2008 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award,
it shall promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other
person affected thereby, with a copy thereof by mail, which shall be
addressed to such person at his or her last known address as shown by
the records of the department. The copy, in case the same is a final
order, decision, or award, shall bear on the same side of the same page
on which is found the amount of the award, a statement, set in black
faced type of at least ten point body or size, that such final order,
decision, or award shall become final within sixty days from the date
the order is communicated to the parties unless a written request for
reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries,
Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance
appeals, Olympia. However, a department order or decision making
demand, whether with or without penalty, for repayment of sums paid to
a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health services
rendered to an industrially injured worker, shall state that such order
or decision shall become final within twenty days from the date the
order or decision is communicated to the parties unless a written
request for reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and
industries, Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial
insurance appeals, Olympia.
(2)(a) Whenever the department has taken any action or made any
decision relating to any phase of the administration of this title the
worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may
request reconsideration of the department, or may appeal to the board.
In an appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of
proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the
relief sought in such appeal.
(b) An order by the department awarding benefits shall become
effective and benefits due ((on the date issued.)) within fourteen days
of the date the order becomes final under subsection (1) of this
section. If the department has considered correspondence, medical or
vocational reports, or other information not previously submitted by
the employer, it shall send copies of that information to the employer
with the employer's copy of the department's order. If a written
request for reconsideration of the order is filed under subsection (1)
of this section, or if the department directs submission of further
evidence under RCW 51.52.060(3), or takes further action under RCW
51.52.060(4), the payment of benefits shall be stayed pending issuance
of a further order by the department. Otherwise, subject to (b)(i) and
(ii) of this subsection, if the department order is appealed to the
board of industrial insurance appeals the order shall not be stayed
pending a final decision on the merits unless ordered by the board.
Upon issuance of the order granting the appeal, the board will provide
the worker with notice concerning the potential of an overpayment of
benefits paid pending the outcome of the appeal and the requirements
for interest on unpaid benefits pursuant to RCW 51.52.135. A worker
may request that benefits cease pending appeal at any time following
the employer's motion for stay or the board's order granting appeal.
The request must be submitted in writing to the employer, the board,
((and)) or the department. Any employer may move for a stay of the
order on appeal, in whole or in part. The motion must be filed within
fifteen days ((of the order granting appeal.)) from the date the
board's order granting appeal is communicated to the employer. If no
timely motion for stay is filed, any benefits awarded by the order are
then due. If a motion for stay is timely filed, the board shall
conduct an expedited review of the claim file provided by the
department as it existed on the date of the department order on appeal.
The board shall issue a ((final)) decision within twenty-five days of
the filing of the motion for stay or the order granting appeal,
whichever is later. The board's ((final)) decision may be appealed to
superior court for a nonjury trial in accordance with RCW 51.52.110.
The board shall grant a motion to stay if the moving party demonstrates
that it is more likely than not to prevail on the facts as they existed
at the time of the order on appeal. The board shall not consider the
likelihood of recoupment of benefits as a basis to grant or deny a
motion to stay. If the motion for stay is denied, any benefits awarded
by the department order on appeal shall become due fifteen days from
the date the board's decision becomes final pursuant to RCW 51.52.110.
If a self-insured employer prevails on the merits, any benefits paid
may be recouped pursuant to RCW 51.32.240.
(i) If upon reconsideration requested by a worker or medical
provider, the department has ordered an increase in a permanent partial
disability award from the amount reflected in an earlier order, the
award reflected in the earlier order shall not be stayed pending a
final decision on the merits. However, the increase is stayed without
further action by the board pending a final decision on the merits.
(ii) If any party appeals an order establishing a worker's wages or
the compensation rate at which a worker will be paid temporary or
permanent total disability or loss of earning power benefits, the
worker shall receive payment pending a final decision on the merits
based on the following:
(A) When the employer is self-insured, the wage calculation or
compensation rate the employer most recently submitted to the
department; or
(B) When the employer is insured through the state fund, the
highest wage amount or compensation rate uncontested by the parties.
Payment of benefits or consideration of wages at a rate that is
higher than that specified in (b)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection is
stayed without further action by the board pending a final decision on
the merits.
(c) In an appeal from an order of the department that alleges
willful misrepresentation, the department or self-insured employer
shall initially introduce all evidence in its case in chief. Any such
person aggrieved by the decision and order of the board may thereafter
appeal to the superior court, as prescribed in this chapter.

--- END ---