BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.129 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A long-term care facility or nursing facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW must fully disclose to residents the facility's
policy on accepting medicaid as a payment source. The policy shall
clearly state the circumstances under which the facility provides care
for medicaid eligible residents and for residents who may later become
eligible for medicaid. Policies used by nursing facilities must be
consistent with RCW 74.42.055.
(2) The policy under this section must be provided to residents
orally and in writing prior to admission, in a language that the
resident or the resident's representative understands. The written
policy must be in type font no smaller than fourteen point and written
on a page that is separate from other documents. The policy must be
signed and dated by the resident or the resident's representative, if
the resident lacks capacity. The facility must retain a copy of the
disclosure. Current residents must receive a copy of the policy
consistent with this section by the effective date of this act.

--- END ---