BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.35D.010 and 2005 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that public buildings can be built and
renovated using high-performance methods that save money, improve
school performance, and make workers more productive. High-performance
public buildings are proven to increase student test scores, reduce
worker absenteeism, and cut energy and utility costs.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that state-owned buildings
and schools be improved by adopting recognized standards for high-performance public buildings and allowing flexible methods and choices
in how to achieve those standards. The legislature also intends that
public agencies and public school districts shall document costs and
savings to monitor this program and ensure that economic, community,
and environmental goals are achieved each year, and that an independent
performance review be conducted to evaluate this program and determine
the extent to which the results intended by this chapter are being met.
(3) The legislature further finds that Washington is the second
leading lumber producing state in the nation and a leader in
sustainable forest management. All Washington forest products produced
in compliance with chapter 76.09 RCW and rules adopted under that
chapter are designated as a green source of wood fiber. It is the
intent of the legislature that wood products from a Washington state
designated green source of wood fiber be required for state-funded
construction, to the maximum extent possible. Requiring the use of a
designated green source of wood fiber for state-funded construction
reduces the environmental impacts and carbon footprint of those
projects, increases the marketability of locally grown wood products,
and improves the economic well-being of small and large forest
landowners, thereby improving the likelihood of forest landowners
remaining in forestry and reducing forest land conversion.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.35D.020 and 2006 c 263 s 330 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of general administration.
(2) "Green source of wood fiber" means a Washington forest product
produced in compliance with chapter 76.09 RCW and rules adopted under
that chapter. It does not include any wood from a forest land owner
who has been found to have committed an intentional forest practice
violation within the last three years.
(3) "High-performance public buildings" means high-performance
public buildings designed, constructed, and certified to a standard as
identified in this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Institutions of higher education" means the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
the community colleges, and the technical colleges.
(((4))) (5) "LEED silver standard" means the United States green
building council leadership in energy and environmental design green
building rating standard, referred to as silver standard.
(((5))) (6)(a) "Major facility project" means: (i) A construction
project larger than five thousand gross square feet of occupied or
conditioned space as defined in the Washington state energy code; or
(ii) a building renovation project when the cost is greater than fifty
percent of the assessed value and the project is larger than five
thousand gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space as defined
in the Washington state energy code.
(b) "Major facility project" does not include: (i) Projects for
which the department, public school district, or other applicable
agency and the design team determine the LEED silver standard or the
Washington sustainable school design protocol to be not practicable; or
(ii) transmitter buildings, pumping stations, hospitals, research
facilities primarily used for sponsored laboratory experimentation,
laboratory research, or laboratory training in research methods, or
other similar building types as determined by the department. When the
LEED silver standard is determined to be not practicable for a project,
then it must be determined if any LEED standard is practicable for the
project. If LEED standards or the Washington sustainable school design
protocol are not followed for the project, the public school district
or public agency shall report these reasons to the department.
(((6))) (7) "Public agency" means every state office, officer,
board, commission, committee, bureau, department, and public higher
education institution.
(((7))) (8) "Public school district" means a school district
eligible to receive state basic education moneys pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.
(((8))) (9) "Washington sustainable school design protocol" means
the school design protocol and related information developed by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with
school districts and the school facilities advisory board.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.35D.030 and 2005 c 12 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any
funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a
financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed,
constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard and to
the maximum extent possible will use only wood products from a
Washington state designated green source of wood fiber. This
subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the
design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED
silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.
(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public
agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state
capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least
the LEED silver standard and to the maximum extent possible will use
only wood products from a Washington state designated green source of
wood fiber. This subsection applies to major facility projects that
have not entered the grant application process prior to July 24, 2005,
and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards exist for that type
of building or facility.
(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and
document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility
projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this
section.
(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to
the department on major facility projects and operating savings.
(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in
subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the
governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year
beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department
shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including
reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by RCW
39.35D.020(5)(b) or why wood products from a Washington state
designated green source of wood fiber were not used. The department
shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing implementation of this
chapter, including a discussion of incentives and disincentives related
to implementing this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.35D.040 and 2006 c 263 s 331 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public school districts
receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed and
constructed to at least the LEED silver standard or the Washington
sustainable school design protocol and to the maximum extent possible
will use only wood products from a Washington state designated green
source of wood fiber. To the extent appropriate LEED silver or
Washington sustainable school design protocol standards exist for the
type of building or facility, this subsection applies to major facility
projects that have not received project approval from the
superintendent of public instruction prior to: (a) July 1, 2006, for
volunteering school districts; (b) July 1, 2007, for class one school
districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for class two school districts.
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
superintendent of public instruction shall also report on the
implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard
or Washington sustainable school design protocol was not used as
required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b) or why wood products from a Washington
state designated green source of wood fiber were not used. The
superintendent of public instruction shall make recommendations
regarding the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a
discussion of incentives and disincentives related to implementing this
chapter.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public school
districts. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying compliance with the LEED silver
standard or the Washington sustainable school design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the
superintendent of public instruction, the department, and others at the
superintendent of public instruction's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the
superintendent of public instruction implement this chapter.

--- END ---