BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.517 and 2002 c 290 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)

TABLE 3

DRUG OFFENSE SENTENCING GRID

Seriousness
Level Offender Score
0 to 2 Offender Score
3 to 5 Offender Score
6 to 9 or more

III 51 to 68 months 68+ to 100 months 100+ to 120 months

II 12+ to ((20)) 15
months ((20+ to 60)) 15 to
45 months ((60+ to 120)) 45 to
90 months

I 0 to ((6))
4 months ((6+ to 18))
4+ to 13 months 12+ to ((24)) 18
months

References to months represent the standard sentence ranges. 12+
equals one year and one day.
(2) The court may utilize any other sanctions or alternatives as
authorized by law, including but not limited to the special drug
offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.660 or drug court under
RCW 2.28.170.
(3) Nothing in this section creates an entitlement for a criminal
defendant to any specific sanction, alternative, sentence option, or
substance abuse treatment.
(4) This section applies to offenders sentenced on or after July 1,
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---