BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.090 and 1980 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation may make available its engineering
and other technical services, with or without charge, to any
municipality or person desiring them in connection with the planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance or operation of
airports or air navigation facilities.
The department may render financial assistance by grant or loan or
both to any municipality or municipalities acting jointly in the
planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or
operation of an airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or
controlled by such municipality or municipalities, or to any Indian
tribe recognized as such by the federal government or such tribes
acting jointly in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement,
maintenance or operation of an airport, owned or controlled, or to be
owned or controlled by such tribe or tribes and to be held available
for the general use of the public, out of appropriations made by the
legislature for such purposes. Such financial assistance may be
furnished in connection with federal or other financial aid for the
same purposes: PROVIDED, That no grant or loan or both shall be in
excess of ((two hundred fifty)) five hundred thousand dollars for any
one project: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no grant or loan or both shall be
granted unless the municipality or municipalities acting jointly, or
the tribe or tribes acting jointly shall from their own funds match any
funds made available by the department upon such ratio as the
department may prescribe.
The department is authorized to act as agent of any municipality or
municipalities acting jointly or any tribe or tribes acting jointly,
upon the request of such municipality or municipalities, or such tribe
or tribes in accepting, receiving, receipting for and disbursing
federal moneys, and other moneys public or private, made available to
finance, in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition, construction,
improvement, maintenance or operation of an airport or air navigation
facility; and if requested by such municipality or municipalities, or
tribe or tribes, may act as its or their agent in contracting for and
supervising such planning, acquisition, construction, improvement,
maintenance, or operation; and all municipalities and tribes are
authorized to designate the department as their agent for the foregoing
purposes. The department, as principal on behalf of the state, and any
municipality on its own behalf, may enter into any contracts, with each
other or with the United States or with any person, which may be
required in connection with a grant or loan of federal moneys for
airport or air navigation facility purposes. All federal moneys
accepted under this section shall be accepted and transferred or
expended by the department upon such terms and conditions as are
prescribed by the United States. All moneys received by the department
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and,
unless otherwise prescribed by the authority from which such moneys
were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to
the purposes for which the moneys were made available, and held by the
state in trust for such purposes. All such moneys are hereby
appropriated for the purposes for which the same were made available,
to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions
upon which they were made available: PROVIDED, That any landing fee or
charge imposed by any Indian tribe or tribes for the privilege of use
of an airport facility planned, acquired, constructed, improved,
maintained, or operated with financial assistance from the department
pursuant to this section must apply equally to tribal and nontribal
members: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event any municipality or
municipalities or Indian tribe or tribes, or any distributor of
aircraft fuel as defined by RCW 82.42.020 which operates in any airport
facility which has received financial assistance pursuant to this
section, fails to collect the aircraft fuel excise tax as specified in
chapter 82.42 RCW, all funds or value of technical assistance given or
paid to such municipality or municipalities or Indian tribe or tribes
under the provisions of this section shall revert to the department,
and shall be due and payable to the department immediately.

--- END ---