BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Washington state is fortunate to have a
dynamic technology industry sector that benefits from vibrant global
demand for its output and that helps drive the state's economy.
Washington state is uniquely positioned to shape its future success in
innovation in the technology sectors of life sciences and high
technology. Nearly every state in the nation is competing to develop
a strong innovation economy. Washington has world-class research
institutions, entrepreneurial spirit and talent, an actively
collaborative community, and an existing foundational sector.
(2) To leverage its potential, the state must actively work to
create and ensure a supportive environment that enables entrepreneurial
people and companies to convert their innovative ideas into marketable
new products and services. Providing such an environment would:
(a) Solidify Washington state as a global hotbed of knowledge and
technology commercialization;
(b) Create more highly rewarding and well-paying careers for
Washington's citizens;
(c) Grow more companies in new and far-reaching markets;
(d) Renew traditional industries through value-added technology
adaptation; and
(e) Generate solid returns for Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of community, trade, and
economic development, in consultation with life sciences trade and
technology trade associations, shall review how to best promote and
grow innovation in the development and commercialization of proprietary
technology in: (a) Life sciences, such as medical devices and
biotechnology, including biofuels and alternative clean energy; and (b)
information technology, including hardware, software, and internet
infrastructure, that address high potential emerging and growing
markets.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development,
in consultation with life sciences trade and technology trade
associations, shall take the following actions:
(a) Investigate targeted investment strategies to advance
commercialization and innovation at the preseed and seed stage of
companies in Washington state;
(b) Monitor and mitigate state policies, bills, and fiscal affairs
related to life sciences and technology innovation to ensure
competitive growth of the industry; and
(c) Work with the Washington economic development commission to
align the following with the state's comprehensive economic development
plan:
(i) Overall strategies and direction of state government activities
related to life sciences and technology innovation;
(ii) The state's technology-based economic development efforts,
making sure the necessary infrastructure is in place to assist
companies at every stage of the business life cycle;
(iii) Technology transfer and commercialization from the state's
public research universities;
(iv) Chart the course for strategy implementation, tactics, and
setting high expectations for continuous high technology business and
employee growth in Washington state;
(v) Conduct market analysis and competitive review; and
(vi) Collaborate with industry representatives and others to
increase the amount of local or regional investment capital available
for early stage investments in Washington companies.
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and
legislature by December 1, 2009.

--- END ---