BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Dyslexia is a language-based learning
disability that affects individuals throughout their lives. Washington
state has a long-standing tradition of working to serve its students
with dyslexia. Since 2005, the legislature has provided funding for
five pilot projects to implement research-based, multisensory literacy
intervention for students with dyslexia. Participating schools were
required to have a three-tiered reading structure in place, provide
professional development training to teachers, assess students, and
collect and maintain data on student progress.
The legislature finds that the students receiving intervention
support through the dyslexia pilot projects have made substantial and
steady academic gains. The legislature intends to sustain this work
and expand the implementation to a level of statewide support for
students with dyslexia by developing and providing information and
training, including a handbook to continue to improve the skills of our
students with dyslexia.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Within available resources, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the school districts that
participated in the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia pilot program, and with an
international nonprofit organization dedicated to supporting efforts to
provide appropriate identification of and instruction for individuals
with dyslexia, shall:
(a) Develop an educator training program to enhance the reading,
writing, and spelling skills of students with dyslexia. The training
program must provide research-based, multisensory literacy intervention
professional development in the areas of dyslexia and intervention
implementation. The program shall be posted on the web site of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The training
program may be regionally delivered through the educational service
districts. The educational service districts may seek assistance from
the international nonprofit organization to deliver the training; and
(b) Develop a dyslexia handbook to be used as a reference for
teachers and parents of students who are dyslexic. The handbook shall
be modeled after other state dyslexia handbooks, and shall include
guidelines for school districts to follow as they identify and provide
services for students with dyslexia. Additionally, the handbook shall
provide school districts, and parents and guardians with information
regarding the state's relevant statutes and their relation to federal
special education laws. The handbook shall be posted on the web site
of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and annually thereafter, each
educational service district shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction the number of individuals who
participate in the training developed and offered by the educational
service district. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report that information to the legislative education
committees.

--- END ---