BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Current population growth and expanding
development into traditionally nonurban areas have increasingly brought
humans into contact with wildfires. The level of development of an
area and that area's proximity to a municipal water system directly
affects the amount of water available to firefighters for suppression
activities. Homes in areas without access to a municipal water system
are more difficult to defend and protect from wildfire as water must be
brought to the site in tankers or by drawing from static water sources
nearby. The forecasted growth in catastrophic wildfires indicates that
climatic change could cause an increase in both fire suppression costs
and economic losses due to wildfires. It is therefore the purpose of
this act to recognize the importance of preventing wildfires by
allowing landowners in rural areas to create a small fire suppression
pond on their property that can be used for fire prevention and fire
suppression purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.015 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology.
(3) "Fire suppression pond" means a pond of less than ten acre feet
in volume used to impound water for fire suppression or fire
prevention. Fire prevention includes, but is not limited to, water
stored for emergency fire suppression activities or for the application
of water to trees or other vegetation in order to prevent or address
hazardous fire conditions.
(4) "Municipal water supplier" means an entity that supplies water
for municipal water supply purposes.
(((4))) (5) "Municipal water supply purposes" means a beneficial
use of water: (a) For residential purposes through fifteen or more
residential service connections or for providing residential use of
water for a nonresidential population that is, on average, at least
twenty-five people for at least sixty days a year; (b) for governmental
or governmental proprietary purposes by a city, town, public utility
district, county, sewer district, or water district; or (c) indirectly
for the purposes in (a) or (b) of this subsection through the delivery
of treated or raw water to a public water system for such use. If
water is beneficially used under a water right for the purposes listed
in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, any other beneficial use of
water under the right generally associated with the use of water within
a municipality is also for "municipal water supply purposes,"
including, but not limited to, beneficial use for commercial,
industrial, irrigation of parks and open spaces, institutional,
landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance and repair, or related
purposes. If a governmental entity holds a water right that is for the
purposes listed in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection, its use of
water or its delivery of water for any other beneficial use generally
associated with the use of water within a municipality is also for
"municipal water supply purposes," including, but not limited to,
beneficial use for commercial, industrial, irrigation of parks and open
spaces, institutional, landscaping, fire flow, water system maintenance
and repair, or related purposes.
(((5))) (6) "Person" means any firm, association, water users'
association, corporation, irrigation district, or municipal
corporation, as well as an individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
A withdrawal of surface water for a fire suppression pond is exempt
from the permit requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.44.035 and 2000 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology((;)).
(2) "Director" means the director of ecology((;)).
(3) "Fire suppression pond" means a pond of less than ten acre feet
in volume used to impound water for fire suppression or fire
prevention. Fire prevention includes, but is not limited to, water
stored for emergency fire suppression activities or for the application
of water to trees or other vegetation in order to prevent or address
hazardous fire conditions.
(4) "Groundwaters" means all waters that exist beneath the land
surface or beneath the bed of any stream, lake or reservoir, or other
body of surface water within the boundaries of this state, whatever may
be the geological formation or structure in which such water stands or
flows, percolates or otherwise moves. There is a recognized
distinction between natural groundwater and artificially stored
groundwater((;)).
(((4))) (5) "Natural groundwater" means water that exists in
underground storage owing wholly to natural processes((;)).
(((5))) (6) "Artificially stored groundwater" means water that is
made available in underground storage artificially, either
intentionally, or incidentally to irrigation and that otherwise would
have been dissipated by natural processes((; and)).
(((6))) (7) "Underground artificial storage and recovery project"
means any project in which it is intended to artificially store water
in the ground through injection, surface spreading and infiltration, or
other department-approved method, and to make subsequent use of the
stored water. However, (a) this subsection does not apply to
irrigation return flow, or to operational and seepage losses that occur
during the irrigation of land, or to water that is artificially stored
due to the construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation
district project, or to projects involving water reclaimed in
accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies to
those instances of claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district
project or operational and seepage losses that occur during the
irrigation of land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial
recharge already existing at the time a groundwater subarea is
established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A withdrawal of public groundwaters for a fire suppression pond is
exempt from the permit requirements of RCW 90.44.050.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.44.050 and 2003 c 307 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
After June 6, 1945, no withdrawal of public groundwaters of the
state shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such
withdrawal be constructed, unless an application to appropriate such
waters has been made to the department and a permit has been granted by
it as herein provided((: EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That)). However, any
withdrawal of public groundwaters for stock-watering purposes, or for
the watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden not exceeding one-half acre in area, or for single or group domestic uses in an amount
not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, or as provided in RCW
90.44.052 or section 5 of this act, or for an industrial purpose in an
amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be
exempt from the provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it
is regularly used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to
that established by a permit issued under the provisions of this
chapter((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). The department from time to
time may require the person or agency making any such small withdrawal
to furnish information as to the means for and the quantity of that
withdrawal((: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). Additionally, at the option
of the party making withdrawals of groundwaters of the state not
exceeding five thousand gallons per day, applications under this
section or declarations under RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits
and certificates obtained in the same manner and under the same
requirements as is in this chapter provided in the case of withdrawals
in excess of five thousand gallons a day.

--- END ---