BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall work with the Washington State University
extension's division of governmental studies and services to develop a
statewide telework program. The department shall serve as the program
administrator, and Washington State University extension shall serve as
the program manager. The purpose of the statewide telework program is
to promote, assist, and provide research to accelerate the use of
telework in Washington state. The goals of the program are to: (a)
Improve the effectiveness of our transportation system; (b) decrease
greenhouse gas emissions; and (c) enhance our state's competitiveness
in the global economy.
(2) The duties of the program include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) Promote telework in Washington state as an important economic
development, transportation, and environmental strategy through
presentations, publications, employer seminars, industry events, and
executive briefings;
(b) Alert industry, government, and nonprofit leaders to the
availability of statewide resources and telework support;
(c) Develop and maintain a comprehensive set of telework resources,
including ongoing enhancement of the online toolkit developed during
the Kitsap telework pilot project, best practices and case studies,
research, and news, as well as establish and maintain connections to
telework activities, resources, and leaders in Washington state and
across the country;
(d) Implement the community template developed during the Kitsap
telework pilot project to enable local and regional governments,
transit agencies, and other organizations to institute telework
efforts;
(e) Offer a suite of services to assist employers and communities
in meeting the range of telework needs, from limited assistance in
using the online toolkit to technical assistance, such as assessment,
program and policy development, and training;
(f) Secure expertise to support statewide and local telework
initiatives;
(g) Coordinate telework efforts across the state through
collaboration and communication in order to share resources and lessons
learned while avoiding costly duplication of efforts and
inconsistencies; and
(h) Conduct telework research to identify current telework use and
business benefits, barriers to implementation, employer needs related
to program development and expansion, impacts on organizational
culture, transportation, and the environment, as well as opportunities
related to technology, economic development, and telecenter
establishment and use.
(3) The program must report biennially to the transportation
committees of the legislature on the progress of the program in meeting
goals and duties provided in this section. By December 2010, the
program must evaluate and make recommendations on strategies to further
telework expansion, including how the state should be organized most
effectively to support telework activities.

--- END ---