BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.52.060 and 2005 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, it shall be the duty
of the chief of the Washington state patrol to file, tabulate, and
analyze all accident reports and to publish annually, immediately
following the close of each fiscal year, and monthly during the course
of the year, statistical information based thereon showing the number
of accidents, the location, the frequency, whether any driver involved
in the accident was distracted at the time of the accident and the
circumstances thereof, and other statistical information which may
prove of assistance in determining the cause of vehicular accidents.
However, the information described in this section must be compiled or
collected solely for the purposes related to those identified in 23
U.S.C. Sec. 152 and 23 U.S.C. Sec. 409.
(2) Distractions contributing to an accident to be reported must
include at least the following: Not distracted; operating a handheld
electronic telecommunication device; operating a hands-free wireless
telecommunication device; other electronic devices (including, but not
limited to, PDA's, laptop computers, navigational devices, etc.);
adjusting an audio or entertainment system; smoking; eating or
drinking; reading or writing; grooming; interacting with children,
passengers, animals, or objects in the vehicle; other inside
distractions; outside distractions; and distraction unknown.
(3) Such accident reports and analysis or reports thereof shall be
available to the director of licensing, the department of
transportation, the utilities and transportation commission, the
traffic safety commission, and other public entities authorized by the
chief of the Washington state patrol, or their duly authorized
representatives, for further tabulation and analysis for pertinent data
relating to the regulation of highway traffic, highway construction,
vehicle operators and all other purposes, and to publish information so
derived as may be deemed of publication value. However, any public
entity listed in this subsection shall compile or collect the
information described in this section solely for the purposes related
to those identified in 23 U.S.C. Sec. 152 and 23 U.S.C. Sec. 409.
(4) Information compiled or collected under this section is subject
to public disclosure in a manner consistent with the state public
records act, chapter 42.56 RCW, but may be released only in conformance
with 23 U.S.C. Sec. 409.

--- END ---