BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.041 and 2005 c 274 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department has reason to believe that a person is
suffering from a physical or mental disability or disease that may
affect that person's ability to drive a motor vehicle, the department
must evaluate whether the person is able to safely drive a motor
vehicle. As part of the evaluation:
(a) The department shall permit the person to demonstrate
personally that notwithstanding the disability or disease he or she is
able to safely drive a motor vehicle.
(b) The department may require the person to obtain a statement
signed by a licensed physician or other proper authority designated by
the department certifying the person's condition.
(i) The department's authority to require the person to obtain a
statement signed by an ophthalmologist or optometrist is limited to
requiring the person to obtain a statement signed by the
ophthalmologist or optometrist certifying the person's visual acuity
and certifying whether the person has a visual condition that could
impair his or her ability to safely operate a motor vehicle at night.
(ii) The statement is for the confidential use of the director and
the chief of the Washington state patrol and for other public officials
designated by law. It is exempt from public inspection and copying
notwithstanding chapter 42.56 RCW.
(((ii))) (iii) The statement may not be offered as evidence in any
court except when appeal is taken from the order of the director
canceling or withholding a person's driving privilege. However, the
department may make the statement available to the director of the
department of retirement systems for use in determining eligibility for
or continuance of disability benefits and it may be offered and
admitted as evidence in any administrative proceeding or court action
concerning the disability benefits.
(2) On the basis of the evaluation the department may:
(a) Issue or renew a driver's license to the person without
restrictions;
(b) Cancel or withhold the driving privilege from the person; or
(c) Issue a restricted driver's license to the person. The
restrictions must be suitable to the licensee's driving ability. The
restrictions may include:
(i) Special mechanical control devices on the motor vehicle
operated by the licensee;
(ii) Limitations on the type of motor vehicle that the licensee may
operate; or
(iii) Other restrictions determined by the department to be
appropriate to assure the licensee's safe operation of a motor vehicle.
(3) The department may either issue a special restricted license or
may set forth the restrictions upon the usual license form.
(4) The department may suspend or revoke a restricted license upon
receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the restrictions.
In that event the licensee is entitled to a driver improvement
interview and a hearing as provided by RCW 46.20.322 or 46.20.328.
(5) Operating a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
imposed in a restricted license is a traffic infraction.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.305 and 1999 c 351 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, having good cause to believe that a licensed
driver is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed may
upon notice require him or her to submit to an examination.
(2) The department shall require a driver reported under RCW
46.52.070 (2) and (3) to submit to an examination. The examination
must be completed no later than one hundred twenty days after the
accident report required under RCW 46.52.070(2) is received by the
department unless the department, at the request of the operator,
extends the time for examination.
(3)(a) The department may in addition to an examination under this
section require such person to obtain a certificate showing his or her
condition signed by a licensed physician or other proper authority
designated by the department.
(b) The department's authority to require the person to obtain a
certificate signed by an ophthalmologist or optometrist is limited to
requiring the person to obtain a certificate signed by the
ophthalmologist or optometrist certifying the person's visual acuity
and certifying whether the person has a visual condition that could
impair his or her ability to safely operate a motor vehicle at night.
(4) Upon the conclusion of an examination under this section the
department shall take driver improvement action as may be appropriate
and may suspend or revoke the license of such person or permit him or
her to retain such license, or may issue a license subject to
restrictions as permitted under RCW 46.20.041. The department may
suspend or revoke the license of such person who refuses or neglects to
submit to such examination.
(5) The department may require payment of a fee by a person subject
to examination under this section. The department shall set the fee in
an amount that is sufficient to cover the additional cost of
administering examinations required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
An eye care provider licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.53 RCW is
not civilly or criminally liable for performing duties under this
chapter with regard to certifying a person's condition if the duties
were performed in good faith.

--- END ---