BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.380 and 2003 c 317 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified department
improved access facilities with a motor vehicle may be required, while
within or while using an improved access facility, to display ((a
current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit)) on the
motor vehicle ((while within or while using an improved access
facility)) one of the following:
(i) A current annual fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit as
provided in this section;
(ii) A wild on Washington, endangered wildlife, or Washington's
wildlife special license plate as authorized in chapter 46.16 RCW; or
(iii) A personalized license plate as defined in RCW 46.16.560.
((An)) (b) As used in this section, "improved access facility"
((is)) means a clearly identified area specifically created for motor
vehicle parking, and includes any boat launch or boat ramp associated
with the parking area, but does not include the department parking
facilities at the Gorge Concert Center near George, Washington.
(2)(a) One vehicle use permit shall be issued at no charge with an
initial purchase of either an annual saltwater, freshwater,
combination, small game hunting, big game hunting, or trapping license,
or a watchable wildlife decal, issued by the department.
(b) The annual fee for a fish and wildlife lands vehicle use
permit, if purchased separately, is ((ten dollars)):
(i) Twenty dollars beginning on the effective date of this section;
(ii) Twenty-five dollars beginning July 2, 2011; and
(iii) Thirty dollars beginning July 1, 2013.
(c) A person to whom the department has issued a vehicle use permit
or who has purchased a vehicle use permit separately may purchase
additional vehicle use permits from the department at a cost of
((five)) ten dollars per vehicle use permit.
(d) Revenue derived from the sale of fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permits shall be used solely for the following purposes:
(i) Stewardship and maintenance of department improved access
facilities; and
(ii) Maintenance and tangible physical improvements to land managed
by the department, such as fence construction and upkeep, weed control,
road maintenance, and restoration projects.
(e) The revenue collected under this section may not be used by the
department for administrative, scientific, or enforcement purposes.
(3) Youth groups may use department improved access facilities
without possessing a vehicle use permit when accompanied by a vehicle
use permit holder.
(((2))) (4) The vehicle use permit must be displayed from the
interior of the motor vehicle so that it is clearly visible from
outside of the motor vehicle before entering upon or using the motor
vehicle on a department improved access facility. The vehicle use
permit can be transferred between two vehicles and must contain space
for the vehicle license numbers of each vehicle.
(((3))) (5)(a) Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands
vehicle use permit or applicable license plate type, if required by
this section, is ((an)) a natural resources infraction under chapter
7.84 RCW, and department employees are authorized to issue a notice of
infraction to the registered owner of any motor vehicle entering upon
or using a department improved access facility ((without such a vehicle
use permit)) in violation of this section.
(b) The penalty for ((failure to clearly display the vehicle use
permit)) a violation of this section is sixty-six dollars. This
penalty ((is)) must be reduced to thirty dollars if the registered
owner provides proof to the court that he or she purchased a vehicle
use permit within fifteen days after the issuance of the notice of
violation.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.880 and 2003 c 153 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall manage wildlife programs in a manner that
provides for public opportunities to view wildlife and supports nature-based and wildlife viewing tourism without impairing the state's
wildlife resources.
(2)(a) The department may develop information accessible through
the department's internet web site that promotes outdoor recreational
and wildlife viewing opportunities. The web-based information may
include, but is not limited to, information about:
(i) The department's wildlife areas and access sites;
(ii) Public and private lands open to the public for recreational
access; and
(iii) Information promoting watchable wildlife and nature-based
tourism activities.
(b) The department may require, as a condition of accessing the
web-based information authorized in this section, the purchase of
certain recreational license documents provided for in chapter 77.32
RCW, including the fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit issued
under RCW 77.32.380. The commission may identify by rule which
recreational license documents provide access to the web-based
information.
(c) Information relating to hunting and fishing regulations, as
well as general information pertaining to the department, must be
accessible to the general public without having to first purchase a
license from the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This act applies prospectively only.
However, the department of fish and wildlife may limit web-based access
under section 2 of this act to information relating to outdoor
recreational and wildlife viewing opportunities collected prior to the
effective date of this section.
(2) The privilege of accessing information under section 2 of this
act applies only to the convenience of instantaneous access via the
department's internet web site. Nothing in this act is intended to
limit the public's ability to otherwise access information under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 77.12.065 (Wildlife viewing tourism) and
2003 c 183 s 1 are each repealed.

--- END ---