BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.060 and 1985 c 335 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall ((be required to)) approve or deny the
application within forty-five days after ((the)) filing ((thereof)),
and shall immediately notify the applicant in writing of its
decision((: PROVIDED, That)). If the department is not able within
forty-five days, despite due diligence, to secure all information
necessary to establish ((his)) eligibility, the department ((is charged
to)) shall continue to secure such information ((and)). If such
information, when established, makes the applicant eligible, the
department shall pay ((his)) the grant from the date of authorization
or forty-five days after the date of application, whichever is
((sooner.
Any person currently ineligible, who will become eligible after the
occurrence of a specific event, may apply for assistance within forty-
five days of that event)) earlier, except that the department shall not
make payments for any period of time in which the applicant is
ineligible for public assistance as an inmate of a public institution
under RCW 74.08.025(1)(c).
The department ((is authorized)) may, in respect to work
requirements, ((to)) provide employment and training services,
including job search, job placement, work orientation, and necessary
support services to verify eligibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect November 1, 2009.

--- END ---