BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.14.100 and 2006 c 307 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The administrator, in consultation with participating agencies
and the committee, shall select the health technologies to be reviewed
by the committee under RCW 70.14.110. Up to six may be selected for
review in the first year after June 7, 2006, and up to eight may be
selected in the second year after June 7, 2006. In making the
selection, priority shall be given to any technology for which:
(a) There are concerns about its safety, efficacy, or cost-effectiveness, especially relative to existing alternatives, or
significant variations in its use;
(b) Actual or expected state expenditures are high, due to demand
for the technology, its cost, or both; and
(c) There is adequate evidence available to conduct the complete
review.
(2)(a) Before any health technology may be selected for review,
there must be a thirty-day public comment period during which
interested parties may submit, in writing to the committee, any
information that may be of use in the assessment. The information may
include current studies that may justify delaying the assessment until
the results are published.
(b) The thirty-day public comment period begins when the committee
publishes an explanation of the technology under consideration.
(c) Before its publication of the draft assessment report for any
health technology, the committee must issue a written report responding
to the evidence-based comments submitted during the thirty-day comment
period.
(d) The committee must provide an opportunity for evidence-based
public testimony for each technology scheduled for review, at a time
and place to be determined by the committee. Notice must be provided
thirty days before the meeting.
(3) A health technology for which the committee has made a
determination under RCW 70.14.110 shall be considered for rereview at
least once every eighteen months, beginning the date the determination
is made. The administrator, in consultation with participating
agencies and the committee, shall select the technology for rereview if
he or she decides that evidence has since become available that could
change a previous determination. Upon rereview, consideration shall be
given only to evidence made available since the previous determination.
(((3))) (4) Pursuant to a petition submitted by an interested
party, the health technology clinical committee may select health
technologies for review that have not otherwise been selected by the
administrator under ((subsection (1) or (2) of)) this section.
(((4))) (5) Upon the selection of a health technology for review,
the administrator shall contract for a systematic evidence-based
assessment of the technology's safety, efficacy, and cost-effectiveness. The contract shall:
(a) Be with an evidence-based practice center designated as such by
the federal agency for health care research and quality, or other
appropriate entity;
(b) Require the assessment be initiated no sooner than thirty days
after notice of the selection of the health technology for review is
posted on the internet under RCW 70.14.130;
(c) Require, in addition to other information considered as part of
the assessment, consideration of: (i) Safety, health outcome, and cost
data submitted by a participating agency; and (ii) evidence submitted
by any interested party; and
(d) Require the assessment to: (i) Give the greatest weight to the
evidence determined, based on objective indicators, to be the most
valid and reliable, considering the nature and source of the evidence,
the empirical characteristic of the studies or trials upon which the
evidence is based, and the consistency of the outcome with comparable
studies; and (ii) take into account any unique impacts of the
technology on specific populations based upon factors such as sex, age,
ethnicity, race, or disability.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.14.110 and 2006 c 307 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The committee shall determine, for each health technology
selected for review under RCW 70.14.100: (a) The conditions, if any,
under which the health technology will be included as a covered benefit
in health care programs of participating agencies; and (b) if covered,
the criteria which the participating agency administering the program
must use to decide whether the technology is medically necessary, or
proper and necessary treatment.
(2) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section,
the committee:
(a) Shall consider, in an open and transparent process, evidence
regarding the safety, efficacy, and cost-effectiveness of the
technology as set forth in the systematic assessment conducted under
RCW 70.14.100(((4))) (5);
(b) Shall provide an opportunity for public comment; and
(c) May establish ad hoc temporary advisory groups if specialized
expertise is needed to review a particular health technology or group
of health technologies, or to seek input from enrollees or clients of
state purchased health care programs. Advisory group members are
immune from civil liability for any official act performed in good
faith as a member of the group. As a condition of appointment, each
person shall agree to the terms and conditions imposed by the
administrator regarding conflicts of interest.
(3) Determinations of the committee under subsection (1) of this
section shall be consistent with decisions made under the federal
medicare program and in expert treatment guidelines, including those
from specialty physician organizations and patient advocacy
organizations, unless the committee concludes, based on its review of
the systematic assessment, that substantial evidence regarding the
safety, efficacy, and cost-effectiveness of the technology supports a
contrary determination. The committee shall issue a written report
when medicare decisions or expert treatment guidelines are not followed
and shall cite the evidence and reasons for not following those
decisions or guidelines.

--- END ---