BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
INTENT. The legislature recognizes that Washington's current
three-tier system, where the functions of manufacturing, distributing,
and retailing are distinct and the financial relationships and business
transactions between entities in these tiers are regulated, is a
valuable system for the distribution of beer and wine. The legislature
further recognizes that the historical total prohibition on ownership
of an interest in one tier by a person with an ownership interest in
another tier, as well as the historical restriction on financial
incentives and business relationships between tiers, is unduly
restrictive. The legislature finds the modifications contained in this
act are appropriate, so long as the modifications do not impermissibly
interfere with the goals of orderly marketing of alcohol in the state,
encouraging moderation in consumption of alcohol by the citizens of the
state, protecting the public interest and advancing public safety by
preventing the use and consumption of alcohol by minors and other
abusive consumption, and promoting the efficient collection of taxes by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout
sections 1 through 6 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Adverse impact on public health and safety" means a
determination by the board that the practice or proposed practice has
or will result in alcohol being made more attractive or available to
minors than would otherwise be the case or has or will result in
overconsumption, consumption by minors, or other harmful or abusive
forms of consumption.
(2) "Affiliate" means any one of two or more persons if one of
those persons has actual or legal control, directly or indirectly,
whether by stock ownership or otherwise, of the other person or persons
and any one of two or more persons subject to common control, actual or
legal, directly or indirectly, whether by stock ownership or otherwise.
(3) "Industry member" means a licensed manufacturer, producer,
supplier, importer, wholesaler, distributor, authorized representative,
certificate of approval holder, warehouse, and any affiliates,
subsidiaries, officers, directors, partners, agents, employees, and
representatives of any industry member. "Industry member" does not
include the board or any of the board's employees.
(4) "Person" means any individual, partnership, joint stock
company, business trust, association, corporation, or other form of
business enterprise, including a receiver, trustee, or liquidating
agent and includes any officer or employee of a retailer or industry
member.
(5) "Retailer" means the holder of a license issued by the board to
allow for the sale of alcoholic beverages to consumers for consumption
on or off premises and any of the retailer's agents, officers,
directors, shareholders, partners, or employees. "Retailer" does not
include the board or any of the board's employees.
(6) "Undue influence over the purchasing, marketing, or sales
decisions of one retailer or industry member over another industry
member or retailer" means any agreement written or unwritten or any
other business practices or arrangements which result directly or
indirectly in circumstances including but not limited to the following:
(a) Any form of coercion between industry members and retailers or
between retailers and industry members through acts or threats of
physical or economic harm, including threat of loss of supply or threat
of curtailment of purchase;
(b) A retailer on an involuntary basis purchasing less than it
would have of another industry member's product;
(c) Purchases made by a retailer or industry member as a
prerequisite for purchase of other items;
(d) A retailer purchasing a specific or minimum quantity or type of
a product or products from an industry member;
(e) An industry member requiring a retailer to take and dispose of
a certain product type or quota of the industry member's products;
(f) A retailer having a continuing obligation to purchase or
otherwise promote or display an industry member's product;
(g) An industry member having a continuing obligation to sell a
product to a retailer;
(h) A retailer having a commitment not to terminate its
relationship with the industry member with respect to purchase of the
industry member's products or the industry member having a commitment
not to terminate its relationship with a retailer with respect to the
sale of a particular product or products;
(i) An industry member being involved in the day-to-day operations
of the retailer or the retailer being involved in the day-to-day
operations of the industry member in a manner that violates the
provisions of this section;
(j) Discriminatory pricing practices as prohibited by law or other
practices that are discriminatory if that product is not offered to all
retailers in the local market on the same terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
LAWFUL FINANCIAL INTEREST. (1) Notwithstanding any prohibitions
and restrictions contained in this title, it shall be lawful for an
industry member or affiliate to have a direct or indirect financial
interest in a retailer, and for a retailer or affiliate to have a
direct or indirect financial interest in an industry member unless such
interest has or will result in undue influence over the purchasing
decisions of the retailer and/or undue influence over the marketing or
sales decisions of the industry member or has or will result in an
adverse impact on public health and safety.
(2) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
that a proposed or existing financial interest has or will result in
undue influence over purchasing, marketing, or sales decisions of a
retailer or in undue influence over marketing or sales decisions of an
industry member or has or will result in an adverse impact on public
health and safety may file a complaint with the board. Upon receipt of
a complaint the board may investigate and if the investigation reveals
the practice has or will result in undue influence over purchasing,
marketing, or sales decisions of a retailer or in undue influence over
marketing or sales decisions of an industry member or has or will
result in an adverse impact on public health and safety the board may
issue an administrative violation notice to the industry member, to the
retailer, or both. The recipient of the administrative notice of
violation may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) It shall be presumed any financial interest or arrangement
allowed by law as of the effective date of this act, including but not
limited to those financial arrangements allowed under RCW 66.28.010 as
it existed on the effective date of this act, is a lawful financial
interest, unless subject to a later determination the existing
financial interest results in undue influence over purchasing,
marketing, or sales decisions of a retailer, undue influence over
marketing or sales decisions of an industry member, or has an adverse
impact on public health and safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
MONEYS' WORTH. Except as provided in section 5 of this act, no
industry member shall advance and no retailer shall receive moneys or
moneys' worth under an agreement written or unwritten or by means of
any other business practice or arrangement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
EXCEPTIONS TO MONEYS' WORTH PROHIBITION. (1)(a) Nothing in section
4 of this act prohibits an industry member from providing retailers
branded promotional items which are of nominal value. Items include
but are not limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils,
coasters, menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses,
bottles or can openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts,
hats, visors, and other items of similar nominal value, whether a
single item or in the aggregate. Branded promotional items:
(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or employees in a
manner consistent with its license;
(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member
only;
(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and
their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or
their employees to retail customers; and
(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal to youth.
(b) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of this
subsection has or will result in undue influence over marketing or
sales decisions of an industry member or has or will result in an
adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise inconsistent
with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may file a complaint with
the board. Upon receipt of a complaint the board may investigate and
if the investigation reveals the provision of branded promotional items
has or will result in an undue influence over marketing or sales
decisions of an industry member or has or will result in an adverse
impact on public health and safety or is otherwise inconsistent with
(a) of this subsection the board may issue an administrative violation
notice to the industry member, to the retailer, or both. The recipient
of the administrative violation notice may request a hearing under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in section 4 of this act prohibits an industry member
from providing to a special occasion licensee and a special occasion
licensee from receiving services for:
(a) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;
or
(b) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer
or wine tasting exhibition or judging event.
(3) Nothing in sections 1 through 6 of this act prohibit industry
members from performing, and retailers from accepting the service of
building, rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories;
rotating and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products;
providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of
their own brands; and performing such similar business services
consistent with board rules.
(4) Nothing in section 4 of this act prohibits:
(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and
(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information
related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or
promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or
(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and
their products.
(5) Nothing in section 4 of this act prohibits the performance of
personal services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or
certificate of approval holder to retailers when the personal services
are (a) conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform,
educate, or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the
manufacturer's products. The performance of personal services may
include participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other
similar informational or educational activities at the premises of a
retailer holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine
and/or beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a
special occasion license, or a private club license. A domestic winery
or certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform any such
personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a domestic
winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any personal
service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail licensee.
Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be
borne, directly or indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of
approval holder. Nothing in this section prohibits wineries,
certificate of approval holders, and retail licensees from identifying
the producers on private labels authorized under RCW 66.24.400,
66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(6) An industry member may enter into an arrangement with any
holder of a sports entertainment facility license or an affiliated
business for brand advertising at the licensed facility or promoting
events held at the sports entertainment facility as authorized under
RCW 66.24.570.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW
to read as follows:
All industry members and retailers shall keep and maintain the
following records on their premises for a three-year period:
(1) Records of all items, services, and things of value furnished
to and received by a retailer and of all items, services, and things of
value provided to a retailer and purchased by a retailer at fair market
value; and
(2) Records of all industry member financial ownership interests in
a retailer and of all retailer financial ownership interests in an
industry member.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.28.180 and 2006 c 302 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
((It is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a
certificate of approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer
distributor's license, a domestic brewery license, a microbrewery
license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license, a
domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine
distributor's license within the state of Washington to modify any
prices without prior notification to and approval of the board.
(1) Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of
this state under the twenty-first amendment to the United States
Constitution, to promote the public's interest in fostering the orderly
and responsible distribution of malt beverages and wine towards
effective control of consumption; to promote the fair and efficient
three-tier system of distribution of such beverages; and to confirm
existing board rules as the clear expression of state policy to
regulate the manner of selling and pricing of wine and malt beverages
by licensed suppliers and distributors.
(2))) (1) Beer and wine distributors ((price posting)).
(a) Every beer or wine distributor shall ((file with the board at
its office in Olympia)) maintain at their liquor licensed location a
price ((posting)) list showing the wholesale prices at which any and
all brands of beer and wine sold by such beer and/or wine distributor
shall be sold to retailers within the state.
(b) Each price ((posting shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and)) list
shall set forth:
(i) All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for
sale by such beer and/or wine distributor;
(ii) The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including
allowances, if any, for returned empty containers.
(c) No beer and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any
package or container of beer or wine to any retail licensee at a price
differing from the price for such package or container as shown in the
price ((posting filed by the beer and/or wine distributor and then in
effect)) list, according to rules adopted by the board.
(d) Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be ((posted
that is)) below acquisition cost ((plus ten percent of acquisition
cost. However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it
may deem appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition cost
as a minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of
the board, except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent)).
(e) Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be ((accepted by
the board)) allowed if the item to be discontinued has been listed ((on
the state market)) for a period of at least six months, and upon the
further condition that the distributor who ((posts)) offers such a
close-out price shall not restock the item for a period of one year
following the first effective date of such close-out price.
(f) ((The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in
violation of this section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that
would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer and
wine. Whenever the board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting
the posting may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the posting is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
and wine. If the posting is accepted, it shall become effective at the
time fixed by the board. If the posting is rejected, the last
effective posting shall remain in effect until such time as an amended
posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(g) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all price
postings filed as required by this section constitute investigative
information and shall not be subject to disclosure, pursuant to RCW
42.56.240(1).
(h))) Any beer and/or wine distributor or employee authorized by
the distributor-employer may sell beer and/or wine at the distributor's
posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail licensee upon
presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of purchase of
a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.
(i) Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon
purchasing any beer and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately
cause such beer or wine to be delivered to the licensed premises, and
the licensee shall not thereafter permit such beer to be disposed of in
any manner except as authorized by the license.
(ii) Beer and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the
retailer's licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the
distributor's licensed premises. When a domestic winery, brewery,
microbrewery, or certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping
endorsement is acting as a distributor of its own production, a
licensed retailer may contract with a common carrier to obtain the
product directly from the domestic winery, brewery, microbrewery, or
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipping endorsement. A
distributor's prices to retail licensees shall be the same at both such
places of delivery.
(((3))) (2) Beer and wine suppliers' ((price filings,))
contracts((,)) and memoranda.
(a) Every domestic brewery, microbrewery, and domestic winery
offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state shall ((file with
the board at its office in Olympia)) maintain at its liquor licensed
location a copy of every written contract and a memorandum of every
oral agreement which such brewery or winery may have with any beer or
wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda shall contain:
(i) A schedule of prices charged to distributors for all items and
all terms of sale, including all regular and special discounts;
(ii) All advertising, sales and trade allowances, and incentive
programs; and
(iii) All commissions, bonuses or gifts, and any and all other
discounts or allowances.
(b) Whenever changed or modified, such revised contracts or
memoranda shall ((forthwith)) also be ((filed with the board as
provided for by rule)) maintained at its liquor licensed location. The
provisions of this section also apply to certificate of approval
holders, beer and/or wine importers, and beer and/or wine distributors
who sell to other beer and/or wine distributors.
(c) Each price ((schedule shall be made on a form prepared and
furnished by the board, or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and)) list
shall set forth all brands, types, packages, and containers of beer or
wine offered for sale by such licensed brewery or winery((; all
additional information required may be filed as a supplement to the
price schedule forms)).
(((b))) (d) Prices ((filed by)) of a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder shall
be uniform prices to all distributors or retailers on a statewide basis
less bona fide allowances for freight differentials. Quantity
discounts are prohibited. No price shall be ((filed that is)) below
acquisition/production cost ((plus ten percent of that cost, except
that acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not
apply to sales of beer or wine between a beer or wine importer who
sells beer or wine to another beer or wine importer or to a beer or
wine distributor, or to a beer or wine distributor who sells beer or
wine to another beer or wine distributor. However, the board is
empowered to review periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the
amount of the percentage of acquisition/production cost as a minimum
mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the board,
except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent)).
(((c))) (e) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery,
certificate of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or beer or wine
distributor may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any persons
whatsoever in this state until copies of such written contracts or
memoranda of such oral agreements are on file with the board.
(((d))) (f) No domestic brewery, microbrewery, domestic winery, or
certificate of approval holder may sell or offer to sell any package or
container of beer or wine to any distributor at a price differing from
the price list for such package or container as shown in the ((schedule
of prices filed by)) price list of the domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, or certificate of approval holder and then in effect,
according to rules adopted by the board.
(((e) The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract,
or memorandum of oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be
in violation of this section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt
the orderly sale and distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board
rejects any such price filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee
submitting the price filing, contract, or memorandum may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the price filing,
contract, or memorandum is not in violation of this section or a rule
or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and distribution of beer
or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is accepted, it
shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the
last effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in
effect until such time as an amended price filing, contract, or
memorandum is filed and approved, in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(f) Prior to the effective date of the posted prices, all prices,
contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this section constitute
investigative information and shall not be subject to disclosure,
pursuant to RCW 42.56.240(1).))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 RCW 66.28.010 (Manufacturers, importers,
distributors, and authorized representatives barred from interest in
retail business or location -- Advances prohibited -- "Financial interest"
defined -- Exceptions) and 2008 c 94 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

--- END ---