BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.02565 and 1999 c 211 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales to a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and
equipment used directly in a manufacturing operation or research and
development operation, to sales to a person engaged in testing for a
manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment used
directly in a testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the machinery and equipment, but only
when the purchaser provides the seller with an exemption certificate in
a form and manner prescribed by the department by rule. The seller
((shall)) must retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement
parts. "Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment
installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or
research and development operation to prevent air pollution, water
pollution, or contamination that might otherwise result from the
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation.
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include:
(i) Hand-powered tools;
(ii) Property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is
permanently affixed to or becomes a physical part of a building; and
(iv) Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation
that are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air
conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if
the machinery and equipment:
(i) Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal
property;
(ii) Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of
tangible personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;
(iii) Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or
tests tangible personal property at the site or away from the site;
(iv) Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal
property;
(v) Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;
(vi) Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in
the manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and
development operation;
(vii) Places tangible personal property in the container, package,
or wrapping in which the tangible personal property is normally sold or
transported; or
(viii) Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW
82.63.010.
(d) "Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A
manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials
enter the manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed
material leaves the manufacturing site. The term also includes that
portion of a cogeneration project that is used to generate power for
consumption within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration
project is an integral part. The term does not include: (i) The
production of electricity by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010 ((or)); (ii) the preparation of food products on the
premises of a person selling food products at retail; or (iii) the
production of petroleum-based fuels that are not biodiesel fuels.
(e) "Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical
energy and low-grade heat from the same fuel.
(f) "Research and development operation" means engaging in research
and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or
processor for hire.
(g) "Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine
the properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal
property.
(h) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible personal
property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing operation
begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the
testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property
leaves the testing site. The term also includes that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part.
The term does not include the production of electricity by a light and
power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food
products on the premises of a person selling food products at retail.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of machinery and equipment used directly in generating
electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, tidal or wave energy,
geothermal resources, or landfill gas as the principal source of power,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the
purchaser develops with such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility
capable of generating not less than two hundred watts of electricity
and provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain
a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:
(a) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, or landfill gas
as the principal source of power;
(c) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
(d) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity with fuel cells or by wind energy, solar energy, or
landfill gas power if it provides any part of the process that captures
the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas, converts that energy to
electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems;
(e) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.02567 and 2004 c 152 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not less than two
hundred watts of electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, or landfill gas as the principal source
of power, or to the use of labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment.
(2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires June 30, ((2009)) 2019.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.16.055 and 1980 c 149 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax under this chapter there ((shall be)) is
deducted from the gross income:
(a) An amount equal to the cost of production at the plant for
consumption within the state of Washington of:
(i) Electrical energy produced or generated from cogeneration ((as
defined in RCW 82.35.020)); and
(ii) Electrical energy or gas produced or generated from renewable
energy resources such as solar energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal
resources, wind energy, hydroelectric energy, geothermal energy, wood,
wood wastes, municipal wastes, agricultural products and wastes, and
end-use waste heat; and
(b) Those amounts expended to improve consumers' efficiency of
energy end use or to otherwise reduce the use of electrical energy or
gas by the consumer.
(2) (a) Except for tidal and wave energy and geothermal facilities,
this section applies only to new facilities for the production or
generation of energy from cogeneration or renewable energy resources or
measures to improve the efficiency of energy end use on which
construction or installation is begun after June 12, 1980, and before
January 1, 1990.
(b) This section applies to new facilities for the production and
generation of energy from tidal and wave energy, and from geothermal
resources, on which construction or installation is begun after January
1, 2009, and before January 1, 2019.
(3) Deductions under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be
allowed for a period not to exceed thirty years after the project is
placed in operation.
(4) ((Measures or projects encouraged under this section shall at
the time they are placed in service be reasonably expected to save,
produce, or generate energy at a total incremental system cost per unit
of energy delivered to end use which is less than or equal to the
incremental system cost per unit of energy delivered to end use from
similarly available conventional energy resources which utilize nuclear
energy or fossil fuels and which the gas or electric utility could
acquire to meet energy demand in the same time period.
(5))) The department ((of revenue)), after consultation with the
utilities and transportation commission ((in the case of investor-owned
utilities)) and the governing bodies of locally regulated utilities,
shall determine the eligibility of individual projects and measures for
deductions under this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.60.020 and 2006 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by:
(i) A light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(5),
other than that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to
generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which
the cogeneration project is an integral part, or investment projects
which have already received deferrals under this chapter; nor
(ii) A person engaged in manufacturing petroleum-based products,
other than that portion of an investment project that is used to
produce biodiesel fuels or investment projects that have already
received deferrals under this chapter.
(5) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial
testing laboratories, and the conditioning of vegetable seeds.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(9) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(10) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(11) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(12) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this
subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales
for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the
product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.4493 and 2008 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed in an amount equal to eight and eight-tenths percent multiplied
by the purchase price, as defined in RCW 82.12.010, of the following
items:
(a) Commercial freezers and refrigerators meeting consortium for
energy efficiency tier 2 specifications dated January 1, 2006;
(b) High efficiency commercial clothes washers meeting consortium
for energy efficiency specifications dated November 14, 2007;
(c) Commercial ice makers meeting consortium for energy efficiency
specifications dated January 1, 2006;
(d) Commercial full-sized gas convection ovens with interior
measurements of six cubic feet or larger;
(e) Commercial deep fat fryers which are rated energy star as of
August 2003;
(f) Commercial hot food holding cabinets which are rated energy
star as of August 2003; and
(g) Commercial electric and gas steam cookers, also known as
compartment cookers, which are rated energy star as of August 2003.
(2) A person may not take the credit under this section if the
person's gross income of the business in the prior calendar year
exceeded seven hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(3) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year.
Credit may not be claimed against taxes due for any tax reporting
period ending before the credit was earned. No refunds shall be
granted for credits under this section.
(4) Credits are available on a first-in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed statewide under this section in any
year to exceed ((seven hundred fifty thousand)) five million dollars.
If the ((seven hundred fifty thousand)) five million dollar limitation
is reached, the department ((shall)) must provide written notice to any
person that has claimed tax credits after the ((seven hundred fifty
thousand)) five million dollar limitation in this subsection has been
met. The notice shall indicate the amount of tax due and shall provide
that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of such notice.
The department may not assess penalties and interest as provided in
chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice if the amount
due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or any extension
thereof.
(5) The department of community, trade, and economic development
must prepare and deliver a report to the legislature no later than
December 30, 2010, assessing the overall energy and cost saving impacts
of this section.
(6) Credit may not be claimed under this section for the purchase
of an item, listed in subsection (1) of this section, before July 1,
2008.
(7) Credit may not be claimed under this section for the purchase
of an item, listed in subsection (1) of this section, after June 30,
2010.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a)(i) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" means refrigerators,
freezers, or refrigerator-freezers designed for use by commercial or
institutional facilities for the purpose of storing or merchandising
food products, beverages, or ice at specified temperatures that: (A)
Incorporate most components involved in the vapor-compression cycle and
the refrigerated compartment in a single cabinet; and (B) may be
configured with either solid or transparent doors as a reach-in
cabinet, pass-through cabinet, roll-in cabinet, or roll-through
cabinet.
(ii) "Commercial refrigerators and freezers" does not include: (A)
Products with eighty-five cubic feet or more of internal volume; (B)
walk-in refrigerators or freezers; (C) consumer products that are
federally regulated pursuant to Title 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6291 et seq.; (D)
products without doors; or (E) freezers specifically designed for ice
cream.
(b) "Commercial clothes washer" means a soft mount horizontal or
vertical-axis clothes washer that: (i) Has a clothes container
compartment no greater than three and one-half cubic feet in the case
of a horizontal-axis product or no greater than four cubic feet in the
case of a vertical-axis product; and (ii) is designed for use by more
than one household, such as in multifamily housing, apartments, or coin
laundries.
(c) "Commercial hot food holding cabinet" means an appliance that
is designed to hold hot food at a specified temperature, which has been
cooked using a separate appliance.
(d) "Commercial ice maker" means a factory-made assembly, not
necessarily shipped in one package, consisting of a condensing unit and
ice-making section operating as an integrated unit with means for
making and harvesting ice. It may also include integrated components
for storing or dispensing ice, or both.
(e) "Commercial open, deep-fat fryer" means an appliance, including
a cooking vessel, in which oil is placed to such a depth that the
cooking food is essentially supported by displacement of the cooking
fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel. Heat is delivered to
the cooking fluid by means of an immersed electric element or band-wrapped vessel (electric fryers), or by heat transfer from gas burners
through either the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing through
the cooking fluid (gas fryers).
(f) "Consortium" means the consortium for energy efficiency, a
United States nonprofit public benefits corporation that promotes the
manufacture and purchase of energy efficient products and services.
The consortium's members include utilities, statewide and regional
market transformation administrators, environmental groups, research
organizations, and state energy offices in the United States and
Canada.
(g) "Energy star" is an energy efficient product that meets the
federal environmental protection agency's and federal department of
energy's criteria for use of the energy star trademark label, or is in
the upper twenty-five percent of efficiency for all similar products as
designated by the federal energy management program. Energy star is a
voluntary labeling program designed to identify and promote energy
efficient products to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(h) "Steam cooker" means a device with one or more food steaming
compartments, in which the energy in the steam is transferred to the
food by direct contact. Models may include countertop models, wall-mounted models, and floor models mounted on a stand, pedestal, or
cabinet-style base.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 84.36.487 (Air pollution control equipment in thermal
electric generation facilities -- Records -- Payments on cessation of
operation) and 1997 c 368 s 11;
(2) RCW 82.08.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4; and
(3) RCW 82.12.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 2008 c 284 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---