BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.320.160 and 2008 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((smart homeownership choices)) prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure program is created in the department to assist
((low-income and moderate-income households, as defined in RCW
84.14.010,)) borrowers facing foreclosure in achieving work-outs. The
borrowers are households, families, and individuals with incomes up to
and including the county median income level.
(2) The department shall enter into an interagency agreement with
the Washington state housing finance commission to implement and
administer this program with moneys from the account created in RCW
43.320.165. The Washington state housing finance commission will
request funds from the department as needed to implement and operate
the program.
(3) The commission shall, under terms and conditions to be
determined by the commission, in consultation with the department,
assist homeowners who are ((delinquent on their mortgage payments to
bring their mortgage payments current in order to refinance into a
different loan product)) facing foreclosure in achieving work-outs.
((Financial assistance received by homeowners under this chapter shall
be repaid at the time of refinancing into a different loan product.
Homeowners receiving financial assistance shall also agree to partake
in a residential mortgage counseling program.)) Moneys may also be
used for outreach activities to raise awareness of this program;
creating and maintaining a pool of volunteers from the professions of
attorneys, certified public accountants, banking professionals, and
other relevant professions who participate in the program as needed and
without compensation to provide advice to the homeowner during
discussions having as their objective, achieving a work-out; qualifying
the volunteers as third parties from whom declarations may be obtained,
regarding requirements of chapter 61.24 RCW, deeds of trust; and
administering assignments of volunteers to borrowers in the most
productive manner. Not more than four percent of the total
appropriation for this program may be used for administrative expenses
of the department and the commission.
(4) The commission must provide an annual report to the legislature
at the end of each fiscal year of program operation. The report must
include information ((including the total number of households seeking
help to resolve mortgage delinquency, the number of program
participants that successfully avoided foreclosure, and the number of
program participants who refinanced a home, including information on
the terms of both the new loan product and the product out of which the
homeowner refinanced)) determined by the prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure oversight committee established under section 4 of
this act to be useful in assessing the success of the program. The
commission shall establish and report upon performance measures,
including measures to gauge program efficiency and effectiveness and
customer satisfaction.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "work-out" means an agreement
made between the borrower and the mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed
of trust, or with the authorized agent of the mortgagee or beneficiary,
that results in the borrower's continued residence in the mortgaged
residential property.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.320.165 and 2008 c 322 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((smart homeownership choices)) prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure program account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from the appropriation in section 4,
chapter 322, Laws of 2008 as well as receipts from private
contributions and all other sources that are specifically designated
for the ((smart homeownership choices)) prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure program must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used solely for the purpose of
preventing or reducing owner-occupied foreclosures through the ((smart
homeownership choices)) prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
program as described in RCW 43.320.160. Only the director of the
department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.320.170 and 2008 c 322 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state housing finance commission shall ((only))
serve ((low-income)) households, ((as defined in RCW 84.14.010,))
families, and individuals with incomes up to and including the county
median income level through the ((smart homeownership choices)) prevent
or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure program described in RCW
43.320.160 using state appropriated general funds in the ((smart
homeownership choices)) prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
program account created in RCW 43.320.165((.)) and contributions from
private and other sources ((to the account may be used to serve both
low-income and moderate-income households, as defined in RCW 84.14.010,
through the smart homeownership choices program)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.320 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The housing finance commission must establish a prevent or
reduce owner-occupied foreclosure oversight committee to consist of:
(a) Two members of the senate and two alternate members, appointed
by the president of the senate, with no more than one member and one
alternate from each caucus of the senate;
(b) Two members of the house of representatives and two alternate
members, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, with
no more than one member and one alternate from each caucus of the
senate;
(c) The director of the department of financial institutions or his
or her designee as an ex officio member;
(d) The executive director of the housing finance commission or his
or her designee as an ex officio member;
(e) A representative of the Washington state bar association as a
nonvoting member;
(f) A representative of the office of civil legal aid as a
nonvoting member;
(g) A representative of the Washington banker's association as a
nonvoting member; and
(h) A representative of the Washington state board of accountancy
as a nonvoting member.
(2) The members of the prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
oversight committee shall serve without compensation of any kind.
(3) The prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure oversight
committee shall serve as the housing finance commission's principal
advisory body on the prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
program, and must:
(a) Develop criteria for success of the program that may include,
but not be limited to: The number of homeowners served; number of
workouts achieved; amount of federal funds received for homeowner
stabilization; decreases in foreclosure rate; and number of volunteer
professionals participating;
(b) Periodically evaluate the effectiveness of the program
according to the criteria developed under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Develop and maintain an inventory of state and federal housing
assistance programs directed to stabilize owner-occupied homes; and
(d) Coordinate all state efforts related to prevention or reduction
of owner-occupied foreclosures.
(4) Any of the duties listed under subsection (3) of this section
may be delegated to the executive director of the housing finance
commission.
(5) The prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure oversight
committee shall meet regularly.
(6) The housing finance commission must supply information and
assistance that are deemed necessary for the prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure oversight committee to carry out its duties under
this section.
(7) The housing finance commission shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
oversight committee.

--- END ---