BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.14.025 and 2003 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state and the director of financial management
shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the
costs of services provided by the division of archives and records
management to state agencies. The total amount allotted for services
to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the archives
and records management account during any allotment period.
(2) There is created the archives and records management account in
the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges
collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated
exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the division of archives and records management as
specified by law.
(3) Institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016,
that do not use the services of the division of archives and records
management are not subject to its cost allocation procedure or formula
and are not required to pay the fees or charges in this section.

--- END ---