BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a recurring
miscalculation of refunds provided to the sponsors of retrospective
rating plans has depleted the industrial insurance accident fund of
more than one hundred million dollars, and perhaps as much as one
hundred fifty million dollars, with the participants in the
retrospective rating plans receiving the benefit of that
miscalculation. In some cases, those overpayments to the sponsors of
retrospective rating plans have been returned to employer members of
those plans and in some cases have been used to fund the activities of
the sponsors of those plans. As the premiums paid by employers into
the accident fund are based in part upon the solvency of the fund, the
legislature finds that overpayments have caused the accident fund to
contain fewer assets than it otherwise would contain, requiring base
premiums to be set at a level higher than would otherwise be necessary,
and further causing the employers who are not members of a
retrospective rating plan to subsidize retro members by inflating the
amount of retro refunds beyond what was merited by the experience of
retro member employers.
The legislature further finds that although the overpayment by the
department of labor and industries was not intentional, the error
resulting in the overpayment was not identified in the numerous reviews
and analyses that have been conducted in the fifteen years since the
erroneous calculations began. The legislature finds that additional
evaluations and increased transparency of the retrospective rating
system are needed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that the primary purposes of the
retrospective rating program created in this chapter are increasing
workplace safety, preventing accidents, and improving worker outcomes.
The legislature finds that retrospective rating refunds are provided
from the industrial insurance accident account, and that the use of
Title 51 funds to improve workplace safety, prevent accidents, and
improve injured worker outcomes are appropriate uses of such funds.
The legislature further finds that any retrospective rating refunds not
used to administer the retrospective rating group or to support the
purposes of the retrospective rating program belong to and should be
returned to the employer members of each retrospective rating group,
with the sole exception that individual members may annually authorize
use of retrospective rating refunds for purposes unrelated to worker
safety and accident prevention, the primary purposes of the
retrospective rating program, similar to the annual authorization
required from the members of union organizations. The legislature
therefore intends to allow and encourage retrospective rating group
sponsoring entities to use retrospective rating refunds to create and
maintain programs that improve workplace safety, prevent accidents, and
improve worker outcomes while distributing the remainder of the refund
to employer members of the group, subject to the optional annual
authorizations by the members of each group. To restore public
confidence in the use of retrospective rating funds, the legislature
intends to make information concerning the sponsoring entities'
administration of the program publicly available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2010, and continuing for five consecutive
years, the department shall:
(1) Conduct an annual actuarial review of the retrospective rating
program. The actuarial review must include an examination of the
method used to calculate retrospective premiums, refunds, and
assessments, an examination of the impact retrospective rating refunds
and assessments have on the accident fund, and an examination of any
other factors necessary to conduct a thorough actuarial review.
(2) By December 31st of each year in which an actuarial review is
conducted, report the contents of the review to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) With respect to refunds made by the department to a sponsor of
a retrospective rating group on or after the effective date of this
section:
(a) The sponsoring entity must distribute the retrospective rating
refund or adjustment to employers in the retrospective rating group
based on a distribution plan, less any amount retained by the
sponsoring entity, within a time period selected by the sponsoring
entity and set forth in the distribution plan. The distribution plan
may not authorize a sponsoring entity to retain any portion of a refund
or adjustment, except as authorized by this section. This distribution
plan shall be provided to the department upon enrollment, and annually
to the members of the retrospective rating group. The department shall
make the distribution plan publicly available, excluding any financial
information specific to individual employer members.
(b) The sponsoring entity may retain a portion of the refund for
reasonable administrative costs. When any portion of the refund is
distributed to the employers in the retrospective rating group, the
sponsoring entity shall disclose to such employers and to the
department the amounts of all administrative costs for which it has
retained any portion of the refund and the specific purposes for which
those costs were incurred.
(c) The sponsoring entity may retain a portion of the refund for
costs directly related to the development and implementation of a
safety plan to increase workplace safety and to prevent accidents. The
safety plan shall be submitted to the department annually. The
department shall develop rules to define the required elements of a
retrospective rating safety plan.
(d) The sponsoring entity may retain a portion of the refund for
costs directly related to claims assistance provided to its member
employers.
(e) The sponsoring entity may retain a portion of the refund to
establish and maintain reserves for the sole and exclusive purpose of
covering the costs of future potential retrospective rating assessments
and an amount of reserves necessary to protect against future penalties
or other unexpected retrospective rating costs incurred during the same
or a subsequent coverage year.
(f) The sponsoring entity must keep a detailed list of costs
related to (b) through (e) of this subsection and report this list to
the department and to employers in the retrospective rating group at
the time the retrospective rating refunds or adjustments are
distributed to members of the group.
(g) Any amounts retained by a sponsoring entity under (b) through
(e) of this subsection shall be used solely for the purposes described
in those subsections, and may not be used directly or indirectly for
any other purpose.
(h) In addition to the amounts that a sponsoring entity may retain
under (b) through (e) of this subsection, the sponsoring entity may
retain a portion of the retrospective rating refund or adjustment due
an employer member if the member has provided a written authorization
allowing the entity to retain a portion of the refund or adjustment due
the employer member. Any authorization provided by an employer member
shall be effective for a period not to exceed one year. If a
sponsoring entity retains funds due the employer member under this
subsection, the sponsoring entity must notify the employer member that
additional funds have been retained by the sponsoring entity, and
inform the employer member of the amount withheld from the employer
member under this subsection. The department shall develop a form to
be separately executed by any employer member authorizing the retention
of funds under this subsection, which form shall (i) authorize the
retention of either a percentage of the member's refund or a fixed
dollar amount, and (ii) inform the member that the authorization is
irrevocable for one year. The sponsoring entity shall use the form
developed by the department or a form prepared by the sponsoring entity
that is consistent with this subsection and has been approved by the
department.
(i) Any amounts retained by a sponsoring entity under (h) of this
subsection may be used by the sponsoring entity for any legal purpose,
even if such purpose is unrelated to worker safety and accident
prevention.
(2) The group must comply with subsection (1) of this section to be
approved by the department for future enrollment.

Sec. 5 RCW 51.18.030 and 1999 c 7 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Entities which sponsored retrospective rating groups prior to
July 25, 1999, may not sponsor additional retrospective rating groups
in a new business or industry category until the coverage period
beginning January 1, 2003.
(2) For retrospective rating groups approved by the department on
or after July 25, 1999, the sponsoring entity may not propose another
retrospective rating group in a new business or industry category until
the minimum mandatory adjustment periods required by the department for
the first two coverage periods of the last formed retrospective rating
group are completed.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not prohibit a
sponsoring entity from proposing to:
(a) Divide an existing retrospective rating group into two or more
groups provided that the proposed new groups fall within the same
business or industry category as the group that is proposed to be
divided; or
(b) Merge existing retrospective rating groups into one business or
industry category provided that the proposed merged groups fall within
the same business or industry category as the groups that are proposed
to be merged.
(4) Under no circumstances may a sponsoring entity propose
retrospective rating groups in multiple business or industry categories
in the same application to the department.
(5) An insurer, insurance broker, agent, or solicitor may not:
(a) Participate in the formation of a retrospective rating group;
or
(b) Sponsor a retrospective rating group.
(6) A sponsoring entity may not require a participating member or
applicant to: (a) Agree to reenroll in the group's future coverage
period, (b) maintain membership in the sponsoring entity or any other
organization beyond the coverage period, which includes the three-year
period during which further refunds and assessments may be made, or (c)
contribute funds to the sponsoring entity or any other organization in
excess of the amounts authorized by this act.

--- END ---