BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall amend the state's water quality standards
to authorize compliance schedules for discharge permits issued under
this chapter that implement a total maximum daily load, to provide that
a compliance schedule must be met as soon as possible but may exceed
ten years only if, during the first ten years, the entity seeking an
extended compliance schedule has made significant investments in
advanced technology and has substantially reduced pollutant loading.
In making this determination, the department shall consider the nature,
magnitude, and cost of point and nonpoint pollution controls
implemented by the entity seeking an extended compliance schedule,
recognizing that a compliance schedule must be met as soon as possible.
Compliance schedules longer than ten years must be unavailable to
implement a total maximum daily load that involves only point sources.
Compliance schedules must be met as soon as possible but those
authorized for longer than ten years may only be authorized for an
additional five years at a time, and the total length of any compliance
schedule may not exceed twenty years. Compliance schedules for
nonpoint sources may exceed twenty years if corrective actions have
been fully implemented during the first ten years and significant
riparian restoration, such as planting of vegetation, is required to
implement a load allocation needed to achieve compliance and the
riparian restoration cannot be completed within twenty years.
(2) If the United States environmental protection agency
disapproves the amendment to the water quality standards necessary to
implement this section, the department shall work with the United
States environmental protection agency to develop an approved amendment
to the state water quality standards that is as consistent as possible
with the provisions of this section.

--- END ---