BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
State transportation funds may not be used for the Interstate
5/Columbia river crossing/Vancouver project, unless the residents of
Clark county approve a ballot measure that supports the following: (1)
Expenditures of state funding for the Interstate 5/Columbia river
crossing/Vancouver project; (2) expenditures for the light rail bridge
project; and (3) tolling the Interstate 5/Columbia river
crossing/Vancouver project.

--- END ---