BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of health is authorized
to create an immunization registry program for children ages zero to
eighteen residing in Washington state and to adopt rules to implement
the program.
(2) The department, in developing the immunization registry
program, at a minimum, must create a registry that allows health care
providers to access patient information regarding immunization history
in a shared, secure database. The department must also develop
materials to provide information about immunizations to parents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of health shall require,
by rule, any physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician
assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or registered nurse,
advanced registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse under chapter
18.79 RCW to use the immunization registry program and record all
essential information involving any immunization delivered to a child.
(2) The department may only require physicians or physician
assistants to report immunizations recommended in the child and
adolescent immunization schedules published by the federal department
of health and human services.
(3) The parent of a child receiving an immunization must have the
ability to exempt their child from participation in the immunization
registry without cause.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---