BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.70.170 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 256 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary on his or her own motion or upon the complaint of
any interested party, may investigate, examine, sample or inspect any
article or condition constituting a threat to the public health
including, but not limited to, outbreaks of communicable diseases, food
poisoning, contaminated water supplies, and all other matters injurious
to the public health. When not otherwise available, the department may
purchase such samples or specimens as may be necessary to determine
whether or not there exists a threat to the public health. In
furtherance of any such investigation, examination or inspection, the
secretary or the secretary's authorized representative may examine that
portion of the ledgers, books, accounts, memorandums, and other
documents and other articles and things used in connection with the
business of such person relating to the actions involved.
(2) For purposes of such investigation, the secretary or the
secretary's representative shall at all times have free and unimpeded
access to all buildings, yards, warehouses, storage and transportation
facilities or any other place. The secretary may also, for the
purposes of such investigation, issue subpoenas to compel the
attendance of witnesses, as provided for in RCW 43.70.090 or the
production of books and documents anywhere in the state.
(3) Within available funds, the department shall provide a toll-free phone number to be listed in the government section of all phone
books distributed to the public at large, with the description:
"Report Suspicious or Contaminated Food Products." The toll-free
number shall be included with any press release or public statement by
the department involving contaminated food products. The toll-free
number may be a number that has already been obtained for other
department uses. The toll-free number shall be directed to a call
center within the department to provide advice and assistance to state
residents who are concerned about a particular food product that
appears contaminated, suspicious, or tampered with. The department
shall also publish the toll-free number on its web site accompanied by
an internet form that may be used to report the contaminated or
suspicious food product. All local public health jurisdictions shall
be provided with the toll-free number and encouraged to publish the
number in all materials dealing with local public health.

--- END ---