BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state building code council must adopt rules requiring that
natural or manufactured wood framing members used in residential
construction be tested by a special inspector or the local building
jurisdiction for maximum allowable moisture content prior to enclosing
the framing. The rules adopted under this section must provide for the
maximum percentage of moisture allowed, the various locations in a
building that must be tested, the standards that need to be applied
during testing, and procedures for retesting the structure if the
moisture content exceeds the maximum allowable amount at the time of
inspection. The rules may include a requirement that the special
inspector be tested and certified by the Washington association of
building officials certification and registration program and be
approved by the local building official.
(2) After the inspection, the special inspector must provide a
certificate of compliance to the local building official showing
compliance with the requirements of this section and the rules adopted
under this section.

--- END ---