BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a myriad of
financial aid programs exist for students at the federal, state, local,
community, and institutional levels. These programs enable thousands
of students across Washington to access all sectors of higher
education, from apprenticeship programs to public and private four and
two-year institutions of higher education. The legislature further
finds that Washington state is a national leader in the distribution of
financial aid to increase college access and affordability, ranking
fourth in the nation in 2007 in terms of state student grant aid
funding per capita.
It is the intent of the legislature to promote and expand access to
state financial aid programs by determining which programs provide the
greatest value to the largest number of students, and by fully
supporting those programs. Furthermore, it is the intent of the
legislature to designate all existing financial aid an "opportunity
passport," with the effect of providing students with a clear
understanding of available resources to pay for postsecondary
education, thereby increasing access to postsecondary education and
meeting the needs of local business and industry.
It is the intent of the legislature that the higher education
coordinating board and institutions of higher education coordinate the
development of outreach tools, such as a web-based portal for
information on all opportunity grant aid programs. The information
should be communicated in a format and manner that provides an ease of
understanding for students and their families and include other
pertinent information on institutions of higher education, costs, and
academic programs. It is also the intent of the legislature for
institutions of higher education to incorporate this information in
promotional materials to prospective and current students and their
families.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.101
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to consolidate the educational
opportunity grant program over a period of two years. As of August 1,
2009, no new educational opportunity grants may be made. Persons who
have been selected by the higher education coordinating board to
receive a grant before August 1, 2009, shall receive the full amount of
their award, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per
academic year for a maximum of two years. All persons awarded an
educational opportunity grant before August 1, 2009, must complete
using the award before August 1, 2011. For these recipients,
eligibility for the grant is forfeited after this period.
(2) This section expires August 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose and within
overall appropriations for the state need grant as defined in this
chapter, need grants are provided for persons who meet all of the
following criteria:
(1) Are needy students as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;
(2) Are placebound students as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; and
(3) Have completed the associate of arts or the associate of
science degree.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.92.060 and 2007 c 404 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In awarding need grants, the board shall proceed substantially as
follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to
prevent the board, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from
following another procedure when the best interest of the program so
dictates:
(1) The board shall annually select the financial aid award
recipients from among Washington residents applying for student
financial aid who have been ranked according to:
(a) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family
contribution; and
(b) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former
foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate
of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.
(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met
by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the
total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are
declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until
disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured
receipt of a grant.
(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for
up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years,
or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of
time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate
degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five
years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant
recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees
concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining
satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program
as determined by the board. Should the recipient terminate his or her
enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion
of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by
the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing
refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.
(4) In computing financial need, the board shall determine a
maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal
to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions
plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating
expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments
received by students who are parents attending less than half-time
shall not be used in computing financial need.
(5)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing
quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may receive a
grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program that leads
to a degree or certificate.
(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis
shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any
academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time
basis, as long as funds are available.
(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant
to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter
credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:
(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from
that institution;
(ii) The student completes the required free application for
federal student aid;
(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial
condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the
student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is
likely eligible for a state need grant; and
(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that
the financial information provided on the free application for federal
student aid and any additional financial information provided directly
to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student
agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student
submitted false or incomplete information.
(6) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person
who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four
years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and
health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.92.030 and 2004 c 275 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical
college operated by the state of Washington or any political
subdivision thereof; or
(b) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the
state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level
which is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized
by rule of the board for the purposes of this section: PROVIDED, That
any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the
state of Washington which is affiliated with an institution operating
in another state must be a separately accredited member institution of
any such accrediting association, or a branch of a member institution
of an accrediting association recognized by rule of the board for
purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal student
financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit college or
university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a minimum of
twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and has an
annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent
students: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no institution of higher education
shall be eligible to participate in a student financial aid program
unless it agrees to and complies with program rules and regulations
adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150.
(2) "Financial aid" means loans and/or grants to needy students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of
higher education.
(3) "Needy student" means a post high school student of an
institution of higher education who demonstrates to the board the
financial inability, either through the student's parents, family
and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books, and
tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter.
(4) "Disadvantaged student" means a post high school student who by
reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential,
familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as
a full time student in an institution of higher education, who would
otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher education under an established program designed
to qualify the student for enrollment as a full time student.
(5) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(6) "Placebound student" means a student who (a) is unable to
complete a college program because of family or employment commitments,
health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors; and (b)
may be influenced by the receipt of an enhanced student financial aid
award to complete a baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to change eligibility requirements of
the Washington scholars program. Persons who have been selected by the
higher education coordinating board as Washington scholars or
Washington scholars-alternates before August 1, 2009, shall continue to
be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve quarters or eight semesters
of grants for undergraduate study, subject to applicable rule of the
higher education coordinating board. Persons who have been selected by
the higher education coordinating board as Washington scholars or
Washington scholars-alternates on or after August 1, 2009, are eligible
to receive a maximum of six quarters or four semesters of grants for
undergraduate study.
(2) It is further the intent of the legislature to redirect any
cost savings gained through changes in eligibility criteria to the
Washington scholars program to the state work-study program, as defined
in chapter 28B.12 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.15.543 and 2004 c 275 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition
and service and activities fees for students named by the higher
education coordinating board on or before June 30, 1994, as recipients
of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through
28A.600.150. The waivers shall be used only for undergraduate studies.
To qualify for the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or
university within three years of high school graduation and maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students ((shall be)) named as recipients before August 1, 2009,
are eligible to receive a maximum of twelve quarters or eight semesters
of waivers and may transfer among state-supported institutions of
higher education during that period and continue to have the tuition
and services and activities fees waived by the state-supported
institution of higher education that the student attends. Beginning
August 1, 2009, students named as recipients are eligible to receive a
maximum of six quarters or four semesters of waivers and may transfer
among state-supported institutions of higher education during that
period and continue to have the tuition and services and activities
fees waived by the state-supported institution of higher education that
the student attends. Should the student's cumulative grade point
average fall below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two
semesters, that student may petition the higher education coordinating
board which shall have the authority to establish a probationary period
until such time as the student's grade point average meets required
standards.
(2) Students named by the higher education coordinating board after
June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW
28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 shall be eligible to receive a grant
for undergraduate course work as authorized under RCW 28B.76.660.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.76.660 and 2005 c 518 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington scholars award or the Washington
scholars-alternate award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 who
choose to attend an independent college or university in this state, as
defined in subsection (4) of this section, and recipients of the award
named after June 30, 1994, who choose to attend a public college or
university in the state may receive grants under this section if moneys
are available. The higher education coordinating board shall
distribute grants to eligible students under this section from moneys
appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall not exceed,
on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident, undergraduate
tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the state-funded
research universities. Grants to recipients attending an independent
institution shall be contingent upon the institution matching on at
least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual money or by a
waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the student from
the state. The higher education coordinating board shall establish
procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the
students.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall establish rules
that provide for the annual awarding of grants, if moneys are
available, to three Washington scholars per legislative district except
for fiscal year 2007 when no more than two scholars per district shall
be selected; and, if not used by an original recipient, to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district.
Beginning with scholars selected in the year 2000, if the
recipients of grants fail to demonstrate in a timely manner that they
will enroll in a Washington institution of higher education in the fall
term of the academic year following the award of the grant or are
deemed by the higher education coordinating board to have withdrawn
from college during the first academic year following the award, then
the grant shall be considered relinquished. The higher education
coordinating board may then award any remaining grant amounts to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district if the
grants are awarded within one calendar year of the recipient being
named a Washington scholars-alternate. Washington scholars-alternates
named as recipients of the grant must also demonstrate in a timely
manner that they will enroll in a Washington institution of higher
education during the next available term, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board. The board may accept appeals and grant
waivers to the enrollment requirements of this section based on
exceptional mitigating circumstances of individual grant recipients.
To maintain eligibility for the grants, recipients must maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students ((shall be)) selected before August 1, 2009, are
eligible to receive a maximum of twelve quarters or eight semesters of
grants for undergraduate study and may transfer among in-state public
and independent colleges and universities during that period and
continue to receive the grant as provided under RCW 28B.76.665.
Beginning August 1, 2009, students named as recipients are eligible to
receive a maximum of six quarters or four semesters of grants for
undergraduate study and may transfer among in-state public and
independent colleges and universities during that period and continue
to receive the grant as provided under RCW 28B.76.665. If the
student's cumulative grade point average falls below 3.30 during the
first three quarters or two semesters, that student may petition the
higher education coordinating board which shall have the authority to
establish a probationary period until such time as the student's grade
point average meets required standards.
(3) No grant shall be awarded to any student who is pursuing a
degree in theology.
(4) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(5) As used in this section, "public college or university" means
an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.76.665 and 2004 c 275 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
Students receiving grants under RCW 28B.76.660 or waivers under RCW
28B.15.543 are entitled to transfer among in-state public and
independent colleges or universities and to continue to receive award
benefits, as provided in this section, in the form of a grant or waiver
of tuition and services and activities fees while enrolled at such
institutions during the period of eligibility. For students receiving
grants or waivers before August 1, 2009, the total grants or waivers
for any one student shall not exceed twelve quarters or eight semesters
of undergraduate study. Beginning August 1, 2009, the total grants or
waivers for any one student shall not exceed six quarters or four
semesters of undergraduate study.
(1) Scholars named to the award on or before June 30, 1994, may
transfer between in-state public institutions, or from an eligible
independent college or university to an in-state public institution of
higher education, and are entitled to receive the waiver of tuition and
services and activities fees.
(2) Scholars named to the award on or before June 30, 1994, may
transfer from an in-state public institution to an eligible independent
college or university, or between eligible independent colleges or
universities, and continue to receive a grant contingent upon available
funding.
(3) Scholars named to the award after June 30, 1994, may transfer
among in-state public or private colleges and universities and continue
to receive the grant contingent upon available funding.
(4) In addition, scholars who transfer to an eligible independent
institution may receive the grant contingent upon the agreement of the
school to match on at least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with
actual money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received
by the student from the state.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.15.0681 and 2007 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the requirement in RCW 28B.76.300(4),
institutions of higher education shall disclose to their undergraduate
resident students on the tuition billing statement, in dollar figures
for a full-time equivalent student:
(((1))) (a) The full cost of instruction((, (2)));
(b) The amount collected from student tuition and fees((,)); and
(((3))) (c) The difference between the amounts for the full cost of
instruction and the student tuition and fees((, noting))
(2) The tuition billing statement shall note that the difference
between the cost and tuition under subsection (1)(c) of this section
was paid by state tax funds and other moneys.
(3) Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, the amount determined
in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be labeled an "opportunity
passport" on the tuition billing statement.
(4) Beginning in the 2010-11 academic year, institutions of higher
education shall label all financial aid awarded to resident
undergraduate students as an "opportunity passport" on the tuition
billing statement or financial aid award notification. This includes
aid from all sources including federal, state, and local governments,
local communities, nonprofit and for-profit organizations, and
institutions of higher education. The disclosure requirements
specified in this section do not change the source, award amount,
student eligibility, or student obligations associated with each award.
Institutions of higher education retain the ability to customize their
tuition billing statements to inform students of the assistance source,
amount, and type so long as provisions of this section are also
fulfilled.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.76.500 and 1985 c 370 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall administer any state program or state-administered federal program of student financial aid now or hereafter
established.
(2) Each of the student financial aid programs administered by the
board shall be labeled an "opportunity passport." All communication
materials, including, but not limited to, printed materials,
presentations, and web content, shall include the "opportunity
passport" label.
(3) If the board develops a one-stop college information web-based
portal that includes financial, academic, and career planning
information, the portal shall display all available student financial
aid programs under the "opportunity passport" label.
(4) The labeling requirements in this section do not change the
source, eligibility requirements, or student obligations associated
with each program. The board retains the ability to customize its
communications to differentiate between programs, eligibility
requirements, and student obligations, so long as the reporting
provisions of this chapter are also fulfilled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, "dual credit program" means a program,
administered by either an institution of higher education or a high
school, through which high school students in the eleventh or twelfth
grade who have not yet received the credits required for the award of
a high school diploma apply to a participating institution of higher
education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution
of higher education and simultaneously earn high school and college
credit.

Sec. 13 RCW 28B.15.820 and 2007 c 404 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education, including technical
colleges, shall deposit a minimum of three and one-half percent of
revenues collected from tuition and services and activities fees in an
institutional financial aid fund that is hereby created and which shall
be held locally. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the
following purposes: (a) To make guaranteed long-term loans to eligible
students as provided in subsections (3) through (8) of this section;
(b) to make short-term loans as provided in subsection (9) of this
section; or (c) to provide financial aid to needy students as provided
in subsection (10) of this section.
(2) An "eligible student" for the purposes of subsections (3)
through (8) and (10) of this section is a student registered for at
least three credit hours or the equivalent, who is eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013, and who is a "needy student" as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.
(3) The amount of the guaranteed long-term loans made under this
section shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the
student. Each institution shall establish loan terms and conditions
which shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program
established by 20 U.S. Code Section 1071 et seq., as now or hereafter
amended. All loans made shall be guaranteed by the Washington student
loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Institutions are
hereby granted full authority to operate as an eligible lender under
the guaranteed loan program.
(4) Before approving a guaranteed long-term loan, each institution
shall analyze the ability of the student to repay the loan based on
factors which include, but are not limited to, the student's
accumulated total education loan burdens and the employment
opportunities and average starting salary characteristics of the
student's chosen fields of study. The institution shall counsel the
student on the advisability of acquiring additional debt, and on the
availability of other forms of financial aid.
(5) Each institution is responsible for collection of guaranteed
long-term loans made under this section and shall exercise due
diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to
insure that maximum repayments are made. Institutions shall cooperate
with other lenders and the Washington student loan guaranty
association, or its successor agency, in the coordinated collection of
guaranteed loans, and shall assure that the guarantability of the loans
is not violated. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term
loans under this section shall be performed by entities approved for
such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or
its successor agency: PROVIDED, That institutions be permitted to
perform such servicing if specifically recognized to do so by the
Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency.
Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans made by
community colleges under subsection (1) of this section shall be
coordinated by the state board for community and technical colleges and
shall be conducted under procedures adopted by the state board.
(6) Receipts from payment of interest or principal or any other
subsidies to which institutions as lenders are entitled, that are paid
by or on behalf of borrowers of funds under subsections (3) through (8)
of this section, shall be deposited in each institution's financial aid
fund and shall be used to cover the costs of making the guaranteed
long-term loans under this section and maintaining necessary records
and making collections under subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED,
That such costs shall not exceed five percent of aggregate outstanding
loan principal. Institutions shall maintain accurate records of such
costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs, shall
be deposited in the institution's financial aid fund.
(7) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, on behalf of the community colleges
and technical colleges, shall each adopt necessary rules and
regulations to implement this section.
(8) First priority for any guaranteed long-term loans made under
this section shall be directed toward students who would not normally
have access to educational loans from private financial institutions in
Washington state, and maximum use shall be made of secondary markets in
the support of loan consolidation.
(9) Short-term loans, not to exceed one year, may be made from the
institutional financial aid fund to students enrolled in the
institution. No such loan shall be made to any student who is known by
the institution to be in default or delinquent in the payment of any
outstanding student loan. A short-term loan may be made only if the
institution has ample evidence that the student has the capability of
repaying the loan within the time frame specified by the institution
for repayment.
(10) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
that are not used in making long-term or short-term loans may be used
by the institution for locally administered financial aid programs for
needy students, such as need-based institutional employment programs or
need-based tuition and fee scholarship or grant programs. These funds
shall be used in addition to and not to replace institutional funds
that would otherwise support these locally administered financial aid
programs. First priority in the use of these funds shall be given to
needy students who have accumulated excessive educational loan burdens.
An excessive educational loan burden is a burden that will be difficult
to repay given employment opportunities and average starting salaries
in the student's chosen fields of study. Second priority in the use of
these funds shall be given to needy single parents, to assist these
students with their educational expenses, including expenses associated
with child care and transportation.
(11) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
may be used by the institution for a locally administered financial aid
program for high school students enrolled in dual credit programs. If
institutions use funds in this manner, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall
each adopt necessary rules to implement this subsection. Moneys from
this fund may be used for all educational expenses related to a
student's participation in a dual credit program including but not
limited to tuition, fees, course materials, and transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92
RCW to read as follows:
Institutions of higher education are encouraged to review their
policies and procedures regarding financial aid for students enrolled
in dual credit programs as defined in section 12 of this act.
Institutions of higher education are further encouraged to implement
policies and procedures providing students enrolled in dual credit
programs with the same access to institutional aid, including all
educational expenses, as provided to resident undergraduate students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective August 1,
2011:
(1) RCW 28B.101.005 (Finding -- Intent) and 2003 c 233 s 1 & 1990 c
288 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.101.010 (Program created) and 2003 c 233 s 2 & 1990 c
288 s 3;
(3) RCW 28B.101.020 (Definition -- Eligibility) and 2004 c 275 s 67,
2003 c 233 s 3, & 1990 c 288 s 4;
(4) RCW 28B.101.030 (Administration of program -- Payments to
participants) and 1990 c 288 s 5; and
(5) RCW 28B.101.040 (Use of grants) and 2003 c 233 s 4 & 2002 c 186
s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---