BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the need for
public employees, teachers, and school employees to have a secure and
viable retirement benefit, not only for their own financial protection,
but also so that public funds are spent prudently for their intended
purpose. The legislature also recognizes the need for public employers
and taxpayers to have consistent and predictable pension funding
obligations in support of employee retirement benefits. Therefore, it
is the intent of the legislature to design a defined contribution
pension system for new public employees, teachers, and school employees
that uses best practices of defined contribution plans to provide
opportunity and flexibility to accrue a viable retirement benefit,
while providing stable funding requirements for public employers and
taxpayers. These best practices include minimizing the investment risk
borne by the participants, whether through lack of investment knowledge
or lack of access to the full variety of investment classes, and
providing a distribution option that would ensure participants would
not outlive their savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The office of the state actuary, with the
assistance and support of the department of retirement systems, shall
develop a legislative proposal in bill draft form that would implement
a mandatory defined contribution retirement system. This proposal, and
accompanying supporting documentation detailing the provisions of the
proposal, shall be delivered to the fiscal committees of the senate and
the house of representatives no later than December 1, 2009. The
proposal shall include the following:
(1) The system shall require participation by all employees hired
after December 31, 2011, that would otherwise be required to establish
membership for the first time in the public employees' retirement
system, the teachers' retirement system, and the school employees'
retirement system. Once membership in the new system is established,
participants shall contribute to this system for all future periods of
eligible public employment.
(2) The system shall provide optional participation to those
employees hired after December 31, 2011 that would otherwise have had
the option to establish membership for the first time in the public
employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the
school employees' retirement system.
(3) The provisions of the system will not apply to members, former
members, and retirees of the public employees' retirement system, the
school employees' retirement system, and the teachers' retirement
system.
(4) The system shall be designed to qualify as a defined
contribution pension plan under internal revenue code.
(5) The system shall require a participant to contribute five
percent of his or her salary until the end of the month during which
his or her thirty-fifth birthday occurs, and seven and one-half percent
thereafter. At any time following the month during which his or her
fifty-fifth birthday occurs, a participant may elect to increase the
rate to ten percent.
(6) Each participant shall have a contractual right to an employer
contribution of the same percentage of salary as the participant, up to
a maximum of six percent of salary.
(7) The system shall be considered a retirement system or
retirement benefit for purposes of RCW 41.80.020.
(8) The system shall provide investment options to participants for
their contributions that include but are not limited to: A fund
managed by the state investment board similar to the funds established
under RCW 41.50.075; and funds similar to those offered to members of
plan 3 under RCW 41.34.130, including retirement strategy or life-cycle
funds.
(9) The system shall provide distribution options to participants
for their accumulated contributions and investment earnings that
include but are not limited to purchasing an insurance-provided life
annuity.
(10) The health care authority shall administer and make available
to participants life insurance and long-term disability insurance
products.
(11) The system shall have an implementation date of January 1,
2012.

--- END ---