BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In actuarial valuation reports for plan 1 of the public
employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the teachers' retirement
system, and plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system, the state actuary shall report the funded status of
each plan on a market value basis, using the ratio of the market value
of assets to the market value of liabilities. The state actuary shall
measure the market value of liabilities as if all of the plan's
projected obligations were settled on the valuation date.
(2) When the state actuary determines that any plan listed in
subsection (1) of this section has become fully funded on a market
value basis, he or she shall:
(a) Notify the state investment board; and
(b) Make recommendations to the council regarding any new methods
or assumptions for the plan. Any changes adopted by the council shall
be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.33A.110 and 1994 c 154 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state investment board may make appropriate rules and
regulations for the performance of its duties. The board shall
establish investment policies and procedures designed exclusively to
maximize return at a prudent level of risk. However, in the case of
the department of labor and industries' accident, medical aid, and
reserve funds, the board shall establish investment policies and
procedures designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in industrial
insurance premiums and, subject to this purpose, to maximize return at
a prudent level of risk; and when any plan listed in section 1 of this
act becomes fully funded on a market value basis as determined by the
state actuary, the board shall establish investment policies and
procedures designed to preserve the fully funded status of the plan
and, subject to this purpose, to maximize return at a prudent level of
risk. The board shall adopt rules to ensure that its members perform
their functions in compliance with chapter 42.52 RCW. Rules adopted by
the board shall be adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---