BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW.
(2) Five additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application received from a resident of that
portion of the state lying west of the crest of the Cascade mountain
range. These moneys must be distributed in the following manner:
(a) Two dollars must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal
account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the department of natural
resources indicates that the balance of the derelict vessel removal
account, not including any transfer or appropriation of funds into the
account or funds deposited into the account collected under RCW
88.02.270, reaches one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the
collection of the two-dollar fee must be suspended for the following
fiscal year.
(b) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879.
(c) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667.
(d) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400.
(3) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140
shall be in addition to the ten dollar and fifty cent annual
registration fee and the five-dollar fee created in subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) Three additional dollars must be collected annually from every
vessel registration application received from a resident of that
portion of the state lying east of the crest of the Cascade mountain
range. These moneys must be distributed in the following manner:
(a) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;
(b) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667; and
(c) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive species
enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400.
(5) Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
(((5))) (6) The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a
period of one year, except that the director of licensing may extend or
diminish vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the
purpose of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more
or less than one year, the department may collect prorated annual
registration fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in
the registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year
in a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
(((6))) (7) When the department issues either a notice to renew a
vessel registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel
registration, it shall also provide information on the location of
marine oil recycling tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations.
This information will be provided to the department by the state parks
and recreation commission in a form ready for distribution. The form
will be developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation
commission with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The
department, the state parks and recreation commission, and the
department of ecology shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to
implement this process.
(((7))) (8) A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel
already validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen
days of the acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the
department or its authorized agent for transfer of the vessel
registration, and the application shall be accompanied by a transfer
fee of one dollar.

Sec. 2 RCW 88.02.050 and 2007 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Application for a vessel registration shall be made to the
department or its authorized agent in the manner and upon forms
prescribed by the department. The application shall state the name and
address of each owner of the vessel and such other information as may
be required by the department, shall be signed by at least one owner,
and shall be accompanied by a vessel registration fee of ten dollars
and fifty cents per year and the excise tax imposed under chapter 82.49
RCW. In addition, two additional dollars must be collected annually
from every vessel registration application received from a resident of
that portion of the state lying west of the crest of the Cascade
mountain range. These moneys must be deposited into the derelict
vessel removal account established in RCW 79.100.100. If the
department of natural resources indicates that the balance of the
derelict vessel removal account, not including any transfer or
appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited into the
account collected under RCW 88.02.270, reaches one million dollars as
of March 1st of any year, the collection of the two-dollar fee must be
suspended for the following fiscal year. Any fees required for
licensing agents under RCW 46.01.140 shall be in addition to the ten
dollar and fifty cent annual registration fee and the two-dollar
derelict vessel fee.
Upon receipt of the application and the registration fee, the
department shall assign a registration number and issue a decal for
each vessel. The registration number and decal shall be issued and
affixed to the vessel in a manner prescribed by the department
consistent with the standard numbering system for vessels set forth in
volume 33, part 174, of the code of federal regulations. A valid decal
affixed as prescribed shall indicate compliance with the annual
registration requirements of this chapter.
The vessel registrations and decals are valid for a period of one
year, except that the director of licensing may extend or diminish
vessel registration periods, and the decals therefor, for the purpose
of staggered renewal periods. For registration periods of more or less
than one year, the department may collect prorated annual registration
fees and excise taxes based upon the number of months in the
registration period. Vessel registrations are renewable every year in
a manner prescribed by the department upon payment of the vessel
registration fee, excise tax, and the derelict vessel fee. Upon
renewing a vessel registration, the department shall issue a new decal
to be affixed as prescribed by the department.
When the department issues either a notice to renew a vessel
registration or a decal for a new or renewed vessel registration, it
shall also provide information on the location of marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations. This information will
be provided to the department by the state parks and recreation
commission in a form ready for distribution. The form will be
developed and prepared by the state parks and recreation commission
with the cooperation of the department of ecology. The department, the
state parks and recreation commission, and the department of ecology
shall enter into a memorandum of agreement to implement this process.
A person acquiring a vessel from a dealer or a vessel already
validly registered under this chapter shall, within fifteen days of the
acquisition or purchase of the vessel, apply to the department or its
authorized agent for transfer of the vessel registration, and the
application shall be accompanied by a transfer fee of one dollar.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.270 and 2007 c 342 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
that have accumulated in our state's waters that pose a threat to the
health and safety of the people and to our environment, the legislature
intends to collect a derelict vessel removal surcharge.
(2) In addition to the fees collected under RCW 88.02.050, the
department shall collect an annual derelict vessel removal surcharge of
one dollar effective with vessel registrations from residents of that
portion of the state lying west of the crest of the Cascade mountain
range that are due or will become due on or after January 1, 2008. The
revenue generated from the derelict vessel surcharge must be deposited
into the derelict vessel removal account established under RCW
79.100.100, and is to be used only for the removal of vessels that are
less than seventy-five feet in length.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---