BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of
any vehicle to a qualifying disabled veteran or surviving spouse,
provided that the exemption in this subsection may not be claimed by a
qualifying disabled veteran or a surviving spouse for more than one
vehicle in a consecutive three-year period.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply, unless the context requires otherwise.
(a) "Qualifying disabled veteran" means a veteran meeting the
qualifications under RCW 84.36.381(3).
(b) "Surviving spouse" means any surviving spouse of a disabled
veteran who was eligible to receive an exemption under RCW 84.36.381(3)
at the time of the veteran's death, if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of RCW
84.36.381(3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any vehicle by a qualifying disabled veteran or surviving
spouse, provided that the exemption in this subsection may not be
claimed by a qualifying disabled veteran or a surviving spouse for more
than one vehicle in a consecutive three-year period.
(2) "Qualifying disabled veteran" and "surviving spouse" have the
same meanings as provided in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---