BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Obesity is a growing epidemic among Washington citizens. It is
a costly disease that left untreated results in further health
complications such as hypertension, cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep
apnea, metabolic syndrome, degenerative joint disease, and diabetes;
(b) A 2007 report from the Washington state department of health
indicates that 2.8 percent of Washington adults are morbidly obese;
(c) A lack of treatment options leaves citizens with morbid obesity
very little choice but to pursue other covered health care services
that treat secondary health issues caused by excessive weight without
solving the underlying problem;
(d) Surgical solutions to morbid obesity have demonstrated the
capacity to produce tremendous weight loss resulting in renewed health
and long-term viability for patients that pursue treatment;
(e) Medical literature indicates that weight loss surgery
significantly decreases overall mortality as well as the development of
new health-related conditions in morbidly obese patients;
(f) Evidence-based best practice guidelines for morbid obesity
identify gastric reduction surgery as facilitating best patient
outcomes where traditional weight loss methods have not worked; and
(g) Nonexperimental, medically necessary surgical treatments for
morbid obesity are a cost-effective solution to this growing health
crisis.
(2) The legislature further finds that the cost of overall health
care can be decreased if health plans actively consider
nonexperimental, medically necessary obesity surgery for patients where
that surgery is the evidence-based standard.
(3) The legislature further finds that plans should strongly
consider waiving contractual benefit exclusions when surgery is the
evidence-based standard of treatment and can be reasonably expected to
reduce health care costs for that patient by reducing or eliminating
health conditions related to the underlying morbid obesity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All health plans issued or renewed after December 31, 2009,
should follow the evidence-based standard of care and coverage
practices for treatment of morbid obesity. Health carriers may develop
a policy that allows a conditional waiver of contractual benefit
exclusions for nonexperimental, medically necessary surgical treatment
by a health care provider of morbid obesity for enrollees over age
eighteen, when:
(a) The condition has persisted for at least five years; and
(b) Nonsurgical treatment that has been supervised by a physician
has been unsuccessful for a least six consecutive months.
(2) As used in this section, "morbid obesity" is defined as:
(a) A body mass index of at least thirty-five kilograms per meter
squared, with comorbidity or coexisting medical conditions such as
hypertension, cardiopulmonary conditions, sleep apnea, or diabetes; or
(b) A body mass index of at least forty kilograms per meter squared
without comorbidity. For purposes of this section, body mass index is
equal to weight in kilograms divided by height in meters squared.
(3) This section does not prevent the application of standard
policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or
copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of
health carriers to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers
for the delivery of nonexperimental, medically necessary surgical
treatment by a health care provider of morbid obesity. This section
does not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental
contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.

--- END ---