BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.005 and 1995 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The intent of this chapter is to provide consistent laws regarding
the formation and legal administration of homeowners' associations.
Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter applies to all
homeowners' associations in the state, regardless of when the
declaration was recorded or the association was established.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
An obligation of good faith is imposed in the performance and
enforcement of all contracts and duties governed by this chapter and in
all other transactions involving declarants, associations, and their
members.
For purposes of this section, "good faith" means honesty in fact
and the observance of reasonable standards of fair dealing.

Sec. 3 RCW 64.38.010 and 1995 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Homeowners' association" or "association" means a corporation,
unincorporated association, or other legal entity, each member of which
is an owner of residential real property located within the
association's jurisdiction, as described in the governing documents,
and by virtue of membership ((or ownership of property)), the owner is
obligated to pay ((real property taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance
costs, or for improvement of real property other than that which is
owned by the member)) assessments pursuant to the governing documents.
"Homeowners' association" does not mean an association created under
chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW.
(2) "Governing documents" means the declaration, articles of
incorporation, bylaws, ((plat, declaration of covenants, conditions,
and restrictions,)) rules and regulations of the association, or other
written instrument by which the association has the authority to
exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter or to manage,
maintain, or otherwise affect the property under its jurisdiction.
(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the body, regardless of
name, with primary authority to manage the affairs of the association.
(4) "Common areas" means property owned, or otherwise maintained,
repaired or administered by the association.
(5) "Common expense" means the costs incurred by the association to
exercise any of the powers provided for in this chapter.
(6) "Residential real property" means any real property, the use of
which is limited by law, covenant or otherwise to primarily residential
or recreational purposes.
(7) "Assessment" means all sums chargeable by the association
against a lot including, without limitation:
(a) Regular and special assessments for common expenses, charges,
and fines imposed by the association;
(b) Interest and late charges on any delinquent account; and
(c) Costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
incurred by the association in connection with the collection of an
owner's delinquent account.
This subsection (7) supersedes any inconsistent provision in the
governing documents.
(8) "Bylaws" means the code adopted for the regulation or
management of the internal affairs of the association, irrespective of
the designated name of that code. If an association is incorporated
under Title 23 or 24 RCW, "bylaws" means the definition assigned to
"bylaws" in the act pursuant to which the association is incorporated.
(9) "Community" means residential real property that is subject to
a declaration under which an association is established for governance
of the community.
(10) "Cooperative" means a community in which the residential real
property is owned by an association where each of those members is
entitled, by virtue of his or her ownership interest in the
association, to exclusive possession of a portion of the property.
(11) "Declarant" means any person who executes as a declarant a
declaration or succeeds to the rights of a declarant pursuant to an
instrument recorded in the real property records of every county in
which any portion of the community is located.
(12) "Declaration" means the declaration of covenants, conditions,
and restrictions or any other document, however denominated, that is
recorded in every county in which any portion of the community is
located and that provides for the establishment of an association to
govern the community. In the case of a cooperative, "declaration"
means the document or documents, however denominated, that create the
cooperative housing association that owns the residential real property
comprising the cooperative, whether or not the document or documents
are recorded.
(13) "Lot" means a physical portion of a community designated for
separate ownership or occupancy and designated for residential use, the
boundaries of which are described in the real property records of every
county in which any portion of the community is located. Within a
cooperative, "lot" means that portion of the community designated for
exclusive possession by a member of the cooperative's association.
"Lot" does not mean an apartment created under chapter 64.32 RCW or a
unit created under chapter 64.34 RCW.
(14) "Owner" means a declarant or other person who owns a lot, but
does not include a person who has an interest in a lot solely as
security for an obligation. Under a real estate contract, "owner"
means the vendee, not the vendor.
(15) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, partnership,
limited partnership, trust, government subdivision or agency, or other
legal entity.
(16) "Rules" means the rules, regulations, and policies,
irrespective of their designated name, that are adopted by the members
of the board of an association in accordance with the governing
documents and that supplement, but do not contradict or contravene, the
governing documents.

Sec. 4 RCW 64.38.015 and 1995 c 283 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The membership of an association at all times shall consist
exclusively of the owners of all real property over which the
association has jurisdiction, both developed and undeveloped or, in the
case of a cooperative, the members of the association who by virtue of
their ownership interest in the association have exclusive possession
of a lot.

Sec. 5 RCW 64.38.020 and 1995 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless otherwise provided in the ((governing documents))
declaration, an association may:
(1) Adopt and amend bylaws, resolutions, policies, rules, and
regulations that are not inconsistent with the declaration or with this
chapter;
(2) Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and
reserves, and impose and collect assessments for common expenses from
owners;
(3) Hire and discharge or contract with managing agents and other
employees, agents, and independent contractors;
(4) Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative
proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two or more owners
on matters affecting the homeowners' association, but not on behalf of
owners involved in disputes that are not the responsibility of the
association;
(5) Make contracts and incur liabilities;
(6) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and
modification of common areas;
(7) Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the
common areas;
(8) Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right,
title, or interest to real or personal property;
(9) Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or
over the common areas and petition for or consent to the vacation of
streets and alleys;
(10) Impose and collect any payments, fees, or charges for the use,
rental, or operation of the common areas;
(11) Impose and collect charges for late payments of assessments
((and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard by the board of
directors or by the representative designated by the board of directors
and in accordance with the procedures as provided in the bylaws or
rules and regulations adopted by the board of directors, levy
reasonable fines in accordance with a previously established schedule
adopted by the board of directors and furnished to the owners for
violation of the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association));
(12) Take enforcement action with respect to any violation of the
governing documents;
(13) After notice and an opportunity to be heard by the board of
directors or by the representative designated by the board of
directors, and in accordance with the procedures provided in the
governing documents, levy reasonable fines in accordance with a
previously established schedule adopted by the board of directors and
furnished to the owners for violations of the governing documents;
(14) Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration,
articles, or bylaws;
(((13))) (15) Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in
this state by the same type of ((corporation)) legal entity as the
association, provided those powers do not conflict with any duties
imposed on an association in this chapter; and
(((14))) (16) Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for
the governance and operation of the association.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section establishes voluntary procedures for the
enforcement of governing documents.
(2) A homeowners' association is deemed to have provided notice and
an opportunity to be heard as required under RCW 64.38.020(13) if the
association fulfills the following requirements:
(a) The association must provide the owner with a notice of the
violation that contains:
(i) A reference to the rule or rules that the owner allegedly
violated;
(ii) A short statement of the evidence of the rule violation;
(iii) The name of a person with firsthand knowledge of the facts
that support the determination that the violation occurred;
(iv) A short statement of the action that the association intends
to take, including the amount of any fine, subject to the owner's right
to request a hearing;
(v) A statement that if the owner wishes to contest or explain the
violation, he or she must submit a written request for a hearing to the
association within fifteen days of delivery of the notice of violation;
(vi) A statement of the owner's rights to a hearing, to attend the
hearing, to be represented by counsel, and to review the evidence
supporting the alleged violation;
(b) Upon the timely request for a hearing from an owner, the
association must set a hearing date no less than thirty and no more
than sixty days from the association's receipt of the request. The
association must notify the owner of the hearing at least twenty days
before the hearing and must include with the notification a copy of the
association's rules of procedure for conducting a hearing;
(c) Upon a timely request by the owner who requested a hearing, the
association must, at least ten days before the date of the hearing,
either provide the owner with a copy of all its evidence concerning the
alleged violation, including copies of the complaint signed by a
witness with firsthand knowledge of the facts that support the
determination that the violation occurred, or identify a reasonable
time and place at which the owner may inspect such evidence;
(d) The association must permit the owner to be represented by
counsel at the hearing; and
(e) The association must provide the owner with a written decision,
including a statement of the reasons for the decision, within thirty
days after the hearing.
(3) The chair of the hearing may adjourn or continue the hearing,
if necessary, to gather additional information that the association
needs in order to make a decision.
(4) If an owner does not request a hearing within fifteen days of
the association's delivery of the notice of violation, the association
may take the remedial action stated in the notice, including the
imposition of any fine listed in the notice.

Sec. 7 RCW 64.38.025 and 1995 c 283 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in the association's governing documents or
this chapter, the board of directors shall act in all instances on
behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the
officers of the association and members of the board of directors shall
exercise the degree of care and loyalty required of an officer or
director of a corporation organized under chapter 24.03 RCW.
(2) The board of directors shall not act on behalf of the
association to amend the articles of incorporation, to take any action
that requires the vote or approval of the owners, to terminate the
association, to elect members of the board of directors, or to
determine the qualifications, powers, and duties, or terms of office of
members of the board of directors; but the board of directors may fill
vacancies in its membership of the unexpired portion of any term.
(((3) Within thirty days after adoption by the board of directors
of any proposed regular or special budget of the association, the board
shall set a date for a meeting of the owners to consider ratification
of the budget not less than fourteen nor more than sixty days after
mailing of the summary. Unless at that meeting the owners of a
majority of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger
percentage specified in the governing documents reject the budget, in
person or by proxy, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is
present. In the event the proposed budget is rejected or the required
notice is not given, the periodic budget last ratified by the owners
shall be continued until such time as the owners ratify a subsequent
budget proposed by the board of directors.
(4) The owners by a majority vote of the voting power in the
association present, in person or by proxy, and entitled to vote at any
meeting of the owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any
member of the board of directors with or without cause.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
A board of directors may by majority vote incorporate an
unincorporated homeowners' association as a nonprofit corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision in the governing
documents or other applicable statutes, any member of the board of
directors may be removed with or without cause by a majority vote of
the owners (1) entitled to elect the board member and present, in
person or by proxy, and (2) entitled to vote at any regular or special
meeting of the owners at which a quorum is present.

Sec. 10 RCW 64.38.030 and 1995 c 283 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless provided for in the ((governing documents)) declaration, the
bylaws of the association ((shall)) must contain provisions that are
consistent with this chapter and provide for:
(1) The number, qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office,
and manner of electing and removing the board of directors and officers
of the association and filling vacancies;
(2) Election by the board of directors of the officers of the
association as the bylaws specify;
(3) Which, if any, of its powers the board of directors or officers
of the association may delegate to other persons or to a managing
agent;
(4) Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record
amendments to the governing documents on behalf of the association;
(5) The method of amending the bylaws; and
(6) ((Subject to the provisions of the governing documents,)) Any
other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

Sec. 11 RCW 64.38.035 and 1995 c 283 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A meeting of the association must be held at least once each
year.
(2) Special meetings of the association may be called by the
president, a majority of the board of directors, or by owners having
((ten)) five percent of the votes in the association and must be held
at a reasonable time and at a reasonable place. Any business may be
placed on the agenda for a special meeting as long as the business does
not conflict with this chapter or the association's governing
documents. If the special meeting is called by the members, the
members may determine the business to be placed on the agenda. The
board may also place business on the special meeting agenda. This
subsection supersedes any inconsistent provisions of the governing
documents or other applicable statute.
(3) Not less than ((fourteen)) ten nor more than sixty days in
advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officers specified in
the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by
first-class United States mail to the mailing address of each owner or
to any other mailing address designated in writing by the owner. The
notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and
the business to be placed on the agenda by the board of directors for
a vote by the owners, including the general nature of any proposed
amendment to the articles of incorporation, bylaws, any budget or
changes in the previously approved budget that result in a change in
assessment obligation, and any proposal to remove a director.
(((2) Except as provided in this subsection, all meetings of the
board of directors shall be open for observation by all owners of
record and their authorized agents. The board of directors shall keep
minutes of all actions taken by the board, which shall be available to
all owners. Upon the affirmative vote in open meeting to assemble in
closed session, the board of directors may convene in closed executive
session to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel or
consider communications with legal counsel; and discuss likely or
pending litigation, matters involving possible violations of the
governing documents of the association, and matters involving the
possible liability of an owner to the association. The motion shall
state specifically the purpose for the closed session. Reference to
the motion and the stated purpose for the closed session shall be
included in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the
consideration of matters during the closed portions of meetings only to
those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. No
motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in closed session
may become effective unless the board of directors, following the
closed session, reconvenes in open meeting and votes in the open
meeting on such motion, or other action which is reasonably identified.
The requirements of this subsection shall not require the disclosure of
information in violation of law or which is otherwise exempt from
disclosure.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, all meetings of the board of
directors shall be open for observation by all owners of record and
their authorized agents. The board of directors shall keep minutes of
all actions taken by the board, which must be available to all owners.
Upon the affirmative vote in open meeting to assemble in closed
session, the board of directors may convene in closed executive session
to consider personnel matters; consult with legal counsel or consider
communications with legal counsel; and discuss likely or pending
litigation, matters involving possible violations of the governing
documents of the association, and matters involving the possible
liability of an owner to the association. The motion must state
specifically the purpose for the closed session. Reference to the
motion and the stated purpose for the closed session must be included
in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the
consideration of matters during the closed portions of meetings only to
those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. A
motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in closed session
may not become effective unless the board of directors, following the
closed session, reconvenes in open meeting and votes in the open
meeting on such motion, or other action that is reasonably identified.
This section does not require the disclosure of information in
violation of law or that is otherwise exempt from disclosure. This
section supersedes any conflicting provisions in Title 23 or 24 RCW or
in the association's governing documents.

Sec. 13 RCW 64.38.040 and 1995 c 283 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the governing documents specify a ((different)) smaller
percentage, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the
association if the owners to which ((thirty-four)) twenty-five percent
of the votes of the association are allocated are present in person or
by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
For declarations that exist before the effective date of this
section:
(1) If a declaration requires more than seventy-five percent of the
votes in the association to approve any amendment to the declaration,
the association shall, if so directed by owners holding at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association, bring an action in
superior court for the county, which any portion of the real property
subject to the declaration is located, to reduce the percentage of
votes required to amend the declaration. The owners' decision to bring
an action may, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the
declaration, be made by votes cast at a meeting of the association duly
called or by written consent, or by both. The action shall be an in
rem declaratory judgment action whose title shall be the description of
the property subject to the declaration.
(2) If the court finds that the percentage of votes set forth in
the declaration is an unreasonable burden on the ability of the owners
to amend the declaration and of the association to administer the
property under its jurisdiction, the court shall enter an order
striking the percentage of votes from the declaration and substituting
the percentage of votes that the court determines to be appropriate in
the circumstances. The court shall not mandate approval of less than
sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association to amend any
provision of the declaration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
declarations recorded after the effective date of this section can be
amended with the approval of at least sixty-seven percent of the total
votes in the association, or any larger percentage specified in the
declaration.
(2) A declarant may unilaterally amend the declaration, but only if
the right to amend is clearly stated in the declaration and if the
amendment:
(a) Subjects additional property to the declaration pursuant to a
plan of expansion set forth in the declaration;
(b) Withdraws property from the declaration, if the withdrawal is
allowed under the terms of the declaration and if the property to be
withdrawn is not owned by any third party;
(c) Brings any provision of the declaration into compliance with
any applicable statute, rule, regulation, or judicial determination;
(d) Enables any title insurance company to issue title insurance
coverage for the lots;
(e) Enables any institutional or governmental lender, purchaser,
insurer, or guarantor of mortgage loans, to make, purchase, insure, or
guarantee mortgage loans for the lots; or
(f) Satisfies the requirements of any local, state, or federal
governmental agency.
The amendment shall not adversely affect the title to any lot
unless the owner of the affected lot consents to it in writing.
(3) The declaration may require all or a specified number or
percentage of the eligible mortgagees who hold first lien security
interests encumbering lots to approve specified actions of the owners
or association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions,
but a requirement for approval may not operate to:
(a) Deny or delegate control of the general administrative affairs
of the association by the owners or board of directors;
(b) Prevent the association or board of directors from commencing,
intervening in, or settling any litigation or proceeding; or
(c) Prevent any insurance trustee or the association from receiving
and distributing any insurance proceeds.
For purposes of this subsection, "eligible mortgagee" means the
holder of a mortgage on a lot that has filed with the secretary of the
association a written request for copies of notices of any action by
the association that requires the consent of mortgagees that includes
the lot number and address of the property subject to the mortgage. If
an eligible mortgagee fails to respond to a request for approval within
thirty days following the association's issuance of a notice requesting
such approval, the eligible mortgagee's approval is deemed granted.
(4) The declaration may permit the association's members to approve
an amendment through a combination of votes conducted during meetings
or through a written consent process.
(5) The declaration may require that to be effective all
declaration amendments must be signed by one or more officers of the
association, or if applicable, by the declarant. To be effective, all
declaration amendments must be acknowledged and recorded in each county
in which any portion of the property is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
An action to challenge the validity of a declaration amendment
adopted by the association under this chapter and after the effective
date of this section may not be brought more than one year after the
amendment is recorded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies to associations in which the declaration
or the bylaws authorize only the board of directors to adopt, amend, or
rescind bylaws and to do so without a vote of the members and, with
respect to those associations, to all bylaws adopted or amended by the
board of directors after the effective date of this section.
(2) A bylaw adopted, amended, or rescinded by the board of
directors shall not be valid or enforceable until it is ratified by the
association's members as set forth in this subsection:
(a) The board of directors shall submit all bylaws adopted,
amended, or rescinded by the board to a vote of the members. The vote
must be held at the next regularly scheduled annual meeting of the
association, or at a special meeting held before the next annual
meeting.
(b) The notice of the annual or special meeting must include the
text of any existing bylaw that the board has approved for amendment or
rescission, and the text of any new or amended bylaw approved by the
board.
(c) Unless the governing documents specify a longer advance notice
period for a meeting, notice of the meeting, at which the proposed
bylaw change will be voted upon, must be provided at least ten days in
advance of the meeting and shall not be given more than sixty days in
advance of the meeting.
(d) The proposed bylaw change is deemed approved and ratified by
the members if a majority of all the votes in the association vote at
the meeting, in person or by proxy, to approve the bylaw change
approved by the board.
(3) All bylaw changes ratified by the members in accordance with
this section take effect the day after the annual or special meeting at
which they were ratified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
For rules, or amendments to rules, adopted after the effective date
of this section:
(1) A rule adopted by the board is valid and enforceable if all the
following requirements are satisfied:
(a) The rule is in writing;
(b) The rule is required by law or, within the authority of the
board, conferred by law or by the declaration;
(c) The rule is consistent with the governing documents; and
(d) The rule is adopted or amended in substantial compliance with
the requirements of this chapter.
(2) Except for emergency rules, the board of directors must provide
the association's members with notice and an opportunity to comment on
any proposed new or amended rule before the board is authorized to
adopt or enforce that rule. For purposes of this section, an
"emergency rule" is a rule that is necessary for the immediate
preservation of health and safety or a rule that sets forth specific
rights or obligations affecting the association or its members under
state statutes or administrative rules. Emergency rules become
effective immediately, subject to the members' right to request a
ratification vote under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Except for emergency rules, rules adopted by the board of
directors following notice and an opportunity for comment become
effective thirty days after notice of the rules is provided to the
members in the manner authorized by the governing documents, unless a
written petition signed by twenty percent of the total votes in the
association is submitted to the board within that thirty-day period
requesting a ratification vote on the proposed rule. If a ratification
vote is requested, the association shall use the following process for
the ratification vote:
(a) The board of directors must submit the rules on which a
ratification vote has been requested to a vote of the members. The
vote must be conducted at the next regularly scheduled annual meeting
of the association, or at a special meeting held before the next annual
meeting.
(b) The notice of the meeting, at which the ratification vote will
be conducted, must include the text of the proposed rules.
(c) Unless the governing documents specify a longer advance notice
period for an association meeting, notice of the meeting, at which the
ratification vote will be conducted, must be provided at least ten days
in advance of the meeting and shall not be provided more than sixty
days in advance of the meeting.
(d) The proposed rule change is deemed approved and ratified by the
members, unless a majority of all the votes in the association vote at
the meeting, in person or by proxy, to reject the rule change approved
by the board.
(e) All rule changes ratified by the members in accordance with
this section take effect on the original effective date or later
effective date established by the board.
(4) The board of directors is not required to use the following
optional rule-making process. However, use of this process establishes
compliance with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
For purposes of this section, "rule change" means the adoption or
amendment of a rule by the board.
(a) The board shall give notice of a proposed rule change to the
owners. The notice must include the following information: (i) The
text of the proposed rule change; (ii) a description of the purpose and
effect of the proposed rule change; and (iii) the deadline for
submission of a comment on the proposed rule change.
(b) For a period of at least thirty days following actual or
constructive delivery of a notice of a proposed rule change, the board
shall accept written comments from owners on the proposed rule change.
(c) The board shall consider any comments it receives and make a
decision on a proposed rule change at a board meeting. Except for
emergency rules, a decision on a rule may not be made until after the
comment submission deadline.
(d) The board shall give notice of a rule change to the owners.
The notice must set out the text of the rule change and state the date
the rule change takes effect. Except for emergency rules, the date the
rule change takes effect must not be less than thirty days after notice
of the rule change is provided in the manner authorized in the
governing documents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
Unless the governing documents permit or require other methods for
providing notice, all notices required under this chapter or the
governing documents must be delivered or sent by first-class mail
postage prepaid to the mailing address of each owner, but not for a
shorter time period for providing notice than is required under RCW
64.38.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the declaration may
provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during
which period a declarant or persons designated by the declarant may (a)
appoint and remove the officers and members of the board of directors
or (b) veto or approve a proposed action of the board or association.
A declarant's failure to veto or approve the proposed action in writing
within thirty days of written notice of the proposed action is deemed
an approval of the proposed action by the declarant.
(2) Regardless of any period provided in the declaration, a period
of declarant control terminates no later than the earliest of: (a)
Sixty days after conveyance of seventy-five percent of the lots that
may be created to lot owners other than a declarant; or (b) two years
after the last conveyance or transfer of record of a lot except as
security for a debt, pursuant to which the declarant voluntarily
surrenders the right to further appoint and remove officers and members
of the board of directors. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the
right to appoint and remove officers and members of the board of
directors before termination of the period of declarant control, but in
that event the declarant may require, for the duration of the period of
declarant control, that specified actions of the association or board
of directors, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the
declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.
(3) No later than sixty days after conveyance of twenty-five
percent of the lots that may be created to lot owners other than a
declarant, at least one member and at least twenty-five percent of the
members of the board of directors must be elected by lot owners other
than the declarant. No later than sixty days after conveyance of fifty
percent of the lots that may be created to lot owners other than a
declarant, at least thirty-three and one-third percent of the members
of the board of directors must be elected by lot owners other than the
declarant.

Sec. 21 RCW 64.38.050 and 1995 c 283 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any violation of the provisions of this chapter entitles an
aggrieved party to any remedy provided by law or in equity. The court,
in an appropriate case, may award reasonable attorneys' fees to the
prevailing party.
(2) The court must award attorneys' fees to a homeowner plaintiff
who prevails in a suit to enforce chapter 64.38 RCW or the
association's governing documents. The court may also award exemplary
damages to homeowners upon a determination that the board of directors
acted in bad faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 The code reviser shall alphabetize and
renumber the definitions in RCW 64.38.010.

--- END ---