BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The sum of three hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, from the general
fund, and the sum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2011, from the general fund, to the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the purposes of developing the
Lewis county watershed planning and economic development demonstration
project. The purpose of the project is to identify lands and resources
suitable for economic development within Lewis county and outside of
the floodplains of Chehalis and Cowlitz river watersheds.
(a) The department shall provide up to two hundred thousand dollars
of the appropriation each to the department of fish and wildlife and
the department of ecology to develop a watershed characterization and
to conduct a local habitat assessment, develop recommendations, and
provide technical assistance in support of a demonstration watershed
planning and economic development project in Lewis county.
(b) Up to three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars of the
appropriation is provided solely for a grant to Lewis county to fund
development of a subarea plan, consistent with the provisions of
chapter 36.70A RCW, for rural economic development that is based on the
watershed characterization and local habitat assessment funded in (a)
of this subsection. The department may retain no more than thirty
percent for grant administration and technical assistance.
(2) The subarea plan funded under subsection (1)(b) of this section
shall be developed by a broad-based local stakeholder group with state
agency technical assistance, and shall include the following:
(a) A defined area or areas for future economic development outside
the one hundred year floodplain. An area planned for economic
development requiring urban levels of service must be designated on the
land use map as an urban growth area consistent with RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) A defined area or areas of designated agricultural, forestry,
wildlife habitat, and other critical area lands;
(c) Mechanisms to achieve long-term conservation of important
aquatic and terrestrial resources in the subarea;
(d) Defined mitigation and restoration areas;
(e) Identification of capital facility improvements needed to
implement the plan, and a plan to finance such capital facilities
within projected funding capacities;
(f) Discussion of the relationship between the plan and other
existing, adopted plans and regulations including but not limited to
county and city comprehensive plans, as appropriate, critical areas and
shoreline regulations, transportation, salmon recovery, watershed, and
water resource inventory area plans;
(g) A plan for monitoring and adaptive management; and
(h) Adoption by the local government affected as an amendment to
its comprehensive plan pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, after review and
recommendations on the plan by a broad-based local stakeholder group.

--- END ---