BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.79.010 and 2001 c 64 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context indicates otherwise.
(1)(a) "Junk vehicle" means a motor vehicle certified under RCW
46.55.230 as meeting all the following requirements:
(((a))) (i) Is three years old or older;
(((b))) (ii) Is extensively damaged, such damage including but not
limited to any of the following: A broken window or windshield or
missing wheels, tires, motor, or transmission;
(((c))) (iii) Is apparently inoperable;
(((d))) (iv) Is without a valid, current registration plate;
(((e))) (v) Has a fair market value equal only to the value of the
scrap in it.
(b) "Junk vehicle" does not include, for the purposes of this
chapter, a vehicle that has been demolished by a licensed scrap
processor. Such a vehicle is considered a commodity if being
transported by a commercial motor vehicle in compliance with rules
adopted pursuant to chapters 46.16 and 46.32 RCW.
(2) "Scrap processor" means a licensed establishment that maintains
a crusher, a hydraulic baler and shears, or a shredder for recycling
salvage.
(3) "Demolish" means to destroy completely by use of a crusher, a
hydraulic baler and shears, or a shredder.
(4) "Hulk hauler" means any person who deals in vehicles for the
sole purpose of transporting and/or selling them to a licensed vehicle
wrecker or scrap processor in substantially the same form in which they
are obtained. A hulk hauler may not sell secondhand motor vehicle
parts to anyone other than a licensed vehicle wrecker or scrap
processor, except for those parts specifically enumerated in RCW
46.79.020(2), as now or hereafter amended, which may be sold to a
licensed vehicle wrecker or disposed of at a public facility for waste
disposal.
(5) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(6) "Major component parts" include engines and short blocks,
frames, transmissions or transfer cases, cabs, doors, front or rear
differentials, front or rear clips, quarter panels or fenders, bumpers,
truck beds or boxes, seats, and hoods.

--- END ---