BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.45.010 and 2008 c 116 s 3 and 2008 c 6 s 701 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" shall have its
ordinary meaning and shall include any conveyance, grant, assignment,
quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real property,
including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a
valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant,
assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to
purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or
interest therein or other contract under which possession of the
property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the
purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the
vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term
also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of
improvements constructed upon leased land.
(2) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration. For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of
persons acting in concert shall be aggregated for purposes of
determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest
has taken place. The department of revenue shall adopt standards by
rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In adopting a
rule for this purpose, the department shall consider the following:
(a) Persons shall be treated as acting in concert when they have a
relationship with each other such that one person influences or
controls the actions of another through common ownership; and
(b) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they shall
be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the
purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of
ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single
entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each
purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions shall be considered separate
acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" shall not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic
partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of
marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of
a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) ((Any)) A transfer or conveyance made pursuant to: (i) The
nonjudicial foreclosure of a deed of trust ((or)) when the transfer or
conveyance is to the beneficiary of the deed of trust; (ii) an order of
sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien foreclosure
proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, when the transfer or
conveyance is to the judgment creditor who obtained the writ of
execution or who initiated the mortgage, deed of trust, or lien
foreclosure proceeding; or (iii) a deed in lieu of foreclosure to
satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists
of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where
there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner: PROVIDED, That if thereafter such transferee corporation or
partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such
transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor
or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer
stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee
partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (((1))) (i) the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner, (((2))) (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the
transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor
or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only
beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (((3)))
(iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this
exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been
paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes shall become due
and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not
involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of
section 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (p)(i) of this subsection
cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another
transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (p)(i) of this subsection,
results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously
holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property
in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert
hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(p)(ii) does not apply to that
part of the transfer involving property received that is the real
property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to
the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real
property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was
purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person
or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under
this subsection (3)(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who
previously held a controlling interest in the entity.
(q) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008,
but before December 31, 2018.

--- END ---