BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that retention of
farm, agricultural, and open space lands for future generations are
important public goals and that the current use program plays a vital
role in achieving these public goals. The legislature finds that
horse-related activities contribute to the quality of life of many
citizens in the state and ready access to nearby facilities at which
horses are used are important to many urban as well as rural residents.
The legislature finds that decisions as to the eligibility of
equestrian-related activities for current use valuation need to be made
after substantial information is available upon which to base these
important public policy decisions.
The legislature finds that in-depth analysis of potential criteria
for eligibility for the program is important to maintain public
confidence. The legislature also finds that decisions regarding change
affecting eligibility or noneligibility for current use valuation may
result in a tax shift between property owners and that the potential
impact to all property owners needs to be fully understood and
thoroughly considered. Further, recent changes in long-standing
administrative rules that affect eligibility have consequences that
have not been quantified and broadly understood.
It is the intent of this act to maintain the status quo of lands
used for equestrian purposes under the open spaces taxation act to
provide the time necessary for the working group to thoroughly consider
and develop recommendations and for the legislature to enact such
recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The equestrian facility current use work
group is established. The work group must be composed of the following
members:
(a)(i) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, one from each caucus;
(ii) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, one from each caucus;
(b) Up to six public members that must include representatives of
the equine industry and county assessors, jointly appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate;
(c) A representative of the department of revenue appointed by its
director; and
(d) A representative of the governor's office appointed by the
governor.
(2) The work group must elect its own chair from its members.
(3) Staffing for the work group will be assigned by the staff
directors of the office of program research and senate committee
services.
(4) The work group must examine the issues relating to eligibility
of equestrian farms and facilities for the open spaces taxation act,
chapter 84.34 RCW.
(5) The work group must submit a report of its findings and
recommendations to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of
the house of representative by December 1, 2009. Any recommendations
for legislation must include proposed legislation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 For the period December 31, 2008, through
July 1, 2010, the property tax treatment of owners of farm and
agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, whose tax status changed
as a result of the emergency rule adoption changing WAC 458-30-200,
must be the same as their treatment for property taxes payable in 2008.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---