BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I - GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 SHORT TITLE. This act may be known and
cited as the regional transportation accountability act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 FINDINGS AND PURPOSES. (1) The legislature
finds that:
(a) The Puget Sound region and certain counties that border on
adjoining states or a foreign country are experiencing severe strains
on their transportation systems, causing widespread congestion;
(b) The absence of a unified regional transportation governance
system has significantly contributed to the lack of accountability for
regional transportation planning, prioritization, and funding;
(c) There is a substantial funding shortfall to address regional
transportation needs; and
(d) Continued reliance on an inefficient regional transportation
system exacerbates problems associated with fossil fuel use and impedes
efforts to reduce carbon emissions.
(2) The purposes of this act are:
(a) To improve regional transportation infrastructure for the
benefit of citizens, the economy, and the environment by reducing
fossil fuel use and carbon emissions and increasing transportation
efficiency;
(b) To consolidate several governmental functions related to
transportation planning and funding into a single governmental entity
to coordinate and prioritize transportation planning and funding
decisions; and
(c) To increase accountability to citizens by requiring direct
election of transportation decision makers and voter approval for
transportation taxes and fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Local transportation plan" means a transportation plan
included as part of a regional transportation plan at the request of a
local governmental entity.
(2) "Policy advisory council" means a body convened by the board
under section 10 of this act.
(3) "Region" means a transportation accountability region
established under section 4 of this act.
(4) "Regional board" or "board" means a regional transportation
accountability board established under section 5 of this act.
(5) "Regional transportation plan" or "plan" means a regional
transportation plan prepared in accordance with section 9 of this act.
(6) "Regional transportation project" means a transportation
project within a transportation accountability region that a regional
board determines to have major significance to regional transportation
and that is included in a regional transportation plan.
(7) "Transit agency" means a city-owned transit system, county
transportation authority, metropolitan municipal corporation, and a
public transportation benefit area.
(8) "Transportation project" includes, without limitation:
(a) Highways and roadways, including arterial streets, and their
appurtenances;
(b) Facilities, equipment, and services of public transportation
systems, whether or not operating on exclusive rights-of-way, and
including projects that integrate and connect different modes, such as
park and ride facilities and special purpose ramps and access points;
(c) Facilities for nonmotorized transportation;
(d) Facilities or programs that improve transportation efficiency,
economy, or safety through either management of demand or extension of
capacity, or both;
(e) Supporting systems that apply or incorporate new technology to
the improvement of transportation systems and services;
(f) An extension or expansion of the useful lives of existing
transportation system assets, so long as these assets are also improved
in their safety and efficiency; and
(g) The operation or maintenance, including mitigation, of
transportation facilities.
(9) "Weighted vote" means one vote that reflects the population of
each elected board member adjusted, if necessary, by a percentage of
the population that each elected board member represents that is not
included within the relevant planning area or taxing district for which
the vote applies relative to the total population represented by the
member.

PART II - TRANSPORTATION ACCOUNTABILITY BOARDS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 TRANSPORTATION ACCOUNTABILITY REGION. (1)
A transportation accountability region is established, which must
include, upon approval by initiative or by the legislative authority of
each county within the transportation accountability region, those
counties participating, as of the effective date of this section, in a
regional transportation planning organization, including a county with
a population of at least one million five hundred thousand. The region
is a municipal corporation and possesses all the usual corporate powers
as well as all other powers conferred by statute.
(2) A transportation accountability region may be expanded to
include any other contiguous county or part of the contiguous county if
the regional board and the voters or legislative authority of that
county approve expansion of the region. At least sixty days before
adopting a resolution approving the expansion, the regional board shall
adopt policies governing the expansion process and integration of an
additional county into the region.
(3) Any county that borders on an adjoining state or foreign
country and that has a population over one hundred fifty thousand may,
by ordinance of the county's legislative authority, create a
transportation accountability region. The regional board members for
a single county region are the members of the legislative authority for
the county it serves.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION ACCOUNTABILITY
BOARD. (1) A regional transportation accountability board is
established for each transportation accountability region. A regional
board shall exercise powers and duties as provided under this chapter
within the region for which the board is established.
(2) The regional board must consist of nine part-time board members
directly elected by voters as provided under this section. Board
members must be elected on a nonpartisan basis from geographical
districts initially established by the secretary of state and
periodically revised under chapter 29A.76 RCW. Each district must:
(a) Be as nearly equal in population as possible to each and every
other such district, without favoring any racial group or political
party;
(b) Be as reasonably compact as possible and consist of a
geographically contiguous area; and
(c) To the extent feasible, coincide with existing recognized
natural boundaries and, to the extent practicable, preserve existing
communities of related and mutual interest.
(3) Each county included in whole or in part in a transportation
accountability region shall provide for the nomination of candidates
and election of regional board members at the state's primary and
general election. Candidates must be residents of the district they
seek to represent and may not be serving as an elected member of any
other governmental body.
(4) The term of office of each regional board member is six years.
The three elected members receiving the lowest percentage of votes in
the initial election serve an initial two-year term, the three elected
members receiving the next lowest percentage of votes serve an initial
four-year term, and the remaining three members serve an initial six-year term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 POWERS AND DUTIES. The regional board
shall:
(1) Develop and periodically revise a regional transportation plan
under section 9 of this act;
(2) Receive, prioritize the expenditure of, and disburse state
transportation funds for regional transportation projects;
(3) Approve regional transportation projects located within the
transportation accountability region prior to any city, county, special
district, or other municipal corporation placing revenue measures to
fund such projects or services on a ballot for voter approval;
(4) Impose transportation impact fees on public and private
development activities that may cause significant impacts on the use or
availability of regional transportation projects; and
(5) Establish a program for interconnecting fares, schedules, and
transfers on trips using two or more transit agencies for regional
transportation projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 ADDITIONAL POWERS. The regional board may:
(1) Employ or contract with engineering, legal, financial, or other
employees, specialized personnel, or consultants as may be necessary.
(2) Exercise all other powers necessary and appropriate to carry
out its responsibilities including, without limitation, to sue and be
sued, to enter into contracts, and to acquire, own, and transfer real
and personal property and property rights by lease, sublease, purchase,
or sale.
(3) Enter into interlocal agreements or agreements with local
governments, the state, or the federal government to further its
responsibilities under this chapter and other applicable laws.
(4) Create and fill staff positions, fix reasonable wages and
salaries, pay costs involved in hiring employees, and establish
reasonable benefits for employees, including holiday pay, vacations or
vacation pay, retirement benefits, and medical, life, accident, or
health disability insurance, as approved by the board. To the extent
appropriate, the regional board shall retain staff from existing
transportation planning organizations and regional transit authorities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 BOARD PROCEDURES. (1) All proceedings of a
regional board must be recorded in its minute books, which are subject
to chapter 42.56 RCW. A majority of the voting board members
constitute a quorum of the board for the transaction of business. Each
elected member has one vote, or one weighted vote if the member's
geographical district is partially or wholly outside a taxing district
under the board's authority.
(2) Actions by the board must be made by a simple majority weighted
vote of board members, except that a decision to submit a regional
transportation plan for voter approval, or to make a major modification
to any regional transportation plan previously approved by the voters,
must be approved by at least two-thirds weighted vote of board members.
(3) Campaign contribution limitations for county elective office of
the most populous county represented by the board apply to campaigns
for election of members to the regional board.
(4) Board members are entitled to reimbursement for reasonable
expenses related to their service on the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION PLAN. (1) A
regional board shall prepare a regional transportation plan as provided
under this section. A regional board may include in a regional
transportation plan each of the following elements:
(a) Planning, financing, construction, and operation of regional
transportation projects.
(b) Standards for preparation of transit development plans under
RCW 35.58.2795 by each municipality within a transportation
accountability region.
(c) A program to coordinate and interconnect transit agency routes,
fares, and schedules within a transportation accountability region.
(d) At the request of a municipal corporation within a
transportation accountability region, any local plan or proposed
transportation project, together with taxes, user fees, tolls, and
charges to finance construction and operation of the project.
(e) A plan to coordinate or consolidate under the authority of the
board the services of any transit agency located in the transportation
accountability region. A plan to coordinate or consolidate a transit
agency must include a detailed description of any rights, powers,
functions, and obligations of the transit agency that would be assumed
by the regional board, as well as any legislation that may be required
before the coordination or consolidation becomes effective. A plan to
coordinate or consolidate a transit agency must also be approved by a
majority of the voters within the boundaries of a transportation
accountability region, as well as a majority of the voters within the
geographic area served by the transit agency.
(2) In adopting a regional transportation plan, a regional board
shall weigh its contribution to:
(a) Economic growth and prosperity;
(b) The alleviation of congestion and delay;
(c) Citizens' personal transportation goals;
(d) Increased energy efficiency;
(e) The development of emerging technologies;
(f) The reduction of carbon emissions;
(g) Increased public safety; and
(h) Advancing all practical transportation modes.
(3) The regional board shall submit a regional transportation plan
to the voters of a transportation accountability region for approval.
Voter approval of a regional transportation plan constitutes all
necessary voter approval for:
(a) Any projects, taxes, tolls, charges, and user fees included in
the plan; and
(b) Any local transportation plan or project included in the
regional transportation plan, and the levy, imposition, or
authorization of local taxes, tolls, charges, and user fees previously
approved by a municipal corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 ADVISORY COUNCIL. (1) A regional board
shall establish a policy advisory council for state, regional, and
local officials, transportation providers, and private citizens to
advise the board on transportation planning, prioritization, and
funding issues. The board shall develop procedures governing the
policy advisory council's composition, duties, procedures, and formal
review of plans and programs.
(2) The policy advisory council for a regional board must include
a member appointed by each county executive or chair of the board of
county commissioners of each county and confirmed by the legislative
authority of the respective county, and a member appointed by the
governor. The appointments should include individuals who have
experience in regional transportation issues or in the design,
construction, operation, maintenance, or financing of public
transportation projects.

PART III - TRANSPORTATION AGENCY CONSOLIDATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 TRANSPORTATION AGENCY CONSOLIDATION.
Within a transportation accountability region, a regional board shall
consolidate and exercise all powers and responsibilities of:
(1) A regional transportation investment district under chapter
36.120 RCW;
(2) A regional transportation planning organization under chapter
47.80 RCW;
(3) A metropolitan planning organization, to the fullest extent
permitted under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 134 and other applicable federal laws;
and
(4) As provided in section 12 of this act, a regional transit
authority under chapter 81.112 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 REGIONAL TRANSIT AUTHORITY CONSOLIDATION.
(1) Commencing with the initial terms of office of its members, the
regional board shall assume all project planning and transportation
funding prioritization functions of the regional transit authority
including, without limitation, all powers provided in RCW 81.112.030(9)
and 81.112.100.
(2) Commencing after the voters approve a regional transportation
plan as provided in section 9 of this act, the regional board may
assume all remaining regional transit authority powers as provided
under the plan.
(3)(a) Until the regional board assumes all remaining regional
transit authority powers as provided under subsection (2) of this
section, the regional board may appoint the governing board of a
regional transit authority within the transportation accountability
region and delegate to that board any additional powers that may be
necessary to preserve the region as a regional transit authority or
other independent taxing or bonding authority or recipient of federal
or state funds.
(b) If the regional board establishes a regional transit authority
board, the regional board shall appoint its members from nominations by
the county executive or legislative authority of each member county.
Membership must be based on population from that portion of each county
that lies within the transportation accountability region. The
regional board shall appoint regional transit authority board members
on the basis of one member for each one hundred forty-five thousand
population within each county included in whole or in part in the
region.

Sec. 13 RCW 81.112.040 and 1994 c 109 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
REGIONAL TRANSIT AUTHORITY BOARD APPOINTMENTS. (1) Except as
provided under section 12 of this act, the regional transit authority
shall be governed by a board consisting of representatives appointed by
the county executive and confirmed by the council or other legislative
authority of each member county. Membership shall be based on
population from that portion of each county which lies within the
service area. Board members shall be appointed initially on the basis
of one for each one hundred forty-five thousand population within the
county. Such appointments shall be made following consultation with
city and town jurisdictions within the service area. In addition, the
secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee shall serve as
a member of the board and may have voting status with approval of a
majority of the other members of the board. Only board members, not
including alternates or designees, may cast votes.
Each member of the board, except the secretary of transportation or
the secretary's designee, shall be:
(a) An elected official who serves on the legislative authority of
a city or as mayor of a city within the boundaries of the authority;
(b) On the legislative authority of the county, if fifty percent of
the population of the legislative official's district is within the
authority boundaries; or
(c) A county executive from a member county within the authority
boundaries.
When making appointments, each county executive shall ensure that
representation on the board includes an elected city official
representing the largest city in each county and assures proportional
representation from other cities, and representation from
unincorporated areas of each county within the service area. At least
one-half of all appointees from each county shall serve on the
governing authority of a public transportation system.
Members appointed from each county shall serve staggered four-year
terms. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the remainder of
the unexpired term of the position being vacated.
The governing board shall be reconstituted, with regard to the
number of representatives from each county, on a population basis,
using the official office of financial management population estimates,
five years after its initial formation and, at minimum, in the year
following each official federal census. The board membership may be
reduced, maintained, or expanded to reflect population changes but
under no circumstances may the board membership exceed twenty-five.
(2) Major decisions of the authority shall require a favorable vote
of two-thirds of the entire membership of the voting members. "Major
decisions" include at least the following: System plan adoption and
amendment; system phasing decisions; annual budget adoption;
authorization of annexations; modification of board composition; and
executive director employment.
(3) Each member of the board is eligible to be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to
receive compensation as provided in RCW 43.03.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 TRANSITION RULES. The jurisdiction and
powers of any existing metropolitan planning organization or regional
transit authority, and its plans or programs necessary to obtain
federal transportation funds or to maintain compliance with federal
law, remain in full force and effect until a regional board is
recognized by the federal government as a qualified successor entity.

PART IV - FINANCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 TAXES AND FEES. (1) Subject to approval by
the legislative authority of each county within a transportation
accountability region to establish a special taxing district, a
regional board may impose or authorize some or all of the following
revenue sources previously authorized for regional transportation
agencies, which a board may levy, impose, or authorize if approved by
an affirmative vote of the majority of the voters when included in a
regional transportation plan under section 9 of this act:
(a) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060;
(b) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of
up to one percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event in the transportation accountability
region;
(c) A commercial parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
board's boundaries; and
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120.
(2) The board may impose vehicle tolls on state or federal highways
within a transportation accountability region if the regional
transportation plan identifies the facilities that may be tolled.
Unless otherwise specified by law or by contract between the board and
the department of transportation, the department of transportation
shall administer the collection of tolls at designated facilities.
(3) Revenues from taxes and fees may be used only to implement a
regional transportation plan and to provide for the board's costs
incurred in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.
(4) A board shall not, unless otherwise negotiated and agreed upon
by applicable parties, directly spend, or otherwise control, a local
jurisdiction's or transit agency's locally imposed funds.
(5) The board may designate the boundaries of the taxing district
proposed in a regional transportation plan to be coextensive with the
boundaries of any regional transit authority in a county represented by
the board.

Sec. 16 RCW 47.56.031 and 2005 c 335 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
APPROVAL OF TOLLS. ((No)) (1) Tolls may not be imposed on new or
existing highways or bridges without:
(a) Specific legislative authorization((, or upon));
(b) Approval by a majority vote of the people within the boundaries
of the unit of government empowered to impose tolls; or
(c) Approval by a regional transportation accountability board,
which may impose vehicle tolls as provided under section 15 of this
act.
(2) This section applies to chapter 47.56 RCW and to any tolls
authorized under chapter 47.29 RCW, the transportation innovative
partnership act of 2005.

Sec. 17 RCW 47.56.075 and 2002 c 56 s 404 are each amended to
read as follows:
TOLL FACILITY APPROVAL. The department shall approve for
construction only such toll roads ((as)) or other toll facilities that:
(1) The legislature specifically authorizes ((or such toll
facilities as));
(2) Are specifically sponsored by a regional transportation
investment district, city, town, or county; or
(3) Are specifically authorized by a regional transportation
accountability board, which may impose tolls as provided under section
15 of this act.

Sec. 18 RCW 81.100.060 and 2006 c 318 s 2 and 2006 c 311 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
HIGH OCCUPANCY VEHICLE SYSTEMS SURCHARGE. A county with a
population of one million or more and a county with a population of
from two hundred ten thousand to less than one million that is
adjoining a county with a population of one million or more, having
within their boundaries existing or planned high occupancy vehicle
lanes on the state highway system, a regional transportation
accountability board, or a regional transportation investment district,
but only to the extent that the surcharge has not already been imposed
by the county, may, with voter approval, impose a local surcharge of
not more than three-tenths of one percent in the case of a county, or
eight-tenths of one percent in the case of a regional transportation
accountability board or regional transportation investment district, of
the value on vehicles registered to a person residing within the county
or investment district and not more than 13.64 percent on the state
sales and use taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail
car rentals within the county, regional transportation accountability
board, or investment district. A county may impose the surcharge only
to the extent that it has not been imposed by the district. No
surcharge may be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070
except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less,
RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
Counties, regional transportation accountability boards, or
investment districts imposing a surcharge under this section shall
contract, before the effective date of the resolution or ordinance
imposing a surcharge, administration and collection to the state
department of licensing, and department of revenue, as appropriate,
which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to
exceed two percent of the taxes, for administration and collection
expenses incurred by the department. All administrative provisions in
chapters 82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW shall, insofar as they are
applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes, be applicable to surcharges
imposed under this section. All administrative provisions in chapters
82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to surcharges
imposed under this section. A surcharge imposed under this section, or
a change to the surcharge, shall take effect no sooner than seventy-five days after the department of licensing or the department of
revenue receives notice of the surcharge or change to the surcharge,
and shall take effect only on the first day of January, April, July, or
October. Unless waived by the department of licensing or the
department of revenue, notice includes providing the appropriate
department with digital mapping and legal descriptions of areas in
which the ((tax)) surcharge will be collected.
If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed, the total
proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW 81.100.030
each year shall not exceed the maximum amount which could be collected
under this section.

Sec. 19 RCW 82.14.430 and 2006 c 311 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
SALES AND USE TAX. (1) If approved by the majority of the voters
within its boundaries voting on ((the)) a ballot proposition, a
regional transportation accountability board or regional transportation
investment district may impose a sales and use tax of up to 0.1 percent
of the selling price or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax. The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under this
subsection.
(2) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on ((the)) a ballot proposition, a regional transportation
accountability board or regional transportation investment district may
impose a tax on the use of a motor vehicle within ((a regional
transportation investment district)) its jurisdiction. The tax applies
to those persons who reside within ((the)) a transportation
accountability region or regional transportation investment district.
The rate of the tax may not exceed 0.1 percent of the value of the
motor vehicle. The tax authorized by this subsection is in addition to
the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030 and must be imposed and
collected at the time a taxable event under RCW 82.08.020(1) or
82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this subsection must
be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and distributed to
the regional transportation accountability board or regional
transportation investment district according to RCW 82.14.050. The
following provisions apply to the use tax in this subsection:
(a) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
shall collect the use tax from the buyer using the collection
provisions of RCW 82.08.050.
(b) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax
must be collected using the provisions of RCW 82.12.045.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(d) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) The value of a motor vehicle must be determined under RCW
82.12.010.
(f) Except as specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters
82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax
imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW, and chapter 82.14 RCW
applies fully to the use tax.
(3) In addition to fulfilling the notice requirements under RCW
82.14.055(1), and unless waived by the department, a regional
transportation accountability board or regional transportation
investment district shall provide the department of revenue with
digital mapping and legal descriptions of areas in which the tax will
be collected.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.80.005 and 2002 c 56 s 415 are each amended to
read as follows:
LOCAL OPTION TRANSPORTATION TAX DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of
this chapter((,)):
(1) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
created under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(2) "Regional board" means a regional transportation accountability
board established under section 5 of this act.
(3) "Regional transportation plan" means a regional transportation
plan prepared in accordance with section 9 of this act.

Sec. 21 RCW 82.80.030 and 2005 c 336 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
COMMERCIAL PARKING TAX. (1) Subject to the conditions of this
section, a regional board or the legislative authority of a county,
city, or district may fix and impose a parking tax on all persons
engaged in a commercial parking business within its respective
jurisdiction. A county, city, or ((county)) district may impose the
tax only to the extent that it has not been imposed by ((the district))
a regional board, and a ((district)) regional board may impose the tax
only to the extent that it has not been imposed by a county, city, or
((county)) district. The jurisdiction of a county, for purposes of
this section, includes only the unincorporated area of the county. The
jurisdiction of a city or district includes only the area within its
boundaries.
(2) In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, a city,
a county in its unincorporated area, a regional board, or a district
may fix and impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor
vehicle in a facility operated by a commercial parking business.
The city, county, regional board, or district may provide that:
(a) The tax is paid by the operator or owner of the motor vehicle;
(b) The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is paid, whether
paid or leased, including parking supplied with a lease of
nonresidential space;
(c) The tax is collected by the operator of the facility and
remitted to the city, county, regional board, or district;
(d) The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the parking
charge;
(e) The tax rate varies with zoning or location of the facility,
the duration of the parking, the time of entry or exit, the type or use
of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and
(f) Tax exempt carpools, vehicles with handicapped decals, or
government vehicles are exempt from the tax.
(3) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section, means
the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking
lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a
covered or uncovered area with stalls for the purpose of parking motor
vehicles.
(4) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be
based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls
available for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be
uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business.
(5) The county, city, regional board, or district levying the tax
provided for in subsection (1) or (2) of this section may provide for
its payment on a monthly, quarterly, or annual basis. Each local
government may develop by ordinance or resolution rules for
administering the tax, including provisions for reporting by commercial
parking businesses, collection, and enforcement.
(6) The proceeds of the commercial parking tax fixed and imposed by
a city or county under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be
used for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070 or
for transportation improvements in accordance with chapter 36.73 RCW.
The proceeds of the commercial parking tax imposed by a regional board
must be used as provided under a regional transportation plan. The
proceeds of the parking tax imposed by a district must be used as
provided in chapter 36.120 RCW.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.80.100 and 2002 c 56 s 408 are each amended to
read as follows:
MOTOR VEHICLE LICENSE FEE. (1) Upon approval of a majority of the
voters within its boundaries voting on the ballot proposition, a
regional transportation accountability board or regional transportation
investment district may set and impose an annual local option vehicle
license fee, or a schedule of fees based upon the age of the vehicle,
of up to one hundred dollars per motor vehicle registered within the
boundaries of the region on every motor vehicle. As used in this
section "motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010. Vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the international registration
plan are exempt from the annual local option vehicle license fee set
forth in this section. The department of licensing shall administer
and collect this fee on behalf of a regional transportation
accountability board or regional transportation investment
district((s)) and remit this fee to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.
(2) The local option vehicle license fee applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.
(3) A regional transportation accountability board or regional
transportation investment district imposing the local option vehicle
license fee or initiating an exemption process shall enter into a
contract with the department of licensing. The contract must contain
provisions that fully recover the costs to the department of licensing
for collection and administration of the fee.
(4) A regional transportation accountability board or regional
transportation investment district imposing the local option fee shall
delay the effective date of the local option vehicle license fee
imposed by this section at least six months from the date of the final
certification of the approval election to allow the department of
licensing to implement the administration and collection of or
exemption from the fee.

Sec. 23 RCW 82.80.120 and 2006 c 311 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
FUEL TAX. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county((;)).
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030((;)).
(c) "District" means a regional transportation investment district
under chapter 36.120 RCW.
(d) "Region" means a transportation accountability region
established under section 4 of this act.
(e) "Regional board" means a regional transportation accountability
board established under section 5 of this act.
(2) A regional transportation accountability board or regional
transportation investment district ((under chapter 36.120 RCW)),
subject to the conditions of this section, may levy additional excise
taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide motor vehicle fuel tax rate
under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in
RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW
82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the regional board or district.
The additional excise tax is subject to the approval of a majority of
the voters within the regional board or district boundaries. Vehicles
paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the
regional board's or district's fuel excise tax. The additional excise
taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights of refund as
applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes
levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax may not be
levied less than one month from the date the election results are
certified. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under this
section will be the first day of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of the region
or district to a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the
fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a regional board or district shall contract with
the department of licensing for the administration and collection of
the taxes. The contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to
exceed one percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be
deposited into the local tax administration account created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The department of licensing may spend
money from this account, upon appropriation, for the administration of
the local taxes imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the regional
board or district levying the tax as part of the regional
transportation plan or regional transportation investment district
plan, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in
RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b).
(8) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a district in
this section, to be used as a part of a regional transportation
investment district plan, must be used in accordance with chapter
36.120 RCW, but only for those areas that are considered "highway
purposes" as that term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the
state Constitution.
(9) A district may only levy the tax under this section if the
district is comprised of boundaries identical to the boundaries of a
county or counties. A district may not levy the tax in this section if
a member county is levying the tax in RCW 82.80.010 or 82.80.110.
(10) The proceeds of the additional taxes levied by a regional
board under this section must be used to implement a regional
transportation plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 BORROWING AUTHORITY. (1) Subject to
chapters 39.36 and 39.46 RCW, a regional board may:
(a) Enter into agreements with a lead agency or the state to pledge
one or more of the taxes, tolls, charges, or fees authorized to be
imposed by a regional board as security for the payment of obligations
issued by the lead agency or the state;
(b) Issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount,
together with any other outstanding nonvoter-approved general
obligation indebtedness, equal to one and one-half percent of the value
of the taxable property within a transportation accountability region;
or
(c) Issue revenue bonds and, in connection with the issuance of
bonds, pledge as additional security for the payment of revenue bonds
of a regional board one or more of the taxes, tolls, charges, or fees
authorized to be imposed by the regional board.
(2) The authority to impose any tax, toll, charge, or fee pledged
by a regional board under this act may not be eliminated or modified
while any obligations benefited by the pledge are outstanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 TREASURER. (1) A regional board shall
designate a person who is not a member of the board and who has
experience in financial or fiscal matters to be treasurer of the
transportation accountability region. The board may designate the
treasurer of any county within the region to act as treasurer. The
treasurer has all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties that the
county treasurer has related to investing surplus funds.
(2) If the treasurer is also the treasurer of a county, all board
funds must be deposited with a county depositary under the same
restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for county
depositaries. If the treasurer is not the treasurer of a county, all
funds must be deposited in a bank or banks that are public
depositaries, as defined in RCW 39.58.010, and are qualified for
insured deposits under any federal deposit insurance act as the board,
by resolution, designates, or funds must be invested in legal
investments for counties.
(3) The board shall require a bond with a surety company authorized
to do business in this state in an amount and under the terms and
conditions the board, by resolution, from time to time finds will
protect the board against loss. The board shall pay the premium on the
bond. The board may require a reasonable bond of any other person
handling money or securities of the board, but the board shall pay the
premium on the bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 TAX EXEMPTIONS. The following taxes do not
apply to any regional transportation project included in a regional
transportation plan:
(1) Local business and occupation taxes;
(2) Business and occupation taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.220;
(3) Retail sales taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020;
(4) Use taxes imposed under RCW 82.12.020; and
(5) Public utility taxes imposed under RCW 82.16.020.

Sec. 27 RCW 35.21.718 and 1998 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
LOCAL BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX EXEMPTION. A city or town may
not impose a tax on amounts received from operating:
(1) State route number 16 corridor transportation systems and
facilities constructed and operated under chapter 47.46 RCW; or
(2) A regional transportation project included in a regional
transportation plan under section 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX EXEMPTIONS. This chapter does not
apply to amounts received from operating a regional transportation
project included in a regional transportation plan under section 9 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
RETAIL SALES TAX EXEMPTION. The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does
not apply to the sales of goods, labor, and services rendered for
construction, maintenance, and operation of a regional transportation
project included in a regional transportation plan under section 9 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
USE TAX EXEMPTION. This chapter does not apply to the use of
tangible personal property to construct, operate, or maintain a
regional transportation project included in a regional transportation
plan under section 9 of this act.

Sec. 31 RCW 82.16.046 and 1998 c 179 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
PUBLIC UTILITY TAX EXEMPTION. The provisions of this chapter do
not apply to amounts received from operating:
(1) State route number 16 corridor transportation systems and
facilities constructed and operated under chapter 47.46 RCW; or
(2) A regional transportation project included in a regional
transportation plan under section 9 of this act.

PART V - MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 RCW 47.80.060 (Executive board membership)
and 2007 c 511 s 1, 2005 c 334 s 1, & 1992 c 101 s 31 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 36.120
RCW to read as follows:
A regional transportation improvement district formed after the
effective date of this section is not allowed within the boundaries of
a transportation accountability region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Sections 1 through 12, 14, 15, and 24
through 26 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

PART VI - RULES OF CONSTRUCTION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 CONSTRUCTION. The rule of strict
construction may not be applied to this act, which must be liberally
construed to carry out its purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 CODE REVISER. The office of the code
reviser is directed to submit to the chair of the senate transportation
committee and the chair of the house of representatives transportation
committee before the commencement of the first legislative session
after the effective date of this section proposed legislation that
makes technical corrections to statutes and identifies other amendments
needed to fully implement this act. The legislature may amend this act
at any time if necessary to fully implement its purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 CAPTIONS AND PART HEADINGS NOT LAW.
Captions and part headings used in this act are not any part of the
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 EMERGENCY EFFECT. This act is necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---