BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the delayed sentencing option if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period in which the
court has jurisdiction for the current offense; and
(e) The standard sentence range for the current offense is one year
or less and the offender would otherwise serve his or her sentence in
a county jail.
(2) A motion for consideration of the delayed sentencing option
under this section may be made by the court, the offender, or the
prosecutor. If the court grants the motion, an offender may elect to
participate in the delayed sentencing option under terms set by the
court.
(3)(a) Upon entry of a plea of guilty, if the court determines that
a delayed sentence under this section is appropriate, the court shall
continue the sentencing hearing for a period set by the court up to
three hundred sixty-five days and order presentence release conditions
pending sentencing.
(b) An offender must submit a chemical dependency, domestic
violence, or mental health evaluation to the court at the time a guilty
plea is entered in order to be considered for inpatient or outpatient
treatment as a condition of the delayed sentencing option.
(c) At the discretion of the court, an offender may participate in
the delayed sentencing option whether or not treatment is imposed as a
condition of the delayed sentencing option.
(4) The delayed sentencing option shall include:
(a) A requirement not to possess or use any controlled substances
without a valid prescription;
(b) A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to
monitor compliance;
(c) A release of information signed by the offender authorizing any
treatment provider to provide notice of noncompliance to the court,
defense counsel, and the prosecutor;
(d) A requirement to remain within prescribed geographical
boundaries while sentencing is pending;
(e) A requirement to commit no criminal law violations;
(f) A requirement to report any change of address, employment, or
phone number to the prosecutor, defense counsel, and any treatment
provider;
(g) A requirement to make monthly payments set by the court or the
county clerk on restitution ordered by the court prior to sentencing,
and to pay any fees assessed by the clerk and the costs of any
treatment and testing including urinalysis, unless provided at public
expense;
(h) A requirement to stay out of prescribed geographical
boundaries, if designated by the court; and
(i) Other crime-related conditions as the court may require.
(5)(a) The delayed sentencing option may include a period of
appropriate inpatient or outpatient substance abuse, domestic violence,
or mental health treatment in a program that has been approved by the
department of social and health services.
(b) The treatment provider must submit periodic status reports to
the court, defense counsel, and the prosecutor relating to the
offender's progress in treatment. The treatment provider must notify
the court, defense counsel, and the prosecutor of any noncompliance by
the offender within seventy-two hours.
(6)(a) The court may require any offender subject to this section
to appear in court during the postconviction period pending sentencing
to review compliance with conditions, including treatment requirements.
(b) The court may modify the terms of the delayed sentencing order
or impose sanctions under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The court may revoke the delayed sentencing option and sentence
the offender to a term of total confinement or county-approved
alternative to total confinement within the standard range for the
offender's current offense at any time during the postconviction period
pending sentencing or at the sentencing hearing if the court finds by
a preponderance of the evidence that the offender violated the
conditions of the delayed sentencing order or the offender is failing
to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total or partial
confinement under (c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any
time previously served under this section.
(7) If an offender subject to this section is found by the United
States attorney general to be subject to a deportation order, a hearing
shall be held by the court unless waived by the offender, and, if the
court finds that the offender is subject to a valid deportation order,
may terminate the offender from the delayed sentencing option and
immediately sentence the offender to a term of total confinement within
the standard range for the offender's current offense.
(8)(a) An offender participating in the delayed sentencing option
under this section shall be subject to all rules relating to earned
release time with respect to any period served in postconviction
treatment pursuant to this section.
(b) An offender ordered to participate in treatment pending
sentencing under this section shall be given one day credit for each
day of participation in inpatient and outpatient treatment.
(9) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under this
section may be paid, at the option of the county, from funds provided
to the county from the criminal justice treatment account under RCW
70.96A.350.
(10) A delayed sentence under this section does not constitute a
suspended or deferred sentence under RCW 9.94A.575.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.500 and 2008 c 231 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing. Except as provided in section 1 of this
act, the sentencing hearing shall be held within forty court days
following conviction. Upon the motion of either party for good cause
shown, or on its own motion, the court may extend the time period for
conducting the sentencing hearing.
Except in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of
total confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death, the court may order the department to
complete a risk assessment report. If available before sentencing, the
report shall be provided to the court.
Unless specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the
department to complete a chemical dependency screening report before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant who has been convicted of a
violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW, a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter
9A.28 RCW, or any felony where the court finds that the offender has a
chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense. In
addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence
upon a defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense.
The department of corrections shall give priority to presentence
investigations for sexual offenders. If the court determines that the
defendant may be a mentally ill person as defined in RCW 71.24.025,
although the defendant has not established that at the time of the
crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the
crime, the court shall order the department to complete a presentence
report before imposing a sentence.
The court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence
reports, if any, including any victim impact statement and criminal
history, and allow arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel,
the offender, the victim, the survivor of the victim, or a
representative of the victim or survivor, and an investigative law
enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.
A criminal history summary relating to the defendant from the
prosecuting authority or from a state, federal, or foreign governmental
agency shall be prima facie evidence of the existence and validity of
the convictions listed therein. If the court is satisfied by a
preponderance of the evidence that the defendant has a criminal
history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to exist.
All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all
risk assessment reports and presentence reports presented to the
sentencing court and all written findings of facts and conclusions of
law as to sentencing entered by the court shall be sent to the
department by the clerk of the court at the conclusion of the
sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the offender is
committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall
provide, without charge, certified copies of documents relating to
criminal convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.
(2) To prevent wrongful disclosure of information related to mental
health services, as defined in RCW 71.05.445 and 71.34.345, a court may
take only those steps necessary during a sentencing hearing or any
hearing in which the department presents information related to mental
health services to the court. The steps may be taken on motion of the
defendant, the prosecuting attorney, or on the court's own motion. The
court may seal the portion of the record relating to information
relating to mental health services, exclude the public from the hearing
during presentation or discussion of information relating to mental
health services, or grant other relief to achieve the result intended
by this subsection, but nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prevent the subsequent release of information related to mental
health services as authorized by RCW 71.05.445, 71.34.345, or
72.09.585. Any person who otherwise is permitted to attend any hearing
pursuant to chapter 7.69 or 7.69A RCW shall not be excluded from the
hearing solely because the department intends to disclose or discloses
information related to mental health services.

--- END ---