BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.270 and 2006 c 327 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this
title makes mandatory the withholding of the driving privilege of such
person by the department, the court in which such conviction is had
shall forthwith mark the person's Washington state driver's license or
permit to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department. A
valid driver's license or permit to drive marked under this subsection
shall remain in effect until the person's driving privilege is withheld
by the department pursuant to notice given under RCW 46.20.245, unless
the license or permit expires or otherwise becomes invalid prior to the
effective date of this action. Perfection of notice of appeal shall
stay the execution of sentence including the withholding of the driving
privilege.
(2) Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under
this chapter, or any other act of this state or municipal ordinance
adopted by a local authority regulating the operation of motor vehicles
on highways, or any federal authority having jurisdiction over offenses
substantially the same as those set forth in Title 46 RCW which occur
on federal installations within this state, shall immediately forward
to the department a forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure the defendant's appearance in court, a payment of a fine,
penalty, or court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a
finding of guilt, or a finding that any person has committed a traffic
infraction an abstract of the court record in the form prescribed by
rule of the supreme court, showing the conviction of any person or the
finding that any person has committed a traffic infraction in said
court for a violation of any said laws other than regulations governing
standing, stopping, parking, and pedestrian offenses.
(3) Every state agency or municipality having jurisdiction over
offenses committed under this chapter, or under any other act of this
state or municipal ordinance adopted by a state or local authority
regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways, may forward to
the department within ten days of failure to respond, failure to pay a
penalty, failure to appear at a hearing to contest the determination
that a violation of any statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to
standing, stopping, parking, or other infraction issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d) has been committed, or failure to appear at a hearing
to explain mitigating circumstances, an abstract of the citation record
in the form prescribed by rule of the department, showing the finding
by such municipality that two or more violations of laws governing
standing, stopping, and parking or one or more other infractions issued
under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) have been committed and indicating the nature
of the defendant's failure to act. Such violations or infractions may
not have occurred while the vehicle is stolen from the registered owner
or is leased or rented under a bona fide commercial vehicle lease or
rental agreement between a lessor engaged in the business of leasing
vehicles and a lessee who is not the vehicle's registered owner. The
department may enter into agreements of reciprocity with the duly
authorized representatives of the states for reporting to each other
violations of laws governing standing, stopping, and parking.
(4) For the purposes of this title ((46 RCW the term)) and except
as defined in RCW 46.25.010, "conviction" means a final conviction in
a state or municipal court or by any federal authority having
jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as those set forth in
this title ((46 RCW)) which occur on federal installations in this
state, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to
secure a defendant's appearance in court, the payment of a fine or
court cost, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or a finding of guilt
on a traffic law violation charge, regardless of whether the imposition
of sentence or sanctions are deferred or the penalty is suspended, but
not including entry into a deferred prosecution agreement under chapter
10.05 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of this title ((46 RCW the term)), "finding
that a traffic infraction has been committed" means a failure to
respond to a notice of infraction or a determination made by a court
pursuant to this chapter. Payment of a monetary penalty made pursuant
to RCW 46.63.070(2) is deemed equivalent to such a finding.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.25.010 and 2006 c 327 s 2 and 2006 c 50 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol,
including but not limited to ethanol, methanol, propanol, and
isopropanol.
(2) "Alcohol concentration" means:
(a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of
blood; or
(b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath.
(3) "Commercial driver's license" (CDL) means a license issued to
an individual under chapter 46.20 RCW that has been endorsed in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter to authorize the
individual to drive a class of commercial motor vehicle.
(4) The "commercial driver's license information system" (CDLIS) is
the information system established pursuant to the CMVSA to serve as a
clearinghouse for locating information related to the licensing and
identification of commercial motor vehicle drivers.
(5) "Commercial driver's instruction permit" means a permit issued
under RCW 46.25.060(5).
(6) "Commercial motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle or combination
of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport passengers or property
if the motor vehicle:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or more
(26,001 pounds or more) inclusive of a towed unit with a gross vehicle
weight rating of more than 4,536 kilograms (10,000 pounds or more); or
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 11,794 kilograms or more
(26,001 pounds or more); or
(c) Is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers, including
the driver; or
(d) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous
materials as defined in this section; or
(e) Is a school bus regardless of weight or size.
(7) "Conviction" means an unvacated adjudication of guilt, or a
determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the
law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized
administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral
deposited to secure the person's appearance in court, a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or
court cost, entry into a deferred prosecution program under chapter
10.05 RCW, or violation of a condition of release without bail,
regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or
probated.
(8) "Disqualification" means a prohibition against driving a
commercial motor vehicle.
(9) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of
a motor vehicle in any place open to the general public for purposes of
vehicular traffic. For purposes of RCW 46.25.100, 46.25.110, and
46.25.120, "drive" includes operation or physical control of a motor
vehicle anywhere in the state.
(10) "Drugs" are those substances as defined by RCW 69.04.009,
including, but not limited to, those substances defined by 49 C.F.R.
40.3.
(11) "Employer" means any person, including the United States, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, who owns or leases a
commercial motor vehicle, or assigns a person to drive a commercial
motor vehicle.
(12) "Gross vehicle weight rating" (GVWR) means the value specified
by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single vehicle.
The GVWR of a combination or articulated vehicle, commonly referred to
as the "gross combined weight rating" or GCWR, is the GVWR of the power
unit plus the GVWR of the towed unit or units. If the GVWR of any unit
cannot be determined, the actual gross weight will be used. If a
vehicle with a GVWR of less than 11,794 kilograms (26,001 pounds or
less) has been structurally modified to carry a heavier load, then the
actual gross weight capacity of the modified vehicle, as determined by
RCW 46.44.041 and 46.44.042, will be used as the GVWR.
(13) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been
designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 5103 and is required to be
placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. part 172 or any quantity of a
material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. part 73.
(14) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, or
any other vehicle required to be registered under the laws of this
state, but does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail.
(15) "Out-of-service order" means a declaration by an authorized
enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican, or local
jurisdiction that a driver, a commercial motor vehicle, or a motor
carrier operation is out-of-service pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 386.72,
392.5, 395.13, 396.9, or compatible laws, or the North American uniform
out-of-service criteria.
(16) "Positive alcohol confirmation test" means an alcohol
confirmation test that:
(a) Has been conducted by a breath alcohol technician under 49
C.F.R. 40; and
(b) Indicates an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more.
A report that a person has refused an alcohol test, under
circumstances that constitute the refusal of an alcohol test under 49
C.F.R. 40, will be considered equivalent to a report of a positive
alcohol confirmation test for the purposes of this chapter.
(17) "School bus" means a commercial motor vehicle used to
transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home
to school, from school to home, or to and from school-sponsored events.
School bus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.
(18) "Serious traffic violation" means:
(a) Excessive speeding, defined as fifteen miles per hour or more
in excess of the posted limit;
(b) Reckless driving, as defined under state or local law;
(c) A violation of a state or local law relating to motor vehicle
traffic control, other than a parking violation, arising in connection
with an accident or collision resulting in death to any person;
(d) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a
commercial driver's license;
(e) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without a commercial
driver's license in the driver's possession; however, any individual
who provides proof to the court by the date the individual must appear
in court or pay any fine for such a violation, that the individual held
a valid CDL on the date the citation was issued, is not guilty of a
"serious traffic offense";
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of
commercial driver's license endorsement or endorsements for the
specific vehicle group being operated or for the passenger or type of
cargo being transported; and
(g) Any other violation of a state or local law relating to motor
vehicle traffic control, other than a parking violation, that the
department determines by rule to be serious.
(19) "State" means a state of the United States and the District of
Columbia.
(20) "Substance abuse professional" means an alcohol and drug
specialist meeting the credentials, knowledge, training, and continuing
education requirements of 49 C.F.R. 40.281.
(21) "Tank vehicle" means a vehicle that is designed to transport
a liquid or gaseous material within a tank that is either permanently
or temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis. Tank vehicles
include, but are not limited to cargo tanks and portable tanks.
However, this definition does not include portable tanks having a rated
capacity under one thousand gallons.
(22) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of
Columbia.
(23) "Verified positive drug test" means a drug test result or
validity testing result from a laboratory certified under the authority
of the federal department of health and human services that:
(a) Indicates a drug concentration at or above the cutoff
concentration established under 49 C.F.R. 40.87; and
(b) Has undergone review and final determination by a medical
review officer.
A report that a person has refused a drug test, under circumstances
that constitute the refusal of a federal department of transportation
drug test under 49 C.F.R. 40, will be considered equivalent to a report
of a verified positive drug test for the purposes of this chapter.

--- END ---