BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the welfare of
the people of the state of Washington is positively impacted through
the encouragement and expansion of key growth industries in the state.
The legislature further finds that targeting tax incentives to focus on
key growth industries is an important strategy to enhance the state's
business climate. A key area of growth is those industries associated
with the green economy and in specific renewable energy manufacturing.
The state has the necessary infrastructure, supporting industries, and
skilled labor force to support renewable energy manufacturing. It is
of great concern that businesses in this sector have been increasingly
expanding and locating their operations elsewhere. Additional
incentives for the renewable energy industry are needed in recognition
of the unique forces and issues involved in business decisions in this
industry. Tax incentives for the sector are important in both
retention and expansion of existing business and attraction of new
businesses, all of which will strengthen this growth industry within
our state, will create jobs, and will bring many indirect benefits to
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a fifty
percent credit is allowed for each dollar of capital invested in
renewable energy manufacturing expenditures, up to a maximum of twenty
million dollars of credit.
(2) The total amount of credits allowed under this section in any
year for a project may not exceed four million dollars. A maximum of
forty million dollars of credits may be issued per year statewide.
Credits are allowed on a first-in-time basis. The department shall
disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the total
amount of credits claimed statewide under this section in any year to
exceed forty million dollars per year. No refunds shall be granted for
credits under this section.
(3) A person may sell or otherwise transfer the economic value of
any credit provided in this section for a renewable energy
manufacturing expenditure at a rate equal to seventy percent of the
total amount of credit being sold or transferred. The buyer may apply
the full value of the credits being purchased to satisfy the tax
otherwise due under this chapter for the tax reporting period. The
buyer may not seek a refund for any credits purchased in excess of
their tax liability due under this chapter.
(4) The department of revenue, in coordination with the department
of community, trade, and economic development, may adopt rules to
implement this section, including rules that provide a formulary method
of determining allowable credits and specify how credits may be sold,
transferred, and tracked.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section:
(a) "Renewable energy manufacturing expenditures" means
expenditures for:
(i) Land that includes a renewable energy manufacturing facility;
(ii) Machinery and equipment used in or integral to a renewable
energy manufacturing facility; and
(iii) Tangible personal property and labor and services used in the
construction, expansion, or reconstruction of a renewable energy
manufacturing facility.
(b) "Renewable energy manufacturing facility" means a facility
predominantly used for manufacturing solar, wind, geothermal, or
bioenergy equipment.
(6) A person taking the credit under this section must report as
required under RCW 82.32.535.
(7) Credits may be carried forward until used; however, no credit
may be earned under this section on or after July 1, 2014.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.32.5351 and 2006 c 84 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(2)(a) A person who reports taxes under RCW 82.04.2404 or who
claims an exemption or credit under RCW 82.08.9651, section 2 of this
act, and 82.12.9651 shall make a complete annual report to the
department detailing employment, wages, and employer-provided health
and retirement benefits per job at the manufacturing site. The report
shall not include names of employees. The report shall also detail
employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary
positions. The first report filed under this subsection shall include
employment, wage, and benefit information for the twelve-month period
immediately before first use of a preferential tax rate under RCW
82.04.2404, or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.08.9651, section 2
of this act, and 82.12.9651. The report is due by April 30th following
any year in which a preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.2404 is used,
or tax exemption or credit under RCW 82.08.9651, section 2 of this act,
and 82.12.9651 is taken. The department may extend the due date for
timely filing annual reports under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(b) If a person fails to submit a complete annual report under (a)
of this subsection by the due date of the report or any extension under
RCW 82.32.590, the department shall declare the amount of taxes
exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the preferential
business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be immediately due
and payable. Excise taxes payable under this subsection are subject to
interest but not penalties, as provided under this chapter. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) By November 1st of the year occurring five years after December
1, 2006, and November 1st of the year occurring eleven years after
December 1, 2006, the fiscal committees of the house of representatives
and the senate, in consultation with the department, shall report to
the legislature on the effectiveness of chapter 84, Laws of 2006 in
regard to keeping Washington competitive. The report shall measure the
effect of chapter 84, Laws of 2006 on job retention, net jobs created
for Washington residents, company growth, diversification of the
state's economy, cluster dynamics, and other factors as the committees
select. The reports shall include a discussion of principles to apply
in evaluating whether the legislature should reenact any or all of the
tax preferences in chapter 84, Laws of 2006.

--- END ---