BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.140.120 and 2005 c 155 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds and declares that, due to the
extraordinary volume of material washed down onto beds of navigable
waters and shorelands in the Toutle river, Coweeman river, and portions
of the Cowlitz river, the dredge spoils placed upon adjacent publicly
and privately owned property in the areas, if further disposed, will be
of nominal value to the state and that it is in the best interests of
the state to allow further disposal without charge.
(2) All dredge spoil or materials removed from the state-owned beds
and shores of the Toutle river, Coweeman river, and that portion of the
Cowlitz river from two miles above the confluence of the Toutle river
to its mouth deposited on adjacent public and private lands during the
years 1980 through December 31, ((1995)) 2035, as a result of dredging
of these rivers for navigation and flood control purposes may be sold,
transferred, or otherwise disposed of by owners of the lands without
the necessity of any charge by the department and free and clear of any
interest of the department of the state of Washington.

--- END ---