BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.310 and 1990 c 284 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Adequate foster parent training has been identified as directly
associated with increasing the length of time foster parents are
willing to provide foster care and reducing the number of placement
disruptions for children. Placement disruptions can be harmful to
children by denying them consistent and nurturing support. Foster
parents have expressed the desire to receive training in addition to
the foster parent SCOPE training currently offered. Foster parents who
care for more demanding children, such as children with severe
emotional, mental, or physical handicaps, would especially benefit from
additional training. The department shall develop additional training
for foster parents that focuses on skills to assist foster parents in
caring for ((emotionally, mentally, or physically handicapped))
children with mental, emotional, or physical disabilities.
(2) No later than January 1, 2010, the department shall develop for
inclusion into its current foster parent training program a section
devoted to the characteristics, management of, and needs of children
with autism.

--- END ---