BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to identify and
fund a project of significance to the Snohomish region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of transportation shall begin the environmental
planning process as required under the state environmental policy act,
chapter 43.21C RCW, or the national environmental policy act if
applicable, for the state route number 9 Snohomish river bridge
replacement project. In conjunction with the environmental planning
process, the department shall prepare a final design for the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five million five hundred sixty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the motor
vehicle account to the department of transportation for the purposes of
section 2 of this act.

--- END ---