BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that profoundly
divergent children have educational needs that are substantially
different than those of normal students. Without individualized
attention, profoundly divergent children underachieve and are unable to
reach their full potential within our society. Furthermore, providing
an inadequate education of the most capable of the profoundly divergent
harms the least capable of the profoundly divergent. The innovation
and skills of high functioning profoundly divergent students create
opportunities for the lowest functioning of the profoundly divergent to
lead fulfilling lives. By assuring that both ends of the profoundly
divergent spectrum have the resources to flourish, the educational
system provides for those at the margins of the intellectual strata.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.155.010 and 2007 c 115 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the purpose of RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160,
28A.160.030, and 28A.150.390 to ensure that all children with
disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020, and profoundly divergent
children as defined in section 3 of this act, shall have the
opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as
guaranteed to them by the Constitution of this state and applicable
federal laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Students designated as profoundly divergent under subsection
(2) of this section must be provided an educational opportunity in
accordance with the special needs education provided for in RCW
28A.155.020.
(2) A student is eligible for special needs educational programs
for profoundly divergent students if the student's intelligence
quotient deviates from the mean by three or more standard deviations on
an individually administered standardized test of intelligence.
(3) Students who must be referred for individualized testing
include:
(a) Any student who performs in the ninety-ninth percentile on a
normalized test of student achievement;
(b) Any student exhibiting a substantial number of the defining
characteristics, as established by the relevant field of study, of a
student whose intelligence quotient deviates from the mean by three or
more standard deviations;
(c) Any student identified in early childhood, birth through age
three, as having a substantial number of the defining characteristics,
as established by the relevant field of study, of a student whose
intelligence quotient deviates from the mean by three or more standard
deviations; or
(d) Any student meeting any other criteria established by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction for screening
students whose intelligence quotient deviates from the mean by three or
more standard deviations.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.155.020 and 2007 c 115 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is established in the office of the superintendent of public
instruction an administrative section or unit for the education of
children with disabilities who require special education and for the
education of profoundly divergent children.
Students with disabilities are those children whether enrolled in
school or not who through an evaluation process are determined eligible
for special education due to a disability. Students who are profoundly
divergent are defined in section 3 of this act.
In accordance with part B of the federal individuals with
disabilities education improvement act and any other federal or state
laws relating to the provision of special education services, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require each school district
in the state to insure an appropriate educational opportunity for all
children with disabilities and profoundly divergent children between
the ages of three and twenty-one, but when the twenty-first birthday
occurs during the school year, the educational program may be continued
until the end of that school year. The superintendent of public
instruction, by rule, shall establish for the purpose of excess cost
funding, as provided in RCW 28A.150.390, 28A.160.030, and 28A.155.010
through 28A.155.160, functional definitions of special education, the
various types of disabling conditions, and eligibility criteria for
special education programs for children with disabilities and
profoundly divergent children, including referral procedures, use of
aversive interventions, the education curriculum and statewide or
district-wide assessments, parent and district requests for special
education due process hearings, and procedural safeguards. For the
purposes of RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.160, an appropriate
education is defined as an education directed to the unique needs,
abilities, and limitations of the children with disabilities and
profoundly divergent children who are enrolled either full time or part
time in a school district. School districts are strongly encouraged to
provide parental training in the care and education of the children and
to involve parents in the classroom.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit the establishment or
continuation of existing cooperative programs between school districts
or contracts with other agencies approved by the superintendent of
public instruction, which can meet the obligations of school districts
to provide education for children with disabilities, or prohibit the
continuation of needed related services to school districts by the
department of social and health services.
This section shall not be construed as in any way limiting the
powers of local school districts set forth in RCW 28A.155.070.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.150.390 and 1995 c 77 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each
regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a
programmed budget request for special education programs for students
with disabilities and profoundly divergent children. Funding for
programs operated by local school districts shall be on an excess cost
basis from appropriations provided by the legislature for special
education programs for students with disabilities and profoundly
divergent children and shall take account of state funds accruing
through RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, federal medical assistance and
private funds accruing under RCW 74.09.5249 through 74.09.5253 and
74.09.5254 through 74.09.5256, and other state and local funds,
excluding special excess levies.

--- END ---