BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislative authority of a county
may adopt an ordinance creating a public health district in all or a
portion of the area of the county, including the area within the
corporate limits of any city or town within the county.
(b) By resolution, the legislative authority of a county may opt to
join the legislative authority of another county or counties to adopt
an ordinance creating a joint public health district in all or a
portion of the area of the counties, including the area within the
corporate limits of any city or town within a county in the joint
public health district.
(c) An ordinance under this section may be adopted only after a
public hearing has been held on the creation of a public health
district, and each county legislative authority within the proposed
district makes a finding that it is in the public interest to create
the district.
(2) A public health district is a municipal corporation, an
independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article VII,
section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the
meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.
(3) A public health district is a body corporate and possesses all
the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all
other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by
statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire
employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and
be sued.
(4) The members of each county legislative authority within the
district, acting ex officio and independently, compose the governing
body of any public health district that is created within the county or
counties. The voters of a public health district must be registered
voters residing within the boundaries of the district.
(5) A county or counties proposing to create a public health
district for the purpose of funding operating costs associated with
public health services in the county or counties must first receive
approval from the governor after submitting a complete business plan to
the governor and the legislature by November 1, 2009. The business
plan must, at a minimum, include anticipated federal and local funding,
long-term operation and maintenance needs, and long-term financial
plan.
(6) For the purposes of this chapter, "district" has the same
meaning as "public health district."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) To carry out the purposes for which
public health districts are created, the governing body of a public
health district may levy each year an ad valorem tax on all taxable
property located in the district not to exceed thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. The levy must be sufficient for
the provision of public health services as shown to be required by the
budget prepared by the governing body of the public health district.
(2) A tax imposed under this section may be used only for funding
the operating costs associated with providing public health services
within the county or counties in the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A public health district may incur
general indebtedness, and issue general obligation bonds, to finance
the operating costs associated with providing public health services
within the county or counties in the district and retire the
indebtedness in whole or in part from the revenues received from the
tax levy authorized in RCW 36.54.130.
(2) The ordinance adopted by the legislative authority creating the
county public health district and authorizing the use of revenues
received from the tax levy authorized in section 2 of this act must
indicate an intent to incur this indebtedness and the maximum amount of
this indebtedness that is contemplated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A public health district may impose excess
levies upon the property included within the district for a one-year
period to be used for operating purposes whenever authorized by the
electors of the district under RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section
2(a) of the state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The governing body of the public health
district must annually prepare a budget of the requirements of each
district fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 At the time of making general tax levies in
each year, each legislative authority of the county or counties in
which a public health district is located must make the required levies
for district purposes against the real and personal property in the
district. The tax levies must be a part of the general tax roll and be
collected as a part of the general taxes against the property in the
district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The treasurer of the county in which a
public health district is located is treasurer of the district. If
there is more than one county in the public health district, then one
of the county treasurers from the counties in the district must be
chosen to be the district treasurer, in the form and manner determined
by the district governing body. The county treasurer must receive and
disburse public health district revenues, collect taxes authorized and
levied under this chapter, and credit district revenues to the proper
fund.
(2) The district treasurer must establish a public health district
fund, into which must be paid all district revenues, and the district
treasurer must also maintain such special funds as may be created by
the governing body of a public health district, into which the district
treasurer must place all money as the governing body of the district
may, by resolution, direct.
(3) The district treasurer must pay out money received for the
account of the public health district on warrants issued by the county
auditor or auditors against the proper funds of the district.
(4) All district funds must be deposited with the county or
counties depositaries under the same restrictions, contracts, and
security as provided for county depositaries.
(5) All interest collected on public health district funds belongs
to the district and must be deposited to its credit in the proper
district funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A public health district formed under this
chapter may be dissolved in the manner provided in chapter 53.48 RCW,
relating to port districts.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.52.052 and 2004 c 129 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of additional taxes by any taxing
district, except school districts and fire protection districts, in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of
the obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing
district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer
district, solid waste disposal district, public facilities district,
flood control zone district, county rail district, service district,
public hospital district, road district, rural county library district,
island library district, rural partial-county library district,
intercounty rural library district, cemetery district, city, town,
transportation benefit district, emergency medical service district
with a population density of less than one thousand per square mile,
cultural arts, stadium, and convention district, ferry district, city
transportation authority, public health district, or regional fire
protection service authority.
Any such taxing district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the
rate specified in RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or
84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when authorized so to do by the voters of
such taxing district in the manner set forth in Article VII, section
2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a special or general election
to be held in the year in which the levy is made.
A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
county legislative authority, or council, board of commissioners, or
other governing body of any such taxing district, by giving notice
thereof by publication in the manner provided by law for giving notices
of general elections, at which special election the proposition
authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

--- END ---