BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.41.030 and 1996 c 254 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county assessor shall maintain an active and systematic
program of revaluation on a continuous basis, and shall establish a
revaluation schedule which will result in revaluation of all taxable
real property within the county at least once each four years and
physical inspection of all taxable real property within the county at
least once each six years. Each county assessor may disregard any
program of revaluation, if requested by a property owner, and change,
as appropriate, the valuation of real property upon the receipt of a
notice of decision received under RCW 36.70B.130((, 90.60.160,)) or
chapter 35.22, 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW pertaining to the value of
the real property.
(2) If a county has a reduction in median home prices of ten
percent or more during an assessment year, then all properties in the
county must be revalued prior to assessments being issued for the same
assessment year.

--- END ---