BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that on a seasonal or longer term basis,
a water right holder or claimant may not need to divert or withdraw any
or a part of the water allowable under the right or claim, but may be
uncertain whether foregoing the use or a portion of the use for a
season or successive seasons may cause the right or a portion of the
right to relinquish. It is the intent of this section to provide a
streamlined procedure to allow a water right holder to notify the state
of the water right holder's intent to forego water use without that
period of nonuse counting toward relinquishment of the right and with
the forgone water benefitting instream flows.
(2) A person entitled to divert or withdraw waters of the state may
elect to forego water use or a portion thereof without the period of
nonuse being included within the five-year period of nonuse
constituting relinquishment under RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, or
90.14.180, when the person provides prior written notice to the
department regarding reduced use.
(3)(a) Notice under this section must include:
(i) Information regarding the ownership of the rights, including
the identifying numbers of pertinent permits, certificates, or
previously filed water right claims;
(ii) A description of each water right or claim, including the land
area to which it is appurtenant, the purpose of use, the location of
the point of diversion or withdrawal, and the instantaneous quantity
and annual quantity allowed;
(iii) The period of time during which it is anticipated that use
will be foregone, if known;
(iv) An estimate of the quantity of water use that has been and
will be foregone, including both the total quantity in acre-feet per
year and the instantaneous diversion or withdrawal rate in cubic feet
per second or gallons per minute; and
(v) An estimate of reduced irrigated acres, if applicable.
(b) The anticipated period of future foregone use identified in
(a)(iii) of this subsection is not binding on the water right holder
and the notice of foregone use remains in effect until the water right
holder files a notice of amendment or revocation under subsection (6)
of this section.
(4) The department shall, through guidelines, establish the forms
of notification necessary to implement this section.
(5) When the department receives a notice of foregone water use,
the foregone water is deemed to be a temporary trust water right under
this chapter.
(6) The water right holder or claimant must maintain their
diversion and conveyance facilities in good working order and capable
of diverting and conveying the full quantity of the right while the
water is foregone.
(7) The water right holder or claimant may revoke or amend the
election to forego water use at any time by submitting a notice in
writing to the department. Upon receipt of such a notice, the
accumulation of time during which nonuse of water may constitute
relinquishment must be resumed if the water right holder or claimant
does not immediately resume the use of the water.
(8) During the period of foregone use of a water right, the water
represented by the consumptive use portion of the right must be
managed, to the extent practicable, by the department for the
maintenance and enhancement of stream flows and to preserve or restore
aquifer conditions.
(9) The department shall make a record of all notices of election
to forego water use and notices to amend or revoke such an election
that are received under this section and shall append the notices to
the water right and claim files associated with the notices. There is
no fee for filing and recording a notice under this section.
(10) The person who files a notice of foregone water use under this
section shall notify the department in writing of any changes in
contact information.
(11) The department shall provide notice annually to a water right
holder or claimant who has filed a notice of foregone water that is
still in operation. The water right holder or claimant must provide
updated notice if he or she would like to change any information
contained in the existing notice of foregone water use.
(12) The department may invalidate a notice of foregone water use
for good cause including, but not limited to, situations in which the
water right holder or claimant is not acting in good faith, if the
water right holder or claimant is acting fraudulently, or in situations
in which the foregone water use is not bona fide.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.42.130 and 2003 c 144 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall seek input from agricultural
organizations, federal agencies, tribal governments, local governments,
watershed groups, conservation groups, and developers on ((water
banking)) the trust water rights program, including water banking
((procedures)) activities and identification of areas in Washington
state where water banking could assist in providing water supplies for
instream and out-of-stream uses. The department shall summarize any
comments received on ((water banking)) the trust water rights program
and submit a report, including any recommendations, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature for their consideration in the subsequent
legislative session.
(2) By December 31st of every even-numbered year, the department
shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on ((water banking activities)) the trust water rights program
authorized under RCW 90.42.100. The report shall:
(a) Evaluate the effectiveness of ((water banking)) the trust water
rights program in meeting the policies and objectives of this chapter;
(b) Describe any statutory, regulatory, or other impediments to
water banking in other areas of the state; and
(c) Identify other basins or regions that may benefit from
authorization for the department to use the trust water (([rights]))
rights program for water banking purposes.
(3) The department shall also include in the report on the trust
water rights program the number of notices received under section 1 of
this act, how much water the notices involve, the geographic locations
affected by the notices, and the impacts on streams.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By June 30, 2010, the department of
ecology shall prepare a data gap analysis that evaluates existing
groundwater and surface water information on water levels and water
quality within each water resource inventory area of the state. The
analysis must include:
(a) A summary of historic and current monitoring of ambient
groundwater and surface water levels and water quality across the
state;
(b) An evaluation of the completeness and quality of the data and
conclusions produced from such monitoring;
(c) An identification of basins where water quantity levels are of
concern but no monitoring is being conducted;
(d) An evaluation and recommendations for quality controls and
other protocols associated with data collection and management;
(e) A compilation and summary of existing studies of groundwater
and surface water levels, water quality, and monitoring activities; and
(f) Recommendations on the components necessary to establish a
comprehensive, statewide ambient groundwater and surface water
monitoring and assessment program and the funding necessary to
implement the program.
(2) The department of ecology must submit the data gap analysis to
the relevant policy committees of the senate and house of
representatives.

--- END ---