BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.160 and 2005 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of the duty connected death of any member who is
in active service, or who has vested under the provisions of RCW
41.26.090 with twenty or more service credit years of service, or who
is on duty connected disability leave or retired for duty connected
disability, the surviving spouse shall become entitled, subject to RCW
41.26.162, to receive a monthly allowance equal to: If active, the
choice of fifty percent of the final average salary at the date of
death ((if active,)) or the amount of the retirement allowance the
vested member would have received if he or she had retired on the date
of death; or the amount of retirement allowance the vested member would
have received at age fifty((,)); or the amount of the retirement
allowance such retired member was receiving at the time of death if
retired for duty connected disability. The amount of this allowance
will be increased five percent of final average salary for each child
as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), subject to a maximum combined allowance
of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED, That if the child
or children is or are in the care of a legal guardian, payment of the
increase attributable to each child will be made to the child's legal
guardian or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the member has
created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, payment of
the increase attributable to each child will be made to the trust.
(2) If at the time of the duty connected death of a vested member
with twenty or more service credit years of service as provided in
subsection (1) of this section or a member retired for duty connected
disability, the surviving spouse has not been lawfully married to such
member for one year prior to retirement or separation from service if
a vested member, the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive
the benefits under this section: PROVIDED, That if a member dies as a
result of a disability incurred in the line of duty, then if he or she
was married at the time he or she was disabled, the surviving spouse
shall be eligible to receive the benefits under this section.
(3) If there be no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at
the time of such member's duty connected death, then the child or
children of such member shall receive a monthly allowance equal to
thirty percent of final average salary for one child and an additional
ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum combined
payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average
salary. When there cease to be any eligible children as defined in RCW
41.26.030(7), there shall be paid to the legal heirs of the member the
excess, if any, of accumulated contributions of the member at the time
of death over all payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under
this chapter: PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to
children shall be prorated equally among the children, if more than
one. If the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or
children, the payment shall be made to the trust.
(4) In the event that there is no surviving spouse eligible to
receive benefits under this section, and that there be no child or
children eligible to receive benefits under this section, then the
accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of the member.
(5) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under this section
remarries after June 13, 2002, the surviving spouse shall continue to
receive the benefits under this section.
(6) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under the provisions
of this section thereafter dies and there are children as defined in
RCW 41.26.030(7), payment to the spouse shall cease and the child or
children shall receive the benefits as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(7) The payment provided by this section shall become due the day
following the date of death and payments shall be retroactive to that
date.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.161 and 2005 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of the nonduty connected death of any member who
is in active service, or who has vested under the provisions of RCW
41.26.090 with twenty or more service credit years of service, or who
is on disability leave or retired, whether for nonduty connected
disability or service, the surviving spouse shall become entitled,
subject to RCW 41.26.162, to receive a monthly allowance equal to: If
active, the greater of fifty percent of the final average salary at the
date of death ((if active,)) or the amount of retirement allowance the
vested member would have received if he or she had retired on the date
of death; or the amount of retirement allowance the vested member would
have received at age fifty((,)); or the amount of the retirement
allowance such retired member was receiving at the time of death if
retired for service or nonduty connected disability. The amount of
this allowance will be increased five percent of final average salary
for each child as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), subject to a maximum
combined allowance of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED,
That if the child or children is or are in the care of a legal
guardian, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be
made to the child's legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal
guardian and if the member has created a trust for the benefit of the
child or children, payment of the increase attributable to each child
will be made to the trust.
(2) If at the time of the death of a vested member with twenty or
more service credit years of service as provided in subsection (1) of
this section or a member retired for service or disability, the
surviving spouse has not been lawfully married to such member for one
year prior to retirement or separation from service if a vested member,
the surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive the benefits
under this section.
(3) If there be no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at
the time of such member's death, then the child or children of such
member shall receive a monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of
final average salary for one child and an additional ten percent for
each additional child subject to a maximum combined payment, under this
subsection, of sixty percent of final average salary. When there cease
to be any eligible children as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), there shall
be paid to the legal heirs of the member the excess, if any, of
accumulated contributions of the member at the time of death over all
payments made to survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter:
PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to children shall be
prorated equally among the children, if more than one. If the member
has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, the
payment shall be made to the trust.
(4) In the event that there is no surviving spouse eligible to
receive benefits under this section, and that there be no child or
children eligible to receive benefits under this section, then the
accumulated contributions shall be paid to the estate of said member.
(5) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under this section
remarries after June 13, 2002, the surviving spouse shall continue to
receive the benefits under this section.
(6) If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under the provisions
of this section thereafter dies and there are children as defined in
RCW 41.26.030(7), payment to the spouse shall cease and the child or
children shall receive the benefits as provided in subsection (3) of
this section.
(7) The payment provided by this section shall become due the day
following the date of death and payments shall be retroactive to that
date.

--- END ---