BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.104.015 and 1999 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "High-capacity transportation system" means a system of public
transportation services within an urbanized region operating
principally on exclusive rights of way, and the supporting services and
facilities necessary to implement such a system, including interim
express services and high occupancy vehicle lanes, which taken as a
whole, provides a substantially higher level of passenger capacity,
speed, and service frequency than traditional public transportation
systems operating principally in general purpose roadways.
(2) "Rail fixed guideway system" means a light, heavy, or rapid
rail system, monorail, inclined plane, funicular, trolley, systems
using various magnetic levitation technologies, personal rapid
transportation systems operating on fixed guideways, or other fixed
rail guideway component of a high-capacity transportation system that
is not regulated by the federal railroad administration, or its
successor. "Rail fixed guideway system" does not mean elevators,
moving sidewalks or stairs, and vehicles suspended from aerial cables,
unless they are an integral component of a station served by a rail
fixed guideway system.
(3) "Regional transit system" means a high-capacity transportation
system under the jurisdiction of one or more transit agencies except
where a regional transit authority created under chapter 81.112 RCW
exists, in which case "regional transit system" means the high-capacity
transportation system under the jurisdiction of a regional transit
authority.
(4) "Transit agency" means city-owned transit systems, county
transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, and
public transportation benefit areas.

--- END ---