BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
pyramiding effect of the business and occupation tax favors vertically
integrated businesses and impedes the success of new and small
businesses in the state. The legislature concludes that a study of the
value added tax is necessary to identify alternatives to the business
and occupation tax.
(2) The department of revenue must conduct a study on alternatives
for replacing the business and occupation tax with a revenue neutral
subtraction method business value added tax. In conducting the study,
the department must examine the tax structures of other states and
review previous studies regarding tax reform in this state. The
department of revenue must be guided by administrative simplicity,
economic neutrality, fairness, stability, and transparency.
(3) The department of revenue must create an advisory group to
include, but not be limited to, representatives of business, state
agencies, local governments, labor, taxpayers, and other advocacy
groups. The group shall provide advice and assistance to the
department.
(4) The department of revenue must present a final report of its
findings and alternatives, including a legislative draft proposal, to
the ways and means committee in the senate and the finance committee in
the house of representatives by September 30, 2009.

--- END ---