BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.610 and 2007 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If any owner of forest land within a forest protection zone
neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection as required by
RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such protection and shall
annually impose the following assessments on each parcel of such land:
(i) A flat fee assessment of seventeen dollars and fifty cents; and
(ii) twenty-seven cents on each acre exceeding fifty acres.
(b) Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment on tax
exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the assessment,
the department may bill the landowner directly.
(2) ((An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels,
each containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the same county,
may obtain the following refund:
(a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) seventeen dollars and (ii) the total of the amounts
retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of
this section.
(b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) seventeen dollars, (ii) twenty-seven cents for each acre
exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of the amounts retained by
the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of this section.
Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a
form prescribed by the department and in the same year in which the
assessments were paid. The department may not provide refunds to
applicants who do not provide verification that all assessments and
property taxes on the property have been paid. Applications may be
made by mail.
In addition to the procedures under this subsection, property
owners with multiple parcels in a single county who qualify for a
refund under this section may apply to the department on an application
listing all the parcels owned in order to have the assessment computed
on all parcels but billed to a single parcel. Property owners with the
following number of parcels may apply to the department in the year
indicated:

Year Number of Parcels
2002 10 or more parcels
2003 8 or more parcels
2004 and thereafter 6 or more parcels

The department must compute the correct assessment and allocate one
parcel in the county to use to collect the assessment. The county must
then bill the forest fire protection assessment on that one allocated
identified parcel. The landowner is responsible for notifying the
department of any changes in parcel ownership.
(3))) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at
the discretion of the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per
year of this assessment shall be used in support of those rural fire
districts assisting the department in fire protection services on
forest lands.
(((4))) (3) For the purpose of this chapter, the department may
divide the forest lands of the state, or any part thereof, into
districts, for fire protection and assessment purposes, may classify
lands according to the character of timber prevailing, and the fire
hazard existing, and place unprotected lands under the administration
of the proper district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid by the
department for protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal
shall be a lien upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the
owner within ten days after October 1st of the year in which they were
incurred. The department shall be prepared to make statement thereof,
upon request, to a forest owner whose own protection has not been
previously approved as to its adequacy, the department shall report the
same to the assessor of the county in which the property is situated.
The assessor shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the
property, and upon authorization from the department shall levy the
forest protection assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as
shown in each ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor
may then segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the
rural fire protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.
(((5))) (4) The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in
the same manner, by the same procedure, and with the same penalties
attached that general state and county taxes on the same property are
collected, except that errors in assessments may be corrected at any
time by the department certifying them to the treasurer of the county
in which the land involved is situated. Assessments shall be known and
designated as assessments of the year in which the amounts became
reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county treasurer
shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the
costs of listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The
treasurer shall then transmit the balance to the department.
Collections shall be applied against expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this section, including necessary and reasonable
administrative costs incurred by the department in the enforcement of
these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected from
owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW
76.04.660.
(((6))) (5) When land against which forest protection assessments
are outstanding is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public
auction, the state shall have a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over
and above the amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent tax
judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale exceed
the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately remit to
the department the amount of the outstanding forest protection
assessments.
(((7))) (6) All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering
forest land included in a forest protection zone shall pay the forest
protection assessments provided in this section and the special forest
fire suppression account assessments under RCW 76.04.630. The forest
protection assessments and special forest fire suppression account
assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available
funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from
the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which
the protection was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against
the nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the
nonfederal public body to the department and are subject to interest
charges at the legal rate.
(((8))) (7) A public body, having failed to previously pay the
forest protection assessments required of it by this section, which
fails to suppress a fire on or originating from forest lands owned or
administered by it, is liable for the costs of suppression incurred by
the department or its agent and is not entitled to reimbursement of
costs incurred by the public body in the suppression activities.
(((9))) (8) The department may adopt rules to implement this
section, including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting
forest protection assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Within available funds, the department
of natural resources is directed to develop a revised forest fire
protection assessment rate structure as recommended by the 2008 forest
fire protection and prevention work group. To achieve the same value
of assessment collection derived under the current rate structure, the
department of natural resources shall consider reducing the rate paid
by owners of unimproved parcels while adding a surcharge or applying a
higher rate to parcels that include improvements such as homes and
other structures.
(2) The department of natural resources shall develop a definition
of the term "improvement" as used for the purposes of the forest fire
protection assessment rate structure.
(3) The department of natural resources shall issue a report of
recommendations in the form of draft legislation to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 31, 2009.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The establishment of a higher assessment rate or a surcharge for
parcels that include improvements is not intended to change or expand
the duties of the department as stated in RCW 76.04.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---