BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.350 and 2002 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental permit
or stamp is required to hunt for western Washington pheasant or
migratory birds.
(1) A western Washington pheasant permit is required to hunt for
pheasant in western Washington. Western Washington pheasant permits
must contain numbered spaces for recording the location and date of
harvest of each western Washington pheasant.
(2) The permit shall be available as a season option, a youth full
season option, or a three-day option. The fee for this permit is:
(a) For the resident and nonresident full season option, ((thirty-six)) forty-three dollars;
(b) For the youth full season option, ((eighteen)) twenty-two
dollars;
(c) For the three-day option, twenty-four dollars.
(3) A migratory bird validation is required for all persons sixteen
years of age or older to hunt migratory birds. The fee for the
validation for hunters is ((ten)) twelve dollars for residents and
nonresidents. The fee for the stamp for collectors is ((ten)) twelve
dollars.
(4) The migratory bird license must be validated at the time of
signature of the licensee.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.32.370 and 1998 c 191 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special hunting season permit is required to hunt in each
special season established under chapter 77.12 RCW.
(2) Persons may apply for special hunting season permits as
provided by rule of the commission.
(3) The application fee to enter the drawing for a special hunting
permit is ((five)) six dollars for residents, ((fifty)) sixty dollars
for nonresidents, and ((three)) four dollars for youth.

Sec. 3 RCW 77.32.430 and 2005 c 192 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Catch record card information is necessary for proper
management of the state's food fish and game fish species and shellfish
resources. Catch record card administration shall be under rules
adopted by the commission. There is no charge for an initial catch
record card. Each subsequent or duplicate catch record card costs
((ten)) twelve dollars.
(2) A license to take and possess Dungeness crab is only valid in
Puget Sound waters east of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line if the fisher has
in possession a valid catch record card officially endorsed for
Dungeness crab. The endorsement shall cost no more than ((three)) four
dollars, including any or all fees authorized under RCW 77.32.050, when
purchased for a personal use saltwater, combination, or shellfish and
seaweed license. The endorsement shall cost no more than one dollar
and twenty cents, including any or all fees authorized under RCW
77.32.050, when purchased for a temporary combination fishing license
authorized under RCW 77.32.470(3)(a).
(3) Catch record cards issued with affixed temporary short-term
charter stamp licenses are not subject to the ((ten-dollar)) twelve-dollar charge nor to the Dungeness crab endorsement fee provided for in
this section. Charter boat or guide operators issuing temporary short-term charter stamp licenses shall affix the stamp to each catch record
card issued before fishing commences. Catch record cards issued with
a temporary short-term charter stamp are valid for one day.
(4) The department shall include provisions for recording marked
and unmarked salmon in catch record cards issued after March 31, 2004.
(5) The funds received from the sale of catch record cards and the
Dungeness crab endorsement must be deposited into the state wildlife
((fund)) account. The funds received from the Dungeness crab
endorsement may be used only for the sampling, monitoring, and
management of catch associated with the Dungeness crab recreational
fisheries. Moneys allocated under this section shall supplement and
not supplant other federal, state, and local funds used for Dungeness
crab recreational fisheries management.

Sec. 4 RCW 77.32.450 and 2005 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game.
A big game license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse,
unclassified wildlife, and the individual species identified within a
specific big game combination license package. Each big game license
includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that package.
A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The fees for
annual big game combination packages are as follows:
(a) Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for
this license is ((sixty-six)) seventy-nine dollars for residents, ((six
hundred sixty)) seven hundred ninety dollars for nonresidents, and
((thirty-three)) forty dollars for youth.
(b) Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is
((fifty-six)) sixty-seven dollars for residents, ((five hundred sixty))
six hundred seventy dollars for nonresidents, and ((twenty-eight))
thirty-four dollars for youth.
(c) Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time
of purchase, the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for
this license is ((forty-six)) fifty-five dollars for residents, ((four
hundred sixty)) five hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and
((twenty-three)) twenty-eight dollars for youth.
(d) Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the
holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
((thirty-six)) forty-three dollars for residents, ((three hundred
sixty)) four hundred thirty dollars for nonresidents, and ((eighteen))
twenty-two dollars for youth.
(e) Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license
is twenty-four dollars for residents, two hundred forty dollars for
nonresidents, and ((ten)) twelve dollars for youth.
(2) In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big
game limit, the fees for the second animal are as follows:
(a) Elk: The fee is twenty-four dollars for residents, two hundred
forty dollars for nonresidents, and ((ten)) twelve dollars for youth.
(b) Deer: The fee is twenty-four dollars for residents, two
hundred forty dollars for nonresidents, and ((ten)) twelve dollars for
youth.
(c) Bear: The fee is ((ten)) twelve dollars for residents, one
hundred twenty dollars for nonresidents, and ((five)) six dollars for
youth.
(d) Cougar: The fee is ((ten)) twelve dollars for residents, one
hundred twenty dollars for nonresidents, and ((five)) six dollars for
youth.
(3) In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit
hunt for goat, sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:
(a) Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred twenty dollars for
residents, one thousand two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and
((fifty)) sixty dollars for youth.
(b) Sheep: The fee is one hundred twenty dollars for residents,
one thousand two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ((fifty)) sixty
dollars for youth.
(c) Moose: The fee is one hundred twenty dollars for residents,
one thousand two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ((fifty)) sixty
dollars for youth.
(4) Multiple season big game permit: The commission may, by rule,
offer permits for hunters to hunt deer or elk during more than one
general season. Only one deer or elk may be harvested annually under
a multiple season big game permit. The fee is one hundred ((fifty))
eighty dollars for residents and one thousand ((five)) eight hundred
dollars for nonresidents.
(5) Authorization to hunt the species set out under subsection
(3)(a) through (c) of this section or in multiple seasons as set out in
subsection (4) of this section is by special permit issued under RCW
77.32.370.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a license
or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning bear or
cougar when necessary to meet harvest objectives.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.32.460 and 2006 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all
classified wild animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game
license also allows the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife.
(a) The fee for this license is thirty-six dollars for residents,
one hundred ((fifty)) eighty dollars for nonresidents, and ((fifteen))
eighteen dollars for youth.
(b) The fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big
game combination license package is ((sixteen)) nineteen dollars for
residents, ((eighty)) ninety-six dollars for nonresidents, and
((eight)) ten dollars for youth.
(c) The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is
((fifty)) sixty dollars for nonresidents.
(2) In addition to a small game license, a turkey tag is required
to hunt for turkey.
(a) The fee for a primary turkey tag is ((fourteen)) seventeen
dollars for residents and forty-eight dollars for nonresidents. A
primary turkey tag will, on request, be issued to the purchaser of a
youth small game license at no charge.
(b) The fee for each additional turkey tag is ((fourteen))
seventeen dollars for residents, ((sixty)) seventy-two dollars for
nonresidents, and ((nine)) eleven dollars for youth.
(c) All moneys received from turkey tags must be deposited in the
state wildlife account. One-third of the moneys received from turkey
tags must be appropriated solely for the purposes of turkey management.
An additional one-third of the moneys received from turkey tags must be
appropriated solely for upland game bird management. Moneys received
from turkey tags may not supplant existing funds provided for these
purposes.

Sec. 6 RCW 77.32.470 and 2008 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary,
or family fishing weekend license is required for all persons fifteen
years of age or older to fish for or possess fish taken for personal
use from state waters or offshore waters.
(2) The fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:
(a) A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The
fee for this license is ((thirty-six)) forty-three dollars for
residents, ((seventy-two)) eighty-six dollars for nonresidents, and
((five)) six dollars for youth. There is an additional fifty-cent
surcharge for this license, to be deposited in the rockfish research
account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(b) A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish taken from saltwater areas. The fee for this license is
((eighteen)) twenty-two dollars for residents, ((thirty-six)) forty-three dollars for nonresidents, and ((five)) six dollars for resident
seniors. There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge for this license,
to be deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW
77.12.702.
(c) A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or
possess food fish or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The
fee for this license is twenty-four dollars for residents, forty-eight
dollars for nonresidents, and ((five)) six dollars for resident
seniors.
(3)(a) A temporary combination fishing license is valid for one to
five consecutive days and allows the holder to fish for or possess
fish, shellfish, and seaweed taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this temporary fishing license is:
(i) One day - ((Seven)) Eight dollars for residents and
((fourteen)) seventeen dollars for nonresidents;
(ii) Two days - ((Ten)) Twelve dollars for residents and twenty-four dollars for nonresidents;
(iii) Three days - ((Thirteen)) Sixteen dollars for residents and
((twenty-six)) thirty-one dollars for nonresidents;
(iv) Four days - ((Fifteen)) Eighteen dollars for residents and
thirty-five dollars for nonresidents; and
(v) Five days - ((Seventeen)) Twenty dollars for residents and
((thirty-four)) forty-one dollars for nonresidents.
(b) The fee for a charter stamp is ((seven)) eight dollars for a
one-day temporary combination fishing license for residents and
nonresidents for use on a charter boat as defined in RCW 77.65.150.
(c) A transaction fee to support the automated licensing system
will be taken from the amounts set forth in this subsection for
temporary licenses.
(d) Except for active duty military personnel serving in any branch
of the United States armed forces, the temporary combination fishing
license is not valid on game fish species for an eight-consecutive-day
period beginning on the opening day of the lowland lake fishing season.
(e) The temporary combination fishing license fee for active duty
military personnel serving in any branch of the United States armed
forces is the resident rate as set forth in (a) of this subsection.
Active duty military personnel must provide a valid military
identification card at the time of purchase of the temporary license to
qualify for the resident rate.
(f) There is an additional fifty-cent surcharge on the temporary
combination fishing license and the associated charter stamp, to be
deposited in the rockfish research account created in RCW 77.12.702.
(4) A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six
anglers: One resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or
one resident, one nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the
holders to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore
waters. The fee for this license is twenty-four dollars. This license
is only valid during periods as specified by rule of the department.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal
to the total cost of the individual license contained within any
combination.

Sec. 7 RCW 77.32.480 and 2007 c 254 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon written application, a combination fishing license shall be
issued at the reduced rate of ((five)) six dollars, and all hunting
licenses shall((,)) be issued at the reduced rate of a youth hunting
license fee for the following individuals:
(1) A resident sixty-five years old or older who is an honorably
discharged veteran of the United States armed forces having a service-connected disability;
(2) A resident who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United
States armed forces with a thirty percent or more service-connected
disability;
(3) A resident with a disability who permanently uses a wheelchair;
(4) A resident who is blind or visually impaired; and
(5) A resident with a developmental disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020 with documentation of the disability certified by a
physician licensed to practice in this state.

Sec. 8 RCW 77.32.520 and 2007 c 336 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for
all persons other than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of
age to fish for, take, dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish,
including razor clams, for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters including national park beaches.
(2) A razor clam license allows a person to harvest only razor
clams for personal use from state waters, including national park
beaches.
(3) The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses
are:
(a) For a resident fifteen years of age or older, ((seven)) eight
dollars;
(b) For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty-four
dollars; and
(c) For a senior, ((five)) six dollars.
(4) The fee for an annual razor clam license is ((five)) six
dollars and ((fifty)) sixty cents for residents and ((eleven)) thirteen
dollars for nonresidents.
(5) The fee for a three-day razor clam license is ((three)) four
dollars and ((fifty)) twenty cents for both residents and nonresidents.
(6) A personal use shellfish and seaweed license or razor clam
license must be in immediate possession of the licensee and available
for inspection while a licensee is harvesting shellfish or seaweed.
However, the license does not need to be visible at all times.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---