BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Expansion of small businesses will have a favorable impact on
the Washington economy by creating jobs, increasing competition in the
marketplace, and expanding tax revenues; and
(2) There is an unmet need to provide long-term capital to growing
small businesses whose growth exceeds their ability to generate
internal earnings to finance that growth; and
(3) Under credit standards used by many financial institutions,
many well-operated small businesses cannot provide security adequate to
qualify for business loans; and
(4) This problem is especially severe in its effects on communities
and individuals during economic downturns; and
(5) It is desirable to address this problem by creating an
efficient mechanism to encourage financial institutions to make loans
which are not now made; and
(6) Assistance and encouragement of small business development to
provide, maintain, and expand employment and tax revenues is an
important function of the state.
To assist in small business development, the legislature hereby
creates the Washington small business loan reserve program. The intent
of the legislature in creating the program is to provide sufficient
incentives to financial institutions and credit unions to make small
business loans that would otherwise not be made to worthy small
businesses. Further, it is the intent of the legislature to provide
incentives which will result in greater availability of small business
financing to promote the creation of new employment opportunities and
the retention of existing employment in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 As used in this chapter, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Lender participant" means such financial institutions and
credit unions as are approved by the director to make loans under this
chapter.
(2) "Eligible loan" means a loan to a person under the conditions
set forth in this chapter.
(3) "Amount of loss" means an amount equal to the unpaid balance of
the principal amount, less any amounts realized by perfecting rights
under a security agreement, together with such interest as the
executive director shall allow, to a maximum of such interest as may be
allowed by rule. The amount of loss is subject to the limitations
contained in section 11(2)(c) of this act.
(4) "Premium charge" means the amount, as negotiated under section
9 of this act, which shall be deposited in the small business loan
reserve fund by the lender and the borrower for loans made pursuant to
this chapter.
(5) "Executive director" means the executive director of the small
business loan reserve program.
(6) "Fund" means the small business loan reserve fund.
(7) "Public match" means the amount, equal to the premium charge,
which shall be deposited in the small business loan reserve fund by the
state for loans made pursuant to this chapter.
(8) "Manufacturing" means all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or
machinery, to materials so that as a result thereof a new, different,
or useful substance or article of tangible personal property is
produced for sale or commercial or industrial use and shall include the
production or fabrication of specially made or custom made articles.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the
activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.
(9) "Traded services" means those commercial and professional
services that are developed for sale outside the state.
(10) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In addition to the powers and duties
prescribed under this chapter, the director may exercise all the powers
necessary or convenient for the enforcement of this chapter. The
director may adopt such rules as he or she finds necessary or
appropriate in carrying out this chapter after consultation with
representatives of small businesses and lender participants. The
director may examine the loans made under this chapter by any lender
participant to ascertain compliance with this chapter and any rules
adopted under this chapter, and to ascertain whether a lender
participant is exercising reasonable care and diligence in the making
and collection of loans made under this chapter.
An exempt position is hereby created for the executive director.
The executive director shall be appointed by the director and shall
serve at the director's pleasure. The director shall delegate to the
executive director such duties as the director deems necessary to the
administration of the program. The director may employ such other
employees as may be needed to carry out the powers and duties imposed
under this chapter.
The director shall report to the governor and appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the house of representatives and the senate by
December 1st of each year and shall include in the report the
following:
(1) The names of all lender participants participating in the small
business loan reserve program;
(2) The names and locations by county of all borrowers under the
program;
(3) The number of employees by county of all borrowers under the
program;
(4) The total amount of funds lent under the program by county;
(5) The total amount of funds lent under the program reported
separately by categories of uses made by borrowers of the proceeds;
(6) The amount paid out of the fund for loans in default, by
lender, and by county;
(7) The financial condition of the fund;
(8) An evaluation of the extent to which the results of the program
meet the objectives of the program as defined in section 1 of this act.
This evaluation shall include a review of success in meeting criteria
listed in section 7(4) of this act;
(9) The expenditure of funds under section 6 of this act; and
(10) Such other information as in the director's judgment may be
desirable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The executive director shall be
responsible for promoting the small business loan reserve program in
conjunction with the small business development center, the office of
minority and women's business enterprises, and associate development
organizations.
(2) The executive director shall be responsible for soliciting
gifts, grants, donations, and other funds from private, federal, state,
and local sources for deposit into the small business loan reserve
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The small business loan reserve fund is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. The fund shall
consist of appropriations made to the fund and any other public or
private money received under this chapter. Moneys in the fund may be
used only to operate the small business loan reserve program and secure
loans made under this chapter. Disbursements from the fund shall be on
authorization of the director. The fund is subject to the allotment
procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for disbursements.
(2)(a) The state of Washington shall not be subject to or
responsible for any claim, debt, obligation, or liability exceeding its
appropriations to the small business loan reserve fund and shall be
immune from suit for any claim, debt, obligation, or liability in
excess of such appropriations.
(b) All loans made under this chapter shall indicate on the face of
the loan instrument the limit of the state's obligation as set forth in
(a) of this subsection and section 11(2)(c) of this act.
(3) Funds held in the small business loan reserve fund which are
attributable to the lender participant's portion of the premium charge
shall be accounted for on a lender-by-lender basis and shall include
the matching premium charge paid by the borrowers and the public match
paid by the state.
(4) Upon authorization by the director, disbursements from the
small business loan reserve fund shall be made to financial
institutions by the state treasurer in warrants drawn pursuant to this
chapter.
(5) Funds in the small business loan reserve fund shall be invested
in time certificates of deposit with lender participants at such rates
as determined by the director in proportion to each lender
participant's participation in the small business loan reserve program.
Such funds shall be offered on a right of first refusal to lender
participants. Should a lender participant refuse to receive such funds
for investment, the funds shall then be offered other lender
participants in proportion to their participation in the small business
loan reserve program and, if not fully invested in the participating
bank, shall be invested as determined by rule of the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) All income from funds invested pursuant
to section 5 of this act shall be deposited in the small business loan
reserve fund, and shall be used exclusively for the support of the
small business loan reserve program.
(2) Whenever the director determines that the income from funds
invested pursuant to section 5 of this act exceeds amounts necessary to
support the small business loan reserve program pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section, the director may order any excess funds, not
otherwise obligated per the terms or conditions under which they were
received, transferred into the general fund, but not to exceed the
amount appropriated to the small business loan reserve fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The director shall certify those
financial institutions whose experience, financial capability, and such
other criteria as the director may establish under rules adopted under
this chapter qualify them to participate in the small business loan
reserve program.
(2) Any financial institution may be disqualified from further
participation in the small business loan reserve program on a finding,
by the director, as specified by rule, that such institution has
violated any provision of this chapter, or any rule adopted under this
chapter, or that such institution is insolvent.
(3) A loan made by a lender participant shall be recorded under
this section if made to a corporation, partnership, sole
proprietorship, cooperative, or other association doing business
primarily in Washington, whether nonprofit or organized for profit.
(4) The executive director shall adopt by rule eligibility criteria
for loans made under this chapter. Such criteria shall be consistent
with the intent of this chapter to assist small businesses with strong
potential for growth and job creation and, to that end, such loans
shall be primarily devoted to businesses engaging in manufacturing or
traded services. Such criteria shall include but not be limited to:
The potential for benefiting low-income communities; the potential for
benefiting individuals of low and moderate income; the potential for
creating new employment opportunities, especially opportunities for
stable high wage employment; the potential for retaining existing
employment, especially stable high wage employment; the potential for
local economic diversification; the impact on the stabilization,
modernization, and long-term growth potential of mature industries; and
the size and types of businesses which shall be eligible to receive
loans.
(5) No more than twenty-five percent of the proceeds of any loans
made under this chapter may be used by the borrowing business for the
payment of existing loans to that business.
(6) Upon default by the borrower on any loan made under this
chapter, the executive director may require from the lender a showing
as to how the proceeds of the loan were disbursed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Prior to the making of a loan under this
chapter, the executive director shall enter into contracts with lender
participants and borrowers. In exchange for the state's agreement to
place the public match in the small business loan reserve fund, the
contracts shall obligate the lender participants to adhere to the
provisions of this chapter and to make loans, consistent with
eligibility criteria established pursuant to this chapter, to small
businesses which do not meet standard lender eligibility criteria.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The lender and borrower shall negotiate the
premium charge for each loan made pursuant to this chapter. Such
charge shall be no more than seven percent of the loan. The lender and
borrower shall contribute an equal amount to the premium charge. The
public match made under this chapter shall be equal in amount to the
premium charge. When a loan is participated in by two or more lender
participants, the premium charge shall be a single rate, applicable to
the entire loan. The lender's portion of the premium charge shall be
apportioned among the lenders in proportion to each lender's
participation in the loan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1)(a) An application to record a loan made
under this chapter shall be made by an eligible lender on such form as
the executive director may require. The application shall set forth
the amount of the loan, its maturity, interest rate, and amortization.
In addition, the executive director may require other information
relating to job creation.
(b) If, upon application by a lender participant, the executive
director finds that the lender has made an eligible loan, the executive
director shall cause the loan to be recorded.
(2)(a) The lender shall submit, together with the application under
subsection (1) of this section, the following premium charges
determined by the lender under section 9 of this act: (i) The percent
premium charge payable by the lender; and (ii) the percent premium
charge payable by the borrower.
(b) Premium charges collected under this section shall be deposited
in the small business loan reserve fund and attributed to the lender
submitting them.
(c) Upon recording a loan, the executive director shall attribute
to the lender the public match.
(3) All loans made under this chapter shall be recorded in a
register to be maintained by the director. The registration shall set
forth the information contained in the application.
(4) At least annually, and more frequently at the direction of the
director, a summary of the information contained in the register
maintained pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be provided
to each lender participant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Upon default by the borrower on any
loan made under this chapter, the lender, if a secured party, shall
take reasonable steps, and avail itself of such rights and reasonable
remedies as may be provided for in the security agreement and by virtue
of chapter 62A.9A RCW except when, in the determination of the
director, special circumstances exist that do not warrant taking such
action.
(2)(a) Upon default by the borrower on any loan made under this
chapter, the lender shall promptly notify the director and the
executive director. The executive director shall, if requested, either
ninety days after the lender has commenced collection action required
by subsection (1) of this section, or after further collection efforts
required by the director, pay to the lender the amount of the loss,
subject to the limitation contained in (c) of this subsection,
sustained by the lender.
(b) In addition to the amount of loss, the lender may claim such
amounts as the director has established by rule for collection expenses
incurred in the attempted collection of the loan. Such collection
expense shall be a charge against that portion of the small business
loan reserve fund attributable to the lender who made the loan, and
shall be subject to the limitation contained in (c) of this subsection.
(c) Payments made to a lender pursuant to this section shall not
exceed the amount retained in the small business loan reserve fund
attributable to the lender who made the loan.
(3) Upon payment of a claim for loss pursuant to this section, the
lender shall assign the note, all security interests, and any and all
other rights held by the lender to the state of Washington. The
director is authorized to take such steps as the director determines
are reasonable to collect, contract, and pay for collection services,
and compromise and settle claims. All amounts collected, minus any
unrecovered collection fees, shall be returned to the fund for the
account of the lender participant.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to excuse the lender
from exercising reasonable care and diligence in the making and
collection of loans under this chapter.
If the director, after reasonable notice and opportunity for
hearing to an eligible lender, finds that it has substantially failed
to exercise such care and diligence required under this section, the
director shall disqualify that lender for further loans under this
chapter until the director is satisfied that its failure has ceased and
finds that there is reasonable assurance that the lender will in the
future exercise necessary care and diligence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
No application to record a loan or the register of loans under
chapter 43.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this act)
may be made available to the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If funding for the purpose of accomplishing
this act is not provided either through federal or private sources by
June 30, 2011, this act is null and void. The office of financial
management must provide the code reviser's office with written notice
by June 30, 2011, concerning the status of funds referenced in this
section.

--- END ---