BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2007 c 232 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The commission must develop and update a state comprehensive
plan for economic development and an initial inventory of economic
development programs, as required under section 4 of this act, by June
30, 2008.
(2))) Using the information from ((the)) its initial inventory of
economic development programs, public input, and such other information
as it deems appropriate, the commission shall, ((by September 1, 2008))
in conjunction with the governor's office and the appropriate policy
committees of the legislature, provide a report with findings,
analysis, and recommendations to the governor and the legislature, by
December 1, 2009, on the appropriate state role in economic development
and the appropriate administrative and regional structures for the
provision of economic development services. The report shall address
how best to organize the state system to ensure that the state's
economic development efforts:
(a) Are organized around a clear central mission and aligned with
the state's comprehensive plan for economic development;
(b) Are capable of providing focused and flexible responses to
changing economic conditions;
(c) Generate greater local capacity to respond to local
opportunities and needs;
(d) Face no administrative barriers to efficiency and
effectiveness;
(e) Maximize results through partnerships and the use of
intermediaries; and
(f) Provide increased accountability to the public, the executive
branch, and the legislature.
(((3))) (2) The report should address the potential value of
creating or consolidating specific programs if doing so would be
consistent with an agency's core mission, and the potential value of
removing specific programs from an agency if the programs are not
central to the agency's core mission.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.280 and 2007 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission shall,
with the advice of an innovation partnership advisory group selected by
the commission, have oversight responsibility for the implementation of
the state's efforts to further innovation partnerships throughout the
state. The commission shall:
(a) Provide information and advice to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to assist in the implementation of the
innovation partnership zone program, including criteria to be used in
the selection of grant applicants for funding;
(b) Document clusters of companies throughout the state that have
comparative competitive advantage or the potential for comparative
competitive advantage, using the process and criteria for identifying
strategic clusters developed by the working group specified in
subsection (2) of this section;
(c) Conduct an annual innovation opportunity analysis to identify
(i) the strongest current intellectual assets and research teams in the
state focused on emerging technologies and their commercialization, and
(ii) faculty and researchers that could increase their focus on
commercialization of technology if provided the appropriate technical
assistance and resources;
(d) Based on its findings and analysis, and in conjunction with the
higher education coordinating board and research institutions:
(i) Develop a plan to be updated annually to build on existing, and
develop new, intellectual assets and innovation research teams in the
state in research areas where there is a high potential to
commercialize technologies. The commission shall present the plan to
the governor and legislature by December ((31, 2007)) 31st of each
year. The higher education coordinating board shall be responsible for
implementing the plan in conjunction with the publicly funded research
institutions in the state. The plan shall address the following
elements and such other elements as the commission deems important:
(A) Specific mechanisms to support, enhance, or develop innovation
research teams and strengthen their research and commercialization
capacity in areas identified as useful to strategic clusters and
innovative firms in the state;
(B) Identification of the funding necessary for laboratory
infrastructure needed to house innovation research teams;
(C) Specification of the most promising research areas meriting
enhanced resources and recruitment of significant entrepreneurial
researchers to join or lead innovation research teams;
(D) The most productive approaches to take in the recruitment, in
the identified promising research areas, of a minimum of ((ten)) one
significant entrepreneurial researcher((s over the next ten years)) per
year to join or lead innovation research teams;
(E) Steps to take in solicitation of private sector support for the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers and the commercialization
activity of innovation research teams; and
(F) Mechanisms for ensuring the location of innovation research
teams in innovation partnership zones;
(ii) Provide direction for the development of comprehensive
entrepreneurial assistance programs at research institutions. The
programs may involve multidisciplinary students, faculty,
entrepreneurial researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors in building
business models and evolving business plans around innovative ideas.
The programs may provide technical assistance and the support of an
entrepreneur-in-residence to innovation research teams and offer
entrepreneurial training to faculty, researchers, undergraduates, and
graduate students. Curriculum leading to a certificate in
entrepreneurship may also be offered;
(e) Develop performance measures to be used in evaluating the
performance of innovation research teams, the implementation of the
plan and programs under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, and the
performance of innovation partnership zone grant recipients, including
but not limited to private investment measures, business initiation
measures, job creation measures, and measures of innovation such as
licensing of ideas in research institutions, patents, or other
recognized measures of innovation. The performance measures developed
shall be consistent with the economic development commission's
comprehensive plan for economic development and its standards and
metrics for program evaluation. The commission shall report to the
legislature and the governor by ((December 31, 2008)) September 30,
2009, on the measures developed; and
(f) Using the performance measures developed, perform a biennial
assessment and report, the first of which shall be due December 31,
2012, on:
(i) Commercialization of technologies developed at state
universities, found at other research institutions in the state, and
facilitated with public assistance at existing companies;
(ii) Outcomes of the funding of innovation research teams and
recruitment of significant entrepreneurial researchers;
(iii) Comparison with other states of Washington's outcomes from
the innovation research teams and efforts to recruit significant
entrepreneurial researchers; and
(iv) Outcomes of the grants for innovation partnership zones.
The report shall include recommendations for modifications of chapter
227, Laws of 2007 and of state commercialization efforts that would
enhance the state's economic competitiveness.
(2) The economic development commission and the workforce training
and education coordinating board shall jointly convene a working group
to:
(a) Specify the process and criteria for identification of substate
geographic concentrations of firms or employment in an industry and the
industry's customers, suppliers, supporting businesses, and
institutions, which process will include the use of labor market
information from the employment security department and local labor
markets; and
(b) Establish criteria for identifying strategic clusters which are
important to economic prosperity in the state, considering cluster
size, growth rate, and wage levels among other factors.

--- END ---