BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.541 and 2006 c 329 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall provide staff support to
the commute trip reduction board in carrying out the requirements of
RCW 70.94.537.
(2) The department of transportation shall provide technical
assistance to regional transportation planning organizations, counties,
cities, ((and)) towns, ((the department of general administration,
other)) state agencies, and other employers in developing and
implementing commute trip reduction plans and programs. The technical
assistance shall include: (a) Guidance in single measurement
methodology and practice to be used in determining progress in
attaining plan goals; (b) developing model plans and programs
appropriate to different situations; and (c) providing consistent
training and informational materials for the implementation of commute
trip reduction programs. Model plans and programs, training, and
informational materials shall be developed in cooperation with
representatives of regional transportation planning organizations,
local governments, transit agencies, and employers.
(3) In carrying out this section the department of transportation
may contract with statewide associations representing cities, towns,
and counties to assist cities, towns, and counties in implementing
commute trip reduction plans and programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.547 and 2006 c 329 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature hereby recognizes the state's crucial leadership
role in establishing and implementing effective commute trip reduction
programs. Therefore, it is the policy of the state that the department
of ((general administration)) transportation and other state agencies,
including institutions of higher education, shall aggressively develop
substantive programs to reduce commute trips by state employees.
Implementation of these programs will reduce energy consumption,
congestion in urban areas, and air and water pollution associated with
automobile travel.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.551 and 2006 c 329 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((director)) secretary of the department of ((general
administration)) transportation may coordinate an interagency board for
the purpose of developing policies or guidelines that promote
consistency among state agency commute trip reduction programs required
by RCW 70.94.527 and 70.94.531. The board shall include
representatives of the departments of transportation, ecology, and
community, trade, and economic development and such other departments
and interested groups as the ((director)) secretary of the department
of ((general administration)) transportation determines to be
necessary. Policies and guidelines shall be applicable to all state
agencies including but not limited to policies and guidelines regarding
parking and parking charges, employee incentives for commuting by other
than single-occupant automobiles, flexible and alternative work
schedules, alternative worksites, and the use of state-owned vehicles
for car and van pools and guaranteed rides home. The policies and
guidelines shall also consider the costs and benefits to state agencies
of achieving commute trip reductions and consider mechanisms for
funding state agency commute trip reduction programs.
(2) State agencies sharing a common location in affected urban
growth areas where the total number of state employees is one hundred
or more shall, with assistance from the department of ((general
administration)) transportation, develop and implement a joint commute
trip reduction program. The worksite ((shall)) must be treated as
specified in RCW 70.94.531 and 70.94.534.
(3) The department of transportation shall develop a joint
comprehensive commute trip reduction plan for all state agencies,
including institutions of higher education, located in the Olympia,
Lacey, and Tumwater urban growth areas.
(a) In developing the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction
plan, the department of transportation shall collaborate with the
following entities: Local jurisdictions; regional transportation
planning organizations as described in chapter 47.80 RCW; transit
agencies, including regional transit authorities as described in
chapter 81.112 RCW and transit agencies that serve areas within twenty-five miles of the Olympia, Lacey, or Tumwater urban growth areas; and
the capitol campus design advisory committee established in RCW
43.34.080.
(b) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must build
on existing commute trip reduction programs and policies. At a
minimum, the joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must
include strategies for telework and flexible work schedules, parking
management, and consideration of the impacts of worksite location and
design on multimodal transportation options.
(c) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must
include performance measures and reporting methods and requirements.
(d) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan may include
strategies to accommodate differences in worksite size and location.
(e) The joint comprehensive commute trip reduction plan must be
consistent with jurisdictional and regional transportation, land use,
and commute trip reduction plans, the state six-year facilities plan,
and the master plan for the capitol of the state of Washington.
(f) Not more than ninety days after the adoption of the joint
comprehensive commute trip reduction plan, state agencies within the
three urban growth areas must implement a commute trip reduction
program consistent with the objectives and strategies of the joint
comprehensive commute trip reduction plan.
(4) The department of ((general administration)) transportation
shall review the initial commute trip reduction program of each state
agency subject to the commute trip reduction plan for state agencies to
determine if the program is likely to meet the applicable commute trip
reduction goals and notify the agency of any deficiencies. If it is
found that the program is not likely to meet the applicable commute
trip reduction goals, the department of ((general administration))
transportation will work with the agency to modify the program as
necessary.
(((4))) (5) Each state agency implementing a commute trip reduction
plan shall report at least once per year to its agency director on the
performance of the agency's commute trip reduction program as part of
the agency's quality management, accountability, and performance system
as defined by RCW 43.17.385. The reports shall assess the performance
of the program, progress toward state goals established under RCW
70.94.537, and recommendations for improving the program.
(((5))) (6) The department of ((general administration))
transportation shall review the agency performance reports defined in
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section and submit a biennial report for
state agencies subject to this chapter to the governor and incorporate
the report in the commute trip reduction board report to the
legislature as directed in RCW 70.94.537(6). The report shall include,
but is not limited to, an evaluation of the most recent measurement
results, progress toward state goals established under RCW 70.94.537,
and recommendations for improving the performance of state agency
commute trip reduction programs. The information shall be reported in
a form established by the commute trip reduction board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2009, in the omnibus capital appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

--- END ---