BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that it is an important function of state
government to increase opportunities for gainful employment and
expanded career opportunities for individuals in occupations necessary
to support industries driving Washington's economy. Further, the
legislature declares that it is equally important to support
Washington's employer community by developing a pipeline of highly
trained and skilled workers readily available to fill positions in
high-demand occupations. The legislature intends to create training
and skill development opportunities in disciplines for which there is
high employer demand for Washingtonians who have been dislocated from
occupations that are in declining demand and increase the availability
of career ladders to incumbent workers in high-demand industries
through the expansion of the existing worker retraining program.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.04.390 and 1999 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The college board worker retraining program funds shall be used
for training programs and related support services, including financial
aid, counseling, referral to training resources, job referral, and job
development that:
(a) Are consistent with the unified plan for workforce development;
(b) Provide increased enrollments for dislocated workers;
(c) Provide customized training opportunities for dislocated
workers; ((and))
(d) Provide increased enrollments and support services, including
financial aid for those students not receiving unemployment insurance
benefits, that do not replace or supplant any existing enrollments,
programs, support services, or funding sources; and
(e) Provide funding and education for dislocated and incumbent
workers in high-demand fields of study, including health care.
(2) The college board shall develop a plan for use of the worker
retraining program funds in conjunction with the workforce training
customer advisory committee established in subsection (3) of this
section. In developing the plan the college board shall:
(a) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall solicit financial support for training programs and give priority
in receipt of funds to those applicants which are most successful in
matching public dollars with financial support;
(b) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall develop training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, labor, and other partners as appropriate and
give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants who develop
customized training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, and labor organizations;
(c) Give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants serving
rural areas;
(d) Ensure that applicants receiving worker retraining program
funds gather information from local workforce development councils on
employer workforce needs, including the needs of businesses with less
than twenty-five employees; ((and))
(e) Provide for specialized vocational training at a private career
school or college at the request of a recipient eligible under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. Available tuition for the training
is limited to the amount that would otherwise be payable per enrolled
quarter to a public institution;
(f) Develop training programs that facilitate career progression in
health care occupations; and
(g) Involve labor-management partnerships in the determination of
relevant skills and competencies and the design of career pathways.
(3) The executive director of the college board shall appoint a
workforce training customer advisory committee by July 1, 1999, to:
(a) Assist in the development of the plan for the use of the
college board worker retraining program funds and recommend guidelines
to the college board for the operation of worker retraining programs;
(b) Recommend selection criteria for worker retraining programs and
grant applicants for receipt of worker retraining program grants;
(c) Provide advice to the college board on other workforce
development activities of the community and technical colleges;
(d) Recommend selection criteria for job skills grants, consistent
with criteria established in this chapter and chapter 121, Laws of
1999. Such criteria shall include a prioritization of job skills
applicants in rural areas;
(e) Recommend guidelines to the college board for the operation of
the job skills program; and
(f) Recommend grant applicants for receipt of job skills program
grants.
(4) Members of the workforce training customer advisory committee
shall consist of three college system representatives selected by the
executive director of the college board, three representatives of
business selected from nominations provided by statewide business
organizations, and three representatives of labor selected from
nominations provided by a statewide labor organization representing a
cross-section of workers in the state.
(5) The college board shall use existing public and private
resources, including the training partnership under chapter 74.39A RCW,
to achieve the goals of recruiting, supporting, and training persons
working in health care fields, as they progress to higher levels of
skilled care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The college board shall coordinate with the employment security
department, the training partnership established in RCW 74.39A.360, and
the board to implement the training system for persons working in
health care fields designed by the college board, pursuant to section
5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.39A RCW
to read as follows:
The training partnership established in RCW 74.39A.360 shall work
in collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and
the employment security department to develop and implement the
training system for persons working in health care fields designed by
the college board, pursuant to section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.88B RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The hospital labor management training partnership shall work
in collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and
the employment security department in the development and
implementation of the health care career ladder.
(2) For purposes of this section, "hospital labor management
training partnership" means a program that enables hospital workers to
gain access to a college education in order to help them progress up
the career ladder, increasing the availability of skilled workers in
high demand health care fields.

Sec. 6 RCW 28C.04.410 and 1999 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout ((RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420)) this
chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means an educational institution which has made
application for a job skills grant under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(2) "Business and industry" means a private corporation,
institution, firm, person, group, or association concerned with
commerce, trades, manufacturing, or the provision of services within
the state, or a public or nonprofit hospital licensed by the department
of social and health services.
(3) "College board" means the state board for community and
technical colleges under chapter 28B.50 RCW.
(4) "Dislocated worker" means an individual who meets the
definition of dislocated worker contained in P.L. 105-220, Sec. 101 on
July 25, 1999.
(((4))) (5) "Educational institution" means a public secondary or
postsecondary institution, an independent institution, or a private
career school or college within the state authorized by law to provide
a program of skills training or education beyond the secondary school
level. Any educational institution receiving a job skills grant under
RCW 28C.04.420 through 28C.04.480 shall be free of sectarian control or
influence as set forth in Article IX, section 4 of the state
Constitution.
(((5))) (6) "Equipment" means tangible personal property which will
further the objectives of the supported program and for which a
definite value and evidence in support of the value have been provided
by the donor.
(((6))) (7) "Financial support" means any thing of value which is
contributed by business, industry, and others to an educational
institution which is reasonably calculated to support directly the
development and expansion of a particular program under RCW 28C.04.390
and 28C.04.420 and represents an addition to any financial support
previously or customarily provided to such educational institutions by
the donor. "Financial support" includes, but is not limited to, funds,
equipment, facilities, faculty, and scholarships for matriculating
students and trainees.
(((7))) (8) "Job skills grant" means funding that is provided to an
educational institution by the commission for the development or
significant expansion of a program under RCW 28C.04.390 and 28C.04.420.
(((8))) (9) "Job skills program" means a program of skills training
or education separate from and in addition to existing vocational
education programs and which:
(a) Provides short-term training which has been designated for
specific industries;
(b) Provides training for prospective employees before a new plant
opens or when existing industry expands;
(c) Includes training and retraining for workers already employed
by an existing industry or business where necessary to avoid
dislocation or where upgrading of existing employees would create new
vacancies for unemployed persons;
(d) Serves areas with high concentrations of economically
disadvantaged persons and high unemployment;
(e) Serves areas with new and growing industries;
(f) Serves areas where there is a shortage of skilled labor to meet
job demands; or
(g) Promotes the location of new industry in areas affected by
economic dislocation.
(((9))) (10) "Labor-management partnership" means a Taft-Hartley
trust or partnership between labor and management representatives that
is formalized through a written agreement calling for joint decision
making related to specific employee benefits, programs, or other
efforts to benefit workers, or an organization comprised of
representatives from organized labor and businesses for the betterment
of that industry's workforce including the labor-management partnership
as defined in chapter 74.39A RCW.
(11) "Persons working in health care fields" means registered
nurses, licensed practical nurses, health care assistants, long-term
care workers, and unlicensed assistive nursing personnel providing
direct patient care under RCW 18.135.020 or 18.88A.020.
(12) "Technical assistance" means professional and any other
assistance provided by business and industry to an educational
institution, which is reasonably calculated to support directly the
development and expansion of a particular program and which represents
an addition to any technical assistance previously or customarily
provided to the educational institutions by the donor.
(((10) "College board" means the state board for community and
technical colleges under chapter 28B.50 RCW.))

--- END ---