BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A task force on milk pricing mechanisms
is established.
(2) The task force shall be jointly appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives and the president of the senate and shall be
composed of the following members:
(a) Four persons representing dairy farmers;
(b) Two persons representing dairy processors;
(c) Up to five representatives of various distributors,
wholesalers, and retailers who sell milk or milk products in the state;
and
(d) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee.
(3) The purpose of the task force is to consider the long-term
economic stability of the dairy industry in Washington state over
recent decades with special attention to the current depression in
prices impacting the industry in February 2009. The task force shall
examine:
(a) The current federal order pricing system and its limited
ability to prevent extreme volatility in prices;
(b) How other states have supplemented federal milk pricing
regulation with additional state regulations;
(c) Washington state current state milk pricing statutes and
whether the law needs to be updated;
(d) The possible use of requesting congressional compact authority
between states for the purpose of jointly regulating milk prices
between states; and
(e) Developing a recommendation as to whether Washington state
should request a similar congressional compact authority for working
with neighboring states.
(4) The task force shall elect its own chairperson.
(5) The department of agriculture shall provide staff for the task
force.
(6) The task force shall submit a report of its findings and
recommendations by December 15, 2010, to the appropriate committees of
the legislature.

--- END ---