BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 88.16.035 and 2008 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of pilotage commissioners shall:
(a) Adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary for the
enforcement and administration of this chapter;
(b)(i) Issue training licenses and pilot licenses to pilot
applicants meeting the qualifications provided for in RCW 88.16.090 and
such additional qualifications as may be determined by the board;
(ii) Establish a comprehensive training program to assist in the
training and evaluation of pilot applicants before final licensing; and
(iii) Establish additional training requirements, including a
program of continuing education developed after consultation with pilot
organizations, including those located within the state of Washington,
as required to maintain a competent pilotage service;
(c) Maintain a register of pilots, records of pilot accidents, and
other history pertinent to pilotage;
(d) Determine from time to time the number of pilots necessary to
be licensed in each district of the state to optimize the operation of
a safe, fully regulated, efficient, and competent pilotage service in
each district;
(e) Annually fix the pilotage tariffs for pilotage services
((performed aboard vessels as required by)) provided under this
chapter: PROVIDED, That the board may fix extra compensation for extra
services to vessels in distress, for awaiting vessels, for all vessels
in direct transit to or from a Canadian port where Puget Sound pilotage
is required for a portion of the voyage, or for being carried to sea on
vessels against the will of the pilot, and for such other services as
may be determined by the board: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board shall
fix a charge in the Puget Sound pilotage district tariff designed to
reimburse a pilot association for the costs incurred in the prior year
for pilot retirement plans in effect on January 1, 2009, which costs
shall include payments made by the association under plans in both
pilotage districts. However, under no circumstances shall the state be
obligated to fund or pay for any portion of retirement payments for
pilots or retired pilots;
(f) File annually with the governor and the chairs of the
transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives a
report which includes, but is not limited to, the following: The
number, names, ages, pilot license number, training license number, and
years of service as a Washington licensed pilot of any person licensed
by the board as a Washington state pilot or trainee; the names,
employment, and other information of the members of the board; the
total number of pilotage assignments by pilotage district, including
information concerning the various types and sizes of vessels and the
total annual tonnage; the annual earnings or stipends of individual
pilots and trainees before and after deduction for expenses of pilot
organizations, including extra compensation as a separate category; the
annual expenses of private pilot associations, including personnel
employed and capital expenditures; the status of pilotage tariffs,
extra compensation, and travel; the retirement contributions paid to
pilots and the disposition thereof; the number of groundings, marine
occurrences, or other incidents which are reported to or investigated
by the board, and which are determined to be accidents, as defined by
the board, including the vessel name, location of incident, pilot's or
trainee's name, and disposition of the case together with information
received before the board acted from all persons concerned, including
the United States coast guard; the names, qualifications, time
scheduled for examinations, and the district of persons desiring to
apply for Washington state pilotage licenses; summaries of dispatch
records, quarterly reports from pilots, and the bylaws and operating
rules of pilotage organizations; the names, sizes in deadweight tons,
surcharges, if any, port of call, name of the pilot or trainee, and
names and horsepower of tug boats for any and all oil tankers subject
to the provisions of RCW 88.16.190 together with the names of any and
all vessels for which the United States coast guard requires special
handling pursuant to their authority under the Ports and Waterways
Safety Act of 1972; the expenses of the board; and any and all other
information which the board deems appropriate to include;
(g) Make available information that includes the pilotage act and
other statutes of Washington state and the federal government that
affect pilotage, including the rules of the board, together with such
additional information as may be informative for pilots, agents,
owners, operators, and masters;
(h) Appoint advisory committees and employ marine experts as
necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter;
(i) Provide for the maintenance of efficient and competent pilotage
service on all waters covered by this chapter; and do such other things
as are reasonable, necessary, and expedient to insure proper and safe
pilotage upon the waters covered by this chapter and facilitate the
efficient administration of this chapter.
(2) The board may pay stipends to pilot trainees under subsection
(1)(b) of this section.

--- END ---