BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Through this act the legislature intends
to address the taxation of persons manufacturing and/or selling bunker
fuel. Bunker fuel is fuel intended for consumption outside the waters
of the United States by vessels in foreign commerce. Although the
state has historically collected tax from bunker fuel manufacturers,
recently questions have arisen whether the manufacture of bunker fuel
is subject to business and occupation tax under RCW 82.04.240.
Pursuant to this act, the activity is taxable under RCW 82.04.240.
(2) The legislature finds that at the time the deduction allowed
under RCW 82.04.433 was enacted in 1985, it was intended to apply only
to the wholesaling or retailing of bunker fuel. In 1987 the
legislature enacted the multiple activities tax credit in RCW
82.04.440. Enactment of the multiple activities tax credit resulted in
changed tax liability for certain taxpayers. In particular, some
taxpayers that engaged in activities that had been exempt under the
prior multiple activities exemption became subject to tax on
manufacturing activities upon enactment of the multiple activities tax
credit in its place. The manufacturing of bunker fuel is one such
activity.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.433 and 1985 c 471 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
imposed under RCW 82.04.250 and 82.04.270 amounts derived from sales of
fuel for consumption outside the territorial waters of the United
States, by vessels used primarily in foreign commerce.
(2) ((Nothing in this section shall be construed to imply that
amounts which may be deducted under this section were taxable under
Title 82 RCW prior to the enactment of this section.)) The deduction in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply with respect to the tax
imposed under RCW 82.04.240, whether the value of the fuel under that
tax is measured by the gross proceeds derived from the sale thereof or
otherwise under RCW 82.04.450.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of revenue must take any
actions that are necessary to ensure that its rules and other
interpretive statements are consistent with this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies both prospectively and
retroactively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---