BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to 2009 c 5 to read
as follows:
Sections 7 through 9 of this act do not apply to the agricultural
commodity commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44,
15.65, 15.66, 15.88, 15.89, 15.-- (Senate Bill No. 5076/House Bill No.
1254), or 16.67 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---