BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares all of
the following:
(1) Numerous municipalities and states have raised safety concerns
regarding the construction and conversion of advertising signs along
and on state, county, and city highways into digital advertising signs.
(2) The key issues of concern are: The potential distraction to
motorists due to brightness, rapid changes in the signs, and proximity
to complex driving environments and areas of high traffic congestion;
diversion of attention from official highway signs; and spacing, among
other factors.
(3) The federal highway administration is expected to release, in
early 2009, phase 1 of a study indicating a need for more research on
the safety impacts of commercial electronic variable message signs,
referred to in this act as digital advertising signs.
(4) In early 2009, the American association of state highway and
transportation officials is expected to release a critical review of
studies in fifty countries around the world over the last ten years on
safety impacts of digital advertising signs.
(5) In 2010, the federal highway administration is expected to
release phase 2 of the study described in subsection (3) of this
section, consisting of field work and conclusions concerning safety
impacts of digital advertising signs.
It is the intent of the legislature to protect the public safety by
prohibiting, until January 1, 2012, the construction of new digital
advertising signs, or the conversion, enhancement, improvement,
modification, modernization, or alteration, other than routine
maintenance, of existing advertising signs into digital advertising
signs, that are visible from a state, county, or city highway, in order
to provide the legislature adequate time to analyze the safety studies
described in this section, hold public hearings throughout the state on
the findings of those studies, and revise state law as appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A sign subject to this chapter, or any other sign that is
visible from a highway that is under the jurisdiction of the state, a
county, or a city, may not be constructed as, or converted, enhanced,
improved, modified, modernized, or altered into, a digital advertising
sign.
(b) An official highway changeable message sign may not be
constructed as, or enhanced, upgraded, improved, modified, modernized,
or altered into, a digital advertising sign for the purpose of
displaying commercial messages in addition to official traffic
operations or public safety messages.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Digital advertising sign" means an advertising sign of still,
scrolling, or moving images, including video and animation, that may be
changed remotely through electronic means and utilizes a series of grid
lights, including cathode ray, light-emitting diode display, plasma
screen, liquid crystal display, fiber optic, or other electronic media
or technology.
(b) "Official highway changeable message sign" means a traffic
control device owned and operated by or on behalf of the department or
a local or regional transportation agency designed to provide the
public with traffic operations and public safety information.
(3) A civil penalty of three thousand five hundred dollars applies
for each day that a sign or official highway changeable message sign is
in violation of this section. The owner of a sign in violation of this
section must disgorge profits gained over the period during which the
sign is in violation of this section. The civil penalty under this
section must be assessed and recovered in an action brought by the
attorney general, a county prosecutor, or a city attorney, who is also
authorized to seek an injunction against further violation of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires January 1, 2012.

--- END ---