BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0237 and 2005 c 351 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Gambling," as used in this chapter, means conditionally or
unconditionally staking or risking something of value upon the outcome
of a contest of chance or a future contingent event not under the
person's control or influence, upon an agreement or understanding,
which may be either conditional or unconditional, that the person or
someone else will or may receive something of value in the event of a
certain outcome. Gambling does not include fishing derbies as defined
by this chapter, parimutuel betting and handicapping contests as
authorized by chapter 67.16 RCW, bona fide business transactions valid
under the law of contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts
for the purchase or sale at a future date of securities or commodities,
and agreements to compensate for loss caused by the happening of
chance, including, but not limited to, contracts of indemnity or
guarantee and life, health, or accident insurance. In addition, a
contest of chance which is specifically excluded from the definition of
lottery under this chapter shall not constitute gambling.

--- END ---