BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.04.060 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
All state elective and appointive officers shall keep their offices
open for the transaction of business ((from eight o'clock a.m. to five
o'clock p.m. of each business day from Monday through Friday,)) for a
minimum of forty hours per week, except weeks that include state legal
holidays ((excepted. On Saturday, such offices may be closed)).
This section shall not apply to the courts of record of this state
or to their officers nor to the office of the attorney general and the
lieutenant governor.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.090 and 1995 c 397 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
Public records shall be available for inspection and copying during
the customary office hours of the agency, the office of the secretary
of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives((: PROVIDED, That if the entity does not have
customary office hours of at least)) for a minimum of thirty hours per
week, ((the public records shall be available from nine o'clock a.m. to
noon and from one o'clock p.m. to four o'clock p.m. Monday through
Friday, excluding)) except weeks that include state legal holidays,
unless the person making the request and the agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives or its representative agree on a different time.

--- END ---