BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of the legislature is to make
state and local tax revenue as open, transparent, and publicly
accessible as is feasible. Increasing the ease of public access to
state and local tax information significantly contributes to
governmental accountability, public participation, and open government;
this is particularly true when the information is currently available
from disparate government sources, but is difficult for the public to
collect and efficiently aggregate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2010, the department must make publicly available
an online searchable database of all taxes and tax rates in the state
for each taxing district. The information must be aggregated by type
of tax and accessible by entering a physical address for each residency
or business. In addition to searching by physical address for each
residence or business, searches must be accommodated by navigating
through a map of the state as a whole and down to the level of each
taxing district.
(2) The department must also provide tax rate calculators on the
searchable database to allow taxpayers to calculate their potential
taxes. Calculators must be provided at a minimum for property, sales
and use, business and occupation, vehicle, and other business taxes and
must be specific to the rate for the taxing district in which the
taxpayer resides. The calculator may only be used for educational
purposes and does not have a legal effect on taxes due.
(3) To facilitate the department's efforts in creating and
maintaining the searchable database of each tax rate for all taxing
districts in the state, each taxing district must report its tax rates
to the department by September 30, 2009. In addition, every taxing
district must report any changes to its tax rates within thirty days of
an enactment of a different rate.
(4) At a minimum the following taxes and rates must be included in
the database and broken down to the taxing district or jurisdiction
level:
(a) State and local sales and use taxes;
(b) State and local regular and excess property taxes;
(c) State and local business taxes including, but not limited to,
business and occupation taxes, public utility taxes, unemployment
compensation taxes, and industrial insurance premiums;
(d) State and local real estate excise taxes; and
(e) State and local motor vehicle taxes and fees.
(5) The database must also contain information, or links to
information, on additional selective sales taxes, selective business
taxes, and in-lieu of property taxes.
(6) The database created under this section must be able to be
accessed by and accessed from the state expenditure information web
site created under RCW 44.48.150.

Sec. 3 RCW 44.48.150 and 2008 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2009, in collaboration with the office of
financial management, using existing databases and structures currently
shared, the office of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee shall establish and make available to the public a
searchable state expenditure information web site. The state
expenditure information web site shall provide access to current budget
data, access to current accounting data for budgeted expenditures and
staff, and access to historical data. At a minimum, the web site will
provide access or links to the following information as data are
available:
(a) State expenditures by fund or account;
(b) State expenditures by agency, program, and subprogram;
(c) State revenues by major source;
(d) State expenditures by object and subobject;
(e) State agency workloads, caseloads, and performance measures,
and recent performance audits; and
(f) State agency budget data by activity.
(2) "State agency," as used in this section, includes every state
agency, office, board, commission, or institution of the executive,
legislative, or judicial branches, including institutions of higher
education.
(3) The state expenditure information web site shall be updated
periodically as subsequent fiscal year data become available, and the
prior year expenditure data shall be maintained by the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee as part of its ten-year
historical budget data.
(4) The web site created under this section must be able to be
accessed by and accessed from the database created in section 2 of this
act.

--- END ---