BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.64.006 and 1989 c 327 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature declares that it is the public policy of the state
of Washington to: (1) Provide continuous operation of the Washington
state ferry system at reasonable cost to users; (2) efficiently provide
levels of ferry service consistent with trends and forecasts of ferry
usage; (3) promote harmonious and cooperative relationships between the
ferry system and its employees by permitting ferry employees to
organize and bargain collectively; (4) protect the citizens of this
state by assuring effective and orderly operation of the ferry system
in providing for their health, safety, and welfare; (5) prohibit and
prevent all strikes or work stoppages by ferry employees; (6) protect
the rights of ferry employees with respect to employee organizations;
and (7) promote just and fair compensation, benefits, and working
conditions for ferry system employees ((as compared with public and
private sector employees in states along the west coast of the United
States, including Alaska, and in British Columbia in directly
comparable but not necessarily identical positions)).

Sec. 2 RCW 47.64.120 and 2006 c 164 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the employer and
ferry system employee organizations, through their collective
bargaining representatives, shall meet at reasonable times((,)) to
negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and working
conditions((, insurance, and health care benefits as limited by RCW
47.64.270, and other matters mutually agreed upon. Employer funded
retirement benefits shall be provided under the public employees
retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW and shall not be included in
the scope of collective bargaining.
(2) Upon ratification of bargaining agreements, ferry employees are
entitled to an amount equivalent to the interest earned on retroactive
compensation increases. For purposes of this section, the interest
earned on retroactive compensation increases is the same monthly rate
of interest that was earned on the amount of the compensation increases
while held in the state treasury. The interest will be computed for
each employee until the date the retroactive compensation is paid, and
must be allocated in accordance with appropriation authority. The
interest earned on retroactive compensation is not considered part of
the ongoing compensation obligation of the state and is not
compensation earnable for the purposes of chapter 41.40 RCW)).
(2) Except as provided under RCW 47.64.270, the employer is not
required to bargain over health care benefits or other employee
insurance benefits.
(3) The employer shall not bargain over retirement plans and
retirement benefits. Employer funded retirement benefits are provided
under the public employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW.
(4) Negotiations shall also include grievance procedures for
resolving any questions arising under the agreement, which shall be
embodied in a written agreement and signed by the parties.
(((3))) (5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a
conflict exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or
agency policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of
employment and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this
chapter, the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A
provision of a collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the
terms of a statute is invalid and unenforceable.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.64.270 and 2006 c 164 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Absent a collective bargaining agreement to the contrary, the
department of transportation shall provide contributions to insurance
and health care plans for ferry system employees and dependents, as
determined by the state health care authority, under chapter 41.05 RCW;
and the employer and employee organizations may collectively bargain
for other insurance and health care plans, and employer contributions
may exceed that of other state agencies as provided in RCW 41.05.050.
To the extent that ferry employees by bargaining unit have absorbed the
required offset of wage increases by the amount that the employer's
contribution for employees' and dependents' insurance and health care
plans exceeds that of other state general government employees in the
1985-87 fiscal biennium, employees shall not be required to absorb a
further offset except to the extent the differential between employer
contributions for those employees and all other state general
government employees increases during any subsequent fiscal biennium.
If such differential increases in the 1987-89 fiscal biennium or the
1985-87 offset by bargaining unit is insufficient to meet the required
deduction, the amount available for compensation shall be reduced by
bargaining unit by the amount of such increase or the 1985-87 shortage
in the required offset. Compensation shall include all wages and
employee benefits.)) The employer and one coalition of all the
exclusive bargaining representatives shall conduct negotiations
regarding the dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for
health care benefits, subject to this chapter and chapter 41.80 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.64.280 and 2006 c 164 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created the marine employees' commission. The
governor shall appoint the commission with the consent of the senate.
The commission shall consist of three members: One member to be
appointed from labor, one member from industry, and one member from the
public who has significant knowledge of maritime affairs. The public
member shall be chair of the commission. One of the original members
shall be appointed for a term of three years, one for a term of four
years, and one for a term of five years. Their successors shall be
appointed for terms of five years each, except that any person chosen
to fill a vacancy shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of the
member whom he or she succeeds. Commission members are eligible for
reappointment. Any member of the commission may be removed by the
governor, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance
in office, but for no other cause. Commission members are not eligible
for state retirement under chapter 41.40 RCW by virtue of their service
on the commission. Members of the commission shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and shall receive reimbursement for
official travel and other expenses at the same rate and on the same
terms as provided for the transportation commission by RCW 47.01.061.
The payments shall be made from the Puget Sound ferry operations
account.
(2) The commission shall: (a) Adjust all complaints, grievances,
and disputes between labor and management arising out of the operation
of the ferry system as provided in RCW 47.64.150; (b) provide for
impasse mediation as required in RCW 47.64.210; (((c) provide salary
surveys as required in RCW 47.64.220;)) and (((d))) (c) perform those
duties required in RCW 47.64.300.
(3)(a) In adjudicating all complaints, grievances, and disputes,
the party claiming labor disputes shall, in writing, notify the
commission, which shall make careful inquiry into the cause thereof and
issue an order advising the ferry employee, or the ferry employee
organization representing him or her, and the department of
transportation, as to the decision of the commission.
(b) The parties are entitled to offer evidence relating to disputes
at all hearings conducted by the commission. The orders and awards of
the commission are final and binding upon any ferry employee or
employees or their representative affected thereby and upon the
department.
(c) The commission shall adopt rules of procedure under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(d) The commission has the authority to subpoena any ferry employee
or employees, or their representatives, and any member or
representative of the department, and any witnesses. The commission
may require attendance of witnesses and the production of all pertinent
records at any hearings held by the commission. The subpoenas of the
commission are enforceable by order of any superior court in the state
of Washington for the county within which the proceeding may be
pending. The commission may hire staff as necessary, appoint
consultants, enter into contracts, and conduct studies as reasonably
necessary to carry out this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.64.320 and 2006 c 164 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The mediator, arbitrator, or arbitration panel may consider
only matters that are subject to bargaining under this chapter, except
that health care benefits are not subject to interest arbitration.
(2) The decision of an arbitrator or arbitration panel is not
binding on the legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the
funds necessary to implement provisions pertaining to compensation and
fringe benefit provisions of an arbitrated collective bargaining
agreement, is not binding on the state, the department of
transportation, or the ferry employee organization.
(3) In making its determination, the arbitrator or arbitration
panel shall be mindful of the legislative purpose under RCW 47.64.005
and 47.64.006 and, as additional standards or guidelines to aid it in
reaching a decision, shall take into consideration the following
factors:
(a) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement;
(b) Past collective bargaining contracts between the parties
including the bargaining that led up to the contracts;
(((b))) (c) The constitutional and statutory authority of the
employer;
(((c))) (d) Stipulations of the parties;
(((d) The results of the salary survey as required in RCW
47.64.220;))
(e) Comparison of wages, hours, employee benefits, and conditions
of employment of the involved ferry employees with those of public and
private sector employees in states along the west coast of the United
States, including Alaska, ((and in British Columbia)) doing directly
comparable but not necessarily identical work, giving consideration to
factors peculiar to the area and the classifications involved;
(f) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances during the
pendency of the proceedings;
(g) The limitations on ferry toll increases and operating subsidies
as may be imposed by the legislature; ((and))
(h) The ability of the state to retain ferry employees;
(i) Comparison of wages, hours, employee benefits, and conditions
of employment of the involved ferry employees with those of other
public employees in the state;
(j) The overall compensation presently received by the ferry
employees, including direct wage compensation, vacations, holidays and
other paid excused time, pensions, insurance benefits, and all other
direct or indirect monetary benefits received;
(k) The implicit price deflator for personal consumption index; and
(l) Other factors that are normally or traditionally taken into
consideration in the determination of matters that are subject to
bargaining under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.80.020 and 2002 c 354 s 303 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive
bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter
47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the
coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the
employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of
higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be
certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW
41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 47.64.220 (Salary survey) and 2006 c 164
s 10, 2005 c 274 s 308, 1999 c 256 s 1, 1989 c 327 s 2, & 1983 c 15 s
13 are each repealed.

--- END ---