BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission must conduct an online keno game in which the
drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than
once every twenty-four hours but not less than every four minutes. The
online keno game may not require interaction between a player and any
device or terminal otherwise prohibited by RCW 67.70.040(1)(a).
(2) The commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.040 and 2006 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To adopt rules governing the establishment and operation of a
state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a
lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and
in order that such lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues
for the state consonant with the dignity of the state and the general
welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be
sold over the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or
video terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or
terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of
both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game
allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to
otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device
or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic
representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot
machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before
entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared
games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except
as limited by (a) of this subsection;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares((. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any online game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours));
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as
limited by (a) of this subsection;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general
fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance
with RCW 43.01.050;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.240 and 2001 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund and student achievement fund created in RCW 43.135.045. For the
transition period from July 1, 2001, until and including June 30, 2002,
fifty percent of the moneys not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the student achievement fund and fifty percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the education construction fund. On
and after July 1, 2002, until June 30, 2004, seventy-five percent of
these moneys shall be placed in the student achievement fund and
twenty-five percent shall be placed in the education construction fund.
On and after July 1, 2004, all deposits not otherwise obligated under
this section shall be placed in the education construction fund.
Moneys in the state lottery account deposited in the education
construction fund and the student achievement fund are included in
"general state revenues" under RCW 39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For distribution of revenue received under the game created in
section 1 of this act, after payments have been made under subsection
(1) of this section, to the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170;
(7) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(((7))) (8) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

--- END ---