BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.044 and 2002 c 349 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 67.70.040(1)(a), the commission may enter into
the multistate agreement establishing a shared game lottery known as
"The Big Game," that was entered into by party state lotteries in
August 1996 and subsequently amended and a shared game lottery known as
"Powerball."
(2) The shared game lottery account is created as a separate
account outside the state treasury. The account is managed,
maintained, and controlled by the commission and consists of all
revenues received from the sale of shared game lottery tickets or
shares, and all other moneys credited or transferred to it from any
other fund or source under law. The account is allotted according to
chapter 43.88 RCW.

--- END ---