BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
final recommendations from the joint transportation committee ferry
study, submitted to the legislature during the 2009 regular legislative
session, be enacted by the legislature and implemented by the
department of transportation as soon as practicable in order to benefit
from the efficiencies and cost savings identified in the
recommendations. It is also the intent of the legislature to make
various additional policy changes aimed at further efficiencies and
cost savings. Since the study began in 2006, recommendations have been
made with regard to long range planning and implementing the most
efficient and effective balance between ferry capital and operating
investments. It is intended that this act, the 2009-2011 omnibus
transportation appropriations act, and subsequent transportation
appropriations acts serve as vehicles for enacting these
recommendations in order to maximize the utilization of existing
capacity and to make the most efficient use of existing assets and tax
dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.60.355 and 2007 c 512 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Terminal and vessel preservation funding requests shall only be
for assets in the life-cycle cost model.
(2) Terminal and vessel preservation funding requests that exceed
five million dollars per project must be accompanied by a predesign
study. The predesign study must include all elements required by the
office of financial management.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.60.365 and 2007 c 512 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall develop terminal and vessel design standards
that:
(1) Adhere to vehicle level of service standards as described in
RCW 47.06.140;
(2) Adhere to operational strategies as described in RCW 47.60.327;
and
(3) Choose the most efficient balance between capital and operating
investments by using a life-cycle cost analysis.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.60.375 and 2008 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The capital plan must adhere to the following:
(a) A current ridership demand forecast;
(b) Vehicle level of service standards as described in RCW
47.06.140;
(c) Operational strategies as described in RCW 47.60.327; and
(d) Terminal and vessel design standards as described in RCW
47.60.365.
(2) The capital plan must include the following:
(a) A current vessel preservation plan;
(b) A current systemwide vessel rebuild and replacement plan as
described in RCW 47.60.377;
(c) A current vessel deployment plan; and
(d) A current terminal preservation plan that adheres to the life-cycle cost model on capital assets as described in RCW 47.60.345.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.60.385 and 2008 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Terminal improvement, vessel improvement, and vessel
acquisition project funding requests must adhere to the capital plan((.
(2) Requests for terminal improvement design and construction
funding must)), include route-based planning, and be submitted with a
predesign study that:
(a) Includes all elements required by the office of financial
management;
(b) Separately identifies basic terminal and vessel elements
essential for operation and their costs;
(c) Separately identifies additional elements to provide ancillary
revenue and customer comfort and their costs;
(d) Includes construction phasing options that are consistent with
forecasted ridership increases;
(e) Separately identifies additional elements requested by local
governments and the cost and proposed funding source of those elements;
(f) Separately identifies multimodal elements and the cost and
proposed funding source of those elements; ((and))
(g) Identifies all contingency amounts((.
(h)[(3)] When planning for new vessel acquisitions, the department
must evaluate the long-term vessel operating costs related to fuel
efficiency and staffing));
(h) Identifies any terminal, vessel, or other capital modifications
that would be required as a result of the proposed capital project;
(i) Includes planned service modifications as a result of the
proposed capital project, and the consistency of those service
modifications with the capital plan; and
(j) Demonstrates the evaluation of long-term operating costs
including fuel efficiency, staffing, and preservation.
(2) The department shall prioritize vessel preservation and
acquisition funding requests over vessel improvement funding requests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the requirements of RCW 47.60.385(1), initial
requests for, and substantial modification requests to, vessel
acquisition funding must be submitted with a predesign study that:
(a) Includes a business decision case on vessel sizing;
(b) Includes an updated vessel deployment plan demonstrating
maximum use of existing vessels, and an updated systemwide vessel
rebuild and replacement plan;
(c) Includes an analysis that demonstrates that acquiring a new
vessel or improving an existing vessel is more cost-effective than
other alternatives considered. At a minimum, alternatives explored
must include:
(i) Alternatives to new vessel construction that increase capacity
of existing vessels;
(ii) Service level changes in lieu of adding vessel capacity; and
(iii) Acquiring existing vessels or existing vessel plans rather
than wholly new vessels or vessel plans; and
(d) Demonstrates that the vessel proposed for improvement,
construction, or purchase, if intended to replace an existing vessel or
to place an existing vessel into inactive or reserve status, is
consistent with the scheduled replacements in the rebuild and
replacement plan.
(2) In addition to the requirements of RCW 47.60.385(1), initial
requests for, and substantial modification requests to, vessel
improvement funding must be submitted with a predesign study that
includes:
(a) An explanation of any regulatory changes necessitating the
improvement;
(b) The requirements under subsection (1) of this section, if the
improvement modifies the capacity of a vessel;
(c) A cost-benefit analysis of any modifications designed to
improve fuel efficiency, including potential impacts on vessel
maintenance and repair; and
(d) An assessment of out-of-service time associated with making the
improvement and ongoing preservation of the improvement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds measuring the performance of Washington
state ferries requires the measurement of quality, timeliness, and unit
cost of services delivered to customers. Consequently, the department
must develop a set of metrics that measure that performance and report
to the transportation committees of the house of representatives and
senate and to the office of financial management on the development of
these measurements along with recommendations to the 2011 legislature
on which measurements must become a part of the next transportation
budget.
(2) Annually, the department shall report to the transportation
committees of the legislature statistics regarding its on-time arrival
and departure status on a route-by-route and month-by-month basis, as
well as an annual route-by-route and systemwide basis, weighted by the
number of customers on each sailing and distinguishing peak period on-time performance. The statistics must include reasons for any delays
over ten minutes from the scheduled time. The statistics must be
prominently displayed on the Washington state ferries' web site. Each
Washington state ferries vessel and terminal must prominently display
the statistics as they relate to their specific route.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Signage must be prominently displayed at
each terminal and on each vessel that informs the public that assaults
on Washington state employees will be prosecuted to the full extent of
the law.
(2) The department shall investigate the frequency, severity, and
prosecutorial results of assaults on Washington state ferries employees
and, if appropriate, make recommendations to the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives during the 2011
legislative session regarding methods to decrease the number of
assaults on employees and procedures for prosecuting those who assault
employees.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.61.010 (Authority to enter into agreement and apply for
financial assistance) and 1984 c 7 s 338 & 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.61.020 (Bonds for matching funds -- Issuance and sale) and
1965 ex.s. c 56 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.61.030 (Term of bonds -- Terms and conditions) and 1965
ex.s. c 56 s 3;
(4) RCW 47.61.040 (Bonds -- Signatures -- Registration -- Where payable--Negotiable instruments) and 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 4;
(5) RCW 47.61.050 (Bonds -- Denominations -- Manner and terms of sale--Legal investment for state funds) and 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 5;
(6) RCW 47.61.060 (Proceeds of bonds -- Deposit and use) and 1965
ex.s. c 56 s 6;
(7) RCW 47.61.070 (Statement describing nature of bond obligation--Pledge of excise taxes) and 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 7;
(8) RCW 47.61.080 (Bonds to reflect terms and conditions of grant
agreement) and 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 8;
(9) RCW 47.61.090 (Designation of funds to repay bonds and
interest) and 1984 c 7 s 339 & 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 9;
(10) RCW 47.61.100 (Bond repayment procedure -- Highway bond
retirement fund) and 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 10;
(11) RCW 47.61.110 (Sums in excess of bond retirement
requirements -- Use) and 1965 ex.s. c 56 s 11;
(12) RCW 47.60.210 (Seamen may sue for injuries -- Venue) and 1984 c
7 s 315 & 1961 c 13 s 47.60.210; and
(13) RCW 47.60.240 (Liability to persons other than shippers or
passengers -- Limitation) and 1984 c 7 s 318 & 1961 c 13 s 47.60.240;
(14) RCW 47.60.395 (Evaluation of cost allocation methodology and
preservation and improvement costs -- Exception) and 2009 c 470 s 707 &
2007 c 512 s 15;
(15) RCW 47.60.649 (Passenger-only ferry service -- Finding) and 1998
c 166 s 1;
(16) RCW 47.60.652 (Passenger-only ferry service -- Vessel and
terminal acquisition, procurement, and construction) and 1998 c 166 s
2;
(17) RCW 47.60.654 (Passenger-only ferry service -- Contingency) and
1998 c 166 s 3;
(18) RCW 47.60.658 (Passenger-only ferry service between Vashon and
Seattle) and 2007 c 223 s 8 & 2006 c 332 s 3;
(19) RCW 47.60.770 (Jumbo ferry construction -- Notice) and 1993 c
493 s 1;
(20) RCW 47.60.772 (Jumbo ferry construction -- Bidding documents)
and 1993 c 493 s 2;
(21) RCW 47.60.774 (Jumbo ferry construction -- Procedure on
conclusion of evaluation) and 1993 c 493 s 4;
(22) RCW 47.60.776 (Jumbo ferry construction -- Contract) and 1993 c
493 s 5;
(23) RCW 47.60.778 (Jumbo ferry construction -- Bid deposits -- Low
bidder claiming error) and 1996 c 18 s 9 & 1993 c 493 s 6; and
(24) RCW 47.60.780 (Jumbo ferry construction--Propulsion system
acquisition) and 1994 c 181 s 2.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.64.011 and 2006 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the
definitions in this section shall apply.
(1) "Collective bargaining representative" means the persons
designated by the governor and employee organizations to be the
exclusive representatives during collective bargaining negotiations.
(2) "Commission" means the ((marine employees')) public employment
relations commission created in RCW ((47.64.280)) 41.58.010.
(3) "Department of transportation" means the department as defined
in RCW 47.01.021.
(4) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(5) "Ferry employee" means any employee of the marine
transportation division of the department of transportation who is a
member of a collective bargaining unit represented by a ferry employee
organization and does not include an exempt employee pursuant to RCW
41.06.079.
(6) "Ferry employee organization" means any labor organization
recognized to represent a collective bargaining unit of ferry
employees.
(7) "Lockout" means the refusal of the employer to furnish work to
ferry employees in an effort to get ferry employee organizations to
make concessions during collective bargaining, grievance, or other
labor relation negotiations. Curtailment of employment of ferry
employees due to lack of work resulting from a strike or work stoppage
shall not be considered a lockout.
(8) "Office of financial management" means the office as created in
RCW 43.41.050.
(9) "Strike or work stoppage" means a ferry employee's refusal, in
concerted action with others, to report to duty, or his or her willful
absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage or slowdown of
work, or his or her abstinence in whole or in part from the full,
faithful, and proper performance of the duties of employment, for the
purpose of inducing, influencing, or coercing a change in conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges, or obligations of his, her, or any
other ferry employee's employment. A refusal, in good faith, to work
under conditions which pose an endangerment to the health and safety of
ferry employees or the public, as determined by the master of the
vessel, shall not be considered a strike for the purposes of this
chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.64.090 and 2003 c 373 s 3 and 2003 c 91 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 47.60.656 and subsections (2) and (4)
of this section, or as provided in RCW 36.54.130 and subsection (3) of
this section, if any party assumes the operation and maintenance of any
ferry or ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the
provisions herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of
any ferry or ferry system entered into by the department shall provide
that the wages to be paid, hours of employment, working conditions, and
seniority rights of employees will be established by the ((marine
employees')) commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of
this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes shall
be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.
(2) If a public transportation benefit area meeting the
requirements of RCW 36.57A.200 has voter approval to operate passenger-only ferry service, it may enter into an agreement with Washington
State Ferries to rent, lease, or purchase passenger-only vessels,
related equipment, or terminal space for purposes of loading and
unloading the passenger-only ferry. Charges for the vessels,
equipment, and space must be fair market value taking into account the
public benefit derived from the ferry service. A benefit area or
subcontractor of that benefit area that qualifies under this subsection
is not subject to the restrictions of subsection (1) of this section,
but is subject to:
(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or
its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining
representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter
41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as applicable;
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its
subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the
department of transportation who separated from employment with the
department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of
Washington; and
(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the benefit area and any contract with its
subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees
for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a
cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(3) If a ferry district is formed under RCW 36.54.110 to operate
passenger-only ferry service, it may enter into an agreement with
Washington State Ferries to rent, lease, or purchase vessels, related
equipment, or terminal space for purposes of loading and unloading the
ferry. Charges for the vessels, equipment, and space must be fair
market value taking into account the public benefit derived from the
ferry service. A ferry district or subcontractor of that district that
qualifies under this subsection is not subject to the restrictions of
subsection (1) of this section, but is subject to:
(a) The terms of those collective bargaining agreements that it or
its subcontractors negotiate with the exclusive bargaining
representatives of its or its subcontractors' employees under chapter
41.56 RCW or the National Labor Relations Act, as applicable;
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the ferry district and any contract with its
subcontractors, give preferential hiring to former employees of the
department of transportation who separated from employment with the
department because of termination of the ferry service by the state of
Washington; and
(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, a
requirement that the ferry district and any contract with its
subcontractors, on any questions concerning representation of employees
for collective bargaining purposes, may be determined by conducting a
cross-check comparing an employee organization's membership records or
bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the
employer.
(4) The department of transportation shall make its terminal, dock,
and pier space available to private operators of passenger-only ferries
if the space can be made available without limiting the operation of
car ferries operated by the department. These private operators are
not bound by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. Charges
for the equipment and space must be fair market value taking into
account the public benefit derived from the passenger-only ferry
service.

Sec. 12 RCW 47.64.150 and 1983 c 15 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
An agreement with a ferry employee organization that is the
exclusive representative of ferry employees in an appropriate unit may
provide procedures for the consideration of ferry employee grievances
and of disputes over the interpretation and application of agreements.
Negotiated procedures may provide for binding arbitration of ferry
employee grievances and of disputes over the interpretation and
application of existing agreements. An arbitrator's decision on a
grievance shall not change or amend the terms, conditions, or
applications of the collective bargaining agreement. The procedures
shall provide for the invoking of arbitration only with the approval of
the employee organization. The costs of arbitrators shall be shared
equally by the parties.
Ferry system employees shall follow either the grievance procedures
provided in a collective bargaining agreement, or if no such procedures
are so provided, shall submit the grievances to the ((marine
employees')) commission ((as provided in RCW 47.64.280)).

Sec. 13 RCW 41.58.060 and 1983 c 15 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
For any matter concerning the state ferry system and employee
relations, collective bargaining, or labor disputes or stoppages, the
provisions of chapter 47.64 RCW and this chapter shall govern.
However, if a conflict exists between the provisions of chapter 47.64
RCW and this chapter, the provisions of chapter 47.64 RCW shall govern.

Sec. 14 RCW 41.06.070 and 2009 c 33 s 36 and 2009 c 5 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the
state printing plant;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington apple commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(s) Officers and employees of the Washington grain commission;
(t) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(u) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under
chapter 15.65 RCW;
(v) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed
under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(w) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants
including but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions,
committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the provisions of this
chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any provision of law
inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is made in such law;
(x) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency
heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more than
three principal policy assistants who report directly to the agency
head or deputy agency heads;
(y) ((All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(z))) Staff employed by the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce to administer energy policy functions
and manage energy site evaluation council activities under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(m);
(((aa))) (z) Staff employed by Washington State University to
administer energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (v) ((and (y))) and (2) of this section, shall be determined by
the director of personnel. Changes to the classification plan
affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for classified
salary increases resulting from adjustments to the classification plan
as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
For the twelve months following February 18, 2009, a salary or wage
increase shall not be granted to any position exempt from
classification under this chapter.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 RCW 47.64.280 (Marine employees'
commission) and 2006 c 164 s 18, 1984 c 287 s 95, & 1983 c 15 s 19 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) The marine employees' commission is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the public employment relations commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the marine employees'
commission shall be delivered to the custody of the public employment
relations commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the marine employees'
commission shall be made available to the public employment relations
commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the marine
employees' commission shall be assigned to the public employment
relations commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the marine employees' commission
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the public employment relations commission.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance
of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial
management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the marine employees'
commission shall be continued and acted upon by the public employment
relations commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the public employment
relations commission.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the marine
employees' commission shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---