BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.40.040 and 2008 c 329 s 917 and 2008 c 328 s 6011
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW
67.40.030, proceeds of the taxes imposed under RCW 67.40.090 and
((67.40.130)) section 3 of this act, and all other moneys received by
the state convention and trade center from any public or private source
which are intended to fund the acquisition, design, construction,
expansion, exterior cleanup and repair of the Eagles building,
conversion of various retail and other space to meeting rooms, purchase
of the land and building known as the McKay Parcel, development of low-income housing, or renovation of the center((, and those expenditures
authorized under RCW 67.40.170)) shall be deposited in the state
convention and trade center account hereby created in the state
treasury and in such subaccounts as are deemed appropriate by the
directors of the corporation.
(2) Moneys in the account, including unanticipated revenues under
RCW 43.79.270, shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in
the following priority:
(a) For reimbursement of the state general fund under RCW
67.40.060;
(b) After appropriation by statute:
(i) For payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of
the bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030;
(ii) ((For expenditures authorized in RCW 67.40.170, and)) During
the 2007-2009 biennium, the legislature may transfer from the state
convention and trade center account to the Washington housing trust
account such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account;
and during the 2007-2009 biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the state convention and trade center account to the general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account;
(iii) For acquisition, design, and construction of the state
convention and trade center;
(iv) For debt service for the acquisition, design, and construction
and retrofit of the museum of history and industry museum property or
other future expansions of the convention center as approved by the
legislature; and
(v) For reimbursement of any expenditures from the state general
fund in support of the state convention and trade center; and
(c) For transfer to the state convention and trade center
operations account.
(3) The corporation shall identify with specificity those
facilities of the state convention and trade center that are to be
financed with proceeds of general obligation bonds, the interest on
which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal income
tax purposes. The corporation shall not permit the extent or manner of
private business use of those bond-financed facilities to be
inconsistent with treatment of such bonds as governmental bonds under
applicable provisions of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.
(4) In order to ensure consistent treatment of bonds authorized
under RCW 67.40.030 with applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, investment
earnings on bond proceeds deposited in the state convention and trade
center account in the state treasury shall be retained in the account,
and shall be expended by the corporation for the purposes authorized
under chapter 386, Laws of 1995 and in a manner consistent with
applicable provisions of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.
(5) Subject to the conditions in subsection (6) of this section,
((starting in fiscal year 2008)) and contingent on the imposition of
the tax in section 3 of this act, the state treasurer shall transfer:
(a) The sum of four million dollars, or as much as may be available
pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the state
convention and trade center account to the tourism enterprise account,
with the maximum transfer being four million dollars per fiscal year;
and
(b) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much as may be
available pursuant to conditions set forth in this section, from the
state convention and trade center account to the tourism development
and promotion account, with the maximum transfer being five hundred
thousand dollars per fiscal year.
(6)(a) Funds required for debt service payments and reserves for
bonds issued under RCW 67.40.030; for debt service authorized under RCW
67.40.170; and for the issuance and sale of financial instruments
associated with the acquisition, design, construction, and retrofit of
the museum of history and industry museum property or for other future
expansions of the center, as approved by the legislature, shall be
maintained within the state convention and trade center account.
(b) ((No less than six million one hundred fifty thousand dollars
per year shall be retained in the state convention and trade center
account for funding capital maintenance as required by the center's
long-term capital plan, facility enhancements, unanticipated
replacements, and operating reserves for the convention center
operation. This amount shall be escalated annually as follows:
(i) Four percent for annual inflation for capital maintenance,
repairs, and replacement;
(ii) An additional two percent for enhancement to the facility; and
(iii) An additional three percent for growth in expenditure due to
aging of the facility and the need to maintain an operating reserve.
(c))) Sufficient funds shall be reserved within the state
convention and trade center account to fund operating appropriations
for the annual operation of the convention center.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.40.045 and 1995 c 386 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of financial management, in consultation with the
chairpersons of the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and
house of representatives, may authorize temporary borrowing from the
state treasury for the purpose of covering cash deficiencies in the
state convention and trade center account resulting from project
completion costs. Subject to the conditions and limitations provided
in this section, lines of credit may be authorized at times and in
amounts as the director of financial management determines are
advisable to meet current and/or anticipated cash deficiencies. Each
authorization shall distinctly specify the maximum amount of cash
deficiency which may be incurred and the maximum time period during
which the cash deficiency may continue. The total amount of borrowing
outstanding at any time shall never exceed the lesser of:
(a) $58,275,000; or
(b) An amount, as determined by the director of financial
management from time to time, which is necessary to provide for payment
of project completion costs.
(2) Unless the due date under this subsection is extended by
statute, all amounts borrowed under the authority of this section shall
be repaid to the state treasury by June 30, 1999, together with
interest at a rate determined by the state treasurer to be equivalent
to the return on investments of the state treasury during the period
the amounts are borrowed. Borrowing may be authorized from any excess
balances in the state treasury, except the agricultural permanent fund,
the Millersylvania park permanent fund, the state university permanent
fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, and the scientific permanent fund.
(3) As used in this section, "project completion" means:
(a) All remaining development, construction, and administrative
costs related to completion of the convention center; and
(b) Costs of the McKay building demolition, Eagles building
rehabilitation, development of low-income housing, and construction of
rentable retail space and an operable parking garage.
(4) It is the intent of the legislature that project completion
costs be paid ultimately from the following sources:
(a) $29,250,000 to be received by the corporation under an
agreement and settlement with Industrial Indemnity Co.;
(b) $1,070,000 to be received by the corporation as a contribution
from the city of Seattle;
(c) $20,000,000 from additional general obligation bonds to be
repaid from the special excise tax under RCW 67.40.090;
(d) $4,765,000 for contingencies and project reserves from
additional general obligation bonds to be repaid from the special
excise tax under RCW 67.40.090;
(e) $13,000,000 for conversion of various retail and other space to
meeting rooms, from additional general obligation bonds to be repaid
from the special excise tax under RCW 67.40.090;
(f) $13,300,000 for expansion at the 900 level of the facility,
from additional general obligation bonds to be repaid from the special
excise tax under RCW 67.40.090;
(g) $10,400,000 for purchase of the land and building known as the
McKay Parcel, for development of low-income housing, for development,
construction, and administrative costs related to completion of the
state convention and trade center, including settlement costs related
to construction litigation, and for partially refunding obligations
under the parking garage revenue note issued by the corporation to
Industrial Indemnity Company in connection with the agreement and
settlement identified in (a) of this subsection, from additional
general obligation bonds to be repaid from the special excise tax under
RCW 67.40.090. All proceeds from any sale of the McKay parcel shall be
deposited in the state convention and trade center account and shall
not be expended without appropriation by law;
(h) $300,000 for Eagles building exterior cleanup and repair, from
additional general obligation bonds to be repaid from the special
excise tax under RCW 67.40.090; and
(i) The proceeds of the sale of any properties owned by the state
convention and trade center that are not planned for use for state
convention and trade center operations, with the proceeds to be used
for development, construction, and administrative costs related to
completion of the state convention and trade center, including
settlement costs related to construction litigation.
(5) The borrowing authority provided in this section is in addition
to the authority to borrow from the general fund to meet the bond
retirement and interest requirements set forth in RCW 67.40.060. To
the extent the specific conditions and limitations provided in this
section conflict with the general conditions and limitations provided
for temporary cash deficiencies in RCW 43.88.260 (section 7, chapter
502, Laws of 1987), the specific conditions and limitations in this
section shall govern.
(6) For expenditures authorized under RCW 67.40.170, the
corporation may use the proceeds of the special excise tax authorized
under RCW 67.40.090, the sales tax authorized under ((RCW 67.40.130))
section 3 of this act, contributions to the corporation from public or
private participants, and investment earnings on any of the funds
listed in this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 67.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city may, by resolution or
ordinance for the purposes authorized under RCW 67.40.170 and
67.40.190, fix and impose a sales tax on the charge for rooms to be
used for lodging by transients. Such tax must be collected from the
persons who are taxable by the state under RCW 67.40.090, but only
those taxable persons located within the boundaries of the city
imposing the tax. The rate of such tax imposed by a city is two
percent of the charge for the rooms to be used for lodging by
transients. The tax authorized under this section must be levied and
collected in the same manner as those taxes authorized under chapter
82.14 RCW. The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to this tax.
(2) As used in this section, the term "city" means a municipality
that has within its boundaries a convention and trade facility as
described in RCW 67.40.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.40.107 and 2008 c 137 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax imposed in RCW 67.40.090 and the tax authorized under ((RCW
67.40.130)) section 3 of this act do not apply to sales of temporary
medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.40.170 and 1995 c 386 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes levied and collected under ((RCW 67.40.130)) section 3 of
this act shall be credited to the state convention and trade center
account in the state treasury and used solely by the corporation formed
under RCW 67.40.020 for the purpose of paying all or any part of the
cost associated with: The financing, design, acquisition,
construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, and reequipping of
convention center facilities related to the expansion recommended by
the convention center expansion and city facilities task force created
under section 148, chapter 6, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.; the acquisition,
construction, and relocation costs of replacement housing; and the
repayment of loans and advances from the state, including loans
authorized previously under this chapter, or to pay or secure the
payment of all or part of the principal of or interest on any state
bonds issued for purposes authorized under this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 67.40.190 and 1995 c 386 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Moneys received from any tax imposed under ((RCW 67.40.130))
section 3 of this act shall be used for the purpose of providing funds
to the corporation for the costs associated with paying all or any part
of the cost associated with: The financing, design, acquisition,
construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, and reequipping of
convention center facilities; the acquisition, construction, and
relocation costs of replacement housing; and repayment of loans and
advances from the state, including loans authorized previously under
this chapter, or to pay or secure the payment of all or part of the
principal of or interest on any state bonds issued for purposes
authorized under this chapter.
(2) If any of the revenue from any local sales tax authorized under
((RCW 67.40.130)) section 3 of this act shall have been encumbered or
pledged by the state to secure the payment of any state bonds as
authorized under RCW 67.40.030, then as long as that agreement or
pledge shall be in effect, the legislature shall not withdraw from the
municipality the authority to levy and collect the tax ((or the tax
credit authorized under RCW 67.40.130 and 67.40.140)) under section 3
of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 67.28.181 and 2004 c 79 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax shall not
exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with all
other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality under
this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
twelve percent. A tax under this chapter shall not be imposed in
increments smaller than tenths of a percent.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four
percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization shall continue
through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may impose a
tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually
imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.
(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax
under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes
under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January
1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.
(c) If a city has a population of four hundred thousand or more and
is located in a county with a population of one million or more, the
rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city shall not exceed the
lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with all other
taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under this
chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
((fifteen)) seventeen and two-tenths percent.
(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent
before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this
section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the
municipality on January 1, 1998.
(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 67.40.130 (Convention and trade facilities -- Tax on
transient lodging authorized -- Rates) and 1995 c 386 s 1; and
(2) RCW 67.40.140 (Convention and trade facilities -- Remittance of
tax -- Credit) and 1995 c 386 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---