BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.440 and 2007 c 370 s 20 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine
private club, hotel, and sports entertainment facility licensee shall
be entitled to purchase any spirituous liquor items salable under such
license from the board at a discount of not ((less than fifteen)) more
than ten percent from the retail price fixed by the board, together
with all taxes.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.220 and 2007 c 370 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall set aside in a separate account in the liquor
revolving fund an amount equal to ten percent of its gross sales of
liquor to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; hotel; and sports entertainment facility licensees
collected from these licensees pursuant to the provisions of RCW
82.08.150, less the ((fifteen percent)) discount provided for in RCW
66.24.440; and the moneys in said separate account shall be distributed
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and
66.08.210. No election unit in which the sale of liquor under spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; and
sports entertainment facility licenses is unlawful shall be entitled to
share in the distribution of moneys from such separate account.

--- END ---