BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.043 and 2005 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named shall be as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a)
The levy by the state under RCW 84.52.065(1) shall not exceed three
dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the
support of the common schools; (b) the levy by the state under RCW
84.52.065(2) shall not exceed one cent per thousand dollars of assessed
value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used
exclusively for the support of the state parks; (c) the levy by any
county shall not exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value; (((c))) (d) the levy by any road district
shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value; and (((d))) (e) the levy by any city or town shall
not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars
and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; and (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts
that are protected under RCW 84.52.125.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the
state shall levy for collection in the following year for the support
of common schools of the state a tax of three dollars and sixty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of
all taxable property within the state adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue.
(2) Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the
state shall levy for collection in the following year for the support
of the state parks a tax of one cent per thousand dollars of assessed
value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the
state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue. Revenue from
the state parks levy shall be deposited into the state parks renewal
and stewardship account created in RCW 79A.05.215.
(3) As used in this section, "the support of common schools"
includes the payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for
capital construction projects for the common schools.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2007 c 340 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from the state property tax levy dedicated to state parks
under RCW 84.52.065(2), user fees, concessions, leases, donations
collected under RCW 46.16.076, and other state park-based activities
shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used for operating state parks, developing and renovating park
facilities, undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park
stewardship, and other state park purposes, except that the revenue
from the state property tax levy dedicated to state parks under RCW
84.52.065(2) may only be used for deferred and preventive maintenance,
historical preservation, renovation, and repair of existing state park
facilities and land. Expenditures from the account may be made only
after appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.52.068 and 2005 c 514 s 1104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A portion of the proceeds of the state property tax levy for
the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065(1) shall be
deposited into the student achievement fund as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) The amount of the deposit shall be based upon the average
number of full-time equivalent students in the school districts during
the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year.
(b) For the 2004-2005 through 2007-2008 school years, an annual
amount equal to two hundred fifty-four dollars per full-time equivalent
student in all school districts shall be deposited in the student
achievement fund.
(c) For the 2008-2009 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred sixty-five dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(d) For the 2009-2010 school year, an annual amount equal to two
hundred seventy-seven dollars per full-time equivalent student in all
school districts shall be deposited in the student achievement fund.
(e) For the 2010-2011 school year and each year thereafter, an
annual amount equal to two hundred seventy-eight dollars per full-time
equivalent student in all school districts shall be deposited in the
student achievement fund.
(f) The school district annual amounts shall be deposited based on
the monthly apportionment schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the
department of the monthly amounts to be deposited into the student
achievement fund to meet the apportionment schedule.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.89.020 and 2001 c 212 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of real
property as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(2) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district,
or any combination thereof.
(3) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(4) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the increment area that
include:
(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within the increment area, including the
management and promotion of retail trade activities in the increment
area;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the increment area; or
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(5) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements;
(b) relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending
construction of public improvements; (c) relocating utilities as a
result of public improvements; (d) financing public improvements,
including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general
indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary
reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred in
revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax
allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred by the
assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this
chapter and other applicable law; and (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs,
including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of
the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of
community revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public
improvements.
(6) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
port districts or public utility districts specifically for the purpose
of making required payments of principal and interest on general
indebtedness; and (b) regular property taxes levied by the state for
the support of the common schools and for the support of state parks
under RCW 84.52.065. Regular property taxes do not include excess
property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for
junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(7) "Tax allocation base value" means the true and fair value of
real property located within an increment area for taxes imposed in the
year in which the increment area is created, plus twenty-five percent
of any increase in the true and fair value of real property located
within an increment area that is placed on the assessment rolls after
the increment area is created.
(8) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from
the imposition of regular property taxes on the increment value and
distributed to finance public improvements.
(9) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes are
to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this
chapter.
(10) "Increment value" means seventy-five percent of any increase
in the true and fair value of real property in an increment area that
is placed on the tax rolls after the increment area is created.
(11) "Taxing districts" means a governmental entity that levies or
has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located
within a proposed or approved increment area.
(12) "Value of taxable property" means the value of the taxable
property as defined in RCW 39.36.015.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.102.020 and 2008 c 209 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Annual state contribution limit" means seven million five
hundred thousand dollars statewide per fiscal year.
(2) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(3) "Base year" means the first calendar year following the
calendar year in which a sponsoring local government, and any
cosponsoring local government, receives approval by the board for a
project award, provided that the approval is granted before October
15th. If approval by the board is received on or after October 15th
but on or before December 31st, the "base year" is the second calendar
year following the calendar year in which a sponsoring local
government, and any cosponsoring local government, receives approval by
the board for a project award.
(4) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board under
chapter 43.160 RCW.
(5) "Demonstration project" means one of the following projects:
(a) Bellingham waterfront redevelopment project;
(b) Spokane river district project at Liberty Lake; and
(c) Vancouver riverwest project.
(6) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(7) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning July 1st
and ending the following June 30th.
(8) "Local excise taxes" means local revenues derived from the
imposition of sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030 at the
tax rate that was in effect at the time the revenue development area
was approved by the board, except that if a local government reduces
the rate of such tax after the revenue development area was approved by
the board, "local excise taxes" means the local revenues derived from
the imposition of the sales and use taxes authorized in RCW 82.14.030
at the lower tax rate.
(9) "Local excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of local
excise taxes received by the local government during the measurement
year from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of local excise taxes received by the local government
during the base year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area, except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "local excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of local excise taxes
received by the sponsoring local government during a calendar year
period beginning with the calendar year immediately following the
approval of the revenue development area by the board and continuing
with each measurement year thereafter;
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "local excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of local excise taxes received by the
sponsoring local government during the measurement year from taxable
activity within the revenue development area over and above an amount
of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local government
during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case may be, adjusted by the
department for any estimated impacts from retail sales and use tax
sourcing changes effective in 2008. The amount of base year adjustment
determined by the department is final; and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "local excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of local excise taxes received by the sponsoring local
government during a calendar year period beginning with 2009 and
continuing with each measurement year thereafter.
(10) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port
district, and any federally recognized Indian tribe.
(11) "Local infrastructure financing" means the use of revenues
received from local excise tax allocation revenues, local property tax
allocation revenues, other revenues from local public sources, and
revenues received from the local option sales and use tax authorized in
RCW 82.14.475, dedicated to pay either the principal and interest on
bonds authorized under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement
costs on a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both.
(12) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure financing.
(13)(a) "Revenues from local public sources" means:
(i) Amounts of local excise tax allocation revenues and local
property tax allocation revenues, dedicated by sponsoring local
governments, participating local governments, and participating taxing
districts, for local infrastructure financing; and
(ii) Any other local revenues, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection, including revenues derived from federal and private
sources.
(b) Revenues from local public sources do not include any local
funds derived from state grants, state loans, or any other state moneys
including any local sales and use taxes credited against the state
sales and use taxes imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.
(14) "Low-income housing" means residential housing for low-income
persons or families who lack the means which is necessary to enable
them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe, and
sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding. For the purposes of this
subsection, "low income" means income that does not exceed eighty
percent of the median family income for the standard metropolitan
statistical area in which the revenue development area is located.
(15) "Measurement year" means a calendar year, beginning with the
calendar year following the base year and each calendar year
thereafter, that is used annually to measure state and local excise tax
allocation revenues.
(16) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative
action by a local government.
(17) "Participating local government" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of all or some of its
local excise tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(18) "Participating taxing district" means a local government
having a revenue development area within its geographic boundaries that
has entered into a written agreement with a sponsoring local government
as provided in RCW 39.102.080 to allow the use of some or all of its
local property tax allocation revenues or other revenues from local
public sources dedicated for local infrastructure financing.
(19)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means
seventy-five percent of any increase in the assessed value of real
property in a revenue development area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the revenue development area is
approved by the board;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the revenue development
area is approved by the board;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the revenue development area is approved by the board.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property in a revenue
development area resulting from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this
subsection are included in the property tax allocation revenue value in
the initial year. These same amounts are also included in the property
tax allocation revenue value in subsequent years unless the property
becomes exempt from property taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes seventy-five
percent of any increase in the assessed value of new construction
consisting of an entire building in the years following the initial
year, unless the building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a revenue development area has not
increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in (a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when such cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when such cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when
such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55
RCW, the year when such cost is treated as new construction for
purposes of levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(20) "Taxing district" means a government entity that levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within
a proposed or approved revenue development area.
(21) "Public improvements" means:
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revenue development area
that include:
(i) Street, bridge, and road construction and maintenance,
including highway interchange construction;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements,
including wastewater reuse facilities;
(iii) Sidewalks, traffic controls, and streetlights;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;
(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas, including trails; and
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(b) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
(22) "Public improvement costs" means the cost of: (a) Design,
planning, acquisition including land acquisition, site preparation
including land clearing, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) demolishing,
relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of
public improvements; (c) the local government's portion of relocating
utilities as a result of public improvements; (d) financing public
improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs
on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any
necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (e) assessments incurred
in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the property
tax allocation revenue base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter
84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with
this chapter and other applicable law; (f) administrative expenses and
feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs;
and (g) any of the above-described costs that may have been incurred
before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements
and the use of local infrastructure financing to fund the costs of the
public improvements.
(23) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the
common schools and for the support of state parks under RCW 84.52.065;
and (c) regular property taxes authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are
limited to a specific purpose. "Regular property taxes" do not include
excess property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits
for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(24) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a revenue development
area for taxes levied in the year in which the revenue development area
is adopted for collection in the following year, plus one hundred
percent of any increase in the assessed value of real property located
within a revenue development area that is placed on the assessment
rolls after the revenue development area is adopted, less the property
tax allocation revenue value.
(25) "Relocating a business" means the closing of a business and
the reopening of that business, or the opening of a new business that
engages in the same activities as the previous business, in a different
location within a one-year period, when an individual or entity has an
ownership interest in the business at the time of closure and at the
time of opening or reopening. "Relocating a business" does not include
the closing and reopening of a business in a new location where the
business has been acquired and is under entirely new ownership at the
new location, or the closing and reopening of a business in a new
location as a result of the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
(26) "Revenue development area" means the geographic area adopted
by a sponsoring local government and approved by the board, from which
local excise and property tax allocation revenues are derived for local
infrastructure financing.
(27) "Small business" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
19.85.020.
(28) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county,
and for the purpose of this chapter a federally recognized Indian tribe
or any combination thereof, that adopts a revenue development area and
applies to the board to use local infrastructure financing.
(29) "State contribution" means the lesser of:
(a) One million dollars;
(b) The state excise tax allocation revenue and state property tax
allocation revenue received by the state during the preceding calendar
year;
(c) The total amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, and other revenues from local public
sources, that are dedicated by a sponsoring local government, any
participating local governments, and participating taxing districts, in
the preceding calendar year to the payment of principal and interest on
bonds issued under RCW 39.102.150 or to pay public improvement costs on
a pay-as-you-go basis subject to RCW 39.102.195, or both; or
(d) The amount of project award granted by the board in the notice
of approval to use local infrastructure financing under RCW 39.102.040.
(30) "State excise taxes" means revenues derived from state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, less the amount
of tax distributions from all local retail sales and use taxes, other
than the local sales and use taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.475, imposed
on the same taxable events that are credited against the state retail
sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.
(31) "State excise tax allocation revenue" means the amount of
state excise taxes received by the state during the measurement year
from taxable activity within the revenue development area over and
above the amount of state excise taxes received by the state during the
base year from taxable activity within the revenue development area,
except that:
(a) If a sponsoring local government adopts a revenue development
area and reasonably determines that no activity subject to tax under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW occurred within the boundaries of the
revenue development area in the twelve months immediately preceding the
approval of the revenue development area by the board, "state excise
tax allocation revenue" means the entire amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during a calendar year period beginning with the
calendar year immediately following the approval of the revenue
development area by the board and continuing with each measurement year
thereafter;
(b) For revenue development areas approved by the board in calendar
years 2006 and 2007 that do not meet the requirements in (a) of this
subsection and if legislation is enacted in this state during the 2007
legislative session that adopts the sourcing provisions of the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement, "state excise tax allocation
revenue" means the amount of state excise taxes received by the state
during the measurement year from taxable activity within the revenue
development area over and above an amount of state excise taxes
received by the state during the 2007 or 2008 base year, as the case
may be, adjusted by the department for any estimated impacts from
retail sales and use tax sourcing changes effective in 2008. The
amount of base year adjustment determined by the department is final;
and
(c) If the sponsoring local government of a revenue development
area related to a demonstration project reasonably determines that no
local excise tax distributions were received between August 1, 2008,
and December 31, 2008, from within the boundaries of the revenue
development area, "state excise tax allocation revenue" means the
entire amount of state excise taxes received by the state during a
calendar year period beginning with 2009 and continuing with each
measurement year thereafter.
(32) "State property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the imposition of property taxes levied by the
state for the support of common schools and for the support of state
parks under RCW 84.52.065 on the property tax allocation revenue value.
(33) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act expire July
1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2010 through 2014.

--- END ---