BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.555 and 2005 c 416 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the fees authorized in this chapter, the
department shall include a surcharge to fund biotoxin testing and
monitoring by the department of health of beaches used for recreational
shellfishing, and to fund monitoring by the Olympic region harmful
algal bloom program of the Olympic natural resources center at the
University of Washington. A surcharge of three dollars applies to
resident and nonresident shellfish and seaweed licenses as authorized
by RCW 77.32.520(3) (a) and (b); a surcharge of two dollars applies to
resident and nonresident adult combination licenses as authorized by
RCW 77.32.470(2)(a); a surcharge of two dollars applies to annual
resident and nonresident razor clam licenses as authorized by RCW
77.32.520(4); and a surcharge of one dollar applies to the three-day
razor clam license authorized by RCW 77.32.520(5). Amounts collected
from these surcharges must be deposited in the ((general fund -- local
account managed by the department of health, except that one hundred
fifty thousand dollars per year shall be deposited in the general
fund -- local account managed by the University of Washington)) biotoxin
account created in subsection (3) of this section.
((Unspent amounts from the surcharges deposited in the general
fund -- local accounts managed by the department of health and the
University of Washington shall carry over to ensuing biennia to pay for
the ongoing costs of the programs.)) (2) Any moneys from surcharges
remaining in the general fund--local account after the 2007-2009
biennium must be transferred to the biotoxin account created in
subsection (3) of this section and be credited to the appropriate
institution. The department of health and the University of Washington
shall, by December 1st of each year, provide a letter to the relevant
legislative policy and fiscal committees on the status of expenditures.
This letter shall include, but is not limited to, the annual
appropriation amount, the amount not expended, account fund balance,
and reasons for not spending the full annual appropriation.
(3) The biotoxin account is created in the state treasury to be
administered by the department of health. All moneys received under
subsection (1) of this section must be deposited in the account and
used by the department of health and the University of Washington as
required by subsection (1) of this section. Of the moneys deposited
into the account, one hundred fifty thousand dollars per year must be
made available to the University of Washington to implement subsection
(1) of this section. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---