BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.52.330 and 2003 c 111 s 1311 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated specifically for
that purpose, the secretary of state shall publish notice of the
proposed constitutional amendments and other state measures that are to
be submitted to the people at a state general election up to four times
during the four weeks immediately preceding that election in every
legal newspaper in the state. ((The secretary of state shall
supplement this publication with an equivalent amount of radio and
television advertisements.))

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.52.340 and 2003 c 111 s 1312 are each amended to
read as follows:
The newspaper ((and broadcast)) notice required by Article XXIII,
section 1, of the state Constitution ((and RCW 29A.52.330)) may set
forth all or some of the following information:
(1) A legal identification of the state measure to be voted upon.
(2) The official ballot title of such state measure.
(3) A brief statement explaining the constitutional provision ((or
state law)) as it presently exists.
(4) A brief statement explaining the effect of the state measure
should it be approved.
(5) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
both the state senate and house of representatives.
No individual candidate or incumbent public official may be
referred to or identified in these notices or advertisements.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.78.030 and 1994 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The public printer shall print and bind the session laws, the
journals of the two houses of the legislature, all bills, resolutions,
documents, and other printing and binding of either the senate or
house, as the same may be ordered by the legislature; and such forms,
blanks, record books, and printing and binding of every description as
may be ordered by all state officers, boards, commissions, and
institutions, and the supreme court, and the court of appeals and
officers thereof, as the same may be ordered on requisition, from time
to time, by the proper authorities. This section shall not apply to
the printing of the supreme court and the court of appeals reports, to
the printing of bond certificates or bond offering disclosure
documents, to the printing of educational publications of the state
historical societies, to voters' pamphlets printed by the secretary of
state, or to any printing done or contracted for by institutions of
higher education: PROVIDED, That institutions of higher education, in
consultation with the public printer, develop vendor selection
procedures comparable to those used by the public printer for
contracted printing jobs. Where any institution or institution of
higher learning of the state is or may become equipped with facilities
for doing such work, it may do any printing: (1) For itself, or (2)
for any other state institution when such printing is done as part of
a course of study relative to the profession of printer. Any printing
and binding of whatever description as may be needed by any institution
or agency of the state department of social and health services not at
Olympia, or the supreme court or the court of appeals or any officer
thereof, the estimated cost of which shall not exceed one thousand
dollars, may be done by any private printing company in the general
vicinity within the state of Washington so ordering, if in the judgment
of the officer of the agency so ordering, the saving in time and
processing justifies the award to such local private printing concern.
Beginning on July 1, 1989, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar limit specified in this section shall be
adjusted as follows: The office of financial management shall
calculate such limit by adjusting the previous biennium's limit by an
appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the rate of inflation
for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to the
nearest fifty dollars.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.32.031 and 2008 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No.
960) are each amended to read as follows:
The voters' pamphlet published or distributed under RCW 29A.32.010
must contain:
(1) Information about each measure for an advisory vote of the
people and each ballot measure initiated by or referred to the voters
for their approval or rejection as required by RCW 29A.32.070;
(2) In even-numbered years, statements, if submitted, ((advocating
the candidacies of nominees)) from candidates for the office of
president and vice president of the United States, United States
senator, United States representative, governor, lieutenant governor,
secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, superintendent of public instruction,
insurance commissioner, state senator, state representative, justice of
the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, or judge of the
superior court. Candidates may also submit ((a)) campaign ((mailing
address and telephone number)) contact information and a photograph not
more than five years old ((and of a size and quality)) in a format that
the secretary of state determines to be suitable for reproduction in
the voters' pamphlet;
(3) In odd-numbered years, if any office voted upon statewide
appears on the ballot due to a vacancy, then statements and photographs
for candidates for any vacant office listed in subsection (2) of this
section must appear;
(4) ((In even-numbered years, a section explaining how voters may
participate in the election campaign process; the address and telephone
number of)) Contact information for the public disclosure commission
established under RCW 42.17.350; ((and a summary of the disclosure
requirements that apply when contributions are made to candidates and
political committees;
(5) In even-numbered years the name, address, and telephone number
of each political party with nominees listed in the pamphlet, if filed
with the secretary of state by the state committee of a major political
party or the presiding officer of the convention of a minor political
party;
(6) In each odd-numbered year immediately before a year in which a
president of the United States is to be nominated and elected,
information explaining the precinct caucus and convention process used
by each major political party to elect delegates to its national
presidential candidate nominating convention. The pamphlet must also
provide a description of the statutory procedures by which minor
political parties are formed and the statutory methods used by the
parties to nominate candidates for president;
(7) An application form for an absentee ballot;
(8))) (5) Contact information for major political parties;
(6) A brief statement explaining the deletion and addition of
language for proposed measures under RCW 29A.32.080; and
(((9))) (7) Any additional information pertaining to elections as
may be required by law or in the judgment of the secretary of state is
deemed informative to the voters.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.32.040 and 2003 c 111 s 804 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Explanatory statements prepared by the attorney general under
RCW 29A.32.070 (3) and (4) must be written in clear and concise
language, avoiding legal and technical terms when possible, and filed
with the secretary of state no later than the tenth day of August.
(2) When the explanatory statement for a measure initiated by
petition is filed with the secretary of state, the secretary of state
shall immediately provide the text of the explanatory statement to the
person proposing the measure and any others who have made written
request for notification of the exact language of the explanatory
statement. When the explanatory statement for a measure referred to
the ballot by the legislature is filed with the secretary of state, the
secretary of state shall immediately provide the text of the
explanatory statement to the presiding officer of the senate and the
presiding officer of the house of representatives and any others who
have made written request for notification of the exact language of the
explanatory statement.
(3) A person dissatisfied with the explanatory statement may appeal
to the superior court of Thurston County within five days of the filing
date. A copy of the petition and a notice of the appeal must be served
on the secretary of state and the attorney general. The court shall
examine the measure, the explanatory statement, and objections, and may
hear arguments. The court shall render its decision and certify to and
file with the secretary of state an explanatory statement it determines
will meet the requirements of this chapter.
The decision of the superior court is final, and its explanatory
statement is the established explanatory statement. The appeal must be
heard without costs to either party.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.32.050 and 2003 c 111 s 805 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall, by the ((first)) tenth day of ((July))
August preceding each general election, prepare the explanatory
statements required ((in)) under RCW ((29A.52.340)) 29A.32.070 (3) and
(4). Such statements shall be prepared in clear and concise language
and shall avoid the use of legal and other technical terms insofar as
possible. Any person dissatisfied with the explanatory statement so
prepared may at any time within ten days from the filing thereof in the
office of the secretary of state appeal to the superior court of
Thurston county by petition setting forth the proposed state measure,
the explanatory statement prepared by the attorney general, and his or
her objection thereto and praying for the amendment thereof. A copy of
the petition and a notice of such appeal shall be served on the
secretary of state and the attorney general. The court shall, upon
filing of the petition, examine the proposed state measure, the
explanatory statement, and the objections thereto and may hear argument
thereon and shall, as soon as possible, render its decision and certify
to and file with the secretary of state such explanatory statement as
it determines will meet the requirement of RCW 29A.52.330, 29A.52.340,
and this section. The decision of the superior court shall be final
and its explanatory statement shall be the established explanatory
statement. Such appeal shall be heard without costs to either party.

Sec. 7 RCW 29A.32.070 and 2008 c 1 s 13 (Initiative Measure No.
960, approved November 6, 2007) are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall determine the format and layout of the
voters' pamphlet published under RCW 29A.32.010. The secretary of
state shall print the pamphlet in clear, readable type on a size,
quality, and weight of paper that in the judgment of the secretary of
state best serves the voters. The pamphlet must contain a table of
contents. ((Federal and state offices must appear in the pamphlet in
the same sequence as they appear on the ballot.)) Measures and
arguments must be printed in the order specified by RCW 29A.72.290.
The voters' pamphlet must provide the following information for
each statewide issue on the ballot except measures for an advisory vote
of the people whose requirements are provided in subsection (11) of
this section:
(1) The legal identification of the measure by serial designation
or number;
(2) The official ballot title of the measure;
(3) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the law
as it presently exists;
(4) A statement prepared by the attorney general explaining the
effect of the proposed measure if it becomes law;
(5) The fiscal impact statement prepared under RCW ((29.79.075))
29A.72.025;
(6) The total number of votes cast for and against the measure in
the senate and house of representatives, if the measure has been passed
by the legislature;
(7) An argument advocating the voters' approval of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(8) An argument advocating the voters' rejection of the measure
together with any statement in rebuttal of the opposing argument;
(9) Each argument or rebuttal statement must be followed by the
names of the committee members who submitted them, and may be followed
by a telephone number that citizens may call to obtain information on
the ballot measure;
(10) The full text of the measure;
(11) Two pages shall be provided in the general election voters'
pamphlet for each measure for an advisory vote of the people under RCW
43.135.041 and shall consist of the serial number assigned by the
secretary of state under RCW 29A.72.040, the short description
formulated by the attorney general under RCW 29A.72.283, the tax
increase's most up-to-date ten-year cost projection, including a
year-by-year breakdown, by the office of financial management under RCW
43.135.031, and the names of the legislators, and their contact
information, and how they voted on the increase upon final passage so
they can provide information to, and answer questions from, the public.
For the purposes of this subsection, "names of legislators, and their
contact information" includes each legislator's position (senator or
representative), first name, last name, party affiliation (for example,
Democrat or Republican), city or town they live in, office phone
number, and office e-mail address.

Sec. 8 RCW 29A.40.061 and 2004 c 271 s 134 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the
primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been
requested if the information contained in a request for an absentee
ballot or ongoing absentee status received by the county auditor is
complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote under
federal or state law. Otherwise, the county auditor shall notify the
applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be accepted.
Whenever two or more candidates have filed for the position of precinct
committee officer for the same party in the same precinct, the contest
for that position must be presented to absentee voters from that
precinct by either including the contest on the regular absentee ballot
or a separate absentee ballot. The ballot must provide space
designated for writing in the name of additional candidates.
(2) A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot if the
ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. The
voter may obtain the ballot by telephone request, by mail,
electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep a record
of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.
(3) ((A copy of the state voters' pamphlet must be sent to
registered voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters along with the absentee ballot if
such a pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election and is
available to the county auditor at the time of mailing.)) The county
auditor shall mail all absentee ballots and related material to voters
outside the territorial limits of the United States and the District of
Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406. If candidate and ballot measure
information is available on the web site of the county auditor or
secretary of state, the county auditor shall provide the appropriate
web site information with the ballot materials.

Sec. 9 RCW 29A.72.025 and 2004 c 266 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the
secretary of state, the attorney general, and any other appropriate
state or local agency, shall prepare a fiscal impact statement for each
of the following state ballot measures: (1) An initiative to the
people that is certified to the ballot; (2) an initiative to the
legislature that will appear on the ballot; (3) an alternative measure
appearing on the ballot that the legislature proposes to an initiative
to the legislature; (4) a referendum bill referred to voters by the
legislature; and (5) a referendum measure appearing on the ballot.
Fiscal impact statements must be written in clear and concise language
((and)), avoid legal and technical terms when possible, and be filed
with the secretary of state no later than the tenth day of August.
Fiscal impact statements may include easily understood graphics.
A fiscal impact statement must describe any projected increase or
decrease in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the
state or local governments will experience if the ballot measure were
approved by state voters. Where appropriate, a fiscal impact statement
may include both estimated dollar amounts and a description placing the
estimated dollar amounts into context. A fiscal impact statement must
include both a summary of not to exceed one hundred words and a more
detailed statement that includes the assumptions that were made to
develop the fiscal impacts.
Fiscal impact statements must be available online from the
secretary of state's web site and included in the state voters'
pamphlet. Additional information may be posted on the web site of the
office of financial management.

Sec. 10 RCW 29A.04.530 and 2006 c 206 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state shall:
(1) Establish and operate, or provide by contract, training and
certification programs for state and county elections administration
officials and personnel, including training on election laws, the
various types of election law violations, and discrimination((, and
training programs for political party observers which conform to the
rules for such programs established under RCW 29A.04.630));
(2) Administer tests for state and county officials and personnel
who have received such training and issue certificates to those who
have successfully completed the training and passed such tests;
(3) Maintain a record of those individuals who have received such
training and certificates; and
(4) Provide the staffing and support services required by the board
created under RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 11 RCW 29A.04.540 and 2003 c 111 s 152 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person having responsibility for the administration or conduct of
elections, other than precinct election officers, shall, within
eighteen months of undertaking those responsibilities, receive general
training regarding the conduct of elections and specific training
regarding their responsibilities and duties as prescribed by this title
or by rules adopted by the secretary of state under this title.
Included among those persons for whom such training is mandatory are
the following:
(1) Secretary of state elections division personnel;
(2) County elections administrators under RCW 36.22.220; and
(3) ((County canvassing board members;
(4) Persons officially designated by each major political party as
elections observers; and
(5))) Any other person or group charged with election
administration responsibilities if the person or group is designated by
rule adopted by the secretary of state as requiring the training.
((The secretary of state shall reimburse election observers in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for travel expenses
incurred to receive training required under subsection (4) of this
section.))
Neither this section nor RCW 29A.04.530 may be construed as
requiring an elected official to receive training or a certificate of
training as a condition for seeking or holding elective office or as a
condition for carrying out constitutional duties.

Sec. 12 RCW 29A.04.570 and 2005 c 240 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The election review staff of the office of the secretary of
state shall conduct a review of election-related policies, procedures,
and practices in an affected county or counties:
(i) If the unofficial returns of a primary or general election for
a position in the state legislature indicate that a mandatory recount
is likely for that position; or
(ii) If unofficial returns indicate a mandatory recount is likely
in a statewide election or an election for federal office.
Reviews conducted under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be
performed in as many selected counties as time and staffing permit.
Reviews conducted as a result of mandatory recounts shall be performed
between the time the unofficial returns are complete and the time the
recount is to take place, if possible.
(b) In addition to conducting reviews under (a) of this subsection,
the election review staff shall also conduct such a review in a county
at least once ((in each three-year period)) every five years, in
conjunction with a county primary or special or general election, at
the direction of the secretary of state or at the request of the county
auditor. If staffing or budget levels do not permit a ((three)) five-
year election cycle for reviews, then reviews must be done as often as
possible. If any resident of this state believes that an aspect of a
primary or election has been conducted inappropriately in a county, the
resident may file a complaint with the secretary of state. The
secretary shall consider such complaints in scheduling periodic reviews
under this section.
(c) Before an election review is conducted in a county, the
secretary of state shall provide the county auditor of the affected
county and the chair of the state central committee of each major
political party with notice that the review is to be conducted. When
a periodic review is to be conducted in a county at the direction of
the secretary of state under (b) of this subsection, the secretary
shall provide the affected county auditor not less than thirty days'
notice.
(2) Reviews shall be conducted in conformance with rules adopted
under RCW 29A.04.630. In performing a review in a county under this
chapter, the election review staff shall evaluate the policies and
procedures established for conducting the primary or election in the
county and the practices of those conducting it. As part of the
review, the election review staff shall issue to the county auditor and
the members of the county canvassing board a report of its findings and
recommendations regarding such policies, procedures, and practices. A
review conducted under this chapter shall not include any evaluation,
finding, or recommendation regarding the validity of the outcome of a
primary or election or the validity of any canvass of returns nor does
the election review staff have any jurisdiction to make such an
evaluation, finding, or recommendation under this title.
(3) The county auditor or the county canvassing board shall respond
to the review report in writing, listing the steps that will be taken
to correct any problems listed in the report. Within one year of
issuance of the response provided by the county auditor or county
canvassing board, the secretary of state shall ((visit the county
before the next state primary or general election to)) verify that the
county has taken the steps ((they listed)) to correct the problems
noted in the report.
(4) The county auditor of the county in which a review is conducted
under this section or a member of the canvassing board of the county
may appeal the findings or recommendations of the election review staff
regarding the review by filing an appeal with the board created under
RCW 29A.04.510.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.07.310 and 2003 c 111 s 2303 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of state, through the division of elections, is
responsible for the following duties, as prescribed by Title 29A RCW:
(1) The filing, verification of signatures, and certification of
state initiative, referendum, and recall petitions;
(2) The production and distribution of a state voters' pamphlet;
(3) The examination, testing, and certification of voting
equipment, voting devices, and vote-tallying systems;
(4) The administration, canvassing, and certification of the
presidential primary, state primaries, and state general elections;
(5) The administration of motor voter and other voter registration
and voter outreach programs;
(6) The training, testing, and certification of state and local
elections personnel as established in RCW 29A.04.530;
(7) ((The training of state and local party observers required by
RCW 29A.04.540;
(8))) The conduct of ((postelection)) reviews as established in RCW
29A.04.570; and
(((9))) (8) Other duties that may be prescribed by the legislature.

Sec. 14 RCW 29A.40.150 and 2006 c 206 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and
instructions for overseas voters and service voters.)) The information
on the envelopes or instructions for overseas voters and service voters
must explain that:
(1) Return postage is free if the ballot is mailed through the
United States postal service, United States armed forces postal
service, or the postal service of a United States foreign embassy;
(2) The date of the signature is considered the date of mailing;
(3) The envelope must be signed by election day;
(4) The signed declaration on the envelope is the equivalent of
voter registration;
(5) A voter may fax a voted ballot and the accompanying envelope if
the voter agrees to waive secrecy. The ballot will be counted if the
original documents are received before certification of the election;
and
(6) A voter may obtain a ballot via electronic mail, which the
voter may print out, vote, and return by mail. In order to facilitate
the electronic acquisition of ballots by overseas and service voters,
the ballot instructions shall include the web site of the office of the
secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 29A.04.236 (Manual of election laws and rules) and 2005 c
244 s 1; and
(2) RCW 29A.04.245 (Voter guide) and 2003 c 111 s 140 & 2001 c 41
s 4.

--- END ---