BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.362.005 and 2007 c 482 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that current concern over the rapid and
increasing loss of rural, agricultural, and forested land has led to
the exploration of creative approaches to preserving these important
lands. The legislature finds also that the creation of a regional
transfer of development rights marketplace will assist in slowing the
conversion of these lands.
The legislature further finds that transferring development rights
is a market-based technique that encourages the voluntary transfer of
growth from places where a community would like to see less
development, referred to as sending areas, to places where a community
would like to see more development, referred to as receiving areas.
Under this technique, permanent deed restrictions are placed on the
sending area properties to ensure that the land will be used only for
approved activities such as farming, forest management, conservation,
or passive recreation. Also under this technique, the costs of
purchasing the recorded development restrictions are borne by the
developers who receive the building credit or bonus.
The legislature further finds that a successful transfer of
development rights program must consider housing affordable to all
economic segments of the population in designated sending areas.
Manufactured/mobile home parks have a long history as areas that
provide housing opportunities for all economic segments of the
population. Their numbers are shrinking due to development pressures
that threaten to eliminate this housing option. The inclusion of
manufactured/mobile home parks in the regional transfer of development
rights program will assist in slowing the conversion of these areas.
Accordingly, the legislature has determined that it is good public
policy to build upon existing transfer of development rights programs,
pilot projects, and private initiatives that foster effective use of
transferred development rights through the creation of a market-based
program that focuses on the central Puget Sound region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.362 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties shall use as a criteria to guide the designation of
sending areas for participation in the regional transfer of development
rights program that the land is in current use as a manufactured/mobile
home park as defined in chapter 59.20 RCW.

--- END ---