BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the siting of
secure residential facilities for sexually violent predators in
residential neighborhoods presents unacceptable dangers and stresses to
families. Further, the siting of these facilities disproportionately
frightens the children and parents of residential neighborhoods. The
legislature also finds that the goals of the growth management act to
preserve and protect the rural character of our agricultural lands need
reinforcement to preserve farming and that secure residential
facilities for sexually violent predators threaten its efforts to
preserve agriculture. The legislature intends to protect families from
disproportionate fear and stress and the goals of the growth management
act by limiting the siting of secure residential facilities for
sexually violent predators to sites previously zoned for industrial
use.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.260 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 206 are each
amended to read as follows:
The provisions of chapter 12, Laws of 2001 2nd sp. sess. shall
((not)) be construed to limit siting of secure community transition
facilities to ((residential neighborhoods)) properties zoned for
industrial use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---