BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.08.050 and 2000 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any promoter shall within seven days prior to the holding of
any event file with the department a statement setting forth the name
of each licensee who is a potential participant, his or her manager or
managers, and such other information as the department may require.
Participant changes regarding a wrestling event may be allowed after
notice to the department, if the new participant holds a valid license
under this chapter. The department may stop any wrestling event in
which a participant is not licensed under this chapter.
(2) Upon the termination of any event the promoter shall file with
the designated department representative a written report, duly
verified as the department may require showing the number of tickets
sold for the event, the price charged for the tickets and the gross
proceeds thereof, and such other and further information as the
department may require. The promoter shall pay to the department at
the time of filing the report under this section ((a tax equal to five
percent of such gross receipts)) an event fee to be determined by the
director pursuant to RCW 67.08.105. However, the ((tax)) event fee may
not be less than twenty-five dollars. The ((five percent of such gross
receipts shall be immediately)) event fee and license fees collected
under this chapter shall be paid by the department into the ((state
general fund)) business and professions account under RCW 43.24.150.
(3) A complimentary ticket may not have a face value of less than
the least expensive ticket available for sale to the general public.
The number of untaxed complimentary tickets shall be limited to ten
percent of the total tickets sold per event location, not to exceed one
thousand tickets. All complimentary tickets exceeding this exemption
shall be subject to taxation.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.08.055 and 1993 c 278 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every licensee who charges and receives an admission fee for
exhibiting a simultaneous telecast of any live, current, or spontaneous
boxing or sparring match, or wrestling exhibition or show on a closed
circuit telecast viewed within this state shall, within seventy-two
hours after such event, furnish to the department a verified written
report on a form which is supplied by the department showing the number
of tickets issued or sold, and the gross receipts therefor without any
deductions whatsoever. Such licensee shall also, at the same time, pay
to the department ((a tax equal to five percent of such gross receipts
paid for admission to the showing of the contest, match or exhibition))
an event fee to be determined by the director pursuant to RCW
67.08.105. In no event, however, shall the ((tax)) event fee be less
than twenty-five dollars. ((The tax shall apply uniformly at the same
rate to all persons subject to the tax. Such receipts)) The event fee
shall be immediately paid by the department into the ((general fund of
the state)) business and professions account under RCW 43.24.150.

Sec. 3 RCW 67.08.105 and 1999 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall set license ((and)), renewal, and event fees
by rule((, but the fees collected do not have to offset the cost of the
program as required under RCW 43.24.086)) in amounts that, pursuant to
the fee policy established in RCW 43.24.086, when combined with all
license and fee revenue under this chapter, are sufficient to defray
the costs of the department in administering this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.24.150 and 2008 c 119 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The business and professions account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from business or professional licenses,
registrations, certifications, renewals, examinations, or civil
penalties assessed and collected by the department from the following
chapters must be deposited into the account:
(a) Chapter 18.11 RCW, auctioneers;
(b) Chapter 18.16 RCW, cosmetologists, barbers, and manicurists;
(c) Chapter 18.96 RCW, landscape architects;
(d) Chapter 18.145 RCW, court reporters;
(e) Chapter 18.165 RCW, private investigators;
(f) Chapter 18.170 RCW, security guards;
(g) Chapter 18.185 RCW, bail bond agents;
(h) Chapter 18.280 RCW, home inspectors;
(i) Chapter 19.16 RCW, collection agencies;
(j) Chapter 19.31 RCW, employment agencies;
(k) Chapter 19.105 RCW, camping resorts;
(l) Chapter 19.138 RCW, sellers of travel;
(m) Chapter 42.44 RCW, notaries public; ((and))
(n) Chapter 64.36 RCW, timeshares; and
(o) Chapter 67.08 RCW, boxing, martial arts, and wrestling.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses incurred in
carrying out these business and professions licensing activities of the
department. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall
not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.
(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on
the anticipated costs of administering the business and professions
licensing activities listed in subsection (1) of this section, which
shall include the estimated income from these business and professions
fees.

--- END ---