BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2008 c 329 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION. (1) Appropriations
made in this act to the office of superintendent of public instruction
shall initially be allotted as required by this act. Subsequent
allotment modifications shall not include transfers of moneys between
sections of this act, except as expressly provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(2) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, ((2008)) 2009,
unless specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the
director of financial management, the superintendent of public
instruction may transfer state general fund and student achievement
fund appropriations for fiscal year ((2008)) 2009 among the following
programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a specified formula in
another of these programs: General apportionment; employee
compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special education
programs; institutional education programs; transitional bilingual
programs; student achievement; and learning assistance programs.
(3) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 1
--- END ---