BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2009 c . . . s 2 (SHB 1776) are each
amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (5) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through 2014, in
addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a) through
(c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include the
following:
(a) The difference between the allocation the district would have
received in the current school year using the Initiative 728 base and
the allocation the district received in the current school year
pursuant to RCW 84.52.068; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year using the Initiative 732 base and the
allocations the district actually received the prior school year
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
(5) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two
percent in 1998 and twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year
thereafter, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section; plus,
for qualifying districts, the grandfathered percentage determined as
follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (7) of this section that are
to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(6) The maximum levy percentages provided in subsection (5) of this
section shall be increased by four percentage points not to exceed a
maximum levy percentage of thirty-five percent for levies approved by
voters ((in 2009 after the effective date of this section)) through
December 31, 2011.
(7) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from
the prior school year for programs included under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to enrollment
changes, compensation increases, or inflationary adjustments; and (b)
that are or were specifically identified as levy reduction funds in the
appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are dependent on formula
factors which would not be finalized until after the start of the
current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school
year data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds
shall not include moneys received by school districts from cities or
counties.
(8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(b) "Current school year" means the year immediately following the
prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 base" means the allocation to the student
achievement fund for the prior year that would have been made under
chapter 3, Laws of 2001, as approved by the voters, if all annual
adjustments to the initial 2001 allocation had been made in previous
years and in each subsequent year as provided for under chapter 3, Laws
of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's annual salary
cost-of-living increases as they would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, as approved by the voters, if each annual
cost-of-living increase had been made in previous years and in each
subsequent year as provided for under chapter 4, Laws of 2001.
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies
shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules
and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
(11) For calendar year 2009, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall recalculate school district levy authority to
reflect levy rates certified by school districts for calendar year
2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (SHB
1776) and section 1 of this act expire January 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---