BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
Minimum Nexus Standards
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that out-of-state businesses that do not have a physical presence in Washington
earn significant income from Washington residents from providing
services or collecting royalties on the use of intangible property in
this state. The legislature further finds that these businesses
receive significant benefits and opportunities provided by the state,
such as: Laws providing protection of business interests or regulating
consumer credit; access to courts and judicial process to enforce
business rights, including debt collection and intellectual property
rights; an orderly and regulated marketplace; and police and fire
protection and a transportation system benefiting in-state agents and
other representatives of out-of-state businesses. Therefore, the
legislature intends to extend the state's business and occupation tax
to these companies to ensure that they pay their fair share of the cost
of services that this state renders and the infrastructure it provides.
(2)(a) The legislature also finds that the current cost
apportionment method in RCW 82.04.460(1) for apportioning most service
income has been difficult for both taxpayers and the department to
apply due in large part (i) to the difficulty in assigning certain
costs of doing business inside or outside of this state, and (ii) to
its dissimilarity with the apportionment methods used in other states
for their business activity taxes.
(b) The legislature further finds that there is a trend among
states to adopt a single factor apportionment formula based on sales.
The legislature recognizes that adoption of a sales factor only
apportionment method has the advantages of simplifying apportionment
and making Washington a more attractive place for businesses to expand
their property and payroll. For these reasons, the legislature adopts
single factor sales apportionment for purposes of apportioning royalty
income and certain service income.
(c) Nothing in this act may be construed, however, to authorize
apportionment of the gross income or value of products taxable under
the following business and occupation tax classifications: Retailing,
wholesaling, manufacturing, processing for hire, extracting, extracting
for hire, printing, government contracting, public road construction,
the classifications in RCW 82.04.280 (2), (4), (6), and (7), and any
other activity not specifically included in the definition of
apportionable activities in RCW 82.04.460.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.220 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.220 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((shall be)) collected from every person
that has a substantial nexus with this state a tax for the act or
privilege of engaging in business activities. ((Such)) The tax ((shall
be)) is measured by the application of rates against value of products,
gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, as the case
may be.
(2) A person who has a substantial nexus with this state in any tax
year will be deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state for the
following tax year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
"Engaging within this state" and "engaging within the state," when
used in connection with any apportionable activity as defined in RCW
82.04.460, means that a person generates gross income of the business
from sources within this state, such as customers or intangible
property located in this state, regardless of whether the person is
physically present in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A person engaging in business is deemed to have substantial
nexus with this state if the person is:
(a) An individual and is a resident or domiciliary of this state;
(b) A business entity and is organized or commercially domiciled in
this state; or
(c) A nonresident individual or a business entity that is organized
or commercially domiciled outside this state, and in any tax year the
person has:
(i) More than fifty thousand dollars of property in this state;
(ii) More than fifty thousand dollars of payroll in this state;
(iii) More than two hundred fifty thousand dollars of receipts from
this state; or
(iv) At least twenty-five percent of the person's total property,
total payroll, or total receipts in this state.
(2)(a) Property counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section is the average value of the
taxpayer's property, including intangible property, owned or rented and
used in this state during the tax year.
(b)(i) Property owned by the taxpayer, other than loans and credit
card receivables owned by the taxpayer, is valued at its original cost
basis. Loans and credit card receivables owned by the taxpayer are
valued at their outstanding principal balance, without regard to any
reserve for bad debts. However, if a loan or credit card receivable is
charged off in whole or in part for federal income tax purposes, the
portion of the loan or credit card receivable charged off is deducted
from the outstanding principal balance.
(ii) Property rented by the taxpayer is valued at eight times the
net annual rental rate. For purposes of this subsection, "net annual
rental rate" means the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less any
annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals.
(c) The average value of property must be determined by averaging
the values at the beginning and ending of the tax year; but the
department may require the averaging of monthly values during the tax
year if reasonably required to properly reflect the average value of
the taxpayer's property.
(d)(i) For purposes of this subsection (2), loans and credit card
receivables are deemed owned and used in this state as follows:
(A) Loans secured by real property, personal property, or both real
and personal property, are deemed owned and used in the state if the
real property or personal property securing the loan is located within
this state. If the property securing the loan is located both within
this state and one or more other states, the loan is deemed owned and
used in this state if more than fifty percent of the fair market value
of the real or personal property is located within this state. If more
than fifty percent of the fair market value of the real or personal
property is not located within any one state, then the loan is deemed
owned and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state.
The determination of whether the real or personal property securing a
loan is located within this state must be made, as of the time the
original agreement was made, and any and all subsequent substitutions
of collateral must be disregarded.
(B) Loans not secured by real or personal property are deemed owned
and used in this state if the borrower is located in this state.
(C) Credit card receivables are deemed owned and used in this state
if the billing address of the cardholder is in this state.
(ii)(A) Except as otherwise provided in (d)(ii)(B) of this
subsection (2), the definitions in the multistate tax commission's
recommended formula for the apportionment and allocation of net income
of financial institutions as existing on the effective date of this
section or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by
rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, apply to this
section.
(B) "Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose
of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.
(e) Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this
subsection, property counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(i) and (iv) of this section does not include a person's
ownership of, or rights in, computer software as defined in RCW
82.04.215, including computer software used in providing a digital
automated service; master copies of software; and digital goods and
digital codes residing on servers located in this state.
(3)(a) Payroll counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(ii) and (iv) of this section is the total amount paid by the
taxpayer for compensation in this state during the tax year plus
nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties in this
state. Nonemployee compensation paid to representative third parties
includes the gross amount paid to nonemployees who represent the
taxpayer in interactions with the taxpayer's clients and includes sales
commissions.
(b) Employee compensation is paid in this state if the compensation
is properly reportable to this state for unemployment compensation tax
purposes, regardless of whether the compensation was actually reported
to this state.
(c) Nonemployee compensation is paid in this state if the service
performed by the representative third party occurs entirely or
primarily within this state.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "compensation" means wages,
salaries, commissions, and any other form of remuneration paid to
employees or nonemployees and defined as gross income under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 61 of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as existing on
the effective date of this section.
(4) Receipts counting toward the thresholds in subsection
(1)(c)(iii) and (iv) of this section are those amounts included in the
numerator of the receipts factor under section 105 of this act and, for
financial institutions, those amounts included in the numerator of the
receipts factor under the rule adopted by the department as authorized
in RCW 82.04.460(2).
(5)(a) Each December, the department must review the cumulative
percentage change in the consumer price index. The department must
adjust the thresholds in subsection (1)(c)(i) through (iii) of this
section if the consumer price index has changed by five percent or more
since the later of the effective date of this section, or the date that
the thresholds were last adjusted under this subsection. For purposes
of determining the cumulative percentage change in the consumer price
index, the department must compare the consumer price index available
as of December 1st of the current year with the consumer price index as
of the later of the effective date of this section, or the date that
the thresholds were last adjusted under this subsection. The
thresholds must be adjusted to reflect that cumulative percentage
change in the consumer price index. The adjusted thresholds must be
rounded to the nearest one thousand dollars. Any adjustment will apply
to tax periods that begin after the adjustment is made.
(b) As used in this subsection, "consumer price index" means the
consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) available from the
bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.
(6) Subsections (1) through (5) of this section only apply with
respect to the taxes imposed under this chapter on apportionable
activities as defined in RCW 82.04.460. For purposes of the taxes
imposed under this chapter on any activity not included in the
definition of apportionable activities in RCW 82.04.460, a person is
deemed to have a substantial nexus with this state if the person has a
physical presence in this state, which need only be demonstrably more
than a slightest presence. For purposes of this subsection, a person
is physically present in this state if the person has property or
employees in this state. A person is also physically present in this
state if the person, either directly or through an agent or other
representative, engages in activities in this state that are
significantly associated with the person's ability to establish or
maintain a market for its products in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The apportionable income of a person within the scope of RCW
82.04.460(1) is apportioned to Washington by multiplying its
apportionable income by the receipts factor. Persons who are subject
to tax under more than one of the tax classifications enumerated in RCW
82.04.460(4)(a) (i) through (ix) must calculate a separate receipts
factor for each tax classification that the person is taxable under.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the receipts
factor is a fraction and is calculated as provided in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section and, for financial institutions, as provided in
the rule adopted by the department under the authority of RCW
82.04.460(2).
(3)(a) The numerator of the receipts factor is the total gross
income of the business of the taxpayer attributable to this state
during the tax year from engaging in an apportionable activity. The
denominator of the receipts factor is the total gross income of the
business of the taxpayer from engaging in an apportionable activity
everywhere in the world during the tax year.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for purposes of
computing the receipts factor, gross income of the business generated
from each apportionable activity is attributable to the state:
(i) Where the customer received the benefit of the taxpayer's
service or, in the case of gross income from royalties, where the
customer used the taxpayer's intangible property.
(ii) If the customer received the benefit of the service or used
the intangible property in more than one state, gross income of the
business must be attributed to the state in which the benefit of the
service was primarily received or in which the intangible property was
primarily used.
(iii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection (3),
gross income of the business must be attributed to the state from which
the customer ordered the service or, in the case of royalties, the
office of the customer from which the royalty agreement with the
taxpayer was negotiated.
(iv) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state to which the billing statements or invoices are sent to the
customer by the taxpayer.
(v) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this
subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to the
state from which the customer sends payment to the taxpayer.
(vi) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of
this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be attributed to
the state where the customer is located as indicated by the customer's
address: (A) Shown in the taxpayer's business records maintained in
the regular course of business; or (B) obtained during consummation of
the sale or the negotiation of the contract for services or for the use
of the taxpayer's intangible property, including any address of a
customer's payment instrument when readily available to the taxpayer
and no other address is available.
(vii) If the taxpayer is unable to attribute gross income of the
business under the provisions of (b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), or
(vi) of this subsection (3), gross income of the business must be
attributed to the commercial domicile of the taxpayer.
(viii) For purposes of this subsection (3)(b), "customer" means a
person or entity to whom the taxpayer makes a sale or renders services
or from whom the taxpayer otherwise receives gross income of the
business. "Customer" includes anyone who pays royalties or charges in
the nature of royalties for the use of the taxpayer's intangible
property.
(c) Gross income of the business from engaging in an apportionable
activity must be excluded from the denominator of the receipts factor
if, in respect to such activity, at least some of the activity is
performed in this state, and the gross income is attributable under (b)
of this subsection (3) to a state in which the taxpayer is not taxable.
For purposes of this subsection (3)(c), "not taxable" means that the
taxpayer is not subject to a business activities tax by that state,
except that a taxpayer is taxable in a state in which it would be
deemed to have a substantial nexus with that state under the standards
in section 104(1) of this act regardless of whether that state imposes
such a tax. "Business activities tax" means a tax measured by the
amount of, or economic results of, business activity conducted in a
state. The term includes taxes measured in whole or in part on net
income or gross income or receipts. "Business activities tax" does not
include a sales tax, use tax, or a similar transaction tax, imposed on
the sale or acquisition of goods or services, whether or not
denominated a gross receipts tax or a tax imposed on the privilege of
doing business.
(d) This subsection (3) does not apply to financial institutions
with respect to apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290.
Financial institutions must calculate the receipts factor as provided
in subsection (4) of this section and the rule adopted by the
department under the authority of RCW 82.04.460(2) with respect to
apportionable income taxable under RCW 82.04.290. Financial
institutions that are subject to tax under any other tax classification
enumerated in RCW 82.04.460(4)(a) (i) through (v) and (vii) through
(ix) must calculate a separate receipts factor, as provided in this
section, for each of the other tax classifications that the financial
institution is taxable under.
(4) A taxpayer may calculate the receipts factor for the current
tax year based on the most recent calendar year for which information
is available for the full calendar year. If a taxpayer does not
calculate the receipts factor for the current tax year based on
previous calendar year information as authorized in this subsection,
the business must use current year information to calculate the
receipts factor for the current tax year. In either case, a taxpayer
must correct the reporting for the current tax year when complete
information is available to calculate the receipts factor for that
year, but not later than October 31st of the following tax year.
Interest will apply to any additional tax due on a corrected tax
return. Interest must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent
excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date the
original return was due, and will accrue until the additional taxes are
paid. Penalties as provided in RCW 82.32.090 will apply to any such
additional tax due only if the current tax year reporting is not
corrected and the additional tax is not paid by October 31st of the
following tax year. Interest as provided in RCW 82.32.060 will apply
to any tax paid in excess of that properly due on a return as a result
of a taxpayer using previous calendar year data or incomplete current-year data to calculate the receipts factor.
(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Apportionable activities" and "apportionable income" have the
same meaning as in RCW 82.04.460.
(b) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession
of the United States, or any foreign country or political subdivision
of a foreign country.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.04.2907 and 2009 c 535 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
receiving income from royalties ((or charges in the nature of royalties
for the granting of intangible rights, such as copyrights, licenses,
patents, or franchise fees)), the amount of tax with respect to
((such)) the business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income from
royalties ((or charges in the nature of royalties from the business))
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "gross income from royalties"
means compensation for the use of intangible property, ((such as))
including charges in the nature of royalties, regardless of where the
intangible property will be used. For purposes of this subsection,
"intangible property" includes copyrights, patents, licenses,
franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. ((It)) "Gross
income from royalties" does not include compensation for any natural
resource, the licensing of prewritten computer software to the end
user, or the licensing ((or use)) of digital goods, digital codes, or
digital automated services to the end user as defined in RCW
82.04.190(11).

Sec. 107 RCW 82.04.460 and 2004 c 174 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
((rendering services)) earning apportionable income taxable under ((RCW
82.04.290 or 82.04.2908)) this chapter and ((maintaining places of
business both within and without this state which contribute to the
rendition of such services shall)) also taxable in another state, must,
for the purpose of computing tax liability under ((RCW 82.04.290 or
82.04.2908)) this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance with
section 105 of this act, that portion of the person's ((gross))
apportionable income ((which is)) derived from ((services rendered))
business activities performed within this state. ((Where such
apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods,
the taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion of the
taxpayer's total income which the cost of doing business within the
state bears to the total cost of doing business both within and without
the state.))
(2) ((Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this
section, persons doing business both within and without the state who
receive gross income from service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010
(relating to amounts charged for granting the right or privilege to
make deferred or installment payments) or who receive gross income from
engaging in business as financial institutions within the scope of
chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial institutions)
shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW 82.04.290 to
this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department consistent
with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.)) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning
the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such
apportionable income is taxable under RCW 82.04.290. The rule adopted
by the department must, to the extent feasible, be consistent with the
multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment
and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on
the effective date of this section or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this section, except that:
(a) The department's rule must provide for a single factor
apportionment method based on the receipts factor; and
(b) The definition of "financial institution" contained in appendix
A to the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the
apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions is
advisory only.
(3) The department ((shall)) may by rule provide a method or
methods of apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales
of telecommunications service and competitive telephone service((s))
taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax
under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. ((The rules shall be, so far as
feasible, consistent with the methods of apportionment contained in
this section and shall require the consideration of those facts,
circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an equitable
and constitutionally permissible division of the services.)) The rule
must provide for an equitable and constitutionally permissible division
of the tax base.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if
the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from
activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable
under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable
activities" means only those activities taxed under:
(i) RCW 82.04.255;
(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (12);
(iii) RCW 82.04.280(5);
(iv) RCW 82.04.285;
(v) RCW 82.04.286;
(vi) RCW 82.04.290;
(vii) RCW 82.04.2907;
(viii) RCW 82.04.2908; and
(ix) RCW 82.04.260(13), 82.04.263, and 82.04.280(1), but only to
the extent of any activity that would be taxable under any of the
provisions enumerated under (a)(i) through (viii) of this subsection
(4) if the tax classifications in RCW 82.04.260(13), 82.04.263, and
82.04.280(1) did not exist.
(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is
subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is
not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state
has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax
on such income under the substantial nexus standards in section 104(1)
of this act.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "business activities
tax" and "state" have the same meaning as in section 105 of this act.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.04.080 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.080 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) "Gross income of the business" means the value proceeding or
accruing by reason of the transaction of the business engaged in and
includes gross proceeds of sales, compensation for the rendition of
services, gains realized from trading in stocks, bonds, or other
evidences of indebtedness, interest, discount, rents, royalties, fees,
commissions, dividends, and other emoluments however designated, all
without any deduction on account of the cost of tangible property sold,
the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery
costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and
without any deduction on account of losses.
(2) Financial institutions must determine gains realized from
trading in stocks, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness on a net
annualized basis. For purposes of this subsection, a financial
institution means a person within the scope of the rule adopted by the
department under the authority of RCW 82.04.460(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a financial
institution from an affiliated person if the amounts are received from
transactions that are required to be at arm's length under sections 23A
or 23B of the federal reserve act as existing on the effective date of
this section or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section. For
purposes of this subsection, "financial institution" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.04.080.
(2) As used in this section, "affiliated" means under common
control. "Common control" means the possession, directly or
indirectly, of more than fifty percent of the power to direct or cause
the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether
through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by investment
conduits from cash and securities.
(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Investment conduit" means an entity formed by a financial
institution as defined in RCW 82.04.080 for the express purpose of
holding or owning cash or securities if the entity formed:
(i) Has no employees;
(ii) Has no direct profit-making motive;
(iii) Owns no tangible assets, other than cash or securities;
(iv) Holds or owns cash or securities solely as a conduit for
investors, allocating its income to holders of its ownership interests.
For the purposes of this subsection (2)(a)(iv), "ownership interest"
means interests categorized as debt or equity for purposes of federal
tax or generally accepted accounting principles; and
(v) Has, within twelve months of its organization or initial
capitalization date, issued ownership interests to other than
affiliated persons, equal to or greater than twenty-five percent of its
total issued ownership interests. For purposes of this subsection
(2)(a)(v), "affiliated" has the same meaning as in section 109 of this
act.
(b) "Securities" has the same meaning as in section 2 of the
securities act of 1933 and includes eligible assets as defined by Rule
3a-7 of the investment company act, as the law and rule existing on the
effective date of this section or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this section.

PART II
Tax Avoidance Transactions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Unless otherwise specifically provided in statute, the
department must respect the form of a transaction, except where the
form of the transaction or a related series of transactions is adopted
for the purpose of:
(i) Disguising income received, or otherwise avoiding tax on
income, from a person that is not affiliated with the taxpayer;
(ii) Disguising the purchase or sale of property or services from
or to a person that is not affiliated with the taxpayer; or
(iii) Avoiding the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 on the use of
property in this state that is owned by an entity organized outside of
Washington.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "affiliated" means under
common control. "Control" means the possession, directly or
indirectly, of more than fifty percent of the power to direct or cause
the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether
through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise.
(2)(a) The department must, as resources allow, adopt rules to
assist in determining when to disregard the form of a transaction or a
related series of transactions adopted for the purposes described in
subsection (1)(a)(i) through (iii) of this section. In adopting rules,
the department may consider the following judicial doctrines, except to
the extent such doctrines are inconsistent with express provisions
contained in Washington state statutes:
(i) The sham transaction doctrine;
(ii) The economic substance doctrine;
(iii) The business purpose doctrine;
(iv) The substance over form doctrine;
(v) The step transaction doctrine; and
(vi) The assignment of income doctrine.
(b) The adoption of a rule as required under this subsection is not
a condition precedent for the department to use the authority provided
in this section. Any rules adopted under this section must include
examples of transactions that the department will disregard for tax
purposes.
(3) The provisions of this section are cumulative and nonexclusive
and do not affect any other remedies provided to the department under
statutory or common law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department may not use section 201 of this act to
disregard any transaction, plan, or arrangement initiated before June
1, 2010, if, in respect to such transaction, plan, or arrangement, the
taxpayer had reported its tax liability in conformance with either
specific written instructions provided by the department to the
taxpayer, a determination published under the authority of RCW
82.32.410, or other document published by the department.
(b) This section does not apply if the transaction, plan, or
arrangement engaged in by the taxpayer differs materially from the
transaction, plan, or arrangement that was addressed in the specific
written instructions, published determination, or other published
document.
(2) For purposes of this section, "specific written instructions"
means tax reporting instructions provided to a taxpayer and which
specifically identifies the taxpayer to whom the instructions apply.
Specific written instructions may be provided as part of an audit, tax
assessment, determination, closing agreement, or in response to a
binding ruling request.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.32.090 and 2006 c 256 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If payment of any tax due on a return to be filed by a taxpayer
is not received by the department of revenue by the due date, there
((shall be)) is assessed a penalty of five percent of the amount of the
tax; and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of the
month following the due date, there ((shall be)) is assessed a total
penalty of fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this
subsection; and if the tax is not received on or before the last day of
the second month following the due date, there ((shall be)) is assessed
a total penalty of twenty-five percent of the amount of the tax under
this subsection. No penalty so added shall be less than five dollars.
(2) If the department of revenue determines that any tax has been
substantially underpaid, there ((shall be)) is assessed a penalty of
five percent of the amount of the tax determined by the department to
be due. If payment of any tax determined by the department to be due
is not received by the department by the due date specified in the
notice, or any extension thereof, there ((shall be)) is assessed a
total penalty of fifteen percent of the amount of the tax under this
subsection; and if payment of any tax determined by the department to
be due is not received on or before the thirtieth day following the due
date specified in the notice of tax due, or any extension thereof,
there ((shall be)) is assessed a total penalty of twenty-five percent
of the amount of the tax under this subsection. No penalty so added
((shall)) may be less than five dollars. As used in this section,
"substantially underpaid" means that the taxpayer has paid less than
eighty percent of the amount of tax determined by the department to be
due for all of the types of taxes included in, and for the entire
period of time covered by, the department's examination, and the amount
of underpayment is at least one thousand dollars.
(3) If a warrant ((be)) is issued by the department ((of revenue))
for the collection of taxes, increases, and penalties, there ((shall
be)) is added thereto a penalty of ten percent of the amount of the
tax, but not less than ten dollars.
(4) If the department finds that a person has engaged in any
business or performed any act upon which a tax is imposed under this
title and that person has not obtained from the department a
registration certificate as required by RCW 82.32.030, the department
((shall)) must impose a penalty of five percent of the amount of tax
due from that person for the period that the person was not registered
as required by RCW 82.32.030. The department ((shall)) may not impose
the penalty under this subsection (4) if a person who has engaged in
business taxable under this title without first having registered as
required by RCW 82.32.030, prior to any notification by the department
of the need to register, obtains a registration certificate from the
department.
(5) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from the disregard of specific written instructions as to
reporting or tax liabilities, the department ((shall)) must add a
penalty of ten percent of the amount of the additional tax found due
because of the failure to follow the instructions. A taxpayer
disregards specific written instructions when the department ((of
revenue)) has informed the taxpayer in writing of the taxpayer's tax
obligations and the taxpayer fails to act in accordance with those
instructions unless the department has not issued final instructions
because the matter is under appeal pursuant to this chapter or
departmental regulations. The department ((shall)) may not assess the
penalty under this section upon any taxpayer who has made a good faith
effort to comply with the specific written instructions provided by the
department to that taxpayer. Specific written instructions may be
given as a part of a tax assessment, audit, determination, or closing
agreement, provided that such specific written instructions ((shall))
apply only to the taxpayer addressed or referenced on such documents.
Any specific written instructions by the department ((of revenue
shall)) must be clearly identified as such and ((shall)) must inform
the taxpayer that failure to follow the instructions may subject the
taxpayer to the penalties imposed by this subsection.
(6) If the department finds that all or any part of a deficiency
resulted from engaging in a disregarded transaction, as described in
section 201(1)(a) (i), (ii), or (iii) of this act, the department must
assess a penalty of thirty-five percent of the additional tax found to
be due as a result of engaging in a transaction disregarded by the
department under section 201(1)(a) (i), (ii), or (iii) of this act.
The penalty provided in this subsection may be assessed together with
any other applicable penalties provided in this section on the same tax
found to be due, except for the evasion penalty provided in subsection
(7) of this section. The department may not assess the penalty under
this subsection if, before the department discovers the taxpayer's use
of a transaction described under section 201(1)(a) (i), (ii), or (iii)
of this act, the taxpayer discloses its participation in the
transaction to the department.
(7) If the department finds that all or any part of the deficiency
resulted from an intent to evade the tax payable ((hereunder)), a
further penalty of fifty percent of the additional tax found to be due
((shall)) must be added.
(((7))) (8) The penalties imposed under subsections (1) through (4)
of this section can each be imposed on the same tax found to be due.
This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of other
penalties authorized by law.
(((8))) (9) The department ((of revenue)) may not impose both the
evasion penalty and the penalty for disregarding specific written
instructions or the penalty provided in subsection (6) of this section
on the same tax found to be due.
(((9))) (10) For the purposes of this section, "return" means any
document a person is required by the state of Washington to file to
satisfy or establish a tax or fee obligation that is administered or
collected by the department ((of revenue)), and that has a statutorily
defined due date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) The legislature finds that this
state's tax policy with respect to the taxation of transactions between
affiliated entities and the income derived from such transactions
(intercompany transactions) has motivated some taxpayers to engage in
transactions designed solely or primarily to minimize the tax effects
of intercompany transactions. The legislature further finds that some
intercompany transactions result from taxpayers that are required to
establish affiliated entities to comply with regulatory mandates and
that transactions between such affiliates effectively increases the tax
burden in this state on the affiliated group of entities.
(2) Therefore, as existing resources allow, the department of
revenue is directed to conduct a review of the state's tax policy with
respect to the taxation of intercompany transactions. The review must
include the impacts of such transactions under the state's business and
occupation tax and state and local sales and use taxes. The department
may include other taxes in the review as it deems appropriate.
(3) In conducting the review, the department must examine how this
state's tax policy compares to the tax policy of other states with
respect to the taxation of intercompany transactions. The department's
review must include an analysis of potential alternatives to the
current policy of taxing intercompany transactions, including their
estimated revenue impacts if practicable.
(4) In conducting this review, the department may seek input from
members of the business community and others as it deems appropriate.
(5) The department must report its findings to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 1,
2010. However, if the department has not completed its review by
December 1, 2010, the department must provide the fiscal committees of
the legislature with a brief status report by December 1, 2010, and the
final report by December 1, 2011.

Sec. 205 RCW 82.12.020 and 2009 c 535 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) levied and ((there shall be)) collected
from every person in this state a tax or excise for the privilege of
using within this state as a consumer any:
(a) Article of tangible personal property ((purchased at retail,
or)) acquired by ((lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted
or produced or manufactured by the person so using the same, or
otherwise furnished to a person engaged in any business taxable under
RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7))) the user in any manner, including tangible
personal property acquired at a casual or isolated sale, and including
by-products used by the manufacturer thereof, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, irrespective of whether the article or
similar articles are manufactured or are available for purchase within
this state;
(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of
delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either
provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing
information, or both;
(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or
(g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), excluding services defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) that are provided free of charge;
(d) Extended warranty; or
(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service,
including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in
connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.
(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated
services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:
(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale; and
(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services,
and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the
consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service
taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), if the
sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's bailor
or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW
or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user or by the
present user's bailor or donor.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax
imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user
of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital
code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the
effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property,
extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.
(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:
(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by his or her bailor or donor;
(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on
reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value
of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed
by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;
(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or
(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services,
which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of
the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present
user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected
to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been
paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is
levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of
the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the
taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the
purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase
price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales
tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person"
includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and
"consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

Sec. 206 RCW 82.45.010 and 2008 c 116 s 3 and 2008 c 6 s 701 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" ((shall have)) has its
ordinary meaning and ((shall)) includes any conveyance, grant,
assignment, quitclaim, or transfer of the ownership of or title to real
property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein
for a valuable consideration, and any contract for such conveyance,
grant, assignment, quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option
to purchase real property, including standing timber, or any estate or
interest therein or other contract under which possession of the
property is given to the purchaser, or any other person at the
purchaser's direction, and title to the property is retained by the
vendor as security for the payment of the purchase price. The term
also includes the grant, assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of
improvements constructed upon leased land.
(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration.
(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the
exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or
acquired within a twelve-month period, the date that the option
agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition
of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes
under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the
date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons
acting in concert ((shall)) must be aggregated for purposes of
determining whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest
has taken place. The department ((of revenue shall)) must adopt
standards by rule to determine when persons are acting in concert. In
adopting a rule for this purpose, the department ((shall)) must
consider the following:
(((a))) (i) Persons ((shall)) must be treated as acting in concert
when they have a relationship with each other such that one person
influences or controls the actions of another through common ownership;
and
(((b))) (ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled,
they ((shall)) must be treated as acting in concert only when the unity
with which the purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the
transfer of ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting
as a single entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent,
with each purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions ((shall be)) are considered separate
acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" ((shall)) does not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic
partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of
marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of
a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) Any transfer or conveyance made pursuant to a deed of trust or
an order of sale by the court in any mortgage, deed of trust, or lien
foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a judgment, or deed in lieu
of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists
of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where
there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if thereafter such transferee
corporation or partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or
such transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the
transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily
transfer stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the
transferee partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than
(((1))) (i) the transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner or children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or
domestic partner, (((2))) (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the
transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor
or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only
beneficiaries at the time of the transfer to the trust, or (((3)))
(iii) a corporation or partnership wholly owned by the original
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner, within three years of the original transfer to which this
exemption applies, and the tax on the subsequent transfer has not been
paid within sixty days of becoming due, excise taxes ((shall)) become
due and payable on the original transfer as otherwise provided by law.
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not
involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of
((section)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (p)(i) of this subsection
cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another
transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (p)(i) of this subsection,
results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously
holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property
in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert
hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(p)(ii) does not apply to that
part of the transfer involving property received that is the real
property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to
the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real
property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was
purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person
or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under
this subsection (3)(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who
previously held a controlling interest in the entity.
(q) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008,
but before December 31, 2018.

Sec. 207 RCW 82.45.033 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 505 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "controlling interest" has
the following meaning:
(((1))) (a) In the case of a corporation, either fifty percent or
more of the total combined voting power of all classes of stock of the
corporation entitled to vote, or fifty percent of the capital, profits,
or beneficial interest in the voting stock of the corporation; and
(((2))) (b) In the case of a partnership, association, trust, or
other entity, fifty percent or more of the capital, profits, or
beneficial interest in such partnership, association, trust, or other
entity.
(2) The department may, at the department's option, enforce the
obligation of the seller under this chapter as provided in this
subsection (2):
(a) In the transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest as
defined in subsection (1)(a) of this section, either against the
corporation in which a controlling interest is transferred or acquired,
against the person or persons who acquired the controlling interest in
the corporation or, when the corporation is not a publicly traded
company, against the person or persons who transferred the controlling
interest in the corporation; and
(b) In the transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest as
defined in subsection (1)(b) of this section, either against the entity
in which a controlling interest is transferred or acquired or against
the person or persons who transferred or acquired the controlling
interest in the entity.

Sec. 208 RCW 82.45.070 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.45.070 are each
amended to read as follows:
The tax ((herein)) provided for in this chapter and any interest or
penalties thereon ((shall be)) is a specific lien upon each ((piece))
parcel of real property located in this state that is either sold or
that is owned by an entity in which a controlling interest has been
transferred or acquired. The lien attaches from the time of sale until
the tax ((shall have been)) is paid, which lien may be enforced in the
manner prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages.

Sec. 209 RCW 82.45.080 and 1980 c 154 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied under this chapter ((shall be)) is the
obligation of the seller and the department ((of revenue)) may, at the
department's option, enforce the obligation through an action of debt
against the seller or the department may proceed in the manner
prescribed for the foreclosure of mortgages ((and resort to)). The
department's use of one course of enforcement ((shall)) is not ((be))
an election not to pursue the other.
(2) For purposes of this section and notwithstanding any other
provisions of law, the seller is the parent corporation of a wholly
owned subsidiary, when such subsidiary is the transferor to a third-party transferee and the subsidiary is dissolved before paying the tax
imposed under this chapter.

Sec. 210 RCW 82.45.100 and 2007 c 111 s 112 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Payment of the tax imposed under this chapter is due and
payable immediately at the time of sale, and if not paid within one
month thereafter ((shall)) will bear interest from the time of sale
until the date of payment.
(a) Interest imposed before January 1, 1999, ((shall be)) is
computed at the rate of one percent per month.
(b) Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, ((shall be)) is
computed on a monthly basis at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed ((shall)) must be adjusted on the
first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for
that calendar year. The department ((of revenue shall)) must provide
written notification to the county treasurers of the variable rate on
or before December 1st of the year preceding the calendar year in which
the rate applies.
(2) In addition to the interest described in subsection (1) of this
section, if the payment of any tax is not received by the county
treasurer or the department of revenue, as the case may be, within one
month of the date due, there ((shall be)) is assessed a penalty of five
percent of the amount of the tax; if the tax is not received within two
months of the date due, there ((shall)) will be assessed a total
penalty of ten percent of the amount of the tax; and if the tax is not
received within three months of the date due, there ((shall)) will be
assessed a total penalty of twenty percent of the amount of the tax.
The payment of the penalty described in this subsection ((shall be)) is
collectible from the seller only, and RCW 82.45.070 does not apply to
the penalties described in this subsection.
(3) If the tax imposed under this chapter is not received by the
due date, the transferee ((shall be)) is personally liable for the tax,
along with any interest as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
unless((:
(a))) an instrument evidencing the sale is recorded in the official
real property records of the county in which the property conveyed is
located((; or
(b) Either the transferor or transferee notifies the department of
revenue in writing of the occurrence of the sale within thirty days
following the date of the sale)).
(4) If upon examination of any affidavits or from other information
obtained by the department or its agents it appears that all or a
portion of the tax is unpaid, the department ((shall)) must assess
against the taxpayer the additional amount found to be due plus
interest and penalties as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section. The department ((shall)) must notify the taxpayer by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, of the additional amount
and the same ((shall)) becomes due and ((shall)) must be paid within
thirty days from the date of the notice, or within such further time as
the department may provide.
(5) No assessment or refund may be made by the department more than
four years after the date of sale except upon a showing of:
(a) Fraud or misrepresentation of a material fact by the taxpayer;
(b) A failure by the taxpayer to record documentation of a sale or
otherwise report the sale to the county treasurer; or
(c) A failure of the transferor or transferee to report the sale
under RCW 82.45.090(2).
(6) Penalties collected on taxes due under this chapter under
subsection (2) of this section and RCW 82.32.090 (2) through (7)
((shall)) must be deposited in the housing trust fund as described in
chapter 43.185 RCW.

Sec. 211 RCW 82.45.220 and 2005 c 326 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An organization that fails to report a transfer of the
controlling interest in the organization under RCW 43.07.390 to the
secretary of state and is later determined to be subject to real estate
excise taxes due to the transfer, ((shall be)) is subject to the
provisions of RCW 82.45.100 as well as the evasion penalty in RCW
82.32.090(((6))) (7).
(2) Subsection (1) of this section also applies to the failure to
report to the secretary of state the granting of an option to acquire
an interest in the organization if the exercise of the option would
result in a sale as defined in RCW 82.45.010(2).

Sec. 212 RCW 43.07.390 and 2005 c 326 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary of state ((shall)) must adopt rules requiring
any entity that is required to file an annual report with the secretary
of state, including entities under Titles 23, 23B, 24, and 25 RCW, to
disclose: (i) Any transfer ((in)) of the controlling interest ((of))
in the entity ((and any interest in real property)); and (ii) the
granting of any option to acquire an interest in the entity if the
exercise of the option would result in a sale as defined in RCW
82.45.010(2).
(b) The disclosure requirement in this subsection only applies to
entities owning an interest in real property located in this state.
(2) This information ((shall)) must be made available to the
department of revenue upon request for the purposes of tracking the
transfer of the controlling interest in entities owning real property
and to determine when the real estate excise tax is applicable in such
cases.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "controlling interest" has
the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.45.033.

PART III
Direct Seller Business and Occupation Tax Exemption
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) In 1983, the legislature provided a
business and occupation tax exemption in RCW 82.04.423 for certain out-of-state sellers that sold consumer products exclusively to or through
a direct seller's representative, which was codified in RCW 82.04.423.
The intent of the legislature in enacting this exemption was to provide
a narrow exemption for out-of-state businesses engaged in direct sales
of consumer products, typically accomplished through in-home parties or
door-to-door selling.
(2) In Dot Foods, Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 166 Wn.2d 912 (2009),
the Washington state supreme court held that the exemption in RCW
82.04.423 applied to a taxpayer: (a) That sold nonconsumer products
through its representative in addition to consumer products; and (b)
whose consumer products were ultimately sold at retail in permanent
retail establishments. This decision raises questions about the
taxpayers intended to benefit from the narrow exemption in RCW
82.04.432.
(3) The legislature recognizes that some out-of-state businesses
selling consumer products in this state may be eligible for the
exemption under RCW 82.04.423 under the broadened interpretation or
could easily restructure their business operations to qualify for the
exemption. The legislature further finds that optimal tax policy does
not provide favorable treatment to out-of-state businesses, which a
broadened interpretation of RCW 82.04.423 could lead to; but rather,
the best tax policy is to have equitable tax treatment for businesses,
both within and without the state.
(4) Therefore, the legislature finds that it is necessary to
reaffirm the legislature's intent in establishing the direct sellers'
exemption by amending RCW 82.04.423 retroactively to conform the
exemption to the original intent of the legislature and by
prospectively ending the direct sellers' exemption effective July 1,
2010.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.423 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Prior to July 1, 2010, this chapter ((shall)) does not apply to
any person in respect to gross income derived from the business of
making sales at wholesale or retail if such person:
(a) Does not own or lease real property within this state; and
(b) Does not regularly maintain a stock of tangible personal
property in this state for sale in the ordinary course of business; and
(c) Is not a corporation incorporated under the laws of this state;
and
(d) Makes sales in this state exclusively to or through a direct
seller's representative.
(2) For purposes of this section, the term "direct seller's
representative" means a person who buys only consumer products on a
buy-sell basis or a deposit-commission basis for resale, by the buyer
or any other person, in the home or otherwise than in a permanent
retail establishment, or who sells at retail, or solicits the sale at
retail of, only consumer products in the home or otherwise than in a
permanent retail establishment; and
(a) Substantially all of the remuneration paid to such person,
whether or not paid in cash, for the performance of services described
in this subsection is directly related to sales or other output,
including the performance of services, rather than the number of hours
worked; and
(b) The services performed by the person are performed pursuant to
a written contract between such person and the person for whom the
services are performed and such contract provides that the person will
not be treated as an employee with respect to such purposes for federal
tax purposes.
(3) Nothing in this section ((shall)) may be construed to imply
that a person exempt from tax under this section was engaged in a
business activity taxable under this chapter prior to ((the enactment
of this section)) August 23, 1983.

PART IV
Business and Occupation Tax Preferences for Manufacturers of Products
Derived from Certain Agricultural Products
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1)(a) In 1967, the legislature authorized
a preferential business and occupation tax rate for slaughtering,
breaking, and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the
same at wholesale. The Washington state supreme court interpreted RCW
82.04.260(4), in Agrilink Foods, Inc. v. Department of Revenue, 153
Wn.2d 392 (2005), holding the preferential business and occupation tax
rate on the slaughtering, breaking, and/or processing of perishable
meat products applied to the processing of perishable meat products
into nonperishable finished products, such as canned food.
(b) In this act, the legislature intends to ensure that the
exemption applies to activities such as slaughtering, breaking, and/or
processing perishable meat products and/or selling such products at
wholesale by requiring that the end product be a perishable meat
product; a nonperishable meat product that is comprised primarily of
animal carcass by weight or volume, other than a canned meat product;
or a meat by-product.
(2) The legislature finds that the rationale of the Agrilink
decision, if applied to these tax preferences, could result in
preferential tax treatment for any processed food product that
contained any fresh fruit or vegetable as an ingredient, however small
the amount. Therefore, the legislature intends, by this act, to
provide direction on its policy regarding preferential tax treatment
for these activities.
(a) A business and occupation tax exemption is provided for (i)
manufacturing by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables, and (ii) selling such products
at wholesale by the manufacturer to purchasers who transport the goods
out of state in the ordinary course of business. This exemption
expires July 1, 2012, and is replaced by a preferential business and
occupation tax rate.
(b) The legislature intends to narrow the tax preference provided
to fruit and vegetable manufacturers by requiring that the end product
be comprised either (i) exclusively of fruits and/or vegetables, or
(ii) of any combination of fruits, vegetables, and certain other
substances that, cumulatively, may not exceed the amount of fruits and
vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Perishable meat products, by slaughtering, breaking, or
processing, if the finished product is a perishable meat product; as to
such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the perishable
meat products manufactured, or, in the case of a processor for hire,
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent;
(b) Meat products, by dehydration, curing, smoking, or any
combination of these activities, if the finished meat products are not
canned; as to such persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the
meat products manufactured, or, in the case of a processor for hire,
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products,
if such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured in
a rendering plant licensed under chapter 16.68 RCW; as to such persons
the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products manufactured, or,
in the case of a processor for hire, the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
selling at wholesale:
(a) Perishable meat products; as to such persons the tax imposed is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Meat products that have been manufactured by the seller by
dehydration, curing, smoking, or any combination of such activities, if
the finished meat products are not canned; as to such persons the tax
imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(c) Hides, tallow, meat meal, and other similar meat by-products,
if such products are derived in part from animals and manufactured by
the seller in a rendering plant; as to such persons the tax imposed is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects.
(b) "Carcass" means all or any parts, including viscera, of a
slaughtered animal.
(c) "Fish" means any water-breathing animal, including shellfish.
(d) "Hide" means any unprocessed animal pelt or skin.
(e)(i) "Meat products" means:
(A) Products comprised exclusively of animal carcass; and
(B) Except as provided in (e)(ii) of this subsection (3), products,
such as jerky, sausage, and other cured meat products, that are
comprised primarily of animal carcass by weight or volume and may also
contain water; nitrates; nitrites; acids; binders and extenders;
natural or synthetic casings; colorings; flavorings such as soy sauce,
liquid smoke, seasonings, citric acid, sugar, molasses, corn syrup, and
vinegar; and similar substances.
(ii) "Meat products" does not include products containing any
cereal grains or cereal-grain products, dairy products, legumes and
legume products, fruit or vegetable products as defined in RCW
82.04.260, and similar ingredients, unless the ingredient is used as a
flavoring. For purposes of this subsection, "flavoring" means a
substance that contains the flavoring constituents derived from a
spice, fruit or fruit juice, vegetable or vegetable juice, edible
yeast, herb, bark, bud, root, leaf, or any other edible substance of
plant origin, whose primary function in food is flavoring or seasoning
rather than nutritional, and which may legally appear as "natural
flavor," "flavor," or "flavorings" in the ingredient statement on the
label of the meat product.
(iii) "Meat products" includes only products that are intended for
human consumption as food or animal consumption as feed.
(f) "Perishable" means having a high risk of spoilage within thirty
days of manufacture without any refrigeration or freezing.
(g) "Rendering plant" means any place of business or location where
dead animals or any part or portion thereof, or packing house refuse,
are processed for the purpose of obtaining the hide, skin, grease
residue, or any other by-product whatsoever.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2006 c 354 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the value of products
or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing fruit((s)) or vegetable((s)) products by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables; or
(b) Selling at wholesale fruit((s)) or vegetable((s)) products
manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing,
processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to
purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods
out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection
(1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW
82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser
in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(2)(a) "Fruit or vegetable products" means:
(i) Products comprised exclusively of fruits, vegetables, or both;
and
(ii) Products comprised of fruits, vegetables, or both, and which
may also contain water, sugar, salt, seasonings, preservatives,
binders, stabilizers, flavorings, yeast, and similar substances.
However, the amount of all ingredients contained in the product, other
than fruits, vegetables, and water, may not exceed the amount of fruits
and vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume.
(b) "Fruit or vegetable products" includes only products that are
intended for human consumption as food or animal consumption as feed.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2010 c ... (SHB 3066) s 111 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the
gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing fruit((s)) or vegetable((s)) products by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables; or
(b) Selling at wholesale fruit((s)) or vegetable((s)) products
manufactured by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing,
processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to
purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods
out of this state. A person taking an exemption under this subsection
(1)(b) must keep and preserve records for the period required by RCW
82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported by the purchaser
in the ordinary course of business out of this state.
(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW 82.32.---(section 102, chapter ... (SHB 3066), Laws of 2010).
(3)(a) For the purposes of this section, "fruit or vegetable
products" means:
(i) Products comprised exclusively of fruits, vegetables, or both;
and
(ii) Products comprised of fruits, vegetables, or both, and which
may also contain water, sugar, salt, seasonings, preservatives,
binders, stabilizers, flavorings, yeast, and similar substances.
However, the amount of all ingredients contained in the product, other
than fruits, vegetables, and water, may not exceed the amount of fruits
and vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume.
(b) "Fruit or vegetable products" includes only products that are
intended for human consumption as food or animal consumption as feed.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.04.260 and 2009 c 479 s 64, 2009 c 461 s 1, and
2009 c 162 s 34 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to
the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such
sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruit((s)) or vegetable((s))
products by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruit((s)) or
vegetable((s)) products manufactured by the seller by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value
of the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such
sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "fruit or vegetable products"
means:
(A) Products comprised exclusively of fruits, vegetables, or both;
or
(B) Products comprised of fruits, vegetables, or both, and which
may also contain water, sugar, salt, seasonings, preservatives,
binders, stabilizers, flavorings, yeast, and similar substances.
However, the amount of all ingredients contained in the product, other
than fruits, vegetables, and water, may not exceed the amount of fruits
and vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume;
(iii) "Fruit and vegetable products" includes only products that
are intended for human consumption as food or animal consumption as
feed;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Alcohol fuel or wood biomass fuel, as those terms are defined
in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of alcohol fuel or wood
biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities ((shall be)) is equal
to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.
(((6))) (5) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as an international steamship agent, international customs
house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income
derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((7))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection ((shall be)) are exempt from payment of
taxes imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business
subject to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(((8))) (7)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding
any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of
3.3 percent.
(b) If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to
activities both within and without this state, the gross income
attributable to this state ((shall)) must be determined in accordance
with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(((9))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an
insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of such business
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((10))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of
the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30,
1995, and 1.5 percent thereafter.
(((11))) (10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall)), in the case of manufacturers,
((be)) is equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross
proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, ((be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through ((the later of))
June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11))) (10)
and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing
tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)), in
the case of manufacturers, ((be)) is equal to the value of the product
manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) is equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11))) (10), "commercial
airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW
82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person eligible for the tax rate under this subsection (((11))) (10)
must report as required under RCW 82.32.545.
(e) This subsection (((11))) (10) does not apply on and after July
1, 2024.
(((12))) (11)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting
for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business ((shall)), in the case of extractors, ((be)) is equal to
the value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case
of extractors for hire, ((be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall)), in the case
of manufacturers, ((be)) is equal to the value of products, including
by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire,
((be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and
0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(d),
"selling standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land,
where the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months
from the date of the original contract, regardless of the method of
payment for the timber and whether title to the timber transfers
before, upon, or after severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(e)(iii),
"postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be
disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a
consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(((13))) (12) Upon every person engaging within this state in
inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by
another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from
such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((14))) (13) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.

Sec. 406 RCW 82.04.260 and 2010 c ... (SHB 3066) s 107 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-
products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by- product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d)(i) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruit((s)) or vegetable((s))
products by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits or vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruit((s)) or
vegetable((s)) products manufactured by the seller by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course
of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "fruit or vegetable products"
means:
(A) Products comprised exclusively of fruits, vegetables, or both;
or
(B) Products comprised of fruits, vegetables, or both, and which
may also contain water, sugar, salt, seasonings, preservatives,
binders, stabilizers, flavorings, yeast, and similar substances.
However, the amount of all ingredients contained in the product, other
than fruits, vegetables, and water, may not exceed the amount of fruits
and vegetables contained in the product measured by weight or volume;
(iii) "Fruit and vegetable products" includes only products that
are intended for human consumption as food or animal consumption as
feed;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) ((Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5))) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(((6))) (5) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as an international steamship agent, international customs
house broker, international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo
charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo
agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to only
international activities is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(((7))) (6) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
movement of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to
taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities
pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne
interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities of a
labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or
unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a
wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or
similar holding or storage yard or area to await further movement in
import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and be
stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(((8))) (7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010;
as to such persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business
is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(((9))) (8) Upon every person engaging within this state as an
insurance producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter
48.17 RCW or a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as
to such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed
activities is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((10))) (9) Upon every person engaging within this state in
business as a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is
operated as a nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its
political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such activities is equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5
percent thereafter.
(((11))) (10)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (((11))) (10)
and is engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing
tooling specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case
of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and
the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case
of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (((11))) (10), "commercial
airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW
82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection
(((11))) (10) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.--- (section 103, chapter ... (SHB 3066), Laws of
2010).
(e) This subsection (((11))) (10) does not apply on and after July
1, 2024.
(((12))) (11)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of extracting timber or extracting
for hire timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
the business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of
products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of
extractors for hire, equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(d), "selling standing
timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer
is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of
the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the
timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (((12))) (11)(e)(iii),
"postconsumer waste" means a finished material that would normally be
disposed of as solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a
consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection
(((12))) (11) must file a complete annual survey with the department
under RCW 82.32.--- (section 102, chapter ... (SHB 3066), Laws of
2010).
(((13))) (12) Upon every person engaging within this state in
inspecting, testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by
another person, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(((14))) (13)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in
the business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both,
the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (((14))) (13) must file a complete annual report with the
department under RCW 82.32.--- (section 103, chapter ... (SHB 3066),
Laws of 2010).

Sec. 407 RCW 82.04.250 and 2008 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
(3) Upon every person classified by the federal aviation
administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated
repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business
of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.

Sec. 408 RCW 82.04.250 and 2010 c ... (SHB 3066) s 106 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(3)(a) Upon every person classified by the federal aviation
administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated
repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business
of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.--- (section 103, chapter ... (SHB 3066), Laws of
2010).

Sec. 409 RCW 82.04.250 and 2007 c 54 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10), as
to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business
((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

Sec. 410 RCW 82.04.261 and 2007 c 54 s 7 and 2007 c 48 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))
(11), a surcharge is imposed on those persons who are subject to any of
the taxes imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11). Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the surcharge is equal to 0.052
percent. The surcharge is added to the rates provided in RCW
82.04.260(((12))) (11) (a), (b), (c), and (d). The surcharge and this
section expire July 1, 2024.
(2) All receipts from the surcharge imposed under this section
((shall)) must be deposited into the forest and fish support account
created in RCW 76.09.405.
(3)(a) The surcharge imposed under this section ((shall be)) is
suspended if:
(i) Receipts from the surcharge total at least eight million
dollars during any fiscal biennium; or
(ii) The office of financial management certifies to the department
that the federal government has appropriated at least two million
dollars for participation in forest and fish report-related activities
by federally recognized Indian tribes located within the geographical
boundaries of the state of Washington for any federal fiscal year.
(b)(i) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(i) of this
subsection (3) ((shall)) takes effect on the first day of the calendar
month that is at least thirty days after the end of the month during
which the department determines that receipts from the surcharge total
at least eight million dollars during the fiscal biennium. The
surcharge ((shall be)) is imposed again at the beginning of the
following fiscal biennium.
(ii) The suspension of the surcharge under (a)(ii) of this
subsection (3) ((shall)) takes effect on the later of the first day of
October of any federal fiscal year for which the federal government
appropriates at least two million dollars for participation in forest
and fish report-related activities by federally recognized Indian
tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington, or the first day of a calendar month that is at least
thirty days following the date that the office of financial management
makes a certification to the department under subsection (5) of this
section. The surcharge ((shall be)) is imposed again on the first day
of the following July.
(4)(a) If, by October 1st of any federal fiscal year, the office of
financial management certifies to the department that the federal
government has appropriated funds for participation in forest and fish
report-related activities by federally recognized Indian tribes located
within the geographical boundaries of the state of Washington but the
amount of the appropriation is less than two million dollars, the
department ((shall)) must adjust the surcharge in accordance with this
subsection.
(b) The department ((shall)) must adjust the surcharge by an amount
that the department estimates will cause the amount of funds deposited
into the forest and fish support account for the state fiscal year that
begins July 1st and that includes the beginning of the federal fiscal
year for which the federal appropriation is made, to be reduced by
twice the amount of the federal appropriation for participation in
forest and fish report-related activities by federally recognized
Indian tribes located within the geographical boundaries of the state
of Washington.
(c) Any adjustment in the surcharge ((shall)) takes effect at the
beginning of a calendar month that is at least thirty days after the
date that the office of financial management makes the certification
under subsection (5) of this section.
(d) The surcharge ((shall be)) is imposed again at the rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section on the first day of the
following state fiscal year unless the surcharge is suspended under
subsection (3) of this section or adjusted for that fiscal year under
this subsection.
(e) Adjustments of the amount of the surcharge by the department
are final and ((shall)) may not be used to challenge the validity of
the surcharge imposed under this section.
(f) The department ((shall)) must provide timely notice to affected
taxpayers of the suspension of the surcharge or an adjustment of the
surcharge.
(5) The office of financial management ((shall)) must make the
certification to the department as to the status of federal
appropriations for tribal participation in forest and fish report-related activities.

Sec. 411 RCW 82.04.298 and 2008 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The amount of tax with respect to a qualified grocery
distribution cooperative's sales of groceries or related goods for
resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW 82.04.260(4)))
section 402 of this act, to customer-owners of the grocery distribution
cooperative is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the grocery
distribution cooperative multiplied by the rate of one and one-half
percent.
(2) A qualified grocery distribution cooperative is allowed a
deduction from the gross proceeds of sales of groceries or related
goods for resale, excluding items subject to tax under ((RCW
82.04.260(4))) section 402 of this act, to customer-owners of the
grocery distribution cooperative that is equal to the portion of the
gross proceeds of sales for resale that represents the actual cost of
the merchandise sold by the grocery distribution cooperative to
customer-owners.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Grocery distribution cooperative" means an entity that sells
groceries and related items to customer-owners of the grocery
distribution cooperative and has customer-owners, in the aggregate, who
own a majority of the outstanding ownership interests of the grocery
distribution cooperative or of the entity controlling the grocery
distribution cooperative. "Grocery distribution cooperative" includes
an entity that controls a grocery distribution cooperative.
(b) "Qualified grocery distribution cooperative" means:
(i) A grocery distribution cooperative that has been determined by
a court of record of the state of Washington to be not engaged in
wholesaling or making sales at wholesale, within the meaning of RCW
82.04.270 or any similar provision of a municipal ordinance that
imposes a tax on gross receipts, gross proceeds of sales, or gross
income, with respect to purchases made by customer-owners, and
subsequently changes its form of doing business to make sales at
wholesale of groceries or related items to its customer-owners; or
(ii) A grocery distribution cooperative that has acquired
substantially all of the assets of a grocery distribution cooperative
described in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(c) "Customer-owner" means a person who has an ownership interest
in a grocery distribution cooperative and purchases groceries and
related items at wholesale from that grocery distribution cooperative.
(d) "Controlling" means holding fifty percent or more of the voting
interests of an entity and having at least equal power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of the entity,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or
otherwise.

Sec. 412 RCW 82.04.334 and 2007 c 48 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any sale of standing timber excluded
from the definition of "sale" in RCW 82.45.010(3). The definitions in
RCW 82.04.260(((12))) (11) apply to this section.

Sec. 413 RCW 82.04.440 and 2006 c 300 s 8 and 2006 c 84 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Every person engaged in activities that are subject to tax
under two or more provisions of RCW 82.04.230 through 82.04.298,
inclusive, ((shall be)) is taxable under each provision applicable to
those activities.
(2) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.2909(2), 82.04.250, 82.04.270,
82.04.294(2), or 82.04.260 (1) (b), (c), (((4),)) or (d), (10), or
(11), or (((12))) section 402(2) of this act with respect to selling
products in this state, including those persons who are also taxable
under RCW 82.04.261, ((shall be)) are allowed a credit against those
taxes for any (a) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to the
manufacturing of products so sold in this state, and/or (b) extracting
taxes paid with respect to the extracting of products so sold in this
state or ingredients of products so sold in this state. Extracting
taxes taken as credit under subsection (3) of this section may also be
taken under this subsection, if otherwise allowable under this
subsection. The amount of the credit ((shall)) may not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the sale of those
products.
(3) Persons taxable as manufacturers under RCW 82.04.240 or
82.04.260 (1)(b) or (((12))) (11), including those persons who are also
taxable under RCW 82.04.261, ((shall be)) are allowed a credit against
those taxes for any extracting taxes paid with respect to extracting
the ingredients of the products so manufactured in this state. The
amount of the credit ((shall)) may not exceed the tax liability arising
under this chapter with respect to the manufacturing of those products.
(4) Persons taxable under RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.2909(1),
82.04.294(1), 82.04.2404, or 82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4),)) (10), or
(11), or (((12))) section 402(1) of this act, including those persons
who are also taxable under RCW 82.04.261, with respect to extracting or
manufacturing products in this state ((shall be)) are allowed a credit
against those taxes for any (i) gross receipts taxes paid to another
state with respect to the sales of the products so extracted or
manufactured in this state, (ii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect
to the manufacturing of products using ingredients so extracted in this
state, or (iii) manufacturing taxes paid with respect to manufacturing
activities completed in another state for products so manufactured in
this state. The amount of the credit ((shall)) may not exceed the tax
liability arising under this chapter with respect to the extraction or
manufacturing of those products.
(5) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Gross receipts tax" means a tax:
(i) Which is imposed on or measured by the gross volume of
business, in terms of gross receipts or in other terms, and in the
determination of which the deductions allowed would not constitute the
tax an income tax or value added tax; and
(ii) Which is also not, pursuant to law or custom, separately
stated from the sales price.
(b) "State" means (i) the state of Washington, (ii) a state of the
United States other than Washington, or any political subdivision of
such other state, (iii) the District of Columbia, and (iv) any foreign
country or political subdivision thereof.
(c) "Manufacturing tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the
act or privilege of engaging in business as a manufacturer, and
includes (i) the taxes imposed in RCW 82.04.240, 82.04.2404,
82.04.2909(1), 82.04.260 (1), (2), (((4),)) (10), and (11), ((and
(12))) section 402(1) of this act, and 82.04.294(1); (ii) the tax
imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are engaged in business as
a manufacturer; and (iii) similar gross receipts taxes paid to other
states.
(d) "Extracting tax" means a gross receipts tax imposed on the act
or privilege of engaging in business as an extractor, and includes (i)
the tax imposed on extractors in RCW 82.04.230 and 82.04.260(((12)))
(11); (ii) the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.261 on persons who are
engaged in business as an extractor; and (iii) similar gross receipts
taxes paid to other states.
(e) "Business", "manufacturer", "extractor", and other terms used
in this section have the meanings given in RCW 82.04.020 through
82.04.212, notwithstanding the use of those terms in the context of
describing taxes imposed by other states.

Sec. 414 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2008 c 81 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the
buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings
constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings
are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and
(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with
respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon
which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for
aerospace product development or in providing aerospace services, by
persons not within the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection
(2) and are: (I) Engaged in manufacturing tooling specifically
designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their
components; or (II) taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3) or 82.04.250(3); or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used
exclusively for aerospace product development or in providing aerospace
services, by persons not within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this
subsection (2) and are: (I) Engaged in manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
their components; or (II) taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3) or
82.04.250(3); and
(b) An amount equal to:
(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;
(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or
(C) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
((82.04.0250(3) [82.04.250(3)])) 82.04.250(3) or 82.04.290(3), on
computer hardware, computer peripherals, and software exempt under RCW
82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and acquired after June 30, 2008.
(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit
under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property
taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.
(((I))) (A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10) (a)
or (b) on the applicable business activities of manufacturing
commercial airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling
specifically designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes.
(((II))) (B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing
classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(((III))) (C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of
the fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable
amount required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar
year before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is
earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for
calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10) for manufacturing was not in effect during the
full calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under
this section is earned.
(((IV))) (D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this
subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the
fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.
(((V))) (E) As used in (((III))) (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection
(2)(((b)(ii)(C))), "returns" means the tax returns for which the tax
imposed under this chapter is reported to the department.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4461.
(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW
82.08.975.
(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but
may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person taking the credit under this section must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 415 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2010 c ... (SHB 3066) s 116 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the
buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings
constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings
are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and
(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with
respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon
which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for
aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling specifically
designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their
components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not within
the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2) and are taxable
under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(((11))) (10)(b), or 82.04.250(3); or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used
exclusively for aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
their components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not
within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (2) and are taxable
under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(((11))) (10)(b), or 82.04.250(3); and
(b) An amount equal to:
(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;
(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or
(C) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW 82.04.250(3)
or 82.04.290(3), on computer hardware, computer peripherals, and
software exempt under RCW 82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and acquired after
June 30, 2008.
(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit
under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property
taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.
(A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable amount
subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(((11))) (10) (a) or (b)
on the applicable business activities of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling specifically
designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes.
(B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable amount
subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing classifications in
chapter 82.04 RCW.
(C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of the
fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable amount
required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar year
before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is
earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for
calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(((11))) (10) for manufacturing was not in effect during the
full calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under
this section is earned.
(D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this
subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the
fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.
(E) As used in (b)(ii)(C) of this subsection (2)(((b)(ii))),
"returns" means the tax returns for which the tax imposed under this
chapter is reported to the department.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4461.
(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW
82.08.975.
(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but
may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person claiming the credit under this section must file a complete
annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.--- (section 103,
chapter ... (SHB 3066), Laws of 2010).
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 416 RCW 82.08.806 and 2009 c 461 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(((14))) (13) or
82.04.280(1).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
((shall)) must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for
purposes of determining whether the computer equipment is used
primarily for administrative purposes.

Sec. 417 RCW 82.32.550 and 2008 c 81 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. takes effect on the
first day of the month in which the governor and a manufacturer of
commercial airplanes sign a memorandum of agreement regarding an
affirmative final decision to site a significant commercial airplane
final assembly facility in Washington state. The department shall
provide notice of the effective date of chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp.
sess. to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as deemed
appropriate by the department.
(b) Chapter 1, Laws of 2003 2nd sp. sess. is contingent upon the
siting of a significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in
the state of Washington. If a memorandum of agreement under subsection
(1) of this section is not signed by June 30, 2005, chapter 1, Laws of
2003 2nd sp. sess. is null and void.
(c)(i) The rate in RCW 82.04.260(11)(a)(ii) takes effect July 1,
2007.
(ii) If on December 31, 2007, final assembly of a superefficient
airplane has not begun in Washington state, the department shall
provide notice of such to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and
others as deemed appropriate by the department.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a))) "Commercial airplane" has its ordinary meaning, which is an
airplane certified by the federal aviation administration for
transporting persons or property, and any military derivative of such
an airplane.
(((b))) (2) "Component" means a part or system certified by the
federal aviation administration for installation or assembly into a
commercial airplane.
(((c) "Final assembly of a superefficient airplane" means the
activity of assembling an airplane from components parts necessary for
its mechanical operation such that the finished commercial airplane is
ready to deliver to the ultimate consumer.
(d) "Significant commercial airplane final assembly facility" means
a location with the capacity to produce at least thirty-six
superefficient airplanes a year.
(e) "Siting" means a final decision by a manufacturer to locate a
significant commercial airplane final assembly facility in Washington
state.
(f))) (3) "Superefficient airplane" means a twin aisle airplane
that carries between two hundred and three hundred fifty passengers,
with a range of more than seven thousand two hundred nautical miles, a
cruising speed of approximately mach .85, and that uses fifteen to
twenty percent less fuel than other similar airplanes on the market.

Sec. 418 RCW 82.45.195 and 2007 c 48 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A sale of standing timber is exempt from tax under this chapter if
the gross income from such sale is taxable under RCW 82.04.260(((12)))
(11)(d).

Sec. 419 RCW 35.102.150 and 2009 c 461 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax must allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines are those activities to which the tax rates in RCW
82.04.260(((14))) (13) and 82.04.280(1) apply.

Sec. 420 RCW 48.14.080 and 2009 c 535 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As to insurers, other than title insurers and taxpayers under
RCW 48.14.0201, the taxes imposed by this title ((shall be)) are in
lieu of all other taxes, except as otherwise provided in this section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply with respect to:
(a) Taxes on real and tangible personal property;
(b) Excise taxes on the sale, purchase, use, or possession of (i)
real property; (ii) tangible personal property; (iii) extended
warranties; (iv) services, including digital automated services as
defined in RCW 82.04.192; and (v) digital goods and digital codes as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.192; and
(c) The tax imposed in RCW 82.04.260(((10))) (9), regarding public
and nonprofit hospitals.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the term "taxes" includes
taxes imposed by the state or any county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political
subdivision.

PART V
Ending the Preferential Business and Occupation Tax Treatment Received
by Directors of Corporations
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) The legislature recognizes that the
business and occupation tax applies to all activities engaged in with
the object of gain, benefit, or advantage to the taxpayer or to another
person or class, directly or indirectly, unless a specific exemption
applies.
(2) One of the major business and occupation tax exemptions is
provided in RCW 82.04.360 for income earned as an employee or servant
as distinguished from income earned as an independent contractor. The
legislature's intent in providing this exemption was to exempt employee
wages from the business and occupation tax but not to exempt income
earned as an independent contractor.
(3) The legislature finds that corporate directors are not
employees or servants of the corporation whose board they serve on and
therefore are not entitled to a business and occupation tax exemption
under RCW 82.04.360. The legislature further finds that there are no
business and occupation tax exemptions for compensation received for
serving as a member of a corporation's board of directors.
(4) The legislature also finds that there is a widespread
misunderstanding among corporate directors that the business and
occupation tax does not apply to the compensation they receive for
serving as a director of a corporation. It is the legislature's
expectation that the department of revenue will take appropriate
measures to ensure that corporate directors understand and comply with
their business and occupation tax obligations with respect to their
director compensation. However, because of the widespread
misunderstanding by corporate directors of their liability for business
and occupation tax on director compensation, the legislature finds that
it is appropriate in this unique situation to provide limited relief
against the retroactive assessment of business and occupation taxes on
corporate director compensation.
(5) The legislature also reaffirms its intent that all income of
all independent contractors is subject to business and occupation tax
unless specifically exempt under the Constitution or laws of this state
or the United States.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.04.360 and 1991 c 324 s 19 and 1991 c 275 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to any person in respect
to his or her employment in the capacity of an employee or servant as
distinguished from that of an independent contractor. For the purposes
of this section, the definition of employee ((shall)) includes those
persons that are defined in section 3121(d)(3)(B) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended through January 1, 1991.
(2) ((A booth renter, as defined by RCW 18.16.020, is an
independent contractor for purposes of this chapter.)) Until July 1,
2010, this chapter does not apply to amounts received by an individual
from a corporation as compensation for serving as a member of that
corporation's board of directors. Beginning July 1, 2010, such amounts
are taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2).

Sec. 503 RCW 82.04.360 and 2010 c ... (E2SHB 1597) s 207 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to any person in respect to his or
her employment in the capacity of an employee or servant as
distinguished from that of an independent contractor. For the purposes
of this section, the definition of employee ((shall)) includes those
persons that are defined in section 3121(d)(3)(B) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended through January 1, 1991.
(2) A booth renter is an independent contractor for purposes of
this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "booth renter" means
any person who:
(a) Performs cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring
services for which a license is required under chapter 18.16 RCW; and
(b) Pays a fee for the use of salon or shop facilities and receives
no compensation or other consideration from the owner of the salon or
shop for the services performed.
(3) Until July 1, 2010, this chapter does not apply to amounts
received by an individual from a corporation as compensation for
serving as a member of that corporation's board of directors.
Beginning June 1, 2010, such amounts are taxable under RCW
82.04.290(2).

PART VI
Foreclosure Exemption
Sec. 601 RCW 82.45.010 and 2010 c ... s 206 (section 206 of this
act) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "sale" has its ordinary
meaning and includes any conveyance, grant, assignment, quitclaim, or
transfer of the ownership of or title to real property, including
standing timber, or any estate or interest therein for a valuable
consideration, and any contract for such conveyance, grant, assignment,
quitclaim, or transfer, and any lease with an option to purchase real
property, including standing timber, or any estate or interest therein
or other contract under which possession of the property is given to
the purchaser, or any other person at the purchaser's direction, and
title to the property is retained by the vendor as security for the
payment of the purchase price. The term also includes the grant,
assignment, quitclaim, sale, or transfer of improvements constructed
upon leased land.
(2)(a) The term "sale" also includes the transfer or acquisition
within any twelve-month period of a controlling interest in any entity
with an interest in real property located in this state for a valuable
consideration.
(b) For the sole purpose of determining whether, pursuant to the
exercise of an option, a controlling interest was transferred or
acquired within a twelve-month period, the date that the option
agreement was executed is the date on which the transfer or acquisition
of the controlling interest is deemed to occur. For all other purposes
under this chapter, the date upon which the option is exercised is the
date of the transfer or acquisition of the controlling interest.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, all acquisitions of persons
acting in concert must be aggregated for purposes of determining
whether a transfer or acquisition of a controlling interest has taken
place. The department must adopt standards by rule to determine when
persons are acting in concert. In adopting a rule for this purpose,
the department must consider the following:
(i) Persons must be treated as acting in concert when they have a
relationship with each other such that one person influences or
controls the actions of another through common ownership; and
(ii) When persons are not commonly owned or controlled, they must
be treated as acting in concert only when the unity with which the
purchasers have negotiated and will consummate the transfer of
ownership interests supports a finding that they are acting as a single
entity. If the acquisitions are completely independent, with each
purchaser buying without regard to the identity of the other
purchasers, then the acquisitions are considered separate acquisitions.
(3) The term "sale" does not include:
(a) A transfer by gift, devise, or inheritance.
(b) A transfer of any leasehold interest other than of the type
mentioned above.
(c) A cancellation or forfeiture of a vendee's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, whether or not such contract
contains a forfeiture clause, or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a
mortgage.
(d) The partition of property by tenants in common by agreement or
as the result of a court decree.
(e) The assignment of property or interest in property from one
spouse or one domestic partner to the other spouse or other domestic
partner in accordance with the terms of a decree of dissolution of
marriage or state registered domestic partnership or in fulfillment of
a property settlement agreement.
(f) The assignment or other transfer of a vendor's interest in a
contract for the sale of real property, even though accompanied by a
conveyance of the vendor's interest in the real property involved.
(g) Transfers by appropriation or decree in condemnation
proceedings brought by the United States, the state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation.
(h) A mortgage or other transfer of an interest in real property
merely to secure a debt, or the assignment thereof.
(i) ((Any)) A transfer or conveyance made (i) to the beneficiary of
a deed of trust pursuant to a trustee's sale in the nonjudicial
foreclosure of a deed of trust ((or)); (ii) to the mortgagee,
beneficiary of the deed of trust, or lienholder pursuant to an order of
sale by the court in the judicial foreclosure of any mortgage, deed of
trust, or lien ((foreclosure proceeding or upon execution of a
judgment, or)); (iii) to the mortgagee by the mortgagor or to the
beneficiary of a deed of trust by the grantor pursuant to deed in lieu
of foreclosure to satisfy a mortgage or deed of trust; or (iv) to the
judgment creditor pursuant to a writ of execution to enforce a
judgment.
(j) A conveyance to the federal housing administration or veterans
administration by an authorized mortgagee made pursuant to a contract
of insurance or guaranty with the federal housing administration or
veterans administration.
(k) A transfer in compliance with the terms of any lease or
contract upon which the tax as imposed by this chapter has been paid or
where the lease or contract was entered into prior to the date this tax
was first imposed.
(l) The sale of any grave or lot in an established cemetery.
(m) A sale by the United States, this state or any political
subdivision thereof, or a municipal corporation of this state.
(n) A sale to a regional transit authority or public corporation
under RCW 81.112.320 under a sale/leaseback agreement under RCW
81.112.300.
(o) A transfer of real property, however effected, if it consists
of a mere change in identity or form of ownership of an entity where
there is no change in the beneficial ownership. These include
transfers to a corporation or partnership which is wholly owned by the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner. However, if thereafter such transferee corporation or
partnership voluntarily transfers such real property, or such
transferor, spouse or domestic partner, or children of the transferor
or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner voluntarily transfer
stock in the transferee corporation or interest in the transferee
partnership capital, as the case may be, to other than (i) the
transferor and/or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner or
children of the transferor or the transferor's spouse or domestic
partner, (ii) a trust having the transferor and/or the transferor's
spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor or the
transferor's spouse or domestic partner as the only beneficiaries at
the time of the transfer to the trust, or (iii) a corporation or
partnership wholly owned by the original transferor and/or the
transferor's spouse or domestic partner or children of the transferor
or the transferor's spouse or domestic partner, within three years of
the original transfer to which this exemption applies, and the tax on
the subsequent transfer has not been paid within sixty days of becoming
due, excise taxes become due and payable on the original transfer as
otherwise provided by law.
(p)(i) A transfer that for federal income tax purposes does not
involve the recognition of gain or loss for entity formation,
liquidation or dissolution, and reorganization, including but not
limited to nonrecognition of gain or loss because of application of 26
U.S.C. Sec. 332, 337, 351, 368(a)(1), 721, or 731 of the internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended.
(ii) However, the transfer described in (p)(i) of this subsection
cannot be preceded or followed within a twelve-month period by another
transfer or series of transfers, that, when combined with the otherwise
exempt transfer or transfers described in (p)(i) of this subsection,
results in the transfer of a controlling interest in the entity for
valuable consideration, and in which one or more persons previously
holding a controlling interest in the entity receive cash or property
in exchange for any interest the person or persons acting in concert
hold in the entity. This subsection (3)(p)(ii) does not apply to that
part of the transfer involving property received that is the real
property interest that the person or persons originally contributed to
the entity or when one or more persons who did not contribute real
property or belong to the entity at a time when real property was
purchased receive cash or personal property in exchange for that person
or persons' interest in the entity. The real estate excise tax under
this subsection (3)(p)(ii) is imposed upon the person or persons who
previously held a controlling interest in the entity.
(q) A qualified sale of a manufactured/mobile home community, as
defined in RCW 59.20.030, that takes place on or after June 12, 2008,
but before December 31, 2018.

Sec. 602 RCW 82.45.080 and 1980 c 154 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the tax levied
under this chapter ((shall be)) is the obligation of the seller and the
department ((of revenue)) may, at the department's option, enforce the
obligation through an action of debt against the seller or the
department may proceed in the manner prescribed for the foreclosure of
mortgages ((and resort to)). The department's use of one course of
enforcement ((shall)) is not ((be)) an election not to pursue the
other.
(2) When a transfer or conveyance pursuant to a judicial or
nonjudicial foreclosure or enforcement of a judgment is a sale, and
notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the tax levied under this
chapter is the obligation of the buyer, and provisions of this chapter
applicable to the seller apply to the buyer. The department may
enforce the obligation against the buyer as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.

PART VII
Corporate Officer Liability
Sec. 701 RCW 82.32.145 and 1995 c 318 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Upon termination, dissolution, or abandonment of a corporate
or limited liability company business, any officer, member, manager, or
other person having control or supervision of retail sales tax funds
collected and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, or who is charged with
the responsibility for the filing of returns or the payment of retail
sales tax funds collected and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050, shall
be personally liable for any unpaid taxes and interest and penalties on
those taxes, if such officer or other person wilfully fails to pay or
to cause to be paid any taxes due from the corporation pursuant to
chapter 82.08 RCW. For the purposes of this section, any retail sales
taxes that have been paid but not collected shall be deductible from
the retail sales taxes collected but not paid.
For purposes of this subsection "wilfully fails to pay or to cause
to be paid" means that the failure was the result of an intentional,
conscious, and voluntary course of action.
(2) The officer, member or manager, or other person shall be liable
only for taxes collected which)) Whenever the department has issued a
warrant under RCW 82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid taxes from a
limited liability business entity and that business entity has been
terminated, dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department
may pursue collection of the entity's unpaid taxes, including penalties
and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible
individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the
condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the
fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an
entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department
the nature of its assets and liabilities.
(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed for state
and local sales and use taxes, state business and occupation taxes, and
any other state and local taxes collected by the department in respect
to which the provisions of this chapter apply, regardless of whether
the tax is denominated a tax, fee, charge, or some other term.
(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former
chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this
section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or
should have been aware of the unpaid tax liability of the limited
liability business entity.
(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this
section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to
be paid to the department the taxes due from the limited liability
business entity.
(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(a), a responsible
individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief
financial officer is liable under this section only for tax liability
accrued during the period that he or she was the chief executive or
chief financial officer. However, if the responsible individual had
the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability
business entity's taxes to the department during any period of time
that the person was not the chief executive or chief financial officer,
that individual is also liable for tax liability that became due during
the period that he or she had the duty to remit payment of the limited
liability business entity's taxes to the department but was not the
chief executive or chief financial officer.
(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section
only for tax liability that became due during the period he or she had
the ((control, supervision,)) responsibility((,)) or duty to ((act for
the corporation described in subsection (1) of this section, plus
interest and penalties on those taxes.
(3))) remit payment of the limited liability business entity's
taxes to the department.
(5) Persons ((liable under)) described in subsection (((1))) (3)(b)
of this section are exempt from liability under this section in
situations where nonpayment of the ((retail sales tax funds held in
trust)) limited liability business entity's taxes is due to reasons
beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.
(((4))) (6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment
under this section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW
82.32.160, 82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.
(((5) This section applies only in situations where the department
has determined that there is no reasonable means of collecting the
retail sales tax funds held in trust directly from the corporation.
(6))) (7) This section does not relieve the ((corporation or))
limited liability ((company)) business entity of ((other tax
liabilities)) its tax liability or otherwise impair other tax
collection remedies afforded by law.
(((7))) (8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this
chapter apply to collections under this section.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or
for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the
corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the
highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the
management of the company or organization.
(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a
corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations
or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers,
the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the
financial activities of the entire company or organization.
(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business
entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for
the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business
entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that
generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts,
obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business
entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited
liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures
in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited
liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or
more of the general partners are also limited liability business
entities.
(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.005.
(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.005, except that
the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability
companies.
(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a
corporation, including the president, vice-president, secretary, and
treasurer.
(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former
officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability
business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.
(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former
employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the
responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability
business entity's unpaid tax liability reflected in a tax warrant
issued by the department.
(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability
business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible
individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or
managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any
other limited liability business entity involved directly in the
management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection
(9)(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with
an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.
(h) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the
failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary
course of action.

PART VIII
Repealing the Business and Occupation Tax Credit for New Employment for
International Service Activities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 RCW 82.04.44525 (Credit -- New employment
for international service activities in eligible areas -- Designation of
census tracts for eligibility -- Records -- Tax due upon ineligibility -- Interest assessment -- Information from employment security department)
and 2009 c 535 s 1104, 2008 c 81 s 9, & 1998 c 313 s 2 are each
repealed.

PART IX
Rural County Tax Incentives
Sec. 901 RCW 82.60.020 and 2006 c 142 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(((5)))(4), other than that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part, or investment projects ((which)) that have already
received deferrals under this chapter.
(5) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes:
(a) Before July 1, 2010: (i) Computer programming, the production
of computer software, and other computer-related services, but only
when the computer programming, production of computer software, or
other computer-related services are performed by a manufacturer as
defined in RCW 82.04.110 and contribute to the production of a new,
different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal property
for sale; (ii) the activities performed by research and development
laboratories and commercial testing laboratories((,)); and (iii) the
conditioning of vegetable seeds; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010: (i) The activities performed by
research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories; and (ii) the conditioning of vegetable seeds.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
((and)) or research and development activities, including plant offices
and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(9) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(10) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(11) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(12) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun, but only when such
activities are intended to ultimately result in the production of a
new, different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal
property for sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 902 RCW 82.60.020 and 2010 c ... (SHB 3066) s 138 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(4), other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the
manufacturing site of ((which)) that the cogeneration project is an
integral part, or investment projects which have already received
deferrals under this chapter.
(5) "Initiation of construction" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.63.010.
(6) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(7) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes:
(a) Before July 1, 2010: (i) Computer programming, the production
of computer software, and other computer-related services, but only
when the computer programming, production of computer software, or
other computer-related services are performed by a manufacturer as
defined in RCW 82.04.110 and contribute to the production of a new,
different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal property
for sale; (ii) the activities performed by research and development
laboratories and commercial testing laboratories; and (iii) the
conditioning of vegetable seeds; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010: (i) The activities performed by
research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories; and (ii) the conditioning of vegetable seeds.
(8) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(9) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing
and research and development activities, including plant offices and
warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw material or
finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an integral part
of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for manufacturing or
research and development. If a building is used partly for
manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral must be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department.
(10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire
tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time position that
is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred fifty-five
hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours a year.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research and
development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment" includes:
Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory equipment;
manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving
parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all equipment
used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.
(13) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun, but only when such
activities are intended to ultimately result in the production of a
new, different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal
property for sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 903 RCW 82.62.010 and 2007 c 485 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
qualified employment positions at the specific facility will be at
least fifteen percent greater in the four consecutive full calendar
quarters after the calendar quarter during which the first qualified
employment position is filled than the applicant's average qualified
employment positions at the same facility in the four consecutive full
calendar quarters immediately preceding the calendar quarter during
which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(((5)))(4) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "First qualified employment position" means the first qualified
employment position filled for which a credit under this chapter is
sought.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes:
(a) Before July 1, 2010: (i) Computer programming, the production
of computer software, and other computer-related services, but only
when the computer programming, production of computer software, or
other computer-related services are performed by a manufacturer as
defined in RCW 82.04.110 and contribute to the production of a new,
different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal property
for sale; and (ii) the activities performed by research and development
laboratories and commercial testing laboratories; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010: (i) The activities performed by
research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories; and (ii) the conditioning of vegetable seeds.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8)(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the eligible business project during four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also
includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "full time" means a normal
work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(c) Once a permanent, full-time employee has been employed, a
position does not cease to be a qualified employment position solely
due to periods in which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the four-quarter period; and
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement permanent, full-time employee for the
position.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun, but only when such
activities are intended to ultimately result in the production of a
new, different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal
property for sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(11) "Seasonal employee" means an employee of a seasonal employer
who works on a seasonal basis. For the purposes of this subsection and
subsection (12) of this section, "seasonal basis" means a continuous
employment period of less than twelve consecutive months.
(12) "Seasonal employer" means a person who regularly hires more
than fifty percent of its employees to work on a seasonal basis.

Sec. 904 RCW 82.62.010 and 2010 c ... (E2SHB 1597) s 232 are each
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means an area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.
(4)(a) "Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research
and development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an
eligible area at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average
qualified employment positions at the specific facility will be at
least fifteen percent greater in the four consecutive full calendar
quarters after the calendar quarter during which the first qualified
employment position is filled than the applicant's average qualified
employment positions at the same facility in the four consecutive full
calendar quarters immediately preceding the calendar quarter during
which the first qualified employment position is filled.
(b) "Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in
RCW 82.16.010(4) or that portion of a business project creating
qualified full-time employment positions outside an eligible area.
(5) "First qualified employment position" means the first qualified
employment position filled for which a credit under this chapter is
sought.
(6) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes:
(a) Before July 1, 2010: (i) Computer programming, the production
of computer software, and other computer-related services, but only
when the computer programming, production of computer software, or
other computer-related services are performed by a manufacturer as
defined in RCW 82.04.110 and contribute to the production of a new,
different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal property
for sale; and (ii) the activities performed by research and development
laboratories and commercial testing laboratories; and
(b) Beginning July 1, 2010: (i) The activities performed by
research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories; and (ii) the conditioning of vegetable seeds.
(7) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(8)(a)(i) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee employed in the eligible business project during four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(ii) For seasonal employers, "qualified employment position" also
includes the equivalent of a full-time employee in work hours for four
consecutive full calendar quarters.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "full time" means a normal
work week of at least thirty-five hours.
(c) Once a permanent, full-time employee has been employed, a
position does not cease to be a qualified employment position solely
due to periods in which the position goes vacant, as long as:
(i) The cumulative period of any vacancies in that position is not
more than one hundred twenty days in the four-quarter period; and
(ii) During a vacancy, the employer is training or actively
recruiting a replacement permanent, full-time employee for the
position.
(9) "Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this
chapter.
(10) "Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun, but only when such
activities are intended to ultimately result in the production of a
new, different, or useful substance or article of tangible personal
property for sale. As used in this subsection, "commercial sales"
excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the total
gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do
not exceed one million dollars.
(11) "Seasonal employee" means an employee of a seasonal employer
who works on a seasonal basis. For the purposes of this subsection and
subsection (12) of this section, "seasonal basis" means a continuous
employment period of less than twelve consecutive months.
(12) "Seasonal employer" means a person who regularly hires more
than fifty percent of its employees to work on a seasonal basis.

PART X
Deductions, Fees, Dues, and Charges
Sec. 1001 RCW 82.04.4282 and 2009 c 535 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) dues and initiation fees paid to
nonprofit organizations exempt from the federal income tax under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(8), (c)(10), or
(c)(19) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended as of January
1, 2010, (2) ((dues, (3))) contributions, (((4))) (3) donations,
(((5))) (4) tuition fees, (((6))) (5) charges made by a nonprofit trade
or professional organization for attending or occupying space at a
trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by the
nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show,
convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public,
(((7))) (6) charges made for operation of privately operated
kindergartens, and (((8))) (7) endowment funds. This section may not
be construed to exempt any person, association, or society from tax
liability upon selling tangible personal property, digital goods,
digital codes, or digital automated services, or upon providing
facilities or other services for which a special charge is made to
members or others. If dues are in exchange for any significant amount
of goods or services rendered by the recipient thereof to members
without any additional charge to the member, or if the dues are
graduated upon the amount of goods or services rendered, the value of
such goods or services ((shall)) may not be considered as a deduction
under this section.
"Bona fide dues and initiation fees" means those amounts paid to
join or continue membership in an organization solely for the right to
associate with other members. Amounts paid to receive goods or
services in the future do not constitute bona fide dues or initiation
fees.

PART XI
Limiting the Bad Debt Deduction
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1101 The legislature intends with sections
1102 and 1103 of this act to supersede the holding of the supreme court
of the state of Washington in Puget Sound National Bank v. Department
of Revenue, 123 Wn.2d 284 (1994).

Sec. 1102 RCW 82.08.037 and 2007 c 6 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for sales taxes
previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
(2) For purposes of this section, "bad debts" does not include:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; ((and))
(c) Debts sold or assigned by the seller to third parties, where
the third party is without recourse against the seller; and
(d) Repossessed property.
(3) If a credit or refund of sales tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(4) Payments on a previously claimed bad debt are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the
sales or use tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges,
and any other charges.
(5) If the seller uses a certified service provider as defined in
RCW 82.32.020 to administer its sales tax responsibilities, the
certified service provider may claim, on behalf of the seller, the
credit or refund allowed by this section. The certified service
provider must credit or refund the full amount received to the seller.
(6) The department ((shall)) must allow an allocation of bad debts
among member states to the streamlined sales tax agreement, as defined
in RCW 82.58.010(1), if the books and records of the person claiming
bad debts support the allocation.
(7) A person's right to claim a credit or refund under this section
is not assignable. No person other than the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt or, as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, a certified service provider, is entitled to claim
a credit or refund under this section. If the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt has sold or assigned the debt
instrument to a third party with recourse, the original seller may
claim a credit or refund under this section only after the debt
instrument is reassigned by the third party to the original seller.

Sec. 1103 RCW 82.12.037 and 2007 c 6 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A seller is entitled to a credit or refund for use taxes
previously paid on bad debts, as that term is used in 26 U.S.C. Sec.
166, as amended or renumbered as of January 1, 2003.
(2) For purposes of this section, "bad debts" does not include:
(a) Amounts due on property that remains in the possession of the
seller until the full purchase price is paid;
(b) Expenses incurred in attempting to collect debt; ((and))
(c) Debts sold or assigned by the seller to third parties, where
the third party is without recourse against the seller; and
(d) Repossessed property.
(3) If a credit or refund of use tax is taken for a bad debt and
the debt is subsequently collected in whole or in part, the tax on the
amount collected must be paid and reported on the return filed for the
period in which the collection is made.
(4) Payments on a previously claimed bad debt are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the
sales or use tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges,
and any other charges.
(5) If the seller uses a certified service provider as defined in
RCW 82.32.020 to administer its use tax responsibilities, the certified
service provider may claim, on behalf of the seller, the credit or
refund allowed by this section. The certified service provider must
credit or refund the full amount received to the seller.
(6) The department ((shall)) must allow an allocation of bad debts
among member states to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, as
defined in RCW 82.58.010(1), if the books and records of the person
claiming bad debts support the allocation.
(7) A person's right to claim a credit or refund under this section
is not assignable. No person other than the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt or, as provided in subsection
(5) of this section, a certified service provider, is entitled to claim
a credit or refund under this section. If the original seller in the
transaction that generated the bad debt has sold or assigned the debt
instrument to a third party with recourse, the original seller may
claim a credit or refund under this section only after the debt
instrument is reassigned by the third party to the original seller.

PART XII
Livestock Nutrients
Sec. 1201 RCW 82.08.890 and 2009 c 469 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for sales made between July 1, 2010, and June 30, 2013,
the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to eligible
persons of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Labor and services rendered in respect to repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving of qualifying livestock nutrient
management facilities, or to tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of such facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the sale of or charge made for: (A) Labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new, or replacing previously
existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities; or (B)
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities during the course
of constructing new, or replacing previously existing, qualifying
livestock nutrient management facilities.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section
applies to sales made after the livestock nutrient management plan is:
(a) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (b) approved as part of the
permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (c) approved as required
under subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists of
eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section
to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy or
animal feeding operation and other information the department may
require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person: (i) Licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management
plan, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding
operation and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who
owns an animal feeding operation and has a nutrient management plan
approved by a conservation district as meeting natural resource
conservation service field office technical guide standards and who
possesses an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(d) "Handling and treatment of livestock manure" means the
activities of collecting, storing, moving, or transporting livestock
manure, separating livestock manure solids from liquids, or applying
livestock manure to the agricultural lands of an eligible person other
than through the use of pivot or linear type traveling irrigation
systems.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.
(f) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment" means the
following tangible personal property for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure, including repair and replacement
parts for such equipment: (i) Aerators; (ii) agitators; (iii) augers;
(iv) conveyers; (v) gutter cleaners; (vi) hard-hose reel traveler
irrigation systems; (vii) lagoon and pond liners and floating covers;
(viii) loaders; (ix) manure composting devices; (x) manure spreaders;
(xi) manure tank wagons; (xii) manure vacuum tanks; (xiii) poultry
house cleaners; (xiv) poultry house flame sterilizers; (xv) poultry
house washers; (xvi) poultry litter saver machines; (xvii) pipes;
(xviii) pumps; (xix) scrapers; (xx) separators; (xxi) slurry injectors
and hoses; and (xxii) wheelbarrows, shovels, and pitchforks.
(g) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities" means the
following structures and facilities for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure: (i) Flush systems; (ii) lagoons;
(iii) liquid livestock manure storage structures, such as concrete
tanks or glass-lined steel tanks; and (iv) structures used solely for
the dry storage of manure, including roofed stacking facilities.

Sec. 1202 RCW 82.12.890 and 2009 c 469 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities in the
course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of such
facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the use of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities during the course of constructing new, or replacing
previously existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
and labor and services made after the livestock nutrient management
plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) approved as part
of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) approved as
required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.
(4) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to the
use of tangible personal property and services described in subsection
(1)(a), (b), and (c)(i) of this section if first use of the property or
services occurs in this state between July 1, 2010, and June 30, 2013.

PART XIII
PUD Privilege Tax Clarification
Sec. 1301 RCW 54.28.011 and 1957 c 278 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Gross revenue" ((shall)) means the amount received from the sale
of electric energy, which also includes any regularly recurring charge
billed to consumers as a condition of receiving electric energy, and
excluding any tax levied by a municipal corporation upon the district
pursuant to RCW 54.28.070.

PART XIV
Repealing the Sales Tax Exemption for Coal Used at Coal-Fired Thermal
Electric Generation Facilities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1401 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication -- Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4; and
(2) RCW 82.12.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication -- Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 6.

PART XV
Sales and Use Tax Exemptions for Machinery
and Equipment Used in Renewable Energy Generation
Sec. 1501 RCW 82.08.962 and 2009 c 469 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 82.08.963, purchasers who have
paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass
energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Except for energy generated by wind, beginning on July 1, 2009,
through June 30, 2011, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to the sale of machinery and equipment described in (a) of this
subsection that are used directly in generating electricity or to sales
of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment.
(c)(i) For energy generated by wind, except as provided otherwise
in (ii) of this subsection (c), beginning on July 1, 2010, through June
30, 2011, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
a local electric utility, or to a person contracting with a local
electric utility for the sale of electric power generated by a facility
containing such machinery and equipment, of machinery and equipment
described in (a) of this subsection that are used directly in
generating electricity or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(ii) Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in (i) of this
subsection (1)(c), and regardless of the identity of the purchaser, any
project using wind to generate electricity may receive the exemption
from sales tax provided under this subsection (1)(c) if construction of
the project began by December 31, 2010.
(d) Except for energy generated by wind, beginning on July 1, 2011,
through June 30, 2013, the amount of the exemption under this
subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local
sales tax paid. The purchaser is eligible for an exemption under this
subsection (1)(d) in the form of a remittance.
(e)(i) For energy generated by wind, except as provided otherwise
in (ii) of this subsection (e), beginning on July 1, 2011, through June
30, 2013, the amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is
equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid by
a local electric utility for such machinery and equipment, or to a
person contracting with a local electric utility for the sale of
electric power generated by a facility containing such machinery and
equipment. The purchaser is eligible for an exemption under this
subsection (1)(((c))) (e) in the form of a remittance.
(ii) Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in (i) of this
subsection (1)(e), and regardless of the identity of the purchaser, any
project using wind to generate electricity may receive the exemption
from sales tax provided under this subsection (1)(e) if construction of
the project began by December 31, 2010.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.962, the following
definitions apply:
(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) By-products of pulping and wood
manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic fuels
from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition or
construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from algae
and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids; and
(x) yard waste. "Biomass energy" does not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests; or municipal solid waste.
(b) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst.
(c) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel, of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 of the federal
internal revenue code, collected from a "landfill" as defined under RCW
70.95.030.
(d)(i) "Machinery and equipment" means fixtures, devices, and
support facilities that are integral and necessary to the generation of
electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power.
(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (A) Hand-powered
tools; (B) property with a useful life of less than one year; (C)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (D) replacement parts that do not increase productivity,
improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and
equipment; (E) buildings; or (F) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are
permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(e) "Local electric utility" means an electrical company whose
rates are regulated by the Washington utilities and transportation
commission under chapter 80.28 RCW; a municipal electric utility formed
under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54
RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, or a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, that is engaged in the
business of distributing electricity to more than one retail electric
customer in the state; and a joint operating agency formed under
chapter 43.52 RCW.
(f) "Person" means the same as defined under RCW 82.04.030.
(g) "Construction of the project began" has the same meaning as
Section 1603(a)(2) of P.L. 111-5, the American recovery and
reinvestment act, and subsequent guidance provided by the United States
department of the treasury.
(3)(a) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by wind energy, solar energy, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas power if
it provides any part of the process that captures the energy of the
wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources,
anaerobic digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy
from exhaust, or landfill gas, converts that energy to electricity, and
stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(b) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by fuel cells if it provides any part of the process that
captures the energy of the fuel, converts that energy to electricity,
and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(4)(a) A purchaser claiming an exemption in the form of a
remittance under subsection (1)(((c))) (d) of this section must pay the
tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes
imposed under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The
purchaser may then apply to the department for remittance in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. A purchaser may not apply for a
remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter.
The purchaser must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The purchaser
must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the purchaser is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the purchaser, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying purchasers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2013.

Sec. 1502 RCW 82.12.962 and 2009 c 469 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 82.12.963, consumers who have paid
the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 on machinery and equipment used
directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass
energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Except for energy generated by wind, beginning on July 1, 2009,
through June 30, 2011, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in
respect to the use of machinery and equipment described in (a) of this
subsection that are used directly in generating electricity or to sales
of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment.
(c)(i) For energy generated by wind, except as provided otherwise
in (ii) of this subsection (c), beginning on July 1, 2010, through June
30, 2011, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use by a local electric utility, or by a person contracting with a
local electric utility for the sale of electric power generated by a
facility containing such machinery and equipment, of machinery and
equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are used directly in
generating electricity or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(ii) Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in (i) of this
subsection (1)(c), and regardless of the identity of the purchaser, any
project using wind to generate electricity may receive the exemption
from sales tax provided under this subsection (1)(c) if construction of
the project began by December 31, 2010.
(d) Except for energy generated by wind, beginning on July 1, 2011,
through June 30, 2013, the amount of the exemption under this
subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local
sales tax paid. The purchaser is eligible for an exemption under this
subsection (1)(d) in the form of a remittance.
(e)(i) For energy generated by wind, except as provided otherwise
in (ii) of this subsection (e), beginning on July 1, 2011, through June
30, 2013, the amount of the exemption under this subsection (1) is
equal to seventy-five percent of the state and local sales tax paid by
a local electric utility for such machinery and equipment, or to a
person contracting with a local electric utility for the sale of
electric power generated by a facility containing such machinery and
equipment. The consumer is eligible for an exemption under this
subsection (1)(((c))) (e) in the form of a remittance.
(ii) Notwithstanding the limitations set forth in (i) of this
subsection (1)(e), and regardless of the identity of the purchaser, any
project using wind to generate electricity may receive the exemption
from sales tax provided under this subsection (1)(e) if construction of
the project began by December 31, 2010.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption in the form of a remittance
under subsection (1)(((c))) (e) of this section must pay the tax
imposed by RCW 82.12.020 and all applicable local use taxes imposed
under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The consumer may
then apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. A consumer may not apply for a
remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter.
The consumer must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The consumer must retain, in adequate detail, records to
enable the department to determine whether the consumer is entitled to
an exemption under this section, including: Invoices; proof of tax
paid; and documents describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the consumer, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying consumers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(3) Purchases exempt under RCW 82.08.962 are also exempt from the
tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020.
(4) The definitions in RCW 82.08.962 apply to this section.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2013.

PART XVI
Property Management Salaries
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1601 RCW 82.04.394 (Exemptions -- Amounts
received by property management company for on-site personnel) and 1998
c 338 s 2 are each repealed.

PART XVII
Repealing the Sales and Use Tax Exemption on Bottled Water
Sec. 1701 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2009 c 483 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of food and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means
substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or
dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and
are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food
ingredients" does not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to prepared
food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements.
(a) "Prepared food" means:
(i) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(ii) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(iii) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(A) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(B) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(b) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(i) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(ii) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(iii) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(d) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(e) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a sealed
container or package for human consumption or other consumer uses.
Bottled water is calorie free and does not contain sweeteners or other
additives except that it may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii)
fluoride; (iii) carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes;
(v) oxygen; (vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts,
or essences derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes
water that is delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is
not sold with the water.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section shall
apply to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal
revenue code, as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under ((Title)) 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1485 ((of the federal internal revenue code)); and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under Title 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes of RCW
82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) This subsection (4) does not apply to hot prepared food and
food ingredients, other than food and food ingredients which are heated
after they have been dispensed from the vending machine.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 1702 RCW 82.08.0293 and 2010 c ... (E2SHB 1597) s 216 are
each amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of food
and food ingredients. "Food and food ingredients" means substances,
whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated
form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed
for their taste or nutritional value. "Food and food ingredients" does
not include:
(a) "Alcoholic beverages," which means beverages that are suitable
for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of
alcohol by volume; and
(b) "Tobacco," which means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe
tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to prepared food, soft
drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. For purposes of this
subsection, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Dietary supplement" means any product, other than tobacco,
intended to supplement the diet that:
(i) Contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients:
(A) A vitamin;
(B) A mineral;
(C) An herb or other botanical;
(D) An amino acid;
(E) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by
increasing the total dietary intake; or
(F) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination
of any ingredient described in this subsection;
(ii) Is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel,
gelcap, or liquid form, or if not intended for ingestion in such form,
is not represented as conventional food and is not represented for use
as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; and
(iii) Is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement,
identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label as
required pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Sec. 101.36, as amended or renumbered as
of January 1, 2003.
(b)(i) "Prepared food" means:
(A) Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;
(B) Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or
straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food; or
(C) Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller
for sale as a single item, except:
(I) Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller; or
(II) Raw eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw
animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the
federal food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11 of The
Food Code, published by the food and drug administration, as amended or
renumbered as of January 1, 2003, so as to prevent foodborne illness.
(ii) "Prepared food" does not include the following food or food
ingredients, if the food or food ingredients are sold without eating
utensils provided by the seller:
(A) Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American
industry classification system (NAICS) classification is manufacturing
in sector 311, except subsector 3118 (bakeries), as provided in the
"North American industry classification system -- United States, 2002";
(B) Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single
item; or
(C) Bakery items. The term "bakery items" includes bread, rolls,
buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes,
tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, or tortillas.
(c) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural
or artificial sweeteners. Soft drinks do not include beverages that
contain: Milk or milk products; soy, rice, or similar milk
substitutes; or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice
by volume.
(d) "Bottled water" means water that is placed in a sealed
container or package for human consumption or other consumer uses.
Bottled water is calorie free and does not contain sweeteners or other
additives except that it may contain: (i) Antimicrobial agents; (ii)
fluoride; (iii) carbonation; (iv) vitamins, minerals, and electrolytes;
(v) oxygen; (vi) preservatives; and (vii) only those flavors, extracts,
or essences derived from a spice or fruit. "Bottled water" includes
water that is delivered to the buyer in a reusable container that is
not sold with the water.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
applies to food and food ingredients that are furnished, prepared, or
served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) That are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" means a facility:
(i) That meets the definition of a qualified low-income housing
project under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42 of the federal internal revenue code,
as existing on August 1, 2009;
(ii) That has been partially funded under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485 ((of
the federal internal revenue code)); and
(iii) For which the lessor or operator has at any time been
entitled to claim a federal income tax credit under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 42
of the federal internal revenue code.
(4)(a) Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail
sale of food and food ingredients is subject to sales tax under RCW
82.08.020 if the food and food ingredients are sold through a vending
machine. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the selling
price of food and food ingredients sold through a vending machine for
purposes of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.
(b) For soft drinks and hot prepared food and food ingredients,
other than food and food ingredients which are heated after they have
been dispensed from the vending machine, the selling price is the total
gross receipts of such sales divided by the sum of one plus the sales
tax rate expressed as a decimal.
(c) For tax collected under this subsection (4), the requirements
that the tax be collected from the buyer and that the amount of tax be
stated as a separate item are waived.

Sec. 1703 RCW 82.12.0293 and 2009 c 483 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply in
respect to the use of food and food ingredients for human consumption.
"Food and food ingredients" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) The exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided for in
subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) does not apply to prepared
food, soft drinks, bottled water, or dietary supplements. "Prepared
food," "soft drinks," ((and)) "dietary supplements," and "bottled
water" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0293.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the
exemption of "food and food ingredients" provided in this section
((shall apply)) applies to food and food ingredients which are
furnished, prepared, or served as meals:
(a) Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as
provided for in the older Americans act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW
74.38.040(6);
(b) Which are provided to senior citizens, individuals with
disabilities, or low-income persons by a not-for-profit organization
organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW; or
(c) That are provided to residents, sixty-two years of age or
older, of a qualified low-income senior housing facility by the lessor
or operator of the facility. The sale of a meal that is billed to both
spouses of a marital community or both domestic partners of a domestic
partnership meets the age requirement in this subsection (3)(c) if at
least one of the spouses or domestic partners is at least sixty-two
years of age. For purposes of this subsection, "qualified low-income
senior housing facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.0293.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1704 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of bottled
water for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant
to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease or medical condition. "Prescription" means an
order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written,
electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly licensed
practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1705 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of bottled water for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to
patients, pursuant to a prescription for use in the cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease or medical condition.
"Prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of
oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly
licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to
prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1706 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
bottled water for human use to persons who do not otherwise have a
readily available source of potable water and who provide the seller
with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) The department may waive the requirement for an exemption
certificate in the event of disaster or similar circumstance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1707 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of bottled water for human use by persons who do not otherwise have
a readily available source of potable water.

PART XVIII
Temporarily Increasing the Business and Occupation Tax on Service
Businesses while Increasing the Small Business Credit for the Same
Businesses
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1801 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional
rate of tax of .25 percent is added to the rate provided for in RCW
82.04.285 and 82.04.290(2)(a).
(2) The additional rate in subsection (1) of this section does not
apply to persons engaged in the business of scientific research and
development services including but not limited to research and
development in the physical, engineering, and life sciences (such as
agriculture, bacteriological, biotechnology, chemical, life sciences,
and physical science research and development laboratories or services)
and research and development in the social sciences and humanities
(such as archaeological, behavioral, cognitive, economic, language, and
learning research or development services).

Sec. 1802 RCW 82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed against the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter, as
provided in this section. The maximum credit for a taxpayer, except
for taxpayers subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2)(a) and 82.04.285,
for a reporting period is thirty-five dollars multiplied by the number
of months in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
The maximum credit for a taxpayer, which reports at least fifty percent
of its taxable income under RCW 82.04.290(2)(a) and 82.04.285, for a
reporting period is seventy dollars multiplied by the number of months
in the reporting period, as determined under RCW 82.32.045.
(2) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter is
equal to or less than the maximum credit, a credit is allowed equal to
the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter.
(3) When the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter exceeds
the maximum credit, a reduced credit is allowed equal to twice the
maximum credit, minus the tax otherwise due under this chapter, but not
less than zero.
(4) The department may prepare a tax credit table consisting of tax
ranges using increments of no more than five dollars and a
corresponding tax credit to be applied to those tax ranges. The table
shall be prepared in such a manner that no taxpayer will owe a greater
amount of tax by using the table than would be owed by performing the
calculation under subsections (1) through (3) of this section. A table
prepared by the department under this subsection ((shall)) must be used
by all taxpayers in taking the credit provided in this section.

Sec. 1803 RCW 82.32.045 and 2006 c 256 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2) The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of
taxpayers from the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the
return to cover other longer reporting periods, but in no event may
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. For these
taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before the last day of the month
next succeeding the end of the period covered by the return.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twenty-eight thousand dollars per
year, except for businesses paying at least fifty percent of their tax
under RCW 82.04.290(2)(a) and 82.04.285, the amount of business
activities taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW is less than fifty-six
thousand dollars per year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

PART XIX
Temporarily Increasing the Sales Tax for Educational Purposes While
Providing a Working Family Tax Exemption
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1901 The legislature finds that the economic
crisis has impacted the many Washington families which do not earn
enough annually to keep pace with increasing health care, child care,
and work-related expenses. The legislature further finds that revenues
are insufficient to maintain necessary funding for education, public
safety, health care, and safety net services for elderly, disabled, and
vulnerable people during the unprecedented economic crisis in the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to provide a means to stabilize revenue collections by imposing a
temporary sales and use tax. It is also the legislature's intent to
provide relief to lower-income working families in Washington in the
form of a sales and use tax exemption.

Sec. 1902 RCW 82.08.020 and 2009 c 469 s 802 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) From June 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, in addition to the tax
imposed upon each retail sale in this state set forth in subsection (1)
of this section, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to two-tenths of one percent of the selling price.
(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the performance audits of government account
created in RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8)(a) Until January 1, 2011, the tax imposed in subsection
(3) of this section and the dedication of revenue provided for in
subsection (((5))) (6) of this section((,)) do not apply with respect
to the sales of new passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty
passenger vehicles, which utilize hybrid technology and have a United
States environmental protection agency estimated highway gasoline
mileage rating of at least forty miles per gallon.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hybrid technology" means
propulsion units powered by both electricity and gasoline.
(((8))) (9) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 1903 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected an additional
tax on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection ((shall)) must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) From June 1, 2010, until June 30, 2013, in addition to the tax
imposed upon each retail sale in this state set forth in subsection (1)
of this section, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to two-tenths of one percent of the selling price. During any period in which
the tax in this subsection (5) is imposed beyond June 30, 2013, no
member of the legislature shall receive any allowances for expenses
under Title 44 RCW, including per diem expenses and quarterly expense
allowances.
(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
dedicated to funding comprehensive performance audits required under
RCW 43.09.470. The revenue identified in this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the performance audits of government account
created in RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter ((shall)) apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 1904 RCW 44.04.120 and 2009 c 549 s 6002 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 82.08.020(5), each member of the senate
or house of representatives when serving on official legislative
business shall be entitled to receive, in lieu of per diem or any other
payment, for each day or major portion thereof in which he or she is
actually engaged in legislative business or business of the committee,
commission, or council, notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, an
allowance in an amount fixed by the secretary of the senate and chief
clerk of the house, respectively, in accordance with applicable rules
and resolutions of each body. Such allowance shall be reasonably
calculated to reimburse expenses, exclusive of mileage, which are
ordinary and necessary in the conduct of legislative business,
recognizing cost variances which are encountered in different locales.
The allowance authorized shall not exceed the greater of forty-four
dollars per day or the maximum daily amount determined under RCW
43.03.050, as now or hereafter amended. In addition, a mileage
allowance shall be paid at the rate per mile provided for in RCW
43.03.060, as now or hereafter amended, when authorized by the house,
committee, commission, or council of which he or she is a member and on
the business of which he or she is engaged.

Sec. 1905 RCW 82.08.0206 and 2008 c 325 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A working families' tax exemption, in the form of a remittance
tax due under this chapter and chapter 82.12 RCW, is provided to
eligible low-income persons for sales taxes paid under this chapter
after January 1, ((2008)) 2011.
(2) For purposes of the exemption in this section, an eligible low-income person is:
(a) An individual, or an individual and that individual's spouse if
they file a federal joint income tax return;
(b) (([An individual who])) An individual who is eligible for, and
is granted, the credit provided in ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the
federal internal revenue code; and
(c) (([An individual who])) An individual who properly files a
federal income tax return as a Washington resident, and has been a
resident of the state of Washington more than one hundred eighty days
of the year for which the exemption is claimed.
(3) ((For remittances made in 2009 and 2010, the working families'
tax exemption for the prior year is a retail sales tax exemption equal
to the greater of five percent of the credit granted as a result of
Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 in the most recent year for which data is
available or twenty-five dollars))
(a) For remittances made in 2012, the working families' tax
exemption for the prior year is a retail sales tax exemption equal to
the greater of five percent of the credit granted as a result of 26
U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the federal internal revenue code in the most recent
year for which data is available or twenty-five dollars.
(b) For ((2011)) 2013 and thereafter, the working families' tax
exemption for the prior year is equal to the greater of ten percent of
the credit granted as a result of ((Title)) 26 U.S.C. Sec. 32 of the
federal internal revenue code in the most recent year for which data is
available or fifty dollars.
(4) For any fiscal period, the working families' tax exemption
authorized under this section ((shall)) must be approved by the
legislature in the state omnibus appropriations act before persons may
claim the exemption during the fiscal period.
(5) The working families' tax exemption ((shall)) must be
administered as provided in this subsection.
(a) An eligible low-income person claiming an exemption under this
section must pay the tax imposed under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14
RCW in the year for which the exemption is claimed. The eligible low-income person may then apply to the department for the remittance as
calculated under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Application ((shall)) must be made to the department in a form
and manner determined by the department, ((but the)) except for the
following:
(i) The department must provide alternative filing methods for
applicants who do not have access to electronic filing; and
(ii) The department is directed to implement joint filing for
exemptions claimed under this section in 2012 and thereafter with the
federal joint income tax return, provided approval is granted by the
internal revenue service.
(c) Application for the exemption remittance under this section
must be made in the year following the year for which the federal
return was filed, but in no case may any remittance be provided for any
period before January 1, ((2008)) 2011. The department may use the
best available data to process the exemption remittance. The
department ((shall)) must begin accepting applications ((October 1,
2009)) January 1, 2012.
(d) The department ((shall)) must review the application and
determine eligibility for the working families' tax exemption based on
information provided by the applicant and through audit and other
administrative records, including, when it deems it necessary,
verification through internal revenue service data.
(e) The department ((shall)) must remit the exempted amounts to
eligible low-income persons who submitted applications. Remittances
may be made by electronic funds transfer or other means.
(f) The department may, in conjunction with other agencies or
organizations, design and implement a public information campaign to
inform potentially eligible persons of the existence of and
requirements for this exemption.
(g) The department may contact persons who appear to be eligible
low-income persons as a result of information received from the
internal revenue service under such conditions and requirements as the
internal revenue service may by law require.
(6) The provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the exemption in
this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.
(8) For the remittances provided in fiscal year 2015 and
thereafter, the department ((shall)) must limit its ongoing costs
((for)) to administer the exemption program to ((the initial start-up
costs to implement the program. The state omnibus appropriations act
shall specify funding to be used for the ongoing administrative costs
of the program. These ongoing administrative costs include, but are
not limited to, costs for: The processing of internet and mail
applications, verification of application claims, compliance and
collections, additional full-time employees at the department's call
center, processing warrants, updating printed materials and web
information, media advertising, and support and maintenance of computer
systems)) no more than five percent of the total exemptions provided
each year.

Sec. 1906 RCW 82.08.064 and 2003 c 361 s 304 and 2003 c 168 s 205
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW shall be imposed (a) no sooner than seventy-five days after
its enactment into law and (b) only on the first day of January, April,
July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 301, chapter 361, Laws of 2003 or to the tax rate
changes in sections 1902 and 1903 of this act.
(3)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

Sec. 1907 RCW 36.100.040 and 2008 c 137 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A public facilities district may impose an excise tax on the
sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is subject to
tax under chapter 82.08 RCW, except that no such tax may be levied on
any premises having fewer than forty lodging units. However, if a
public facilities district has not imposed such an excise tax prior to
December 31, 1995, the public facilities district may only impose the
excise tax if a ballot proposition authorizing the imposition of the
tax has been approved by a simple majority vote of voters of the public
facilities district voting on the proposition.
(2) The rate of the tax ((shall)) may not exceed two percent and
the proceeds of the tax shall only be used for the acquisition, design,
construction, remodeling, maintenance, equipping, reequipping,
repairing, and operation of its public facilities. This excise tax
((shall)) may not be imposed until the district has approved the
proposal to acquire, design, and construct the public facilities.
(3) A public facilities district may not impose the tax authorized
in this section if, after the tax authorized in this section was
imposed, the effective combined rate of state and local excise taxes,
including sales and use taxes and excise taxes on lodging, imposed on
the sale of or charge made for furnishing of lodging in any
jurisdiction in the public facilities district exceeds eleven and one-half percent.
(4) In determining the effective combined rate of tax, the tax rate
under RCW 82.08.020(5) is not included.
(5) The tax imposed in this section does not apply to sales of
temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997.

Sec. 1908 RCW 67.28.181 and 2004 c 79 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any municipality may impose an excise
tax on the sale of or charge made for the furnishing of lodging that is
subject to tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. The rate of tax ((shall)) may
not exceed the lesser of two percent or a rate that, when combined with
all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging within the municipality
under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW,
equals twelve percent. A tax under this chapter ((shall)) may not be
imposed in increments smaller than tenths of a percent.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100 or both with a total rate exceeding four
percent before July 27, 1997, such total authorization ((shall)) must
continue through January 31, 1999, and thereafter the municipality may
impose a tax under this section at a rate not exceeding the rate
actually imposed by the municipality on January 31, 1999.
(b) If a city or town, other than a municipality imposing a tax
under (a) of this subsection, is located in a county that imposed taxes
under this chapter with a total rate of four percent or more on January
1, 1997, the city or town may not impose a tax under this section.
(c) If a city has a population of four hundred thousand or more and
is located in a county with a population of one million or more, the
rate of tax imposed under this chapter by the city ((shall)) may not
exceed the lesser of four percent or a rate that, when combined with
all other taxes imposed upon sales of lodging in the municipality under
this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.40, 82.08, and 82.14 RCW, equals
fifteen and two-tenths percent.
(d) If a municipality was authorized to impose taxes under this
chapter or RCW 67.40.100, or both, at a rate equal to six percent
before January 1, 1998, the municipality may impose a tax under this
section at a rate not exceeding the rate actually imposed by the
municipality on January 1, 1998.
(3) Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section
shall contain a provision allowing a credit against the county tax for
the full amount of any city or town tax imposed under this section upon
the same taxable event.
(4) In determining the effective combined rate of tax, the tax rate
under RCW 82.08.020(5) is not included.

Sec. 1909 RCW 82.14.410 and 2001 c 6 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A local sales and use tax change adopted after December 1,
2000, must provide an exemption for those sales of lodging for which,
but for the exemption, the total sales tax rate imposed on sales of
lodging would exceed the greater of:
(a) Twelve percent; or
(b) The total sales tax rate that would have applied to the sale of
lodging if the sale were made on December 1, 2000.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Local sales and use tax change" is defined as provided in RCW
82.14.055.
(b) "Sale of lodging" means the sale of or charge made for the
furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel, rooming house,
tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of any similar
license to use real property.
(c) "Total sales tax rate" means the combined rates of all state
and local taxes imposed under this chapter and chapters 36.100, 67.28,
67.40, and 82.08 RCW, and any other tax authorized after March 29,
2001, if the tax is in the nature of a sales tax collected from the
buyer, but excluding taxes imposed under RCW 81.104.170 before December
1, 2000, and taxes imposed under RCW 82.08.020(5).

PART XX
Miscellaneous Provisions
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, if any provision of sections 101 through 110 of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of sections 101 through 110 of this act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.
(2) If a court of competent jurisdiction, in a final judgment not
subject to appeal, adjudges any provision of section 104(1)(c) of this
act unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, sections 101 through 110 of
this act are null and void in their entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 Sections 101 through 110 of this act
apply with respect to gross income of the business, as defined in RCW
82.04.080, including gross income from royalties as defined in RCW
82.04.2907, generated on and after June 1, 2010. For purposes of
calculating the thresholds in section 104(1)(c) of this act for the
2010 tax year, property, payroll, and receipts are based on the entire
2010 tax year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 Sections 201 through 212 of this act must
be construed liberally to effectuate the legislature's intent to ensure
that all businesses and individuals pay their fair share of taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, section 201 of this act applies to tax periods
beginning January 1, 2006.
(2) Section 201 of this act does not apply to any tax periods
ending before July 1, 2010, that were included in a completed field
audit conducted by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 Sections 302 and 502 of this act apply
both retroactively and prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 Section 302 of this act does not affect
any final judgments, not subject to appeal, entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 Sections 601 and 602 of this act apply to
transfers or conveyances as described in RCW 82.45.010(3)(i) occurring
on and after June 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 Sections 301, 302, and 2005 of this act
are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 Except as otherwise provided in this act,
this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 Section 409 of this act takes effect July
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 Sections 403, 405, 407, 414, and 901 of
this act expire June 10, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 Sections 404, 406, 408, 415, and 902 of
this act take effect June 10, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 Section 408 of this act expires July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 Sections 502 and 903 of this act expire
July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 Sections 503 and 904 of this act take
effect July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 Sections 1102 and 1103 of this act apply
to claims for credit or refund filed with the department of revenue
after June 30, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 Section 1301 of this act applies
prospectively only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 Part XVII of this act expires June 1,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 Section 1902 of this act expires January
1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 Section 1903 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 Sections 1701 and 1703 through 1706 of
this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect May 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 Section 1701 of this act expires July 1,
2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 Section 1702 of this act takes effect
July 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 In accordance with Article VIII, section
5 of the state Constitution, sections 502, 503, and 2005 of this act do
not authorize refunds of business and occupation tax validly collected
before July 1, 2010, on amounts received by an individual from a
corporation as compensation for serving as a member of that
corporation's board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---