BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to the major industrial development allowed under
RCW 36.70A.365 and 36.70A.367, a county planning under RCW 36.70A.040
that meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section may
establish, in consultation with cities consistent with RCW 36.70A.210,
a process for designating a master planned location for major
auctioneering activity outside urban growth areas, and regardless of
any underlying landuse designation. Once a master planned location is
designated, it shall be considered an urban growth area retained for
purposes of promoting major auctioneering activity.
(2) This section applies to a county that, at the time the process
is established in subsection (1) of this section, has or is adjacent to
a county that has an industrial equipment auction yard within fifty
miles of the master planned location, and the master planned location
is currently and planned to be located within two miles of the
Interstate 5 corridor.
(3) Designation of a master planned location for major
auctioneering activities under subsection (1) of this section is an
amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted under RCW 36.70A.070, and
the comprehensive plan does not require further amendment. The process
established under subsection (1) of this section for designating a
master planned location for major auctioneering activity must include,
but is not limited to, the following comprehensive plan policy
criteria:
(a) The master planned location must be located on lands: That
consist of an aggregation of land of one hundred fifty or more acres,
which is not required to be contiguous; and that are suitable for major
auctioneering activity;
(b) New infrastructure is provided for;
(c) Environmental review of a proposed designation of a master
planned location must be at the programmatic level, as long as the
environmental review of a proposed designation that is being reviewed
concurrent with a proposed major auctioneering activity is at the
project level;
(d) The site is used no more than eight times per year to conduct
major auctioneering activity. The full-time, annual, on-site employees
do not exceed sixty persons.
The maximum number of members of the public on the site at any one
time does not exceed five thousand;
(e) Urban growth will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(f) Commercial development within a master planned location must be
directly related to the major auctioneering activity. Commercial uses
other than major auctioneering activity shall not exceed ten percent of
the total gross area of the development.
(4) Final approval of the designation of a master planned location
designated under subsection (3) of this section is subject to appeal
under RCW 36.70B.120.
(5) RCW 36.70A.365, 36.70A.367, and 36.70A.368 do not apply to the
designation of master planned locations or the review and approval of
specific major auctioneering activities under this section.
(6) "Major auctioneering activity" means the business of conducting
auctions by an "auction company," as defined in RCW 18.11.050, for
which the goods primarily offered for sale are industrial equipment,
and for which the gross annual sales at the master planned location are
expected to exceed ten million dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.157.010 and 2004 c 275 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.76.210,
28C.18.080, 43.21A.350, ((47.06.030,)) and 90.58.100 ((and)) an
industrial project of statewide significance is a border crossing
project that involves both private and public investments carried out
in conjunction with adjacent states or provinces or a private
industrial development with private capital investment in
manufacturing, auctioneering, or research and development. To qualify
as an industrial project of statewide significance: (a) The project
must be completed after January 1, 1997; (b) the applicant must submit
an application for designation as an industrial project of statewide
significance to the department of community, trade, and economic
development; and (c) the project must have:
(i) In counties with a population of less than or equal to twenty
thousand, a capital investment of twenty million dollars;
(ii) In counties with a population of greater than twenty thousand
but no more than fifty thousand, a capital investment of fifty million
dollars;
(iii) In counties with a population of greater than fifty thousand
but no more than one hundred thousand, a capital investment of one
hundred million dollars;
(iv) In counties with a population of greater than one hundred
thousand but no more than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of
two hundred million dollars;
(v) In counties with a population of greater than two hundred
thousand but no more than four hundred thousand, a capital investment
of four hundred million dollars;
(vi) In counties with a population of greater than four hundred
thousand but no more than one million, a capital investment of six
hundred million dollars;
(vii) In counties with a population of greater than one million, a
capital investment of one billion dollars;
(viii) In counties with fewer than one hundred persons per square
mile as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of fifty or greater;
(ix) In counties with one hundred or more persons per square mile
as determined annually by the office of financial management and
published by the department of revenue effective for the period July
1st through June 30th, projected full-time employment positions after
completion of construction of one hundred or greater; or
(x) Been designated by the director of community, trade, and
economic development as an industrial project of statewide significance
either: (A) Because the county in which the project is to be located
is a distressed county and the economic circumstances of the county
merit the additional assistance such designation will bring; or (B)
because the impact on a region due to the size and complexity of the
project merits such designation.
(2) The term manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned it in
RCW ((82.61.010)) 82.62.010.
(3) The term auctioneering shall have the meaning assigned to major
auctioneering activity in section 1 of this act.
(4) The term research and development shall have the meaning
assigned it in RCW ((82.61.010)) 82.62.010.
(((4))) (5) The term applicant means a person applying to the
department of community, trade, and economic development for
designation of a development project as an industrial project of
statewide significance.

--- END ---