BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2009 c 5 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE EMPLOYMENT. (1) From February 18, 2009, until July 1, 2009,
and consistent with the governor's directive dated August 4, 2008,
state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches
shall not establish new staff positions or fill vacant existing staff
positions except as specifically authorized by this section.
(2) The following activities of state agencies are exempt from
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Direct custody, supervision, and patient care in corrections,
juvenile rehabilitation, institutional care of veterans, the mentally
ill, developmentally disabled, state hospitals, the special commitment
center, and the schools for the blind and the deaf;
(b) Direct protective services to children and other vulnerable
populations in the department of social and health services;
(c) Washington state patrol investigative services and field
enforcement;
(d) Hazardous materials response and emergency cleanup;
(e) Emergency public health and patient safety response and the
public health laboratory;
(f) Military operations and emergency management within the
military department;
(g) Firefighting;
(h) Enforcement officers in the department of fish and wildlife,
the liquor control board, the gambling commission, and the department
of natural resources;
(i) Park rangers at the parks and recreation commission;
(j) Seasonal employment by natural resources agencies to the extent
that employment levels do not exceed the prior fiscal year;
(k) Seasonal employment in the department of transportation
maintenance programs to the extent that employment levels do not exceed
the prior fiscal year;
(l) Employees hired on a seasonal basis by the department of
agriculture for inspection and certification of agricultural products
and for insect detection;
(m) Activities directly related to tax and fee collection, revenue
generation, auditing, and recovery;
(n) In institutions of higher education, any positions directly
related to academic programs, ((as well as)) positions not funded from
state funds or tuition, positions that are filled by enrolled students
at their own institution as student workers, positions in campus police
and security, positions related to emergency management and response,
and positions related to student health care and counseling;
(o) Operations of the state lottery and liquor control board
business enterprises;
(p) The unemployment insurance program of the employment security
department; and
(q) Activities that are necessary to receive or maintain federal
funds by the state.
(3) The exemptions specified in subsection (2) of this section do
not require the establishment of new staff positions or the filling of
vacant existing staff positions in the activities specified.
(4) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 10,
chapter 5, Laws of 2009 and section 5 of this act.

Sec. 2 2009 c 5 s 7 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
PERSONAL SERVICES CONTRACTS. From February 18, 2009, until July 1,
2009, and consistent with the governor's directive dated August 4,
2008, state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial
branches shall not enter into any contracts or other agreements for the
acquisition of personal services not related to an emergency or other
catastrophic event that requires government action to protect life or
public safety. This section does not apply to personal services
contracts or other agreements for the acquisition of personal services
where the costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants,
where the costs are for tax and fee collection, where the costs are for
revenue generation and auditing activities, where the costs are
necessary to receive or maintain federal funds by the state, or, in
institutions of higher education, where the costs are not funded from
state funds or tuition, or where costs are related to hearing officers,
where costs are related to real estate appraisals or habitat
assessments, where costs are related to carrying out a court order, or
where costs are related to information technology contracts related to
an information services board approved information technology project,
or where costs are related to judicial information system technology
projects. Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 10,
chapter 5, Laws of 2009 and section 5 of this act. This section does
not apply to the unemployment insurance program of the employment
security department.

Sec. 3 2009 c 5 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
EQUIPMENT PURCHASES. From February 18, 2009, until July 1, 2009,
and consistent with the governor's directive dated August 4, 2008,
state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches
shall not enter into any contracts or other agreements for the
acquisition of any item of equipment the cost of which exceeds five
thousand dollars and is not related to an emergency or other
catastrophic event that requires government action to protect life or
public safety. This section does not apply to costs that are funded
exclusively from private or federal grants. Exceptions to this section
may be granted under section 10, chapter 5, Laws of 2009 and section 5
of this act. This section does not apply to the unemployment insurance
program of the employment security department, to costs that are for
tax and fee collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or
for receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or, in
institutions of higher education, to costs not funded from state funds
or tuition, or for equipment necessary to complete a project funded in
the omnibus capital or transportation appropriation acts, or the
operational divisions of the department of information services, or
cost related to the continuation, renewal, or establishment of
maintenance for existing computer software licensing and existing
computer hardware, or for costs related to the judicial information
system.

Sec. 4 2009 c 5 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
STATE EMPLOYEE TRAVEL AND TRAINING. Consistent with the governor's
directive dated August 4, 2008, state agencies of the legislative,
executive, and judicial branches shall not make expenditures for the
cost or reimbursement of out-of-state travel or out-of-state training
by state employees where the travel or training is not related to (1)
an emergency or other catastrophic event that requires government
action to protect life or public safety, or (2) direct service
delivery, and the travel or training occurs after February 18, 2009,
and before July 1, 2009. This section does not apply to travel
expenditures when the costs are funded exclusively from private or
federal grants. Exceptions to this section may be granted under
section 10, chapter 5, Laws of 2009 and section 5 of this act. This
section does not apply to the unemployment insurance program of the
employment security department, to costs that are for tax and fee
collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or for
receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or, in
institutions of higher education, to costs not funded from state funds
or tuition, or to costs related to carrying out a court order or to
costs to travel by air into Washington state from any airport located
in a contiguous state of which the largest city is part of a
metropolitan statistical area with a city located in Washington state,
or to motor vehicle and parking costs for single day travel to a
contiguous state or British Columbia, Canada.

Sec. 5 2009 c 5 s 10 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
EXCEPTIONS. (1) Exceptions to sections 6 through 9, chapter 5,
Laws of 2009 may be granted for the critically necessary work of an
agency as provided in this section.
(2) For agencies of the executive branch, the exceptions shall be
subject to approval by the director of financial management. For
agencies of the judicial branch, the exceptions shall be subject to
approval of the chief justice of the supreme court. For the house of
representatives and the senate, the exceptions shall be subject to
approval of the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate, respectively, under the direction of the
senate committee on facilities and operations and the executive rules
committee of the house of representatives. For other legislative
agencies, the exceptions shall be subject to approval of both the chief
clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate
under the direction of the senate committee on facilities and
operations and the executive rules committee of the house of
representatives.
(3) ((Exceptions approved under subsection (2) of this section
shall take effect no sooner than five business days following
notification of the chair and ranking minority member of the ways and
means committees in the house of representatives and the senate.)) The
person approving exceptions under subsection (2) of this section shall
send the exceptions to the legislature for consideration every
((thirty)) five days from February 18, 2009, or earlier should volume
or circumstances so necessitate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to 2009 c 5
(uncodified) to read as follows:
Notwithstanding sections 1 through 5, chapter 5, Laws of 2009,
institutions of higher education may grant a wage or salary increase to
critical academic personnel as needed for retention purposes, for
retention of critical personnel positions that are not funded from
state funds or tuition, or for additional academic responsibilities
during the summer quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Captions used in this act are not any part
of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---