BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
REPORTS ELIMINATED
Sec. 1 RCW 19.146.280 and 2006 c 19 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established the mortgage broker commission consisting
of seven commission members who shall act in an advisory capacity to
the director on mortgage broker issues.
(2) The director shall appoint the members of the commission,
weighing the recommendations from professional organizations
representing mortgage brokers and loan originators. At least three of
the commission members shall be mortgage brokers licensed under this
chapter, at least one shall be exempt from licensure under RCW
19.146.020(1)(g), and at least two of the commission members shall be
licensed loan originators under this chapter. No commission member
shall be appointed who has had less than five years' experience in the
business of residential mortgage lending. In addition, the director or
a designee shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the
commission. Voting members of the commission shall serve for two-year
terms. The department shall provide staff support to the commission.
(3) The commission may establish a code of conduct for its members.
Any commissioner may bring a motion before the commission to remove a
commissioner for failing to conduct themselves in a manner consistent
with the code of conduct. The motion shall be in the form of a
recommendation to the director to dismiss a specific commissioner and
shall enumerate causes for doing so. The commissioner in question
shall recuse himself or herself from voting on any such motion. Any
such motion must be approved unanimously by the remaining six
commissioners. Approved motions shall be immediately transmitted to
the director for review and action.
(4) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for their travel
expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. All costs and expenses
associated with the commission shall be paid from the financial
services regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is
created as a dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case all
costs and expenses shall be paid from the consumer services account.
(5) The commission shall advise the director on the characteristics
and needs of the mortgage broker profession.
(6) The department, in consultation with other applicable agencies
of state government, shall conduct a continuing review of the number
and type of consumer complaints arising from residential mortgage
lending in the state. ((The department shall report its findings to
the senate committee on financial institutions and house of
representatives committee on financial institutions and insurance along
with recommendations for any changes in the licensing requirements of
this chapter, biennially by December 1st of each even-numbered year.))

Sec. 2 RCW 43.320.1401 and 2006 c 21 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Before December 31st of every year, the department of financial
institutions shall provide the senate and house of representatives
committees that address matters related to financial institutions with
a written report outlining the activity of the mortgage lending fraud
prosecution account.
(2) This section expires June 30, ((2011)) 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.88.110 and 2003 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section sets forth the expenditure programs and the allotment
and reserve procedures to be followed by the executive branch for
public funds.
(1) Allotments of an appropriation for any fiscal period shall
conform to the terms, limits, or conditions of the appropriation.
(2) The director of financial management shall provide all agencies
with a complete set of operating and capital instructions for preparing
a statement of proposed expenditures at least thirty days before the
beginning of a fiscal period. The set of instructions need not include
specific appropriation amounts for the agency.
(3) Within forty-five days after the beginning of the fiscal period
or within forty-five days after the governor signs the omnibus biennial
appropriations act, whichever is later, all agencies shall submit to
the governor a statement of proposed expenditures at such times and in
such form as may be required by the governor.
(4) The office of financial management shall develop a method for
monitoring capital appropriations and expenditures that will capture at
least the following elements:
(a) Appropriations made for capital projects including
transportation projects;
(b) Estimates of total project costs including past, current,
ensuing, and future biennial costs;
(c) Comparisons of actual costs to estimated costs;
(d) Comparisons of estimated construction start and completion
dates with actual dates;
(e) Documentation of fund shifts between projects.
This data may be incorporated into the existing accounting system
or into a separate project management system, as deemed appropriate by
the office of financial management.
(5) ((The office of financial management shall publish agency
annual maintenance summary reports beginning in October 1997. State
agencies shall submit a separate report for each major campus or site,
as defined by the office of financial management. Reports shall be
prepared in a format prescribed by the office of financial management
and shall include, but not be limited to: Information describing the
number, size, and condition of state-owned facilities; facility
maintenance, repair, and operating expenses paid from the state
operating and capital budgets, including maintenance staffing levels;
the condition of major infrastructure systems; and maintenance
management initiatives undertaken by the agency over the prior year.
Agencies shall submit their annual maintenance summary reports to the
office of financial management by September 1 each year.
(6))) The office of financial management, prior to approving
allotments for major capital construction projects valued over five
million dollars, shall institute procedures for reviewing such projects
at the predesign stage that will reduce long-term costs and increase
facility efficiency. The procedures shall include, but not be limited
to, the following elements:
(a) Evaluation of facility program requirements and consistency
with long-range plans;
(b) Utilization of a system of cost, quality, and performance
standards to compare major capital construction projects; and
(c) A requirement to incorporate value-engineering analysis and
constructability review into the project schedule.
(((7))) (6) No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered
into for such major capital construction projects including, without
exception, land acquisition, site development, predesign, design,
construction, and equipment acquisition and installation, until the
allotment of the funds to be expended has been approved by the office
of financial management. This limitation does not prohibit the
continuation of expenditures and obligations into the succeeding
biennium for projects for which allotments have been approved in the
immediate prior biennium.
(((8))) (7) If at any time during the fiscal period the governor
projects a cash deficit in a particular fund or account as defined by
RCW 43.88.050, the governor shall make across-the-board reductions in
allotments for that particular fund or account so as to prevent a cash
deficit, unless the legislature has directed the liquidation of the
cash deficit over one or more fiscal periods. Except for the
legislative and judicial branches and other agencies headed by elective
officials, the governor shall review the statement of proposed
operating expenditures for reasonableness and conformance with
legislative intent. The governor may request corrections of proposed
allotments submitted by the legislative and judicial branches and
agencies headed by elective officials if those proposed allotments
contain significant technical errors. Once the governor approves the
proposed allotments, further revisions may at the request of the office
of financial management or upon the agency's initiative be made on a
quarterly basis and must be accompanied by an explanation of the
reasons for significant changes. However, changes in appropriation
level authorized by the legislature, changes required by across-the-board reductions mandated by the governor, changes caused by executive
increases to spending authority, and changes caused by executive
decreases to spending authority for failure to comply with the
provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW may require additional revisions.
Revisions shall not be made retroactively. However, the governor may
assign to a reserve status any portion of an agency appropriation
withheld as part of across-the-board reductions made by the governor
and any portion of an agency appropriation conditioned on a contingent
event by the appropriations act. The governor may remove these amounts
from reserve status if the across-the-board reductions are subsequently
modified or if the contingent event occurs. The director of financial
management shall enter approved statements of proposed expenditures
into the state budgeting, accounting, and reporting system within
forty-five days after receipt of the proposed statements from the
agencies. If an agency or the director of financial management is
unable to meet these requirements, the director of financial management
shall provide a timely explanation in writing to the legislative fiscal
committees.
(((9))) (8) It is expressly provided that all agencies shall be
required to maintain accounting records and to report thereon in the
manner prescribed in this chapter and under the regulations issued
pursuant to this chapter. Within ninety days of the end of the fiscal
year, all agencies shall submit to the director of financial management
their final adjustments to close their books for the fiscal year.
Prior to submitting fiscal data, written or oral, to committees of the
legislature, it is the responsibility of the agency submitting the data
to reconcile it with the budget and accounting data reported by the
agency to the director of financial management.
(((10))) (9) The director of financial management may exempt
certain public funds from the allotment controls established under this
chapter if it is not practical or necessary to allot the funds.
Allotment control exemptions expire at the end of the fiscal biennium
for which they are granted. The director of financial management shall
report any exemptions granted under this subsection to the legislative
fiscal committees.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.60.110 and 1999 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A task force on missing and exploited children is established
in the Washington state patrol. The task force shall be under the
direction of the chief of the state patrol.
(2) The task force is authorized to assist law enforcement
agencies, upon request, in cases involving missing or exploited
children by:
(a) Direct assistance and case management;
(b) Technical assistance;
(c) Personnel training;
(d) Referral for assistance from local, state, national, and
international agencies; and
(e) Coordination and information sharing among local, state,
interstate, and federal law enforcement and social service agencies.
(3) To maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of state resources
and to improve interagency cooperation, the task force shall, where
feasible, use existing facilities, systems, and staff made available by
the state patrol and other local, state, interstate, and federal law
enforcement and social service agencies. The chief of the state patrol
may employ such additional personnel as are necessary for the work of
the task force and may share personnel costs with other agencies.
(4) The chief of the state patrol shall seek public and private
grants and gifts to support the work of the task force.
(5) ((By December 1, 2001, and annually thereafter, the chief of
the state patrol shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature. The report shall establish performance measurements
and objectives for the task force and assess the accomplishments of the
task force.
(6))) For the purposes of RCW 13.60.100 through 13.60.120,
"exploited children" means children under the age of eighteen who are
employed, used, persuaded, induced, enticed, or coerced to engage in,
or assist another person to engage in, sexually explicit conduct.
"Exploited children" also means the rape, molestation, or use for
prostitution of children under the age of eighteen.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13.031 and 2008 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the duty to provide child welfare
services and shall:
(1) Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and
comprehensive plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for
the protection and care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.
(2) Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of
prospective adoptive and foster homes, both regular and specialized,
i.e. homes for children of ethnic minority, including Indian homes for
Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped and emotionally disturbed,
teens, pregnant and parenting teens((, and annually report to the
governor and the legislature concerning the department's success in:
(a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies
for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include
a section entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and
Recommendations.")).
(3) Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on
the part of a parent or caretaker that results in death, serious
physical or emotional harm, or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that
presents an imminent risk of serious harm, and on the basis of the
findings of such investigation, offer child welfare services in
relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians, or persons
serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the attention
of an appropriate court, or another community agency. An investigation
is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly not the
result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation
reveals that a crime against a child may have been committed, the
department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.
(4) Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to
families who are in conflict.
(5) Monitor placements of children in out-of-home care and in-home
dependencies to assure the safety, well-being, and quality of care
being provided is within the scope of the intent of the legislature as
defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010. The policy for monitoring
placements under this section shall require that children in out-of-home care and in-home dependencies and their caregivers receive a
private and individual face-to-face visit each month.
(a) The department shall conduct the monthly visits with children
and caregivers required under this section unless the child's placement
is being supervised under a contract between the department and a
private agency accredited by a national child welfare accrediting
entity, in which case the private agency shall, within existing
resources, conduct the monthly visits with the child and with the
child's caregiver according to the standards described in this
subsection and shall provide the department with a written report of
the visits within fifteen days of completing the visits.
(b) In cases where the monthly visits required under this
subsection are being conducted by a private agency, the department
shall conduct a face-to-face health and safety visit with the child at
least once every ninety days.
(6) Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and
to accept custody of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to
do so under law, to provide child welfare services including placement
for adoption, to provide for the routine and necessary medical, dental,
and mental health care, or necessary emergency care of the children,
and to provide for the physical care of such children and make payment
of maintenance costs if needed. Except where required by Public Law
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no private adoption agency which receives
children for adoption from the department shall discriminate on the
basis of race, creed, or color when considering applications in their
placement for adoption.
(7) Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who
have run away from home and who are admitted to crisis residential
centers.
(8) Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow
in general the policy of using properly approved private agency
services for the actual care and supervision of such children insofar
as they are available, paying for care of such children as are accepted
by the department as eligible for support at reasonable rates
established by the department.
(9) Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall
assist the secretary in the development of a partnership plan for
utilizing resources of the public and private sectors, and advise on
all matters pertaining to child welfare, licensing of child care
agencies, adoption, and services related thereto. At least one member
shall represent the adoption community.
(10)(a) Have authority to provide continued foster care or group
care as needed to participate in or complete a high school or
vocational school program.
(b)(i) Beginning in 2006, the department has the authority to allow
up to fifty youth reaching age eighteen to continue in foster care or
group care as needed to participate in or complete a posthigh school
academic or vocational program, and to receive necessary support and
transition services.
(ii) In 2007 and 2008, the department has the authority to allow up
to fifty additional youth per year reaching age eighteen to remain in
foster care or group care as provided in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(iii) A youth who remains eligible for such placement and services
pursuant to department rules may continue in foster care or group care
until the youth reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Eligibility
requirements shall include active enrollment in a posthigh school
academic or vocational program and maintenance of a 2.0 grade point
average.
(11) Refer cases to the division of child support whenever state or
federal funds are expended for the care and maintenance of a child,
including a child with a developmental disability who is placed as a
result of an action under chapter 13.34 RCW, unless the department
finds that there is good cause not to pursue collection of child
support against the parent or parents of the child. Cases involving
individuals age eighteen through twenty shall not be referred to the
division of child support unless required by federal law.
(12) Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care
services to purchase care for Indian children who are in the custody of
a federally recognized Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing
agency pursuant to parental consent, tribal court order, or state
juvenile court order; and the purchase of such care shall be subject to
the same eligibility standards and rates of support applicable to other
children for whom the department purchases care.
Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through
13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through 74.13.036, or of this section all
services to be provided by the department of social and health services
under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the
federal juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.
(13) Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide
preventive services to families with children that prevent or shorten
the duration of an out-of-home placement.
(14) Have authority to provide independent living services to
youths, including individuals who have attained eighteen years of age,
and have not attained twenty-one years of age who are or have been in
foster care.
(15) Consult at least quarterly with foster parents, including
members of the foster parent association of Washington state, for the
purpose of receiving information and comment regarding how the
department is performing the duties and meeting the obligations
specified in this section and RCW 74.13.250 and 74.13.320 regarding the
recruitment of foster homes, reducing foster parent turnover rates,
providing effective training for foster parents, and administering a
coordinated and comprehensive plan that strengthens services for the
protection of children. Consultation shall occur at the regional and
statewide levels.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.13.036 and 2003 c 207 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall oversee
implementation of chapter 13.34 RCW and chapter 13.32A RCW. The
oversight shall be comprised of working with affected parts of the
criminal justice and child care systems as well as with local
government, legislative, and executive authorities to effectively carry
out these chapters. The department shall work with all such entities
to ensure that chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW are implemented in a
uniform manner throughout the state.
(2) The department shall develop a plan and procedures, in
cooperation with the statewide advisory committee, to insure the full
implementation of the provisions of chapter 13.32A RCW. Such plan and
procedures shall include but are not limited to:
(a) Procedures defining and delineating the role of the department
and juvenile court with regard to the execution of the child in need of
services placement process;
(b) Procedures for designating department staff responsible for
family reconciliation services;
(c) Procedures assuring enforcement of contempt proceedings in
accordance with RCW 13.32A.170 and 13.32A.250; and
(d) Procedures for the continued education of all individuals in
the criminal juvenile justice and child care systems who are affected
by chapter 13.32A RCW, as well as members of the legislative and
executive branches of government.
There shall be uniform application of the procedures developed by
the department and juvenile court personnel, to the extent practicable.
Local and regional differences shall be taken into consideration in the
development of procedures required under this subsection.
(3) In addition to its other oversight duties, the department
shall:
(a) Identify and evaluate resource needs in each region of the
state;
(b) Disseminate information collected as part of the oversight
process to affected groups and the general public;
(c) Educate affected entities within the juvenile justice and child
care systems, local government, and the legislative branch regarding
the implementation of chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW;
(d) Review complaints concerning the services, policies, and
procedures of those entities charged with implementing chapters 13.32A
and 13.34 RCW; and
(e) Report any violations and misunderstandings regarding the
implementation of chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW.
(((4) The department shall provide an annual report to the
legislature not later than December 1 of each year only when it has
declined to accept custody of a child from a law enforcement agency or
it has received a report of a child being released without placement.
The report shall indicate the number of times it has declined to accept
custody of a child from a law enforcement agency under chapter 13.32A
RCW and the number of times it has received a report of a child being
released without placement under RCW 13.32A.060(1)(c). The report
shall include the dates, places, and reasons the department declined to
accept custody and the dates and places children are released without
placement.))

Sec. 7 RCW 74.08A.130 and 1997 c 58 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall make an affirmative effort to identify and
proactively contact legal immigrants receiving public assistance to
facilitate their applications for naturalization. The department shall
obtain a complete list of legal immigrants in Washington who are
receiving correspondence regarding their eligibility from the social
security administration. The department shall inform immigrants
regarding how citizenship may be attained. In order to facilitate the
citizenship process, the department shall coordinate and contract, to
the extent necessary, with existing public and private resources and
shall, within available funds, ensure that those immigrants who qualify
to apply for naturalization are referred to or otherwise offered
classes. The department shall assist eligible immigrants in obtaining
appropriate test exemptions, and other exemptions in the naturalization
process, to the extent permitted under federal law. ((The department
shall report annually by December 15th to the legislature regarding the
progress and barriers of the immigrant naturalization facilitation
effort. It is the intent of the legislature that persons receiving
naturalization assistance be facilitated in obtaining citizenship
within two years of their eligibility to apply.))

Sec. 8 RCW 70.56.040 and 2008 c 136 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall contract with a qualified, independent
entity to receive notifications and reports of adverse events and
incidents, and carry out the activities specified in this section. In
establishing qualifications for, and choosing the independent entity,
the department shall strongly consider the patient safety organization
criteria included in the federal patient safety and quality improvement
act of 2005, P.L. 109-41, and any regulations adopted to implement this
chapter.
(2) The independent entity shall:
(a) In collaboration with the department of health, establish an
internet-based system for medical facilities and the health care
workers of a medical facility to submit notifications and reports of
adverse events and incidents, which shall be accessible twenty-four
hours a day, seven days a week. The system shall be a portal to report
both adverse events and incidents, and notifications and reports of
adverse events shall be immediately transmitted to the department. The
system shall be a secure system that protects the confidentiality of
personal health information and provider and facility specific
information submitted in notifications and reports, including
appropriate encryption and an accurate means of authenticating the
identity of users of the system. When the system becomes operational,
medical facilities shall submit all notifications and reports by means
of the system;
(b) Collect, analyze, and evaluate data regarding notifications and
reports of adverse events and incidents, including the identification
of performance indicators and patterns in frequency or severity at
certain medical facilities or in certain regions of the state;
(c) Develop recommendations for changes in health care practices
and procedures, which may be instituted for the purpose of reducing the
number or severity of adverse events and incidents;
(d) Directly advise reporting medical facilities of immediate
changes that can be instituted to reduce adverse events or incidents;
(e) Issue recommendations to medical facilities on a
facility-specific or on a statewide basis regarding changes, trends,
and improvements in health care practices and procedures for the
purpose of reducing the number and severity of adverse events or
incidents. Prior to issuing recommendations, consideration shall be
given to the following factors: Expectation of improved quality of
care, implementation feasibility, other relevant implementation
practices, and the cost impact to patients, payers, and medical
facilities. Statewide recommendations shall be issued to medical
facilities on a continuing basis and shall be published and posted on
a publicly accessible web site. The recommendations made to medical
facilities under this section shall not be considered mandatory for
licensure purposes unless they are adopted by the department as rules
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; and
(f) Monitor implementation of reporting systems addressing adverse
events or their equivalent in other states and make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature as necessary for modifications to this
chapter to keep the system as nearly consistent as possible with
similar systems in other states.
(3)(((a) The independent entity shall report no later than January
1, 2008, and annually thereafter to the governor and the legislature on
the activities under this chapter in the preceding year. The report
shall include:
(i) The number of adverse events and incidents reported by medical
facilities, in the aggregate, on a geographical basis, and a summary of
actions taken by facilities in response to the adverse events or
incidents;
(ii) In the aggregate, the information derived from the data
collected, including any recognized trends concerning patient safety;
(iii) Recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes that may
help improve patient safety in the state; and
(iv) Information, presented in the aggregate, to inform and educate
consumers and providers, on best practices and prevention tools that
medical facilities are implementing to prevent adverse events as well
as other patient safety initiatives medical facilities are undertaking
to promote patient safety.
(b) The annual report shall be made available for public inspection
and shall be posted on the department's and the independent entity's
web site.
(4))) The independent entity shall conduct all activities under
this section in a manner that preserves the confidentiality of
facilities, documents, materials, or information made confidential by
RCW 70.56.050.
(((5))) (4) Medical facilities and health care workers may provide
notification of incidents to the independent entity. The notification
shall be filed in a format specified by the independent entity, after
consultation with the department and medical facilities, and shall
identify the facility but shall not include any identifying information
for any of the health care professionals, facility employees, or
patients involved. This provision does not modify the duty of a
hospital to make a report to the department or a disciplinary authority
if a licensed practitioner has committed unprofessional conduct as
defined in RCW 18.130.180. The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to
notifications of incidents that are submitted in good faith by
employees of medical facilities.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.70.690 and 2005 c 462 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, in collaboration with its public and private
partners, shall design a state asthma plan, based on clinically sound
criteria including nationally recognized guidelines such as those
established by the national asthma education prevention partnership
expert panel report guidelines for the diagnosis and management of
asthma.
(2) The plan shall include recommendations in the following areas:
(a) Evidence-based processes for the prevention and management of
asthma;
(b) Data systems that support asthma prevalence reporting,
including population disparities and practice variation in the
treatment of asthma;
(c) Quality improvement strategies addressing the successful
diagnosis and management of the disease; and
(d) Cost estimates and sources of funding for plan implementation.
(3) The department shall submit the completed state plan to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2005. ((After the initial
state plan is submitted, the department shall provide progress reports
to the governor and the legislature on a biennial basis beginning
December 1, 2007.))
(4) The department shall implement the state plan recommendations
made under subsection (2) of this section only to the extent that
federal, state, or private funds, including grants, are available for
that purpose.

Sec. 10 RCW 77.85.140 and 2007 c 241 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Habitat project lists shall be submitted to the salmon recovery
funding board for funding at least once a year on a schedule
established by the board. The board shall provide the legislature with
a list of the proposed projects and a list of the projects funded by
October 1st of each year for informational purposes. Project sponsors
who complete salmon habitat projects approved for funding from habitat
project lists and have met grant application deadlines will be paid by
the salmon recovery funding board within thirty days of project
completion.
(2) The recreation and conservation office shall track all funds
allocated for salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities on
behalf of the board, including both funds allocated by the board and
funds allocated by other state or federal agencies for salmon recovery
or water quality improvement.
(((3) Beginning in December 2000, the board shall provide a
biennial report to the governor and the legislature on salmon recovery
expenditures. This report shall be coordinated with the state of the
salmon report required under RCW 77.85.020.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.88.067 (Fee and expense report -- Impact of amounts
awarded to prevailing party in agency action) and 1999 c 372 s 10 &
1995 c 403 s 905;
(2) RCW 46.48.180 (State patrol study to insure uniformity of
regulations) and 1980 c 20 s 2 & 1961 c 12 s 46.48.180;
(3) RCW 43.44.100 (Annual report) and 1995 c 369 s 33, 1986 c 266
s 76, 1985 c 470 s 26, 1977 c 75 s 71, & 1947 c 79 s .33.11;
(4) RCW 74.14C.080 (Data collection -- Reports to the legislature)
and 1995 c 311 s 5;
(5) RCW 80.36.475 (Washington telephone assistance program -- Report
to legislature) and 2003 c 134 s 9 & 1990 c 170 s 7;
(6) RCW 74.08A.430 (Outcome measures -- Report to legislature) and
1997 c 58 s 704;
(7) RCW 70.114A.085 (Temporary worker building code -- Report) and
1999 c 374 s 11;
(8) RCW 43.70.518 (Public health -- Annual reports) and 2007 c 259 s
63;
(9) RCW 43.215.080 (Reports to the governor and legislature) and
2006 c 265 s 109;
(10) RCW 43.215.435 (Early childhood education and assistance
program -- Reports) and 1995 c 335 s 501, 1994 c 166 s 9, 1988 c 174 s 8,
& 1985 c 418 s 8; and
(11) RCW 79A.15.100 (Report to governor and standing committees)
and 2007 c 241 s 35 & 1990 1st ex.s. c 14 s 11.

REPORT FREQUENCY CHANGES
Sec. 12 RCW 43.320.100 and 1993 c 472 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director of financial institutions shall file in his or her
office all reports required to be made to the director, prepare and
furnish to banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and
loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, check
cashers and sellers, and trust companies and departments blank forms
for such reports as are required of them, and ((each year)), beginning
in the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium and each biennium thereafter, make a
report to the governor showing:
(1) A summary of the conditions of the banks, savings banks,
foreign bank branches, savings and loan associations, credit unions,
consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, and trust companies
and departments at the date of their last report; and
(2) A list of those organized or closed during the year.
The director may publish such other statements, reports, and
pamphlets as he or she deems advisable.

Sec. 13 RCW 39.102.140 and 2007 c 229 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sponsoring local government shall provide a report to the
board and the department by March 1st of each year. The report shall
contain the following information:
(a) The amount of local excise tax allocation revenues, local
property tax allocation revenues, other revenues from local public
sources, and taxes under RCW 82.14.475 received by the sponsoring local
government during the preceding calendar year that were dedicated to
pay the public improvements financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure financing, and a summary of how these revenues were
expended;
(b) The names of any businesses locating within the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(c) The total number of permanent jobs created in the revenue
development area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by
the sponsoring local government and financed in whole or in part with
local infrastructure financing;
(d) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the revenue development area as a result of
the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government
and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure financing;
and
(e) That the sponsoring local government is in compliance with RCW
39.102.070.
(2) The board shall make a report available to the public and the
legislature by June 1st of each even-numbered year. The report shall
include a list of public improvements undertaken by sponsoring local
governments and financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure
financing and it shall also include a summary of the information
provided to the department by sponsoring local governments under
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.336.060 and 2007 c 228 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
On or before June 30th of each ((fiscal)) even-numbered year, the
commission shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate that describes
the tourism development program for the previous fiscal year and
quantifies the financial benefits to the state. The report must
contain information concerning targeted markets, benefits to different
areas of the state, return on the state's investment, grants disbursed
under the tourism competitive grant program, a copy of the most recent
strategic plan, and other relevant information related to tourism
development.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.365.040 and 2006 c 247 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information on how incentives are used.
(2) Each motion picture production receiving funding assistance
under RCW 43.365.020 shall report information to the department by
filing a complete annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of
the year following any calendar year in which funding assistance under
RCW ((43.365.030)) 43.365.020 is taken. The department may extend the
due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section if
failure to file was the result of circumstances beyond the control of
the motion picture production receiving the funding assistance.
(3) The survey shall include the amount of funding assistance
received. The survey shall also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington by the motion picture production
receiving funding assistance, including indirect employment by
contractors or other affiliates:
(a) The number of total employment positions;
(b) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(c) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(d) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(4) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the funding assistance program, to be submitted
at the same time as the survey.
(5) If a person fails to submit an annual survey under subsection
(2) of this section by the due date of the report or any extension the
department shall declare the amount of funding assistance for the
previous calendar year to be immediately due and payable. The
department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the amounts due
under this section. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
provided for delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to
the date the funding assistance was received, and shall accrue until
the funding assistance is repaid.
(6) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics. The department shall report
these statistics to the legislature each even-numbered year by
September 1st. The department shall provide the complete annual
surveys to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

Sec. 16 RCW 43.330.082 and 2007 c 249 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Contracting associate development organizations shall provide
the department with measures of their performance. Annual reports
shall include information on the impact of the contracting organization
on employment, wages, tax revenue, and capital investment. Specific
measures shall be developed in the contracting process between the
department and the contracting organization every two years.
Performance measures should be consistent across regions to allow for
statewide evaluation.
(2)(a) The department and contracting organizations shall agree
upon specific target levels for the performance measures in subsection
(1) of this section. Comparison of agreed thresholds and actual
performance shall occur annually.
(b) Contracting organizations that fail to achieve the agreed
performance targets in more than one-half of the agreed measures shall
develop remediation plans to address performance gaps. The remediation
plans shall include revised performance thresholds specifically chosen
to provide evidence of progress in making the identified service
changes.
(c) Contracts and state funding shall be terminated for one year
for organizations that fail to achieve the agreed upon progress toward
improved performance defined under (b) of this subsection. During the
year in which termination for nonperformance is in effect,
organizations shall review alternative delivery strategies to include
reorganization of the contracting organization, merging of previous
efforts with existing regional partners, and other specific steps
toward improved performance. At the end of the period of termination,
the department may contract with the associate development organization
or its successor as it deems appropriate.
(3) The department shall report to the legislature and the
Washington economic development commission by December 31st of each
even-numbered year on the performance results of the contracts with
associate development organizations.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.155.070 and 2008 c 299 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board
must determine that a local government meets all of the following
conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; and
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding public works, taking into
consideration local employment and economic factors.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request
is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040. A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040
which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited
from receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the
comprehensive plan and development regulations are adopted as required
by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan
guarantee.
(3) In considering awarding loans for public facilities to special
districts requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for public works
projects as provided in this section. The intent of the priority
process is to maximize the value of public works projects accomplished
with assistance under this chapter. The board shall attempt to assure
a geographical balance in assigning priorities to projects. The board
shall consider at least the following factors in assigning a priority
to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency public works needs;
(b) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether the
entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW
90.71.010;
(c) Whether the project is referenced in the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(d) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(e) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to guidelines
regarding its permitting process for those applying for development
permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of 2007;
(f) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(g) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(h) Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment,
compared to the average state unemployment;
(i) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards, including the cost of
extending existing service to such a system;
(j) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(k) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth; and
(l) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each public works project for
which financial assistance is sought under this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section during the
preceding fiscal year ((and)). Before November 1st of each year, the
board shall develop and submit a prioritized list of projects which are
recommended for funding by the legislature, including one copy to the
staff of each of the appropriate fiscal committees. The list shall
include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and
recommended financing, the terms and conditions of the loan or
financial guarantee, the local government jurisdiction and unemployment
rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's critical need for the project
and documentation of local funds being used to finance the public works
project. The list shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for
each jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(7) The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that
the solid waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary
to implement the comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by
the city or county under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 18 RCW 43.185C.040 and 2005 c 484 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Six months after the first Washington homeless census, the
department shall, in consultation with the interagency council on
homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, prepare and
publish a ten-year homeless housing strategic plan which shall outline
statewide goals and performance measures and shall be coordinated with
the plan for homeless families with children required under RCW
43.63A.650. To guide local governments in preparation of their first
local homeless housing plans due December 31, 2005, the department
shall issue by October 15, 2005, temporary guidelines consistent with
this chapter and including the best available data on each community's
homeless population. Local governments' ten-year homeless housing
plans shall not be substantially inconsistent with the goals and
program recommendations of the temporary guidelines and, when amended
after 2005, the state strategic plan.
(2) Program outcomes and performance measures and goals shall be
created by the department and reflected in the department's homeless
housing strategic plan as well as interim goals against which state and
local governments' performance may be measured, including:
(a) By the end of year one, completion of the first census as
described in RCW 43.185C.030;
(b) By the end of each subsequent year, goals common to all local
programs which are measurable and the achievement of which would move
that community toward housing its homeless population; and
(c) By July 1, 2015, reduction of the homeless population statewide
and in each county by fifty percent.
(3) The department shall develop a consistent statewide data
gathering instrument to monitor the performance of cities and counties
receiving grants in order to determine compliance with the terms and
conditions set forth in the grant application or required by the
department.
The department shall, in consultation with the interagency council
on homelessness and the affordable housing advisory board, report
((annually)) biennially to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature an assessment of the state's performance in
furthering the goals of the state ten-year homeless housing strategic
plan and the performance of each participating local government in
creating and executing a local homeless housing plan which meets the
requirements of this chapter. The annual report may include
performance measures such as:
(a) The reduction in the number of homeless individuals and
families from the initial count of homeless persons;
(b) The number of new units available and affordable for homeless
families by housing type;
(c) The number of homeless individuals identified who are not
offered suitable housing within thirty days of their request or
identification as homeless;
(d) The number of households at risk of losing housing who maintain
it due to a preventive intervention;
(e) The transition time from homelessness to permanent housing;
(f) The cost per person housed at each level of the housing
continuum;
(g) The ability to successfully collect data and report
performance;
(h) The extent of collaboration and coordination among public
bodies, as well as community stakeholders, and the level of community
support and participation;
(i) The quality and safety of housing provided; and
(j) The effectiveness of outreach to homeless persons, and their
satisfaction with the program.
(4) Based on the performance of local homeless housing programs in
meeting their interim goals, on general population changes and on
changes in the homeless population recorded in the annual census, the
department may revise the performance measures and goals of the state
homeless housing strategic plan, set goals for years following the
initial ten-year period, and recommend changes in local governments'
plans.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.63A.068 and 2007 c 384 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall establish an advisory committee to monitor, guide, and report on
recommendations relating to policies and programs for children and
families with incarcerated parents.
(b) The advisory committee shall include representatives of the
department of corrections, the department of social and health
services, the department of early learning, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, representatives of the private
nonprofit and business sectors, child advocates, representatives of
Washington state Indian tribes as defined under the federal Indian
welfare act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), court administrators, the
administrative office of the courts, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, jail administrators, the office of the
governor, and others who have an interest in these issues.
(c) The advisory committee shall:
(i) Gather the data collected by the departments as required in RCW
72.09.495, 74.04.800, 43.215.065, and 28A.300.520;
(ii) Monitor and provide consultation on the implementation of
recommendations contained in the 2006 children of incarcerated parents
report;
(iii) Identify areas of need and develop recommendations for the
legislature, the department of social and health services, the
department of corrections, the department of early learning, and the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to better meet the
needs of children and families of persons incarcerated in department of
corrections facilities; and
(iv) Advise the department of community, trade, and economic
development regarding community programs the department should fund
with moneys appropriated for this purpose in the operating budget. The
advisory committee shall provide recommendations to the department
regarding the following:
(A) The goals for geographic distribution of programs and funding;
(B) The scope and purpose of eligible services and the priority of
such services;
(C) Grant award funding limits;
(D) Entities eligible to apply for the funding;
(E) Whether the funding should be directed towards starting or
supporting new programs, expanding existing programs, or whether the
funding should be open to all eligible services and providers; and
(F) Other areas the advisory committee determines appropriate.
(d) The children of incarcerated parents advisory committee shall
update the legislature and governor ((annually)) biennially on
committee activities, with the first update due by January 1, ((2008))
2010.
(2) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall select community programs or services to receive funding that
focus on children and families of inmates incarcerated in a department
of corrections facility and sustaining the family during the period of
the inmate's incarceration.
(a) Programs or services which meet the needs of the children of
incarcerated parents should be the greatest consideration in the
programs that are identified by the department.
(b) The department shall consider the recommendations of the
advisory committee regarding which services or programs the department
should fund.
(c) The programs selected shall collaborate with an agency, or
agencies, experienced in providing services to aid families and victims
of sexual assault and domestic violence to ensure that the programs
identify families who have a history of sexual assault or domestic
violence and ensure the services provided are appropriate for the
children and families.

Sec. 20 RCW 39.86.190 and 1987 c 297 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
By February 1 of each even-numbered year, the agency shall
summarize for the legislature each previous year's bond allocation
requests and issuance. Beginning in June of 1988 and thereafter in
June of each even-numbered year, the agency shall also submit a
biennial report summarizing usage of the bond allocation proceeds and
any policy concerns for future bond allocations.

Sec. 21 RCW 43.325.050 and 2006 c 171 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall report to the legislature and governor on the
status of the energy freedom program created under this chapter, on or
before December 1, 2006, and ((annually)) biennially thereafter. This
report must include information on the projects that have been funded,
the status of these projects, and their environmental, energy savings,
and job creation benefits.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.79.460 and 2009 c 4 s 902 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated
to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures from the account.
(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may
create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable
to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial
management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.
Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the
authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for
the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state,
such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish
new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or
incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.
(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state
general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a
fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board
reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations
for:
(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the
extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have
been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program.
"Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for
which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third
parties or other entities;
(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;
(c) A specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an
appropriation in the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not
achieve the specific purpose or objective of the condition or
limitation;
(d) Debt service on state obligations; and
(e) State retirement system obligations.
(4) The office of financial management, after consulting with the
legislative fiscal committees, shall report ((to the treasurer)) the
amount of savings incentives achieved. ((By December 1, 1998, and each
December 1st thereafter, the office of financial management shall
submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the
implementation of this section. The report shall (a) evaluate the
impact of this section on agency reversions and end-of-biennium
expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency expenditures from the
savings recovery account. The office of financial management is
relieved from having to submit a report by December 1, 2008.))
(5) For fiscal year 2009, the legislature may transfer from the
savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state
general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2008.

Sec. 23 RCW 18.130.310 and 2008 c 134 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the disciplinary authority shall
submit ((an annual)) a biennial report to the legislature on its
proceedings during the ((year)) biennium, detailing the number of
complaints made, investigated, and adjudicated and manner of
disposition. In addition, the report must provide data on the
department's background check activities conducted under RCW 18.130.064
and the effectiveness of those activities in identifying potential
license holders who may not be qualified to practice safely. The
report must summarize the distribution of the number of cases assigned
to each attorney and investigator for each profession. The identity of
the attorney and investigator must remain anonymous. The report may
include recommendations for improving the disciplinary process,
including proposed legislation. The department shall develop a uniform
report format.
(2) Each disciplining authority identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b)
may submit ((an annual)) a biennial report to complement the report
required under subsection (1) of this section. Each report may provide
additional information about the disciplinary activities, rule-making
and policy activities, and receipts and expenditures for the individual
disciplining authority.

Sec. 24 RCW 43.20.100 and 1977 c 75 s 44 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state board of health shall ((make an annual)) report to the
governor by July 1st of each even-numbered year including therein
suggestions for public health priorities for the following biennium and
such legislative action as it deems necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Section 13 of this act expires June 30,
2039.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Section 21 of this act expires June 30,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2009.

--- END ---