BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4489 and 2008 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in this section, a credit is allowed
against the tax imposed under this chapter for contributions made by a
person to ((a Washington motion picture competitiveness program))
program for supported employment services for individuals with
developmental disabilities as they transition from high school to the
workforce.
(2) The person must make the contribution before claiming a credit
authorized under this section. Credits earned under this section may
be claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the
contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a reporting
period shall not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
that reporting period. No person may claim more than one million
dollars of credit in any calendar year, including credit carried over
from a previous calendar year. No refunds may be granted for any
unused credits.
(3) The maximum credit that may be earned for each calendar year
under this section for a person is limited to the lesser of one million
dollars or an amount equal to one hundred percent of the contributions
made by the person to a program during the calendar year.
(4) Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section, a tax
credit claimed under this section may not be carried over to another
year.
(5) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by the person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the person's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding
calendar year may be carried forward and claimed against the person's
tax liability for the second succeeding calendar year; and any credit
not used in that second succeeding calendar year may be carried over
and claimed against the person's tax liability for the third succeeding
calendar year, but may not be carried over for any calendar year
thereafter.
(6) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
shall disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would cause the
total amount of credits claimed under this section during any calendar
year to exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars. If this
limitation is reached, the department shall notify ((all Washington
motion picture competitiveness programs that)) the department of social
and health services division of developmental disabilities that the
annual statewide limit has been met. In addition, the department shall
provide written notice to any person who has claimed tax credits in
excess of the three million five hundred thousand dollar limitation in
this subsection. The notice shall indicate the amount of tax due and
shall provide that the tax be paid within thirty days from the date of
such notice. The department shall not assess penalties and interest as
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW on the amount due in the initial notice
if the amount due is paid by the due date specified in the notice, or
any extension thereof.
(7) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department. Any return, form, or
information required to be filed in an electronic format under this
section is not filed until received by the department in an electronic
format. As used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as
"return" in RCW 82.32.050.
(8) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(9) ((A Washington motion picture competitiveness program shall))
The program for supported employment services for individuals with
developmental disabilities as they transition from high school to the
workforce must provide to the department, upon request, such
information needed to verify eligibility for credit under this section,
including information regarding contributions received by the program.
(10) The department shall not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2006.
(11) For the purposes of this section, "((Washington motion picture
competitiveness program)) the program for supported employment services
for individuals with developmental disabilities as they transition from
high school to the workforce" or "program" means ((an organization
established pursuant to chapter 43.365 RCW)) the program operated by
the department of social and health services pursuant to RCW 71A.12.040
(4) and (14) and targeted to providing individuals with developmental
disabilities with employment search supports, job skills training and
development, and supports for individuals to maintain their employment
particularly targeted to individuals with developmental disabilities as
they transition from high school.
(((12) No credit may be earned for contributions made on or after
July 1, 2011.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

--- END ---