BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.47.020 and 2007 c 259 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system of
enrollment and payment for basic health care services, administered by
the plan administrator through participating managed health care
systems, created by this chapter.
(2) "Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan
administrator, who also holds the position of administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.
(3) "Health coverage tax credit program" means the program created
by the Trade Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-210) that provides a federal tax
credit that subsidizes private health insurance coverage for displaced
workers certified to receive certain trade adjustment assistance
benefits and for individuals receiving benefits from the pension
benefit guaranty corporation.
(4) "Health coverage tax credit eligible enrollee" means individual
workers and their qualified family members who lose their jobs due to
the effects of international trade and are eligible for certain trade
adjustment assistance benefits; or are eligible for benefits under the
alternative trade adjustment assistance program; or are people who
receive benefits from the pension benefit guaranty corporation and are
at least fifty-five years old.
(5) "Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care
service contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any
combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract basic health
care services, as defined by the administrator and rendered by duly
licensed providers, to a defined patient population enrolled in the
plan and in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or
self-insured method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized
enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations
under RCW 70.47.100(7).
(6) "Subsidized enrollee" means:
(a) An individual, or an individual plus the individual's spouse or
dependent children:
(i) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(ii) Who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator;
(iii) Who is not a full-time student who has received a temporary
visa to study in the United States;
(iv) Who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan;
(v) Whose gross family income at the time of enrollment does not
exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health
and human services; ((and))
(vi) Who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments
to the plan;
(vii) Who is a United States citizen or legally admitted for
permanent residence; and
(viii) Whose family liquid assets do not exceed an amount
established by the administrator in rule;
(b) An individual who meets the requirements in (a)(i) through (iv)
and (vi) through (viii) of this subsection and who is a foster parent
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and whose gross family income at the
time of enrollment does not exceed three hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services; and
(c) To the extent that state funds are specifically appropriated
for this purpose, with a corresponding federal match, an individual, or
an individual's spouse or dependent children, who meets the
requirements in (a)(i) through (iv) and (vi) through (viii) of this
subsection and whose gross family income at the time of enrollment is
more than two hundred percent, but less than two hundred fifty-one
percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and
determined annually by the federal department of health and human
services.
(7) "Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual
plus the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not
eligible for medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility
criteria adopted by the administrator; (c) who is accepted for
enrollment by the administrator as provided in RCW 48.43.018, either
because the potential enrollee cannot be required to complete the
standard health questionnaire under RCW 48.43.018, or, based upon the
results of the standard health questionnaire, the potential enrollee
would not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health
insurance pool; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a
managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) who chooses
to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed health
care system; and (f) who pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs
for participation in the plan, without any subsidy from the plan.
(8) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic
payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the
plan of providing the plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount
determined to be the subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).
(9) "Premium" means a periodic payment, which an individual, their
employer or another financial sponsor makes to the plan as
consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee, a
nonsubsidized enrollee, or a health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollee.
(10) "Rate" means the amount, negotiated by the administrator with
and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based
upon the enrollment of subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage
tax credit eligible enrollees in the plan and in that system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall establish a waiting period that subsidized
enrollee applicants must complete without private insurance before
enrolling in the program under this chapter. The waiting period shall
be at least four months and waived only when:
(1) The prospective enrollee has a medical condition that, without
treatment, would be life-threatening or cause serious disability; or
(2) The loss of employer-sponsored dependent coverage is due to
either loss of employment, the death of the employee, or the employer
discontinues the option of dependent coverage.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.47.060 and 2007 c 259 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator has the following powers and duties:
(1) To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered
basic health care services, including physician services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, prescription drugs and medications, and
other services that may be necessary for basic health care. In
addition, the administrator may, to the extent that funds are
available, offer as basic health plan services chemical dependency
services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services
shall increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by
more than five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office
of financial management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in
any participating managed health care system under the Washington basic
health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health care
services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and
shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees
who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the
medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator
shall not contract for such services except to the extent that such
services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order
to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a
separate schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen
years of age and younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for
their dependent children. In designing and revising the schedule of
services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing
health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030,
and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.
(2)(a) To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due
the administrator from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross
family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and the
ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not
require the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for
the plan. The structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to
subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (((11))) (12) of this section and to the share of the cost
of the plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as
employees pursuant to subsection (((12))) (13) of this section.
(b) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
subsidized enrollees under RCW 70.47.020(6)(b). Premiums due for
foster parents with gross family income up to two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall be set at the minimum premium amount
charged to enrollees with income below sixty-five percent of the
federal poverty level. Premiums due for foster parents with gross
family income between two hundred percent and three hundred percent of
the federal poverty level shall not exceed one hundred dollars per
month.
(c) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
nonsubsidized enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees
shall be in an amount equal to the cost charged by the managed health
care system provider to the state for the plan plus the administrative
cost of providing the plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under
RCW 48.14.0201.
(d) To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. Premiums due from
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees must be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to
the state for the plan, plus the administrative cost of providing the
plan to those enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201. The
administrator will consider the impact of eligibility determination by
the appropriate federal agency designated by the Trade Act of 2002
(P.L. 107-210) as well as the premium collection and remittance
activities by the United States internal revenue service when
determining the administrative cost charged for health coverage tax
credit eligible enrollees.
(e) An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior
approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other
amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall establish a mechanism for
receiving premium payments from the United States internal revenue
service for health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees.
(f) To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing
coverage identical to the basic health plan, as configured on January
1, 2001, a basic health plan model plan with uniformity in enrollee
cost-sharing requirements.
(3) To evaluate, with the cooperation of participating managed
health care system providers, the impact on the basic health plan of
enrolling health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The
administrator shall issue to the appropriate committees of the
legislature preliminary evaluations on June 1, 2005, and January 1,
2006, and a final evaluation by June 1, 2006. The evaluation shall
address the number of persons enrolled, the duration of their
enrollment, their utilization of covered services relative to other
basic health plan enrollees, and the extent to which their enrollment
contributed to any change in the cost of the basic health plan.
(4) To end the participation of health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees in the basic health plan if the federal government reduces or
terminates premium payments on their behalf through the United States
internal revenue service.
(5) To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing
due a managed health care system from subsidized, nonsubsidized, and
health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees. The structure shall
discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing
mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a
barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care services.
(6) To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as
to prevent an overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes.
Whenever the administrator finds that there is danger of such an
overexpenditure, the administrator shall close enrollment until the
administrator finds the danger no longer exists. Such a closure does
not apply to health coverage tax credit eligible enrollees who receive
a premium subsidy from the United States internal revenue service as
long as the enrollees qualify for the health coverage tax credit
program.
(7) Subject to subsection (6) of this section and section 2 of this
act, to enroll any person who meets the eligibility standards in RCW
70.47.020 and for whom a completed application is submitted. In
determining eligibility, the administrator shall require submission of
income tax returns, or verification that income tax returns were not
filed, and recent income history for any applicant, the applicant's
spouse, and his or her dependents.
(8) To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as
defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who
qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the
administrator.
(((8))) (9) To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the
delivery of services and availability of the plan to residents of the
state, subject to the limitations ((contained in RCW 70.47.080)) in
this chapter or any act appropriating funds for the plan.
(((9))) (10) To solicit and accept applications from managed health
care systems, as defined in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible
basic health care providers under the plan for subsidized enrollees,
nonsubsidized enrollees, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered
basic health care services are available to any enrollee of the plan
from among a selection of two or more participating managed health care
systems. In adopting any rules or procedures applicable to managed
health care systems and in its dealings with such systems, the
administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance for the need
for health care services and the differences in local availability of
health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who
become eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue
to receive services from their existing providers within the managed
health care system if such providers have entered into provider
agreements with the department of social and health services.
(((10))) (11) To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of
subsidized, nonsubsidized, and health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account,
keep records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to
managed health care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees
participating in the respective managed health care systems.
(((11))) (12) To accept applications from individuals residing in
areas served by the plan, on behalf of themselves and their spouses and
dependent children, for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan
as subsidized, nonsubsidized, or health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, to give priority to members of the Washington national guard
and reserves who served in Operation Enduring Freedom, Operation Iraqi
Freedom, or Operation Noble Eagle, and their spouses and dependents,
for enrollment in the Washington basic health plan, to establish
appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as may be
necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale
premiums. Funds received by a family as part of participation in the
adoption support program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100
through 74.13.145 shall not be counted toward a family's current gross
family income for the purposes of this chapter. When an enrollee fails
to report income or income changes accurately, the administrator shall
have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the amounts overpaid
by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred percent
of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to
implement the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available
resources. No subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose
current gross family income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or,
subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or
medical care services under chapter 74.09 RCW. If a number of
enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good cause, the
administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that are
applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll
in the plan.
(((12))) (13) To accept applications from business owners on behalf
of themselves and their employees, spouses, and dependent children, as
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by
the plan. The administrator may require all or the substantial
majority of the eligible employees of such businesses to enroll in the
plan and establish those procedures necessary to facilitate the orderly
enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health care system.
The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least an
amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for
medicare who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic
health care coverage and services from a managed care system
participating in the plan. The administrator shall adjust the amount
determined to be due on behalf of or from all such enrollees whenever
the amount negotiated by the administrator with the participating
managed health care system or systems is modified or the administrative
cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.
(((13))) (14) To determine the rate to be paid to each
participating managed health care system in return for the provision of
covered basic health care services to enrollees in the system.
Although the schedule of covered basic health care services will be the
same or actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the rates
negotiated with participating managed health care systems may vary
among the systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems,
the administrator shall consider the characteristics of the populations
served by the respective systems, economic circumstances of the local
area, the need to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust
account, and other factors the administrator finds relevant.
(((14))) (15) To monitor the provision of covered services to
enrollees by participating managed health care systems in order to
assure enrollee access to good quality basic health care, to require
periodic data reports concerning the utilization of health care
services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate information
for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of participating
managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes of
this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health
care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed
health care systems and to the plan. The administrator shall
coordinate any such reporting requirements with other state agencies,
such as the insurance commissioner and the department of health, to
minimize duplication of effort.
(((15))) (16) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private
employer-based health care coverage and to take appropriate measures
consistent with state and federal statutes that will discourage the
reduction of such coverage in the state.
(((16))) (17) To develop a program of proven preventive health
measures and to integrate it into the plan wherever possible and
consistent with this chapter.
(((17))) (18) To provide, consistent with available funding,
assistance for rural residents, underserved populations, and persons of
color.
(((18))) (19) In consultation with appropriate state and local
government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.
(((19))) (20) To administer the premium discounts provided under
RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and (ii) pursuant to a contract with the
Washington state health insurance pool.
(((20))) (21) To give priority in enrollment to persons who
disenrolled from the program in order to enroll in medicaid, and
subsequently became ineligible for medicaid coverage.
(22)(a) To disenroll any enrollee:
(i) Whose premium payments to the plan are delinquent, except that
an enrollee whose premium is the responsibility of the department of
social and health services under RCW 70.47.110 may not be dropped
solely because of nonpayment by the department;
(ii) Who, as reported by health care providers and confirmed by the
administrator, repeatedly fails to pay the required copayments or
coinsurance in full on a timely basis;
(iii) Who does not meet the criteria for a "subsidized enrollee"
under RCW 70.47.020; or
(iv) As necessary to meet the requirements of subsection (6) of
this section;
(b) To verify continued eligibility, check employment security
payroll records at least once every twelve months on all enrollees;
require any enrollee whose family income, as indicated by payroll
records, exceeds that upon which his or her enrollment and subsidy
level is based to document his or her current family income as a
condition of continued eligibility; and require any enrollee for whom
employment security payroll records cannot be obtained to document his
or her current family income at least once every six months;
(c) To provide an enrollee subject to disenrollment with advance
written notice. Upon disenrollment, the administrator shall promptly
notify the managed health care system in which the enrollee has been
enrolled, and shall not be responsible for payment of health care
services provided to the enrollee, including if applicable members of
the enrollee's family, after the date of notification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 70.47.080 (Enrollment of applicants -- Participation
limitations) and 1993 c 492 s 213 & 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 10; and
(2) RCW 70.47.090 (Removal of enrollees) and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s
11.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---