BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.695 and 2003 c 407 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each four-year institution of higher education and the state
board for community and technical colleges shall develop policies that
ensure undergraduate students enrolled in degree or certificate
programs complete their programs in a timely manner in order to make
the most efficient use of instructional resources and provide capacity
within the institution for additional students.
(2) Policies adopted under this section shall address, but not be
limited to, undergraduate students in the following circumstances:
(a) Students who accumulate more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the number of credits required to complete their respective
baccalaureate or associate degree or certificate programs;
(b) Students who drop more than twenty-five percent of their course
load before the grading period for the quarter or semester, which
prevents efficient use of instructional resources; and
(c) Students who remain on academic probation for more than one
quarter or semester.
(3) Policies adopted under this section ((may)) shall include
assessment by the institution of a surcharge in addition to regular
tuition and fees to be paid by a student for continued enrollment. The
amount of the surcharge shall result in a tuition fees assessment for
that student equivalent to the full cost of instruction for the
subsequent quarter or semester after a finding that a policy under
subsection (2) of this section has been violated. The surcharge shall
continue to be assessed until the institution of higher education
determines that the policy is no longer being violated.
(4) It is presumed that the surcharge shall apply to all students
described in subsection (2) of this section unless the student presents
to his or her registrar evidence that one or more of the following
exemptions apply:
(a) The student is a dislocated worker as defined by RCW 50.04.075
or a person engaging in a job training program under the purview of the
workforce training and education coordinating board;
(b) The student participates in the border county higher education
opportunity project under RCW 28B.76.685;
(c) The student is a certificated teacher of the K-12 school system
pursuing continuing education credits according to certification
requirements; or
(d) The student has not been enrolled in an institution of higher
education during the preceding five years.
(5) Students who believe they are under extraordinary or unforeseen
academic or personal circumstances or were unable to complete their
baccalaureate degree program within the number of credits specified due
to institutional constraints may petition the institution of higher
education for a special waiver from the tuition surcharge provisions of
subsection (3) of this section. The institution of higher education
shall create a process through which student petitions may be fairly
processed, heard, and determined. The process shall include a one
hundred dollar administrative fee. The entire amount of the fee shall
be refunded for those students who make a successful petition.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "full cost of instruction"
means the average instructional support in state general funds and
tuition fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020, per full-time equivalent
undergraduate at each institution of higher education for that academic
year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2008 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington ((21)) 18 percent
(b) Washington State University ((20)) 14 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University ((11)) 6.5 percent
(d) Central Washington University ((10)) 8 percent
(e) Western Washington University ((10)) 9 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College ((10)) 6 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole ((35)) 20 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; and
(s) RCW 28B.70.050.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540;
(c) RCW 28B.15.558; and
(d) RCW 28B.15.621(3).
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.056 and 2006 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A state priority is established for institutions of higher
education, including community colleges, to encourage growing numbers
of enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics.
(2) In meeting this state priority, the legislature understands and
recognizes that the demands of the economic marketplace and the desires
of students are not always on parallel tracks. Therefore, institutions
of higher education shall determine and track local student demand for
programs in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology,
sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics ((and submit findings and
proposed alternatives to meet demand to the higher education
coordinating board and the legislature by November 1, 2008)).
(3) While it is understood that these areas of emphasis should not
be the sole focus of institutions of higher education((.)), it is the
intent of the legislature that steady progress in these areas occur.
The higher education coordinating board shall track and report progress
in the fields of engineering, technology, biotechnology, sciences,
computer sciences, and mathematics including, but not limited to, the
following information:
(a) The number of students enrolled in these fields on a biennial
basis;
(b) The number of associate, bachelor's, and master's degrees
conferred in these fields on a biennial basis;
(c) The amount of expenditures in enrollment and degree programs in
these fields; and
(d) The number and type of public-private partnerships established
relating to these fields among institutions of higher education,
including community colleges, private colleges and universities, and
leading corporations in Washington state.
(4) Institutions of higher education, including community colleges,
shall be provided discretion and flexibility in achieving the
objectives under this section. Examples of the types of institutional
programs that may help achieve these objectives include, but are not
limited to, establishment of institutes of technology, new polytechnic-based institutions, new divisions of existing institutions,
partnerships with private colleges and universities, and a flexible
array of delivery models, including face-to-face learning, interactive
courses, internet-based offerings, and instruction on main campuses,
branch campuses, and other educational centers.
(5) The legislature recognizes the global needs of the economic
marketplace for technologically prepared graduates, and the
relationship between technology industries and higher education.
Institutions of higher education, including community colleges, are
strongly urged to consider science, engineering, and technology program
growth in areas of the state that exhibit a high concentration of
aerospace, biotechnology, and technology industrial presence. Expanded
science and technology programs can gain from the proximity of
experienced and knowledgeable industry leaders, while industry can
benefit from access to new sources of highly trained and educated
graduates.
(6) The state may contract with private colleges and universities
to provide courses or degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics, for
Washington resident students as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a)
through (d). The higher education coordinating board shall act as the
agent for the state in negotiating the terms of the contracts. The
terms of the contract shall include:
(a) The number of courses offered or degrees to be conferred per
year;
(b) The number of students to be served per year;
(c) The financial consideration for providing the services; and
(d) Any other terms necessary to facilitate the administration of
the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 For fiscal years 2010 and 2011, the
percentage of nonresident undergraduate students admitted to
institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, shall
be limited to:
(1) Fifteen percent at the University of Washington, Washington
State University, The Evergreen State College, and the regional
universities; and
(2) Four percent at the community and technical colleges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 For fiscal years 2010 and 2011, community
colleges shall charge not less than one hundred dollars in tuition per
semester or quarter for adult basic education. This requirement may be
waived for students who demonstrate a financial inability to meet the
total cost of books, tuition, and incidental fees for any semester or
quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the greatest extent feasible within available funds, all
institutions of higher education shall use common online learning
technologies including, but not limited to, existing learning
management and web conferencing systems currently managed and governed
by the state board for community and technical colleges; and share
professional development materials and activities related to effective
use of these tools. The state board for community and technical
colleges may adjust existing vendor licenses to accommodate and provide
enterprise services for any interested institutions of higher
education. The common learning management system shall be designed in
a way that allows for easy sharing of courses, learning objects, and
other digital content among the institutions of higher education.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the number and percent
of enrollments served by online learning or web conferencing
technologies continue to expand. The goal is for twenty percent of
community and technical college enrollments and ten percent of four-year public institution enrollments to be attending using online
learning or web conferencing technologies by 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Some upper division courses at Washington colleges and
universities are significantly more expensive to offer because the
classes must be smaller or specialized faculty must be retained to
maintain the quality of instruction that students expect and deserve.
(2) Colleges and universities, using the expertise of
administrators and faculty, and in consultation with student government
association or its equivalent, shall identify upper division courses
that are significantly more expensive to offer.
(3) The governing board of each of the state colleges or
universities may establish and charge each student enrolled in upper
division courses identified in subsection (2) of this section, an upper
division surcharge. The surcharge may not exceed ten percent of the
student's tuition fees charged to a student for that class.
(4) The surcharge may be waived for students receiving state need
grant awards under chapter 28B.92 RCW.
(5) Revenues from the surcharge in this section shall be used
exclusively for expenses incurred for offering the specific class that
resulted the surcharge, except that three and one-half percent of
revenues from the surcharge shall be deposited in the institutional
financial aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2011.

--- END ---