BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.510 and 2002 c 290 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:

((TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL
OFFENDER SCORE

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8 9 or
more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320 333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136 147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102 114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14 20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3 8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6 9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29))

TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL
OFFENDER SCORE

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9 10 or
more

XVI Life Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 225- 233- 243- 262- 272- 289- 289- 315- 345- 383- 383-

337 350 365 393 408 435 435 473 518 575 862

XIV 123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397 595

XIII 115- 125- 134- 144- 154- 163- 182- 201- 238- 277- 277-

172 187 202 216 230 245 273 301 357 416 624

XII 88- 95- 103- 112- 120- 128- 151- 166- 193- 222- 222-

132 143 155 168 180 194 227 248 290 333 500

XI 72- 80- 88- 95- 100- 112- 136- 148- 172- 196- 196-

107 120 132 143 150 168 204 222 257 295 442

X 43- 47- 52- 56- 61- 64- 79- 90- 108- 127- 127-

71 79 86 93 100 107 132 150 180 208 312

IX 26- 29- 34- 38- 43- 47- 64- 72- 90- 108- 108-

43 50 57 64 71 79 107 120 150 180 270

VIII 17- 21- 26- 30- 34- 38- 56- 64- 72- 90- 90-

28 36 43 50 57 64 93 107 120 150 225

VII 14- 17- 21- 26- 30- 34- 47- 55- 64- 72- 72-

21 28 36 43 50 57 79 93 107 120 180

VI 10+- 14- 17- 21- 26- 30- 38- 47- 55- 64- 64-

17 21 28 36 43 50 64 79 93 107 157

V 6- 10+- 12+- 14- 17- 27- 34- 43- 52- 61- 61-

12 17 18 21 30 45 57 71 86 100 120

IV 3- 6- 10+- 12+- 14- 17- 27- 34- 44- 52- 52-

9 12 17 18 21 30 45 57 74 86 120

III 1- 3- 4- 9- 10+- 16- 17- 27- 36- 43- 43-

3 8 12 12 17 23 30 45 60 71 120

II 0-90 2- 3- 4- 10+- 13- 16- 17- 27- 36- 36-

Days 6 9 12 17 19 23 30 45 60 120

I 0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 10+- 13- 16- 17- 17-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 17 19 23 30 60

Numbers in the first and second horizontal rows of each seriousness
category ((represent sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m).
Numbers in the second and third rows)) represent standard sentence
ranges in months, or in days if so designated. 12+ equals one year and
one day. 10+ equals ten months and one day.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.94A.535 and 2008 c 276 s 303 and 2008 c 233 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range
for an offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter,
that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence. Facts supporting aggravated sentences, other
than the fact of a prior conviction, shall be determined pursuant to
the provisions of RCW 9.94A.537.
Whenever a sentence outside the standard sentence range is imposed,
the court shall set forth the reasons for its decision in written
findings of fact and conclusions of law. A sentence outside the
standard sentence range shall be a determinate sentence.
If the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside
the standard sentence range should be imposed, the sentence is subject
to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.585(4).
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.589 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or
concurrently is an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in
this section, and may be appealed by the offender or the state as set
forth in RCW 9.94A.585 (2) through (6).
(1) Mitigating Circumstances - Court to Consider
The court may impose an exceptional sentence below the standard
range if it finds that mitigating circumstances are established by a
preponderance of the evidence. The following are illustrative only and
are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional sentences.
(a) To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing
participant, aggressor, or provoker of the incident.
(b) Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good
faith effort to compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any
damage or injury sustained.
(c) The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion,
threat, or compulsion insufficient to constitute a complete defense but
which significantly affected his or her conduct.
(d) The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was
induced by others to participate in the crime.
(e) The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his
or her conduct, or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of
the law, was significantly impaired. Voluntary use of drugs or alcohol
is excluded.
(f) The offense was principally accomplished by another person and
the defendant manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the
safety or well-being of the victim.
(g) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.589
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of
the purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(h) The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing
pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and
the offense is a response to that abuse.
(i) The offender score due to other current offenses, as opposed to
prior offenses, results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly
excessive.
(2) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered and Imposed by the Court
The trial court may impose an aggravated exceptional sentence
without a finding of fact by a jury under the following circumstances:
(a) The defendant and the state both stipulate that justice is best
served by the imposition of an exceptional sentence outside the
standard range, and the court finds the exceptional sentence to be
consistent with and in furtherance of the interests of justice and the
purposes of the sentencing reform act.
(b) ((The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(c))) The defendant has committed multiple current offenses and the
defendant's high offender score results in some of the current offenses
going unpunished.
(((d) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal
history which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.))
(3) Aggravating Circumstances - Considered by a Jury -Imposed by
the Court
Except for circumstances listed in subsection (2) of this section,
the following circumstances are an exclusive list of factors that can
support a sentence above the standard range. Such facts should be
determined by procedures specified in RCW 9.94A.537.
(a) The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty to the victim.
(b) The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the
current offense was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance.
(c) The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant
knew that the victim of the current offense was pregnant.
(d) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following
factors:
(i) The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple
incidents per victim;
(ii) The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss
substantially greater than typical for the offense;
(iii) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication
or planning or occurred over a lengthy period of time; or
(iv) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence,
or fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(e) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to
trafficking in controlled substances, which was more onerous than the
typical offense of its statutory definition: The presence of ANY of
the following may identify a current offense as a major VUCSA:
(i) The current offense involved at least three separate
transactions in which controlled substances were sold, transferred, or
possessed with intent to do so;
(ii) The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or
transfer of controlled substances in quantities substantially larger
than for personal use;
(iii) The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled
substances for use by other parties;
(iv) The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender
to have occupied a high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;
(v) The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning, occurred over a lengthy period of time, or involved a broad
geographic area of disbursement; or
(vi) The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate
the commission of the current offense, including positions of trust,
confidence or fiduciary responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or
other medical professional).
(f) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.835.
(g) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of
the same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time.
(h) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in
RCW 10.99.020, and one or more of the following was present:
(i) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological,
physical, or sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple
incidents over a prolonged period of time;
(ii) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or
the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years; or
(iii) The offender's conduct during the commission of the current
offense manifested deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.
(i) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of
rape.
(j) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was
a youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant
established or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of
victimization.
(k) The offense was committed with the intent to obstruct or impair
human or animal health care or agricultural or forestry research or
commercial production.
(l) The current offense is trafficking in the first degree or
trafficking in the second degree and any victim was a minor at the time
of the offense.
(m) The offense involved a high degree of sophistication or
planning.
(n) The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or
fiduciary responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current
offense.
(o) The defendant committed a current sex offense, has a history of
sex offenses, and is not amenable to treatment.
(p) The offense involved an invasion of the victim's privacy.
(q) The defendant demonstrated or displayed an egregious lack of
remorse.
(r) The offense involved a destructive and foreseeable impact on
persons other than the victim.
(s) The defendant committed the offense to obtain or maintain his
or her membership or to advance his or her position in the hierarchy of
an organization, association, or identifiable group.
(t) The defendant committed the current offense shortly after being
released from incarceration.
(u) The current offense is a burglary and the victim of the
burglary was present in the building or residence when the crime was
committed.
(v) The offense was committed against a law enforcement officer who
was performing his or her official duties at the time of the offense,
the offender knew that the victim was a law enforcement officer, and
the victim's status as a law enforcement officer is not an element of
the offense.
(w) The defendant committed the offense against a victim who was
acting as a good samaritan.
(x) The defendant committed the offense against a public official
or officer of the court in retaliation of the public official's
performance of his or her duty to the criminal justice system.
(y) The victim's injuries substantially exceed the level of bodily
harm necessary to satisfy the elements of the offense. This aggravator
is not an exception to RCW 9.94A.530(2).
(z) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored
foreign criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is
clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of this chapter, as
expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.
(aa) The failure to consider the defendant's prior criminal history
which was omitted from the offender score calculation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.525 results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too
lenient.
(bb)(i)(A) The current offense is theft in the first degree, theft
in the second degree, possession of stolen property in the first
degree, or possession of stolen property in the second degree; (B) the
stolen property involved is metal property; and (C) the property damage
to the victim caused in the course of the theft of metal property is
more than three times the value of the stolen metal property, or the
theft of the metal property creates a public hazard.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "metal property" means
commercial metal property, private metal property, or nonferrous metal
property, as defined in RCW 19.290.010.
(((aa))) (cc) The defendant committed the offense with the intent
to directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement, gain,
profit, or other advantage to or for a criminal street gang as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030, its reputation, influence, or membership.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.94A.190 and 2009 c 28 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentence that includes a term or terms of confinement
totaling more than one year, or a sentence set under RCW 9.94A.510
based on a sentence range with a minimum sentence of more than ten
months, shall be served in a facility or institution operated, or
utilized under contract, by the state. Except as provided in this
subsection or subsection (3) or (5) of this section, a sentence of not
more than one year of confinement shall be served in a facility
operated, licensed, or utilized under contract, by the county, or if
home detention or work crew has been ordered by the court, in the
residence of either the offender or a member of the offender's
immediate family.
(2) If a county uses a state partial confinement facility for the
partial confinement of a person sentenced to confinement for not more
than one year, the county shall reimburse the state for the use of the
facility as provided in this subsection. The office of financial
management shall set the rate of reimbursement based upon the average
per diem cost per offender in the facility. The office of financial
management shall determine to what extent, if any, reimbursement shall
be reduced or eliminated because of funds provided by the legislature
to the department for the purpose of covering the cost of county use of
state partial confinement facilities. The office of financial
management shall reestablish reimbursement rates each even-numbered
year.
(3) A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term of not more
than one year, and who is committed or returned to incarceration in a
state facility on another felony conviction, either under the
indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter 9.95 RCW, or under this chapter
shall serve all terms of confinement, including a sentence of not more
than one year, in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW
9.94A.589.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a sentence
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660 which has a standard sentence range
of over one year, regardless of length, shall be served in a facility
or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.
(5) Sentences imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507 shall be served in
a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.94A.850 and 2009 c 28 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sentencing guidelines commission is established as an agency
of state government.
(2) The legislature finds that the commission, having accomplished
its original statutory directive to implement this chapter, and having
expertise in sentencing practice and policies, shall:
(a) Evaluate state sentencing policy, to include whether the
sentencing ranges and standards are consistent with and further:
(i) The purposes of this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and
(ii) The intent of the legislature to emphasize confinement for the
violent offender and alternatives to confinement for the nonviolent
offender.
The commission shall provide the governor and the legislature with
its evaluation and recommendations under this subsection not later than
December 1, 1996, and every two years thereafter;
(b) Recommend to the legislature revisions or modifications to the
standard sentence ranges, state sentencing policy, prosecuting
standards, and other standards. If implementation of the revisions or
modifications would result in exceeding the capacity of correctional
facilities, then the commission shall accompany its recommendation with
an additional list of standard sentence ranges which are consistent
with correction capacity;
(c) Study the existing criminal code and from time to time make
recommendations to the legislature for modification;
(d)(i) Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the
collection, preparation, analysis, and dissemination of information on
state and local adult and juvenile sentencing practices; (ii) develop
and maintain a computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information
system by individual superior court judge consisting of offender,
offense, history, and sentence information entered from judgment and
sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing research
regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and
other matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice
system and the juvenile justice system;
(e) Assume the powers and duties of the juvenile disposition
standards commission after June 30, 1996;
(f) Evaluate the effectiveness of existing disposition standards
and related statutes in implementing policies set forth in RCW
13.40.010 generally, specifically review the guidelines relating to the
confinement of minor and first-time offenders as well as the use of
diversion, and review the application of current and proposed juvenile
sentencing standards and guidelines for potential adverse impacts on
the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;
(g) Solicit the comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice
community concerning disposition standards, and make recommendations to
the legislature regarding revisions or modifications of the standards.
The evaluations shall be submitted to the legislature on December 1 of
each odd-numbered year. The department of social and health services
shall provide the commission with available data concerning the
implementation of the disposition standards and related statutes and
their effect on the performance of the department's responsibilities
relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for
modification of the disposition standards. The administrative office
of the courts shall provide the commission with available data on
diversion, including the use of youth court programs, and dispositions
of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW; and
(h) Not later than December 1, 1997, and at least every two years
thereafter, based on available information, report to the governor and
the legislature on:
(i) Racial disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing,
and, if available, the impact that diversions, such as youth courts,
have on racial disproportionality in juvenile prosecution,
adjudication, and sentencing;
(ii) The capacity of state and local juvenile and adult facilities
and resources; and
(iii) Recidivism information on adult and juvenile offenders.
(3) Each of the commission's recommended standard sentence ranges
shall include one or more of the following: Total confinement, partial
confinement, community supervision, community restitution, and a fine.
(4) The standard sentence ranges of total and partial confinement
under this chapter, except as provided in RCW 9.94A.517, are subject to
the following limitations:
(a) If the maximum term in the range is one year or less, the
minimum term in the range shall be no less than one-third of the
maximum term in the range, except that if the maximum term in the range
is ninety days or less, the minimum term may be less than one-third of
the maximum;
(b) If the maximum term in the range is greater than one year, the
minimum term in the range shall be no less than ((seventy-five)) sixty
percent of the maximum term in the range, except that for murder in the
second degree in seriousness level XIV under RCW 9.94A.510, the minimum
term in the range shall be no less than fifty percent of the maximum
term in the range and except that for any offense with an offender
score of ten or more, the minimum term in the range shall be no less
than twenty-five percent of the maximum term in the range; and
(c) The maximum term of confinement in a range may not exceed the
statutory maximum for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(5)(a) Not later than December 31 of each year, the commission may
propose modifications to the community custody ranges to be included in
sentences under RCW 9.94A.701. The ranges shall be based on the
principles in RCW 9.94A.010, and shall take into account the funds
available to the department for community custody. The minimum term in
each range shall not be less than one-half of the maximum term.
(b) The legislature may, by enactment of a legislative bill, adopt
or modify the community custody ranges proposed by the commission. If
the legislature fails to adopt or modify the initial ranges in its next
regular session after they are proposed, the proposed ranges shall take
effect without legislative approval for crimes committed on or after
July 1, 2000.
(c) When the commission proposes modifications to ranges pursuant
to this subsection, the legislature may, by enactment of a bill, adopt
or modify the ranges proposed by the commission for crimes committed on
or after July 1 of the year after they were proposed. Unless the
legislature adopts or modifies the commission's proposal in its next
regular session, the proposed ranges shall not take effect.
(6) The commission shall exercise its duties under this section in
conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2009.

--- END ---