BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.45.010 and 2005 c 370 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and
systematic process for funding the benefits provided to members and
retirees of the public employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW;
the teachers' retirement system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement systems, chapter 41.26 RCW; the
school employees' retirement system, chapter 41.35 RCW; the public
safety employees' retirement system, chapter 41.37 RCW; and the
Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter 43.43 RCW.
((The legislature finds that the funding status of the state
retirement systems has improved dramatically since 1989. Because of
the big reduction in unfunded pension liabilities, it is now prudent to
adjust the long-term economic assumptions that are used in the
actuarial studies conducted by the state actuary. The legislature
finds that it is reasonable to increase the salary growth assumption in
light of Initiative Measure No. 732, to increase the investment return
assumption in light of the asset allocation policies and historical
returns of the state investment board, and to reestablish June 30,
2024, as the target date to achieve full funding of all liabilities in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1, and the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system plan 1.))
The funding process established by this chapter is intended to
achieve the following goals:
(1) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school
employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 as provided by law;
(2) To fully amortize the total costs of ((the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and))
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan
1, not later than June 30, 2024;
(3) To fully amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 within a rolling ten-year period, using
methods and assumptions that balance needs for increased benefit
security, decreased contribution rate volatility, and affordability of
pension contribution rates;
(4) To establish long-term employer contribution rates which will
remain a relatively predictable proportion of the future state budgets;
and
(((4))) (5) To fund, to the extent feasible, ((benefit increases
for plan 1 members and)) all benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the
working lives of those members so that the cost of those benefits are
paid by the taxpayers who receive the benefit of those members'
service.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.45.035 and 2004 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic
assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW
41.45.030:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;
(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or
longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;
(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;
and
(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25
percent for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety
employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system,
and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system.
The assumption shall be .90 percent for the teachers' retirement
system.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, the growth in salaries assumption for
the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol
retirement system, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be
the sum of:
(a) The growth in inflation assumption in subsection (1)(a) of this
section; and
(b) The productivity growth assumption of 0.5 percent.
(3)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003,
changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment
rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of
assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the
magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return
relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with
actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of
assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the
market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy
percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date.
Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four
councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing
technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.
(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness
of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to
the ((legislature)) council as necessary. Any changes adopted by the
council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.45.060 and 2007 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state actuary shall provide preliminary actuarial valuation
results based on the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
41.45.035.
(2) Not later than July 31, 2008, and every two years thereafter,
consistent with the economic assumptions and asset value smoothing
technique included in RCW 41.45.035 or adopted under RCW 41.45.030 or
41.45.035, the council shall adopt and may make changes to:
(a) A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1;
(b) Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees'
retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system; and
(c) Basic employer contribution rates for the school employees'
retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system
for funding both those systems and the public employees' retirement
system plan 1.
The council may adopt annual rate changes for any plan for any
rate-setting period. The contribution rates adopted by the council
shall be subject to revision by the legislature.
(3) The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the
council shall be the level percentages of pay that are needed:
(a) To fully amortize the total costs of ((the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and))
the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan
1 not later than June 30, 2024; ((and))
(b) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans 2
and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the public safety
employees' retirement system plan 2, and the school employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance with RCW 41.45.061,
41.45.067, and this section; and
(c) To fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 1
and the teachers' retirement system plan 1 in accordance with RCW
41.45.070, 41.45.150, and this section.
(4) The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate
a combined plan 2 and 3 ((employer contribution rate and)) normal cost,
a Washington state patrol retirement system ((contribution rate))
normal cost, and a public safety employees' retirement system normal
cost.
(5) A modified entry age normal cost method, as set forth in this
chapter, shall be used to calculate employer contributions to the
public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement
system plan 1.
(6) The employer contribution rate for the public employees'
retirement system and the school employees' retirement system shall
equal the sum of:
(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3
normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied
pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus
(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a
rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth
in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates
applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus
(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit
improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that
become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit
improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using
projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The
amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are
collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant
to RCW 41.45.150.
(7) The employer contribution rate for the public safety employees'
retirement system shall equal the sum of:
(a) The amount required to pay the normal cost for the system,
subject to any minimum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus
(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system over a
rolling ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth
in system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates
applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus
(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit
improvements in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system that
become effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit
improvement shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using
projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The
amounts required under this subsection are not subject to, and are
collected in addition to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant
to RCW 41.45.150.
(8) The employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system shall equal the sum of:
(a) The amount required to pay the combined plan 2 and plan 3
normal cost for the system, subject to any minimum rates applied
pursuant to RCW 41.45.155; plus
(b) The amount required to amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system over a rolling
ten-year period using projected future salary growth and growth in
system membership, and subject to any minimum or maximum rates applied
pursuant to RCW 41.45.150; plus
(c) The amounts required to amortize the costs of any benefit
improvements in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system that become
effective after June 30, 2009. The cost of each benefit improvement
shall be amortized over a fixed ten-year period using projected future
salary growth and growth in system membership. The amounts required
under this subsection are not subject to, and are collected in addition
to, any minimum or maximum rates applied pursuant to RCW 41.45.150.
(((5))) (9) The council shall immediately notify the directors of
the office of financial management and department of retirement systems
of the state and employer contribution rates adopted. The rates shall
be effective for the ensuing biennial period, subject to any
legislative modifications.
(((6))) (10) The director shall collect those rates adopted by the
council. The rates established in RCW 41.45.062, or by the council,
shall be subject to revision by the legislature.
(((7))) (11) The state actuary shall prepare final actuarial
valuation results based on the economic assumptions, asset value
smoothing technique, and contribution rates included in or adopted
under RCW 41.45.030, 41.45.035, and this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.45.070 and 2007 c 491 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established
in RCW 41.45.060 or 41.45.054, the department shall also charge
employers of public employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, school employees' retirement system, public safety employees'
retirement system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members
an additional supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional
benefits, if any, granted to members of those systems. Except as
provided in subsections (6), (7), and (9) of this section, the
supplemental contribution rates required by this section shall be
calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged regardless of
language to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes
additional benefits.
(2) In addition to the basic member, employer, and state
contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.0604 for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2, the department
shall also establish supplemental rates to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2. Except as
provided in subsection (6) of this section, these supplemental rates
shall be calculated by the actuary retained by the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' board and the state actuary through the
process provided in RCW 41.26.720(1)(a) and the state treasurer shall
transfer the additional required contributions regardless of language
to the contrary contained in the statute which authorizes the
additional benefits.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under
this section to fund benefit increases provided to active members of
the public employees' retirement system plan 1((,)) and the teachers'
retirement system plan 1((, and Washington state patrol retirement
system,)) shall be calculated as the level percentage of all
((members')) system pay needed to fund the cost of the benefit ((not
later than June 30, 2024)) over a fixed ten-year period, using
projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The
supplemental rate to fund benefit increases provided to active members
of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to
all system employers in the public employees' retirement system, the
school employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees'
retirement system. The supplemental rate to fund benefit increases
provided to active members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1
shall be charged to all system employers in the teachers' retirement
system.
(4) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
benefit increases provided to active and retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, the public safety employees'
retirement system plan 2, ((or)) the school employees' retirement
system plan 2 and plan 3, or the Washington state patrol retirement
system shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay
needed to fund the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW
41.45.060, 41.45.061, 41.45.0631, or 41.45.067.
(5) The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
postretirement adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis
to current retirees shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed
to fund the adjustments as they are paid to the retirees. Beginning
July 1, 2009, the supplemental rate charged under this section to fund
increases in the automatic postretirement adjustments for active or
retired members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level
percentage of pay needed to fund the cost of the automatic adjustments
((not later than June 30, 2024)) over a fixed ten-year period, using
projected future salary growth and growth in system membership. The
supplemental rate to fund increases in the automatic postretirement
adjustments for active members or retired members of the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to all system
employers in the public employees' retirement system, the school
employees' retirement system, and the public safety employees'
retirement system. The supplemental rate to fund increases in
automatic postretirement adjustments for active members or retired
members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 shall be charged to
all system employers in the teachers' retirement system.
(6) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of
1998.
(7) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW;
section 309, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998.
(8) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
additional benefits granted to members and survivors pursuant to
chapter 94, Laws of 2006.
(9) A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the teachers' retirement
system and the school employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in
sections 2, 4, 6, and 8, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 until September 1,
2008. A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of
the additional benefits granted to members of the public employees'
retirement system plans 2 and 3 under sections 9 and 10, chapter 491,
Laws of 2007 until July 1, 2008.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.45.150 and 2006 c 365 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2015, maximum
annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the
employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system
and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement
system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of
the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize
plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum
rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system that
is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

2.04% 2.04% 6.50% 7.50% 8.50% 9.50%

(4) Beginning July 1, ((2009)) 2015, a minimum ((2.68)) 5.25
percent contribution is established as part of the basic ((state and))
employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system
and the public safety employees' retirement system, to be used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution
rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan
1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred twenty-five percent of the actuarial accrued liability ((or June 30, 2024,
whichever comes first)).
(((2))) (5) Beginning September 1, ((2009)) 2015, a minimum
((2.68)) 5.25 percent contribution is established as part of the basic
((state and)) employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that
portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required
to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.
This minimum contribution rate shall remain effective until the
actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement
system equals one hundred ((twenty-five)) percent of the actuarial
accrued liability ((or June 30, 2024, whichever comes first)).
(((3))) (6) Beginning September 1, ((2009)) 2015, a minimum
((4.71)) 8.00 percent contribution is established as part of the basic
((state and)) employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of
the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1
benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum
contribution rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of
assets in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system equals one hundred
((twenty-five)) percent of the actuarial accrued liability ((or June
30, 2024, whichever comes first)).
(((4))) (7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation,
the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of ((these)) the
minimum contribution rates and recommend to the ((legislature)) council
any adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or
actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. Any changes adopted by
the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.45.155 and 2006 c 365 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, ((2009)) 2011, a minimum contribution rate is
established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the basic
((state and)) employer contribution rate for the public employees'
retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the plans 2 and
3 employer normal cost shall equal the total contribution rate required
to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost as
calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This minimum rate,
when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any contribution
rate required to amortize past gain-sharing distributions in plan 3.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, a minimum contribution rate is
established for the plan 2 normal cost as part of the basic employer
contribution rate for the public safety employees' retirement system.
The minimum contribution rate for the plan 2 normal cost shall equal
the total contribution rate required to fund eighty percent of the plan
2 normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method.
(3) Beginning September 1, ((2009)) 2011, a minimum contribution
rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as part of the
basic ((state and)) employer contribution rate for the school
employees' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the
plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost shall equal the total contribution
rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employer
normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This
minimum rate, when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any
contribution rate required to amortize past gain-sharing distributions
in plan 3.
(((3))) (4) Beginning September 1, ((2009)) 2011, a minimum
contribution rate is established for the plans 2 and 3 normal cost as
part of the basic ((state and)) employer contribution rate for the
teachers' retirement system. The minimum contribution rate for the
plans 2 and 3 employer normal cost shall equal the total contribution
rate required to fund eighty percent of the plans 2 and 3 employer
normal cost as calculated under the entry age normal cost method. This
minimum rate, when applicable, shall be collected in addition to any
contribution rate required to amortize past gain-sharing distributions
in plan 3.
(((4))) (5) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation,
the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of these minimum
contribution rates and recommend to the ((legislature)) council any
adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or
actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. Any changes adopted by
the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.45.0631 and 2007 c 300 s 1 and 2007 c 280 s 5 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The allocation of costs between the employer and members of the
Washington state patrol retirement system shall be made only after the
application of any minimum total contribution rate that may be in
effect for the system under subsection (4) of this section. For
benefit improvements effective on or after July 1, 2007, costs shall be
shared equally by members and the employer, and any cap on member
contributions shall be adjusted accordingly. The member contribution
rate shall be based on the adjusted total contribution rate described
in subsection (2) of this section. Beginning July 1, 2007, the
required member contribution rate for members of the Washington state
patrol retirement system shall be the lesser of the following: (a)
One-half of the adjusted total contribution rate for the system; or (b)
seven percent, plus fifty percent of the contribution rate increase
caused by any benefit improvements effective on or after July 1, 2007.
(2) The employer shall continue to pay for all costs attributable
to distributions under RCW 43.43.270(2) for survivors of members who
became disabled under RCW 43.43.040(2) prior to July 1, 2006, until
such costs are fully paid. In order to avoid charging members for
these costs, the total required contribution rate shall be adjusted to
exclude these costs. The result of the adjustment shall be the
adjusted total contribution rate that is to be used to calculate the
required member contribution rate.
(3) The employer rate shall be the contribution rate required to
cover all total system costs that are not covered by the member
contribution rate.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2009, a minimum total contribution rate is
established for the Washington state patrol retirement system. The
total Washington state patrol retirement system contribution rate ((as
adopted by the pension funding council and subject to revision by the
legislature)) may exceed, but may not drop below, the established
minimum total contribution rate. From July 1, 2009, through June 30,
2011, the minimum total contribution rate shall equal the total
contribution rate required to fund fifty percent of the Washington
state patrol retirement system's normal cost as calculated under the
entry age normal cost method. Beginning July 1, 2011, the minimum
total contribution rate shall equal the total contribution rate
required to fund seventy percent of the Washington state patrol
retirement system's normal cost as calculated under the entry age
normal cost method. This minimum rate, when applicable, shall be
collected in addition to any contribution rate required to amortize any
unfunded costs attributable to distributions under RCW 43.43.270(2) for
survivors of members who became disabled under RCW 43.43.040(2) prior
to July 1, 2006.
(5) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state
actuary shall review the appropriateness of this minimum total
contribution rate and recommend to the ((legislature)) council any
adjustments as may be needed. Any changes adopted by the council shall
be subject to revision by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW
to read as follows, but because of its temporary nature is not
codified:
The legislature hereby revises the contribution rates adopted by
the council at its July 22, 2008, meeting to exclude assumed
improvements for projected mortality, and to implement the changes in
RCW 41.45.010, 41.45.035, 41.45.060, 41.45.070, 41.45.150, 41.45.155,
and 41.45.0631, resulting in the following required contribution rates:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
basic employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement
system shall be 5.25 percent, of which 1.25 percent shall be used for
the sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
basic employer contribution rate for the public safety employees'
retirement system shall be 7.80 percent, of which 1.25 percent shall be
used for the sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system.
(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2011, the
required basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system shall be 6.17 percent, of which 2.04 percent shall be used for
the sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2011, the
required basic employer contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system shall be 5.39 percent, of which 1.25 percent shall be
used for the sole purpose of amortizing the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
basic employer contribution rate for plan 1 of the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be 0.00 percent.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
basic employer contribution rate for the Washington state patrol
retirement system shall be 6.17 percent.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
plan 2 member contribution rate for the public employees' retirement
system shall be 3.89 percent.
(8) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
plan 2 member contribution rate for the public safety employees'
retirement system shall be 6.55 percent.
(9) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2011, the
required plan 2 member contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system shall be 3.36 percent.
(10) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2011, the
required plan 2 member contribution rate for the school employees'
retirement system shall be 3.14 percent.
(11) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
member contribution rate for plan 1 of the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system shall be 0.00 percent.
(12) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2011, the required
member contribution rate for the Washington state patrol retirement
system shall be 4.85 percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---