BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature intends that the nursing
facility medicaid payment system be structured to promote quality care
and quality of life for residents. The legislature also intends that
the nursing facility medicaid payment system is efficient to
administer, accountable to the public and to the legislature, and
transparent to taxpayers and providers. The legislature finds that the
current statute governing the nursing facility medicaid payment system
is overly complex in contrast to Washington state's statutes governing
reimbursement systems for hospitals, physicians, boarding homes, and
other vendors, and that this complexity has made it difficult to focus
on systemic improvements in the nursing facility medicaid payment
system and in other long-term care policies.
(2) The legislature intends to simplify the existing nursing
facility medicaid payment system so that it is fair, predictable,
transparent, and accountable. The legislature further intends that,
effective July 1, 2009, the essential structure of this simplified
nursing facility medicaid payment system must be described in statute,
and the details of the system must be described in rules adopted by the
department of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
The nursing facility medicaid payment system shall have the
following structure:
(1) Nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations must be
cost-based and facility-specific and have at least four components:
Direct care, including therapy; support services; indirect care; and
capital costs. Additional noncapital components may be considered if
the entire nursing facility medicaid payment system does not result in
a statewide weighted average payment rate that exceeds the
appropriations level in the biennial appropriations act.
(2) The direct care component shall use a case mix system.
(3) Noncapital components shall be subject to limits based upon a
determination of the median of facilities' costs with respect to a
particular component.
(4) Noncapital rates must be determined from annual cost reports
filed by facilities, with costs rebased every two years. The capital
rate component shall be determined July 1st of each year, based on cost
reports filed by facilities for the preceding year.
(5) Facilities must be separated into peer groups, based on
location.
(6) Payments must be subject to a settlement procedure that
compares costs to rates received and recovers unspent moneys as
appropriate.
(7) An occupancy adjustment must be applied to the indirect and
capital cost centers.
(8) A statewide weighted average payment rate and adjustments to
medicaid rate components for economic trends and conditions shall be
specified in the biennial appropriations act and may adjust payments if
necessary to ensure compliance. Any economic trends and conditions
factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act
shall not be applied solely nor compounded to the medicaid rate
components.
(9) The department of social and health services must ensure that
nursing facility medicaid payment rates, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, comply with the biennial
appropriations act.
(10) Capital spending on nursing facilities subject to the
requirement of a certificate of capital authorization must be limited
by annual authorization amounts specified by the legislature pursuant
to RCW 74.46.807.
(11) The department is authorized within funds appropriated in the
biennial appropriations act to establish payments linked to performance
measures.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.421 and 2008 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing
facility medicaid payment rates that, in the aggregate for all
participating nursing facilities, are in accordance with the biennial
appropriations act.
(2)))(a) The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid
payment rate methodologies described in this chapter and in rules
adopted by the department to determine initial component rate
allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.
(b) The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to
adjustment as provided in this section in order to assure that the
statewide weighted average payment rate to nursing facilities is less
than or equal to the statewide weighted average payment rate specified
in the biennial appropriations act.
(((3))) (2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating
a legal right or entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been
adjusted under this section or (b) would cause the statewide weighted
average payment rate to exceed the statewide weighted average payment
rate specified in the biennial appropriations act.
(((4))) (3)(a) The statewide weighted average payment rate for any
state fiscal year under the nursing facility medicaid payment system,
weighted by patient days, shall not exceed the annual statewide
weighted average nursing facility payment rate identified for that
fiscal year in the biennial appropriations act.
(b) If the department determines that the weighted average nursing
facility payment rate calculated in accordance with this chapter is
likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
identified in the biennial appropriations act, then the department
shall adjust all nursing facility payment rates proportional to the
amount by which the weighted average rate allocations would otherwise
exceed the budgeted rate amount. Any such adjustments for the current
fiscal year shall only be made prospectively, not retrospectively, and
shall be applied proportionately to each component rate allocation for
each facility.
(c) If any final order or final judgment, including a final order
or final judgment resulting from an adjudicative proceeding or judicial
review permitted by chapter 34.05 RCW, would result in an increase to
a nursing facility's payment rate for a prior fiscal year or years, the
department shall consider whether the increased rate for that facility
would result in the statewide weighted average payment rate for all
facilities for such fiscal year or years to be exceeded. If the
increased rate would result in the statewide weighted average payment
rate for such year or years being exceeded, the department shall
increase that nursing facility's payment rate to meet the final order
or judgment only to the extent that it does not result in an increase
to the statewide weighted average payment rate for all facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.800 and 1998 c 322 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consistent with the principles and provisions described in
section 2 of this act, the department shall have authority to adopt,
amend, and rescind such administrative rules and definitions as it
deems necessary to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter,
to administer the nursing facility medicaid payment system, to audit
nursing facilities, and to resolve issues and develop procedures that
it deems necessary to implement, update, and improve the case mix
elements of the nursing facility medicaid payment system. In adopting
rules, the department may consider the potential impact of the payment
system on the level and quality of services received by nursing
facility residents; the anticipated impact of the system on private pay
clients and on populations in other parts of the long-term care system;
and the special circumstances presented by changes of ownership of
nursing facilities, bed banking, exceptional care needs of residents,
addition or deletion of licensed beds, facilities located in nonurban
areas, closure of facilities, and facilities with low-occupancy levels,
as well as other concerns.
(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the
department to adopt or employ any calculations, steps, tests,
methodologies, alternate methodologies, indexes, formulas, mathematical
or statistical models, concepts, or procedures for medicaid rate
setting or payment that are not expressly called for in this chapter.
(3) The department shall adopt comprehensive rules to describe and
administer the nursing facility medicaid payment system, to be
effective July 1, 2009. The rules shall result in a statewide weighted
average payment rate that does not exceed the appropriations level in
the biennial appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed:
(1) RCW 74.46.431 (Nursing facility medicaid payment rate
allocations -- Components -- Minimum wage -- Rules) and 2008 c 263 s 2, 2007
c 508 s 2, 2006 c 258 s 2, 2005 c 518 s 944, 2004 c 276 s 913, 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 5, 1999 c 353 s 4, & 1998 c 322 s 19;
(2) RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component rate allocation) and
2006 c 258 s 3, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 6, & 1999 c 353 s 9;
(3) RCW 74.46.435 (Property component rate allocation) and 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 7, 1999 c 353 s 10, & 1998 c 322 s 29;
(4) RCW 74.46.437 (Financing allowance component rate allocation)
and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 & 1999 c 353 s 11;
(5) RCW 74.46.439 (Facilities leased in arm's-length agreements--Recomputation of financing allowance -- Reimbursement for annualized
lease payments -- Rate adjustment) and 1999 c 353 s 12;
(6) RCW 74.46.485 (Case mix classification methodology) and 1998 c
322 s 22;
(7) RCW 74.46.496 (Case mix weights -- Determination -- Revisions) and
2006 c 258 s 4 & 1998 c 322 s 23;
(8) RCW 74.46.501 (Average case mix indexes determined quarterly--Facility average case mix index -- Medicaid average case mix index) and
2006 c 258 s 5, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 9, & 1998 c 322 s 24;
(9) RCW 74.46.506 (Direct care component rate allocations--Determination -- Quarterly updates -- Fines) and 2007 c 508 s 3, 2006 c 258
s 6, & 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 10;
(10) RCW 74.46.508 (Direct care component rate allocation--Increases -- Rules) and 2003 1st sp.s. c 6 s 1 & 1999 c 181 s 2;
(11) RCW 74.46.511 (Therapy care component rate allocation--Determination) and 2008 c 263 s 3, 2007 c 508 s 4, & 2001 1st sp.s. c
8 s 11;
(12) RCW 74.46.515 (Support services component rate allocation--Determination -- Emergency situations) and 2008 c 263 s 4, 2001 1st sp.s.
c 8 s 12, 1999 c 353 s 7, & 1998 c 322 s 27;
(13) RCW 74.46.521 (Operations component rate allocation--Determination) and 2007 c 508 s 5, 2006 c 258 s 7, 2001 1st sp.s. c 8
s 13, 1999 c 353 s 8, & 1998 c 322 s 28; and
(14) RCW 74.46.533 (Combined and estimated rebased rates--Determination -- Hold harmless provision) and 2007 c 508 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2009.

--- END ---