BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part
from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall
indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds
that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose
an excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas
of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the
city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one
percent of the selling price. The revenues from this tax shall be used
by any city or county with a population of five thousand or less and
any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 for any
capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local
capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.
After April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed under
this subsection in counties over five thousand population and cities
over five thousand population that are required or choose to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall be used solely for financing capital projects
specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan
and housing relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450.
However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt
retirement prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that
purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is
retired, or (b) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or
cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the
project is completed.
(3) In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the
legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an
additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the
unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.
(4) Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from
persons who are taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the unincorporated areas of the
county or within the corporate limits of the city, as the case may be.
(5) Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all
applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real
estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.
(6) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads;
highways; sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals;
bridges; domestic water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems;
parks; recreational facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire
protection facilities; trails; libraries; administrative and/or
judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood control projects by
those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes; and,
until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions that,
prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized
by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes.
(7) From the effective date of this act through December 31, 2012,
revenues generated from the tax imposed under this section may also be
used for the maintenance of capital facilities if the legislative
authority of any county or city identifies the capital maintenance
facilities in the adopted budget.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.46.035 and 1992 c 221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 33
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify
in the adopted budget the capital projects, park maintenance and
operation expenditures, or both, funded in whole or in part from the
proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and shall indicate that
such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that may be
reasonably available for ((such capital projects)) these purposes.
(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city that plans
under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may impose an additional excise tax on each
sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the
county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at
a rate not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price.
Any county choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(2) and any city within
such a county may only adopt an ordinance imposing the excise tax
authorized by this section if the ordinance is first authorized by a
proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district
voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
district or at a special election within the taxing district called by
the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the
voters.
(3) Revenues generated from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of
this section shall be used by such counties and cities ((solely)) for
financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan
element of a comprehensive plan, and, at the option of the city or
county, park maintenance and operation expenditures. However, revenues
(a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to
March 1, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the
original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b)
committed prior to March 1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a
project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is
completed.
(4) Revenues generated by the tax imposed by this section shall be
deposited in a separate account.
(5) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads,
highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals,
bridges, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems,
((and planning, construction, reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation,
or improvement of parks)) parks, recreational facilities, law
enforcement facilities, fire protection facilities, trails, libraries,
administrative and/or judicial facilities, and river and water flood
control facilities.
(6) When the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW
36.70A.340 with the secretary of state and the appropriate county or
city, the county or city's authority to impose the additional excise
tax under this section shall be temporarily rescinded until the
governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.
(7) From the effective date of this act through December 31, 2012,
revenues generated from the tax imposed under this section may also be
used for the maintenance of capital facilities if the legislative
authority of any county or city identifies the capital maintenance
facilities in the adopted budget.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.340 and 1995 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislative authority of any county may fix and impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter, provided that
such sales and use tax is subject to repeal by referendum, using the
procedures provided in RCW 82.14.036. The referendum procedure
provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the exclusive method for subjecting any
county sales and use tax ordinance or resolution to a referendum vote.
The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons
who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within such county. The rate
of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent of the selling price (in
the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of
a use tax).
When distributing moneys collected under this section, the state
treasurer shall distribute ten percent of the moneys to the county in
which the tax was collected. The remainder of the moneys collected
under this section shall be distributed to the county and the cities
within the county ratably based on population as last determined by the
office of financial management. In making the distribution based on
population, the county shall receive that proportion that the
unincorporated population of the county bears to the total population
of the county and each city shall receive that proportion that the city
incorporated population bears to the total county population.
Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section shall be
expended ((exclusively)) for criminal justice purposes ((and shall not
be used to replace or supplant existing funding)). Criminal justice
purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist the
criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where
ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which
include((s)) human services, domestic violence services such as those
provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal
advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020. ((Existing funding for
purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not
likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the
services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.))
In the expenditure of funds for criminal justice purposes as
provided in this section, cities and counties, or any combination
thereof, are expressly authorized to participate in agreements,
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to jointly expend funds for criminal
justice purposes of mutual benefit. Such criminal justice purposes of
mutual benefit include, but are not limited to, the construction,
improvement, and expansion of jails, court facilities, ((and)) juvenile
justice facilities, and services with ancillary benefits to the civil
justice system.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.46.113 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any county, city, or town which collects a tax on gambling
activities authorized pursuant to RCW 9.46.110 shall use the revenue
from such tax primarily for the purpose of ((enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town law enforcement
agency)) public safety.

Sec. 5 RCW 67.28.1815 and 2008 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 67.28.180, all revenue from taxes imposed
under this chapter shall be credited to a special fund in the treasury
of the municipality imposing such tax and used ((solely)) for the
purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of tourism promotion,
acquisition of tourism-related facilities, or operation of tourism-related facilities. Municipalities may, under chapter 39.34 RCW, agree
to the utilization of revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter for
the purposes of funding a multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.
After the effective date of this act through December 31, 2012, revenue
from taxes imposed under this chapter may also be used for governmental
purposes that will maintain or enhance tourism, including public safety
improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire
December 31, 2012.

--- END ---