BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.185 and 2005 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the case of an appeal involving a single-family residence or
appurtenance to a single-family residence, including a dock or pier
designed to serve a single-family residence, ((or of)) appeals
involving a penalty of fifteen thousand dollars or less, or other
cases designated by the chair of the hearings board, the request for
review may be heard by a panel of three board members, at least one and
not more than two of whom shall be members of the pollution control
hearings board. Two members of the three must agree to issue a final
decision of the board. In designating appeals for review by panels of
three hearings board members, the chair shall consider factors such as
the complexity and precedential nature of the case and the efficiency
and cost-effectiveness of using a short board versus a full board.
(2) The board shall define by rule alternative processes to
expedite appeals, including those involving a single-family residence
or appurtenance to a single-family residence, including a dock or pier
designed to serve a single-family residence, or involving a penalty of
fifteen thousand dollars or less. These alternatives may include:
Mediation, upon agreement of all parties; submission of testimony by
affidavit; or other forms that may lead to less formal and faster
resolution of appeals.

--- END ---