BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) An organized retail crime task force is
created for the purpose of monitoring the effects of raising the
monetary threshold amounts differentiating the various degrees of
property crimes in Washington state. The task force is directed to
examine the impact of raising these values on (a) the retail industry;
(b) the district and municipal courts; and (c) the county and city
offices of the prosecuting attorney. The task force shall also examine
the best methods for apportionment and sharing of costs for prosecution
when multiple jurisdictions are involved. In addition, the task force
is charged with identifying any policies or procedures which would
enhance the successful investigation and prosecution of property crimes
in Washington state.
(2) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One member appointed by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;
(d) One member appointed by the Washington association of criminal
defense lawyers;
(e) One member appointed by the association of Washington cities;
(f) One member appointed by the association of Washington counties;
(g) One member appointed by the food industry association of
Washington representing retail grocers who own a single store or a
regional chain with less than ten million five hundred thousand dollars
in gross revenues per location annually;
(h) One member appointed by the Washington association of retailers
representing a retailer who owns a single store or a chain with one
million five hundred thousand dollars or more in gross revenues
annually; and
(i) The superior court judges association and the district and
municipal court judges association are each invited to select a judge
to be a member of the task force.
(3) The task force shall choose its chair from among its members
and may conduct meetings, select officers, and prescribe rules of
procedure.
(4) Staff for the task force will be provided by the staff of the
legislature.
(5) Legislative members of the task force shall not be reimbursed
for travel expenses. Nonlegislative members appointed under subsection
(2)(c) through (h) of this section are not entitled to reimbursement
under RCW 43.03.050 or 43.03.060 for travel or other expenses related
to service on the task force. The participation of an organization in
the task force shall not result in any finding or determination that
the organization is a governmental or public agency.
(6) The task force is subject to the open public meetings act,
chapter 42.30 RCW.
(7) The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature eighteen months after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
The sentencing guidelines commission shall review the monetary
threshold amounts differentiating the various degrees of property
crimes in Washington state to determine whether such amounts should be
modified. The sentencing guidelines commission shall report to the
legislature with its recommendations by November 1, 2014, and every
five years thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 4.24.230 and 1994 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) An adult or emancipated minor who takes possession of any
goods, wares, or merchandise displayed or offered for sale by any
wholesale or retail store or other mercantile establishment without the
consent of the owner or seller, and with the intention of converting
such goods, wares, or merchandise to his or her own use without having
paid the purchase price thereof ((shall be)) is liable in addition to
actual damages, for a penalty to the owner or seller in the amount of
the retail value thereof not to exceed ((one)) two thousand eight
hundred fifty dollars, plus an additional penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars nor more than ((two)) six hundred fifty dollars, plus
all reasonable attorney's fees and court costs expended by the owner or
seller. A customer who orders a meal in a restaurant or other eating
establishment, receives at least a portion thereof, and then leaves
without paying, is subject to liability under this section. A person
who shall receive any food, money, credit, lodging, or accommodation at
any hotel, motel, boarding house, or lodging house, and then leaves
without paying the proprietor, manager, or authorized employee thereof,
is subject to liability under this section.
(2) The parent or legal guardian having the custody of an
unemancipated minor who takes possession of any goods, wares, or
merchandise displayed or offered for sale by any wholesale or retail
store or other mercantile establishment without the consent of the
owner or seller and with the intention of converting such goods, wares,
or merchandise to his or her own use without having paid the purchase
price thereof, ((shall be)) is liable as a penalty to the owner or
seller for the retail value of such goods, wares, or merchandise not to
exceed ((five)) one thousand four hundred twenty-five dollars plus an
additional penalty of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than
((two)) six hundred fifty dollars, plus all reasonable attorney's fees
and court costs expended by the owner or seller. The parent or legal
guardian having the custody of an unemancipated minor, who orders a
meal in a restaurant or other eating establishment, receives at least
a portion thereof, and then leaves without paying, is subject to
liability under this section. The parent or legal guardian having the
custody of an unemancipated minor, who receives any food, money,
credit, lodging, or accommodation at any hotel, motel, boarding house,
or lodging house, and then leaves without paying the proprietor,
manager, or authorized employee thereof, is subject to liability under
this section. For the purposes of this subsection, liability shall not
be imposed upon any governmental entity, private agency, or foster
parent assigned responsibility for the minor child pursuant to court
order or action of the department of social and health services.
(3) Judgments and claims arising under this section may be
assigned.
(4) A conviction for violation of chapter 9A.56 RCW shall not be a
condition precedent to maintenance of a civil action authorized by this
section.
(5) An owner or seller demanding payment of a penalty under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall give written notice to the
person or persons from whom the penalty is sought. The notice shall
state:
"IMPORTANT NOTICE: The payment of any penalty demanded of you does
not prevent criminal prosecution under a related criminal provision."
This notice shall be boldly and conspicuously displayed, in at
least the same size type as is used in the demand, and shall be sent
with the demand for payment of a penalty described in subsection (1) or
(2) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.48.070 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the first degree if
he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((one)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars;
(b) Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the
public by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or
property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public
utility or mode of public transportation, power, or communication; or
(c) Causes an impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of
an aircraft by physically damaging or tampering with the aircraft or
aircraft equipment, fuel, lubricant, or parts.
(2) Malicious mischief in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 5 RCW 9A.48.080 and 1994 c 261 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the second degree
if he or she knowingly and maliciously:
(a) Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount
exceeding ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars; or
(b) Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of
service rendered to the public, by physically damaging or tampering
with an emergency vehicle or property of the state, a political
subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public
transportation, power, or communication.
(2) Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 6 RCW 9A.48.090 and 2003 c 53 s 71 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the third degree if
he or she:
(a) Knowingly and maliciously causes physical damage to the
property of another, under circumstances not amounting to malicious
mischief in the first or second degree; or
(b) Writes, paints, or draws any inscription, figure, or mark of
any type on any public or private building or other structure or any
real or personal property owned by any other person unless the person
has obtained the express permission of the owner or operator of the
property, under circumstances not amounting to malicious mischief in
the first or second degree.
(2)(((a))) Malicious mischief in the third degree ((under
subsection (1)(a) of this section is a gross misdemeanor if the damage
to the property is in an amount exceeding fifty dollars.
(b) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(a)
of this section is a misdemeanor if the damage to the property is fifty
dollars or less.
(c) Malicious mischief in the third degree under subsection (1)(b)
of this section)) is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 7 RCW 9A.56.030 and 2007 c 199 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the first degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) ((one)) five thousand
((five hundred)) dollars in value other than a firearm as defined in
RCW 9.41.010;
(b) Property of any value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, taken from the person of another; or
(c) A search and rescue dog, as defined in RCW 9.91.175, while the
search and rescue dog is on duty.
(2) Theft in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec. 8 RCW 9A.56.040 and 2007 c 199 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the second degree if he or she
commits theft of:
(a) Property or services which exceed(s) ((two)) seven hundred
fifty dollars in value but does not exceed ((one)) five thousand ((five
hundred)) dollars in value, other than a firearm as defined in RCW
9.41.010 or a motor vehicle; or
(b) A public record, writing, or instrument kept, filed, or
deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public office
or public servant; or
(c) An access device.
(2) Theft in the second degree is a class C felony.

Sec. 9 RCW 9A.56.050 and 1998 c 236 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft in the third degree if he or she
commits theft of property or services which (a) does not exceed ((two))
seven hundred ((and)) fifty dollars in value, or (b) includes ten or
more merchandise pallets, or ten or more beverage crates, or a
combination of ten or more merchandise pallets and beverage crates.
(2) Theft in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 10 RCW 9A.56.060 and 1982 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who shall with intent to defraud, make, or draw, or
utter, or deliver to another person any check, or draft, on a bank or
other depository for the payment of money, knowing at the time of such
drawing, or delivery, that he or she has not sufficient funds in, or
credit with ((said)) the bank or other depository, to meet ((said)) the
check or draft, in full upon its presentation, ((shall be)) is guilty
of unlawful issuance of bank check. The word "credit" as used herein
shall be construed to mean an arrangement or understanding with the
bank or other depository for the payment of such check or draft, and
the uttering or delivery of such a check or draft to another person
without such fund or credit to meet the same shall be prima facie
evidence of an intent to defraud.
(2) Any person who shall with intent to defraud, make, or draw, or
utter, or deliver to another person any check, or draft on a bank or
other depository for the payment of money and who issues a stop-payment
order directing the bank or depository on which the check is drawn not
to honor ((said)) the check, and who fails to make payment of money in
the amount of the check or draft or otherwise arrange a settlement
agreed upon by the holder of the check within twenty days of issuing
((said)) the check or draft ((shall be)) is guilty of unlawful issuance
of a bank check.
(3) When any series of transactions which constitute unlawful
issuance of a bank check would, when considered separately, constitute
unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount of ((two)) seven hundred
fifty dollars or less because of value, and the series of transactions
are a part of a common scheme or plan, the transactions may be
aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of all of the
transactions shall be the value considered in determining whether the
unlawful issuance of a bank check is to be punished as a class C felony
or a gross misdemeanor.
(4) Unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount greater than
((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars is a class C felony.
(5) Unlawful issuance of a bank check in an amount of ((two)) seven
hundred fifty dollars or less is a gross misdemeanor and shall be
punished as follows:
(a) The court shall order the defendant to make full restitution;
(b) The defendant need not be imprisoned, but the court shall
impose a ((minimum)) fine of ((five)) up to one thousand one hundred
twenty-five dollars. Of the fine imposed, at least ((fifty)) three
hundred seventy-five dollars or an amount equal to one hundred fifty
percent of the amount of the bank check, whichever is greater, shall
not be suspended or deferred. Upon conviction for a second offense
within any twelve-month period, the court may not suspend or defer
((only that)) any portion of the fine ((which is in excess of five
hundred dollars)).

Sec. 11 RCW 9A.56.096 and 2007 c 199 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who, with intent to deprive the owner or owner's
agent, wrongfully obtains, or exerts unauthorized control over, or by
color or aid of deception gains control of personal property that is
rented, leased, or loaned by written agreement to the person, is guilty
of theft of rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned property.
(2) The finder of fact may presume intent to deprive if the finder
of fact finds either of the following:
(a) That the person who rented or leased the property failed to
return or make arrangements acceptable to the owner of the property or
the owner's agent to return the property to the owner or the owner's
agent within seventy-two hours after receipt of proper notice following
the due date of the rental, lease, lease-purchase, or loan agreement;
or
(b) That the renter, lessee, or borrower presented identification
to the owner or the owner's agent that was materially false,
fictitious, or not current with respect to name, address, place of
employment, or other appropriate items.
(3) As used in subsection (2) of this section, "proper notice"
consists of a written demand by the owner or the owner's agent made
after the due date of the rental, lease, lease-purchase, or loan
period, mailed by certified or registered mail to the renter, lessee,
or borrower at: (a) The address the renter, lessee, or borrower gave
when the contract was made; or (b) the renter, lessee, or borrower's
last known address if later furnished in writing by the renter, lessee,
borrower, or the agent of the renter, lessee, or borrower.
(4) The replacement value of the property obtained must be utilized
in determining the amount involved in the theft of rental, leased,
lease-purchased, or loaned property.
(5)(a) Theft of rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned property
is a class B felony if the rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned
property is valued at ((one)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars or
more.
(b) Theft of rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned property is
a class C felony if the rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned
property is valued at ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than ((one)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars.
(c) Theft of rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned property is
a gross misdemeanor if the rental, leased, lease-purchased, or loaned
property is valued at less than ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars.
(6) This section applies to rental agreements that provide that the
renter may return the property any time within the rental period and
pay only for the time the renter actually retained the property, in
addition to any minimum rental fee, to lease agreements, to lease-purchase agreements as defined under RCW 63.19.010, and to vehicles
loaned to prospective purchasers borrowing a vehicle by written
agreement from a motor vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW.
This section does not apply to rental or leasing of real property under
the residential landlord-tenant act, chapter 59.18 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 9A.56.150 and 2007 c 199 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the first
degree if he or she possesses stolen property, other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, which exceeds ((one)) five
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars in value.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the first degree is a class B
felony.

Sec. 13 RCW 9A.56.160 and 2007 c 199 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the second
degree if:
(a) He or she possesses stolen property, other than a firearm as
defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, which exceeds ((two)) seven
hundred fifty dollars in value but does not exceed ((one)) five
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars in value; or
(b) He or she possesses a stolen public record, writing or
instrument kept, filed, or deposited according to law; or
(c) He or she possesses a stolen access device.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the second degree is a class C
felony.

Sec. 14 RCW 9A.56.170 and 1998 c 236 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the third
degree if he or she possesses (a) stolen property which does not exceed
((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars in value, or (b) ten or more stolen
merchandise pallets, or ten or more stolen beverage crates, or a
combination of ten or more stolen merchandise pallets and beverage
crates.
(2) Possessing stolen property in the third degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec. 15 RCW 9A.56.350 and 2006 c 277 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of organized retail theft if he or she:
(a) Commits theft of property with a value of at least ((two))
seven hundred fifty dollars from a mercantile establishment with an
accomplice; ((or))
(b) Possesses stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.56.140, with a
value of at least ((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars from a mercantile
establishment with an accomplice; or
(c) Commits theft of property with a cumulative value of at least
seven hundred fifty dollars from one or more mercantile establishments
within a period of up to one hundred eighty days.
(2) A person is guilty of organized retail theft in the first
degree if the property stolen or possessed has a value of ((one)) five
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars or more. Organized retail theft in
the first degree is a class B felony.
(3) A person is guilty of organized retail theft in the second
degree if the property stolen or possessed has a value of at least
((two)) seven hundred fifty dollars, but less than ((one)) five
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars. Organized retail theft in the
second degree is a class C felony.
(4) For purposes of this section, a series of thefts committed by
the same person from one or more mercantile establishments over a
period of one hundred eighty days may be aggregated in one count and
the sum of the value of all the property shall be the value considered
in determining the degree of the organized retail theft involved.
Thefts committed by the same person in different counties that have
been aggregated in one county may be prosecuted in any county in which
any one of the thefts occurred.
(5) The mercantile establishment or establishments whose property
is alleged to have been stolen may request that the charge be
aggregated with other thefts of property about which the mercantile
establishment or establishments is aware. In the event a request to
aggregate the prosecution is declined, the mercantile establishment or
establishments shall be promptly advised by the prosecuting
jurisdiction making the decision to decline aggregating the prosecution
of the decision and the reasons for such decision.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 3.50 RCW
to read as follows:
Before a sentence is imposed upon a defendant convicted of a crime
against property, the court or the prosecuting authority shall check
existing judicial information systems to determine the criminal history
of the defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 3.66 RCW
to read as follows:
Before a sentence is imposed upon a defendant convicted of a crime
against property, the court or the prosecuting authority shall check
existing judicial information systems to determine the criminal history
of the defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Before a sentence is imposed upon a defendant convicted of a crime
against property, the court or the prosecuting authority shall check
existing judicial information systems to determine the criminal history
of the defendant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Merchants and other parties who create a
database of individuals who have been: Apprehended in the process of
committing a property crime; assessed a civil fine or penalty for
committing a property crime; or convicted of a property crime are not
subject to civil fines or penalties for sharing information from the
database with other merchants, law enforcement officials, or legal
professionals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 This act applies to crimes committed on or
after September 1, 2009.

--- END ---