BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.415.380 and 2007 c 396 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A mathematics and science instructional coach program is
authorized, which shall consist of a coach development institute,
coaching seminars, coaching activities in schools, and program
evaluation.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a mathematics and science instructional coach program that
includes an initial coach development experience for new coaches
provided through an institute setting, coaching support seminars, and
additional coach development services. The office shall draw upon the
experiences of coaches in federally supported elementary literacy
programs and other successful programs, research and policy briefs on
adult professional development, and research that specifically
addresses the instructional environments of middle, junior high, and
high schools as well as the unique aspects of the fields of mathematics
and science.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
design the application process and select the program participants.
(4) Schools and school districts participating in the program shall
carefully select the individuals to perform the role of mathematics or
science instructional coach. Characteristics to be considered for a
successful coach include:
(a) Expertise in content area;
(b) Expertise in various instructional methodologies and
personalizing learning;
(c) Personal skills that include skilled listening, questioning,
trust-building, and problem-solving;
(d) Understanding and appreciation for the differences in adult
learners and student learners; and
(e) Capacity for strategic planning and quality program
implementation.
(5) The role of the mathematics or science instructional coach is
focused on supporting teachers as they apply knowledge, develop skills,
polish techniques, and deepen their understanding of content and
instructional practices. This work takes a number of forms including:
Individualized professional development, department-wide and school-wide professional development, guidance in student data interpretation,
and using assessment to guide instruction. Each coach shall be
assigned to two schools as part of the program.
(6) Program participants have the following responsibilities:
(a) Mathematics and science coaches shall participate in the coach
development institute as well as in coaching support seminars that take
place throughout the school year, practice coaching activities as
guided by those articulated in the role of the coach in subsection (5)
of this section, collect data, and participate in program evaluation
activities as requested by the institute pursuant to subsection (7) of
this section.
(b) School and district administrators in districts in which the
mathematics and science coaches are practicing shall participate in
program evaluation activities.
(7)(a) The Washington State University social and economic sciences
research center shall conduct an evaluation of the mathematics and
science instructional coach program in this section. Data shall be
collected through various instruments including surveys, program and
activity reports, student performance measures, observations,
interviews, and other processes. Findings shall include an evaluation
of the coach development institute, coaching support seminars, and
other coach support activities; recommendations with regard to the
characteristics required of the coaches; identification of changes in
teacher instruction related to coaching activities; and identification
of the satisfaction level with coaching activities as experienced by
classroom teachers and administrators.
(b) The Washington State University social and economic sciences
research center shall report its findings to the governor, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, and the education and
fiscal committees of the legislature. An interim report is due
November 1, 2008. The final report is due December 1, 2009.
(8) The mathematics and science instructional coach program in this
section shall be implemented to the extent funds are available for that
purpose.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.320.190 and 2008 c 321 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The extended learning opportunities program is created for
eligible eleventh and twelfth grade students who are not on track to
meet local or state graduation requirements as well as eighth grade
students who ((may not be on track to meet the standard on the
Washington assessment of student learning or)) need additional
assistance in order to have the opportunity for a successful entry into
high school. The program shall provide early notification of
graduation status and information on education opportunities including
preapprenticeship programs that are available.
(2) Under the extended learning opportunities program and to the
extent funds are available for that purpose, districts shall make
available to students in grade twelve who have failed to meet one or
more local or state graduation requirements the option of continuing
enrollment in the school district in accordance with RCW 28A.225.160.
Districts are authorized to use basic education program funding to
provide instruction to eligible students under RCW 28A.150.220(3).
(3) Under the extended learning (([opportunities])) opportunities
program, instructional services for eligible students can occur during
the regular school day, evenings, on weekends, or at a time and
location deemed appropriate by the school district, including the
educational service district, in order to meet the needs of these
students. Instructional services provided under this section do not
include services offered at private schools. Instructional services
can include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Individual or small group instruction;
(b) Instruction in English language arts and/or mathematics that
eligible students need to pass all or part of the Washington assessment
of student learning;
(c) Attendance in a public high school or public alternative school
classes or at a skill center;
(d) Inclusion in remediation programs, including summer school;
(e) Language development instruction for English language learners;
(f) Online curriculum and instructional support, including programs
for credit retrieval and Washington assessment of student learning
preparatory classes; and
(g) Reading improvement specialists available at the educational
service districts to serve eighth, eleventh, and twelfth grade
educators through professional development in accordance with RCW
28A.415.350. The reading improvement specialist may also provide
direct services to eligible students and those students electing to
continue a fifth year in a high school program who are still struggling
with basic reading skills.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.415.340 and 2007 c 402 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Research supports the value of quality school and school
district leadership. Effective leadership is critical to improving
student learning and transforming underperforming schools and school
districts into world-class learning centers.
(2) A public-private partnership is established to develop, pilot,
and implement, to the extent funds are available, the Washington state
leadership academy to focus on the development and enhancement of
personal leadership characteristics and the teaching of effective
practices and skills demonstrated by school and district administrators
who are successful managers and instructional leaders. It is the goal
of the academy to provide state-of-the-art programs and services across
the state.
(3) Academy partners include the state superintendent and principal
professional associations, private nonprofit foundations, institutions
of higher education with approved educator preparation programs, the
professional educator standards board, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, educational service districts, the state school
business officers' association, and other entities identified by the
partners. The partners shall designate an independent organization to
act as the fiscal agent for the academy and shall establish a board of
directors to oversee and direct the academy's finances, services, and
programs. The academy shall be supported by a national research
institution with demonstrated expertise in educational leadership.
(4) Initial development of academy course content and activities
shall be supported by private funds. Implementation of the Washington
state leadership academy is subject to the availability of funds.
Initial tasks of the academy are to:
(a) Finalize a comprehensive design of the academy and the
development of the curriculum frameworks for a comprehensive leadership
development program that includes coursework, practicum, mentoring, and
evaluation components;
(b) Develop curriculum for individual leadership topics;
(c) Pilot the curriculum and all program components; and
(d) Modify the comprehensive design, curriculum coursework,
practicum, and mentoring programs based on the research results gained
from pilot activities.
(5) The board of directors shall report semiannually to the
superintendent of public instruction on the financial contributions
provided by foundations and other organizations to support the work of
the academy. The board of directors shall report by December 31st each
year to the superintendent of public instruction on the programs and
services provided, numbers of participants in the various academy
activities, evaluation activities regarding program and participant
outcomes, and plans for the academy's future development.
(6) The board of directors shall make recommendations for changes
in superintendent and principal preparation programs, the administrator
licensure system, and continuing education requirements.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.300.515 and 2007 c 396 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
To the extent funds are available for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for
statewide coordination for math, science, and technology, including
employing a statewide director for math, science, and technology. The
duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, obtain a
statewide license, or otherwise obtain and disseminate, an interactive,
project-based high school and middle school technology curriculum that
includes a comprehensive professional development component for
teachers and, if possible, counselors, and also includes a systematic
program evaluation. The curriculum must be distributed to all school
districts, or as many as feasible, by the 2007-08 school year;
(2) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to assist school districts with implementing
an ongoing, inquiry-based science program that is based on a research-based model of systemic reform and aligned with the Washington state
science grade level expectations;
(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to provide enriching opportunities in
mathematics, engineering, and science for underrepresented students in
grades kindergarten through twelve using exemplary materials and
instructional approaches;
(4) In an effort to increase precollege and prework interest in
math, science, and technology fields, in collaboration with the
community and technical colleges, the four-year institutions of higher
education, and the workforce training and education coordinating board,
conducting outreach efforts to attract middle and high school students
to careers in math, science, and technology and to educate students
about the coursework that is necessary to be adequately prepared to
succeed in these fields;
(5) Coordinating youth opportunities in math, science, and
technology, including facilitating student participation in school
clubs, state-level fairs, national competitions, and encouraging
partnerships between students and university faculty or industry to
facilitate such student participation;
(6) Developing and maintaining public-private partnerships to
generate business and industry assistance to accomplish the following:
(a) Increasing student engagement and career awareness, including
increasing student participation in the youth opportunities in
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Creation and promotion of student scholarships, internships,
and apprenticeships;
(c) Provision of relevant teacher experience and training,
including on-the-job professional development opportunities;
(d) Upgrading kindergarten through twelfth grade school equipment
and facilities to support high quality math, science, and technology
programs;
(7) Assembling a cadre of inspiring speakers employed or
experienced in the relevant fields to speak to kindergarten through
twelfth grade students to demonstrate the breadth of the opportunities
in the relevant fields as well as share the types of coursework that
((is [are])) are necessary for someone to be successful in the relevant
field;
(8) Providing technical assistance to schools and school districts,
including working with counselors in support of the math, science, and
technology programs; and
(9) Reporting annually to the legislature about the actions taken
to provide statewide coordination for math, science, and technology.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.630.035 and 2006 c 113 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the complexity of modern political
life has created a demand for informed citizens who are willing not
only to vote, but also to participate in the elections process.
(2) The purpose of this section is to create a pilot project to
help graduate students who are better voters, better citizens, and who
are ready to take an informed and responsible place in society.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within
funds available for this purpose, shall work with selected county
auditors' offices to develop an interactive high school civics
curriculum to help students learn how to become informed citizens. The
curriculum shall meet the requirements for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction's classroom-based assessments.
Staff from the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
work directly in the curriculum development.
(4) Counties ((shall)) may apply to, and be selected by, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to participate in the pilot
project under this section. A maximum of fifteen counties may
participate.
(5) The curriculum shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Local government organization;
(b) A discussion of ballot measures, initiatives, and referenda;
(c) The role of the precinct in defining ballots, candidates, and
political activities;
(d) The roles and responsibilities of taxing jurisdictions in
establishing ballot measures; and
(e) The work of conducting elections.
(6) The study may include in the curriculum civics essential
academic learning requirements relating to examining representative
government and citizen participation and analyzing the purposes and
organization of government and laws.
(7) To the extent funds are available, a curriculum guide shall be
developed that will help teachers and students maximize the learning of
key issues in civics, and shall include strategies for helping students
develop voters' guide information for ballot issues and candidates who
appear on the ballot. This guide should incorporate ideas from other
Washington state civics education programs, such as "We the People" and
"Project Citizen." The guide should also present ideas for sharing the
results of an election with the larger community and with local
government officials in productive, meaningful ways.
(8) In addition to the required components of the pilot project
under this section, other activities may be included in the project,
such as:
(a) Conducting mock county elections at schools; and
(b) Preparing an advisory issue on which the school would vote,
including issue preparation, conducting the election, and preparing a
presentation to a local government official on the results of the
advisory issue.
(9) The pilot project shall operate for the 2006-07 and 2007-08
school years.
(((10) Funds for the pilot project shall be made available to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction for a contract
position in civics curriculum and for support costs for soliciting and
implementing volunteer participation.
(11))) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement this section, including rules specifying
selection criteria for counties that wish to participate.
(((12))) (11) The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide an interim report to appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2008, and a final report by December 1, 2009, detailing
the results of the project and budget recommendations for expansion, if
appropriate.
(((13))) (12) This section expires January 31, 2010.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.300.130 and 2008 c 165 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To facilitate access to information and materials on
educational improvement and research, the superintendent of public
instruction, to the extent funds are appropriated, shall establish the
center for the improvement of student learning. The center shall work
in conjunction with parents, educational service districts,
institutions of higher education, and education, parent, community, and
business organizations.
(2) The center, to the extent funds are appropriated for this
purpose, and in conjunction with other staff in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall:
(a) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful
educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools
and districts, and information about efforts within institutions of
higher education in the state to support educational improvement
initiatives in Washington schools and districts;
(b) Provide best practices research that can be used to help
schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve
instruction; systems to analyze student assessment data, with an
emphasis on systems that will combine the use of state and local data
to monitor the academic progress of each and every student in the
school district; comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to promote lifelong
learning and community involvement in education; school-to-work
transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly capable
students; programs and practices to meet the needs of students with
disabilities; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of
students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs
status; research, information, and technology systems; and other
programs and practices that will assist educators in helping students
learn the essential academic learning requirements;
(c) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the
availability of information, research, and other materials;
(d) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers,
district and school administrators, and school directors about the
waivers available and the broadened school board powers under RCW
28A.320.015;
(e) Provide training and consultation services, including
conducting regional summer institutes;
(f) Identify strategies for improving the success rates of ethnic
and racial student groups and students with disabilities, with
disproportionate academic achievement;
(g) Work with parents, teachers, and school districts in
establishing a model absentee notification procedure that will properly
notify parents when their student has not attended a class or has
missed a school day. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall consider various types of communication with parents
including, but not limited to, electronic mail, phone, and postal mail;
and
(h) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the
center as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall select and
employ a director for the center.
(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or
organizations including but not limited to: School districts;
educational service districts; educational organizations; teachers;
higher education faculty; institutions of higher education; state
agencies; business or community-based organizations; and other
individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and
responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and
responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible,
shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist
educators and others in schools and districts.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the legislature by September 1, 2007, and thereafter
biennially, regarding the effectiveness of the center for the
improvement of student learning, how the services provided by the
center for the improvement of student learning have been used and by
whom, and recommendations to improve the accessibility and application
of knowledge and information that leads to improved student learning
and greater family and community involvement in the public education
system.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.245.060 and 2007 c 463 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
To the extent funds are available, the superintendent of public
instruction shall assign at least one full-time equivalent staff
position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to serve as the director of skill centers.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.625.020 and 1991 c 255 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish an
annual award program for excellence in education to recognize teachers,
principals, administrators, classified staff, school district
superintendents, and school boards for their leadership, contributions,
and commitment to education. The program shall recognize annually:
(((1))) (a) Five teachers from each congressional district of the
state. One individual must be an elementary level teacher, one must be
a junior high or middle school level teacher, and one must be a
secondary level teacher. Teachers shall include educational staff
associates;
(((2))) (b) Five principals or administrators from the state;
(((3))) (c) One school district superintendent from the state;
(((4))) (d) One school district board of directors from the state;
and
(((5))) (e) Three classified staff from each congressional district
of the state.
(2) Implementation of the program in this section is contingent on
the provision of funds available for this purpose.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.300.520 and 2007 c 384 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall review current
policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted
at children who have a parent who is incarcerated in a department of
corrections facility. The superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt policies that support the children of incarcerated parents and
meet their needs with the goal of facilitating normal child
development, including maintaining adequate academic progress, while
reducing intergenerational incarceration.
(2) To the extent funds are available, the superintendent shall
conduct the following activities to assist in implementing the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Gather information and data on the students who are the
children of inmates incarcerated in department of corrections
facilities; and
(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory
committee and report information obtained under this section to the
advisory committee.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.320.125 and 2007 c 406 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature considers it to be a matter of public safety
for public schools and staff to have current safe school plans and
procedures in place, fully consistent with federal law. The
legislature further finds and intends, by requiring safe school plans
to be in place, that school districts will become eligible for federal
assistance. The legislature further finds that schools are in a
position to serve the community in the event of an emergency resulting
from natural disasters or man-made disasters.
(2) Schools and school districts shall consider the guidance
provided by the superintendent of public instruction, including the
comprehensive school safety checklist and the model comprehensive safe
school plans that include prevention, intervention, all hazard/crisis
response, and postcrisis recovery, when developing their own individual
comprehensive safe school plans. Each school district shall adopt, no
later than September 1, 2008, and implement a safe school plan
consistent with the school mapping information system pursuant to RCW
36.28A.060. The plan shall:
(a) Include required school safety policies and procedures;
(b) Address emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery;
(c) Include provisions for assisting and communicating with
students and staff, including those with special needs or disabilities;
(d) Use the training guidance provided by the Washington emergency
management division of the state military department in collaboration
with the Washington state office of the superintendent of public
instruction school safety center and the school safety center advisory
committee;
(e) Require the building principal to be certified on the incident
command system;
(f) Take into account the manner in which the school facilities may
be used as a community asset in the event of a community-wide
emergency; and
(g) Set guidelines for requesting city or county law enforcement
agencies, local fire departments, emergency service providers, and
county emergency management agencies to meet with school districts and
participate in safety-related drills ((annually)).
(3) To the extent funds are available, school districts shall
annually:
(a) Review and update safe school plans in collaboration with local
emergency response agencies;
(b) Conduct an inventory of all hazardous materials;
(c) Update information on the school mapping information system to
reflect current staffing and updated plans, including:
(i) Identifying all staff members who are trained on the national
incident management system, trained on the incident command system, or
are certified on the incident command system; and
(ii) Identifying school transportation procedures for evacuation,
to include bus staging areas, evacuation routes, communication systems,
parent-student reunification sites, and secondary transportation
agreements consistent with the school mapping information system; and
(d) Provide information to all staff on the use of emergency
supplies and notification and alert procedures.
(4) To the extent funds are available, school districts ((are
required to)) shall annually record and report on the information and
activities required in subsection (3) of this section to the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs.
(5) School districts are encouraged to work with local emergency
management agencies and other emergency responders to conduct one
tabletop exercise, one functional exercise, and two full-scale
exercises within a four-year period.
(6) Schools shall conduct no less than one safety-related drill
each month that school is in session. Schools shall complete no less
than one drill using the school mapping information system, one drill
for lockdowns, one drill for shelter-in-place, and six drills for fire
evacuation in accordance with the state fire code. Schools should
consider drills for earthquakes, tsunamis, or other high-risk local
events. Schools shall document the date and time of such drills. This
subsection is intended to satisfy all federal requirements for
comprehensive school emergency drills and evacuations.
(7) Educational service districts are encouraged to apply for
federal emergency response and crisis management grants with the
assistance of the superintendent of public instruction and the
Washington emergency management division of the state military
department.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement provisions of this section. These rules may include, but are
not limited to, provisions for evacuations, lockdowns, or other
components of a comprehensive safe school plan.

--- END ---