BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
Renewable Energy
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in section 103 of this act, purchasers
who have paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on machinery and
equipment used directly in generating electricity using fuel cells,
wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources,
anaerobic digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy
from exhaust, or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to
sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption
as provided in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with
such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating
not less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the tax
levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of machinery and
equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are used directly in
generating electricity or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, the amount of
the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five
percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The purchaser is
eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(c) in the form of
a remittance.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 102 of this act, the
following definitions apply:
(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) Byproducts of pulping and wood
manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii) solid organic fuels
from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v) wooden demolition or
construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii) liquors derived from algae
and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy crops; (ix) biosolids; and
(x) yard waste. "Biomass energy" does not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests; or municipal solid waste.
(b) "Fuel cell" means an electrochemical reaction that generates
electricity by combining atoms of hydrogen and oxygen in the presence
of a catalyst.
(c) "Landfill gas" means biomass fuel, of the type qualified for
federal tax credits under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 of the federal
internal revenue code, collected from a "landfill" as defined under RCW
70.95.030.
(d)(i) "Machinery and equipment" means fixtures, devices, and
support facilities that are integral and necessary to the generation of
electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas as the
principal source of power.
(ii) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (A) Hand-powered
tools; (B) property with a useful life of less than one year; (C)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (D) replacement parts that do not increase productivity,
improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and
equipment; (E) buildings; or (F) building fixtures that are not
integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that are
permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building.
(3)(a) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by wind energy, solar energy, biomass energy, tidal or wave
energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic digestion, technology that
converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust, or landfill gas power if
it provides any part of the process that captures the energy of the
wind, sun, biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources,
anaerobic digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy
from exhaust, or landfill gas, converts that energy to electricity, and
stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(b) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by fuel cells if it provides any part of the process that
captures the energy of the fuel, converts that energy to electricity,
and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for entry into or
operation in parallel with electric transmission and distribution
systems.
(4)(a) A purchaser claiming an exemption in the form of a
remittance under subsection (1)(c) of this section must pay the tax
imposed by RCW 82.08.020 and all applicable local sales taxes imposed
under the authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The purchaser
may then apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. A purchaser may not apply for a
remittance under this section more frequently than once per quarter.
The purchaser must specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases for which the exemption is claimed. The purchaser
must retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the purchaser is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the purchaser, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying purchasers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in section 104 of this act, consumers who
have paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 on machinery and equipment
used directly in generating electricity using fuel cells, wind, sun,
biomass energy, tidal or wave energy, geothermal resources, anaerobic
digestion, technology that converts otherwise lost energy from exhaust,
or landfill gas as the principal source of power, or to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to installing
such machinery and equipment, are eligible for an exemption as provided
in this section, but only if the purchaser develops with such
machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of generating not
less than one thousand watts of electricity.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, the
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of
machinery and equipment described in (a) of this subsection that are
used directly in generating electricity or to sales of or charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery
and equipment.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, the amount of
the exemption under this subsection (1) is equal to seventy-five
percent of the state and local sales tax paid. The consumer is
eligible for an exemption under this subsection (1)(c) in the form of
a remittance.
(2)(a) A person claiming an exemption in the form of a remittance
under subsection (1)(c) of this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.12.020 and all applicable local use taxes imposed under the
authority of chapters 82.14 and 81.104 RCW. The consumer may then
apply to the department for remittance in a form and manner prescribed
by the department. A consumer may not apply for a remittance under
this section more frequently than once per quarter. The consumer must
specify the amount of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases
or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed. The consumer must
retain, in adequate detail, records to enable the department to
determine whether the consumer is entitled to an exemption under this
section, including: Invoices; proof of tax paid; and documents
describing the machinery and equipment.
(b) The department must determine eligibility under this section
based on the information provided by the consumer, which is subject to
audit verification by the department. The department must on a
quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to qualifying consumers who
submitted applications during the previous quarter.
(3) Purchases exempt under section 101 of this act are also exempt
from the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020.
(4) The definitions in section 101 of this act apply to this
section.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
machinery and equipment used directly in generating electricity using
solar energy, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but
only if the purchaser develops with such machinery, equipment, and
labor a facility capable of generating not more than ten kilowatts of
electricity and provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must retain
a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section and section 104 of this act:
(a) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices,
and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using solar energy;
(b) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i) Hand-powered
tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year; (iii)
repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase
productivity, improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of
machinery and equipment; (v) buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that
are not integral and necessary to the generation of electricity that
are permanently affixed to and become a physical part of a building;
and
(c) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity with solar energy if it provides any part of the process
that captures the energy of the sun, converts that energy to
electricity, and stores, transforms, or transmits that electricity for
entry into or operation in parallel with electric transmission and
distribution systems.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to
machinery and equipment used directly in generating not more than ten
kilowatts of electricity using solar energy, or to the use of labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment.
(2) The definitions in section 103 of this act apply to this
section.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
The exemptions in sections 101 through 104 of this act are for the
state and local sales and use taxes and include the sales and use taxes
imposed under the authority of this chapter.

Sec. 106 RCW 81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation
benefit areas, and regional transit authorities may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and if approved by a majority of
persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with
the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation service.
(2) The tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in
addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
taxing district. The maximum rate of such tax shall be approved by the
voters and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price (in the
case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use
tax). The maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not
exceed nine-tenths of one percent in any county that imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340, or within a regional transit authority if any
county within the authority imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340.
(3)(a) The exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the
state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax
authorized in this section.
(b) The exemptions in sections 101 and 102 of this act are for the
state and local sales and use taxes and include the tax authorized by
this section.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.14.050 and 2005 c 336 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW
82.14.045, public facilities districts under chapters 36.100 and 35.57
RCW, public transportation benefit areas under RCW 82.14.440, regional
transportation investment districts, and transportation benefit
districts under chapter 36.73 RCW shall contract, prior to the
effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of
revenue, which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department. The
remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this chapter that is
collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by the state
department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax
account may be ((spent)) withdrawn only for:
(a) Distribution to counties, cities, transportation authorities,
public facilities districts, public transportation benefit areas,
regional transportation investment districts, and transportation
benefit districts imposing a sales and use tax; and
(b) Making refunds of taxes imposed under the authority of this
chapter and RCW 81.104.170 and exempted under sections 101 and 102 of
this act.
(2) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12,
and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall,
insofar as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be
applicable to taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(3) Counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, and regional transportation investment districts may not
conduct independent sales or use tax audits of sellers registered under
the streamlined sales tax agreement.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, public transportation benefit areas, regional transportation
investment districts, and transportation benefit districts monthly.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.14.060 and 2005 c 336 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer ((shall make distribution))
must distribute from the local sales and use tax account to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, public facilities
districts, and transportation benefit districts the amount of tax
collected on behalf of each taxing authority, less:
(i) The deduction provided for in RCW 82.14.050; and
(ii) The amount of any refunds of local sales and use taxes
exempted under sections 101 and 102 of this act, which must be made
without appropriation.
(b) The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
section without appropriation.
(2) In the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales
and use tax at a rate in excess of the applicable limits contained
herein, such ordinance or resolution shall not be considered void in
toto, but only with respect to that portion of the rate which is in
excess of the applicable limits contained herein.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
expiration of RCW 82.12.02567 and section 102 of this act do not
require the payment of, or authorize the department to assess, use tax
imposed by or under the authority of RCW 82.12.020, 81.104.170, and
chapter 82.14 RCW, on the use of machinery and equipment, and labor and
services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment, if such use qualified for the exemption under RCW
82.12.02567 or section 102 of this act immediately preceding the
expiration date of the applicable exemption under RCW 82.12.02567 or
section 102 of this act.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit the department
from assessing, subject to the limitations period in RCW 82.32.050,
state and local use taxes on the use of machinery and equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing such machinery and
equipment, if, before the expiration of the applicable exemption
provided in RCW 82.12.02567 or section 102 of this act, the machinery
and equipment was put to a use that is outside of the scope of the
applicable exemption in RCW 82.12.02567 or section 102 of this act.

PART II
Radioactive Waste Cleanup
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) The legislature finds that the
cleaning up of radioactive waste at the Hanford site is crucial to the
environment in this state. The legislature intends to include services
supporting the cleanup within the radioactive waste clean-up business
and occupation tax classification, but it is not the legislature's
intent to extend the radioactive waste clean-up classification to all
business activities conducted at the Hanford site or performed for
persons engaged in the performance of cleanup.
(2) It is the legislature's intent in enacting this legislation to
ensure that the radioactive waste clean-up business and occupation tax
classification applies to all services contributing to the performance
of a clean-up project at the Hanford site other than services that are
routinely provided to any business, including businesses that are not
engaged in clean-up activities.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.04.263 and 1996 c 112 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other by-products of weapons production and
nuclear research and development; as to such persons the amount of the
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the ((value of
the)) gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.471
percent.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, "cleaning up radioactive
waste and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research
and development" means:
(a) The activities of handling, storing, treating, immobilizing,
stabilizing, or disposing of radioactive waste, radioactive tank waste
and capsules, nonradioactive hazardous solid and liquid wastes, or
spent nuclear fuel;
(b) Spent nuclear fuel conditioning;
(c) Removal of contamination in soils and groundwater;
(d) Decontamination and decommissioning of facilities; and
((activities integral and necessary to the direct performance of
cleanup)) (e) Services supporting the performance of cleanup. For the
purposes of this subsection (2)(e), a service supports the performance
of cleanup if it:
(i) Is within the scope of work under a clean-up contract with the
United States department of energy; or
(ii) Assists in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up
project undertaken by the United States department of energy under a
subcontract entered into with the prime contractor or another
subcontractor in furtherance of a clean-up contract between the United
States department of energy and a prime contractor.
(3) A service does not assist in the accomplishment of a
requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the United States
department of energy if the same services are routinely provided to
businesses not engaged in clean-up activities, except that the
following services are always deemed to contribute to the
accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project undertaken by the
United States department of energy:
(a) Information technology and computer support services;
(b) Services rendered in respect to infrastructure; and
(c) Security, safety, and health services.
(4) The legislature intends that the examples provided in this
subsection be used as a guideline when determining whether a service is
"routinely provided to businesses not engaged in clean-up activities"
as that phrase is used in subsection (3) of this section.
(a) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to
general accounting services but does apply to performance audits
performed for persons cleaning up radioactive waste.
(b) The radioactive waste clean-up classification does not apply to
general legal services but does apply to those legal services that
assist in the accomplishment of a requirement of a clean-up project
undertaken by the United States department of energy. Thus, legal
services provided to contest any local, state, or federal tax liability
or to defend a company against a workers' compensation claim arising
from a worksite injury do not qualify for the radioactive waste clean-up classification. But, legal services related to the resolution of a
contractual dispute between the parties to a clean-up contract between
the United States department of energy and a prime contractor do
qualify.
(c) General office janitorial services do not qualify for the
radioactive waste clean-up classification, but the specialized cleaning
of equipment exposed to radioactive waste does qualify.

PART III
Hog Fuel Tax Relief
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of hog
fuel used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel. This
exemption is available only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.
(2) For the purposes of this section the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Hog fuel" means wood waste and other wood residuals including
forest derived biomass. "Hog fuel" does not include firewood or wood
pellets; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of hog fuel for production of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Hog fuel" has the same meaning as provided in section 301 of
this act; and
(b) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

PART IV
Biomass Energy Incentives
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, harvesters are
allowed a credit against the amount of tax otherwise due under this
chapter, as provided in this section. The credit per harvested green
ton of forest derived biomass sold, transferred, or used for production
of electricity, steam, heat, or biofuel is as follows:
(a) For forest derived biomass harvested October 1, 2009, through
June 30, 2010, zero dollars;
(b) For forest derived biomass harvested July 1, 2010, through June
30, 2013, three dollars;
(c) For forest derived biomass harvested July 1, 2013, through June
30, 2015, five dollars.
(2) Credit may not be claimed for forest derived biomass sold,
transferred, or used before the effective date of this section. The
amount of credit allowed for a reporting period may not exceed the tax
otherwise due under this chapter for that reporting period. Any unused
excess credit in a reporting period may be carried forward to future
reporting periods for a maximum of two years.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "harvested" and "harvesters"
are defined in RCW 84.33.035, and "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(4) This section expires June 30, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
forest derived biomass used to produce electricity, steam, heat, or
biofuel. This exemption is available only if the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(2) For purposes of this section, "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of forest derived biomass for production of electricity, steam,
heat, or biofuel.
(2) For purposes of this section, "biofuel" is defined in RCW
43.325.010.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

PART V
Solar Energy Incentives
Sec. 501 RCW 82.04.294 and 2007 c 54 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business shall, in the case of
manufacturers, be equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(2)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems, manufactured by that
person; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the solar
energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the solar grade
silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the
solar grade silicon to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(3) Beginning October 1, 2009, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar
cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers
are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651 and
82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((b))) (c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light
directly into electricity without moving parts.
(((c))) (d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell
manufactured from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(((d))) (g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(((4))) (h) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating
substrate on which various semiconducting materials are deposited to
produce a photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 502 RCW 82.08.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for
hire in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor
materials" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under RCW 82.32.5351. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after December 1, 2006.

Sec. 503 RCW 82.12.9651 and 2006 c 84 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must report
under RCW 82.32.5351. No application is necessary for the tax
exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of chapter
82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after December 1, 2006.

Sec. 504 RCW 82.16.110 and 2005 c 300 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Community solar project" means:
(i) A solar energy system owned by local individuals, households,
nonprofit organizations, or nonutility businesses that is placed on the
property owned by a cooperating local governmental entity that is not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business; or
(ii) A utility-owned solar energy system that is voluntarily funded
by the utility's ratepayers where, in exchange for their financial
support, the utility gives contributors a payment or credit on their
utility bill for the value of the electricity produced by the project.
(b) For the purposes of "community solar project" as defined in (a)
of this subsection:
(i) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
taxation under Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, as of January 1, 2009; and
(ii) "Utility" means a light and power business, an electric
cooperative, or a mutual corporation that provides electricity service.
(2) "Customer-generated electricity" means a community solar
project or the alternating current electricity that is generated from
a renewable energy system located on an individual's, businesses', or
local government's real property that is also provided electricity
generated by a light and power business. Except for community solar
projects, a system located on a leasehold interest does not qualify
under this definition. "Customer-generated electricity" does not
include electricity generated by a light and power business with
greater than one thousand megawatt hours of annual sales or a gas
distribution business.
(((2))) (3) "Economic development kilowatt-hour" means the actual
kilowatt-hour measurement of customer-generated electricity multiplied
by the appropriate economic development factor.
(((3))) (4) "Local governmental entity" means any unit of local
government of this state including, but not limited to, counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and school districts.
(5) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(((4))) (6) "Renewable energy system" means a solar energy system,
an anaerobic digester as defined in RCW 82.08.900, or a wind generator
used for producing electricity.
(((5))) (7) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination
of devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy
source for use in the generation of electricity.
(((6))) (8) "Solar inverter" means the device used to convert
direct current to alternating current in a photovoltaic cell system.
(((7))) (9) "Solar module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells
and providing a single direct current electrical output.
(((8) "Standards for interconnection to the electric distribution
system" means technical, engineering, operational, safety, and
procedural requirements for interconnection to the electric
distribution system of a light and power business.))

Sec. 505 RCW 82.16.120 and 2007 c 111 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any individual, business, ((or)) local governmental entity, not
in the light and power business or in the gas distribution business, or
a participant in a community solar project may apply to the light and
power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year
beginning on July 1, 2005, for an investment cost recovery incentive
for each kilowatt-hour from a customer-generated electricity renewable
energy system ((installed on its property that is not interconnected to
the electric distribution system)). No incentive may be paid for
kilowatt-hours generated before July 1, 2005, or after June 30,
((2014)) 2020.
(2) ((When light and power businesses serving eighty percent of the
total customer load in the state adopt uniform standards for
interconnection to the electric distribution system, any individual,
business, or local governmental entity, not in the light and power
business or in the gas distribution business, may apply to the light
and power business serving the situs of the system, each fiscal year,
for an investment cost recovery incentive for each kilowatt-hour from
a customer-generated electricity renewable energy system installed on
its property that is not interconnected to the electric distribution
system and from a customer-generated electricity renewable energy
system installed on its property that is interconnected to the electric
distribution system. Uniform standards for interconnection to the
electric distribution system means those standards established by light
and power businesses that have ninety percent of total requirements the
same. No incentive may be paid for kilowatt-hours generated before
July 1, 2005, or after June 30, 2014.
(3)))(a) Before submitting for the first time the application for
the incentive allowed under subsection (4) of this section, the
applicant ((shall)) must submit to the department of revenue and to the
climate and rural energy development center at the Washington State
University, established under RCW 28B.30.642, a certification in a form
and manner prescribed by the department that includes, but is not
limited to, the following information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) That the electricity produced by the applicant meets the
definition of "customer-generated electricity" and that the renewable
energy system produces electricity with:
(A) Any solar inverters and solar modules manufactured in
Washington state;
(B) A wind generator powered by blades manufactured in Washington
state;
(C) A solar inverter manufactured in Washington state;
(D) A solar module manufactured in Washington state; or
(E) Solar or wind equipment manufactured outside of Washington
state;
(iv) That the electricity can be transformed or transmitted for
entry into or operation in parallel with electricity transmission and
distribution systems;
(v) The date that the renewable energy system received its final
electrical permit from the applicable local jurisdiction.
(b) Within thirty days of receipt of the certification the
department of revenue ((shall)) must notify the applicant by mail, or
electronically as provided in RCW 82.32.135, whether the renewable
energy system qualifies for an incentive under this section. The
department may consult with the climate and rural energy development
center to determine eligibility for the incentive. System
certifications and the information contained therein are subject to
disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(((4))) (3)(a) By August 1st of each year application for the
incentive shall be made to the light and power business serving the
situs of the system by certification in a form and manner prescribed by
the department that includes, but is not limited to, the following
information:
(i) The name and address of the applicant and location of the
renewable energy system;
(ii) The applicant's tax registration number;
(iii) The date of the notification from the department of revenue
stating that the renewable energy system is eligible for the incentives
under this section;
(iv) A statement of the amount of kilowatt-hours generated by the
renewable energy system in the prior fiscal year.
(b) Within sixty days of receipt of the incentive certification the
light and power business serving the situs of the system shall notify
the applicant in writing whether the incentive payment will be
authorized or denied. The business may consult with the climate and
rural energy development center to determine eligibility for the
incentive payment. Incentive certifications and the information
contained therein are subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(m).
(c)(i) Persons receiving incentive payments shall keep and
preserve, for a period of five years, suitable records as may be
necessary to determine the amount of incentive applied for and
received. Such records shall be open for examination at any time upon
notice by the light and power business that made the payment or by the
department. If upon examination of any records or from other
information obtained by the business or department it appears that an
incentive has been paid in an amount that exceeds the correct amount of
incentive payable, the business may assess against the person for the
amount found to have been paid in excess of the correct amount of
incentive payable and shall add thereto interest on the amount.
Interest shall be assessed in the manner that the department assesses
interest upon delinquent tax under RCW 82.32.050.
(ii) If it appears that the amount of incentive paid is less than
the correct amount of incentive payable the business may authorize
additional payment.
(((5))) (4) Except for community solar projects, the investment
cost recovery incentive may be paid fifteen cents per economic
development kilowatt-hour unless requests exceed the amount authorized
for credit to the participating light and power business. For
community solar projects, the investment cost recovery incentive may be
paid thirty cents per economic development kilowatt-hour unless
requests exceed the amount authorized for credit to the participating
light and power business. For the purposes of this section, the rate
paid for the investment cost recovery incentive may be multiplied by
the following factors:
(a) For customer-generated electricity produced using solar modules
manufactured in Washington state, two and four-tenths;
(b) For customer-generated electricity produced using a solar or a
wind generator equipped with an inverter manufactured in Washington
state, one and two-tenths;
(c) For customer-generated electricity produced using an anaerobic
digester, or by other solar equipment or using a wind generator
equipped with blades manufactured in Washington state, one; and
(d) For all other customer-generated electricity produced by wind,
eight-tenths.
(((6))) (5) No individual, household, business, or local
governmental entity is eligible for incentives provided under
subsection (4) of this section for more than ((two)) five thousand
dollars per year. Each applicant in a community solar project is
eligible for up to five thousand dollars per year.
(((7))) (6) If requests for the investment cost recovery incentive
exceed the amount of funds available for credit to the participating
light and power business, the incentive payments shall be reduced
proportionately.
(((8))) (7) The climate and rural energy development center at
Washington State University energy program may establish guidelines and
standards for technologies that are identified as Washington
manufactured and therefore most beneficial to the state's environment.
(((9))) (8) The environmental attributes of the renewable energy
system belong to the applicant, and do not transfer to the state or the
light and power business upon receipt of the investment cost recovery
incentive.

Sec. 506 RCW 82.16.130 and 2005 c 300 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A light and power business shall be allowed a credit against
taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to investment cost
recovery incentive payments made in any fiscal year under RCW
82.16.120. The credit shall be taken in a form and manner as required
by the department. The credit under this section for the fiscal year
((shall)) may not exceed ((twenty-five one-hundredths of)) one percent
of the businesses' taxable power sales due under RCW 82.16.020(1)(b) or
((twenty-five)) one hundred thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
Incentive payments to participants in a utility-owned community solar
project as defined in RCW 82.16.110(1)(a)(ii) may only account for up
to twenty-five percent of the total allowable credit. The credit may
not exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.
Refunds shall not be granted in the place of credits. Expenditures not
used to earn a credit in one fiscal year may not be used to earn a
credit in subsequent years.
(2) For any business that has claimed credit for amounts that
exceed the correct amount of the incentive payable under RCW 82.16.120,
the amount of tax against which credit was claimed for the excess
payments shall be immediately due and payable. The department shall
assess interest but not penalties on the taxes against which the credit
was claimed. Interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the
date the credit was claimed, and shall accrue until the taxes against
which the credit was claimed are repaid.
(3) The right to earn tax credits under this section expires June
30, ((2015)) 2020. Credits may not be claimed after June 30, ((2016))
2021.

PART VI
Livestock Nutrient Incentives
Sec. 601 RCW 82.08.890 and 2006 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to
eligible persons of:
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Labor and services rendered in respect to ((operating,))
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of qualifying livestock
nutrient management ((equipment and)) facilities, or to ((sales of))
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
((the equipment and)) qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities in the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
of such facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the sale of or charge made for: (A) Labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing of new, or replacing previously
existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities; or (B)
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of
qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities during the course
of constructing new, or replacing previously existing, qualifying
livestock nutrient management facilities.
(2)(((a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b))) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section
applies to sales made after the livestock nutrient management plan is:
(((i))) (a) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (((ii))) (b) approved as
part of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (((iii))) (c)
approved as required under subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists of
eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section
to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy or
animal feeding operation and other information the department may
require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person: (i) Licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management
plan, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding
operation and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who
owns an animal feeding operation and has a nutrient management plan
approved by a conservation district as meeting natural resource
conservation service field office technical guide standards and who
possesses an exemption certificate under RCW 82.08.855.
(d) (("Livestock nutrient management equipment and facilities"
means machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and
treatment of livestock manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley
scrapers, augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes,
pumps, separators, and tanks. The term also includes tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities, including repair and replacement parts)) "Handling and
treatment of livestock manure" means the activities of collecting,
storing, moving, or transporting livestock manure, separating livestock
manure solids from liquids, or applying livestock manure to the
agricultural lands of an eligible person other than through the use of
pivot or linear type traveling irrigation systems.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.
(f) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment" means the
following tangible personal property for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure, including repair and replacement
parts for such equipment: (i) Aerators; (ii) agitators; (iii) augers;
(iv) conveyers; (v) gutter cleaners; (vi) hard-hose reel traveler
irrigation systems; (vii) lagoon and pond liners and floating covers;
(viii) loaders; (ix) manure composting devices; (x) manure spreaders;
(xi) manure tank wagons; (xii) manure vacuum tanks; (xiii) poultry
house cleaners; (xiv) poultry house flame sterilizers; (xv) poultry
house washers; (xvi) poultry litter saver machines; (xvii) pipes;
(xviii) pumps; (xix) scrapers; (xx) separators; (xxi) slurry injectors
and hoses; and (xxii) wheelbarrows, shovels, and pitchforks.
(g) "Qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities" means the
following structures and facilities for exclusive use in the handling
and treatment of livestock manure: (i) Flush systems; (ii) lagoons;
(iii) liquid livestock manure storage structures, such as concrete
tanks or glass-lined steel tanks; and (iv) structures used solely for
the dry storage of manure, including roofed stacking facilities.

Sec. 602 RCW 82.12.890 and 2006 c 151 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by an eligible person of ((tangible personal property that becomes
an ingredient or component of livestock nutrient management equipment
and facilities, as defined in RCW 82.08.890, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
eligible tangible personal property)):
(a) Qualifying livestock nutrient management equipment;
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving qualifying livestock
nutrient management equipment; and
(c)(i) Tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of qualifying livestock nutrient management facilities in the
course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of such
facilities.
(ii) The exemption provided in this subsection (1)(c) does not
apply to the use of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities during the course of constructing new, or replacing
previously existing, qualifying livestock nutrient management
facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
((or)) and labor and services made after the livestock nutrient
management plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii)
approved as part of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii)
approved as required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.

PART VII
Log Trucks
Sec. 701 RCW 82.16.010 and 2007 c 6 s 1023 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Railroad business" means the business of operating any
railroad, by whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance
of persons or property for hire. It shall not, however, include any
business herein defined as an urban transportation business.
(2) "Express business" means the business of carrying property for
public hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state,
when such common carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging
in such business.
(3) "Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock
cars, furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank
cars, sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any
other kinds of cars used for transportation of property or persons upon
the line of any railroad operated in this state when such railroad is
not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.
(4) "Water distribution business" means the business of operating
a plant or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.
(5) "Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of
electrical energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of
electricity for others.
(6) "Telegraph business" means the business of affording
telegraphic communication for hire.
(7) "Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of
gas, whether manufactured or natural.
(8) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle
by which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and
includes, but is not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled
vehicle as an auto transportation company (except urban transportation
business), common carrier or contract carrier as defined by RCW
81.68.010 and 81.80.010((: PROVIDED, That)). However, "motor
transportation business" shall not mean or include: (a) A log
transportation business; or (b) the transportation of logs or other
forest products exclusively upon private roads or private highways.
(9) "Urban transportation business" means the business of operating
any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for
hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of
any city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof,
or (b) operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose
corporate limits are not more than five miles apart or within five
miles of the corporate limits of either thereof. Included herein, but
without limiting the scope hereof, is the business of operating
passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of operating
cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the
collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a
point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or
distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate
line-haul of such property.
(10) "Log transportation business" means the business of
transporting logs by truck, other than exclusively upon private roads.
(11)(a) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9)
of this section or any business subject to control by the state, or
having the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or
any business hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public
service nature, except telephone business and low-level radioactive
waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW 81.04.010. It
includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof: Airplane
transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll logging
road, water transportation and wharf businesses.
(b) The definitions in this subsection (((10))) (11)(b) apply
throughout this subsection (((10))) (11).
(i) "Competitive telephone service" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.065.
(ii) "Network telephone service" means the providing by any person
of access to a telephone network, telephone network switching service,
toll service, or coin telephone services, or the providing of
telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for
hire, via a telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave,
or similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the site of
an internet provider via a telephone network, toll line or channel,
cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television
service, the providing of broadcast services by radio or television
stations, nor the provision of internet service as defined in RCW
82.04.297, including the reception of dial-in connection, provided at
the site of the internet service provider.
(iii) "Telephone business" means the business of providing network
telephone service. It includes cooperative or farmer line telephone
companies or associations operating an exchange.
(iv) "Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or
network telephone service, or both, as defined in (b)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection.
(((11))) (12) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating
tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or
pushing of vessels, barges or rafts for hire.
(((12))) (13) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing
from the performance of the particular public service or transportation
business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without
any deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or
sold, the cost of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount,
delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued
and without any deduction on account of losses.
(((13))) (14) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the
term "tax year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing," "business,"
"engaging in business," "in this state," "within this state," "cash
discount" and "successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec. 702 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected from every person
a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one
or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate set out after
the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

PART VIII
Hybrid Vehicles
NEW SECTION. Sec. 801 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.813 (Exemptions -- High gas mileage vehicles) and 2005
c 296 s 2; and
(2) RCW 82.12.813 (Exemptions -- High gas mileage vehicles) and 2005
c 296 s 4.

Sec. 802 RCW 82.08.020 and 2006 c 1 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each
retail sale in this state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price.
(2) There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax
on each retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is
licensed in this state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the
selling price. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in RCW
47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.020, and
snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(5) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection shall be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(6) The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive
retail sales of the same property.
(7)(a) Until January 1, 2011, the tax imposed in subsection (3) of
this section and the dedication of revenue provided for in subsection
(5) of this section, do not apply with respect to the sales of new
passenger cars, light duty trucks, and medium duty passenger vehicles,
which utilize hybrid technology and have a United States environmental
protection agency estimated highway gasoline mileage rating of at least
forty miles per gallon.
(b) As used in this subsection, "hybrid technology" means
propulsion units powered by both electricity and gasoline.
(8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

PART IX
Miscellaneous
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 Except for sections 801 and 802 of this
act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 Sections 801 and 802 of this act take
effect August 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 Section 802 of this act expires January 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 Sections 701 and 702 of this act expire
June 30, 2013.

--- END ---