BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
FINDING AND INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that the department
of revenue's 2008 compliance study estimates that sales tax
noncompliance exceeds well over one hundred million dollars annually in
unpaid state and local sales and use taxes. The study further
indicates that sales tax noncompliance occurs most frequently for
construction at 80.7 percent of all firms in this industry.
The legislature intends to address this significant problem by
taking a two-pronged approach.
First, this act changes the excise taxation of construction
businesses and others who render services in respect to real property.
Beginning January 1, 2010: (1) The purchase of materials and
subcontractor services for all retail construction and other retail
real property improvement projects will become retail sales; (2)
contractors and other persons who render services in respect to real
property will pay retail sales tax on all such purchases; (3) to avoid
the pyramiding of sales tax, contractors and other persons who render
services in respect to real property will be entitled to claim a credit
on their excise tax returns for the amount of retail sales or use taxes
paid on the purchase or use of materials incorporated into, and
subcontractor services purchased for, retail construction and other
retail real property improvement projects; and (4) sales and use tax
exemptions are provided or modified so as not to affect the sales and
use taxation of construction projects within the scope of a sales and
use tax deferral certificate issued by the department of revenue or a
specific sales and use tax exemption provided in chapters 82.08 and
82.12 RCW.
Second, this act also eliminates the use of resale certificates to
document wholesale purchases. Resale certificates will be replaced
with seller's permits, which will be issued by the department of
revenue only to those businesses that make wholesale purchases, such as
retailers, wholesalers, and manufacturers. Businesses that do not make
wholesale purchases, such as construction businesses and most service
businesses, will not be entitled to a seller's permit.

PART II
ADDRESSING THE IMPROPER USE OF RESALE CERTIFICATES BY
CONTRACTORS AND OTHER PERSONS WHO RENDER SERVICES IN
RESPECT TO REAL PROPERTY
Sec. 201 RCW 82.04.050 and 2007 c 54 s 4 and 2007 c 6 s 1004 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of tangible
personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who presents a ((resale certificate under)) seller's permit or uniform
exemption certificate in conformity with RCW 82.04.470 and who:
(a) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(b) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, or improves((,
constructs, or decorates real or)) personal property of or for
consumers, if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or
component of such ((real or)) personal property without intervening use
by such person; or
(c) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(d) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(e) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065. The term shall include every sale of tangible personal
property which is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the
performance of any activity classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail
sale" even though such property is resold or utilized as provided in
(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this subsection following such use. The
term also means every sale of tangible personal property to persons
engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and
(7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908; or
(f) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or
for labor and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and shall also include the sale of services or charges
made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the
mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but shall not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it
shall be presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing
of lodging for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is
a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the
same;
(g) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this
subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection shall be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section shall be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include the
sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term shall also include:
(i) The renting or leasing of tangible personal property to
consumers; and
(ii) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator
for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A consideration of this
is that the operator is necessary for the tangible personal property to
perform as designed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(a)(ii), an
operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible
personal property.
(b) The term shall not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term shall also include the providing of "competitive
telephone service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary
services," as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6) The term shall also include the sale of prewritten computer
software other than a sale to a person who presents a ((resale
certificate under)) seller's permit or uniform exemption certificate in
conformity with RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the method of delivery to
the end user, but shall not include custom software or the
customization of prewritten computer software.
(7) The term shall also include the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(9) The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or the Washington state department of
fish and wildlife to produce or improve wildlife habitat on land that
the farmer owns or leases.
(10) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities,
radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production and
nuclear research and development.
(11) The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.04.051 and 1999 c 212 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) As used in RCW 82.04.050, the term "services rendered in
respect to" means those services that are directly related to the
constructing, building, repairing, improving, and decorating of
buildings or other structures and that are performed by a person who is
responsible for the performance of the constructing, building,
repairing, improving, or decorating activity.
(b) The term does not include services such as engineering,
architectural, surveying, flagging, accounting, legal, consulting, or
administrative services provided to the consumer of, or person
responsible for performing, the constructing, building, repairing,
improving, or decorating services.
(2) A contract or agreement under which a person is responsible for
both services that would otherwise be subject to tax as a service under
RCW 82.04.290(2) and also constructing, building, repairing, improving,
or decorating activities that would otherwise be subject to tax under
another section of this chapter is subject to the tax that applies to
the predominant activity under the contract or agreement.
(3) Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract or agreement under
which a person is responsible for activities that are subject to tax as
a service under RCW 82.04.290(2), and a subsequent contract or
agreement under which the same person is responsible for constructing,
building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities subject to tax
under another section of this chapter, shall not be combined and taxed
as a single activity if at the time of the first contract or agreement
it was not contemplated by the parties, as evidenced by the facts, that
the same person would be awarded both contracts.
(4)(a) As used in this section "responsible for the performance"
means that the person is obligated to perform all or a portion of the
activities, either personally or through a third party. ((A person
who))
(b) A person is not responsible for the performance of the work if
the person: (i) Reviews work for a consumer((,)) or retailer((, or
wholesaler)) but does not supervise or direct the work ((is not
responsible for the performance of the work. A person who)); or (ii)
is financially obligated for the work, such as a bank, but ((who)) does
not have control over the work itself ((is not responsible for the
performance of the work)).

Sec. 203 RCW 82.04.060 and 2007 c 6 s 1007 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means:
(1) Any sale of the following that is not a sale at retail:
(a) Tangible personal property((, any sale of));
(b) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a)((, any
sale of));
(c) Amusement or recreation services as defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a)((, any sale of canned));
(d) Prewritten computer software((,));
(e) Any sale of an extended warranty as defined in RCW
82.04.050(7)((, or any sale of));
(f) Competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW
82.04.065((, which is not a sale at retail)); and
(2) Any charge made for labor and services rendered for persons who
are not consumers, in respect to ((real or)) personal property, if such
charge is expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when
rendered to or for consumers((: PROVIDED, That)). The term "((real
or)) personal property" as used in this subsection ((shall)) (2) may
not include any natural products named in RCW 82.04.100.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.04.190 and 2007 c 6 s 1008 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Consumer" means the following:
(1) Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any
article of tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the
person's business and including, among others, without limiting the
scope hereof, persons who install, repair, clean, alter, improve,
construct, or decorate real or personal property of or for consumers
other than for the purpose (a) of resale as tangible personal property
in the regular course of business or (b) of incorporating such property
as an ingredient or component of real or personal property when
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving((,
constructing, or decorating)) such ((real or)) personal property of or
for consumers or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale
a new article of tangible personal property or a new substance, of
which such property becomes an ingredient or component or as a chemical
used in processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of a new article being produced for sale or (d) of consuming the
property purchased in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used
in producing magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such
property is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of ferrosilicon or (e) of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7),
if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an ingredient or
component of property covered by the extended warranty without
intervening use by such person;
(2)(a) Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under
RCW 82.04.290 or 82.04.2908; (b) any person who purchases, acquires, or
uses any competitive telephone service, ancillary services, or
telecommunications service as those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065,
other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person
who purchases, acquires, or uses any service defined in RCW
82.04.050(2)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of
business or for the purpose of satisfying the person's obligations
under an extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7); (d) any
person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation
service defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the
regular course of business; (e) any person who is an end user of
software; and (f) any person who purchases or acquires an extended
warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7) other than for resale in the
regular course of business;
(3) Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the
building, repairing or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington or by
the United States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or
vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any kind as
defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of
such publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement,
right-of-way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility,
bridge, tunnel, or trestle by installing, placing or spreading the
property in or upon the right-of-way of such street, place, road,
highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in or upon the site of
such mass public transportation terminal or parking facility;
(4) Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of
possession to or an easement in real property which is being
constructed, repaired, decorated, improved, or otherwise altered by a
person engaged in business, excluding only (a) municipal corporations
or political subdivisions of the state in respect to labor and services
rendered to their real property which is used or held for public road
purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82
RCW in respect to labor and services rendered to their real property.
Nothing contained in this or any other subsection of this definition
shall be construed to modify any other definition of "consumer";
(5) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession to personal property which is being constructed, repaired,
improved, cleaned, imprinted, or otherwise altered by a person engaged
in business;
(6) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created
pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation; also, any person engaged in the business of clearing land
and moving earth of or for the United States, any instrumentality
thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant to
chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the
meaning of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property
incorporated into, installed in, or attached to such building or other
structure by such person, except that consumer does not include any
person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating,
or improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon,
or above real property of or for the United States, or any
instrumentality thereof, if the investment project would qualify for
sales and use tax deferral under chapter 82.63 RCW if undertaken by a
private entity;
(7) Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the
rental of which is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under
RCW 82.08.02565, with respect to the sale of or charge made for
tangible personal property consumed in respect to repairing the
machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal property has a useful
life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or any other
subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";
(8) Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development;
((and))
(9) Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of
possession of tangible personal property that, under the terms of an
extended warranty as defined in RCW 82.04.050(7), has been repaired or
is replacement property, but only with respect to the sale of or charge
made for the repairing of the tangible personal property or the
replacement property;
(10) Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving new or existing buildings or other structures
under, upon, or above real property of or for consumers as defined in
subsection (4) of this section.
(a) A person is a consumer under this subsection in respect to:
(i) Tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or
attached to buildings or other structures located under, upon, or above
real property of or for consumers as defined in subsection (4) of this
section, by such person, during the course of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving such buildings or other structures; and (ii)
the purchase of labor and services defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(2)(b) for the purposes of fulfilling the purchaser's own
obligation to perform labor and services defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050(2) (b) or (c).
(b) A person who is a consumer under this subsection (10) may also
be a consumer under other provisions of this section; and
(11) Any person performing services described in RCW
82.04.050(3)(e).
(a) A person is a consumer under this subsection in respect to:
(i) Tangible personal property incorporated into, installed in, or
attached to real property by such person during the course of rendering
services described in RCW 82.04.050(3)(e); and (ii) the purchase of
services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(3)(e) for the
purposes of fulfilling the purchaser's own obligation to perform
services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(3)(e).
(b) A person who is a consumer under this subsection (11) may also
be a consumer under other provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Construction services" means those services included within
the definition of retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (b) and (c) and
(3)(e).
(b) "Eligible taxpayer" means a taxpayer who:
(i) Makes sales of construction services in this state; and
(ii)(A) Has paid state sales or use taxes on the purchase or use of
tangible personal property that became an ingredient or component,
without intervening use, of buildings, other structures, or other real
property in respect to which the taxpayer rendered construction
services in this state; or
(B) Has paid state sales tax on the purchase of construction
services in order to fulfill the taxpayer's obligation to perform
construction services in this state.
(c) "State sales taxes" means a sales tax, as defined in RCW
82.56.010, imposed by this or any other state or by a local taxing
authority of a state other than Washington, including the tax imposed
in RCW 82.08.020.
(d) "State use taxes" means a use tax, as defined in RCW 82.56.010,
imposed by this or any other state or by a local taxing authority of a
state other than Washington, including the tax imposed in RCW
82.12.020.
(e) "Tax return" means a document a taxpayer files with the
department, or information transmitted electronically to the department
by the taxpayer, to report taxes due under this chapter.
(2) An eligible taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the tax
imposed in RCW 82.08.020 and otherwise required to be remitted to the
department. The credit is equal to the amount of any:
(a) Legally imposed state sales taxes properly paid by the taxpayer
on the purchase of tangible personal property that became an ingredient
or component, without intervening use, of buildings, other structures,
or other real property in respect to which the taxpayer rendered
construction services in this state taxable under RCW 82.08.020; and
(b) The amount of taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020 properly paid by
the taxpayer on the purchase of construction services for the purposes
of fulfilling the taxpayer's obligation to perform construction
services in this state taxable under RCW 82.08.020.
(3) Credit under this section may not be claimed until:
(a) The tangible personal property in respect to which the credit
is claimed has become an ingredient or component of buildings, other
structures, or other real property in respect to which the taxpayer
rendered construction services in this state; and
(b) The construction services in respect to which the credit is
claimed have been performed.
(4) Credit may not be claimed for state sales tax liability accrued
but not paid to the seller. The amount of credit claimed on a tax
return may not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under RCW
82.08.020 for the tax reporting period for which the credit is claimed.
Unused credit amounts may be carried forward and claimed on tax returns
for subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) Taxpayers claiming a credit must keep and preserve records that
show the names of the sellers from whom the tangible personal property
or construction services were purchased, the date of the purchase, the
type of tangible personal property or construction services purchased,
the amount of the purchase, the sales taxes that were paid on the
tangible personal property or construction services, and information
about the project for which the tangible personal property or
construction services were purchased. The requirements in this
subsection may not be construed as a limitation on RCW 82.32.070.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve an eligible
taxpayer from its obligation to pay the tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 on
the purchase of tangible personal property that will become an
ingredient or component, without intervening use, of buildings, other
structures, or other real property in respect to which the taxpayer
will render construction services, or on the purchase of construction
services for the purposes of fulfilling the taxpayer's obligation to
perform construction services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) An eligible taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the tax
imposed under RCW 82.12.020 as provided in this section. Eligible
taxpayers claiming the credit must first pay the applicable state use
taxes and may then claim the credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of any legally imposed state
use taxes properly paid by the taxpayer on the use of tangible personal
property that became an ingredient or component, without intervening
use, of buildings, other structures, or other real property in respect
to which the taxpayer rendered construction services in this state
taxable under RCW 82.08.020.
(3) Credit under this section may not be claimed until the tangible
personal property in respect to which the credit is claimed has become
an ingredient or component of buildings, other structures, or other
real property in respect to which the taxpayer rendered construction
services in this state.
(4) Credit may not be claimed for state use tax liability accrued
but not paid. The amount of credit claimed on a tax return may not
exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under RCW 82.12.020 for the tax
reporting period for which the credit is claimed. Unused credit
amounts may be carried forward and claimed on tax returns for
subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) Taxpayers claiming a credit must keep and preserve records that
show the names of the sellers from whom the tangible personal property
was purchased, the date of the purchase, the type of tangible personal
property purchased, the amount of the purchase, the use taxes that were
paid on the tangible personal property, and information about the
project for which the tangible personal property was purchased.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve an eligible
taxpayer from its obligation to pay the tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 on
the use of tangible personal property that will become an ingredient or
component, without intervening use, of buildings, other structures, or
other real property in respect to which the taxpayer will render
construction services in this state.
(7) The definitions in section 205 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) A taxpayer who is entitled to claim a credit under section
205 or 206 of this act is also entitled to claim a credit against sales
and use taxes paid under this chapter and RCW 81.104.170.
(b) The credit is equal to the amount of any:
(i) Local sales and use taxes properly paid by the taxpayer on the
purchase or use of tangible personal property that became an ingredient
or component, without intervening use, of buildings, other structures,
or other real property in respect to which the taxpayer rendered
construction services in this state taxable under RCW 82.08.020; and
(ii) Local sales taxes properly paid by the taxpayer on the
purchase of construction services for the purposes of fulfilling the
taxpayer's own obligation to perform construction services in this
state taxable under RCW 82.08.020.
(2) Credit under this section may not be claimed until:
(a) The tangible personal property in respect to which the credit
is claimed has become an ingredient or component of buildings, other
structures, or other real property in respect to which the taxpayer
rendered construction services in this state; and
(b) The construction services in respect to which the credit is
claimed have been performed.
(3) Credit may not be claimed for local sales tax and local use tax
liability accrued but not paid. The amount of credit claimed on a tax
return may not exceed the amount of local sales and use taxes otherwise
due for the tax reporting period for which the credit is claimed.
Unused credit amounts may be carried forward and claimed on tax returns
for subsequent tax reporting periods. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(4) No credit may be allowed under this section, including any
associated credit claimed under section 205 or 206 of this act, if the
tax return does not identify, in a manner required by the department:
(a) In the case of a local sales tax, the location code representative
of where: (i) The tangible personal property, which is the subject of
the credit claim, was received; or (ii) the construction services,
which are the subject of the credit claim, were performed; or (b) in
the case of a local use tax, the location code used to report and pay
the tax for which the credit is claimed.
(5) Taxpayers claiming the credit must keep and preserve records
that show the names of the sellers from whom the tangible personal
property or construction services were purchased, the date of the
purchase, the type of tangible personal property or construction
services purchased, the amount of the purchase, the state and local
sales or use taxes that were paid on the tangible personal property or
construction services, and information about the project for which the
tangible personal property or construction services were purchased.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve an eligible
taxpayer from its obligation to pay local sales taxes or local use
taxes on the purchase or use of tangible personal property that will
become an ingredient or component, without intervening use, of
buildings, other structures, or other real property in respect to which
the taxpayer will render construction services in this state, or local
sales taxes on the purchase of construction services for the purposes
of fulfilling the taxpayer's obligation to perform construction
services in this state.
(7) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Local sales taxes" means sales taxes imposed under the
authority of this chapter or RCW 81.104.170.
(b) "Local use taxes" means use taxes imposed under the authority
of this chapter or RCW 81.104.170.
(8) The definitions in section 205 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 208 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
a contractor of the following:
(a) Tangible personal property to be incorporated into, installed
in, or attached to buildings, other structures, or other real property,
if the real property is within the scope of a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for a tax-deferred project; and
(b) Construction services rendered in respect to a tax-deferred
project.
(2) The exemption is available only if the contractor provides the
seller with a copy of the sales and use tax deferral certificate issued
by the department for the project in respect to which the exempt
purchase relates. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3)(a) The exemptions provided in this section do not apply to any
person to whom the department has issued a sales and use tax deferral
certificate, with respect to the tax-deferred project for which the
certificate was issued.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to change the sales
tax treatment of any person to whom the department has issued a sales
and use tax deferral certificate for a tax-deferred project.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Contractor" means a person engaged in the business of
rendering services included within the definition of retail sale in RCW
82.04.050 (2) (b) and (c) and (3)(e).
(b) "Construction services" means those services included within
the definition of retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (b) and (c) and
(3)(e).
(c) "Tax-deferred project" means a project for which the department
has issued a sales and use tax deferral certificate under RCW
36.100.090, 47.01.412, 47.46.060, 82.32.580, or chapter 82.60, 82.63,
82.74, 82.75, or 82.82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 209 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use by
a contractor of tangible personal property to be incorporated into,
installed in, or attached to buildings, other structures, or other real
property, without intervening use, if the real property is within the
scope of a sales and use tax deferral certificate for a tax-deferred
project.
(2)(a) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to any
person to whom the department has issued a sales and use tax deferral
certificate, with respect to the tax-deferred project for which the
certificate was issued.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to change the use tax
treatment of any person to whom the department has issued a sales and
use tax deferral certificate for a tax-deferred project.
(3) The definitions in section 208 of this act apply to this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 210 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale to
a contractor of the following:
(a) Tangible personal property to be incorporated into, installed
in, or attached to buildings, other structures, or other real property
of or for a tribal member or an Indian tribe, if the real property is
located wholly in Indian country; and
(b) Construction services rendered in respect to real property
located wholly in Indian country.
(2) The exemption is available only if the contractor provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller must retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Contractor" means a person engaged in the business of
rendering services included within the definition of retail sale in RCW
82.04.050 (2) (b) and (c) and (3)(e).
(b) "Construction services" means those services included within
the definition of retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (b) and (c) and
(3)(e).
(c) "Indian country" has the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C. Sec.
1151.
(d) "Indian tribe" means an Indian nation, tribe, band, community,
or other entity recognized as an "Indian tribe" by the United States
Department of the Interior.
(e) "Tribal member" means a person on the tribal rolls of an Indian
tribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 211 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use by
a contractor of tangible personal property to be incorporated into,
installed in, or attached to buildings, other structures, or other real
property of or for a tribal member or an Indian tribe, without
intervening use, if the real property is located wholly in Indian
country.
(2) The definitions in section 210 of this act apply to this
section.

Sec. 212 RCW 82.08.841 and 2005 c 420 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(a) Sales of the following machinery and equipment to qualified
farmers: No-till drills, minimum-till drills, chisels, plows,
sprayers, discs, cultivators, harrows, mowers, swathers, power rakes,
balers, bale handlers, shredders, transplanters, tractors two hundred
fifty horsepower and over designed to pull conservation equipment on
steep hills and highly erodible lands, and combine components limited
to straw choppers, chaff spreaders, and stripper headers; and
(b) Labor and services rendered in respect to constructing hay
sheds of or for a qualified farmer((s)) or to sales of tangible
personal property ((to qualified farmers)) that becomes an ingredient
or component of such hay sheds during the course of the constructing.
(2)(a) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section. A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility. The
department may request from a qualified farmer, copies of farm service
agency or crop insurance records for verification purposes, however
information obtained from farm service agency or crop insurance records
is deemed taxpayer information under RCW 82.32.330 and is not
disclosable.
(b) The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Qualified farmer" means a farmer as defined in RCW 82.04.213
who has more than fifty percent of his or her tillable acres in cereal
grains and/or field and turf grass grown for seed in qualified
counties.
(b) "Qualified counties" means those counties in Washington state
where cereal grain production within the county exceeds fifteen
thousand acres.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 213 RCW 82.08.890 and 2006 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales ((to
eligible persons)) of services rendered in respect to operating,
repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving of livestock nutrient
management equipment and facilities of or for eligible persons, or to
sales of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or
component of the equipment and facilities.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to sales made after the livestock
nutrient management plan is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW;
(ii) approved as part of the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or
(iii) approved as required under subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this
section.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
department of agriculture must provide a list of eligible persons, as
defined in subsection (4)(c)(i) and (ii) of this section, to the
department of revenue. Conservation districts must maintain lists of
eligible persons as defined in subsection (4)(c)(iii) of this section
to allow the department of revenue to verify eligibility. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the dairy or
animal feeding operation and other information the department may
require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. If the buyer is not an eligible person, the buyer may
provide the seller with a copy of the exemption certificate of the
eligible person that owns the livestock nutrient management facility in
respect to which the claim of exemption relates. The seller must
retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.890 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Animal feeding operation" means a lot or facility, other than
an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions
are met:
(i) Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five
days or more in any twelve-month period; and
(ii) Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or postharvest residues are
not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot
or facility.
(b) "Conservation district" means a subdivision of state government
organized under chapter 89.08 RCW.
(c) "Eligible person" means a person (i) licensed to produce milk
under chapter 15.36 RCW who has a certified dairy nutrient management
plan, as required by chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) who owns an animal feeding
operation and has a permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) who
owns an animal feeding operation and has a nutrient management plan
approved by a conservation district as meeting natural resource
conservation service field office technical guide standards.
(d) "Livestock nutrient management equipment and facilities" means
machinery, equipment, and structures used in the handling and treatment
of livestock manure, such as aerators, agitators, alley scrapers,
augers, dams, gutter cleaners, loaders, lagoons, pipes, pumps,
separators, and tanks. The term also includes tangible personal
property that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment and
facilities, including repair and replacement parts.
(e) "Permit" means either a state waste discharge permit or a
national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, or both.

Sec. 214 RCW 82.08.900 and 2006 c 151 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to:
(a) Sales to an eligible person ((establishing or operating)) of an
anaerobic digester; or ((to))
(b) The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving an anaerobic digester((,)) of or for an eligible person; or
((to))
(c) Sales of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component of ((the)) an eligible person's anaerobic digester during
the course of installing, constructing, repairing, cleaning, altering,
or improving the anaerobic digester. ((The anaerobic digester must be
used primarily to treat livestock manure.))
(2)(a) The department of revenue must provide an exemption
certificate to an eligible person upon application by that person. The
application must be in a form and manner prescribed by the department
and must contain information regarding the location of the facility and
other information as the department may require.
(b) A person claiming an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. If the person claiming an exemption under subsection
(1)(b) or (c) of this section is not an eligible person, the buyer may
provide the seller with a copy of the exemption certificate of the
eligible person that owns the anaerobic digester in respect to which
the claim of exemption relates. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section and
RCW 82.12.900 unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Anaerobic digester" means a facility ((that processes)) used
primarily for processing manure from livestock into biogas and dried
manure using microorganisms in a decomposition process within a closed,
oxygen-free container.
(b) "Eligible person" means any person establishing or operating an
anaerobic digester to treat primarily livestock manure.
(c) "Primarily" means more than fifty percent measured by volume or
weight.

Sec. 215 RCW 82.08.980 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to the constructing of new
buildings ((by)) of or for a manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing
of superefficient airplanes or ((by)) of or for a port district, to be
leased to a manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing of superefficient
airplanes, to sales of tangible personal property that will be
incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings during the
course of the constructing, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section, however in order to qualify under this section before starting
construction the port district must have entered into an agreement with
the manufacturer to build such a facility. A person taking the
exemption under this section is subject to all the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must report as required
under RCW 82.32.545 if the person is a manufacturer of superefficient
airplanes.
(3) The exemption in this section applies to buildings, or parts of
buildings, that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of
superefficient airplanes, including buildings used for the storage of
raw materials and finished product.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "superefficient airplane" has
the meaning given in RCW 82.32.550.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 216 RCW 82.12.841 and 2005 c 420 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply in respect to:
(a) The use of the following machinery and equipment by qualified
farmers: No-till drills, minimum-till drills, chisels, plows,
sprayers, discs, cultivators, harrows, mowers, swathers, power rakes,
balers, bale handlers, shredders, transplanters, tractors two hundred
fifty horsepower and over designed to pull conservation equipment on
steep hills and highly erodible lands, and combine components limited
to straw choppers, chaff spreaders, and stripper headers; and
(b) The use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated
as an ingredient or component of hay sheds ((by)) of a qualified
farmer, during the course of constructing such hay sheds.
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
RCW 82.08.841 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 217 RCW 82.12.890 and 2006 c 151 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use ((by an eligible person)) of tangible personal property that
becomes an ingredient or component of livestock nutrient management
equipment and facilities of an eligible person, as defined in RCW
82.08.890, or to labor and services rendered in respect to repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving eligible tangible personal property.
(2)(a) To be eligible, the equipment and facilities must be used
exclusively for activities necessary to maintain a livestock nutrient
management plan.
(b) The exemption applies to the use of tangible personal property
or labor and services made after the livestock nutrient management plan
is: (i) Certified under chapter 90.64 RCW; (ii) approved as part of
the permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW; or (iii) approved as
required under RCW 82.08.890(4)(c)(iii).
(3) The exemption certificate and recordkeeping requirements of RCW
82.08.890 apply to this section. The definitions in RCW 82.08.890
apply to this section.

Sec. 218 RCW 82.12.900 and 2006 c 151 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of anaerobic digesters by eligible persons, tangible personal property
that becomes an ingredient or component of anaerobic digesters for
operation by an eligible person, or the use of services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
eligible tangible personal property by an eligible person establishing
or operating an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW 82.08.900. The
anaerobic digester must be used primarily to treat livestock manure.

Sec. 219 RCW 82.12.980 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings for use by a manufacturer
engaged in the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes or owned by a
port district and to be leased to a manufacturer engaged in the
manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, during the course of
constructing such buildings, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
RCW 82.08.980 apply to this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 220 RCW 82.32.045 and 2006 c 256 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the
taxes imposed under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW,
along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due monthly within twenty-five days after the end of the month in
which the taxable activities occur.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department
of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers from the
obligation of remitting monthly and may require the return to cover
other longer reporting periods, but in no event may returns be filed
for a period greater than one year. For these taxpayers, tax payments
are due on or before the last day of the month next succeeding the end
of the period covered by the return.
(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply to
persons who makes retail sales as defined in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (b) or
(c) or (3)(e), if the department determines that the effective
administration of RCW 82.04.050, 82.04.051, 82.04.060, 82.04.190,
82.08.841, 82.08.890, 82.08.900, 82.08.980, 82.12.890, 82.12.900,
82.14.841, and sections 205 through 211 of this act requires the person
to file returns and remit taxes on a monthly basis.
(3) The department of revenue may also require verified annual
returns from any taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as
it may deem necessary to correctly determine tax liability.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if
the following conditions are met:
(a) The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or
gross income of the business, from all business activities taxable
under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less than twenty-eight thousand dollars per
year;
(b) The person's gross income of the business from all activities
taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand
dollars per year; and
(c) The person is not required to collect or pay to the department
of revenue any other tax or fee which the department is authorized to
collect.

PART III
REPLACING RESALE CERTIFICATES WITH SELLER'S PERMITS
ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Taxpayers seeking a new seller's permit or to renew or
reinstate a seller's permit must apply to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The department must rule on
applications within sixty days of receiving a complete application. An
application must be denied if the department determines that, based on
the nature of the applicant's business, the applicant is not entitled
to make purchases at wholesale or is otherwise prohibited from using a
seller's permit. The department may also deny an application if it
determines that denial would be in the best interest of collecting
taxes due under this title. The department's decision whether to
approve or deny an application may be based on tax returns previously
filed with the department by the applicant, a current or previous
examination of the applicant's books and records by the department,
information provided by the applicant in the master application and the
seller's permit application, and other information available to the
department.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department
may issue a seller's permit to a taxpayer that has not applied for the
permit if it appears to the department's satisfaction, based on the
nature of the taxpayer's business activities and any other information
available to the department, that the taxpayer is entitled to make
purchases at wholesale.
(3) Seller's permits issued by the department will be in a form
prescribed by the department, which may include an electronic form, and
must contain a unique identifying number assigned by the department.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, seller's
permits issued, renewed, or reinstated under this section will be valid
for a period of forty-eight months from the date of issuance, renewal,
or reinstatement.
(b) A seller's permit issued to taxpayers who register with the
department under RCW 82.32.030 after January 1, 2009, is valid for a
period of twenty-four months and may be renewed for the period
prescribed in (a) of this subsection (4).
(c) A seller's permit is no longer valid if the permit holder's
certificate of registration is revoked by department or the person
otherwise ceases to engage in business.
(5)(a) The department may revoke a seller's permit of a taxpayer
for any of the following reasons:
(i) The taxpayer used or allowed or caused its seller's permit to
be used to purchase any item or service without payment of sales tax,
but the taxpayer or other purchaser was not entitled to use the
seller's permit for the purchase;
(ii) The department issued the seller's permit to the taxpayer in
error;
(iii) The department determines that the taxpayer is no longer
entitled to make purchases at wholesale; or
(iv) The department closes the permit holder's tax reporting
account with the department.
(b) The notice of revocation must be in writing and is effective on
the date specified in the revocation notice. The notice must also
advise the taxpayer of its right to a review by the department.
(c) The department may refuse to reinstate a seller's permit
revoked under (a)(i) of this subsection until all taxes, penalties, and
interest due on any improperly purchased item or service have been paid
in full. In the event a taxpayer whose seller's permit has been
revoked under this subsection reorganizes, the new business resulting
from the reorganization is not entitled to a seller's permit until all
taxes, penalties, and interest due on any improperly purchased item or
service have been paid in full.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "reorganize" or
"reorganization" means: (i) The transfer, however effected, of a
majority of the assets of one business to another business where any of
the persons having an interest in the ownership or management in the
former business maintain an ownership or management interest in the new
business, either directly or indirectly; (ii) a mere change in identity
or form of ownership, however effected; or (iii) the new business is a
mere continuation of the former business based on significant shared
features such as owners, personnel, assets, or general business
activity.
(6) The department may provide lists of valid and revoked seller's
permit numbers on its web site.
(7) The department must provide by rule for the review of the
department's decision to deny, revoke, or refuse to reinstate a
seller's permit. Such review must be consistent with the requirements
of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(8) As used in this section, "seller's permit" has the same meaning
as in RCW 82.04.470.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.470 and 2007 c 6 s 1201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless a seller has taken from the buyer a ((resale
certificate)) seller's permit, the burden of proving that a sale of
tangible personal property, extended warranty, or of services, was not
a sale at retail shall be upon the person who made it.
(2) If a seller does not receive a ((resale certificate)) seller's
permit at the time of the sale, have a ((resale certificate)) seller's
permit on file at the time of the sale, or obtain a ((resale
certificate)) seller's permit from the buyer within a reasonable time
after the sale, the seller shall remain liable for the tax as provided
in RCW 82.08.050, unless the seller can demonstrate facts and
circumstances according to rules adopted by the department ((of
revenue)) that show the sale was properly made without payment of
retail sales tax.
(3) ((The department may provide by rule for suggested forms for
resale certificates or equivalent documents containing the information
that will be accepted as resale certificates. The department shall
provide by rule the categories of items or services that must be
specified on resale certificates and the business classifications that
may use a blanket resale certificate.
(4) As used in this section, "resale certificate" means
documentation provided by a buyer to a seller stating that the purchase
is for resale in the regular course of business, or that the buyer is
exempt from retail sales tax, and containing the following
information)) A seller's permit must contain such information as
required by the department, which may include, but is not limited to:
(a) The name and address of the buyer;
(b) The ((uniform business identifier or revenue registration
number of the buyer, if the buyer is required to be registered))
seller's permit number issued by the department;
(c) The type of business engaged in;
(d) The categories of items or services to be purchased for resale
or that are ((exempt)) otherwise to be purchased at wholesale, unless
the buyer presents a blanket ((resale certificate)) seller's permit;
(e) The date on which the ((certificate)) permit was provided to
the seller;
(f) A statement that the items or services purchased either: (i)
Are purchased for resale in the regular course of business; or (ii) are
((exempt from tax pursuant to statute)) otherwise purchased at
wholesale;
(g) A statement that the buyer acknowledges that the buyer is
solely responsible for purchasing within the categories specified on
the ((certificate)) permit and that misuse of the resale ((or
exemption)) privilege claimed on the ((certificate)) permit subjects
the buyer to ((a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due)) revocation
of the seller's permit, penalties as provided in RCW 82.32.290 and
82.32.291, in addition to the tax, interest, and any other penalties
imposed by law;
(h) The name of the individual authorized to sign the
((certificate)) permit, printed in a legible fashion;
(i) The signature of the authorized individual; ((and))
(j) The name of the seller;
(k) The date the permit was issued, renewed, or reinstated by the
department;
(l) The date that the permit expires;
(m) Instructions for renewing the permit; and
(n) A statement that the department is authorized to obtain
information concerning the buyer's purchase of items or services under
the permit from the seller to verify whether the buyer was authorized
to purchase such items or services without payment of retail sales tax.
(((5))) (4) Subsection (((4))) (3)(h)((,)) and (i)((, and (j))) of
this section does not apply if the ((certificate)) permit is provided
in a format other than paper. If the ((certificate)) permit is
provided in a format other than paper, the name of the individual
providing the ((certificate)) permit must be included in the
((certificate)) permit.
(5)(a) In lieu of a seller's permit issued by the department under
section 301 of this act, a seller may accept from a nonresident buyer
that is not required to be registered with the department under RCW
82.32.030 a properly completed:
(i) Uniform sales and use tax exemption certificate developed by
the multistate tax commission; or
(ii) Uniform exemption certificate approved by the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement governing board.
(b) A seller who accepts a properly completed exemption certificate
as authorized in (a) of this subsection is relieved of the obligation
to collect and remit retail sales tax.
(6) As used in this section, "seller's permit" means documentation
issued by the department under section 301 of this act and provided by
a buyer to a seller to substantiate a wholesale sale.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.08.050 and 2007 c 6 s 1202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the buyer to the
seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of
the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale in accordance with the
schedule of collections adopted by the department pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 82.08.060.
(2) The tax required by this chapter, to be collected by the
seller, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to
the department, and any seller who appropriates or converts the tax
collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of
the tax to the extent that the money required to be collected is not
available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(3) In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein imposed or,
having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the
manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result
of his or her own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his
or her control, he or she shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to
the state for the amount of the tax, unless the seller has taken from
the buyer a ((resale certificate)) seller's permit or uniform exemption
certificate authorized under RCW 82.04.470, a copy of a direct pay
permit issued under RCW 82.32.087, a direct mail form under RCW
82.32.730(5), or other information required under the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement, or information required under rules adopted by
the department.
(4) Sellers shall not be relieved from personal liability for the
amount of the tax unless they maintain proper records of exempt
transactions and provide them to the department when requested.
(5) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they fraudulently fail to collect the tax or if they solicit
purchasers to participate in an unlawful claim of exemption.
(6) Sellers are not relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they accept an exemption certificate from a purchaser
claiming an entity-based exemption if:
(a) The subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the
exemption certificate is actually received by the purchaser at a
location operated by the seller in Washington; and
(b) Washington provides an exemption certificate that clearly and
affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in
Washington. Graying out exemption reason types on a uniform form and
posting it on the department's web site is a clear and affirmative
indication that the grayed out exemptions are not available.
(7)(a) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount
of tax if they obtain a fully completed exemption certificate or
capture the relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement within ninety days, or a longer period as may be
provided by rule by the department, subsequent to the date of sale.
(b) If the seller has not obtained an exemption certificate or all
relevant data elements required under the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement within the period allowed subsequent to the date of sale, the
seller may, within one hundred twenty days, or a longer period as may
be provided by rule by the department, subsequent to a request for
substantiation by the department, either prove that the transaction was
not subject to tax by other means or obtain a fully completed exemption
certificate from the purchaser, taken in good faith.
(c) Sellers are relieved from personal liability for the amount of
tax if they obtain a blanket exemption certificate for a purchaser with
which the seller has a recurring business relationship. The department
may not request from a seller renewal of blanket certificates or
updates of exemption certificate information or data elements if there
is a recurring business relationship between the buyer and seller. For
purposes of this subsection (7)(c), a "recurring business relationship"
means at least one sale transaction within a period of twelve
consecutive months.
(8) The amount of tax, until paid by the buyer to the seller or to
the department, shall constitute a debt from the buyer to the seller
and any seller who fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with
intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who
refuses to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(9) The tax required by this chapter to be collected by the seller
shall be stated separately from the selling price in any sales invoice
or other instrument of sale. On all retail sales through vending
machines, the tax need not be stated separately from the selling price
or collected separately from the buyer. For purposes of determining
the tax due from the buyer to the seller and from the seller to the
department it shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price
quoted in any price list, sales document, contract or other agreement
between the parties does not include the tax imposed by this chapter,
but if the seller advertises the price as including the tax or that the
seller is paying the tax, the advertised price shall not be considered
the selling price.
(10) Where a buyer has failed to pay to the seller the tax imposed
by this chapter and the seller has not paid the amount of the tax to
the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly
against the buyer for collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of
ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for failure of the
buyer to pay the same to the seller, regardless of when the tax may be
collected by the department; and all of the provisions of chapter 82.32
RCW, including those relative to interest and penalties, shall apply in
addition; and, for the sole purpose of applying the various provisions
of chapter 82.32 RCW, the twenty-fifth day of the month following the
tax period in which the purchase was made shall be considered as the
due date of the tax.
(11) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (10) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(12) Subsection (11) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.
(13) For purposes of this section, "seller" includes a certified
service provider, as defined in RCW 82.32.020, acting as agent for the
seller.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.08.130 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 702 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) If a buyer normally is engaged in both consuming and reselling
certain types of articles of tangible personal property and is not able
to determine at the time of purchase whether the particular property
acquired will be consumed or resold, the buyer may use a ((resale
certificate)) seller's permit or, if eligible, a uniform exemption
certificate authorized under RCW 82.04.470 for the entire purchase if
the buyer principally resells the articles according to the general
nature of the buyer's business. The buyer shall account for the value
of any articles purchased with a ((resale certificate)) seller's permit
or uniform exemption certificate authorized under RCW 82.04.470 that
are used by the buyer and remit the deferred sales tax on the articles
to the department.
(2) A buyer who pays a tax on all purchases and subsequently
resells an article or service at retail, without intervening use by the
buyer, shall collect the tax from the purchaser as otherwise provided
by law and is entitled to a deduction or credit on the buyer's tax
return equal to, in the case of a deduction, the cost to the buyer of
the property or service resold upon which retail sales tax has been
paid, and in the case of a credit, the amount of state and local sales
taxes paid with respect to the property or service resold. The
deduction or credit is allowed only if the taxpayer keeps and preserves
records that show the names of the persons from whom the articles or
services were purchased, the date of the purchase, the type of articles
or services, the amount of the purchase, and the tax that was paid.
(3) The department ((shall)) must provide by rule for the refund or
credit of retail sales tax paid by a buyer for purchases that are later
((sold at wholesale)) resold without intervening use by the buyer or
for purchases that otherwise meet the definition of wholesale sale.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a
deduction or credit in respect to the purchase of services if the
services are not of a type that can be sold at wholesale under the
definition of wholesale sale in RCW 82.04.060.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.14B.042 and 2002 c 341 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state enhanced 911 excise taxes imposed by this chapter
must be paid by the subscriber to the local exchange company providing
the switched access line or the radio communications service company
providing the radio access line, and each local exchange company and
each radio communications service company shall collect from the
subscriber the full amount of the taxes payable. The state enhanced
911 excise taxes required by this chapter to be collected by the local
exchange company or the radio communications service company are deemed
to be held in trust by the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company until paid to the department. Any local
exchange company or radio communications service company that
appropriates or converts the tax collected to its own use or to any use
other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money
collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in
this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) If any local exchange company or radio communications service
company fails to collect the state enhanced 911 excise tax or, after
collecting the tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner
prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of its
own act or the result of acts or conditions beyond its control, the
local exchange company or the radio communications service company is
personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax, unless the
local exchange company or the radio communications service company has
taken from the buyer in good faith ((a properly executed resale
certificate under RCW 82.14B.200)) documentation, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the state enhanced 911 tax.
(3) The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the local
exchange company, the radio communications service company, or to the
department, constitutes a debt from the subscriber to the local
exchange company or the radio communications service company. Any
local exchange company or radio communications service company that
fails or refuses to collect the tax as required with intent to violate
the provisions of this chapter or to gain some advantage or benefit,
either direct or indirect, and any subscriber who refuses to pay any
tax due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The state
enhanced 911 excise taxes required by this chapter to be collected by
the local exchange company or the radio communications service company
must be stated separately on the billing statement that is sent to the
subscriber.
(4) If a subscriber has failed to pay to the local exchange company
or the radio communications service company the state enhanced 911
excise taxes imposed by this chapter and the local exchange company or
the radio communications service company has not paid the amount of the
tax to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed
directly against the subscriber for collection of the tax, in which
case a penalty of ten percent may be added to the amount of the tax for
failure of the subscriber to pay the tax to the local exchange company
or the radio communications service company, regardless of when the tax
is collected by the department. Tax under this chapter is due as
provided under RCW 82.14B.061.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.14B.200 and 2002 c 341 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless a local exchange company or a radio communications
service company has taken from the buyer ((a resale certificate or
equivalent document under RCW 82.04.470)) documentation, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is not a
subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the tax, the burden of
proving that a sale of the use of a switched access line or radio
access line was not a sale to a subscriber or was not otherwise subject
to the tax is upon the person who made the sale.
(2) If a local exchange company or a radio communications service
company does not receive ((a resale certificate)) documentation, in a
form and manner prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is
not a subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the tax at the time of
the sale, have ((a resale certificate)) such documentation on file at
the time of the sale, or obtain ((a resale certificate)) such
documentation from the buyer within a reasonable time after the sale,
the local exchange company or the radio communications service company
remains liable for the tax as provided in RCW 82.14B.042, unless the
local exchange company or the radio communications service company can
demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by the
department of revenue that show the sale was properly made without
payment of the state enhanced 911 excise tax.
(3) The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on
state enhanced 911 excise taxes due but not paid as a result of the
improper use of ((a resale certificate)) documentation stating that the
buyer is not a subscriber or is otherwise not liable for the state
enhanced 911 tax. This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the
application of other penalties authorized by law.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.32.087 and 2001 c 188 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director may grant a direct pay permit to a taxpayer who
demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the director, that the taxpayer
meets the requirements of this section. The direct pay permit allows
the taxpayer to accrue and remit directly to the department use tax on
the acquisition of tangible personal property or sales tax on the sale
of or charges made for labor and/or services, in accordance with all of
the applicable provisions of this title. Any taxpayer that uses a
direct pay permit shall remit state and local sales or use tax directly
to the department. The agreement by the purchaser to remit tax
directly to the department, rather than pay sales or use tax to the
seller, relieves the seller of the obligation to collect sales or use
tax and requires the buyer to pay use tax on the tangible personal
property and sales tax on the sale of or charges made for labor and/or
services.
(2)(a) A taxpayer may apply for a permit under this section if the
taxpayer (i) is subject to mandatory use of electronic funds transfer
under RCW 82.32.080; or (ii) makes purchases subject to the taxes
imposed under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW in excess of ten million
dollars per calendar year.
(b) Application for a permit must be made in writing to the
director in a form and manner prescribed by the department. A taxpayer
who transacts business in two or more locations may submit one
application to cover the multiple locations.
(c) The director shall review a direct pay permit application in a
timely manner and shall notify the applicant, in writing, of the
approval or denial of the application. The department shall approve or
deny an application based on the applicant's ability to comply with
local government use tax coding capabilities and responsibilities;
requirements for vendor notification; recordkeeping obligations;
electronic data capabilities; and tax reporting procedures.
Additionally, an application may be denied if the director determines
that denial would be in the best interest of collecting taxes due under
this title. The department shall provide a direct pay permit to an
approved applicant with the notice of approval. The direct pay permit
shall clearly state that the holder is solely responsible for the
accrual and payment of the tax imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW and that the seller is relieved of liability to collect tax imposed
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on all sales to the direct pay
permit holder. The taxpayer may petition the director for
reconsideration of a denial.
(d) A taxpayer who uses a direct pay permit must continue to
maintain records that are necessary to a determination of the tax
liability in accordance with this title. A direct pay permit is not
transferable and the use of a direct pay permit may not be assigned to
a third party.
(3) Taxes for which the direct pay permit is used are due and
payable on the tax return for the reporting period in which the
taxpayer (a) receives the tangible personal property purchased or in
which the labor and/or services are performed or (b) receives an
invoice for such property or such labor and/or services, whichever
period is earlier.
(4) The holder of a direct pay permit shall furnish a copy of the
direct pay permit to each vendor with whom the taxpayer has opted to
use a direct pay permit. Sellers who make sales upon which the sales
or use tax is not collected by reason of the provisions of this
section, in addition to existing requirements under this title, shall
maintain a copy of the direct pay permit and any such records or
information as the department may specify.
(5) A direct pay permit is subject to revocation by the director at
any time the department determines that the taxpayer has violated any
provision of this section or that revocation would be in the best
interests of collecting the taxes due under this title. The notice of
revocation must be in writing and is effective either as of the end of
the taxpayer's next normal reporting period or a date deemed
appropriate by the director and identified in the revocation notice.
The taxpayer may petition the director for reconsideration of a
revocation and reinstatement of the permit.
(6) Any taxpayer who chooses to no longer use a direct pay permit
or whose permit is revoked by the department, shall return the permit
to the department and immediately make a good faith effort to notify
all vendors to whom the permit was given, advising them that the permit
is no longer valid.
(7) Except as provided in this subsection, the direct pay permit
may be used for any purchase of tangible personal property and any
retail sale under RCW 82.04.050. The direct pay permit may not be used
for:
(a) Purchases of meals or beverages;
(b) Purchases of motor vehicles, trailers, boats, airplanes, and
other property subject to requirements for title transactions by the
department of licensing;
(c) Purchases for which a ((resale certificate)) seller's permit or
uniform exemption certificate authorized under RCW 82.04.470 may be
used;
(d) Purchases that meet the definitions of RCW 82.04.050 (2) (e)
and (f), (3) (a) through (d), (f), and (g), and (5); or
(e) Other activities subject to tax under chapter 82.08 or 82.12
RCW that the department by rule designates, consistent with the
purposes of this section, as activities for which a direct pay permit
is not appropriate and may not be used.

Sec. 308 RCW 82.32.290 and 1985 c 414 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) It shall be unlawful:
(i) For any person to engage in business without having obtained a
certificate of registration as provided in this chapter;
(ii) For the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or
other officer of any company to cause or permit the company to engage
in business without having obtained a certificate of registration as
provided in this chapter;
(iii) For any person to tear down or remove any order or notice
posted by the department;
(iv) For any person to aid or abet another in any attempt to evade
the payment of any tax or any part thereof;
(v) For any purchaser to fraudulently sign or furnish to a seller
a ((resale certificate)) seller's permit or uniform exemption
certificate authorized under RCW 82.04.470 without intent to resell the
property purchased; or
(vi) For any person to fail or refuse to permit the examination of
any book, paper, account, record, or other data by the department or
its duly authorized agent; or to fail or refuse to permit the
inspection or appraisal of any property by the department or its duly
authorized agent; or to refuse to offer testimony or produce any record
as required.
(b) Any person violating any of the provisions of this subsection
(1) shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor in accordance with chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(2)(a) It shall be unlawful:
(i) For any person to engage in business after revocation of a
certificate of registration;
(ii) For the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or
other officer of any company to cause or permit the company to engage
in business after revocation of a certificate of registration; or
(iii) For any person to make any false or fraudulent return or
false statement in any return, with intent to defraud the state or
evade the payment of any tax or part thereof.
(b) Any person violating any of the provisions of this subsection
(2) shall be guilty of a class C felony in accordance with chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(3) In addition to the foregoing penalties, any person who
knowingly swears to or verifies any false or fraudulent return, or any
return containing any false or fraudulent statement with the intent
aforesaid, shall be guilty of the offense of perjury in the second
degree; and any company for which a false return, or a return
containing a false statement, as aforesaid, is made, shall be punished,
upon conviction thereof, by a fine of not more than one thousand
dollars. All penalties or punishments provided in this section shall
be in addition to all other penalties provided by law.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.32.291 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 703 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any person who uses a ((resale certificate)) seller's permit to
purchase items or services without payment of sales tax, or who uses a
uniform exemption certificate developed by the multistate tax
commission or approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement
governing board to claim a purchase for resale exemption, and who is
not entitled to use the seller's permit or exemption certificate for
the purchase shall be assessed a penalty of ((fifty)) one hundred
percent of the tax due, in addition to all other taxes, penalties, and
interest due, on the improperly purchased item or service. The
department may waive the penalty imposed under this section if it finds
that the use of the seller's permit or exemption certificate was due to
circumstances beyond the taxpayer's control or if the seller's permit
or exemption certificate was properly used for purchases for dual
purposes. The department shall define by rule what circumstances are
considered to be beyond the taxpayer's control.

Sec. 310 RCW 82.32.330 and 2008 c 81 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense((: PROVIDED, That)). However, data,
material, or documents that do not disclose information related to a
specific or identifiable taxpayer do not constitute tax information
under this section. Except as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in
this chapter shall require any person possessing data, material, or
documents made confidential and privileged by this section to delete
information from such data, material, or documents so as to permit its
disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information ((shall be)) are confidential and
privileged, and except as authorized by this section, neither the
department of revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or
tax information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under Title 82 RCW
is a party in the proceeding; or
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director ((shall)) prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such
taxpayer or to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in
a request for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person,
at the taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a
request for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such
other person((: PROVIDED, That)). However, tax information not
received from the taxpayer ((shall)) must not be so disclosed if the
director determines that such disclosure would compromise any
investigation or litigation by any federal, state, or local government
agency in connection with the civil or criminal liability of the
taxpayer or another person, or that such disclosure would identify a
confidential informant, or that such disclosure is contrary to any
agreement entered into by the department that provides for the
reciprocal exchange of information with other government agencies which
agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such information
unless such information is required to be disclosed to the taxpayer by
the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding for
a period of at least ten working days. The department ((shall)) is not
((be)) required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer: (i) Has been issued a tax assessment; (ii) has been issued
a warrant that has not been filed; and (iii) has entered a deferred
payment arrangement with the department of revenue and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer with a deficiency greater
than five thousand dollars and against whom a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 has been filed with a court of record and remains
outstanding;
(e) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(f) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(g) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(j) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the Department
of Justice, including the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and
Explosives within the Department of Justice, the Department of Defense,
the Immigration and Customs Enforcement and the Customs and Border
Protection agencies of the United States Department of Homeland
Security, the Coast Guard of the United States, and the United States
Department of Transportation, or any authorized representative
((thereof)) of these federal agencies, for official purposes;
(k) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(l) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, seller's permit numbers and
the status of such permits, North American industry classification
system or standard industrial classification code of a taxpayer, and
the dates of opening and closing of business. This subsection
((shall)) must not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(n) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(o) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(p) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded;
(q) Disclosing such return or tax information in the possession of
the department relating to the administration or enforcement of the
real estate excise tax imposed under chapter 82.45 RCW, including
information regarding transactions exempt or otherwise not subject to
tax; or
(r) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of
sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for
which relief is granted.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department ((shall)) must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence ((shall)) must
clearly identify the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
The department may not disclose any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this
subsection has expired or until the court has ruled on any challenge
brought under (c) of this subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court shall limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department ((shall)) must reimburse reasonable expenses for
the production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person
in possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3)(f), (g), (h), (i), (j), or (n) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person ((shall)) must forfeit such office or employment and
((shall be)) is incapable of holding any public office or employment in
this state for a period of two years thereafter.

Sec. 311 RCW 82.72.040 and 2004 c 254 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Telephone program excise taxes must be paid by the subscriber
to the local exchange company providing the switched access line, and
each local exchange company shall collect from the subscriber the full
amount of the taxes payable. Telephone program excise taxes to be
collected by the local exchange company are deemed to be held in trust
by the local exchange company until paid to the department. Any local
exchange company that appropriates or converts the tax collected to its
own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax to the extent
that the money collected is not available for payment on the due date
as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(2) If any local exchange company fails to collect telephone
program excise taxes or, after collecting the tax, fails to pay it to
the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such
failure is the result of its own act or the result of acts or
conditions beyond its control, the local exchange company is personally
liable to the state for the amount of the tax, unless the local
exchange company has taken from the buyer in good faith ((a properly
executed resale certificate under RCW 82.72.070)) documentation, in a
form and manner prescribed by the department, stating that the buyer is
not a subscriber or is otherwise not liable for telephone program
excise taxes.
(3) The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the local
exchange company or to the department, constitutes a debt from the
subscriber to the local exchange company. Any local exchange company
that fails or refuses to collect telephone program excise taxes as
required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to
gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any
subscriber who refuses to pay any telephone excise tax is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(4) If a subscriber has failed to pay to the local exchange company
the telephone program excise taxes and the local exchange company has
not paid the amount of the tax to the department, the department may,
in its discretion, proceed directly against the subscriber for
collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of ten percent may be
added to the amount of the tax for failure of the subscriber to pay the
tax to the local exchange company, regardless of when the tax is
collected by the department. Telephone program excise taxes are due as
provided under RCW 82.72.050.

Sec. 312 RCW 82.72.070 and 2004 c 254 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless a local exchange company has taken from the buyer ((a
resale certificate or equivalent document under RCW 82.04.470))
documentation, in a form and manner prescribed by the department,
stating that the buyer is not a subscriber or is otherwise not liable
for telephone program excise taxes, the burden of proving that a sale
of the use of a switched access line was not a sale to a subscriber or
was otherwise not subject to telephone program excise taxes is upon the
person who made the sale.
(2) If a local exchange company does not receive ((a resale
certificate)) documentation, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, stating that the buyer is not a subscriber or is otherwise
not liable for telephone program excise taxes at the time of the sale,
have ((a resale certificate)) such documentation on file at the time of
the sale, or obtain ((a resale certificate)) such documentation from
the buyer within a reasonable time after the sale, the local exchange
company remains liable for the telephone program excise taxes as
provided in RCW 82.72.040, unless the local exchange company can
demonstrate facts and circumstances according to rules adopted by the
department that show the sale was properly made without payment of
telephone program excise taxes.
(3) The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on
telephone program excise taxes that are due but not paid as a result of
the improper use of ((a resale certificate)) documentation stating that
the buyer is not a subscriber or is otherwise not liable for telephone
program excise taxes. This subsection does not prohibit or restrict
the application of other penalties authorized by law.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 This act must be liberally construed in
order to carry out its purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 This act takes effect January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 The effective date in section 403 of this
act may not be construed as preventing the department of revenue from
accepting applications for, or issuing, seller's permits before January
1, 2010, or taking any other action before January 1, 2010, necessary
to ensure the effective implementation of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 405 Part headings used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406 If chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2278 or any other bill making substantively
identical amendments to RCW 82.08.890 and 82.12.890) is enacted,
sections 213 and 217, chapter . . ., Laws of 2009 (section 213 and 217
of this act) are null and void.

--- END ---