BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.95.180 and 1996 c 251 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The punishment of death shall be supervised by the
superintendent of the penitentiary and shall be inflicted by
intravenous injection of a substance or substances in a lethal quantity
sufficient to cause death and until the defendant is dead, or, at the
election of the defendant, by hanging by the neck until the defendant
is dead. In any case, death shall be pronounced by a licensed
physician.
(2) All executions, for both men and women, shall be carried out
within the walls of the state penitentiary.
(3) Records, materials, and other information that reveal, or could
reasonably lead to discovery of, the identity of persons who directly
participate in an execution under this section, and the physician who
pronounces death, are confidential and privileged, are not subject to
public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, and are not subject to
subpoena or discovery in a civil case.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies retroactively, as well as
prospectively, to all past and future executions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---