BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the need to effect
cost savings through the possible use of sentencing changes, prison
releases, prison closures, and decreased supervision. The legislature
believes that through the use of strategic cuts and efficient use of
resources, it can maintain current levels of community safety. The
state intends to keep a close watch on projected incarceration trends
and is prepared to recommend capital prison projects if needed.
While research supports the cost benefit of incarcerating
individuals who have violent tendencies and who are at a high risk to
reoffend, it also shows that there is little benefit to the public in
incarcerating nonviolent criminals. Punishment is a necessary
component of the justice system; however, the state must find more
cost-effective means of dealing with these criminals in a manner that
benefits the taxpayer and public safety.

--- END ---