BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.09.5225 and 2005 c 383 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Payments for recipients eligible for medical assistance
programs under this chapter for services provided by hospitals,
regardless of the beneficiary's managed care enrollment status, shall
be made based on allowable costs incurred during the year, when
services are provided by a rural hospital certified by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services as a critical access hospital. Any
additional payments made by the medical assistance administration for
the healthy options program shall be no more than the additional
amounts per service paid under this section for other medical
assistance programs. The department may adjust payment rates to
comport with payment rate changes made to noncritical access hospitals.
(2) Beginning on July 24, 2005, a moratorium shall be placed on
additional hospital participation in critical access hospital payments
under this section. However, rural hospitals that applied for
certification to the centers for medicare and medicaid services prior
to January 1, 2005, but have not yet completed the process or have not
yet been approved for certification, remain eligible for medical
assistance payments under this section.

--- END ---