BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.96A.037 and 2005 c 504 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services shall contract for
chemical dependency specialist services at ((each)) division of
children and family services offices to enhance the timeliness and
quality of child protective services assessments and to better connect
families to needed treatment services.
(2) The chemical dependency specialist's duties may include, but
are not limited to: Conducting on-site chemical dependency screening
and assessment, facilitating progress reports to department social
workers, in-service training of department social workers and staff on
substance abuse issues, referring clients from the department to
treatment providers, and providing consultation on cases to department
social workers.
(3) The department of social and health services shall provide
training in and ensure that each case-carrying social worker is trained
in uniform screening for mental health and chemical dependency.

--- END ---