BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13.800 and 2008 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall select two geographic areas with high
concentrations of children with significant needs in out-of-home care
for implementing an intensive resource home pilot. In choosing the
pilot sites, the department shall: (a) Examine areas where there are
concentrations of children with significant behavioral challenges and
intensive developmental or medical needs who are being served in family
foster homes; (b) consider sites of appropriate size that will allow
for careful analysis of the impact of the intensive resource home pilot
on the array of out-of-home care providers, including providers of
behavioral rehabilitation services; and (c) determine the number of
children to be served in these selected sites. Implementation of the
program at the pilot sites also shall be structured to support the
long-term goal of eventual expansion of the pilot statewide.
(2) Based on the information gathered by the work group convened
under chapter 413, Laws of 2007, and the additional information
gathered pursuant to this section, the department shall work
collaboratively in:
(a) Seeking recommendations from foster parents and other out-of-home service providers, including child placing agencies, regarding the
qualifications and requirements of intensive resource home providers,
the needs of the children to be served, and the desired outcomes to be
measured or monitored at the respective pilot sites; and
(b) Consulting with experts in child welfare, children's mental
health, and children's health care to identify the evidence-based or
promising practice models to be employed in the pilot and the
appropriate supports to ensure program fidelity, including, but not
limited to, the necessary training and clinical consultation and
oversight to be provided to intensive resource homes.
(3) Using the recommendations from foster parents, the
consultations with professionals as required in subsection (2)(a) and
(b) of this section, and the information provided in the report to the
legislature under chapter 413, Laws of 2007, including the information
presented to the work group convened to prepare and present the report,
the department shall implement the pilot by entering into contracts
with no more than seventy-five providers who are determined by the
department to meet the eligibility criteria for the intensive resource
home pilot. The department shall:
(a) Define the criteria for intensive resource home providers,
which shall include a requirement that the provider be licensed by the
department as a foster parent, as well as meet additional requirements
relating to relevant experience, education, training, and professional
expertise necessary to meet the high needs of children identified as
eligible for this pilot;
(b) Define criteria for identifying children with high needs who
may be eligible for placement with an intensive resource home provider.
Such criteria shall be based on the best interests of the child and
include an assessment of the child's past and current level of
functioning as well as a determination that the child's treatment plan
and developmental needs are consistent with the placement plan;
(c) Establish a policy for placement of children with high needs in
intensive resource homes, including a process for matching the child's
needs with the provider's skills and expertise;
(d) Establish a limit on the number and ages of children with high
needs that may be placed in an intensive resource home pursuant to the
pilot contract. Such limitation shall recognize that children with
externalizing behaviors are most likely to experience long-term
improvements in their behavior when care is provided in settings that
minimize exposure to peers with challenging behaviors;
(e) Identify one or more approved models of skill building for use
by intensive resource home providers, with the assistance of other
child welfare experts;
(f) Specify the training and consultation requirements that support
the models of service;
(g) Establish a system of supports, including clinical consultation
and oversight for intensive resource homes;
(h) Develop a tiered payment system, by September 30, 2008, which
may include a stipend to the provider, which takes into account the
additional responsibilities intensive resource home providers have with
regard to the children placed in their care. Until such time as the
department has developed the tiered payment system, money for
exceptional cost plans shall be used only for special services or
supplies provided to the child and shall not be used to reimburse the
provider for services he or she provides to the child. A stipend of
not more than five hundred dollars per month may be used to reimburse
the provider for services he or she provides directly to the child;
(i) Establish clearly defined responsibilities of intensive
resource home providers, who have an intensive resource home contract
including responsibilities to promote permanency and connections with
birth parents; and
(j) Develop a process for annual performance reviews of intensive
resource home providers.
(4) Contracts between the department and an intensive resource home
provider shall include a statement of work focusing on achieving
stability in placement and measuring improved permanency outcomes and
shall specify at least the following elements:
(a) The model of treatment and care to be provided;
(b) The training and ongoing professional consultation to be
provided;
(c) The method for determining any additional supports to be
provided to an eligible child or the intensive resource home provider;
(d) The desired outcomes to be measured;
(e) A reasonable and efficient process for seeking a modification
of the contract;
(f) The rate and terms of payment under the contract; and
(g) The term of the contract and the processes for an annual
performance review of the intensive resource home provider and an
annual assessment of the child.
(5) ((Beginning on or before October 1, 2008,)) The department
shall begin the selection of, and negotiation of contracts with,
intensive resource home providers in the selected pilot sites when
specific funds have been appropriated by the legislature for
implementation of the intensive resource home pilot.
(6) Nothing in chapter 281, Laws of 2008 gives a provider eligible
under this section the right to a contract under the intensive resource
home pilot, and nothing in chapter 281, Laws of 2008 gives a provider
that has a contract under the pilot a right to have a child or children
placed in the home pursuant to the contract.
(7) "Intensive resource home provider" means a provider who meets
the eligibility criteria developed by the department under this section
and who has an intensive resource home pilot contract with the
department.
(8) ((The department shall report to the governor and the
legislature by January 30, 2009, on the implementation of the pilot,
including how the pilot fits within the continuum of out-of-home care
options. Based on the experiences and lessons learned from
implementation of the pilot, the department shall recommend a process
and timeline for expanding the pilot and implementing it statewide.
The department shall report to the governor and the appropriate members
of the legislature by September 1, 2009, on the expansion, and shall
identify the essential elements of the intensive resource home pilot
that should be addressed or replicated if the pilot is expanded.
(9))) The department shall operate this pilot using only funds
appropriated specifically for the operation of this pilot. The term
"specifically for the operation of this pilot" includes only those
costs associated with the following: The administration of the pilot,
the stipend to eligible intensive resource home providers, training for
the providers, consultation for the providers, and program review
consultation.

--- END ---