BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.685 and 1993 c 419 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of this section, any alien offender
committed to the custody of the department under the sentencing reform
act of 1981, chapter 9.94A RCW, who has been found by the United States
attorney general to be subject to a final order of deportation or
exclusion, may be placed on conditional release status and released to
the immigration and ((naturalization service)) customs enforcement
agency for deportation at any time prior to the expiration of the
offender's term of confinement. Conditional release shall continue
until the expiration of the statutory maximum sentence provided by law
for the crime or crimes of which the offender was convicted. If the
offender has multiple current convictions, the statutory maximum
sentence allowed by law for each crime shall run concurrently.
(2) No offender may be released under this section unless the
secretary or the secretary's designee finds (([finds])) that such
release is in the best interests of the state of Washington((.
Further, releases under this section may occur only with the approval
of the sentencing court and the prosecuting attorney of the county of
conviction)) and has reached an agreement with the immigration and
customs enforcement agency that the alien offender placed on
conditional release status will be detained in total confinement at a
facility operated by the immigration and customs enforcement agency
pending the offender's return to the country of origin or other
location designated in the final deportation or exclusion order.
(3) No offender may be released under this section who is serving
a sentence for a violent offense or sex offense, as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, or any other offense that is a crime against a person.
(4) The unserved portion of the term of confinement of any offender
released under this section shall be tolled at the time the offender is
released to the immigration and ((naturalization service)) customs
enforcement agency for deportation. Upon the release of an offender to
the immigration and ((naturalization service)) customs enforcement
agency, the department shall issue a warrant for the offender's arrest
within the United States. This warrant shall remain in effect until
the expiration of the offender's conditional release.
(5) Upon arrest of an offender, the department shall, upon making
a finding that it is in the best interest of the state, seek
extradition as necessary and the offender ((shall)) may be returned to
the department for completion of the unserved portion of the offender's
term of total confinement. If returned, the offender shall also be
required to fully comply with all the terms and conditions of the
sentence.
(6) Alien offenders released to the immigration and
((naturalization service)) customs enforcement agency for deportation
under this section are not thereby relieved of their obligation to pay
restitution or other legal financial obligations ordered by the
sentencing court.
(7) Any offender released pursuant to this section who returns
illegally to the United States may not thereafter be released again
pursuant to this section.
(8) The secretary is authorized to take all reasonable actions to
implement this section and shall assist federal authorities in
prosecuting alien offenders who may illegally reenter the United States
and enter the state of Washington.

--- END ---