BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.72.020 and 2003 c 111 s 1803 are each amended to
read as follows:
Upon receipt of a proposed initiative measure, and before giving it
a serial number, the secretary of state shall submit a copy thereof to
the office of the code reviser, the attorney general's office, and the
office of financial management, and give notice to the sponsor of such
transmittal. Upon receipt of the measure, the assistant code reviser
to whom it has been assigned may confer with the sponsor and shall,
within ((seven)) fifteen working days from its receipt, review the
proposal and recommend to the sponsor such revision or alteration of
the measure as may be deemed necessary and appropriate. Upon receipt
of the measure, the attorney general's office shall draft an informal
opinion letter, as to the legal effect of the initiative as proposed.
The informal opinion letter of the attorney general's office shall be
transmitted to the initiative sponsor and the chairpersons and ranking
minority members of the judiciary committees of the senate and the
house of representatives, within fifteen working days of the attorney
general's receipt of the measure. Upon receipt of the measure, the
office of financial management shall prepare a fiscal note. The fiscal
note shall be sent to the initiative sponsor and the chairpersons and
ranking minority members of the ways and means committees of the senate
and the house of representatives within fifteen working days of the
office of financial management's receipt of the measure. The
recommendations of the code reviser's office and attorney general's
office are advisory only, and the sponsor may accept or reject them in
whole or in part. The code reviser shall issue a certificate of review
certifying that he or she has reviewed the measure and that any
recommendations have been communicated to the sponsor. The certificate
must be issued whether or not the sponsor accepts such recommendations.
Within ((fifteen)) twenty-five working days after notification of
((submittal)) submission of the proposed measure to the code reviser's
office, the sponsor, if he or she desires to proceed with sponsorship,
shall file the measure together with the certificate of review with the
secretary of state for assignment of a serial number, and the secretary
of state shall then submit to the code reviser's office a certified
copy of the measure filed. Upon submission of the proposal to the
secretary of state for assignment of a serial number, the secretary of
state shall refuse to make such assignment unless the proposal is
accompanied by a certificate of review.

--- END ---