BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.64 RCW
to read as follows:
For real property, after a certificate of delinquency has been
issued thereon and prior to the day of the sale, no change in ownership
of the real property may be made until all moneys due under the
certificate of delinquency are paid in full.

--- END ---