BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 44.28.010 and 1996 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The joint legislative audit and review committee is created, which
shall consist of eight senators and eight representatives from the
legislature. The senate members of the joint committee shall be
appointed by the president of the senate, and the house members of the
joint committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not
more than four members from each house shall be from the same political
party. Members shall be appointed before the close of each regular
session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year. ((If before
the close of a regular session during an odd-numbered year, the
governor issues a proclamation convening the legislature into special
session, or the legislature by resolution convenes the legislature into
special session, following such regular session, then such appointments
shall be made as a matter of closing business of such special session.
Members shall be subject to confirmation, as to the senate members by
the senate, and as to the house members by the house. In the event of
a failure to appoint or confirm joint committee members, the members of
the joint committee from either house in which there is a failure to
appoint or confirm shall be elected by the members of such house.))

Sec. 2 RCW 44.28.020 and 1996 c 288 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term of office of the members of the joint committee ((who
continue to be members of the senate and house shall be from the close
of the session in which they were appointed or elected as provided in
RCW 44.28.010 until the close of the next regular session during an
odd-numbered year or special session following such regular session,
or, in the event that such appointments or elections are not made,
until the close of the next regular session during an odd-numbered year
during which successors are appointed or elected. The term of office
of joint committee members who do not continue to be members of the
senate and house ceases upon the convening of the next regular session
of the legislature during an odd-numbered year after their
confirmation, election or appointment)) shall be two years, ending two
years from the date of appointment or when a member is no longer a
member of the house from which he or she was appointed, except that
members shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed.
Vacancies on the joint committee shall be filled ((by appointment by
the remaining members. All such vacancies shall be filled from the
same political party and from the same house as the member whose seat
was vacated)) from the same political party and from the same house as
the member whose seat was vacated. Senate vacancies shall be filled
through appointment by the president of the senate, and house vacancies
shall be filled through appointment by the speaker of the house.

Sec. 3 RCW 44.28.083 and 1996 c 288 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((During the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered
year, beginning with 1997)) At the conclusion of the regular
legislative session of each odd-numbered year, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall develop and approve a performance
audit work plan for the ((subsequent sixteen to twenty-four-month
period and an overall work plan that identifies state agency programs
for which formal evaluation appears necessary)) ensuing biennium. The
biennial work plan may be modified, as necessary, at the conclusion of
other legislative sessions to reflect actions taken by the legislature
and the joint committee. The work plan shall include a description of
each performance audit, and the cost of completing the audits on the
work plan shall be limited to the funds appropriated to the joint
committee. Approved performance audit work plans shall be transmitted
to the entire legislature by July 1st following the conclusion of each
regular session of an odd-numbered year and as soon as practical
following other legislative sessions.
(2) Among the factors to be considered in preparing the work plans
are:
(a) Whether a program newly created or significantly altered by the
legislature warrants continued oversight because (i) the fiscal impact
of the program is significant, or (ii) the program represents a
relatively high degree of risk in terms of reaching the stated goals
and objectives for that program;
(b) Whether implementation of an existing program has failed to
meet its goals and objectives by any significant degree; ((and))
(c) Whether a follow-up audit would help ensure that previously
identified recommendations for improvements were being implemented; and
(d) Whether an assignment for the joint committee to conduct a
performance audit has been mandated in legislation.
(((2) The project description for each performance audit must
include start and completion dates, the proposed approach, and cost
estimates.))
(3) The legislative auditor may consult with the chairs and staff
of appropriate legislative committees, the state auditor, and the
director of financial management in developing the performance audit
work plan.
(((4) The performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may
include proposals to employ contract resources. As conditions warrant,
the performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may be
amended from time to time. All performance audit work plans shall be
transmitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
senate and the house of representatives no later than the sixtieth day
of the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered year, beginning
with 1997. All overall work plans shall be transmitted to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and the house of
representatives.))

Sec. 4 RCW 44.28.088 and 2005 c 319 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When the legislative auditor has completed a performance audit
authorized in the performance audit work plan, the legislative auditor
shall transmit the preliminary performance audit report to the affected
state agency or local government and the office of financial management
for comment. The agency or local government and the office of
financial management shall provide any response to the legislative
auditor within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary performance
audit report unless a different time period is approved by the joint
committee. The legislative auditor shall incorporate the response of
the agency or local government and the office of financial management
into the final performance audit report.
(2) ((Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,))
Before releasing the results of a performance audit to the legislature
or the public, the legislative auditor shall submit the preliminary
performance audit report to the joint committee for its review,
comments, and final recommendations. Any comments by the joint
committee must be included as a separate addendum to the final
performance audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation of the
review, comments, and recommendations of the joint committee, the
legislative auditor shall transmit the final performance audit report
to the affected agency or local government, the director of financial
management, the leadership of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the appropriate standing committees of the house
of representatives and the senate and shall publish the results and
make the report available to the public. For purposes of this section,
"leadership of the senate and the house of representatives" means the
speaker of the house, the majority leaders of the senate and the house
of representatives, the minority leaders of the senate and the house of
representatives, the caucus chairs of both major political parties of
the senate and the house of representatives, and the floor leaders of
both major political parties of the senate and the house of
representatives.
(((3) If contracted to manage a transportation-related performance
audit under RCW 44.75.090, before releasing the results of a
performance audit originally directed by the transportation performance
audit board to the legislature or the public, the legislative auditor
shall submit the preliminary performance audit report to the
transportation performance audit board for review and comments solely
on the management of the audit. Any comments by the transportation
performance audit board must be included as a separate addendum to the
final performance audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation
of the review and comments of the transportation performance audit
board, the legislative auditor shall transmit the final performance
audit report to the affected agency or local government, the director
of financial management, the leadership of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the appropriate standing committees of the house
of representatives and the senate and shall publish the results and
make the report available to the public.))

Sec. 5 RCW 44.28.097 and 1996 c 288 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
All agency and local government reports concerning program
performance, including administrative review, quality control, and
other internal audit or performance reports, as requested by the joint
committee, shall be furnished by the agency or local government
requested to provide such report.

Sec. 6 RCW 44.28.110 and 1955 c 206 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the discharge of any duty herein imposed, the joint
committee or any personnel under its authority and its subcommittees
shall have the authority to examine and inspect all properties,
equipment, facilities, files, records, and accounts of any state
office, department, institution, board, committee, commission ((or)),
agency, or local government, and to administer oaths, issue subpoenas,
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers,
books, accounts, documents, and testimony, and to cause the deposition
of witnesses, either residing within or without the state, to be taken
in the manner prescribed by laws for taking depositions in civil
actions in the superior courts.
(2) The authority in this section extends to accessing any
confidential records needed to discharge the joint committee's
performance audit duties. However, access to confidential records for
the purpose of conducting performance audits does not change their
confidential nature, and any existing confidentiality requirements
shall remain in force and be similarly respected by the joint committee
and its staff.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 44.28.030 (Continuation of memberships and powers) and 1996
c 288 s 5, 1955 c 206 s 6, & 1951 c 43 s 13; and
(2) RCW 44.28.161 (Transportation-related performance audits) and
2005 c 319 s 25 & 2003 c 362 s 13.

--- END ---