BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.64.080 and 2004 c 79 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The court shall examine each application for judgment foreclosing
tax lien, and if defense (specifying in writing the particular cause of
objection) be offered by any person interested in any of the lands or
lots to the entry of judgment against the same, the court shall hear
and determine the matter in a summary manner, without other pleadings,
and shall pronounce judgment as the right of the case may be; or the
court may, in its discretion, continue such individual cases, wherein
defense is offered, to such time as may be necessary, in order to
secure substantial justice to the contestants therein; but in all other
cases the court shall proceed to determine the matter in a summary
manner as above specified. In all judicial proceedings of any kind for
the collection of taxes, and interest and costs thereon, all amendments
which by law can be made in any personal action pending in such court
shall be allowed, and no assessments of property or charge for any of
the taxes shall be considered illegal on account of any irregularity in
the tax list or assessment rolls or on account of the assessment rolls
or tax list not having been made, completed or returned within the time
required by law, or on account of the property having been charged or
listed in the assessment or tax lists without name, or in any other
name than that of the owner, and no error or informality in the
proceedings of any of the officers connected with the assessment,
levying or collection of the taxes, shall vitiate or in any manner
affect the tax or the assessment thereof, and any irregularities or
informality in the assessment rolls or tax lists or in any of the
proceedings connected with the assessment or levy of such taxes or any
omission or defective act of any officer or officers connected with the
assessment or levying of such taxes, may be, in the discretion of the
court, corrected, supplied and made to conform to the law by the court.
The court shall give judgment for such taxes, interest and costs as
shall appear to be due upon the several lots or tracts described in the
notice of application for judgment or complaint, and such judgment
shall be a several judgment against each tract or lot or part of a
tract or lot for each kind of tax included therein, including all
interest and costs, and the court shall order and direct the clerk to
make and enter an order for the sale of such real property against
which judgment is made, or vacate and set aside the certificate of
delinquency or make such other order or judgment as in the law or
equity may be just. The order shall be signed by the judge of the
superior court, shall be delivered to the county treasurer, and shall
be full and sufficient authority for him or her to proceed to sell the
property for the sum as set forth in the order and to take such further
steps in the matter as are provided by law. The county treasurer shall
immediately after receiving the order and judgment of the court proceed
to sell the property as provided in this chapter to the highest and
best bidder for cash. The acceptable minimum bid shall be the total
amount of taxes, interest, and costs. All sales shall be made at a
location in the county on a date and time (except Saturdays, Sundays,
or legal holidays) as the county treasurer may direct, and shall
continue from day to day (Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays
excepted) during the same hours until all lots or tracts are sold,
after first giving notice of the time, and place where such sale is to
take place for ten days successively by posting notice thereof in three
public places in the county, one of which shall be in the office of the
treasurer. The notice shall be substantially in the following form:

TAX JUDGMENT SALE

Public notice is hereby given that pursuant to real property tax
judgment of the superior court of the county of . . . . . . in the
state of Washington, and an order of sale duly issued by the court,
entered the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings for
foreclosure of tax liens upon real property, as per provisions of law,
I shall on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., at . . . . o'clock
a.m., at . . . . . . in the city of . . . . . ., and county of
. . . . . ., state of Washington, sell the real property to the highest
and best bidder for cash, to satisfy the full amount of taxes, interest
and costs adjudged to be due.
In witness whereof, I have hereunto affixed my hand and seal this
. . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
Treasurer of . . . . . . . . . . . .
county.

No county officer or employee shall directly or indirectly be a
purchaser of such property at such sale.
If any buildings or improvements are upon an area encompassing more
than one tract or lot, the same must be advertised and sold as a single
unit.
If the highest amount bid for any such separate unit tract or lot
is in excess of the minimum bid due upon the whole property included in
the certificate of delinquency, the excess shall be refunded following
payment of all recorded water-sewer district liens, on application
therefor, to the record owner of the property. Within thirty days of
a foreclosure sale of any property that is sold in excess of the
minimum bid, the county treasurer must mail the record owner an
application for the distribution of the excess proceeds to the record
owner's address on file in the office of the county treasurer. The
record owner of the property is the person who held title on the date
of issuance of the certificate of delinquency. Assignments of
interests, deeds, or other documents executed or recorded after filing
the certificate of delinquency shall not affect the payment of excess
funds to the record owner. In the event no claim for the excess is
received by the county treasurer within three years after the date of
the sale he or she shall at expiration of the three year period deposit
such excess in the current expense fund of the county which shall
extinguish all claims by any owner to the excess funds. The county
treasurer shall execute to the purchaser of any piece or parcel of land
a tax deed. The deed so made by the county treasurer, under the
official seal of his or her office, shall be recorded in the same
manner as other conveyances of real property, and shall vest in the
grantee, his or her heirs and assigns the title to the property therein
described, without further acknowledgment or evidence of such
conveyance, and shall be substantially in the following form:

State of Washington |
|
>
|
|

ss.

County of . . . . . . . . . . . .

This indenture, made this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . . .,
between . . . . . ., as treasurer of . . . . . . county, state of
Washington, party of the first part, and . . . . . ., party of the
second part:
Witnesseth, that, whereas, at a public sale of real property held
on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., pursuant to a real property
tax judgment entered in the superior court in the county of . . . . . .
on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . ., in proceedings to foreclose
tax liens upon real property and an order of sale duly issued by the
court, . . . . . . duly purchased in compliance with the laws of the
state of Washington, the following described real property, to wit:
(Here place description of real property conveyed) and that the
. . . . . . has complied with the laws of the state of Washington
necessary to entitle (him, or her or them) to a deed for the real
property.
Now, therefore, know ye, that, I . . . . . ., county treasurer of
the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, in consideration of the
premises and by virtue of the statutes of the state of Washington, in
such cases provided, do hereby grant and convey unto . . . . . ., his
or her heirs and assigns, forever, the real property hereinbefore
described.
Given under my hand and seal of office this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., A.D. . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . .
County Treasurer.

--- END ---