BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.05.105 and 1967 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No certificate of authority shall be granted to a foreign or
alien applicant that has not actively transacted for three years the
classes of insurance for which it seeks to be admitted((; except, the
foregoing shall)).
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the following:
(a) Any subsidiary of a seasoned, reputable insurer that has held
a certificate of authority in this state for at least three years; or
(b) Any applicant that:
(i) Has surplus of not less than twenty-five million dollars; and
(ii) Has made a deposit with the commissioner in the amount of one
million dollars for the sole benefit of the applicant's Washington
policyholders.
(3) The commissioner shall release the deposit to an authorized
insurer who originally met the requirement in subsection (2)(b)(ii) of
this section, in accordance with chapter 48.16 RCW, if:
(a) The certificate of authority was issued at least three years
prior to application for release of the deposit; and
(b) The insurer is in good standing with the commissioner.

--- END ---