BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 30.22.210 and 1981 c 192 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to require
any financial institution to make any payment from an account to a
depositor, or any trust or P.O.D. account beneficiary, or any other
person claiming an interest in any funds deposited in the account, if
the financial institution has actual knowledge of the existence of a
dispute between the depositors, beneficiaries, or other persons
concerning their respective rights of ownerships to the funds contained
in, or proposed to be withdrawn, or previously withdrawn from the
account, or in the event the financial institution is otherwise
uncertain as to who is entitled to the funds pursuant to the contract
of deposit. In any such case, the financial institution may, without
liability, notify, in writing, all depositors, beneficiaries, or other
persons claiming an interest in the account of either its uncertainty
as to who is entitled to the distributions or the existence of any
dispute, and may also, without liability, refuse to disburse any funds
contained in the account to any depositor, and/or trust or P.O.D.
account beneficiary thereof, and/or other persons claiming an interest
therein, until such time as either:
(((1))) (a) All such depositors and/or beneficiaries have
consented, in writing, to the requested payment; or
(((2))) (b) The payment is authorized or directed by a court of
proper jurisdiction.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, if a
financial institution reasonably believes that financial exploitation
of a vulnerable adult, as defined in RCW 74.34.020, has occurred, has
been attempted, or is being attempted, the financial institution may,
but is not required to, refuse a transaction requiring disbursal of
funds contained in the account of the vulnerable adult, an account on
which the vulnerable adult is a beneficiary, including a trust or
guardianship account, or an account of a person suspected of
perpetrating financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult pending an
investigation by the financial institution, the department of social
and health services, or law enforcement. A financial institution may
refuse to disburse funds under this subsection if the department of
social and health services, law enforcement, or the prosecuting
attorney's office, or a professional guardian as defined in RCW
11.88.008 appointed by the court for the vulnerable adult, if any,
provides information to the financial institution demonstrating that it
is reasonable to believe that exploitation of a vulnerable adult, as
defined in RCW 74.34.020, has occurred, has been attempted, or is being
attempted.
(a) A financial institution is not required to refuse to disburse
funds when provided with information alleging that financial
exploitation has occurred, has been attempted, or is being attempted,
but may determine whether to do so based on the information it has and
within its discretion. A financial institution and its employees are
immune from criminal, civil, and administrative liability for its good
faith determination of whether or not to refuse to disburse funds based
on information that financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult has
occurred, has been attempted, or is being attempted, and for its
actions taken in furtherance of such determination.
(b) A financial institution that refuses to disburse funds based
upon a reasonable belief that financial exploitation of a vulnerable
adult has occurred, has been attempted, or is being attempted, will
notify all depositors, beneficiaries, or other persons claiming an
interest therein for whom contact information is available to the
institution, and any guardian appointed under chapter 11.88 RCW for the
vulnerable adult, orally or in writing and shall report the incident to
the adult protective services division of the department of social and
health services and local law enforcement. Any refusal to disburse
funds as authorized by this section based on a financial institution's
reason to believe that financial exploitation has occurred, has been
attempted, or is being attempted will expire upon the sooner of:
(i) Five business days after the date on which the financial
institution first refused to disburse the funds, unless sooner
terminated by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or
(ii) At the time that the financial institution is satisfied, that
the disbursement will not result in financial exploitation.
(c) A court of competent jurisdiction may enter an order extending
a financial institution's refusal to disburse funds based on reason to
believe that financial exploitation has occurred, has been attempted,
or is being attempted and/or order other protective relief as
necessary, as authorized by RCW 7.40.010 or 74.34.130.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.34.035 and 2003 c 230 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When there is reasonable cause to believe that abandonment,
abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a vulnerable adult has
occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately report to the
department.
(2) When there is reason to suspect that sexual assault has
occurred, mandated reporters shall immediately report to the
appropriate law enforcement agency and to the department.
(3) When there is reason to suspect that physical assault has
occurred or there is reasonable cause to believe that an act has caused
fear of imminent harm:
(a) Mandated reporters shall immediately report to the department;
and
(b) Mandated reporters shall immediately report to the appropriate
law enforcement agency, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(4) A mandated reporter is not required to report to a law
enforcement agency, unless requested by the injured vulnerable adult or
his or her legal representative or family member, an incident of
physical assault between vulnerable adults that causes minor bodily
injury and does not require more than basic first aid, unless:
(a) The injury appears on the back, face, head, neck, chest,
breasts, groin, inner thigh, buttock, genital, or anal area;
(b) There is a fracture;
(c) There is a pattern of physical assault between the same
vulnerable adults or involving the same vulnerable adults; or
(d) There is an attempt to choke a vulnerable adult.
(5) Mandated reporters shall report the death of a vulnerable adult
to the medical examiner or coroner having jurisdiction pursuant to RCW
68.50.020 in the most expeditious manner possible, when the
circumstances indicate that death was caused by, or suspected to be
caused by, abuse, neglect, or abandonment by another person. The
mandated reporter shall also report the death, in the most expeditious
manner possible, to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction and
to the department. A mandated reporter is not relieved from the
reporting requirement provisions of this section by the existence of a
previously signed death certificate. The death of a vulnerable adult,
where abuse, neglect, or abandonment caused or contributed to the
death, is a death caused by unnatural or unlawful means and the body
shall be the jurisdiction of the coroner or medical examiner pursuant
to RCW 68.50.010.
(6) Permissive reporters may report to the department or a law
enforcement agency when there is reasonable cause to believe that a
vulnerable adult is being or has been abandoned, abused, financially
exploited, or neglected.
(((6))) (7) No facility, as defined by this chapter, agency
licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, or
facility or agency under contract with the department to provide care
for vulnerable adults may develop policies or procedures that interfere
with the reporting requirements of this chapter.
(((7))) (8) Each report, oral or written, must contain as much as
possible of the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person making the report;
(b) The name and address of the vulnerable adult and the name of
the facility or agency providing care for the vulnerable adult;
(c) The name and address of the legal guardian or alternate
decision maker;
(d) The nature and extent of the abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;
(e) Any history of previous abandonment, abuse, financial
exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect;
(f) The identity of the alleged perpetrator, if known; and
(g) Other information that may be helpful in establishing the
extent of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or the
cause of death of the deceased vulnerable adult.
(((8))) (9) Unless there is a judicial proceeding or the person
consents, the identity of the person making the report under this
section is confidential.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A financial institution, as defined in RCW 30.22.040 and
30.22.041, must ensure that existing employees who have contact with
customers and account information on a regular basis and as part of
their job receive training concerning the financial exploitation of
vulnerable adults within one year of the effective date of this
section, and must thereafter provide the training to any new employees
who have contact with account information as part of their new employee
orientation. The training must include recognition of indicators of
financial exploitation, how employees may report suspected financial
exploitation to the department and to law enforcement as permissive
reporters, and what steps employees may take to prevent suspected
financial exploitation, consistent with the employing institution's
agreement with customers, or as otherwise authorized by law. The
attorney general's office and the department will develop a
standardized training that financial institutions may offer, or the
financial institution may develop its own training.
(2) Financial institutions may provide access to or copies of
records which are relevant to suspected financial exploitation or
attempted financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult to the
department, law enforcement, or the prosecuting attorney's office,
either as part of a referral to the department, law enforcement, or
prosecuting attorney's office, or upon request of the department, law
enforcement, or prosecuting attorney's office as part of an
investigation. The records may include those relating to the most
recent transaction or transactions which may comprise financial
exploitation, as well as historical records.
(3) No criminal, civil, or administrative liability shall attach to
any financial institution or its employees for conduct relating to the
reporting or prevention of financial exploitation or in providing
access to or copies of records to the department, law enforcement, or
prosecuting attorney's office as provided in this chapter.

--- END ---