BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the December
2009 state government performance review, "Opportunities for
Washington," outlined opportunities for increased revenue relating to
the sale of liquor and its distribution. The performance review
evaluated six alternatives to the current system of wholesale and
retail liquor sales and suggested that the state could increase revenue
by as much as two hundred seventy-seven million dollars over five years
by changing the current model. The legislature declares that it cannot
change the method of liquor sales that has been in place since 1933
without thorough and comprehensive study of the issue.
(2) The liquor control board must, in consultation with the office
of financial management and the appropriate legislative committees,
examine methods to increase efficiency and revenue through the sale of
liquor in this state. The liquor control board must examine the six
alternatives identified in the performance review and investigate other
options it deems appropriate. Support for this study must be provided
by the office of financial management and appropriate legislative
staff. The liquor control board must report its findings to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2010.

--- END ---