BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.590 and 2009 c 461 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey or annual report under RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351,
82.32.545, 82.32.560, 82.32.570, 82.32.610, 82.32.620, 82.32.630,
82.32.632, 82.32.645, 82.32.650, ((82.32.630, 82.32.610,)) 82.60.070,
82.63.020, 82.82.020, ((82.32.632,)) or 82.74.040 by the due date was
the result of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the
department ((shall)) must extend the time for filing the survey or
report. ((Such)) The extension ((shall be)) is for a period of thirty
days from the date the department issues its written notification to
the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under this section.
The department may grant additional extensions as it deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
((shall)) must be guided by rules adopted by the department for the
waiver or cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely
payment of any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer.
(3)(a) Subject to the conditions in this subsection (3), a taxpayer
who fails to file an annual report or annual survey required under any
of the statutes listed in subsection (1) of this section by the due
date of the report or survey is entitled to an extension of the due
date. A request for an extension under this subsection (3) must be
made in writing to the department.
(b) To qualify for an extension under this subsection (3), a
taxpayer must have filed all annual reports and surveys, if any, due in
prior years under the statutes listed in subsection (1) of this section
by their respective due dates, beginning with annual reports and
surveys due in calendar year 2010.
(c) An extension under this subsection (3) is for ninety days from
the original due date of the annual report or survey.
(d) No taxpayer may be granted more than one ninety-day extension
under this subsection (3).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies to annual
surveys and reports due under any of the statutes listed in RCW
82.32.590(1) in calendar year 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---