BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.42.020 and 2005 c 398 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of
transportation.
(2) "Erect" means to construct, build, raise, assemble, place,
affix, attach, create, paint, draw, or in any other way bring into
being or establish.
(3) "Interstate system" means any state highway which is or does
become part of the national system of interstate and defense highways
as described in section 103(d) of title 23, United States Code.
(4) "Maintain" means to allow to exist.
(5) "Person" means this state or any public or private corporation,
firm, partnership, association, as well as any individual or
individuals.
(6) "Primary system" means any state highway which is or does
become part of the federal-aid primary system as described in section
103(b) of title 23, United States Code.
(7) "Scenic system" means (a) any state highway within any public
park, federal forest area, public beach, public recreation area, or
national monument, (b) any state highway or portion thereof outside the
boundaries of any incorporated city or town designated by the
legislature as a part of the scenic system, or (c) any state highway or
portion thereof outside the boundaries of any incorporated city or town
designated by the legislature as a part of the scenic and recreational
highway system except for the sections of highways specifically
excluded in RCW 47.42.025 or located within areas zoned by the
governing county for predominantly commercial and industrial uses, and
having development visible to the highway, as determined by the
department.
(8) "Sign" means any outdoor sign, display, device, figure,
painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or other thing
that is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform, any part of
the advertising or informative contents of which is visible from any
place on the main-traveled way of the interstate system or other state
highway. "Sign" does not include a display authorized under RCW
47.36.030(3) promoting a local agency sponsored event that does not
include advertising.
(9) "Commercial and industrial areas" means any area zoned
commercial or industrial by a county or municipal code, or if unzoned
or zoned for general uses by a county or municipal code, that area
occupied by three or more separate and distinct commercial or
industrial activities, or any combination thereof, within a space of
five hundred feet and the area within five hundred feet of such
activities on both sides of the highway. The area shall be measured
from the outer edges of the regularly used buildings, parking lots, or
storage or processing areas of the commercial or industrial activity
and not from the property lines of the parcels upon which the
activities are located. Measurements shall be along or parallel to the
edge of the main traveled way of the highway. The following shall not
be considered commercial or industrial activities:
(a) Agricultural, forestry, grazing, farming, and related
activities, including, but not limited to, wayside fresh produce
stands;
(b) Transient or temporary activities;
(c) Railroad tracks and minor sidings;
(d) Signs;
(e) Activities more than six hundred and sixty feet from the
nearest edge of the right-of-way;
(f) Activities conducted in a building principally used as a
residence.
If any commercial or industrial activity that has been used in defining
or delineating an unzoned area ceases to operate for a period of six
continuous months, any signs located within the former unzoned area
become nonconforming and shall not be maintained by any person.
(10) "Roadside area information panel or display" means a panel or
display located so as not to be readable from the main traveled way,
erected in a safety rest area, scenic overlook, or similar roadside
area, for providing motorists with information in the specific interest
of the traveling public.
(11) "Temporary agricultural directional sign" means a sign on
private property adjacent to a state highway right-of-way, or on a
state highway right-of-way, to provide directional information to
places of business offering for sale seasonal agricultural products on
the property where the sale is taking place.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.42.120 and 1999 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no sign
except a sign of type 1 or 2 or those type 3 signs that advertise
activities conducted upon the properties where the signs are located,
may be erected or maintained without a permit issued by the department.
Application for a permit shall be made to the department on forms
furnished by it. The forms shall contain a statement that the owner or
lessee of the land in question has consented thereto. For type 8 signs
(temporary agricultural directional signs), when the land in question
is owned by the department, the consent statement must be reviewed and,
if the sign does not create a safety concern, be approved within five
days of application by the department. The application shall be
accompanied by a fee established by department rule to be deposited
with the state treasurer to the credit of the motor vehicle fund.
Permits shall be for the remainder of the calendar year in which they
are issued, and accompanying fees shall not be prorated for fractions
of the year. Permits must be renewed annually through a certification
process established by department rule. Advertising copy may be
changed at any time without the payment of an additional fee.
Assignment of permits in good standing is effective only upon receipt
of written notice of assignment by the department. A permit may be
revoked after hearing if the department finds that any statement made
in the application or annual certification process was false or
misleading, or that the sign covered is not in good general condition
and in a reasonable state of repair, or is otherwise in violation of
this chapter, if the false or misleading information has not been
corrected and the sign has not been brought into compliance with this
chapter or rules adopted under it within thirty days after written
notification.

--- END ---