BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.82.070 and 2001 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any money paid to any county road fund may be used for the
construction, alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance of county
roads and bridges thereon and for wharves necessary for ferriage of
motor vehicle traffic, and for ferries, and for the acquiring,
operating, and maintaining of machinery, equipment, quarries, or pits
for the extraction of materials, and for the cost of establishing
county roads, acquiring rights-of-way therefor, and expenses for the
operation of the county engineering office, and for any of the
following programs when directly related to county road purposes: (1)
Insurance; (2) self-insurance programs; and (3) risk management
programs; and for any other proper county road purpose. Such
expenditure may be made either independently or in conjunction with the
state or any city, town, or tax district within the county. County
road purposes include the construction, maintenance, or improvement of
park and ride lots. County road purposes also include the removal of
barriers to fish passage related to county roads, and include but are
not limited to the following activities associated with the removal of
these barriers: Engineering and technical services; stream bank
stabilization; streambed restoration; the placement of weirs, rock, or
woody debris; planting; and channel modification. County road funds
may be used beyond the county right-of-way for activities clearly
associated with removal of fish passage barriers that are the
responsibility of the county. Activities related to the removal of
barriers to fish passage performed beyond the county right-of-way must
not exceed twenty-five percent of the total cost of activities related
to fish barrier removal on any one project, and the total annual cost
of activities related to the removal of barriers to fish passage
performed beyond the county rights-of-way must not exceed one-half of
one percent of a county's annual road construction budget. The use of
county road funds beyond the county right-of-way for activities
associated with the removal of fish barriers is permissive, and wholly
within the discretion of the county legislative authority. The use of
county road funds beyond the county right-of-way for such activities
does not create or impose a legal duty upon a county for salmon
recovery work beyond the county right-of-way.

--- END ---