BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.39.010 and 1999 c 218 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created a scenic and recreational highway system.
Highways in this system shall be developed and maintained in accordance
with general standards for state highways of comparable classification
and usage.
Recognizing that the Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century
establishes a national "scenic byway" program that could benefit state
and local roadways, the Washington state scenic byway designation
program is revised to address state and local transportation routes.
Byways in this program must be designated and maintained in accordance
with the criteria developed by the department under this chapter.
However, a highway so designated under RCW 47.39.069 does not become
part of the scenic and recreational highway system unless approved by
the legislature. Corridors within the scenic and recreational highway
system that showcase the state's historic agricultural areas and
promote the maintenance and enhancement of agricultural areas may be
designated as agricultural scenic corridors.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.39.020 and 2009 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following portions of highways are designated as part of the
scenic and recreational highway system:
(1) State route number 2, beginning at the crossing of Woods creek
at the east city limits of Monroe, thence in an easterly direction by
way of Stevens pass to a junction with state route number 97 in the
vicinity of Peshastin; also
Beginning at the junction with state route number 17, in the
vicinity of Coulee City, thence easterly to the junction with state
route number 155;
(2) State route number 3, beginning at a junction with state route
number 101 in the vicinity of Shelton, thence northeasterly and
northerly to a junction with state route number 104 in the vicinity of
Port Gamble;
(3) State route number 4, beginning at the junction with state
route number 101, thence easterly through Cathlamet to Coal Creek road,
approximately .5 miles west of the Longview city limits;
(4) State route number 5, beginning at the junction with Starbird
Road in Snohomish county, thence northerly to the junction with Bow
Hill Road in Skagit county, to be designated as an agricultural scenic
corridor with appropriate signage;
(5) State route number 6, beginning at the junction with state
route number 101 in Raymond, thence easterly to the junction with state
route number 5, in the vicinity of Chehalis;
(((5))) (6) State route number 7, beginning at the junction with
state route number 12 in Morton, thence northerly to the junction with
state route number 507;
(((6))) (7) State route number 8, beginning at a junction with
state route number 12 in the vicinity of Elma, thence easterly to a
junction with state route number 101 near Tumwater;
(((7))) (8) State route number 9, beginning at the junction with
state route number 530 in Arlington, thence northerly to the end of the
route at the Canadian border;
(((8))) (9) State route number 10, beginning at Teanaway junction,
thence easterly to a junction with state route number 97 west of
Ellensburg;
(((9))) (10) State route number 11, beginning at the junction with
state route number 5 in the vicinity of Burlington, thence in a
northerly direction to the junction with state route number 5;
(((10))) (11) State route number 12, beginning at a junction with
a county road approximately 2.8 miles west of the crossing of the
Wynoochee river which is approximately 1.2 miles west of Montesano,
thence in an easterly direction to a junction with state route number
8 in the vicinity of Elma; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 5, thence easterly
by way of Morton, Randle, and Packwood to the junction with state route
number 410, approximately 3.5 miles west of Naches; also
Beginning at the junction with state route number 124 in the
vicinity of the Tri-Cities, thence easterly through Wallula and Touchet
to a junction with a county road approximately 2.4 miles west of a
junction with state route number 129 at Clarkston;
(((11))) (12) State route number 14, beginning at the crossing of
Gibbons creek approximately 0.9 miles east of Washougal, thence
easterly along the north bank of the Columbia river to a point in the
vicinity of Plymouth;
(((12))) (13) State route number 17, beginning at a junction with
state route number 395 in the vicinity of Mesa, thence northerly to the
junction with state route number 97 in the vicinity of Brewster;
(((13))) (14) State route number 19, the Chimacum-Beaver Valley
road, beginning at the junction with state route number 104, thence
northerly to the junction with state route number 20;
(((14))) (15) State route number 20, beginning at the junction with
state route number 101 to the ferry zone in Port Townsend; also
Beginning at the Keystone ferry slip on Whidbey Island, thence
northerly and easterly to a junction with state route number 153
southeast of Twisp; also
Beginning at the junction of state route number 97 in the vicinity
of Okanogan, thence westerly across the Okanogan river to the junction
with state route number 215; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 97 near Tonasket,
thence easterly and southerly to a junction with state route number 2
at Newport;
(((15))) (16) State route number 25, beginning at the Spokane river
bridge, thence northerly through Cedonia, Gifford, Kettle Falls, and
Northport, to the Canadian border;
(((16))) (17) State route number 26, beginning at the Whitman
county boundary line, thence easterly by way of the vicinities of La
Crosse and Dusty to a junction with state route number 195 in the
vicinity of Colfax;
(((17))) (18) State route number 27, beginning at a junction with
state route number 195 in the vicinity of Pullman, thence northerly by
way of the vicinities of Palouse and Garfield to a junction with state
route number 271 in the vicinity of Oakesdale; also
From a junction with state route number 271 at Oakesdale, thence
northerly to the vicinity of Tekoa;
(((18))) (19) State route number 31, beginning at the junction with
state route number 20 in Tiger, thence northerly to the Canadian
border;
(((19))) (20) State route number 82, beginning at the junction with
state route number 395 south of the Tri-Cities area, thence southerly
to the end of the route at the Oregon border;
(((20))) (21) State route number 90, beginning at the junction with
East Sunset Way in the vicinity east of Issaquah, thence easterly to
Thorp road 9.0 miles west of Ellensburg;
(((21))) (22) State route number 97, beginning at the Oregon
border, in a northerly direction through Toppenish and Wapato to the
junction with state route number 82 at Union Gap; also
Beginning at the junction with state route number 10, 2.5 miles
north of Ellensburg, in a northerly direction to the junction with
state route number 2, 4.0 miles east of Leavenworth; also
Beginning at the junction of state route number 153 in the vicinity
south of Pateros, thence northerly by way of the vicinities of
Brewster, Okanogan, Omak, Riverside, Tonasket, and Oroville to the
international boundary line;
(((22))) (23) State route number 97 alternate, beginning at the
junction with state route number 2 in the vicinity of Monitor, thence
northerly to the junction with state route number 97, approximately 5.0
miles north of Chelan;
(((23))) (24) State route number 101, beginning at the Astoria-Megler bridge, thence north to Fowler street in Raymond; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 109 in the vicinity
of Queets, thence in a northerly, northeasterly, and easterly direction
by way of Forks to the junction with state route number 5 in the
vicinity of Olympia;
(((24))) (25) State route number 104, beginning at a junction with
state route number 101 in the vicinity south of Discovery bay, thence
in a southeasterly direction to the Kingston ferry crossing;
(((25))) (26) State route number 105, beginning at a junction with
state route number 101 at Raymond, thence westerly and northerly by way
of Tokeland and North Cove to the shore of Grays Harbor north of
Westport; also
Beginning at a junction with state route number 105 in the vicinity
south of Westport, thence northeasterly to a junction with state route
number 101 at Aberdeen;
(((26))) (27) State route number 109, beginning at a junction with
state route number 101 in Hoquiam to a junction with state route number
101 in the vicinity of Queets;
(((27))) (28) State route number 112, beginning at the easterly
boundary of the Makah Indian reservation, thence in an easterly
direction to the vicinity of Laird's corner on state route number 101;
(((28))) (29) State route number 116, beginning at the junction
with the Chimacum-Beaver Valley road, thence in an easterly direction
to Fort Flagler State Park;
(((29))) (30) State route number 119, beginning at the junction
with state route number 101 at Hoodsport, thence northwesterly to the
Mount Rose development intersection;
(((30))) (31) State route number 122, Harmony road, between the
junction with state route number 12 near Mayfield dam and the junction
with state route number 12 in Mossyrock;
(((31))) (32) State route number 123, beginning at the junction
with state route number 12 in the vicinity of Morton, thence northerly
to the junction with state route number 410;
(((32))) (33) State route number 129, beginning at the Oregon
border, thence northerly to the junction with state route number 12 in
Clarkston;
(((33))) (34) State route number 141, beginning at the junction
with state route number 14 in Bingen, thence northerly to the end of
the route at the Skamania county line;
(((34))) (35) State route number 142, beginning at the junction
with state route number 14 in Lyle, thence northeasterly to the
junction with state route number 97, .5 miles from Goldendale;
(((35))) (36) State route number 153, beginning at a junction with
state route number 97 in the vicinity of Pateros, thence in a northerly
direction to a junction with state route number 20 in the vicinity
south of Twisp;
(((36))) (37) State route number 155, beginning at a junction with
state route number 2 in the vicinity north of Coulee City, thence
northerly and westerly to the junction with state route number 215;
(((37))) (38) State route number 194, beginning at the Port of
Almota to the junction with state route number 195 in the vicinity of
Pullman;
(((38))) (39) State route number 195, beginning at the Washington-Idaho boundary line southeast of Uniontown, thence northwesterly and
northerly by way of the vicinity of Colton, Pullman, Colfax, Steptoe,
and Rosalia to the Whitman county boundary line;
(((39))) (40) State route number 202, beginning at the junction
with state route number 522, thence in an easterly direction to the
junction with state route number 90 in the vicinity of North Bend;
(((40))) (41) State route number 211, beginning at the junction
with state route number 2, thence northerly to the junction with state
route number 20 in the vicinity of Usk;
(((41))) (42) State route number 215, beginning at the junction of
state route number 20 in the vicinity of Okanogan, thence northeasterly
on the west side of the Okanogan river to a junction with state route
number 97 north of Omak;
(((42))) (43) State route number 231, beginning at the junction
with state route number 23, in the vicinity of Sprague, thence in a
northerly direction to the junction with state route number 2,
approximately 2.5 miles west of Reardan;
(((43))) (44) State route number 261, beginning at the junction
with state route number 12 in the vicinity of Delaney, thence
northwesterly to the junction with state route number 260;
(((44))) (45) State route number 262, beginning at the junction
with state route number 26, thence northeasterly to the junction with
state route number 17 between Moses Lake and Othello;
(((45))) (46) State route number 271, beginning at a junction with
state route number 27 in the vicinity of Oakesdale, thence
northwesterly to a junction with state route number 195 in the vicinity
south of Rosalia;
(((46))) (47) State route number 272, beginning at the junction
with state route number 195 in Colfax, thence easterly to the Idaho
state line, approximately 1.5 miles east of Palouse;
(((47))) (48) State route number 305, beginning at the Winslow
ferry dock to the junction with state route number 3 approximately 1.0
mile north of Poulsbo;
(((48))) (49) State route number 395, beginning at the north end of
the crossing of Mill creek in the vicinity of Colville, thence in a
northwesterly direction to a junction with state route number 20 at the
west end of the crossing over the Columbia river at Kettle Falls;
(((49))) (50) State route number 401, beginning at a junction with
state route number 101 at Point Ellice, thence easterly and northerly
to a junction with state route number 4 in the vicinity north of
Naselle;
(((50))) (51) State route number 410, beginning 4.0 miles east of
Enumclaw, thence in an easterly direction to the junction with state
route number 12, approximately 3.5 miles west of Naches;
(((51))) (52) State route number 501, beginning at the junction
with state route number 5 in the vicinity of Vancouver, thence
northwesterly on the New Lower River road around Vancouver Lake;
(((52))) (53) State route number 503, beginning at the junction
with state route number 500, thence northerly by way of Battle Ground
and Yale to the junction with state route number 5 in the vicinity of
Woodland;
(((53))) (54) State route number 504, beginning at a junction with
state route number 5 at Castle Rock, to the end of the route on
Johnston Ridge, approximately milepost 52;
(((54))) (55) State route number 505, beginning at the junction
with state route number 504, thence northwesterly by way of Toledo to
the junction with state route number 5;
(((55))) (56) State route number 508, beginning at the junction
with state route number 5, thence in an easterly direction to the
junction with state route number 7 in Morton;
(((56))) (57) State route number 525, beginning at the ferry toll
booth on Whidbey Island to a junction with state route number 20 east
of the Keystone ferry slip;
(((57))) (58) State route number 542, beginning at the junction
with state route number 5, thence easterly to the vicinity of Austin
pass in Whatcom county;
(((58))) (59) State route number 547, beginning at the junction
with state route number 542 in Kendall, thence northwesterly to the
junction with state route number 9 in the vicinity of the Canadian
border;
(((59))) (60) State route number 706, beginning at the junction
with state route number 7 in Elbe, in an easterly direction to the end
of the route at Mt. Rainier National Park;
(((60))) (61) State route number 821, beginning at a junction with
state route number 82 at the Yakima firing center interchange, thence
in a northerly direction to a junction with state route number 82 at
the Thrall road interchange;
(((61))) (62) State route number 971, Navarre Coulee road, between
the junction with state route number 97 and the junction with South
Lakeshore road;
(((62))) (63) Beginning at the Anacortes ferry landing, the
Washington state ferries Anacortes/San Juan Islands route, which
includes stops at Lopez, Shaw, Orcas, and San Juan Islands; and the
roads on San Juan and Orcas Islands as described in San Juan Island
county council resolution number 7, adopted February 5, 2008;
(((63))) (64) All Washington state ferry routes.

--- END ---