BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.55.181 and 2005 c 146 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to receive the permit review and approval process
created in this section, a small size and scale fish habitat
enhancement project must meet the criteria under (a) and (b) of this
subsection:
(a) A fish habitat enhancement project must be a project to
accomplish one or more of the following tasks:
(i) Elimination of instream human-made fish passage barriers,
including culvert repair and replacement;
(ii) Restoration of an eroded or unstable streambank employing the
principle of bioengineering, including limited use of rock as a
stabilization only at the toe of the bank, and with primary emphasis on
using native vegetation to control the erosive forces of flowing water;
((or))
(iii) Placement of woody debris or other instream structures that
benefit naturally reproducing fish stocks; or
(iv) Restoration of a stream side channel or riparian wetland area
less than one acre in size.
The department shall develop size or scale threshold tests to
determine if projects accomplishing any of these tasks should be
evaluated under the process created in this section or under other
project review and approval processes. A project proposal shall not be
reviewed under the process created in this section if the department
determines that the scale of the project raises concerns regarding
public health and safety; and
(b) A fish habitat enhancement project must be approved in one of
the following ways:
(i) By the department pursuant to chapter 77.95 or 77.100 RCW;
(ii) By the sponsor of a watershed restoration plan as provided in
chapter 89.08 RCW;
(iii) By the department as a department-sponsored fish habitat
enhancement or restoration project;
(iv) Through the review and approval process for the jobs for the
environment program;
(v) Through the review and approval process for conservation
district-sponsored projects, where the project complies with design
standards established by the conservation commission through
interagency agreement with the United States fish and wildlife service
and the natural resource conservation service;
(vi) Through a formal grant program established by the legislature
or the department for fish habitat enhancement or restoration; and
(vii) Through other formal review and approval processes
established by the legislature.
(2) Fish habitat enhancement projects meeting the criteria of
subsection (1) of this section are expected to result in beneficial
impacts to the environment. Decisions pertaining to fish habitat
enhancement projects meeting the criteria of subsection (1) of this
section and being reviewed and approved according to the provisions of
this section are not subject to the requirements of RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c).
(3)(a) A permit is required for projects that meet the criteria of
subsection (1) of this section and are being reviewed and approved
under this section. An applicant shall use a joint aquatic resource
permit application form developed by the office of regulatory
assistance to apply for approval under this chapter. On the same day,
the applicant shall provide copies of the completed application form to
the department and to each appropriate local government. Local
governments shall accept the application as notice of the proposed
project. The department shall provide a fifteen-day comment period
during which it will receive comments regarding environmental impacts.
Within forty-five days, the department shall either issue a permit,
with or without conditions, deny approval, or make a determination that
the review and approval process created by this section is not
appropriate for the proposed project. The department shall base this
determination on identification during the comment period of adverse
impacts that cannot be mitigated by the conditioning of a permit. If
the department determines that the review and approval process created
by this section is not appropriate for the proposed project, the
department shall notify the applicant and the appropriate local
governments of its determination. The applicant may reapply for
approval of the project under other review and approval processes.
(b) Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or
modification of a permit under this section may formally appeal the
decision to the board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(4) No local government may require permits or charge fees for fish
habitat enhancement projects that meet the criteria of subsection (1)
of this section and that are reviewed and approved according to the
provisions of this section.
(5) Project approvals under this section shall not be made until
the department has developed and adopted rules to define the size and
scale thresholds for projects covered by this section.

--- END ---