BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.350 and 1977 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1) The driver of any motor vehicle carrying passengers for hire,
other than a passenger car, or of any school bus or private carrier bus
carrying any school child or other passenger, or of any vehicle
carrying explosive substances or flammable liquids as a cargo or part
of a cargo, before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad,
shall stop such vehicle within fifty feet but not less than fifteen
feet from the nearest rail of such railroad and while so stopped shall
listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching
train, and for signals indicating the approach of a train, except as
hereinafter provided, and shall not proceed until he can do so safely.
After stopping as required herein and upon proceeding when it is safe
to do so the driver of any said vehicle shall cross only in such gear
of the vehicle that there will be no necessity for changing gears while
traversing such crossing, and the driver shall not shift gears while
crossing the track or tracks.
(2) This section shall not apply at:
(a) Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is controlled by
a police officer or a duly authorized flagman;
(b) Any railroad grade crossing at which traffic is regulated by a
traffic control signal;
(c) Any railroad grade crossing protected by crossing gates or an
alternately flashing light signal intended to give warning of the
approach of a railroad train;
(d) Any railroad grade crossing at which an official traffic
control device as designated by the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to RCW 81.53.060 gives notice that the stopping
requirement imposed by this section does not apply.))
(1)(a) The driver of any of the following vehicles must stop before
the stop line, if present, and otherwise within fifty feet but not less
than fifteen feet from the nearest rail at a railroad grade crossing
unless exempt under subsection (3) of this section:
(i) A school bus or private carrier bus carrying any school child
or other passenger;
(ii) A commercial motor vehicle transporting passengers;
(iii) A cargo tank, whether loaded or empty, used for transporting
any hazardous material as defined in the hazardous materials
regulations of the United States department of transportation in 49
C.F.R. Parts 107 through 180 as it existed on the effective date of
this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the state
patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section. For the
purposes of this section, a cargo tank is any commercial motor vehicle
designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank
that is either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or
the chassis;
(iv) A cargo tank, whether loaded or empty, transporting a
commodity under exemption in accordance with United States department
of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Part 107, Subpart B as it existed on the
effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the state patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes of
this section;
(v) A cargo tank transporting a commodity that at the time of
loading has a temperature above its flashpoint as determined by the
United States department of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 173.120 as
it existed on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent
date as may be provided by the state patrol by rule, consistent with
the purposes of this section; or
(vi) A commercial motor vehicle that is required to be marked or
placarded with any one of the following classifications by the United
States department of transportation in 49 C.F.R. Part 172 as it existed
on the effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the state patrol by rule, consistent with the purposes
of this section:
(A) Division 1.1, Division 1.2, Division 1.3, or Division 1.4;
(B) Division 2.1, Division 2.2, Division 2.2 oxygen, Division 2.3
poison gas, or Division 2.3 chlorine;
(C) Division 4.1 or Division 4.3;
(D) Division 5.1 or Division 5.2;
(E) Division 6.1 poison;
(F) Class 3 combustible liquid or Class 3 flammable;
(G) Class 7;
(H) Class 8.
(b) While stopped, the driver must listen and look in both
directions along the track for any approaching train and for signals
indicating the approach of a train. The driver may not proceed until
he or she can do so safely.
(2) After stopping at a railroad grade crossing and upon proceeding
when it is safe to do so, the driver must cross only in a gear that
permits the vehicle to traverse the crossing without changing gears.
The driver may not shift gears while crossing the track or tracks.
(3) This section does not apply at any railroad grade crossing
where:
(a) Traffic is controlled by a police officer or flagger.
(b) A functioning traffic control signal is transmitting a green
light.
(c) The tracks are used exclusively for a streetcar or industrial
switching purposes.
(d) The utilities and transportation commission has approved the
installation of an "exempt" sign in accordance with the procedures and
standards under RCW 81.53.060.
(e) The crossing is abandoned and is marked with a sign indicating
it is out-of-service.
(f) The state patrol has, by rule, identified a crossing where
stopping is not required.
(g) The superintendent of public instruction has, by rule,
identified a circumstance under which a school bus or private carrier
bus carrying any school child or other passenger is not required to
stop.
(4) For the purpose of this section, "commercial motor vehicle"
means: Any vehicle with a manufacturer's seating capacity for eight or
more passengers, including the driver, that transports passengers for
hire; any private carrier bus; any vehicle used to transport property
that has a gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight
rating, gross vehicle weight, or gross combination weight of 4,536 kg
(10,001 pounds) or more; and any vehicle used in the transportation of
hazardous materials as defined in RCW 46.25.010.

--- END ---