BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.381 and 2008 c 6 s 706 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person ((shall be)) is exempt from any legal obligation to pay
all or a portion of the amount of excess and regular real property
taxes due and payable in the year following the year in which a claim
is filed, and thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, any person who sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or
her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement
residence, but no claimant ((shall)) may receive an exemption on more
than one residence in any year((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Furthermore, confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home,
boarding home, or adult family home ((shall)) does not disqualify the
claim of exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner
and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned
by cotenants ((shall be)) is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each
domestic partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life ((shall be))
is deemed a life estate;
(3) The person claiming the exemption must be (a) sixty-one years
of age or older on December 31st of the year in which the exemption
claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of filing, retired from
regular gainful employment by reason of disability, or (b) a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with one hundred percent service-connected disability as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 423 (d)(1)(A) as
amended prior to January 1, 2005. However, any surviving spouse or
surviving domestic partner of a person who was receiving an exemption
at the time of the person's death ((shall qualify)) qualifies if the
surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is fifty-seven years of
age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person ((shall be)) is exempt from an
obligation to pay ((shall be)) is calculated on the basis of combined
disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming
the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment
year, the combined disposable income of such person ((shall be)) is
calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable
income of ((such)) the person during the months ((such)) the person was
retired by twelve. If the income of the person claiming exemption is
reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of the
death of the person's spouse or the person's domestic partner, or when
other substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable
income of such person ((shall be)) is calculated by multiplying the
average monthly combined disposable income of such person after such
occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate income to comply
with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming documentation
of such income prior to May 31st of the year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of ((thirty-five)) forty thousand dollars
or less ((shall be)) is exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of ((thirty)) thirty-five thousand dollars
or less but greater than ((twenty-five)) thirty thousand dollars
((shall be)) is exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater
of fifty thousand dollars or ((thirty-five)) fifty percent of the
valuation of his or her residence, but not to exceed ((seventy)) one
hundred thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of ((twenty-five)) thirty thousand dollars
or less ((shall be)) is exempt from all regular property taxes on the
greater of sixty thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of
his or her residence;
(6) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of ((thirty-five)) forty thousand dollars
or less, the valuation of the residence shall be the assessed value of
the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the
assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one
year because of high income, this same valuation ((shall)) must be used
upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one
year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any
other reason, the valuation upon requalification ((shall be)) is the
assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the
person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption under this
section to a different residence, the valuation of the different
residence ((shall be)) is the assessed value of the different residence
on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the
exemption.
In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than
the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the
property in the year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent
improvements to the property ((shall)) must be added to the value
otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value
in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.38.030 and 2008 c 6 s 702 are each amended to read
as follows:
A claimant may defer payment of special assessments and/or real
property taxes on up to eighty percent of the amount of the claimant's
equity value in the claimant's residence if the following conditions
are met:
(1) The claimant must meet all requirements for an exemption for
the residence under RCW 84.36.381, other than the age and income limits
under RCW 84.36.381.
(2) The claimant must be sixty years of age or older on December
31st of the year in which the deferral claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by
reason of physical disability((: PROVIDED, That)). However, any
surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of a person who was
receiving a deferral at the time of the person's death ((shall
qualify)) qualifies if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic
partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the
requirements of this section.
(3) The claimant must have a combined disposable income, as defined
in RCW 84.36.383, of ((forty)) forty-five thousand dollars or less.
(4) The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the
residence on which the special assessment and/or real property taxes
have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned
by a marital community, owned by domestic partners, or owned by
cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse, each domestic
partner, or each cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership
in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable
trust does not satisfy the ownership requirement.
(5) The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty
insurance in sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in
the claimant's equity value((: PROVIDED, That)). However, if the
claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to the
extent of the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the
amount deferred ((shall)) may not exceed one hundred percent of the
claimant's equity value in the land or lot only.
(6) In the case of special assessment deferral, the claimant must
have opted for payment of such special assessments on the installment
method if such method was available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2011 and thereafter.

--- END ---