BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.94.020 and 1998 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Credit enhancement" includes insurance, letters of credit,
lines of credit, or other similar agreements which enhance the security
for the payment of the state's or an other agency's obligations under
financing contracts.
(2) "Financing contract" means any contract entered into by the
state for itself or on behalf of an other agency which provides for the
use and purchase of real or personal property by the state and provides
for payment by the state over a term of more than one year, and which
provides that title to the subject property may secure performance of
the state or transfer to the state or an other agency by the end of the
term, upon exercise of an option, for a nominal amount or for a price
determined without reference to fair market value. Financing contracts
((shall)) include, but are not ((be)) limited to, conditional sales
contracts, financing leases, lease purchase contracts, or refinancing
contracts, but ((shall)) does not include operating or true leases.
For purposes of this chapter, the term "financing contract" ((shall))
does not include any nonrecourse financing contract or other obligation
payable only from money or other property received from private sources
and not payable from any public money or property. The term "financing
contract" ((shall)) includes a "master financing contract."
(3) "Master financing contract" means a financing contract which
provides for the use and purchase of property by the state, and which
may include more than one financing contract and appropriation.
(4) "Other agency" means any commission established under Title 15
RCW, a library or regional library, an educational service district,
the superintendent of public instruction, the school directors'
association, a health district, or any county, city, town, school
district, or other municipal corporation or quasi-municipal corporation
((described as such by statute)).
(5) "State" means the state, agency, department, or instrumentality
of the state, the state board for community and technical colleges, and
any state institution of higher education.
(6) "State finance committee" means the state finance committee
under chapter 43.33 RCW.
(7) "Trustee" means a bank or trust company, within or without the
state, authorized by law to exercise trust powers.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.94.030 and 2009 c 500 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state may enter into financing contracts for itself or on
behalf of an other agency for the use and acquisition for public
purposes of real and personal property. Payments under financing
contracts of the state shall be made by the state from currently
appropriated funds or funds not constituting "general state revenues"
as defined in Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.
Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, payments under
financing contracts of the state on behalf of any other agency shall be
made solely from the sources identified in the financing contract,
which may not obligate general state revenues as defined in Article
VII, section 1 of the state Constitution. The treasurer of an other
agency shall remit payments under financing contracts to the office of
the state treasurer or to the state treasurer's designee. In the event
of any deficiency of payments by an other agency under a financing
contract, the treasurer of the other agency shall transfer any legally
available funds of the other agency in satisfaction of the other
agency's obligations under the financing contract if such funds have
been obligated by the other agency under the financing contract and, if
such deficiency is not thereby cured, the office of the state treasurer
is directed to withdraw from that agency's share of state revenues for
distribution or other money an amount sufficient to fulfill the terms
and conditions of the financing contract. The term of any financing
contract shall not exceed thirty years or the remaining useful life of
the property, whichever is shorter. Financing contracts may include
other terms and conditions agreed upon by the parties.
(2) The state for itself or on behalf of an other agency may enter
into contracts for credit enhancement, which ((shall)) limits the
recourse of the provider of credit enhancement solely to the security
provided under the financing contract secured by the credit
enhancement.
(3) The state or an other agency may grant a security interest in
real or personal property acquired under financing contracts. The
security interest may be perfected as provided by the uniform
commercial code - secured transactions, or otherwise as provided by law
for perfecting liens on real estate. Other terms and conditions may be
included as agreed upon by the parties. An other agency that is
authorized by applicable law to enter into a financing contract may
make payments due under such a contract from the proceeds of annual tax
levies approved by the voters under RCW 84.52.056, among other sources.
(4)(a) Financing contracts and contracts for credit enhancement
entered into under the limitations set forth in this chapter ((shall))
do not constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under any
law limiting debt of the state. It is the intent of the legislature
that such contracts also ((shall)) do not constitute a debt or the
contracting of indebtedness under Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution. Certificates of participation in payments to be made
under financing contracts also ((shall)) do not constitute a debt or
the contracting of an indebtedness under any law limiting debt of the
state if payment is conditioned upon payment by the state under the
financing contract with respect to which the same relates. It is the
intent of the legislature that such certificates also ((shall)) do not
constitute a debt or the contracting of indebtedness under Article
VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution if payment of the
certificates is conditioned upon payment by the state under the
financing contract with respect to which those certificates relate.
(b) An other agency authorized by law to issue bonds, notes or
other evidences of indebtedness or to enter into conditional sales
contracts or lease obligations, may participate in a program under this
chapter in which the state enters into a financing contract on behalf
of that other agency, and the other agency's obligations to the state
under the program may be evidenced by an agreement, lease, bond, note,
or other appropriate instrument. A financing contract made by the
state on behalf of an other agency may be secured by the pledge of
revenues of the other agency or other agency's full faith and credit or
may, at the option of the state finance committee, include a contingent
obligation by the state for payment under such financing contract.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.056 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 104 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any municipal corporation otherwise authorized by law to issue
general obligation bonds for capital purposes may, at an election duly
held after giving notice thereof as required by law, authorize the
issuance of general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, which
((shall)) does not include the replacement of equipment, and provide
for the payment of the principal and interest of such bonds by annual
levies in excess of the tax limitations contained in RCW 84.52.050 to
84.52.056, inclusive and RCW 84.52.043. Such an election ((shall)) may
not be held ((oftener)) more often than twice a calendar year, and the
proposition to issue any such bonds and to exceed ((said)) the tax
limitation must receive the affirmative vote of a three-fifths majority
of those voting on the proposition and the total number of persons
voting at ((such)) the election must constitute not less than forty
percent of the voters in ((said)) the municipal corporation who voted
at the last preceding general state election.
(2) Any taxing district ((shall have)) has the right by vote of its
governing body to refund any general obligation bonds of said district
issued for capital purposes only, and to provide for the interest
thereon and amortization thereof by annual levies in excess of the tax
limitations provided for in RCW 84.52.050 to 84.52.056, inclusive and
RCW 84.52.043.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "bond" includes a municipal
corporation's obligation to make payments to the state in connection
with a financing contract entered into by the state by or on behalf of
a municipal corporation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The authority conferred on the state and any
municipal corporation or other agency under this act is in addition and
supplemental to any other authority granted by applicable law. Any
action previously taken by the state, a municipal corporation, or other
agency consistent with the provisions of this act is approved and
confirmed.

--- END ---