BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.42.030 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 14 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The state finance committee shall meet not less than twice per
calendar year and shall determine by resolution the amount, date or
dates, terms, conditions, covenants, denominations, interest rate or
rates (which may be fixed or variable), maturity or maturities,
redemption rights, manner of execution and authentication, manner and
price of sale and form of all bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness.
((Such)) (2) The state finance committee may authorize the state
treasurer, by resolution to:
(a) Accept offers to purchase the bonds, notes, or other evidences
of indebtedness and to sell and deliver the bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness to the purchases thereof;
(b) Determine the date or dates, price or prices, principal amounts
per maturity, delivery dates, interest rate or rates (or mechanisms for
determining the interest rate or rates); and
(c) Set other terms and conditions as the state finance committee
may deem necessary and appropriate. Each delegation is limited to
bonds, notes, or other indebtedness that the state finance committee
has authorized to be issued. Bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness shall be payable either to the bearer or to the registered
owner as provided in RCW 39.46.030. The resolution may provide for the
deposit in trust with any qualified public depository of all or any
part of the proceeds of the bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness or money set aside for the payment thereof.
(3) The state finance committee shall also determine by resolution
whether interest on all or any part of the bonds is to be payable
periodically during the term of such bonds or only at the maturity of
the bonds. For purposes of the limitations on the amount of bonds
authorized to be issued contained in the acts authorizing their
issuance, the amount of bonds which pay interest only at maturity
((shall)) must be equal to the price, exclusive of accrued interest, at
which the bonds are initially offered to the public.
(4) The state finance committee may issue, under chapter 39.53 RCW
and this chapter, bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness to
refund at or prior to maturity any outstanding state bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness.
(5) The state finance committee may obtain or provide for obtaining
bond insurance, letters of credit or other credit support instruments
for the purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the
marketability, or both, of any state bonds, notes, or other evidences
of indebtedness, and may authorize the execution and delivery of
agreements, promissory notes, and other related instruments.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.33.130 and 1998 c 245 s 63 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state finance committee ((shall prepare written reports at
least annually summarizing the debt management activities of the
finance committee, which reports shall be sent to agencies having a
direct financial interest in the issuance and sale of bonds by the
committee, and to other persons on written request)) must publish a
summary of debt management activities at least annually and must also
publish the results of each debt issuance in a timely manner upon
conclusion of each debt issuance. The state finance committee, in its
discretion, may publish these materials exclusively by electronic means
on the office of the state treasurer's web site if it is determined
that public access to these materials is not substantially diminished.

--- END ---