BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.250.010 and 2001 c 31 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to enable ((political
subdivisions,)) eligible governmental entities, including community and
technical college districts, the state board for community and
technical colleges as established in chapter 28B.50 RCW, ((and)) public
four-year institutions of higher education, qualifying federally
recognized tribes or federally recognized political subdivisions
thereof, and other governmental entities to participate with the state
in providing maximum opportunities for the investment of surplus public
funds consistent with the safety and protection of such funds. The
legislature finds and declares that the public interest is found in
providing maximum prudent investment of surplus funds, thereby reducing
the need for additional taxation. The legislature also recognizes that
not all ((political subdivisions)) eligible governmental entities are
able to maximize the return on their temporary surplus funds. The
legislature therefore provides in this chapter a mechanism whereby
((political subdivisions, community and technical colleges, the state
board for community and technical colleges, and public four-year
institutions of higher education)) eligible governmental entities may,
at their option, utilize the resources of the state treasurer's office
to maximize the potential of surplus funds while ensuring the safety of
((public)) those funds.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.250.020 and 2001 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Public funds investment account" or "investment pool" means
the aggregate of all funds as defined in subsection (5) of this section
that are placed in the custody of the state treasurer for investment
and reinvestment.
(2) "((Political subdivision)) Eligible governmental entity" means
any county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, public corporation, political subdivision, or special
purpose taxing district in the state, an instrumentality of any of the
foregoing governmental entities created under chapter 39.34 RCW, any
agency of state government, any entity issuing or executing and
delivering bonds or certificates of participation with respect to
financing contracts approved by the state finance committee under RCW
39.94.040, and any qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally
recognized political subdivisions thereof.
(3) "((Local)) Government finance official" means any officer or
employee of ((a political subdivision)) an eligible governmental entity
who has been designated by statute or by local charter, ordinance,
((or)) resolution, or other appropriate official action, as the officer
having the authority to invest the funds of the ((political
subdivision)) eligible governmental entity. However, the county
treasurer shall be deemed the only ((local)) government finance
official for all ((political subdivisions)) public agencies for which
the county treasurer has exclusive statutory authority to invest the
funds thereof.
(4) "Financial officer" means the board-appointed treasurer of a
community or technical college district, the state board for community
and technical colleges, or a public four-year institution of higher
education.
(5) "Funds" means:
(a) ((Public)) Funds of an eligible governmental entity under the
control of or in the custody of any ((local)) government finance
official or local funds, as defined by the office of financial
management publication "Policies, Regulations and Procedures," under
the control of or in the custody of a financial officer by virtue of
the official's authority that are not immediately required to meet
current demands;
(b) State funds deposited in the investment pool by the state
treasurer that are the proceeds of bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness authorized by the state finance committee under chapter
39.42 RCW, or the proceeds of bonds or certificates of participation
with respect to financing contracts approved by the state finance
committee under RCW 39.94.040, or payments pursuant to financing
contracts under chapter 39.94 RCW, when the investments are made in
order to comply with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(c) Tribal funds under the control of or in the custody of any
qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally recognized political
subdivisions thereof, where the tribe warrants that the use or
disposition of the funds are either not subject to, or are used and
deposited with federal approval, and where the tribe warrants that the
funds are not immediately required to meet current demands.
(6) "Qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally recognized
political subdivisions thereof" means any federally recognized tribe,
located in the state of Washington, authorized and empowered by its
constitution or ordinance to invest its surplus funds pursuant to this
section, and whose authorized tribal official has executed a deposit
agreement with the office of the treasurer.
(7) "Authorized tribal official" means any officer or employee of
a qualifying federally recognized tribe who has been expressly
designated by tribal constitution, ordinance, or resolution as the
officer having the authority to invest the funds of the qualifying
federally recognized tribe or federally recognized political
subdivisions thereof.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.250.040 and 2001 c 31 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
If authorized by statute, local ordinance, ((or)) resolution, or
other appropriate official action, the state treasurer, a ((local))
government finance official or financial officer or his or her
designee, or authorized tribal official, may place funds into the
public funds investment account for investment and reinvestment by the
state treasurer in those securities and investments set forth in RCW
43.84.080 and chapter 39.58 RCW. The state treasurer shall invest the
funds in such manner as to effectively maximize the yield to the
investment pool. In investing and reinvesting moneys in the public
funds investment account and in acquiring, retaining, managing, and
disposing of investments of the investment pool, there shall be
exercised the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing
which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the
management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in
regard to the permanent disposition of the funds considering the
probable income as well as the probable safety of the capital.

--- END ---