BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.225.151 and 1996 c 134 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As required under subsection (2) of this section, each school
shall document the actions taken under RCW 28A.225.030 and report this
information to the school district superintendent who shall compile the
data for all the schools in the district and prepare an annual school
district report for each school year and submit the report to the
superintendent of public instruction. The reports shall be made upon
forms furnished by the superintendent of public instruction and shall
be transmitted as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused
absences;
(b) Documentation of the steps taken by the school district under
each subsection of RCW 28A.225.020 at the request of the superintendent
of public instruction. Each year, by May 1st, the superintendent of
public instruction shall select ten school districts to submit the
report at the end of the following school year. The ten districts
shall represent different areas of the state and be of varied sizes.
In addition, the superintendent of public instruction shall require any
district that fails to keep appropriate records to submit a full report
to the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection. All
school districts shall document steps taken under RCW 28A.225.020 in
each student's record, and make those records available upon request
consistent with the laws governing student records;
(c) The number of enrolled students with ten or more unexcused
absences in a school year or five or more unexcused absences in a month
during a school year;
(d) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve
students who have had five or more unexcused absences in a month or ten
in a year including information about the number of students in the
program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students
during and after participation in the program. The school district
shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian
school or program or certified program under a court order under RCW
28A.225.090; and
(e) The number of petitions filed by a school district with the
juvenile court.
(3) A report required under this section shall not disclose the
name or other identification of a child or parent.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect these
reports from all school districts and prepare an annual report for each
school year to be submitted to the legislature no later than December
15th of each year.
(5) The school district superintendent of any school district that
does not file petitions, as provided in RCW 28A.225.030, on behalf of
at least fifty percent of eligible students in a given year, must
submit a full report to the superintendent of public instruction by
July 15th of the following year as provided under subsection (2)(b) of
this section.
(6) The school district superintendent of any school district that
falls in the lowest quartile of petition filing rates among all state
of Washington school districts for eligible students in a given year
must file with the superintendent of public instruction special
attendance reports during the following school year in forty-five
school-day increments. If identified for the special attendance report
requirement, the school district superintendent must assemble reports
detailing number of enrolled students for the forty-five day period,
number of excused absences during the period, total number of students
newly eligible for a petition for civil action as provided in RCW
28A.225.030 during the period, and number of new petitions filed within
the period. The special attendance report must be filed with the
superintendent of public instruction no later than ten calendar days
following the conclusion of each forty-five day reporting period and
made available to the legislature and governor no later than twenty
days after the initial filing. The first forty-five school days of the
school year constitute the first reporting period. A compilation of
the special attendance reports must be included as an appendix to the
annual school district report as provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction may waive the
requirements of subsection (5) or (6) of this section for any school
district for which it is clearly demonstrated that mitigating
circumstances have directly contributed to lower than expected petition
filing rates.

--- END ---