BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.86.010 and 2002 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature recognizes a public benefit in:
(1) Establishing standards governing the labeling and advertising
of ((food)) agricultural products and agricultural commodities as
transitionally or organically produced;
(2) Providing certification under the federal organic food
production act of 1990, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq., and the rules
adopted thereunder for agricultural products marketed and labeled using
the term "organic" or a derivative of the term "organic;"
(3) Providing access for Washington producers, processors, and
handlers to domestic and international markets for organic ((food))
products; ((and))
(4) Establishing a state organic program or obtaining federal
accreditation as a certifying agent under the federal organic food
production act of 1990, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq., and the rules
adopted thereunder; and
(5) Establishing a brand name materials list for registration of
inputs that are in compliance with 7 C.F.R. Part 205, the national
organic standards or international or additional organic standards.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.86.020 and 2002 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture
or the director's designee.
(2) "Organic ((food)) product" means any agricultural product, in
whole or in part, including meat, dairy, and beverage, that is marketed
using the term organic or any derivative of organic and that is
produced, handled, and processed in accordance with this chapter.
(3) "Producer" means any person or organization who or which grows,
raises, or produces an agricultural product.
(4) "Handler" means any person who sells, distributes, or packs
organic or transitional products.
(5) "Transitional ((food)) product" means any ((food)) agricultural
product that satisfies all of the requirements of organic ((food))
products except ((the time requirements as defined in rule)) that it
has had no prohibited substances applied to it for a period of one year
immediately preceding harvest of the crop.
(6) "Organic certifying agent" means any third-party certification
organization that is recognized by the director as being one which
imposes, for certification, standards consistent with this chapter.
(7) "Processor" means any person engaged in the canning, freezing,
drying, dehydrating, cooking, pressing, powdering, packaging, baking,
heating, mixing, grinding, churning, separating, extracting, cutting,
fermenting, eviscerating, preserving, jarring, or otherwise processing
organic ((food)) products.
(8) "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, exchange,
association, trustee, receiver, corporation, and any member, officer,
or employee thereof or assignee for the benefit of creditors.
(9) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.
(10) "Represent" means to hold out as or to advertise.
(11) "Sale" means selling, offering for sale, holding for sale,
preparing for sale, trading, bartering, offering a gift as an
inducement for sale of, and advertising for sale in any media.
(12) "Material" means any substance or mixture of substances that
is intended to be used in agricultural production, processing, or
handling.
(13) "Fertilizer" means a single or blended substance containing
one or more recognized plant nutrient or nutrients that is used
primarily for its plant nutrient content and that is designed for use
or claimed to have value in promoting plant growth.
(14) "Label" means a display of written, printed, or graphic
material on the immediate container of an agricultural product or any
such material affixed to any agricultural product or affixed to a bulk
container containing an agricultural product, except for package liners
or a display of written, printed, or graphic material that contains
only information about the weight of the product.
(15) "Labeling" includes all written, printed, or graphic material
accompanying an agricultural product at any time or written, printed,
or graphic material about the agricultural product displayed at retail
stores about the product.
(16) "National organic program" means the United States department
of agriculture national organic program established under the federal
organic food production act of 1990 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.), and
the rules adopted thereunder at 7 C.F.R. Part 205, the national organic
standards.
(17) "Registrant" means the person registering a material on the
brand name materials list under the provisions of this chapter.
(18) "Certification" or "certified" means a determination
documented by a certificate of organic operation made by a certifying
agent that a production or handling operation is in compliance with the
national organic program or is in compliance with international
standards.
(19) "Compost" means the product of a managed process through which
microorganisms break down plant and animal materials into more
available forms suitable for application to the soil.
(20) "Crop production aid" means any substance, material,
structure, or device that is used to aid a producer of an agricultural
product except for fertilizers and pesticides.
(21) "Livestock production aid" means any substance, material,
structure, or device that is used to aid a producer in the production
of livestock such as parasiticides, medicines, and feed additives.
(22) "Organic waste-derived material" means grass clippings,
leaves, weeds, bark, plantings, prunings, and other vegetative wastes,
uncontaminated wood waste from logging and milling operations, food
wastes, food processing wastes, and materials derived from these wastes
through composting. "Organic waste-derived material" does not include
products that contain biosolids as defined in chapter 70.95 RCW.
(23) "Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended to
improve the physical characteristics of the soil, except for
fertilizers and pesticides.
(24) "Spray adjuvant" means any product intended to be used with a
pesticide as an aid to the application or to the effect of the
pesticide and that is in a package or container separate from the
pesticide. "Spray adjuvant" includes, but is not limited to, wetting
agents, spreading agents, deposit builders, adhesives, emulsifying
agents, deflocculating agents, and water modifiers or similar agent
with or without toxic properties of its own intended to be used with
any other pesticide as an aid to its application or to its effect.
"Spray adjuvant" does not include products that are only intended to
mark the location where a pesticide is applied.
(25) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, nematode,
mollusk, fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life or
virus, except a virus on or in a living human being or other animal,
which is normally considered to be a pest or which the director may
declare to be a pest;
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant;
(c) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a spray adjuvant; and
(d) Any other substances intended for such use as may be named by
the director by rule.
(26) "Post-harvest material" means any substance, material,
structure, or device that is used in the post-harvest handling of
agricultural products.
(27) "Processing aid" means a substance that is added to a food:
(a) During the processing of the food but is removed in some manner
from the food before it is packaged in its finished form;
(b) During processing, is converted into constituents normally
present in the food, and does not significantly increase the amount of
the constituents naturally found in the food; and
(c) For its technical or functional effect in the processing but is
present in the finished food at insignificant levels and does not have
any technical or functional effect in that food.
(28) "Manufacturer" means a person that compounds, produces,
granulates, mixes, blends, repackages, or otherwise alters the
composition of materials.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.86.030 and 2002 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To be labeled, sold, or represented as an organic ((food))
product, a product shall be produced under standards established under
((RCW 15.86.060)) this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.
A producer, processor, or handler shall not represent, sell, or offer
for sale any ((food)) agricultural product with the representation that
the product is ((an)) organic ((food)) if the producer, processor, or
handler knows, or has reason to know, that the ((food)) product has not
been produced, processed, or handled in accordance with standards
established under ((RCW 15.86.060)) this chapter or the rules adopted
under this chapter.
(2) The department may conduct compliance checks in retail
establishments to evaluate compliance with organic labeling and
advertising requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter and the national organic program and regulations adopted
thereunder.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.86.060 and 2002 c 220 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules, in conformity with chapter
34.05 RCW, as the director believes are appropriate for the adoption of
the national organic program under the federal organic food production
act of 1990((,)) (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.), and the rules adopted
thereunder and for the proper administration of this chapter.
(2) The director shall issue orders to producers, processors, or
handlers whom ((he or she)) the director finds are violating ((any
provision of this chapter, or rules or regulations adopted under this
chapter,)) RCW 15.86.030 or 15.86.090 to cease their violations and
desist from future violations. Whenever the director finds that a
producer, processor, or handler has committed a violation, the director
shall impose on and collect from the violator a civil fine not
exceeding the total of the following amounts: (a) The state's
estimated costs of investigating and taking appropriate administrative
and enforcement actions in respect to the violation; and (b) one
thousand dollars.
(((3) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a certification
provided for in this chapter if he or she determines that an applicant
or certified person has violated this chapter or rules adopted under
it.))

Sec. 5 RCW 15.86.065 and 2002 c 220 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to take such actions, conduct
proceedings, and enter orders as permitted or contemplated for a state
organic program or certifying agent under the federal organic food
production act of 1990((,)) (7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.), and the rules
adopted thereunder. The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a
certification provided for in this chapter if the director determines
that an applicant or certified person has violated this chapter or
rules adopted under this chapter. The ((state organic)) program shall
not be inconsistent with the requirements of 7 U.S.C. Sec. 6501 et seq.
and the rules adopted thereunder, including 7 C.F.R. Sec. 205.668. The
department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.86.070 and 2002 c 220 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules establishing a program for
certifying producers, processors, and handlers as meeting state,
national, or international standards for organic or transitional
((food)) products. The rules may govern, but are not limited to
governing: The number and scheduling of on-site visits, both announced
and unannounced, by certification personnel; recordkeeping
requirements; and the submission of product samples for chemical
analysis. The rules shall include a fee schedule that will provide for
the recovery of the full cost of the ((organic food)) program.
(2) All fees collected under this ((section)) chapter shall be
deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund and the
revenue from such fees shall be used solely for carrying out the
provisions of this ((section)) chapter, and no appropriation is
required for disbursement from the fund. The director may employ such
personnel as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this
((section)) chapter.
(((2) The fees established under this section may be increased in
excess of the fiscal growth factor as provided in RCW 43.135.055 for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003.))

Sec. 7 RCW 15.86.090 and 2002 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, or
process any agricultural product within this state with an organic
label unless that person is certified under this chapter by the
department or a recognized organic certifying agent.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Final retailers of organic ((food)) products that do not
process organic ((food)) products; or
(b) Producers who sell no more than five thousand dollars annually
in value of agricultural products directly to consumers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 15.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To be labeled, sold, or represented as a transitional product,
a product must be produced under standards established under this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter except that no
prohibited substances as specified under the national organic program
are applied to it within one year immediately preceding harvest of the
crop. A producer, processor, or handler may not represent, sell, or
offer for sale any agricultural product with the representation that
the product is transitional if the producer, processor, or handler
knows or has reason to know that the product has not been produced,
processed, or handled in accordance with standards established under
this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter for transitional
products.
(2)(a) The department is authorized to set and collect fees related
to transitional certification, including application for transitional
certification, renewal of transitional certification, inspections, and
sampling. Fees collected under this section must be deposited in an
account within the agricultural local fund and the revenue from the
fees must be used solely for carrying out the provisions of this
section, and no appropriation is required for disbursement from the
fund. The department may by rule increase the initial fees established
in this section as necessary to cover costs of provision of services.
(b) The fee for application for transitional certification is fifty
dollars per site in addition to any organic certification application
fees established under this chapter.
(3) The department may conduct compliance checks in retail
establishments to evaluate compliance with transitional labeling and
advertising requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter and the national organic program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 15.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may establish a brand name materials list. The
brand name materials list is a list of registered materials that are
approved for use in organic production, processing, or handling in
accordance with 7 C.F.R. Part 205, national organic standards, or
international standards. Registration of a material on the brand name
materials list is voluntary. While registration under this section is
not required for a material to be used or sold in this state,
registration is necessary for a material to appear on the brand name
materials list.
(2)(a) Manufacturers of materials may submit an application to the
department for registration of a material on the brand name materials
list. Applications for registration on the brand name materials list
must be made on a form designated by the department. The application
must include:
(i) The name and address of the manufacturer;
(ii) The name and address of the manufacturer's representative
making the representations in the application;
(iii) The brand name that the material is sold under;
(iv) A copy of the labeling accompanying the material and a
statement of all claims to be made for it, including the directions and
precautions for use;
(v) The complete formula of the material including the active and
inert ingredients;
(vi) A description of the manufacturing process including all
materials used for the extraction and synthesis of the material, if
appropriate;
(vii) The intended uses of the product;
(viii) The source or supplier of all ingredients;
(ix) The required fee for registration or renewal; and
(x) Any additional information required by rule.
(b) If any change to the information provided in an application
occurs at any time after an application is submitted, the registrant
must immediately submit the changed information to the department for
review. Failure by the registrant to provide notice of change of
information provided in the application may result in suspension or
revocation of the registration.
(c) By submitting an application for registration on the brand name
materials list, the applicant expressly consents to jurisdiction of the
state of Washington in all matters related to the registration.
Applications for registration for the brand name materials list are
governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3)(a) By applying for registration on the brand name materials
list, the registrant expressly grants to the department or other
organic certifying agent or inspection agent approved by the national
organic program the right to enter the registrant's premises during
normal business hours or at other reasonable times to: (i) Inspect the
portion of the premises where the material, inputs, or ingredients are
stored, produced, manufactured, packaged, or labeled; (ii) inspect
records related to the sales, storage, production, manufacture,
packaging, or labeling of the material, inputs, or ingredients; and
(iii) obtain samples of materials, inputs, and ingredients. Should the
registrant refuse to allow the inspection of the premises or records or
fail to provide samples, the registration on the brand name materials
list is cancelled. The department shall deny applications for
registration where the registrant refuses to allow the inspection of
the premises or records as provided in this subsection or fails to
provide samples as provided in this subsection.
(b) Required inspections may be conducted by department personnel,
by an organic certifying agent, or by another inspection agent approved
by the national organic program. The department may establish by rule
the evaluation criteria for the review of inspection reports conducted
by an organic certifying agent or inspection agent approved by the
national organic program.
(4) The director may adopt rules necessary to implement the brand
name materials list. The rules may address, but are not limited to:
(a) Fees related to registration; (b) the number and scheduling of
inspections, both announced and unannounced; (c) recordkeeping
requirements; (d) additional application requirements; (e) labeling of
registered materials; and (f) the chemical analysis of material
samples.
(5) The department may establish a brand name materials list to
register materials approved for use under the following standards:
(a) The national organic program. A material that meets the
requirements of 7 C.F.R. Part 205, national organic standards, may be
registered; or
(b) The international or additional organic standards. The
director may review materials registered on the brand name materials
list as approved for use under the national organic program for
compliance with specific international or additional organic standards
as designated by rule. A registered material that complies with a
specific international or additional organic standard may also be
registered as approved under that standard.
(6) Registration of a material on the brand name materials list
under this chapter does not guarantee acceptance for use in organic
production or processing by organic certifying agents other than the
department. The department is not liable for any losses or damage that
occurs as a result of use of a material registered on the brand name
materials list.
(7)(a) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke a registration on
the brand name materials list provided for in this chapter if the
director determines that a registrant has failed to meet the
registration criteria established in this chapter or rules adopted
under it or violated any other provision of this chapter or rules
adopted under it.
(b) Failure to consent to inspections or sampling constitutes
grounds for removal from the brand name materials list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 15.86 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to set and collect fees for
application for registration, renewal of registration, inspections, and
sampling for the brand name materials list. Fees collected under this
section shall be deposited in an account within the agricultural local
fund and the revenue from such fees shall be used solely for carrying
out the provisions of this section, and no appropriation is required
for disbursement from the fund. The department may increase by rule
the initial fees established in this section as necessary to cover
costs of provision of services.
(2)(a) The application fee for initial registration of a pesticide,
spray adjuvant, processing aid, livestock production aid, or post-harvest material is five hundred dollars per material.
(b) The application fee for initial registration of a fertilizer,
soil amendment, organic waste-derived material, compost, animal manure,
or crop production aid is four hundred dollars per material.
(3)(a)(i) The application fee for renewing a registration for a
pesticide, spray adjuvant, processing aid, livestock production aid, or
post-harvest material is three hundred dollars per material.
(ii) The application fee for renewing a registration for a
fertilizer, soil amendment, organic waste-derived material, compost,
animal manure, or crop production aid is two hundred dollars per
material.
(b) Renewal applications postmarked after October 31st must include
a late fee in addition to the renewal fee. Late fees must be assessed
as follows:
(i) Applications postmarked after October 31st, a late fee of one
hundred dollars per material.
(ii) Applications postmarked after November 30th, a late fee of two
hundred dollars per material.
(iii) Applications postmarked after December 31st, a late fee of
three hundred dollars per material.
(c) Renewal applications received after February 2nd will not be
accepted and are required to reapply as a new applicant.
(4) Inspections must be billed at forty dollars per hour plus
travel costs and mileage, which is charged at the rate established by
the office of financial management.
(5) Samples, if required for registration, or requested by the
applicant, will be charged to the applicant at a rate established by
the laboratory services division of the department of agriculture or at
cost for analyses performed by another laboratory. If an additional
visit must be arranged, then the visit must be billed at forty dollars
per hour plus travel costs and mileage, which is charged at the rate
established by the office of financial management.
(6) Requests for expedited reviews may be submitted and, if
approved, are billed at a rate of forty dollars per hour.
(7) The department may assess compliance with an international or
additional organic standard for materials registered on the brand name
materials list as approved for use under the national organic program.
Requests for additional assessments of materials approved under the
national organic program are billed at a rate of one hundred dollars
per product for each standard.

--- END ---