BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.7541 and 2008 c 97 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every sentence imposed ((under chapter 9.94A RCW)) for a crime
specified in RCW 43.43.754 must include a fee of one hundred dollars.
The fee is a court-ordered legal financial obligation ((as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030)), payable by the offender after payment of all other
legal financial obligations included in the sentence has been
completed. The clerk of the court shall transmit eighty percent of the
fee collected to the state treasurer for deposit in the state DNA
database account created under RCW 43.43.7532, and shall transmit
twenty percent of the fee collected to the agency responsible for
collection of a biological sample from the offender as required under
RCW 43.43.754.

--- END ---