BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.215 and 2005 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Ignition interlock device" means breath alcohol analyzing ignition
equipment or other biological or technical device certified in
conformance with section 2 of this act and rules adopted by the state
patrol and designed to prevent a motor vehicle from being operated by
a person who has consumed an alcoholic beverage. ((The state patrol
shall by rule provide standards for the certification, installation,
repair, and removal of the devices.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The state patrol shall by rule provide standards for the
certification, installation, repair, maintenance, monitoring,
inspection, and removal of ignition interlock devices, as defined under
RCW 46.04.215, and equipment as outlined under this section, and may
inspect the records and equipment of manufacturers, vendors, and
customers during regular business hours for compliance with statutes
and rules and may suspend or revoke certification for any
noncompliance.
(2)(a) When an authorized service provider or individual installer
of ignition interlock devices is found to be out of compliance, the
installation privileges of that authorized service provider or
individual installer may be suspended or revoked until the authorized
service provider or individual installer comes into compliance. During
any suspension or revocation period, the authorized service provider or
individual installer is responsible for notifying affected customers of
any changes in their service agreement.
(b) An authorized service provider or individual installer whose
certification is suspended or revoked for noncompliance has a right to
an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW to contest the
suspension or revocation, or both. For the administrative hearing, the
procedure and rules of evidence are as specified in chapter 34.05 RCW,
except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Any request for an
administrative hearing must be made in writing and must be received by
the state patrol within twenty days after the receipt of the notice of
suspension or revocation.
(3)(a) An ignition interlock device must employ fuel cell
technology. For the purposes of this subsection, "fuel cell
technology" consists of the following electrochemical method: An
electrolyte designed to oxidize the alcohol and release electrons to be
collected by an active electrode; a current flow is generated within
the electrode proportional to the amount of alcohol oxidized on the
fuel cell surface; and the electrical current is measured and reported
as breath alcohol concentration. Fuel cell technology is highly
specific for alcohols.
(b) To be certified, an ignition interlock device must:
(i) Meet or exceed the minimum test standards in sections one and
two of the model specifications for breath alcohol ignition interlock
devices, as published in the federal register, volume 71, number 31 (57
FR 11772), or as rules are adopted. Only a notarized statement from a
laboratory that is certified by the international organization of
standardization and is capable of performing the tests specified will
be accepted as proof of meeting or exceeding the standards. The
notarized statement must include the name and signature of the person
in charge of the tests under the following statement:

"Two samples of (model name) , manufactured by (manufacturer)
were tested by (laboratory) certified by the Internal Organization
of Standardization. They do meet or exceed all specifications listed
in the Federal Register, Volume 71, Number 31 (57 FR 11772), Breath
Alcohol Ignition Interlock Devices (BAIID), NHTSA 2005-23470."; and

(ii) Be maintained in accordance with the rules and standards
adopted by the state patrol.

--- END ---