BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.70.150 and 2005 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sea urchin dive fishery license is required to take sea
urchins for commercial purposes. A sea urchin dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea urchin harvest operations. If the same vessel has been designated
on two sea urchin dive fishery licenses, two divers may be in the
water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea urchin dive
fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea urchin dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea urchin dive fishery license
is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is not
renewable. However, if the license is not held because of revocation
or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall renew the
license in the name of a natural person at the end of the revocation or
suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of the license
before the end of the year in which the revocation or suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during the
previous year because of a license suspension or revocation by the
director or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by
establishing that the person held such a license during the last year
in which the person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the sea urchin dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. The collections and deposits
must continue, as set forth in (a) and (b) of this subsection, through
license year 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty, whichever occurs first. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The sea urchin
dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall only be used to retire sea urchin
licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to ((twenty-five))
twenty, and thereafter shall only be used for sea urchin management and
enforcement. The director or the director's designee shall notify the
department of revenue within thirty days when the number of licenses is
reduced to twenty.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea urchin dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued ((in)) for
license years 2000 through ((2010)) 2013, or until the number of
licenses is reduced to twenty, whichever occurs first.
(b) For licenses issued for ((the year)) license years 2000 ((and
thereafter,)) through 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced
to twenty, whichever occurs first, a surcharge shall be charged on the
sea urchin dive fishery license for designating an alternate operator.
The surcharge shall be as follows: Five hundred dollars for the first
year or each of the first two consecutive years after 1999 that any
alternate operator is designated and two thousand five hundred dollars
each year thereafter that any alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea urchin dive fishery licenses are transferable. ((After
December 31, 1999,)) For licenses issued for license years 2000 through
2013, or whenever the number of licenses is reduced to twenty,
whichever occurs first, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea urchin
dive fishery license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the
first transfer of a license valid for ((calendar)) license year 2000,
and two thousand five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer,
((whether)) occurring in the ((year)) license years 2000 ((or
thereafter)) through 2013, or whenever the number of licenses is
reduced to twenty, whichever occurs first. Notwithstanding this
subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a
transfer from the natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that
person's spouse or child.
(6) If fewer than ((twenty-five)) twenty natural persons are
eligible for sea urchin dive fishery licenses, the director may accept
applications for new licenses. The additional licenses may not cause
more than ((twenty-five)) twenty natural persons to be eligible for a
sea urchin dive fishery license. New licenses issued under this
section shall be distributed according to rules of the department that
recover the value of such licensed privilege.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.70.190 and 2005 c 110 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A sea cucumber dive fishery license is required to take sea
cucumbers for commercial purposes. A sea cucumber dive fishery license
authorizes the use of only one diver in the water at any time during
sea cucumber harvest operations. If the same vessel has been
designated on two sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, two divers may be
in the water. A natural person may not hold more than two sea cucumber
dive fishery licenses.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
director shall issue no new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses. For
licenses issued for the year 2000 and thereafter, the director shall
renew existing licenses only to a natural person who held the license
at the end of the previous year. If a sea cucumber dive fishery
license is not held by a natural person as of December 31, 1999, it is
not renewable. However, if the license is not held because of
revocation or suspension of licensing privileges, the director shall
renew the license in the name of a natural person at the end of the
revocation or suspension if the license holder applies for renewal of
the license before the end of the year in which the revocation or
suspension ends.
(3) Where a licensee failed to obtain the license during either of
the previous two years because of a license suspension by the director
or the court, the licensee may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the
person was eligible.
(4) Surcharges as provided for in this section shall be collected
and deposited into the sea cucumber dive fishery account hereby created
in the custody of the state treasurer. The collections and deposits
must continue, as set forth in (a) and (b) of this subsection, through
license year 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty, whichever occurs first. Only the director or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The sea cucumber
dive fishery account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall only be used to retire sea cucumber
licenses until the number of licenses is reduced to ((twenty-five))
twenty, and thereafter shall only be used for sea cucumber management
and enforcement. The director or the director's designee shall notify
the department of revenue within thirty days when the number of
licenses is reduced to twenty.
(a) A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be charged with each
sea cucumber dive fishery license renewal for licenses issued in 2000
through ((2010)) 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced to
twenty, whichever occurs first.
(b) For licenses issued for ((the year)) license years 2000 ((and
thereafter,)) through 2013, or until the number of licenses is reduced
to twenty, whichever occurs first, a surcharge shall be charged on the
sea cucumber dive fishery license for designating an alternate
operator. The surcharge shall be as follows: Five hundred dollars for
the first year or each of the first two consecutive years after 1999
that any alternate operator is designated and two thousand five hundred
dollars each year thereafter that any alternate operator is designated.
(5) Sea cucumber dive fishery licenses are transferable. ((After
December 31, 1999,)) For licenses issued for license years 2000 through
2013, or whenever the number of licenses is reduced to twenty,
whichever occurs first, there is a surcharge to transfer a sea cucumber
dive fishery license. The surcharge is five hundred dollars for the
first transfer of a license valid for ((calendar)) license year 2000
and two thousand five hundred dollars for any subsequent transfer
((whether)), occurring in the ((year)) license years 2000 ((or
thereafter)) through 2013, or whenever the number of licenses is
reduced to twenty, whichever occurs first. Notwithstanding this
subsection, a one-time transfer exempt from surcharge applies for a
transfer from the natural person licensed on January 1, 2000, to that
person's spouse or child.
(6) If fewer than ((twenty-five)) twenty persons are eligible for
sea cucumber dive fishery licenses, the director may accept
applications for new licenses. The additional licenses may not cause
more than ((twenty-five)) twenty natural persons to be eligible for a
sea cucumber dive fishery license. New licenses issued under this
section shall be distributed according to rules of the department that
recover the value of such licensed privilege.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.27.020 and 2005 c 110 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other taxes, licenses, or fees provided by
law there is established an excise tax on the commercial possession of
enhanced food fish as provided in this chapter. The tax is levied upon
and shall be collected from the owner of the enhanced food fish whose
possession constitutes the taxable event. The taxable event is the
first possession in Washington by an owner after the enhanced food fish
has been landed. Processing and handling of enhanced food fish by a
person who is not the owner is not a taxable event to the processor or
handler.
(2) A person in possession of enhanced food fish and liable to this
tax may deduct from the price paid to the person from which the
enhanced food fish (except oysters) are purchased an amount equal to a
tax at one-half the rate levied in this section upon these products.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the enhanced food fish
at the point of landing.
(4) The tax shall be equal to the measure of the tax multiplied by
the rates for enhanced food fish as follows:
(a) Chinook, coho, and chum salmon and anadromous game fish: Five
and twenty-five one-hundredths percent;
(b) Pink and sockeye salmon: Three and fifteen one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Other food fish and shellfish, except oysters, sea urchins, and
sea cucumbers: Two and one-tenth percent;
(d) Oysters: Eight one-hundredths of one percent;
(e) Sea urchins: Four and six-tenths percent through December 31,
((2010)) 2013, or until the department of fish and wildlife notifies
the department that the number of sea urchin licenses has been reduced
to twenty licenses, whichever occurs first, and two and one-tenth
percent thereafter; and
(f) Sea cucumbers: Four and six-tenths percent through December
31, ((2010)) 2013, or until the department of fish and wildlife
notifies the department that the number of sea cucumber licenses has
been reduced to twenty licenses, whichever occurs first, and two and
one-tenth percent thereafter.
(5) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (4) of this
section.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.27.070 and 2005 c 110 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter
shall be deposited in the state general fund except for the excise tax
on anadromous game fish, which shall be deposited in the state wildlife
((fund, and, during the period)) account. From January 1, 2000, to
December 31, ((2010)) 2013, or until the department of fish and
wildlife notifies the department that the license reduction goals of
the sea urchin or sea cucumber fishery have been met, whichever occurs
first, twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise
tax on sea urchins collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited
into the sea urchin dive fishery account created in RCW 77.70.150, and
twenty-five forty-sixths of the revenues derived from the excise tax on
sea cucumbers collected under RCW 82.27.020 shall be deposited into the
sea cucumber dive fishery account created in RCW 77.70.190.

--- END ---