BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the utilization
of forest biomass materials located on state lands will assist in
achieving the purposes of the forest biomass energy demonstration
project under RCW 43.30.835, facilitate and support the emerging forest
biomass market and clean energy economy, and enable the department to
encourage biomass energy development on state trust lands for the trust
land's potential long-term benefits to trust beneficiaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department may maintain a list of all
potential sources of forest biomass on state lands for the purposes of
identifying and making forest biomass available for sale, exploration,
collection, processing, storage, stockpiling, and conversion into
energy, biofuels, for use in a biorefinery, or any other similar use.
The department may utilize the list to establish available supply
limitations to limit the sale of forest biomass under biomass supply
contracts authorized under this act when the department finds the
overall supply of forest biomass in a region or watershed is depleted
such that further exploration and collection of forest biomass may not
be sustainable or might otherwise threaten long-term forest health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department is authorized to enter
forest biomass supply contracts on terms and conditions acceptable to
the department for terms of up to five years for the purpose of
providing a supply of forest biomass during the term of the contract
except as the term of the contract may be limited under subsection (2)
of this section, provided that such a contract must terminate
automatically upon the removal of the agreed volume of biomass and the
completion of other conditions of the contract.
(2) The department may authorize the sale of forest biomass in a
contract for the sale of valuable materials under chapter 79.15 RCW
provided that the department complies with the provisions of this
chapter and: (a) Requires a separate bid and selects an apparent
highest bidder for the forest biomass separately from the sale of
valuable materials; (b) expressly includes forest biomass as an element
of the sale of the valuable materials to be sold in the sales contract;
or (c) a combination of (a) and (b) of this subsection. The term of
the contract for the removal of biomass, if the sale is made in
conformance with this subsection, must not exceed the term of the
contract for valuable materials sold under chapter 79.15 RCW.
(3) The department may: (a) Enter into direct sales contracts for
forest biomass, without public auction, based upon procedures adopted
by the board to ensure competitive market prices and accountability; or
(b) enter into contracts for forest biomass at public auction or by
sealed bid to the highest bidder in a manner consistent with the sale
procedures established for the sale of valuable materials in chapter
79.15 RCW or as may be adopted by the board.
(4) The department must specify in each contract an annual
volumetric limit of the total cubic volume or tons of forest biomass to
be supplied from a specific unit, geographically delineated area, or
region within a watershed or watersheds based upon the department's
determination of forest biomass available in that unit, area, region,
or watershed or watersheds on a sustainable basis. The department may
unilaterally amend the volume to be supplied by providing the
contracting party with a minimum of six months notice prior to reducing
the contract volume to be supplied if the department determines, under
section 2 of this act, that the available supply has been depleted such
that further removal of forest biomass may not be sustainable or may
adversely affect long-term forest health.
(5) At the expiration of the contract term, the department may
renew the contract for up to three additional five year periods on
terms and conditions acceptable to the department, if the department
finds: (a) A sustainable supply of forest biomass is available for the
term of the contract; (b) the payment under the contract represents the
fair market value at the time of the renewal; and (c) the purchaser
agrees to the estimated amount of biomass material available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department is authorized to lease state
lands for the purpose of the sale, exploration, collection, processing,
storage, stockpiling, and conversion of biomass into energy or
biofuels, the development of a biorefinery, or for any other resource
use derived from biomass if the department is able to obtain a fair
market rental return to the state or the appropriate constitutional or
statutory trust and if the lease is in the best interest of the state
and the affected trust, as follows:
(1) Leases authorized under this chapter may be entered into by
public auction, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 79.13.140, or
by negotiation.
(2) All leases must contain such terms and conditions as may be
prescribed by the rules adopted by the department in accordance with
the provision of this act. Leases authorized under this act may be for
a term of no more than fifty years.
(3) For leases that involve the development of biomass processing,
biofuel manufacturing, or biomass energy production facilities, the
department may include provisions for reduced rent until an approved
plan of development is completed and the facility is operational,
provided that provisions are included to require: (a) Adequate
assurances to protect the department's interest in a future rental
income stream; (b) the demonstration of reasonable progress consistent
with an approved plan of development; and (c) a lump sum payment to the
department in the amount of the difference between the fair market rent
and the reduced rent, if the approved plan of development is not
completed in the time required in the plan.
(4) The department may require the payment of production rent or
other compensation for the use of the land and biomass materials on the
land. If the department is not entering a supply contract under
section 3 of this act for any forest biomass to be supplied for the
lease purposes from the leased land, then the department must require
a royalty payment for the contribution to value of any product created
by the lessee that is associated with forest biomass removed from the
leased land in an amount fixed by the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.02.010 and 2004 c 199 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic lands" means all state-owned tidelands, shorelands,
harbor areas, and the beds of navigable waters as defined in ((chapter
79.90)) RCW 79.105.060 that are administered by the department.
(2) "Board" means the board of natural resources.
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(4) "Community and technical college forest reserve lands" means
lands managed under RCW 79.02.420.
(5) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(6) "Improvements" means anything considered a fixture in law
placed upon or attached to lands administered by the department that
has changed the value of the lands or any changes in the previous
condition of the fixtures that changes the value of the lands.
(7) "Land bank lands" means lands acquired under RCW 79.19.020.
(8) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of a federal, state, or local governmental unit,
however designated.
(9) "Public lands" means lands of the state of Washington
administered by the department including but not limited to state
lands, state forest lands, and aquatic lands.
(10) "State forest lands" means lands acquired under RCW 79.22.010,
79.22.040, and 79.22.020.
(11) "State lands" includes:
(a) School lands, that is, lands held in trust for the support of
the common schools;
(b) University lands, that is, lands held in trust for university
purposes;
(c) Agricultural college lands, that is, lands held in trust for
the use and support of agricultural colleges;
(d) Scientific school lands, that is, lands held in trust for the
establishment and maintenance of a scientific school;
(e) Normal school lands, that is, lands held in trust for state
normal schools;
(f) Capitol building lands, that is, lands held in trust for the
purpose of erecting public buildings at the state capital for
legislative, executive, and judicial purposes;
(g) Institutional lands, that is, lands held in trust for state
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions; and
(h) Land bank, escheat, donations, and all other lands, except
aquatic lands, administered by the department that are not devoted to
or reserved for a particular use by law.
(12) "Valuable materials" means any product or material on the
lands, such as forest products, forage or agricultural crops, stone,
gravel, sand, peat, and all other materials of value except: (a)
Mineral, coal, petroleum, and gas as provided for under chapter 79.14
RCW; and (b) forest biomass as provided for under chapter 79.-- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).
(13)(a) "Forest biomass" means the by-products of: Current forest
practices prescribed or permitted under chapter 76.09 RCW; current
forest protection treatments prescribed or permitted under chapter
76.04 RCW; or the by-products of forest health treatment prescribed or
permitted under chapter 76.06 RCW.
(b) "Forest biomass" does not include wood pieces that have been
treated with chemical preservatives such as: Creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old growth
forests, except wood removed for forest health treatments under chapter
76.06 RCW and RCW 79.15.540; wood required by chapter 76.09 RCW for
large woody debris recruitment; or municipal solid waste.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.30.020 and 2009 c 163 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the department of
natural resources.
(2) "Agency" and "state agency" means any branch, department, or
unit of the state government, however designated or constituted.
(3) "Board" means the board of natural resources.
(4) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(5) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(6) (("Forest biomass" means the by-products of: Current forest
practices prescribed or permitted under chapter 76.09 RCW; current
forest protection treatments prescribed or permitted under chapter
76.04 RCW; or the by-products of forest health treatments prescribed or
permitted under chapter 76.06 RCW. "Forest biomass" does not include
wood pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as:
Creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from old
growth forests, except wood removed for forest health treatments under
chapter 76.06 RCW and RCW 79.15.540; wood required by chapter 76.09 RCW
for large woody debris recruitment; or municipal solid waste.
(7))) "Supervisor" means the supervisor of natural resources.

Sec. 7 RCW 76.04.465 and 1986 c 100 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
Standing dead trees constitute a substantial deterrent to effective
fire control action in forest areas, but are also an important and
essential habitat for many species of wildlife. To ((insure)) ensure
continued existence of these wildlife species and continued forest
growth while minimizing the risk of destruction by conflagration, only
certain snags must be felled currently with the logging. The
department shall adopt rules relating to effective fire control action
to require that only certain snags be felled, taking into consideration
the need to protect the wildlife habitat. Snags felled for effective
fire control action under this section on land managed by the
department may be utilized by the department for purposes of providing
a supply of forest biomass as provided in chapter 79.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 13 of this act), subject to rules adopted
under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 76.06.180 and 2007 c 480 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to issuing a forest health hazard warning or forest
health hazard order, the commissioner shall consider the findings and
recommendations of the forest health technical advisory committee and
shall consult with county government officials, forest landowners and
forest land managers, consulting foresters, and other interested
parties to gather information on the threat, opportunities or
constraints on treatment options, and other information they may
provide. The commissioner, or a designee, shall conduct a public
hearing in a county within the geographical area being considered.
(2) The commissioner of public lands may issue a forest health
hazard warning when he or she deems such action is necessary to manage
the development of a threat to forest health or address an existing
threat to forest health. A decision to issue a forest health hazard
warning may be based on existing forest stand conditions and:
(a) The presence of an uncharacteristic insect or disease outbreak
that has or is likely to (i) spread to multiple forest ownerships and
cause extensive damage to forests; or (ii) significantly increase
forest fuel that is likely to further the spread of uncharacteristic
fire;
(b) When, due to extensive physical damage from wind or ice storm
or other cause, there are (i) insect populations building up to large
scale levels; or (ii) significantly increased forest fuels that are
likely to further the spread of uncharacteristic fire; or
(c) When otherwise determined by the commissioner to be
appropriate.
(3) The commissioner of public lands may issue a forest health
hazard order when he or she deems such action is necessary to address
a significant threat to forest health. A decision to issue a forest
health hazard order may be based on existing forest stand conditions
and:
(a) The presence of an uncharacteristic insect or disease outbreak
that has (i) spread to multiple forest ownerships and has caused and is
likely to continue to cause extensive damage to forests; or (ii)
significantly increased forest fuels that are likely to further the
spread of uncharacteristic fire;
(b) When, due to extensive physical damage from wind or ice storm
or other cause (i) insect populations are causing extensive damage to
forests; or (ii) significantly increased forest fuels are likely to
further the spread of uncharacteristic fire;
(c) Insufficient landowner action under a forest health hazard
warning; or
(d) When otherwise determined by the commissioner to be
appropriate.
(4) A forest health hazard warning or forest health hazard order
shall be issued by use of a commissioner's order. General notice of
the commissioner's order shall be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in each county within the area covered by the order and on
the department's web site. The order shall specify the boundaries of
the area affected, including federal and tribal lands, the forest stand
conditions that would make a parcel subject to the provisions of the
order, and the actions landowners or land managers should take to
reduce the hazard. If the forest health hazard warning or order
relates to land managed by the department, the warning or order may
also contain provisions for the department's utilization of any forest
biomass pursuant to chapter 79.-- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 13 of this act).
(5) Written notice of a forest health hazard warning or forest
health hazard order shall be provided to forest landowners of
specifically affected property.
(a) The notice shall set forth:
(i) The reasons for the action;
(ii) The boundaries of the area affected, including federal and
tribal lands;
(iii) Suggested actions that should be taken by the forest
landowner under a forest health hazard warning or the actions that must
be taken by a forest landowner under a forest health hazard order;
(iv) The time within which such actions should or must be taken;
(v) How to obtain information or technical assistance on forest
health conditions and treatment options;
(vi) The right to request mitigation under subsection (6) of this
section and appeal under subsection (7) of this section;
(vii) These requirements are advisory only for federal and tribal
lands.
(b) The notice shall be served by personal service or by mail to
the latest recorded real property owner, as shown by the records of the
county recording officer as defined in RCW 65.08.060. Service by mail
is effective on the date of mailing. Proof of service shall be by
affidavit or declaration under penalty of perjury.
(6) Forest landowners who have been issued a forest health hazard
order under subsection (5) of this section may apply to the department
for the remission or mitigation of such order. The application shall
be made to the department within fifteen days after notice of the order
has been served. Upon receipt of the application, the department may
remit or mitigate the order upon whatever terms the department in its
discretion deems proper, provided the department deems the remission or
mitigation to be in the best interests of carrying out the purposes of
this chapter. The department may ascertain the facts regarding all
such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rule as it
deems proper.
(7) Forest landowners who have been issued a forest health hazard
order under subsection (5) of this section may appeal the order to the
forest practices appeals board.
(a) The appeal shall be filed within thirty days after notice of
the order has been served, unless application for mitigation has been
made to the department. When such an application for mitigation is
made, such appeal shall be filed within thirty days after notice of the
disposition of the application for mitigation has been served.
(b) The appeal must set forth:
(i) The name and mailing address of the appellant;
(ii) The name and mailing address of the appellant's attorney, if
any;
(iii) A duplicate copy of the forest health hazard order;
(iv) A separate and concise statement of each error alleged to have
been committed;
(v) A concise statement of facts upon which the appellant relies to
sustain the statement of error; and
(vi) A statement of the relief requested.
(8) A forest health hazard order issued under subsection (5) of
this section is effective thirty days after date of service unless
application for remission or mitigation is made or an appeal is filed.
When an application for remission or mitigation is made, the order is
effective thirty days after notice setting forth the disposition of the
application is served unless an appeal is filed from such disposition.
Whenever an appeal of the order is filed, the order shall become
effective only upon completion of all administrative and judicial
review proceedings and the issuance of a final decision confirming the
order in whole or in part.
(9) Upon written request, the department may certify as adequate a
forest health management plan developed by a forest landowner, before
or in response to a forest health hazard warning or forest health
hazard order, if the plan is likely to achieve the desired result and
the terms of the plan are being diligently followed by the forest
landowner. The certification of adequacy shall be determined by the
department in its sole discretion, and be provided to the requestor in
writing.

Sec. 9 RCW 79.15.100 and 2004 c 177 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Valuable materials may be sold separately from the land as a
"lump sum sale" or as a "scale sale."
(a) "Lump sum sale" means any sale offered with a single total
price applying to all the material conveyed.
(b) "Scale sale" means any sale offered with per unit prices to be
applied to the material conveyed.
(2) Payment for lump sum sales must be made as follows:
(a) Lump sum sales under five thousand dollars appraised value
require full payment on the day of sale.
(b) Lump sum sales appraised at over five thousand dollars but
under one hundred thousand dollars may require full payment on the day
of sale.
(c) Lump sum sales requiring full payment on the day of sale may be
paid in cash or by certified check, cashier's check, bank draft, or
money order, all payable to the department.
(3) Except for sales paid in full on the day of sale or sales with
adequate bid bonds, an initial deposit not to exceed twenty-five
percent of the actual or projected purchase price shall be made on the
day of sale.
(a) Sales with bid bonds are subject to the day of sale payment and
replacement requirements prescribed by RCW 79.15.110.
(b) The initial deposit must be maintained until all contract
obligations of the purchaser are satisfied. However, all or a portion
of the initial deposit may be applied as the final payment for the
valuable materials in the event the department determines that adequate
security exists for the performance or fulfillment of any remaining
obligations of the purchaser under the sale contract.
(4) Advance payments or other adequate security acceptable to the
department is required for valuable materials sold on a scale sale
basis or a lump sum sale not requiring full payment on the day of sale.
(a) The purchaser must notify the department before any operation
takes place on the sale site.
(b) Upon notification as provided in (a) of this subsection, the
department must require advanced payment or may allow purchasers to
submit adequate security.
(c) The amount of advanced payments or security must be determined
by the department and must at all times equal or exceed the value of
timber cut and other valuable materials processed or removed until paid
for.
(d) Security may be bank letters of credit, payment bonds,
assignments of savings accounts, assignments of certificates of
deposit, or other methods acceptable to the department as adequate
security.
(5) All valuable material must be removed from the sale area within
the period specified in the contract.
(a) The specified period may not exceed five years from date of
purchase except for stone, sand, gravel, fill material, or building
stone.
(b) The specified period for stone, sand, gravel, fill material, or
building stone may not exceed thirty years.
(c) In all cases, any valuable material not removed from the land
within the period specified in the contract reverts to the state. The
department may utilize any remaining forest biomass in accordance with
chapter 79.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).
(6) The department may extend a contract beyond the normal
termination date specified in the sale contract as the time for removal
of valuable materials when, in the department's judgment, the purchaser
is acting in good faith and endeavoring to remove the materials. The
extension is contingent upon payment of the fees specified below.
(a) The extended time for removal shall not exceed:
(i) Forty years from date of purchase for stone, sand, gravel, fill
material, or building stone;
(ii) A total of ten years beyond the original termination date for
all other valuable materials.
(b) An extension fee fixed by the department will be charged based
on the estimated loss of income per acre to the state resulting from
the granting of the extension plus interest on the unpaid portion of
the contract. The board must periodically fix and adopt by rule the
interest rate, which shall not be less than six percent per annum.
(c) The sale contract shall specify:
(i) The applicable rate of interest as fixed at the day of sale and
the maximum extension payment; and
(ii) The method for calculating the unpaid portion of the contract
upon which interest is paid.
(d) The minimum extension fee is fifty dollars per extension plus
interest on the unpaid portion of the contract.
(e) Moneys received for any extension must be credited to the same
fund in the state treasury as was credited the original purchase price
of the valuable material sold.
(7) The department may, in addition to any other securities,
require a performance security to guarantee compliance with all
contract requirements. The security is limited to those types listed
in subsection (4) of this section. The value of the performance
security will, at all times, equal or exceed the value of work
performed or to be performed by the purchaser.
(8) The department does not need to comply with the provisions of
this chapter for forest biomass except as described in the provisions
of chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this
act). Forest biomass may not be included in any sales contract
authorized under this chapter unless the department has complied with
the provisions of chapter 79.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section
13 of this act).
(9) The provisions of this section apply unless otherwise provided
by statute.

Sec. 10 RCW 79.15.220 and 2001 c 250 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the department finds valuable materials on state land that are
damaged by fire, wind, flood, or from any other cause, it shall
determine if the salvage of the damaged valuable materials is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held, which may
include the salvage of forest biomass under chapter 79.-- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 13 of this act). If salvaging the valuable
materials is in the best interest of the trust, the department shall
proceed to offer the valuable materials for sale. The valuable
materials, when offered for sale, must be sold in the most expeditious
and efficient manner as determined by the department. In determining
if the sale is in the best interest of the trust the department shall
consider the net value of the valuable materials and relevant elements
of the physical and social environment.

Sec. 11 RCW 79.15.510 and 2009 c 418 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a contract harvesting program for
directly contracting for the removal of timber and other valuable
materials from state lands and for conducting silvicultural treatments
consistent with RCW 79.15.540.
(2) The contract requirements must be compatible with the office of
financial management's guide to public service contracts.
(3) The department may not use contract harvesting for more than
twenty percent of the total annual volume of timber offered for sale.
However, volume removed primarily to address an identified forest
health issue under RCW 79.15.540 may not be included in calculating the
((ten [twenty] percent)) annual limit of contract harvesting sales.
Forest biomass resulting from harvesting to address an identified
forest health issue under RCW 79.15.540 may be utilized in accordance
with chapter 79.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this
act).

Sec. 12 RCW 79.15.510 and 2004 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may establish a contract harvesting program for
directly contracting for the removal of timber and other valuable
materials from state lands and for conducting silvicultural treatments
consistent with RCW 79.15.540.
(2) The contract requirements must be compatible with the office of
financial management's guide to public service contracts.
(3) The department may not use contract harvesting for more than
ten percent of the total annual volume of timber offered for sale.
However, volume removed primarily to address an identified forest
health issue under RCW 79.15.540 may not be included in calculating the
((ten percent)) annual limit of contract harvesting sales. Forest
biomass resulting from harvesting to address an identified forest
health issue under RCW 79.15.540 may be utilized in accordance with
chapter 79.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 11 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 12 of this act takes effect January
1, 2014.

--- END ---