BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the members
of the sustainable recreation work group created in chapter 195, Laws
of 2008 volunteered numerous hours and dedicated considerable personal
resources and knowledge to aid the legislature with the development of
recommendations aimed at improving recreational opportunities on land
managed by the department of natural resources. Their dedication and
contributions deserve the respect and appreciation of everyone who
enjoys recreating in Washington's great outdoor spaces.
(2) The legislature further finds that the input and expertise of
these volunteers, which was presented to the legislature in a final
report dated December 2009, has created an invaluable document that
deserves consideration by state policymakers both today and into the
future.
(3) It is the intent of this act to adopt certain policy
recommendations developed by the sustainable recreation work group that
are capable of being implemented in the near term and that may provide
near-term benefits to sustainable recreation or additional information
that may be used to improve recreational activities in Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.10.140 and 2007 c 241 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized:
(1)(a) To construct, operate, and maintain primitive outdoor
recreation and conservation facilities on lands under its jurisdiction
which are of primitive character when deemed necessary by the
department to achieve maximum effective development of such lands and
resources consistent with the purposes for which the lands are held.
((This))
(b) The authority provided by this section shall be exercised only
after review by the recreation and conservation funding board and
determination by the recreation and conservation funding board that the
department is the most appropriate agency to undertake such
construction, operation, and maintenance. Such review is not required
for campgrounds designated and prepared or approved by the department.
(c) The department may convey the responsibility to construct,
operate, or maintain recreation facilities to a concessionaire as
provided in section 3 of this act;
(2) To acquire right-of-way and develop public access to lands
under the jurisdiction of the department and suitable for public
outdoor recreation and conservation purposes;
(3) To receive and expend funds from federal and state outdoor
recreation funding measures for the purposes of this section and RCW
79A.50.110;
(4)(a) To assess use charges on individuals or groups for the
privilege of accessing specific recreation sites or hosting or
attending specific events located on public lands.
(b)(i) Prior to assessing use charges under this section, the
department must develop and adopt by rule a detailed structure for the
setting and the efficient collection of the appropriate use charge.
The dollar amount and collection technique of any use charge must be
developed in a manner that ensures use charge collections generate more
revenue than the department must expend to collect the use charges.
(ii) In addition to the rule-making requirements of chapter 34.05
RCW, when developing rules for the implementation of this subsection,
the department shall initiate a public process that allows for the
formal solicitation of input as to how the department could implement
waivers from use charges for individuals who volunteer their time with
the department and how the department can address strategies for
avoiding the exclusion of certain population segments from recreating
on public lands.
(c) All revenues collected through use charges under this section
must be reinvested by the department into the management of, and the
provision of recreational opportunities at, the site where the use
charge was collected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.10 RCW
under the subchapter heading "part 2 multiple use" to read as follows:
(1) The department shall initiate a pilot project to better
understand how private concessionaires could be compatible with the
department's tradition of providing primitive, relatively dispersed
recreation experiences and whether allowing concessionaires access to
well-suited campgrounds could improve the quality of service provided
while reducing management costs to the department.
(2)(a) To accomplish the goals of this section, the department
shall initiate two private concessionaire pilot projects. One project
must be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one
project must be located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.
The temporal length of each project must be determined by the
department.
(b) In structuring the pilot projects, the department shall
maintain the necessary oversight to ensure the continued support for
the needs of recreational users and explore ways to ensure that
potential recreational users are not being precluded by high fees and
costs. The pilot projects must also be structured in a manner that is
consistent with any use charges developed under RCW 79.10.140.
(3) In addition to the goals of subsection (1) of this section, the
pilot project may be used to investigate other questions deemed
relevant by the department. These questions may include:
(a) How concessionaire contracts can best be developed and
evaluated?
(b) Whether the concessionaire model would apply to recreation
sites funded by the recreation and conservation office or other state
agencies? and
(c) If user surveys identify a risk of concessionaire utilization
creating an exclusionary effect at campgrounds?
(4) The department shall prepare two reports to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036,
summarizing the information learned during the pilot project process.
The first report must be a progress report and must be delivered by
November 22, 2011. The second report must be delivered after the end
date of both pilot projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of natural resources and
the department of fish and wildlife shall formally explore how the two
agencies can develop and implement a multiagency pass that would allow
the holder to access any fee-based recreational lands managed by the
agencies in lieu of paying a separate access fee to an individual
agency.
(2) The proposed structure for a multiagency recreation pass must:
(a) Integrate the new pass with other passes or site or event-specific fees or charges;
(b) Include processes for exploring the inclusion of lands managed
by the federal government;
(c) Consider how funds can be efficiently collected and reinvested
into recreational opportunities;
(d) Include waivers or reduced charges for individuals who are
active volunteers with either of the agencies; and
(e) Consider methods that will avoid excluding segments of the
population from recreating on public lands.
(3) The final result of the agency collaboration required by this
section must be delivered to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 22, 2010, consistent with the provisions of RCW
43.01.036. The results must be delivered in the form of proposed
legislation with accompanying documents explaining the approach taken,
the questions remaining unanswered, barriers to success, the positive
and negative attributes associated with the proposed legislation, and
any addition analyses deemed appropriate by the two agencies.
(4) This section expires August 1, 2011.

Sec. 5 RCW 4.24.210 and 2006 c 212 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowners or others in lawful
possession and control of any lands whether designated resource, rural,
or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to such areas
or channels, who allow members of the public to use them for the
purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is not limited
to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private persons
for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking,
bicycling, skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities,
hanggliding, paragliding, rock climbing, the riding of horses or other
animals, clam digging, pleasure driving of off-road vehicles,
snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature study, winter or water
sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological, scenic, or
scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this
section, any public or private landowner or others in lawful possession
and control of any lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or
channels and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who offer or
allow such land to be used for purposes of a fish or wildlife
cooperative project, or allow access to such land for cleanup of litter
or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional injuries to
any volunteer group or to any other users.
(3) Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession
and control of the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to
twenty-five dollars for the cutting, gathering, and removing of
firewood from the land.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent the liability of a
landowner or others in lawful possession and control for injuries
sustained to users by reason of a known dangerous artificial latent
condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted.
A fixed anchor used in rock climbing and put in place by someone other
than a landowner is not a known dangerous artificial latent condition
and a landowner under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
liable for unintentional injuries resulting from the condition or use
of such an anchor. Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and this section limits or
expands in any way the doctrine of attractive nuisance. Usage by
members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is permissive
and does not support any claim of adverse possession.
(5) For purposes of this section, the following are not fees:
(a) A license or permit issued for statewide use under the
authority of chapter 79A.05 RCW or Title 77 or 79 RCW; ((and))
(b) A use charge issued under the authority of RCW 79.10.140; and
(c) A daily charge not to exceed twenty dollars per person, per
day, for access to a publicly owned ORV sports park, as defined in RCW
46.09.020, or other public facility accessed by a highway, street, or
nonhighway road for the purposes of off-road vehicle use.

--- END ---