BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that:
(1) The state is projected to experience substantial population
growth in the next two decades and this growth will require substantial
new housing, places of employment, community facilities, and supporting
local, subregional, and regional infrastructure;
(2) In most areas of the state projected to accommodate substantial
growth, there are inadequate community facilities and infrastructure to
facilitate and support such growth. In addition, current public
financing options and resources are not adequate to provide the needed
community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure;
(3) A more flexible type of financing mechanism known as a
community facilities district should be available to counties, cities,
and towns so that needed community facilities and local, subregional,
and regional infrastructure can be provided;
(4) This chapter is intended to facilitate voluntary landowner
financing of community facilities and local, subregional, and regional
infrastructure by authorizing the creation of community facilities
districts, while creating jobs and facilitating economic development;
and
(5) It is in the interest of the people of the state of Washington
to authorize the establishment of community facility districts as
independently governed, special purpose districts, vested with the
corporate authority included under Article VII, section 9 of the state
Constitution to make local improvements in accordance with this chapter
and to carry out the purposes specifically authorized under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board of supervisors" or "board" means the governing body of
a community facilities district.
(2) "Community facilities district" or "district" means a district
created under this chapter.
(3) "Facility" or "facilities" means the local improvements
included under section 501 of this act.
(4) "Legislative authority" means the governing body of a county,
city, or town to which a petition or amended petition is submitted.
(a) If the proposed district is located entirely within
unincorporated land, then the county is the exclusive "legislative
authority" for purposes of approving formation of the district under
sections 201 through 206 of this act, inclusive, and section 301 of
this act.
(b) If all or a portion of the proposed district is located within
unincorporated land that is entirely surrounded by an incorporated city
or town, then the "legislative authority" for purposes of approving
formation of the district under sections 201 through 206 of this act,
inclusive, and section 301 of this act includes the governing bodies of
the county and the city or town surrounding the unincorporated land.
(c) If the proposed district is located entirely within
incorporated land, then the city or town is the exclusive "legislative
authority" for purposes of this chapter, and all powers and
responsibilities of a county under this chapter must be exercised by
that city or town.
(5) "Petition" means a request, meeting the requirements of section
201 of this act, made by landowners to form a community facilities
district and to voluntarily submit their land to the assessments
authorized under this chapter and includes an amended petition meeting
the requirements of section 201(3) of this act.
(6) "Special assessment" means an assessment imposed in accordance
with the requirements of this chapter.

PART II
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT FORMATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 Community facilities districts are
authorized to be formed for the purposes authorized under this chapter.
Community facilities districts may only include land within urban
growth areas designated under the state growth management act, located
in portions of one or more cities, towns, or counties when created in
accordance with this chapter. A district may include one or more
noncontiguous tracts, lots, parcels, or other properties meeting the
requirements of this chapter.
(1) To form a community facilities district, a petition must be
presented to the applicable legislative authorities. The petition
must:
(a) Designate and describe the boundaries of the district by metes
and bounds or reference to United States townships, ranges, and legal
subdivisions;
(b) Be executed by one hundred percent of all owners of private
property located within the boundaries of the proposed district. The
property owners must include a request to subject their property to the
assessments, up to the amount included in the petition and authorized
under this chapter;
(c) Include a certification by the petitioners that they want to
voluntarily submit their property to the authority of the district
under this chapter to approve the petitioner's request to submit their
property to the assessments, up to the amount included in the petition
and authorized under this chapter;
(d) Include a general explanation of the objective and plan of the
district and describe the specific facilities that the district
anticipates financing;
(e) Declare the district will be conducive to public health,
safety, and welfare;
(f) Assert that the purpose for forming the district will be a
benefit to the land located in the district;
(g) Be accompanied by an "obligation" signed by at least two
petitioners who agree to pay the costs of the formation process;
(h) Include a list of petitioners or representatives thereof who
are willing and able to serve on the board of supervisors. All
petitioners within a proposed district who are natural persons, or
natural persons who are designated representatives of petitioners, are
eligible to include their name on the list of eligible supervisors.
The petitioners may nominate qualified professions to serve on the
board of supervisors in lieu of the petitioners or representatives of
the petitioners;
(i) If it proposes a special assessment, include: (i) A diagram
showing each separate lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property in
the district; (ii) the acreage of the property; (iii) the name and
address of the owner or reputed owner of each lot, tract, parcel of
land, or other property as shown on the tax rolls of the county
assessor; (iv) a preliminary assessment roll showing the special
assessment proposed to be imposed on each lot, tract, parcel of land,
or other property; and (v) a proposed method or combination of methods
for computing special assessments, determining the benefit to assessed
property or use from facilities or improvements funded directly or
indirectly by special assessments under this chapter; and
(j) Include an explanation of what security will be provided to
ensure the timely payment of assessments and the timely payment of
bonds issued by the district.
(2) The petition must be filed with the auditor of each county in
which property included within the proposed district is located. The
auditor for the county in which the largest geographic portion of the
proposed district is located must be the lead auditor for the purposes
of this section. Within thirty days of the lead auditor's receipt of
the petition, the lead auditor must confirm that the petition has been
validly executed by one hundred percent of all owners of the property
located within the proposed district, including confirmation by the
auditors of all other counties with whom the petition was filed.
Within ten days of the lead auditor's finding that the petition either
does or does not contain the required signatures, the lead auditor must
either (a) transmit the petition, together with a certificate of
sufficiency attached thereto, to each legislative authority petitioned
for formation of the district; or (b) return the petition to the
petitioners with a list of property owners who must sign the petition
in order to comply with this section. There are no restrictions on the
number of petitions that may be submitted by one or more property
owners.
(3) A petition may be amended for any reason if the amendment is
signed by one hundred percent of the owners of property located within
the district proposed in the amended petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 A public hearing on the petition for
formation of a district must be held by each applicable legislative
authority, not less than thirty, but not more than sixty days, from the
date that the lead county auditor issues the certificate of sufficiency
required under section 201 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Notice of all public hearings must include
a description of the proposal, be mailed to all petitioners, and must
be published once a week for three consecutive weeks in the official
paper for each applicable legislative authority, prior to the date set
for the hearing. The notice must be posted for not less than fifteen
days prior to the date of the hearing in each of three public places
within the boundaries of the proposed district and in three public
places for each applicable legislative authority. Each notice must
contain the time, date, and place of the public hearing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 At the time and place of the public
hearing, the legislative authority must consider the petition. The
legislative authority may receive any evidence it deems material that
supports or opposes the formation of the district, including the
inclusion or exclusion of land. Unless an amended petition satisfying
the requirements of section 201 of this act is approved in accordance
with the requirements of this chapter, no land outside the boundaries
described in the petition may be included within the proposed district.
No land inside the boundaries of an approved petition may be removed
from the district unless an amended petition satisfying the
requirements of section 201 of this act is approved in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 (1) The legislative authority may act on
the petition to form a community facilities district at the public
hearing held under section 204 of this act and in no event may the
legislative authority's decision be issued later than thirty days after
the day of the public hearing. The applicable legislative authority
may approve the petition by resolution if the applicable legislative
authority determines, in its sole discretion, that the petitioners will
benefit from the proposed district and that the formation of the
district will be in the best interest of the county, city or town, as
applicable, and that formation of the district is consistent with the
requirements of Washington's growth management act.
(2) A community facilities district may not be formed unless each
applicable legislative authority makes the finding required under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) All resolutions approving a petition must conform to the terms
and conditions contained in the petition, including the maximum amounts
of special assessments set forth in the petition, and must designate
the name and number of the community facilities district being formed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 (1) Any person who objects to formation of
the district may appeal the final decision of a legislative authority
to approve a petition for formation of a community facilities district
by filing an appeal with the superior court of the county in which any
part of the district is located within thirty days of the effective
date of the resolution approving formation of the district.
(2) If no appeal is timely filed, then the legislative authority's
decision is deemed valid, complete, and final, and neither the legal
existence of the district, nor the terms and conditions of an approved
petition can thereafter be challenged or questioned by any person on
the grounds of procedural defect or otherwise. Certified copies of
each resolution approving a district must be filed with the auditor of
the county or counties in which the community facilities district is
located.

PART III
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT BOARD OF SUPERVISORS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) A community facilities district must
be governed by a board of supervisors possessing the powers set forth
under section 401 of this act. The board of supervisors must be
appointed by each applicable legislative authority within sixty days of
the formation of the district. Except as expressly provided under this
section, each applicable legislative authority is authorized to appoint
members to the board of supervisors only from among the members of its
own governing body. Each applicable legislative authority must appoint
the petitioner members or nominees required under subsection (2) or (3)
of this section. The term of office of each supervisor is three years
and until a successor is appointed, except that the supervisors first
appointed serve for one and two years respectively from the date of
their appointments, as designated in their appointments.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if the
proposed district is located entirely within a single jurisdiction,
then the board of supervisors consists of: (a) Three members of the
legislative authority of the jurisdiction; and (b) two members
appointed from among the list of eligible supervisors included in the
petition as provided in section 201(1)(h) of this act. All members of
the board of supervisors must be natural persons.
(3) If all or a portion of the proposed district is located within
unincorporated land that is entirely surrounded by an incorporated city
or town, then the board of supervisors consists of: (a) Two members
appointed from the county legislative authority; (b) two members
appointed from the legislative authority of the city or town that is
the additional legislative authority under section 102(4) of this act;
and (c) one member appointed from the list of eligible petitioners
included in the petition as provided in section 201(1)(h) of this act,
depending on the number of additional members that are required to
result in an overall odd number of supervisors.
(4) If the county, city, or town is the exclusive legislative
authority pursuant to section 102 of this act, then the board of
supervisors consists of: (a) Three members appointed from such county,
city, or town; and (b) two members from the list of eligible
petitioners or nominees included in the petition, as provided in
section 201(1)(h) of this act, to result in an overall odd number of
supervisors.
(5) The legislative authorities may appoint qualified professionals
with expertise in municipal finance in lieu of one or more appointments
authorized in this section. A jurisdiction's appointments to the board
of supervisors may consist of a combination of qualified professionals
authorized under this section and one or more members from the
applicable legislative authority. Nothing contained in this section
authorizes a legislative authority to exceed the maximum number of
appointments set forth under subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(6) A vacancy on the board must be filled by the legislative
authority authorized to make the appointment to the applicable
supervisor position under this section. Vacancies must be filled by a
person in the same position vacating the board, which for initial
petitioner members or nominees includes successor owners of property
located within the boundaries of an approved district. If the approved
district was originally located entirely on unincorporated land and the
unincorporated land has been annexed into a city or town, then, as of
the effective date of annexation, the city or town is deemed the
exclusive legislative authority for the purposes of this chapter and
the composition of the board must be structured accordingly, as
provided in this section. Supervisors must serve without compensation,
but they are entitled to expenses, including traveling expenses,
necessarily incurred in discharge of their duties. The board must
designate a chair from time to time.

PART IV
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT POWERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) A community facilities district
created in accordance with this chapter is an independently governed,
special purpose district, vested with the corporate authority included
under Article VII, section 9 of the state Constitution to make local
improvements by special assessment in accordance with this chapter.
Nothing in this chapter exempts the public improvements and facilities
provided by a district from the regulatory and land use permitting
requirements of the county, city, or town in which the improvements are
to be located.
(2) Subject to the terms and conditions of an approved petition, a
community facilities district has the powers necessary to carry out the
specific purposes authorized under this chapter in order to carry out
the specific objectives, plan, and facilities identified in the
approved petition including, but not limited to, the authority to:
(a) Acquire, purchase, hold, lease, finance, manage, occupy,
construct, and sell real and personal property, facilities, or any
interest therein, either inside or outside of the boundaries of the
district, except that any such property, facilities, or interests
outside the boundaries of the district must directly serve facilities
or benefit properties within the district;
(b) Finance and construct facilities authorized under this chapter;
(c) Enter into and perform any and all contracts;
(d) Levy and enforce the collection of special assessments against
the property included within a district;
(e) Enter into lease-purchase agreements with or without an option
to purchase;
(f) Enter into executory conditional sales contracts, leases, and
installment promissory notes;
(g) Borrow money to the extent and in the manner authorized by this
chapter;
(h) Hold in trust property useful to accomplishment of the
authority granted under this chapter;
(i) Issue revenue bonds in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW and
assessment bonds in accordance with chapter 35.45 RCW, and the
requirements of this chapter, payable from revenue or assessments,
respectively, of the district that is legally available to be pledged
to secure the bonds;
(j) Contract with any municipal corporation, governmental, or
private agencies to carry out the purposes authorized by this chapter;
(k) Sue and be sued;
(l) Accept and receive on behalf of the district any money or
property donated, devised, or bequeathed to the district and carry out
the terms of the donation, devise, or bequest, if it is within the
powers granted by law to community facilities districts or, in the
absence of such terms, expend or use the money or property for district
purposes as determined by the board of supervisors;
(m) Transfer to any county, city, or other municipal corporation,
without compensation, any property or other assets of the district; and
(n) Do any and all lawful acts required and expedient to carry out
the express authority provided in this chapter.

PART V
COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT FINANCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) Through the use of district revenue
derived through special assessments and bonds authorized under this
chapter and, consistent with the terms and conditions of a petition
approved in accordance with this chapter, a community facilities
district may finance all or a portion of the following costs, expenses,
and facilities whether located inside or outside the boundaries of an
approved district:
(a) The cost, or any portion thereof, of the purchase, finance,
lease, sublease, construction, expansion, improvement, or
rehabilitation of any facility with an estimated life of five years or
longer;
(b) The planning and design work that is directly related to the
purchase, construction, expansion, improvement, or rehabilitation of a
facility, including engineering, architectural, planning, and
inspection costs;
(c) Facilities listed in RCW 35.43.040 to the extent not specified
in this section;
(d) Sanitary sewage systems, including collection, transport,
storage, treatment, dispersal, effluent use, and discharge;
(e) Drainage and flood control systems, including collection,
transport, diversion, storage, detention, retention, dispersal, use,
and discharge;
(f) Water systems for domestic, industrial, irrigation, municipal,
or community facilities purposes, including production, collection,
storage, treatment, transport, delivery, connection, and dispersal;
(g) Highways, streets, roadways, and parking facilities, including
all areas for vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(h) Areas for pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle, or other nonmotor
vehicle use for travel, ingress, egress, and parking;
(i) Pedestrian malls, parks, recreational facilities, and open-space facilities for the use of members of the public for
entertainment, assembly, and recreation;
(j) Landscaping, including earthworks, structures, lakes, and other
water features, plants, trees, and related water delivery systems;
(k) Public buildings, public safety facilities, and community
facilities;
(l) Publicly owned natural gas transmission and distribution
facilities, facilities for the transmission or distribution of
electrical energy, and limited communications facilities, specifically
poles, trenches, and conduits, for use of any communications provider;
(m) Street lighting;
(n) Traffic control systems and devices, including signals,
controls, markings, and signage;
(o) Systems of surface, underground, or overhead railways,
tramways, buses, or any other means of mass transportation facilities,
including passenger, terminal, station parking, and related facilities
and areas for passenger and vehicular use for travel, ingress, egress,
and parking;
(p) Library, educational, and cultural facilities; and
(q) Facilities similar to those listed in this section.
(2) The district may not finance public or private residential
dwellings, nonprofit facilities as defined in RCW 43.180.300, health
care facilities as defined in RCW 70.37.020, higher education
institutions as defined in RCW 28B.07.020, or economic development
activities as defined in RCW 43.163.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 (1) The board of supervisors of a
community facilities district may impose special assessments on
property located inside the district and benefited by the facilities
and improvements provided, or to be provided, by a district, whether
the facilities and improvements are located inside or outside of the
boundaries of the proposed district. The requirements and powers of a
district relating to the formation, assessment, collection,
foreclosure, and other powers of a special assessment district are as
set forth in chapters 35.43, 35.44, 35.49, and 35.50 RCW, except where
otherwise addressed under this chapter. In any case where the
provisions of this chapter conflict with the requirements under any
other chapter that applies to the formation, assessment, collection,
foreclosure, or other powers of a special assessment district, the
provisions of this chapter control.
(2) Except as otherwise expressly provided under this chapter, the
special assessments imposed and collected on property within a district
may not exceed the amount set forth in a petition or amended petition
approved in accordance with this chapter.
(3) The term of the special assessment is limited to the lesser of
(a) twenty-eight years or (b) two years less than the term of any bonds
issued by or on behalf of the district to which the assessments or
other revenue of the district is specifically dedicated, pledged, or
obligated.
(4) The computation of special assessments must follow the
requirements of chapter 35.44 RCW, including the authority to use any
method or combination of methods to compute assessments which may be
deemed by the board of supervisors to fairly reflect the benefit to the
properties being assessed. The method of assessment may utilize the
supplemental authority granted under chapter 35.51 RCW. A petition
meeting the requirements of section 201 of this act may provide for the
reduction or waiver of special assessments for low-income households as
that term is defined in RCW 36.130.010.
(5) The board must set a date, time, and place for hearing any
objections to the assessment roll, which hearing must occur no later
than one hundred twenty days from final approval of formation of the
district. Petitioners or representatives thereof serving on the board
of supervisors must not participate in the determination of the special
assessment roll or vote on the confirmation of that assessment roll.
The restriction in this subsection does not apply to members of the
board of supervisors appointed from among the qualified professionals
that petitioners may nominate under section 201(1)(h) of this act.
(6) The procedures and requirements for assessments, hearings on
the assessment roll, filing of objections to the assessment roll, and
appeals from the decision of the board approving or rejecting the
assessment roll, must be as set forth in RCW 35.44.010 through
35.44.020, 35.44.080 through 35.44.110, and 35.44.190 through
35.44.270.
(7) At the hearing on the assessment roll and, in no event later
than thirty days after the day of the hearing, the board may adopt a
resolution approving the assessment roll or may correct, revise, raise,
lower, change, or modify the assessment roll or any part thereof, and
provide the petitioner with a detailed explanation of the changes made
by the board.
(8) If the assessment roll is revised by the board in any way,
then, within thirty days of the board's decision, the petitioner(s)
must unanimously make one of the following elections: (a) Rescind the
petition; or (b) accept the changes made by the board, upon which
occurrence the board must adopt a resolution approving the assessment
roll as modified by the board.
(9) Reassessments, assessments on omitted property, and
supplemental assessments are governed by the provisions set forth under
chapter 35.44 RCW.
(10) Any assessment approved under the provisions of this chapter
may be segregated upon a petition of one hundred percent of the owners
of the property subject to the assessment to be segregated. The
segregation must be made as nearly as possible on the same basis as the
original assessment was levied and approved by the board. The board,
in approving a petition for segregation and amendment of the assessment
roll, must do so in a fashion such that the total of the segregated
parts of the assessment equal the assessment before segregation. As to
any property originally entered upon the roll the assessment upon which
has not been raised, no objections to the approval of the petition for
segregation, the resulting assessment, or the amended assessment roll
may be considered by the jurisdiction in which the district is located,
the board, or by any court on appeal. Assessments must be collected in
districts pursuant to the district's previous assessment roll until the
amendment to the assessment roll is finalized under this section.
(11) Except as provided under chapter 35.44 RCW, assessments may
not be increased without the approval of one hundred percent of the
property owners subject to the proposed increase.
(12) Special assessments must be collected by the district
treasurer determined in accordance with section 505 of this act.
(13) A notice of any special assessment imposed under this chapter
must be provided to the owner of the assessed property, not less than
once per year, with the following appearing at the top of the page in
at least fourteen point, bold font:

****NOTICE****

THIS PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO THE ASSESSMENTS ITEMIZED BELOW AND APPROVED
BY COMMUNITY FACILITIES DISTRICT # . . . . .. AS THE OWNER OR
POTENTIAL BUYER OF THIS PROPERTY, YOU ARE, OR WOULD BE, RESPONSIBLE FOR
PAYMENT OF THE AMOUNTS ITEMIZED BELOW.

PLEASE REFER TO RCW 36.--.--- (section 502, chapter . . ., Laws of 2010
(section 502 of this act)) OR CONTACT YOUR COUNTY AUDITOR FOR
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.

(14) The district treasurer responsible for collecting special
assessments may account for the costs of handling the assessments and
may collect a fee not to exceed the measurable costs incurred by the
treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 (1) The district may utilize the special
assessments and revenue derived in accordance with this chapter for the
payment of principal and interest on bonds issued pursuant to the
authority granted under this chapter to fund or reimburse the costs of
facilities authorized under this chapter and prior to the issuance of
bonds, may utilize the revenue to directly fund the costs of providing
the facilities authorized under this chapter on a pay-as-you-go basis.
(2) The board of supervisors may establish, administer, and pay or
otherwise dedicate, pledge, or obligate the assessments and revenue
generated in accordance with this chapter into a specific fund created
by or on behalf of the district, in order to guarantee payment of
obligations incurred in connection with facilities provided under this
chapter, including the payment of principal and interest on any bonds
issued by or on behalf of the district.
(3) The proceeds of any bond issued pursuant to this chapter may be
used to pay any and all costs related to providing the facilities
authorized under this chapter, including expenses incurred in
connection with issuance of the bonds.
(4) The reporting requirements of RCW 39.44.210 apply to any bond
issuance under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 No bonds issued by or on behalf of a
community facilities district are obligations of any city, town,
county, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
other than the district and the bonds must so state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 (1) If a district includes land that is
entirely within a county and the land is not surrounded entirely by a
city or town, then the treasurer of that county is the treasurer of the
district. If a district includes land that is entirely within a county
and the land is entirely surrounded by a city or town, or, if parts of
the district include land within or surrounded by more than one
jurisdiction, then the board of supervisors may, with the concurrence
of the treasurers of all jurisdictions within which the district lies,
appoint the treasurer of any of those jurisdictions to serve as the
district treasurer. Except as specifically provided under this
chapter, the duties of a district treasurer are as provided under
applicable law.
(2) The district treasurer must establish a community facilities
district fund, into which must be paid all district revenues. The
district treasurer must also maintain any special funds created by the
board of supervisors of the community facilities district, into which
the district treasurer must place all money as the board of supervisors
may, by resolution, direct. The treasurer may create such subfunds,
accounts, and subaccounts as he or she deems necessary, consistent with
applicable law.
(3) The district treasurer must pay assessment bonds and revenue
bonds and the accrued interest thereon in accordance with their terms
from the appropriate fund when interest or principal payments become
due.
(4) All interest collected on community facilities district funds
belongs to the district and must be deposited to its credit in the
proper district funds.

PART VI
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 All assessments imposed on the respective
lots, tracts, parcels of land, and other property included within the
boundaries of an approved district in accordance with this chapter, are
a lien upon the property from the date of final approval and are
paramount and superior to any other lien or encumbrance whatsoever,
theretofore or thereafter created, except a lien for general taxes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Sections 101 through 601 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---