BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state building code council shall:
(a) Review local and nationally recognized green building and
energy efficiency programs, standards, and codes currently in use or
being developed for use by 2012 that: (i) Establish criteria for
energy efficiency, indoor air quality, environmental responsibility,
and resource efficiency, including a life cycle assessment of building
products; (ii) provides for varying levels of certified green homes;
and (iii) establishes energy efficiency levels;
(b) Review local or national green building and energy efficiency
programs, standards, and codes establishing national accreditation or
certification criteria for third-party inspection agencies and firms
conducting plan review and inspection services as a method to verify
compliance with the green building or energy efficiency program,
standard, or code;
(c) Evaluate the feasibility of creating a residential energy code
appendix that is consistent with the state energy code adopted under
chapter 19.27A RCW and RCW 19.27A.015 for local jurisdictions to adopt
by reference; and
(d) Identify and evaluate the impacts to local jurisdictions
required to implement this act.
(2)(a) The state building code council shall conduct the study
required under subsection (1) of this section in collaboration with
interested stakeholders including representatives of the department of
commerce, the Washington State University extension energy office, the
Washington association of realtors, the Washington association of
building officials, the building industry association of Washington,
local master builder association green programs, the appraiser
coalition of Washington, and the American institute of architects,
Washington council.
(b) The state building code council shall provide a report of its
findings to the legislature by December 1, 2011. The report must
include recommendations for the expected percent of energy efficiency
gains that may be achieved above national model energy codes; provide
recommendations to facilitate implementation by local jurisdictions of
the definitions for energy efficient home and green home;
recommendations for consideration of the embodied energy consumption in
differing types of construction materials; and identify impacts to the
housing market.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2012, the state building code council shall
adopt rules, in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW, to define: (a)
Green home; and (b) energy efficient home for: (i) A group R-3 single-family dwelling unit; and (ii) a duplex residential dwelling unit or a
townhouse residential dwelling unit constructed under the provisions of
the international residential code or group R-2 apartment houses with
residential dwelling units, as defined in section 310 of the 2009
international building code. The rules must be developed in
consideration of the information and recommendations developed from the
review of local and national energy efficient and green home criteria
as required under section 1 of this act and in collaboration with
interested stakeholders identified in section 1(2)(a) of this act.
(2) The state building code council must:
(a) Review the rules every three years coinciding with the reviews
and updates to the Washington state energy code as required in chapter
423, Laws of 2009. The review of the definitions of green home and
energy efficient home must be included as an element of the Washington
state energy code progress report as required in chapter 423, Laws of
2009;
(b) Review the definitions of green home and energy efficient home
in 2030. The definitions developed under subsection (1) of this
section expire July 1, 2031, unless extended by the legislature; and
(c) Provide energy efficient home compliance methods that are
consistent with the mandatory sections of the Washington state energy
code, including a method to show compliance using the prescriptive, the
component performance, or the systems analysis approaches, and
prescribe labels for an energy efficient home that are consistent with
energy efficiency labeling required by the energy code.
(3) The state building code council, after considering the
feasibility of creating a residential energy code appendix, may publish
an appendix of the requirements for an energy efficient home for each
revised edition of the Washington state energy code.
(4) A local building department or a third-party inspector approved
by a local building department may provide plan review and inspections
for energy efficient homes.

--- END ---