BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Asbestos" means any type of asbestos including, without
limitation, chrysotile, amosite, crocidolite, tremolite asbestos,
anthophyllite asbestos, actinolite asbestos, and any of these minerals
that have been chemically treated or altered.
(2) "Asbestos claim" means any claim, wherever or whenever made,
for damages, losses, indemnification, contribution, or other relief
arising out of, based on, or in any way related to asbestos, including:
(a) The health effects of exposure to asbestos, including any claim
for:
(i) Personal injury or death;
(ii) Mental or emotional injury;
(iii) Risk of disease or other injury; or
(iv) The costs of medical monitoring or surveillance, to the extent
such claims are recognized under state law;
(b) Any claim made by or on behalf of any person exposed to
asbestos, or a representative, spouse, parent, child, or other relative
of the person; and
(c) Any claim for damage or loss caused by the installation,
presence, or removal of asbestos.
(3) "Corporation" means a corporation for profit, including a
domestic corporation organized under the laws of this state or a
foreign corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this
state.
(4) "Successor" means a corporation that assumes or incurs, or has
assumed or incurred, successor asbestos-related liabilities before
January 1, 1972, or a successor of that successor.
(5) "Successor asbestos-related liabilities" means any liabilities,
whether known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, absolute or
contingent, accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated, or due or
to become due, that are related in any way to asbestos claims, and that
were assumed or incurred by a corporation as a result of or in
connection with a merger or consolidation, or the plan of merger or
consolidation related to the merger or consolidation, with or into
another corporation or that are related in any way to asbestos claims
based on the exercise of control or the ownership of stock of the
corporation before the merger or consolidation. "Successor asbestos-related liabilities" includes liabilities that, after the time of the
merger or consolidation for which the fair market value of total gross
assets is determined under section 3 of this act, are or were paid or
otherwise discharged, or committed to be paid or otherwise discharged,
by or on behalf of the corporation, by a successor of the corporation,
or by or on behalf of a transferor, in connection with settlements,
judgments, or other discharges in this state or another jurisdiction.
(6) "Transferor" means a corporation from which successor asbestos-related liabilities are or were assumed or incurred.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Except as further limited in subsection
(2) of this section, the cumulative successor asbestos-related
liabilities of a corporation are limited to the fair market value of
the total gross assets of the transferor determined as of the time of
the merger or consolidation. The corporation does not have any
responsibility for successor asbestos-related liabilities in excess of
this limitation.
(2) If the transferor had assumed or incurred successor asbestos-related liabilities in connection with a prior merger or consolidation
with a prior transferor, the fair market value of the total assets of
the prior transferor, determined as of the time of the earlier merger
or consolidation, must be substituted for the limitation set forth in
subsection (1) of this section for the purposes of determining the
limitation of liability of a corporation.
(3) The limitations in this section apply to a domestic corporation
or a foreign corporation that is a successor.
(4) The limitations in this section do not apply to:
(a) Workers' compensation benefits paid by or on behalf of an
employer to an employee under this state's workers' compensation act or
a comparable workers' compensation law of another jurisdiction;
(b) Any claim against a corporation that does not constitute a
successor asbestos-related liability;
(c) An insurer, as defined in RCW 48.01.050;
(d) Any obligations under the national labor relations act (29
U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), as amended, or under any collective
bargaining agreement;
(e) A successor that, after a merger or consolidation, continued in
the business of mining asbestos, selling or distributing asbestos
fibers, or manufacturing, distributing, removing, or installing
asbestos-containing products that were the same or substantially the
same as those products previously manufactured, distributed, removed,
or installed by the transferor;
(f) A contractual obligation existing as of the effective date of
this section that was entered into with claimants or potential
claimants or their counsel and that resolves asbestos claims or
potential asbestos claims;
(g) Any claim made against the estate of a debtor in a bankruptcy
proceeding commenced prior to April 1, 2003, under the United States
bankruptcy code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.) by or against the debtor,
or against a bankruptcy trust established under 11 U.S.C. Sec. 524(g)
or similar provisions of the United States code in such a bankruptcy
proceeding commenced prior to April 1, 2003;
(h) A successor asbestos-related liability arising from a common
law claim for premises liability, but only if the successor owned or
controlled the premise or premises at issue after the merger or
consolidation; or
(i) Any government claims brought under chapter 70.105D RCW, or
under the federal superfund law, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A corporation may establish the fair
market value of total gross assets for the purpose of the limitations
under section 2 of this act through any method reasonable under the
circumstances, including: (a) By reference to the going-concern value
of the assets or to the purchase price attributable to or paid for the
assets in an arm's-length transaction; or (b) in the absence of other
readily available information from which fair market value can be
determined, by reference to the value of the assets recorded on a
balance sheet.
(2) Total gross assets include (a) intangible assets and (b) the
aggregate coverage under any applicable liability insurance that was
issued to the transferor whose assets are being valued for purposes of
this section and which insurance has been collected or is collectable
to cover successor asbestos-related liabilities, except compensation
for liabilities arising from workers' exposure to asbestos solely
during the course of their employment by the transferor. A settlement
of a dispute concerning the liability insurance coverage entered into
by a transferor or successor with the insurers of the transferor before
the effective date of this section determines the aggregate coverage of
the liability insurance to be included in the calculation of the
transferor's total gross assets.
(3) The fair market value of total gross assets must reflect no
deduction for any liabilities arising from any asbestos claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Except as provided in this section, the
fair market value of total gross assets at the time of a merger or
consolidation increases annually at a rate equal to the sum of: (a)
The prime rate as listed in the first edition of the Wall Street
Journal published for each calendar year since the merger or
consolidation, unless the prime rate is not published in that edition
of the Wall Street Journal, in which case any reasonable determination
of the prime rate on the first day of the year may be used; and (b) one
percent.
(2) The rate in subsection (1) of this section is not compounded.
(3) The adjustment of fair market value of total gross assets
continues as provided under subsection (1) of this section until the
date the adjusted value is first exceeded by the cumulative amounts of
successor asbestos-related liabilities paid or committed to be paid by
or on behalf of the corporation or a predecessor, or by or on behalf of
a transferor, after the time of the merger or consolidation for which
the fair market value of total gross assets is determined.
(4) An adjustment of the fair market value of total gross assets
may not be applied to any liability insurance otherwise included in the
definition of total gross assets under section 3(2) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 23 RCW.

--- END ---