BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.56.020 and 2009 c 495 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to establish an adverse health events
and incident notification and reporting system that is designed to
facilitate quality improvement in the health care system, improve
patient safety, assist the public in making informed health care
choices, and decrease medical errors in a nonpunitive manner. The
notification and reporting system shall not be designed to punish
errors by health care practitioners or health care facility employees.
(2)(a) When a medical facility confirms that an adverse event has
occurred, it shall submit to the department of health:
(((a))) (i) Notification of the event, with the date, type of
adverse event, and any additional contextual information the facility
chooses to provide, within forty-eight hours; and
(((b))) (ii) A report regarding the event within forty-five days.
(b) The notification and report shall be submitted to the
department using the internet-based system established under RCW
70.56.040(2) if the system is operational.
(c) A medical facility may amend the notification or report within
sixty days of the submission.
(3) The notification and report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity if an independent entity has been contracted
for under RCW 70.56.040(1). The format shall identify the facility,
but shall not include any identifying information for any of the health
care professionals, facility employees, or patients involved. This
provision does not modify the duty of a hospital to make a report to
the department of health or a disciplinary authority if a licensed
practitioner has committed unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW
18.130.180.
(4) As part of the report filed under subsection (2)(((b))) (a)(ii)
of this section, the medical facility must conduct a root cause
analysis of the event, describe the corrective action plan that will be
implemented consistent with the findings of the analysis, or provide an
explanation of any reasons for not taking corrective action. The
department shall adopt rules, in consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity if an independent entity has been contracted
for under RCW 70.56.040(1), related to the form and content of the root
cause analysis and corrective action plan. In developing the rules,
consideration shall be given to existing standards for root cause
analysis or corrective action plans adopted by the joint commission on
accreditation of health facilities and other national or governmental
entities.
(5) ((If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from
an employee of a medical facility, the department determines that the
facility has not provided notification of an adverse event or
undertaken efforts to investigate the occurrence of an adverse event,
the department shall direct the facility to provide notification or to
undertake an investigation of the event.)) If the department determines
that a medical facility has failed to provide notification of or a
report regarding any adverse event in compliance with subsection (2)(a)
of this section, the department must assess a civil penalty not to
exceed one thousand dollars per violation per day against the medical
facility for each day the medical facility is not in compliance with
these notification or reporting requirements.
(6) The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to notifications of
adverse events that are submitted in good faith by employees of medical
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Proceedings for imposing or challenging civil penalties under this
chapter are governed by the provisions of the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

--- END ---