BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Metal can" means a single walled container that is
manufactured from metal substrate designed to hold or pack food or
beverages and sealed by can ends manufactured from metal substrate.
The metal substrate for the can and the can ends must be equal to or
thinner than 0.0149 inch.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Beginning July 1, 2011, no manufacturer,
wholesaler, or retailer may manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for
sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state any of
the following: Any bottle, cup, or other container, except a metal
can, that contains bisphenol A if that container is designed or
intended to be filled with any liquid, food, or beverage primarily for
consumption from that container by children three years of age or
younger and is sold or distributed at retail without containing any
liquid, food, or beverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A manufacturer of products that are
restricted under this chapter must notify persons that sell the
manufacturer's products in this state about the provisions of this
chapter no less than ninety days prior to the effective date of the
restrictions.
(2) A manufacturer that produces, sells, or distributes a product
prohibited from manufacture, sale, or distribution in this state under
this chapter shall recall the product and reimburse the retailer or any
other purchaser for the product.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer
that manufacturers, knowingly sells, or distributes products in
violation of this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
five thousand dollars for each violation in the case of a first
offense. Manufacturers, wholesalers, or retailers who are repeat
violators are subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand
dollars for each repeat offense. Penalties collected under this
section must be deposited in the state toxics control account created
in RCW 70.105D.070.
(2) Retailers who unknowingly sell products that are restricted
from sale under this chapter are not subject to the civil penalties
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Expenses to cover the cost of administering
this chapter shall be paid from the toxics control account under RCW
70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department may adopt rules as necessary
for the purpose of implementing, administering, and enforcing this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---