BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Every child is unique--each has different
interests, talents, skills, personalities, and each comes from a home
with different cultures, socio-economic levels, and education levels.
The legislature finds that too often children are labeled in a negative
context because of these differences. Such negative labels can be
devastating to children by making them feel defeated and helpless about
what the negative label says about them. The use of negative labels
creates a self-fulfilling prophecy that many adults unconsciously
adopt. The legislature further finds that it needs to redesign the
negative labels, especially those labels that the state uses for
children. The legislature finds that instead of the negative labels
such as "at-risk," "in-poverty," "from-poverty," and "disadvantaged,"
a positive characterization should be used. Using a positive
descriptor will help children to see themselves differently and help
adults more accurately define a child's capacity. If the state is
going to label these children then the state must label to enable the
children to have hope.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.305 and 2002 c 291 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of school districts may contract with
alternative educational service providers for eligible students.
Alternative educational service providers that the school district may
contract with include, but are not limited to:
(a) Other schools;
(b) Alternative education programs not operated by the school
district;
(c) Education centers;
(d) Skills centers;
(e) The Washington national guard youth challenge program;
(f) Dropout prevention programs; or
(g) Other public or private organizations, excluding sectarian or
religious organizations.
(2) Eligible students include ((students)) kids at hope who are
likely to be expelled or who are enrolled in the school district but
have been suspended, are academically at risk, or who have been subject
to repeated disciplinary actions due to behavioral problems.
(3) If a school district board of directors chooses to initiate
specialized programs for ((students)) kids at hope at risk of expulsion
or who are failing academically by contracting out with alternative
educational service providers identified in subsection (1) of this
section, the school district board of directors and the organization
must specify the specific learning standards that students are expected
to achieve. Placement of the ((student)) kids at hope shall be jointly
determined by the school district, the student's parent or legal
guardian, and the alternative educational service provider.
(4) For the purpose of this section, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules for reporting and documenting enrollment.
((Students)) Kids at hope may reenter at the grade level appropriate to
the student's ability. Students who are sixteen years of age or older
may take the GED test.
(5) The board of directors of school districts may require that
((students)) kids at hope who would otherwise be suspended or expelled
attend schools or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section as
a condition of continued enrollment in the school district.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2007 c 400 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest ((poverty levels,)) numbers of kids at hope, which for
the purpose of this section shall be defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. Once a school receives funding
for the all-day kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible
for funding in subsequent school years regardless of changes in the
school's percentage of ((students eligible for free and reduced-price
lunches)) kids at hope as long as other program requirements are
fulfilled. Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten
program support shall agree to the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.
(3) Any funds allocated to support all-day kindergarten programs
under this section shall not be considered as basic education funding.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2009 c 548 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest ((poverty levels,)) numbers of kids at hope, which for
the purpose of this section shall be defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. Once a school receives funding
for the all-day kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible
for funding in subsequent school years regardless of changes in the
school's percentage of ((students eligible for free and reduced-price
lunches)) kids at hope as long as other program requirements are
fulfilled. Additionally, schools receiving all-day kindergarten
program support shall agree to the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.170
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter "kids at hope" means students who
may have or who have problems of drug and alcohol abuse.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.170.075 and 1995 c 335 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the provision of drug and alcohol
counseling and related prevention and intervention services in schools
will enhance the classroom environment for students and teachers, and
better enable students to realize their academic and personal
potentials.
(2) The legislature finds that it is essential that resources be
made available to school districts to provide early drug and alcohol
prevention and intervention services to students and their families; to
assist in referrals to treatment providers; and to strengthen the
transition back to school for students who have had problems of drug
and alcohol abuse.
(3) Substance abuse awareness programs funded under this chapter do
not fall within the definition of basic education for purposes of
Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding duty
thereunder.
(4) The legislature intends to provide grants for drug and alcohol
abuse prevention and intervention in schools, targeted to those schools
with the highest concentrations of ((students at risk)) kids at hope.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.170.090 and 1995 c 335 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall select school
districts and cooperatives of school districts to receive grants for
drug and alcohol abuse prevention and intervention programs for
students in kindergarten through twelfth grade, from funds appropriated
by the legislature for this purpose. The minimum annual grant amount
per district or cooperative of districts shall be twenty thousand
dollars. Factors to be used in selecting proposals for funding and in
determining grant awards shall be developed in consultation with the
substance abuse advisory committee appointed under RCW 28A.170.050,
with the intent of targeting funding to districts with ((high-risk))
kids at hope populations. These factors may include:
(a) Characteristics of the school attendance areas to be served,
such as the number of students from low-income families, truancy rates,
juvenile justice referrals, and social services caseloads;
(b) The total number of students who would have access to services;
and
(c) Participation of community groups and law enforcement agencies
in drug and alcohol abuse prevention and intervention activities.
(2) The application procedures for grants under this section shall
include provisions for comprehensive planning, establishment of a
school and community substance abuse advisory committee, and
documentation of the district's needs assessment. Planning and
application for grants under this section may be integrated with the
development of other substance abuse awareness programs by school
districts. School districts shall, to the maximum extent feasible,
coordinate the use of grants provided under this section with other
funding available for substance abuse awareness programs. School
districts should allocate resources giving emphasis to drug and alcohol
abuse intervention services for ((students)) kids at hope in grades
five through nine. Grants may be used to provide services for students
who are enrolled in approved private schools.
(3) School districts receiving grants under this section shall be
required to establish a means of accessing formal assessment services
for determining treatment needs of ((students)) kids at hope with drug
and alcohol problems. The grant applications submitted by districts
shall identify the districts' plan for meeting this requirement.
(4) School districts receiving grants under this section shall be
required to perform biennial evaluations of their drug and alcohol
abuse prevention and intervention programs, and to report on the
results of these evaluations to the superintendent of public
instruction.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement RCW 28A.170.080 and 28A.170.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, "kids at hope" means students at
risk of dropping out of school.

Sec. 9 RCW 28A.175.025 and 2007 c 408 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create a
grant program and award grants to local partnerships of schools,
families, and communities to begin the phase in of a statewide
comprehensive dropout prevention, intervention, and retrieval system.
This program shall be known as the building bridges program.
(1) For purposes of RCW 28A.175.025 through 28A.175.075, a
"building bridges program" means a local partnership of schools,
families, and communities that provides all of the following programs
or activities:
(a) A system that identifies individual ((students)) kids at hope
at risk of dropping out from middle through high school based on local
predictive data, including state assessment data starting in the fourth
grade, and provides timely interventions for such ((students)) kids at
hope and for dropouts, including a plan for educational success as
already required by the student learning plan as defined under RCW
28A.655.061. ((Students)) Kids at hope identified shall include foster
care youth, youth involved in the juvenile justice system, and students
receiving special education services under chapter 28A.155 RCW;
(b) Coaches or mentors for students as necessary;
(c) Staff responsible for coordination of community partners that
provide a seamless continuum of academic and nonacademic support in
schools and communities;
(d) Retrieval or reentry activities; and
(e) Alternative educational programming, including, but not limited
to, career and technical education exploratory and preparatory programs
and online learning opportunities.
(2) One of the grants awarded under this section shall be for a
two-year demonstration project focusing on providing fifth through
twelfth grade ((students)) kids at hope with a program that utilizes
technology and is integrated with state standards, basic academics,
cross-cultural exposures, and age-appropriate preemployment training.
The project shall:
(a) Establish programs in two western Washington and one eastern
Washington urban areas;
(b) Identify ((at-risk students)) kids at hope in each of the
distinct communities and populations and implement strategies to close
the achievement gap;
(c) Collect and report data on participant characteristics and
outcomes of the project, including the characteristics and outcomes
specified under RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(d) Submit a report to the legislature by December 1, 2009.

Sec. 10 2007 c 408 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that increasing academic
success and increasing graduation rates be dual goals for the K-12
system. The legislature finds that only seventy-four percent of the
class of 2005 graduated on time. Students of color, students living in
poverty, students in foster care, students in the juvenile justice
system, students who are homeless, students for whom English is not
their primary language, and students with disabilities have lower
graduation rates than the average. The legislature further finds that
((students)) kids at hope who drop out experience more frequent
occurrences of early pregnancy, delinquency, substance abuse, and
mental health issues, and have greater need of publicly funded health
and social services. The legislature further finds that helping all
students be successful in school requires active participation in
coordinating services from schools, parents, and other stakeholders and
agencies in the local community. The legislature finds that existing
resources to vulnerable youth are used more efficiently and effectively
when there is significant coordination across local and state entities.
The legislature further finds that efficiency and accountability of the
K-12 system would be improved by creating a dropout prevention and
intervention grant program that implements research-based and emerging
best practices and evaluates results.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.175.065 and 2007 c 408 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Educational service districts, in collaboration with area
workforce development councils, shall:
(a) Provide technical assistance to local partnerships established
under a grant awarded under RCW 28A.175.025 in collecting and using
performance data; and
(b) At the request of a local partnership established under a grant
awarded under RCW 28A.175.025, provide assistance in the development of
a functional sustainability plan, including the identification of
potential funding sources for future operation.
(2) Local partnerships established under a grant awarded under RCW
28A.175.025 may contract with an educational service district,
workforce development council, or a private agency for specialized
training in such areas as cultural competency, identifying diverse
learning styles, and intervention strategies for ((students at risk of
dropping out of school)) kids at hope.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2007 c 408 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level work group that includes K-12 and state
agencies that work with ((youth)) kids at hope who have dropped out or
are at risk of dropping out of school. The state-level leadership
group shall consist of one representative from each of the following
agencies and organizations: The workforce training and education
coordinating board; career and technical education including skill
centers; relevant divisions of the department of social and health
services; the juvenile courts; the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of public defense;
the employment security department; accredited institutions of higher
education; the educational service districts; the area workforce
development councils; parent and educator associations; the department
of health; local school districts; agencies or organizations that
provide services to special education students; community organizations
serving youth; federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers;
each of the major political caucuses of the senate and house of
representatives; and the minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges
program((s)) established in RCW ((28A.175.055)) 28A.175.025, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3) The work group shall report to the legislature and the governor
on an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with recommendations for
implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources, and
eliminating barriers.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.225.035 and 2009 c 266 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or
28A.225.015 shall consist of a written notification to the court
alleging that:
(a) The child has unexcused absences during the current school
year;
(b) Actions taken by the school district have not been successful
in substantially reducing the child's absences from school; and
(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the
school district or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.
(2) The petition shall set forth the name, date of birth, school,
address, gender, race, and ethnicity of the child and the names and
addresses of the child's parents, and shall set forth whether the child
and parent are fluent in English and whether there is an existing
individualized education program.
(3) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations
in this section and shall generally request relief available under this
chapter and provide information about what the court might order under
RCW 28A.225.090.
(4) When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015,
the juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall
consider the petition, or if the court determines that a referral to an
available community truancy board would substantially reduce the
child's unexcused absences, the court may refer the case to a community
truancy board under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(5) If a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy
board must meet with the child, a parent, and the school district
representative and enter into an agreement with the petitioner and
respondent regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address
the child's truancy within twenty days of the referral. If the
petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be required
to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the
truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent. The court
may permit the truancy board or truancy prevention counselor to provide
continued supervision over the student, or parent if the petition is
based on RCW 28A.225.015.
(6) If the truancy board fails to reach an agreement, or the parent
or student does not comply with the agreement, the truancy board shall
return the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of this
section, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court
would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a
juvenile court hearing is held, the court shall:
(i) Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the
school district of the hearing. If the parent is not fluent in
English, the preferred practice is for notice to be provided in a
language in which the parent is fluent;
(ii) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present
evidence at the hearing; and
(iii) Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights
available under chapter 13.32A RCW.
(b) If the child is not provided with counsel, the advisement of
rights must take place in court by means of a colloquy between the
court, the child if eight years old or older, and the parent.
(8) The court may require the attendance of the child if eight
years old or older, the parents, and the school district at any hearing
on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.
(9) A school district is responsible for determining who shall
represent the school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW
28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.
(10) The court may permit the first hearing to be held without
requiring that either party be represented by legal counsel, and to be
held without a guardian ad litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At
the request of the school district, the court shall permit a school
district representative who is not an attorney to represent the school
district at any future hearings.
(11) If the child is in a special education program or has a
diagnosed mental or emotional disorder, the court shall inquire as to
what efforts the school district has made to assist the child in
attending school.
(12) If the allegations in the petition are established by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and
enter an order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of
time determined by the court, after considering the facts alleged in
the petition and the circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely
cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school while the juvenile
is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire before the
end of the school year in which it is entered.
(13) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall
regularly report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the
child.
(14) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to
the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who
are subject to truancy petitions and ((at-risk youth)) kids at hope
petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or ((child)) kids at hope in need of
services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.
(15) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county
the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the
receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or
parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous
county.

Sec. 14 RCW 13.32A.010 and 2000 c 123 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that within any group of people there exists
a need for guidelines for acceptable behavior and that, presumptively,
the experience and maturity of parents make them better qualified to
establish guidelines beneficial to and protective of their children.
The legislature further finds that it is the right and responsibility
of adults to establish laws for the benefit and protection of the
society; and that, in the same manner, the right and responsibility for
establishing reasonable guidelines for the family unit belongs to the
adults within that unit. Further, absent abuse or neglect, parents
have the right to exercise control over their children. The
legislature reaffirms its position stated in RCW 13.34.020 that the
family unit is the fundamental resource of American life which should
be nurtured and that it should remain intact in the absence of
compelling evidence to the contrary.
The legislature recognizes there is a need for services and
assistance for parents and children who are in conflict. These
conflicts are manifested by children who exhibit various behaviors
including: Running away, substance abuse, serious acting out problems,
mental health needs, and other behaviors that endanger themselves or
others.
The legislature finds many parents do not know their rights
regarding their adolescent children and law enforcement. Parents and
courts feel they have insufficient legal recourse for the chronic
runaway child who is endangering himself or herself through his or her
behavior. The legislature further recognizes that for chronic runaways
whose behavior puts them in serious danger of harming themselves or
others, secure facilities must be provided to allow opportunities for
assessment, treatment, and to assist parents and protect their
children. The legislature intends to give tools to parents, courts,
and law enforcement to keep families together and reunite them whenever
possible.
The legislature recognizes that some children run away to protect
themselves from abuse or neglect in their homes. Abused and neglected
children should be dealt with pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW and it is
not the intent of the legislature to handle dependency matters under
this chapter.
The legislature intends services offered under this chapter be on
a voluntary basis whenever possible to children and their families and
that the courts be used as a last resort.
The legislature intends to increase the safety of children through
the preservation of families and the provision of assessment,
treatment, and placement services for ((children)) kids at hope in need
of services and ((at-risk youth)) kids at hope including services and
assessments conducted under chapter 13.32A RCW and RCW 74.13.033.
Within available funds, the legislature intends to provide these
services through crisis residential centers in which children and youth
may safely reside for a limited period of time. The time in residence
shall be used to conduct an assessment of the needs of the children,
youth, and their families. The assessments are necessary to identify
appropriate services and placement options that will reduce the
likelihood that children will place themselves in dangerous or life-threatening situations.
The legislature recognizes that crisis residential centers provide
an opportunity for children to receive short-term necessary support and
nurturing in cases where there may be abuse or neglect. The
legislature intends that center staff provide an atmosphere of concern,
care, and respect for children in the center and their parents.
The legislature intends to provide for the protection of children
who, through their behavior, are endangering themselves. The
legislature intends to provide appropriate residential services,
including secure facilities, to protect, stabilize, and treat children
with serious problems. The legislature further intends to empower
parents by providing them with the assistance they require to raise
their children.

Sec. 15 RCW 13.32A.015 and 1990 c 276 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to:
(1) Preserve, strengthen, and reconcile families experiencing
problems with ((at-risk youth)) kids at hope;
(2) Provide a legal process by which parents who are experiencing
problems with ((at-risk youth)) kids at hope can request and receive
assistance from juvenile courts in providing appropriate care,
treatment, and supervision to such youth; and
(3) Assess the effectiveness of the family reconciliation services
program.
The legislature does not intend by this enactment to grant any
parent the right to file ((an at-risk youth)) a kids at hope petition
or receive juvenile court assistance in dealing with ((an at-risk
youth)) kids at hope. The purpose of chapter 276, Laws of 1990 is to
create a process by which a parent of ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at
hope may request and receive assistance subject to the availability of
juvenile court services and resources. Recognizing that these services
and resources are limited, the legislature intends that counties have
the authority to impose reasonable limits on the utilization of
juvenile court services and resources in matters related to at-risk
youth. Any responsibilities imposed upon the department under chapter
276, Laws of 1990 shall be contingent upon the availability of funds
specifically appropriated by the legislature for such purpose.

Sec. 16 RCW 13.32A.030 and 2000 c 123 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily
administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or
her designee.
(3) "((At-risk youth)) Kid at hope" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive
hours without consent of his or her parent;
(b) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or any other person; or
(c) Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no
pending criminal charges related to the substance abuse.
(4) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean any unemancipated
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.
(5) "((Child in need of services)) Kid at hope" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or other person;
(b) Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without
consent for at least twenty-four consecutive hours on two or more
separate occasions from the home of either parent, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement; and
(i) Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or
(ii) Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; or
(c)(i) Who is in need of: (A) Necessary services, including food,
shelter, health care, clothing, or education; or (B) services designed
to maintain or reunite the family;
(ii) Who lacks access to, or has declined to utilize, these
services; and
(iii) Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful
efforts to maintain the family structure or are unable or unwilling to
continue efforts to maintain the family structure.
(6) "((Child)) Kid at hope in need of services petition" means a
petition filed in juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department
seeking adjudication of placement of the child.
(7) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure
facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.
(8) "Custodian" means the person or entity who has the legal right
to the custody of the child.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a grandparent,
brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin
with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is
willing and available to care for the child.
(11) "Guardian" means that person or agency that (a) has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than
a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the right to legal
custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian"
does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(12) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide
assistance and support to a child who is ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at
hope or a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services and his or her
parent. The team shall include the parent, a department case worker,
a local government representative when authorized by the local
government, and when appropriate, members from the mental health and
substance abuse disciplines. The team may also include, but is not
limited to, the following persons: Educators, law enforcement
personnel, probation officers, employers, church persons, tribal
members, therapists, medical personnel, social service providers,
placement providers, and extended family members. The team members
shall be volunteers who do not receive compensation while acting in a
capacity as a team member, unless the member's employer chooses to
provide compensation or the member is a state employee.
(13) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW.
(14) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or guardian.
(15) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or
portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured
perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving
without permission of the facility staff.
(16) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including but not
limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster family
homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed
there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the
department, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours
for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents
are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent
residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator,
where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon
the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the
administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the
administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave,
his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her
return to the center.
(17) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility
licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of at least
one adult staff member to every two children.
(18) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home
placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at a
fact-finding hearing on a child in need of services petition.

Sec. 17 RCW 13.32A.040 and 2000 c 123 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Families who are in conflict or who are experiencing problems with
((at-risk youth)) kids at hope or a ((child)) kid at hope who may be in
need of services may request family reconciliation services from the
department. The department may involve a local multidisciplinary team
in its response in determining the services to be provided and in
providing those services. Such services shall be provided to alleviate
personal or family situations which present a serious and imminent
threat to the health or stability of the child or family and to
maintain families intact wherever possible. Family reconciliation
services shall be designed to develop skills and supports within
families to resolve problems related to ((at-risk youth)) kids at hope,
((children)) kids at hope in need of services, or family conflicts.
These services may include but are not limited to referral to services
for suicide prevention, psychiatric or other medical care, or
psychological, mental health, drug or alcohol treatment, welfare,
legal, educational, or other social services, as appropriate to the
needs of the child and the family, and training in parenting, conflict
management, and dispute resolution skills.

Sec. 18 RCW 13.32A.042 and 2000 c 123 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The administrator of a crisis residential center may convene
a multidisciplinary team, which is to be locally based and
administered, at the request of a child placed at the center or the
child's parent.
(b) If the administrator has reasonable cause to believe that a
child is a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services and the parent is
unavailable or unwilling to continue efforts to maintain the family
structure, the administrator shall immediately convene a
multidisciplinary team.
(c) A parent may disband a team twenty-four hours, excluding
weekends and holidays, after receiving notice of formation of the team
under (b) of this subsection unless a petition has been filed under RCW
13.32A.140. If a petition has been filed the parent may not disband
the team until the hearing is held under RCW 13.32A.179. The court may
allow the team to continue if an out-of-home placement is ordered under
RCW 13.32A.179(3). Upon the filing of ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at
hope or dependency petition the team shall cease to exist, unless the
parent requests continuation of the team or unless the out-of-home
placement was ordered under RCW 13.32A.179(3).
(2) The secretary shall request participation of appropriate state
agencies to assist in the coordination and delivery of services through
the multidisciplinary teams. Those agencies that agree to participate
shall provide the secretary all information necessary to facilitate
forming a multidisciplinary team and the secretary shall provide this
information to the administrator of each crisis residential center.
(3) The secretary shall designate within each region a department
employee who shall have responsibility for coordination of the state
response to a request for creation of a multidisciplinary team. The
secretary shall advise the administrator of each crisis residential
center of the name of the appropriate employee. Upon a request of the
administrator to form a multidisciplinary team the employee shall
provide a list of the agencies that have agreed to participate in the
multidisciplinary team.
(4) The administrator shall also seek participation from
representatives of mental health and drug and alcohol treatment
providers as appropriate.
(5) A parent shall be advised of the request to form a
multidisciplinary team and may select additional members of the
multidisciplinary team. The parent or child may request any person or
persons to participate including, but not limited to, educators, law
enforcement personnel, court personnel, family therapists, licensed
health care practitioners, social service providers, youth residential
placement providers, other family members, church representatives, and
members of their own community. The administrator shall assist in
obtaining the prompt participation of persons requested by the parent
or child.
(6) When an administrator of a crisis residential center requests
the formation of a team, the state agencies must respond as soon as
possible.

Sec. 19 RCW 13.32A.044 and 2000 c 123 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The purpose of the multidisciplinary team is to assist in a
coordinated referral of the family to available social and health-related services.
(2) The team shall have the authority to evaluate the juvenile, and
family members, if appropriate and agreed to by the parent, and shall:
(a) With parental input, develop a plan of appropriate available
services and assist the family in obtaining those services;
(b) Make a referral to the designated chemical dependency
specialist or the county designated mental health professional, if
appropriate;
(c) Recommend no further intervention because the juvenile and his
or her family have resolved the problem causing the family conflict; or
(d) With the parent's consent, work with them to achieve
reconciliation of the child and family.
(3) At the first meeting of the multidisciplinary team, it shall
choose a member to coordinate the team's efforts. The parent member of
the multidisciplinary team must agree with the choice of coordinator.
The team shall meet or communicate as often as necessary to assist the
family.
(4) The coordinator of the multidisciplinary team may assist in
filing a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition when
requested by the parent or child or ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
petition when requested by the parent. The multidisciplinary team
shall have no standing as a party in any action under this title.
(5) If the administrator is unable to contact the child's parent,
the multidisciplinary team may be used for assistance. If the parent
has not been contacted within five days the administrator shall contact
the department and request the case be reviewed for a dependency filing
under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 20 RCW 13.32A.060 and 2000 c 162 s 11 and 2000 c 123 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 13.32A.050(1)
(a) or (b) shall inform the child of the reason for such custody and
shall:
(a) Transport the child to his or her home or to a parent at his or
her place of employment, if no parent is at home. The parent may
request that the officer take the child to the home of an adult
extended family member, responsible adult, crisis residential center,
the department, or a licensed youth shelter. In responding to the
request of the parent, the officer shall take the child to a requested
place which, in the officer's belief, is within a reasonable distance
of the parent's home. The officer releasing a child into the custody
of a parent, an adult extended family member, responsible adult, or a
licensed youth shelter shall inform the person receiving the child of
the reason for taking the child into custody and inform all parties of
the nature and location of appropriate services available in the
community; or
(b) After attempting to notify the parent, take the child to a
designated crisis residential center's secure facility or a center's
semi-secure facility if a secure facility is full, not available, or
not located within a reasonable distance if:
(i) The child expresses fear or distress at the prospect of being
returned to his or her home which leads the officer to believe there is
a possibility that the child is experiencing some type of abuse or
neglect;
(ii) It is not practical to transport the child to his or her home
or place of the parent's employment; or
(iii) There is no parent available to accept custody of the child;
or
(c) After attempting to notify the parent, if a crisis residential
center is full, not available, or not located within a reasonable
distance, request the department to accept custody of the child. If
the department determines that an appropriate placement is currently
available, the department shall accept custody and place the child in
an out-of-home placement. Upon accepting custody of a child from the
officer, the department may place the child in an out-of-home placement
for up to seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays, without filing a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition, obtaining parental consent, or obtaining an order for
placement under chapter 13.34 RCW. Upon transferring a child to the
department's custody, the officer shall provide written documentation
of the reasons and the statutory basis for taking the child into
custody. If the department declines to accept custody of the child,
the officer may release the child after attempting to take the child to
the following, in the order listed: The home of an adult extended
family member; a responsible adult; or a licensed youth shelter. The
officer shall immediately notify the department if no placement option
is available and the child is released.
(2) An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 13.32A.050(1)
(c) or (d) shall inform the child of the reason for custody. An
officer taking a child into custody under RCW 13.32A.050(1)(c) may
release the child to the supervising agency, or shall take the child to
a designated crisis residential center's secure facility. If the
secure facility is not available, not located within a reasonable
distance, or full, the officer shall take the child to a semi-secure
crisis residential center. An officer taking a child into custody
under RCW 13.32A.050(1)(d) may place the child in a juvenile detention
facility as provided in RCW 13.32A.065 or a secure facility, except
that the child shall be taken to detention whenever the officer has
been notified that a juvenile court has entered a detention order under
this chapter or chapter 13.34 RCW.
(3) Every officer taking a child into custody shall provide the
child and his or her parent or parents or responsible adult with a copy
of the statement specified in RCW 13.32A.130(6).
(4) Whenever an officer transfers custody of a child to a crisis
residential center or the department, the child may reside in the
crisis residential center or may be placed by the department in an out-of-home placement for an aggregate total period of time not to exceed
seventy-two hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
Thereafter, the child may continue in out-of-home placement only if the
parents have consented, a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition has been filed, or an order for placement has been entered
under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(5) The department shall ensure that all law enforcement
authorities are informed on a regular basis as to the location of all
designated secure and semi-secure facilities within centers in their
jurisdiction, where children taken into custody under RCW 13.32A.050
may be taken.

Sec. 21 RCW 13.32A.120 and 2000 c 123 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Where either a child or the child's parent or the person or
facility currently providing shelter to the child notifies the center
that such individual or individuals cannot agree to the continuation of
an out-of-home placement arrived at pursuant to RCW
13.32A.090(3)(d)(ii), the administrator of the center shall immediately
contact the remaining party or parties to the agreement and shall
attempt to bring about the child's return home or to an alternative
living arrangement agreeable to the child and the parent as soon as
practicable.
(2) If a child and his or her parent cannot agree to an out-of-home
placement under RCW 13.32A.090(3)(d)(ii), either the child or parent
may file a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition to
approve an out-of-home placement or the parent may file ((an at-risk
youth)) a kid at hope petition.
(3) If a child and his or her parent cannot agree to the
continuation of an out-of-home placement under RCW
13.32A.090(3)(d)(ii), either the child or parent may file a ((child))
kid at hope in need of services petition to continue an out-of-home
placement or the parent may file ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
petition.

Sec. 22 RCW 13.32A.130 and 2009 c 569 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A child admitted to a secure facility located in a juvenile
detention center shall remain in the facility for at least twenty-four
hours after admission but for not more than five consecutive days. A
child admitted to a secure facility not located in a juvenile detention
center or a semi-secure facility may remain for not more than fifteen
consecutive days. If a child is transferred between a secure and semi-secure facility, the aggregate length of time a child may remain in
both facilities shall not exceed fifteen consecutive days per
admission, and in no event may a child's stay in a secure facility
located in a juvenile detention center exceed five days per admission.
(2)(a)(i) The facility administrator shall determine within twenty-four hours after a child's admission to a secure facility whether the
child is likely to remain in a semi-secure facility and may transfer
the child to a semi-secure facility or release the child to the
department. The determination shall be based on: (A) The need for
continued assessment, protection, and treatment of the child in a
secure facility; and (B) the likelihood the child would remain at a
semi-secure facility until his or her parents can take the child home
or a petition can be filed under this title.
(ii) In making the determination the administrator shall consider
the following information if known: (A) The child's age and maturity;
(B) the child's condition upon arrival at the center; (C) the
circumstances that led to the child's being taken to the center; (D)
whether the child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare
of the child or any other person; (E) the child's history of running
away; and (F) the child's willingness to cooperate in the assessment.
(b) If the administrator of a secure facility determines the child
is unlikely to remain in a semi-secure facility, the administrator
shall keep the child in the secure facility pursuant to this chapter
and in order to provide for space for the child may transfer another
child who has been in the facility for at least seventy-two hours to a
semi-secure facility. The administrator shall only make a transfer of
a child after determining that the child who may be transferred is
likely to remain at the semi-secure facility.
(c) A crisis residential center administrator is authorized to
transfer a child to a crisis residential center in the area where the
child's parents reside or where the child's lawfully prescribed
residence is located.
(d) An administrator may transfer a child from a semi-secure
facility to a secure facility whenever he or she reasonably believes
that the child is likely to leave the semi-secure facility and not
return and after full consideration of all factors in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection.
(3) If no parent is available or willing to remove the child during
the first seventy-two hours following admission, the department shall
consider the filing of a petition under RCW 13.32A.140.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, the parents may remove the child at any time unless the staff
of the crisis residential center has reasonable cause to believe that
the child is absent from the home because he or she is abused or
neglected or if allegations of abuse or neglect have been made against
the parents. The department or any agency legally charged with the
supervision of a child may remove a child from a crisis residential
center at any time after the first twenty-four-hour period after
admission has elapsed and only after full consideration by all parties
of the factors in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(5) Crisis residential center staff shall make reasonable efforts
to protect the child and achieve a reconciliation of the family. If a
reconciliation and voluntary return of the child has not been achieved
within forty-eight hours from the time of admission, and if the
administrator of the center does not consider it likely that
reconciliation will be achieved within five days of the child's
admission to the center, then the administrator shall inform the parent
and child of: (a) The availability of counseling services; (b) the
right to file a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition for
an out-of-home placement, the right of a parent to file ((an at-risk
youth)) a kid at hope petition, and the right of the parent and child
to obtain assistance in filing the petition; (c) the right to request
the facility administrator or his or her designee to form a
multidisciplinary team; (d) the right to request a review of any out-of-home placement; (e) the right to request a mental health or chemical
dependency evaluation by a county-designated professional or a private
treatment facility; and (f) the right to request treatment in a program
to address the child's at-risk behavior under RCW 13.32A.197.
(6) At no time shall information regarding a parent's or child's
rights be withheld. The department shall develop and distribute to all
law enforcement agencies and to each crisis residential center
administrator a written statement delineating the services and rights.
The administrator of the facility or his or her designee shall provide
every resident and parent with a copy of the statement.
(7) A crisis residential center and any person employed at the
center acting in good faith in carrying out the provisions of this
section are immune from criminal or civil liability for such actions.

Sec. 23 RCW 13.32A.140 and 2000 c 123 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the department files a dependency petition, the department
shall file a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition to
approve an out-of-home placement on behalf of a child under any of the
following sets of circumstances:
(1) The child has been admitted to a crisis residential center or
has been placed by the department in an out-of-home placement, and:
(a) The parent has been notified that the child was so admitted or
placed;
(b) The child cannot return home, and legal authorization is needed
for out-of-home placement beyond seventy-two hours;
(c) No agreement between the parent and the child as to where the
child shall live has been reached;
(d) No ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition has been
filed by either the child or parent;
(e) The parent has not filed ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
petition; and
(f) The child has no suitable place to live other than the home of
his or her parent.
(2) The child has been admitted to a crisis residential center and:
(a) Seventy-two hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
have passed since such placement;
(b) The staff, after searching with due diligence, have been unable
to contact the parent of such child; and
(c) The child has no suitable place to live other than the home of
his or her parent.
(3) An agreement between parent and child made pursuant to RCW
13.32A.090(3)(d)(ii) or pursuant to RCW 13.32A.120(1) is no longer
acceptable to parent or child, and:
(a) The party to whom the arrangement is no longer acceptable has
so notified the department;
(b) Seventy-two hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
have passed since such notification;
(c) No new agreement between parent and child as to where the child
shall live has been reached;
(d) No ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition has been
filed by either the child or the parent;
(e) The parent has not filed ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
petition; and
(f) The child has no suitable place to live other than the home of
his or her parent.
Under the circumstances of subsections (1), (2), or (3) of this
section, the child shall remain in an out-of-home placement until a
((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition filed by the
department on behalf of the child is reviewed and resolved by the
juvenile court. The department may authorize emergency medical or
dental care for a child admitted to a crisis residential center or
placed in an out-of-home placement by the department. The state, when
the department files a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition under this section, shall be represented as provided for in
RCW 13.04.093.

Sec. 24 RCW 13.32A.150 and 2000 c 123 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the juvenile
court shall not accept the filing of a ((child)) kid at hope in need of
services petition by the child or the parents or the filing of ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope petition by the parent, unless verification
is provided that the department has completed a family assessment. The
family assessment shall involve the multidisciplinary team if one
exists. The family assessment or plan of services developed by the
multidisciplinary team shall be aimed at family reconciliation,
reunification, and avoidance of the out-of-home placement of the child.
If the department is unable to complete an assessment within two
working days following a request for assessment the child or the
parents may proceed under subsection (2) of this section or the parent
may proceed under RCW 13.32A.191.
(2) A child or a child's parent may file with the juvenile court a
((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition to approve an out-of-home placement for the child. The department shall, when requested,
assist either a parent or child in the filing of the petition. The
petition must be filed in the county where the parent resides. The
petition shall allege that the child is a ((child)) kid at hope in need
of services and shall ask only that the placement of a child outside
the home of his or her parent be approved. The filing of a petition to
approve the placement is not dependent upon the court's having obtained
any prior jurisdiction over the child or his or her parent, and confers
upon the court a special jurisdiction to approve or disapprove an out-of-home placement under this chapter.
(3) A petition may not be filed if the child is the subject of a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 25 RCW 13.32A.152 and 2004 c 64 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition
is filed by: (a) A youth pursuant to RCW 13.32A.150; (b) the child or
the child's parent pursuant to RCW 13.32A.120; or (c) the department
pursuant to RCW 13.32A.140, the filing party shall have a copy of the
petition served on the parents of the youth. Service shall first be
attempted in person and if unsuccessful, then by certified mail with
return receipt.
(2) Whenever a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition
is filed by a youth or parent pursuant to RCW 13.32A.150, the court
shall immediately notify the department that a petition has been filed.
(3)(a) Whenever the court or the petitioning party knows or has
reason to know that an Indian child is involved, the petitioning party
shall promptly provide notice to the child's parent or Indian custodian
and to the agent designated by the child's Indian tribe to receive such
notices. Notice shall be by certified mail with return receipt
requested. If the identity or location of the parent or Indian
custodian and the tribe cannot be determined, notice shall be given to
the secretary of the interior in the manner described in 25 C.F.R.
23.11. If the child may be a member of more than one tribe, the
petitioning party shall send notice to all tribes the petitioner has
reason to know may be affiliated with the child.
(b) The notice shall: (i) Contain a statement notifying the parent
or custodian and the tribe of the pending proceeding; and (ii) notify
the tribe of the tribe's right to intervene and/or request that the
case be transferred to tribal court.

Sec. 26 RCW 13.32A.160 and 2000 c 123 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a proper ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition to approve an out-of-home placement is filed under RCW
13.32A.120, 13.32A.140, or 13.32A.150 the juvenile court shall: (a)(i)
Schedule a fact-finding hearing to be held: (A) For a child who
resides in a place other than his or her parent's home and other than
an out-of-home placement, within five calendar days unless the last
calendar day is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, in which case the
hearing shall be held on the preceding judicial day; or (B) for a child
living at home or in an out-of-home placement, within ten days; and
(ii) notify the parent, child, and the department of such date; (b)
notify the parent of the right to be represented by counsel and, if
indigent, to have counsel appointed for him or her by the court; (c)
appoint legal counsel for the child; (d) inform the child and his or
her parent of the legal consequences of the court approving or
disapproving a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition; (e)
notify the parents of their rights under this chapter and chapters
11.88, 13.34, 70.96A, and 71.34 RCW, including the right to file ((an
at-risk youth)) a kid at hope petition, the right to submit an
application for admission of their child to a treatment facility for
alcohol, chemical dependency, or mental health treatment, and the right
to file a guardianship petition; and (f) notify all parties, including
the department, of their right to present evidence at the fact-finding
hearing.
(2) Upon filing of a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition, the child may be placed, if not already placed, by the
department in a crisis residential center, foster family home, group
home facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW, or any other suitable
residence other than a HOPE center to be determined by the department.
The court may place a child in a crisis residential center for a
temporary out-of-home placement as long as the requirements of RCW
13.32A.125 are met.
(3) If the child has been placed in a foster family home or group
care facility under chapter 74.15 RCW, the child shall remain there, or
in any other suitable residence as determined by the department,
pending resolution of the petition by the court. Any placement may be
reviewed by the court within three judicial days upon the request of
the juvenile or the juvenile's parent.

Sec. 27 RCW 13.32A.170 and 2000 c 123 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The court shall hold a fact-finding hearing to consider a
proper ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition, giving due
weight to the intent of the legislature that families have the right to
place reasonable restrictions and rules upon their children,
appropriate to the individual child's developmental level. The court
may appoint legal counsel and/or a guardian ad litem to represent the
child and advise parents of their right to be represented by legal
counsel. At the commencement of the hearing, the court shall advise
the parents of their rights as set forth in RCW 13.32A.160(1). If the
court approves or denies a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition, a written statement of the reasons must be filed.
(2) The court may approve an order stating that the child shall be
placed in a residence other than the home of his or her parent only if
it is established by a preponderance of the evidence, including a
departmental recommendation for approval or dismissal of the petition,
that:
(a) The child is a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services as
defined in RCW 13.32A.030(5);
(b) If the petitioner is a child, he or she has made a reasonable
effort to resolve the conflict;
(c) Reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the
need for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it
possible for the child to return home; and
(d) A suitable out-of-home placement resource is available.
The court may not grant a petition filed by the child or the
department if it is established that the petition is based only upon a
dislike of reasonable rules or reasonable discipline established by the
parent.
The court may not grant the petition if the child is the subject of
a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(3) Following the fact-finding hearing the court shall: (a)
Approve a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition and, if
appropriate, enter a temporary out-of-home placement for a period not
to exceed fourteen days pending approval of a disposition decision to
be made under RCW 13.32A.179(2); (b) approve ((an at-risk youth)) a kid
at hope petition filed by the parents and dismiss the ((child)) kid at
hope in need of services petition; or (c) dismiss the petition.
At any time the court may order the department to review the case
to determine whether the case is appropriate for a dependency petition
under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 28 RCW 13.32A.179 and 2000 c 123 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A disposition hearing shall be held no later than fourteen days
after the approval of the temporary out-of-home placement. The
parents, child, and department shall be notified by the court of the
time and place of the hearing.
(2) At the conclusion of the disposition hearing, the court may:
(a) Reunite the family and dismiss the petition; (b) approve ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope petition filed by the parents and dismiss
the ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition; (c) approve an
out-of-home placement requested in the ((child)) kid at hope in need of
services petition by the parents; or (d) order an out-of-home placement
at the request of the child or the department not to exceed ninety
days.
At any time the court may order the department to review the matter
for purposes of filing a dependency petition under chapter 13.34 RCW.
Whether or not the court approves or orders an out-of-home placement,
the court may also order any conditions of supervision as set forth in
RCW 13.32A.196(3).
(3) The court may only enter an order under subsection (2)(d) of
this section if it finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence
that: (a)(i) The order is in the best interest of the family; (ii) the
parents have not requested an out-of-home placement; (iii) the parents
have not exercised any other right listed in RCW 13.32A.160(1)(e); (iv)
the child has made reasonable efforts to resolve the problems that led
to the filing of the petition; (v) the problems cannot be resolved by
delivery of services to the family during continued placement of the
child in the parental home; (vi) reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's
home and to make it possible for the child to return home; and (vii) a
suitable out-of-home placement resource is available; (b)(i) the order
is in the best interest of the child; and (ii) the parents are
unavailable; or (c) the parent's actions cause an imminent threat to
the child's health or safety.
(4) The court may order the department to submit a dispositional
plan if such a plan would assist the court in ordering a suitable
disposition in the case. The plan, if ordered, shall address the needs
of the child, and the perceived needs of the parents if the order was
entered under subsection (2)(d) of this section or if specifically
agreed to by the parents. If the parents do not agree or the order was
not entered under subsection (2)(d) of this section the plan may only
make recommendations regarding services in which the parents may
voluntarily participate. If the court orders the department to prepare
a plan, the department shall provide copies of the plan to the parent,
the child, and the court. If the parties or the court desire the
department to be involved in any future proceedings or case plan
development, the department shall be provided with timely notification
of all court hearings.
(5) A child who fails to comply with a court order issued under
this section shall be subject to contempt proceedings, as provided in
this chapter, but only if the noncompliance occurs within one year
after the entry of the order.
(6) After the court approves or orders an out-of-home placement,
the parents or the department may request, and the court may grant,
dismissal of the ((child)) kid at hope in need of services proceeding
when it is not feasible for the department to provide services due to
one or more of the following circumstances:
(a) The child has been absent from court approved placement for
thirty consecutive days or more;
(b) The parents or the child, or all of them, refuse to cooperate
in available, appropriate intervention aimed at reunifying the family;
or
(c) The department has exhausted all available and appropriate
resources that would result in reunification.
(7) The court shall dismiss a placement made under subsection
(2)(c) of this section upon the request of the parents.

Sec. 29 RCW 13.32A.190 and 1996 c 133 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon making a dispositional order under RCW 13.32A.179, the
court shall schedule the matter on the calendar for review within three
months, advise the parties of the date thereof, appoint legal counsel
and/or a guardian ad litem to represent the child at the review
hearing, advise parents of their right to be represented by legal
counsel at the review hearing, and notify the parties of their rights
to present evidence at the hearing. Where resources are available, the
court shall encourage the parent and child to participate in programs
for reconciliation of their conflict.
(2) At the review hearing, the court shall approve or disapprove
the continuation of the dispositional plan in accordance with this
chapter. The court shall determine whether reasonable efforts have
been made to reunify the family and make it possible for the child to
return home. The court shall discontinue the placement and order that
the child return home if the court has reasonable grounds to believe
that the parents have made reasonable efforts to resolve the conflict
and the court has reason to believe that the child's refusal to return
home is capricious. If out-of-home placement is continued, the court
may modify the dispositional plan.
(3) Out-of-home placement may not be continued past one hundred
eighty days from the day the review hearing commenced. The court shall
order the child to return to the home of the parent at the expiration
of the placement. If an out-of-home placement is disapproved prior to
one hundred eighty days, the court shall enter an order requiring the
child to return to the home of the child's parent.
(4) The parents and the department may request, and the juvenile
court may grant, dismissal of an out-of-home placement order when it is
not feasible for the department to provide services due to one or more
of the following circumstances:
(a) The child has been absent from court approved placement for
thirty consecutive days or more;
(b) The parents or the child, or all of them, refuse to cooperate
in available, appropriate intervention aimed at reunifying the family;
or
(c) The department has exhausted all available and appropriate
resources that would result in reunification.
(5) The court shall terminate a placement made under this section
upon the request of a parent unless the placement is made pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.179(3).
(6) The court may dismiss a ((child)) kid at hope in need of
services petition filed by a parent at any time if the court finds good
cause to believe that continuation of out-of-home placement would serve
no useful purpose.
(7) The court shall dismiss a ((child)) kid at hope in need of
services proceeding if the child is the subject of a proceeding under
chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 30 RCW 13.32A.191 and 2000 c 123 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A child's parent may file with the juvenile court a petition in
the interest of a child alleged to be ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at
hope. The department shall, when requested, assist the parent in
filing the petition. The petition shall be filed in the county where
the petitioner resides. The petition shall set forth the name, age,
and residence of the child and the names and residence of the child's
parents and shall allege that:
(a) The child is ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope;
(b) The petitioner has the right to legal custody of the child;
(c) Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the
parent to maintain the care, custody, and control of the child; and
(d) Alternatives to court intervention have been attempted or there
is good cause why such alternatives have not been attempted.
(2) The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations
in this section and shall generally request relief available under this
chapter. The petition need not specify any proposed disposition
following adjudication of the petition. The filing of ((an at-risk
youth)) a kid at hope petition is not dependent upon the court's having
obtained any prior jurisdiction over the child or his or her parent and
confers upon the court the special jurisdiction to assist the parent in
maintaining parental authority and responsibility for the child.
(3) A petition may not be filed if a dependency petition is pending
under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 31 RCW 13.32A.192 and 1997 c 146 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When a proper ((at-risk youth)) kid at hope petition is filed
by a child's parent under this chapter, the juvenile court shall:
(a)(i) Schedule a fact-finding hearing to be held: (A) For a child
who resides in a place other than his or her parent's home and other
than an out-of-home placement, within five calendar days unless the
last calendar day is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, in which case the
hearing shall be held on the preceding judicial day; or (B) for a child
living at home or in an out-of-home placement, within ten days; and
(ii) notify the parent and the child of such date;
(b) Notify the parent of the right to be represented by counsel at
the parent's own expense;
(c) Appoint legal counsel for the child;
(d) Inform the child and his or her parent of the legal
consequences of the court finding the child to be ((an at-risk youth))
a kid at hope; and
(e) Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present
evidence at the fact-finding hearing.
(2) Unless out-of-home placement of the child is otherwise
authorized or required by law, the child shall reside in the home of
his or her parent or in an out-of-home placement requested by the
parent or child and approved by the parent.
(3) If upon sworn written or oral declaration of the petitioning
parent, the court has reason to believe that a child has willfully and
knowingly violated a court order issued pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to
take the child into custody and place the child in a juvenile detention
facility or in a secure facility within a crisis residential center.
If the child is placed in detention, a review shall be held as provided
in RCW 13.32A.065.
(4) If both a ((child)) kid at hope in need of services petition
and ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope petition have been filed with
regard to the same child, the petitions and proceedings shall be
consolidated as ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope petition. Pending
a fact-finding hearing regarding the petition, the child may be placed
in the parent's home or in an out-of-home placement if not already
placed in a temporary out-of-home placement pursuant to a ((child)) kid
at hope in need of services petition. The child or the parent may
request a review of the child's placement including a review of any
court order requiring the child to reside in the parent's home.

Sec. 32 RCW 13.32A.194 and 2000 c 123 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The court shall hold a fact-finding hearing to consider a
proper ((at-risk youth)) kid at hope petition. The court shall grant
the petition and enter an order finding the child to be ((an at-risk
youth)) a kid at hope if the allegations in the petition are
established by a preponderance of the evidence, unless the child is the
subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW. If the petition is
granted, the court shall enter an order requiring the child to reside
in the home of his or her parent or in an out-of-home placement as
provided in RCW 13.32A.192(2).
(2) The court may order the department to submit a dispositional
plan if such a plan would assist the court in ordering a suitable
disposition in the case. If the court orders the department to prepare
a plan, the department shall provide copies of the plan to the parent,
the child, and the court. If the parties or the court desire the
department to be involved in any future proceedings or case plan
development, the department shall be provided timely notification of
all court hearings.
(3) If the court grants or denies ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at
hope petition, a statement of the written reasons shall be entered into
the records. If the court denies ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
petition, the court shall verbally advise the parties that the child is
required to remain within the care, custody, and control of his or her
parent.

Sec. 33 RCW 13.32A.196 and 2000 c 123 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A dispositional hearing shall be held no later than fourteen
days after the fact-finding hearing. Each party shall be notified of
the time and date of the hearing.
(2) At the dispositional hearing regarding an adjudicated ((at-risk
youth)) kid at hope, the court shall consider the recommendations of
the parties and the recommendations of any dispositional plan submitted
by the department. The court may enter a dispositional order that will
assist the parent in maintaining the care, custody, and control of the
child and assist the family to resolve family conflicts or problems.
(3) The court may set conditions of supervision for the child that
include:
(a) Regular school attendance;
(b) Counseling;
(c) Participation in a substance abuse or mental health outpatient
treatment program;
(d) Reporting on a regular basis to the department or any other
designated person or agency; and
(e) Any other condition the court deems an appropriate condition of
supervision including but not limited to: Employment, participation in
an anger management program, and refraining from using alcohol or
drugs.
(4) No dispositional order or condition of supervision ordered by
a court pursuant to this section shall include involuntary commitment
of a child for substance abuse or mental health treatment.
(5) The court may order the parent to participate in counseling
services or any other services for the child requiring parental
participation. The parent shall cooperate with the court-ordered case
plan and shall take necessary steps to help implement the case plan.
The parent shall be financially responsible for costs related to the
court-ordered plan; however, this requirement shall not affect the
eligibility of the parent or child for public assistance or other
benefits to which the parent or child may otherwise be entitled.
(6) The parent may request dismissal of ((an at-risk youth)) a kid
at hope proceeding or out-of-home placement at any time. Upon such a
request, the court shall dismiss the matter and cease court supervision
of the child unless: (a) A contempt action is pending in the case; (b)
a petition has been filed under RCW 13.32A.150 and a hearing has not
yet been held under RCW 13.32A.179; or (c) an order has been entered
under RCW 13.32A.179(3) and the court retains jurisdiction under that
subsection. The court may retain jurisdiction over the matter for the
purpose of concluding any pending contempt proceedings, including the
full satisfaction of any penalties imposed as a result of a contempt
finding.
(7) The court may order the department to monitor compliance with
the dispositional order, assist in coordinating the provision of court-ordered services, and submit reports at subsequent review hearings
regarding the status of the case.

Sec. 34 RCW 13.32A.197 and 1996 c 133 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In a disposition hearing, after a finding that a child is a
((child)) kid at hope in need of services or ((an at-risk youth)) a kid
at hope, the court may adopt the additional orders authorized under
this section if it finds that the child involved in those proceedings
is not eligible for inpatient treatment for a mental health or
substance abuse condition and requires specialized treatment. The
court may order that a child be placed in a staff secure facility,
other than a crisis residential center, that will provide for the
child's participation in a program designed to remedy his or her
behavioral difficulties or needs. The court may not enter this order
unless, at the disposition hearing, it finds that the placement is
clearly necessary to protect the child and that a less restrictive
order would be inadequate to protect the child, given the child's age,
maturity, propensity to run away from home, past exposure to serious
risk when the child ran away from home, and possible future exposure to
serious risk should the child run away from home again.
(2) The order shall require periodic court review of the placement,
with the first review hearing conducted not more than thirty days after
the date of the placement. At each review hearing the court shall
advise the parents of their rights under RCW 13.32A.160(1), review the
progress of the child, and determine whether the orders are still
necessary for the protection of the child or a less restrictive
placement would be adequate. The court shall modify its orders as it
finds necessary to protect the child. Reviews of orders adopted under
this section are subject to the review provisions under RCW 13.32A.190
and ((13.32.198 [13.32A.198])) 13.32A.198.
(3) Placements in staff secure facilities under this section shall
be limited to children who meet the statutory definition of a ((child))
kid at hope in need of services or ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
as defined in RCW 13.32A.030.
(4) State funds may only be used to pay for placements under this
section if, and to the extent that, such funds are appropriated to
expressly pay for them.

Sec. 35 RCW 13.32A.198 and 1990 c 276 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon making a disposition regarding an adjudicated ((at-risk
youth)) kid at hope, the court shall schedule the matter on the
calendar for review within three months, advise the parties of the date
thereof, appoint legal counsel for the child, advise the parent of the
right to be represented by legal counsel at the review hearing at the
parent's own expense, and notify the parties of their rights to present
evidence at the hearing.
(2) At the review hearing, the court shall approve or disapprove
the continuation of court supervision in accordance with the goal of
assisting the parent to maintain the care, custody, and control of the
child. The court shall determine whether the parent and child are
complying with the dispositional plan. If court supervision is
continued, the court may modify the dispositional plan.
(3) Court supervision of the child may not be continued past one
hundred eighty days from the day the review hearing commenced unless
the court finds, and the parent agrees, that there are compelling
reasons for an extension of supervision. Any extension granted
pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed ninety days.
(4) The court may dismiss ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope
proceeding at any time if the court finds good cause to believe that
continuation of court supervision would serve no useful purpose or that
the parent is not cooperating with the court-ordered case plan. The
court shall dismiss ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope proceeding if
the child is the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec. 36 RCW 13.32A.200 and 2007 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All hearings pursuant to this chapter may be conducted at any
time or place within the county of the residence of the parent and such
cases shall be heard in conjunction with the business of any other
division of the superior court, except as provided in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section.
(2) The public shall be excluded from a ((child)) kid at hope in
need of services hearing if the judicial officer finds that it is in
the best interest of the child.
(3) The public shall be excluded from ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at
hope hearing if:
(a) The judicial officer finds that it is in the best interest of
the child; or
(b) Either parent requests that the public be excluded from the
hearing.
(4) At the beginning of the ((at-risk youth)) kid at hope hearing,
the judicial officer shall notify the parents that either parent has
the right to request that the public be excluded from the ((at-risk
youth)) kid at hope hearing.
(5) If the public is excluded from hearings under subsection (2) or
(3) of this section, only such persons who are found by the court to
have a direct interest in the case or the work of the court shall be
admitted to the proceedings.

Sec. 37 RCW 13.32A.205 and 1995 c 312 s 32 are each amended to
read as follows:
No superior court may refuse to accept for filing a properly
completed and presented ((child)) kid at hope in need of services
petition or ((an at-risk youth)) a kid at hope petition. To be
properly presented, the petitioner shall verify that the family
assessment required under RCW 13.32A.150 has been completed. In the
event of an improper refusal that is appealed and reversed, the
petitioner shall be awarded actual damages, costs, and attorneys' fees.

Sec. 38 RCW 13.32A.250 and 2000 c 162 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In all ((child)) kid at hope in need of services proceedings
and ((at-risk youth)) kid at hope proceedings, the court shall verbally
notify the parents and the child of the possibility of a finding of
contempt for failure to comply with the terms of a court order entered
pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the court shall treat the parents and the child equally for
the purposes of applying contempt of court processes and penalties
under this section.
(2) Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this
chapter is a civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e),
subject to the limitations of subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The court may impose remedial sanctions including a fine of up
to one hundred dollars and confinement for up to seven days, or both
for contempt of court under this section.
(4) A child placed in confinement for contempt under this section
shall be placed in confinement only in a secure juvenile detention
facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county.
(5) A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child,
juvenile court personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or
person having custody of the child under a court order adopted pursuant
to this chapter.
(6) Whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon
consideration of a motion for contempt and the information set forth in
a supporting declaration, that a child has violated a placement order
entered under this chapter, the court may issue an order directing law
enforcement to pick up and take the child to detention. The order may
be entered ex parte without prior notice to the child or other parties.
Following the child's admission to detention, a detention review
hearing must be held in accordance with RCW 13.32A.065.

Sec. 39 RCW 13.40.460 and 2003 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary, assistant secretary, or the secretary's designee
shall manage and administer the department's juvenile rehabilitation
responsibilities, including but not limited to the operation of all
state institutions or facilities used for juvenile rehabilitation.
The secretary or assistant secretary shall:
(1) Prepare a biennial budget request sufficient to meet the
confinement and rehabilitative needs of the juvenile rehabilitation
program, as forecast by the office of financial management;
(2) Create by rule a formal system for inmate classification. This
classification system shall consider:
(a) Public safety;
(b) Internal security and staff safety;
(c) Rehabilitative resources both within and outside the
department;
(d) An assessment of each offender's risk of sexually aggressive
behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470; and
(e) An assessment of each offender's vulnerability to sexually
aggressive behavior as provided in RCW 13.40.470;
(3) Develop agreements with local jurisdictions to develop regional
facilities with a variety of custody levels;
(4) Adopt rules establishing effective disciplinary policies to
maintain order within institutions;
(5) Develop a comprehensive diagnostic evaluation process to be
used at intake, including but not limited to evaluation for substance
addiction or abuse, literacy, learning disabilities, fetal alcohol
syndrome or effect, attention deficit disorder, and mental health;
(6) Develop placement criteria:
(a) To avoid assigning youth who present a moderate or high risk of
sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as youth
assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization under RCW
13.40.470(1)(c); and
(b) To avoid placing a juvenile offender on parole status who has
been assessed as a moderate to high risk for sexually aggressive
behavior in a department community residential program with another
child who is: (i) Dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW, or ((an at-risk
youth)) a kid at hope or ((child)) a kid at hope in need of services
under chapter 13.32A RCW; and (ii) not also a juvenile offender on
parole status;
(7) Develop a plan to implement, by July 1, 1995:
(a) Substance abuse treatment programs for all state juvenile
rehabilitation facilities and institutions;
(b) Vocational education and instruction programs at all state
juvenile rehabilitation facilities and institutions; and
(c) An educational program to establish self-worth and
responsibility in juvenile offenders. This educational program shall
emphasize instruction in character-building principles such as:
Respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; work ethics; good citizenship; and life skills; and
(8)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop
uniform policies related to custodial assaults consistent with RCW
72.01.045 and 9A.36.100 that are to be followed in all juvenile
rehabilitation administration facilities; and
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration will report assaults
in accordance with the policies developed in (a) of this subsection.

Sec. 40 RCW 28A.225.160 and 2009 c 380 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
otherwise provided by law, it is the general policy of the state that
the common schools shall be open to the admission of all persons who
are five years of age and less than twenty-one years residing in that
school district. Except as otherwise provided by law or rules adopted
by the superintendent of public instruction, districts may establish
uniform entry qualifications, including but not limited to birth date
requirements, for admission to kindergarten and first grade programs of
the common schools. Such rules may provide for exceptions based upon
the ability, or the need, or both, of an individual student. For the
purpose of complying with any rule adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction that authorizes a preadmission screening process as
a prerequisite to granting exceptions to the uniform entry
qualifications, a school district may collect fees to cover expenses
incurred in the administration of any preadmission screening process:
PROVIDED, That in so establishing such fee or fees, the district shall
adopt rules for waiving and reducing such fees in the cases of those
persons whose families, ((by reason of their low income,)) including
kids at hope, who for the purpose of this section are families, who
would have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees because
of their low income.
(2) A student who meets the definition of a child of a military
family in transition under section 1, Article II of this act shall be
permitted to continue enrollment at the grade level in the common
schools commensurate with the grade level of the student when attending
school in the sending state as defined in section 1, Article II of this
act, regardless of age or birthdate requirements.

Sec. 41 RCW 28A.235.140 and 1993 c 333 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((For the purposes of)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section((:)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Free or reduced-price lunches" means lunches served by a
school district that qualify for federal reimbursement as free or
reduced-price lunches under the national school lunch program.
(b) "Kids at hope" means students from low-income families.
(c) "School breakfast program" means a program meeting federal
requirements defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1773.
(((c))) (d) "Severe-need school" means a school that qualifies for
a severe-need school reimbursement rate from federal funds for school
breakfasts served to ((children from low-income families)) kids at
hope.
(2) School districts shall be required to develop and implement
plans for a school breakfast program in severe-need schools, pursuant
to the schedule in this section. For the second year prior to the
implementation of the district's school breakfast program, and for each
subsequent school year, each school district shall submit data enabling
the superintendent of public instruction to determine which schools
within the district will qualify as severe-need schools. In developing
its plan, each school district shall consult with an advisory committee
including school staff and community members appointed by the board of
directors of the district.
(3) Using district-wide data on school lunch participation during
the 1988-89 school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt a schedule for implementation of school breakfast programs in
severe-need schools as follows:
(a) School districts where at least forty percent of lunches served
to students are free or reduced-price lunches shall submit a plan for
implementation of a school breakfast program in severe-need schools to
the superintendent of public instruction no later than July 1, 1990.
Each such district shall implement a school breakfast program in all
severe-need schools no later than the second day of school in the
1990-91 school year and in each school year thereafter.
(b) School districts where at least twenty-five but less than forty
percent of lunches served to students are free or reduced-price lunches
shall submit a plan for implementation of a school breakfast program in
severe-need schools to the superintendent of public instruction no
later than July 1, 1991. Each such district shall implement a school
breakfast program in all severe-need schools no later than the second
day of school in the 1991-92 school year and in each school year
thereafter.
(c) School districts where less than twenty-five percent of lunches
served to students are free or reduced-price lunches shall submit a
plan for implementation of a school breakfast program in severe-need
schools to the superintendent of public instruction no later than July
1, 1992. Each such district shall implement a school breakfast program
in all severe-need schools no later than the second day of school in
the 1992-93 school year and in each school year thereafter.
(d) School districts that did not offer a school lunch program in
the 1988-89 school year are encouraged to implement such a program and
to provide a school breakfast program in all severe-need schools when
eligible.
(4) The requirements in this section shall lapse if the federal
reimbursement rate for breakfasts served in severe-need schools is
eliminated.
(5) Students who do not meet family-income criteria for free
breakfasts shall be eligible to participate in the school breakfast
programs established under this section, and school districts may
charge for the breakfasts served to these students. Requirements that
school districts have school breakfast programs under this section
shall not create or imply any state funding obligation for these costs.
The legislature does not intend to include these programs within the
state's obligation for basic education funding under Article IX of the
Constitution.

Sec. 42 RCW 28A.235.160 and 2005 c 287 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((For the purposes of)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section((:)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Free or reduced-price lunch" means a lunch served by a school
district participating in the national school lunch program to a
((student)) kid at hope qualifying for national school lunch program
benefits based on family size-income criteria.
(b) "School lunch program" means a meal program meeting the
requirements defined by the superintendent of public instruction under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(c) "School breakfast program" means a program meeting federal
requirements defined in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1773.
(d) "Severe-need school" means a school that qualifies for a
severe-need school reimbursement rate from federal funds for school
breakfasts served to ((children from low-income families)) kids at
hope.
(e) "Summer food service program" means a meal or snack program
meeting the requirements defined by the superintendent of public
instruction under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) School districts shall implement a school lunch program in each
public school in the district in which educational services are
provided to children in any of the grades kindergarten through four and
in which twenty-five percent or more of the enrolled students qualify
for a free or reduced-price lunch. In developing and implementing its
school lunch program, each school district may consult with an advisory
committee including school staff, community members, and others
appointed by the board of directors of the district.
(a) Applications to determine free or reduced-price lunch
eligibility shall be distributed and collected for all households of
children in schools containing any of the grades kindergarten through
four and in which there are no United States department of agriculture
child nutrition programs. The applications that are collected must be
reviewed to determine eligibility for free or reduced-price lunches.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to require completion or
submission of the application by a parent or guardian.
(b) Using the most current available school data on free and
reduced-price lunch eligibility, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a schedule for implementation of school lunch
programs at each school required to offer such a program under
subsection (2) of this section as follows:
(i) Schools not offering a school lunch program and in which
twenty-five percent or more of the enrolled students are eligible for
free or reduced-price lunch shall implement a school lunch program not
later than the second day of school in the 2005-06 school year and in
each school year thereafter.
(ii) The superintendent shall establish minimum standards defining
the lunch meals to be served, and such standards must be sufficient to
qualify the meals for any available federal reimbursement.
(iii) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prevent a
school from implementing a school lunch program earlier than the school
is required to do so.
(3) To extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, each school
district shall implement a school breakfast program in each school
where more than forty percent of students eligible to participate in
the school lunch program qualify for free or reduced-price meal
reimbursement by the school year 2005-06. For the second year before
the implementation of the district's school breakfast program, and for
each subsequent school year, each school district shall submit data
enabling the superintendent of public instruction to determine which
schools within the district will qualify for this requirement. Schools
where lunch programs start after the 2003-04 school year, where forty
percent of students qualify for free or reduced-price meals, must begin
school breakfast programs the second year following the start of a
lunch program.
(4) Each school district shall implement a summer food service
program in each public school in the district in which a summer program
of academic, enrichment, or remedial services is provided and in which
fifty percent or more of the children enrolled in the school qualify
for free or reduced-price lunch. However, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop rules establishing criteria to permit an
exemption for a school that can demonstrate availability of an adequate
alternative summer feeding program. Sites providing meals should be
open to all children in the area, unless a compelling case can be made
to limit access to the program. The superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt a definition of compelling case and a schedule
for implementation as follows:
(a) Beginning the summer of 2005 if the school currently offers a
school breakfast or lunch program; or
(b) Beginning the summer following the school year during which a
school implements a school lunch program under subsection (2)(b) of
this section.
(5) Schools not offering a breakfast or lunch program may meet the
meal service requirements of subsections (2)(b) and (4) of this section
through any of the following:
(a) Preparing the meals on-site;
(b) Receiving the meals from another school that participates in a
United States department of agriculture child nutrition program; or
(c) Contracting with a nonschool entity that is a licensed food
service establishment under RCW 69.07.010.
(6) Requirements that school districts have a school lunch,
breakfast, or summer nutrition program under this section shall not
create or imply any state funding obligation for these costs. The
legislature does not intend to include these programs within the
state's obligation for basic education funding under Article IX of the
state Constitution.
(7) The requirements in this section shall lapse if the federal
reimbursement for any school breakfasts, lunches, or summer food
service programs is eliminated.
(8) School districts may be exempted from the requirements of this
section by showing good cause why they cannot comply with the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to the extent that such
exemption is not in conflict with federal or state law. The process
and criteria by which school districts are exempted shall be developed
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with representatives of school directors, school food
service, community-based organizations and the Washington state PTA.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 A new section is added to chapter 28A.245
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, "kids at hope" means at-risk
students.

Sec. 44 RCW 28A.245.040 and 2007 c 463 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
Subject to available funding, skill centers shall provide access to
late afternoon and evening sessions and summer school programs, to
rural and high-density area students aligned with regionally identified
high-demand occupations. When possible, the programs shall be
specifically targeted for credit retrieval, dropout prevention and
intervention for ((at-risk students)) kids at hope, and retrieval of
dropouts. Skill centers that receive funding for these activities must
participate in an evaluation that is designed to quantify results and
identify best practices, collaborate with local community partners in
providing a comprehensive program, and provide matching funds.

Sec. 45 RCW 28A.245.070 and 2008 c 170 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
Skill centers may enter into agreements with one or more
cooperating school districts to grant a high school diploma on behalf
of the district so that students who are juniors and seniors have an
opportunity to attend the skill center on a full-time basis without
coenrollment at a district high school. To avoid competition with
other high schools in the cooperating district, high school completion
programs operated by skill centers shall be designed as dropout
prevention and retrieval programs for ((at-risk)) kids at hope and
credit-deficient students or for fifth-year seniors. A skill center
may use grant awards from the building bridges program under RCW
28A.175.025 to develop high school completion programs as provided in
this section.

Sec. 46 RCW 28A.300.360 and 1999 c 319 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall provide, to the
extent funds are appropriated, start-up grants for alternative programs
and services that provide instruction and learning for kids at hope,
which for the purposes of this section include truant, at-risk, and
expelled students. Each grant application shall contain proposed
performance indicators and an evaluation plan to measure the success of
the program and its impact on improved student learning. Applications
shall contain the applicant's plan for maintaining the program and
services after the grant period.

Sec. 47 RCW 28A.300.440 and 2003 c 22 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
grant program is hereby created, subject to the availability of funds
in the natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
partnership account. The program is created to promote proven and
innovative natural science, wildlife, and environmental education
programs that are fully aligned with the state's essential academic
learning requirements, and includes but is not limited to instruction
about renewable resources, responsible use of resources, and
conservation.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and
publish funding criteria for environmental, natural science, wildlife,
forestry, and agricultural education grants. The office of (([the]))
the superintendent of public instruction shall involve a cross-section
of stakeholder groups to develop socially, economically, and
environmentally balanced funding criteria. These criteria shall be
based on compliance with the essential academic learning requirements
and use methods that encourage critical thinking. The criteria must
also include environmental, natural science, wildlife, forestry, and
agricultural education programs with one or more of the following
features:
(a) Interdisciplinary approaches to environmental, natural science,
wildlife, forestry, and agricultural issues;
(b) Programs that target underserved, ((disadvantaged)) kids at
hope, and multicultural populations;
(c) Programs that reach out to schools across the state that would
otherwise not have access to specialized environmental, natural
science, wildlife, forestry, and agricultural education programs;
(d) Proven programs offered by innovative community partnerships
designed to improve student learning and strengthen local communities.
(3) Eligible uses of grants include, but are not limited to:
(a) Continuing in-service and preservice training for educators
with materials specifically developed to enable educators to teach
essential academic learning requirements in a compelling and effective
manner;
(b) Proven, innovative programs that align the basic subject areas
of the common school curriculum in chapter 28A.230 RCW with the
essential academic learning requirements; the basic subject areas
should be integrated by using environmental education, natural science,
wildlife, forestry, agricultural, and natural environment curricula to
meet the needs of various learning styles; and
(c) Support and equipment needed for the implementation of the
programs in this section.
(4) Grants may only be disbursed to nonprofit organizations exempt
from income tax under section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue
code that can provide matching funds or in-kind services.
(5) Grants may not be used for any partisan or political
activities.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "kids at hope" means
disadvantaged populations.

Sec. 48 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2009 c 548 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students((,))
and all kids at hope. "Kids at hope" includes the following:
(i) Economically disadvantaged students((,));
(ii) Limited English proficient students((,));
(iii) Students with disabilities((,)); and
(iv) Students from disproportionately academically underachieving
racial and ethnic backgrounds.
The board may establish school and school district goals addressing
high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for students
in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the goals by
rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board shall
present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and, for high
school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The
board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of
student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall
consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into
the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall
set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. The initial performance standards
and any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards
for the tenth grade assessment shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November
30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit
the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are
implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The
legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and
any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the
middle school level performance standards;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 49 RCW 28A.325.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 170 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
The board of directors of any common school district may establish
and collect a fee from students and nonstudents as a condition to their
attendance at any optional noncredit extracurricular event of the
district which is of a cultural, social, recreational, or athletic
nature: PROVIDED, That in so establishing such fee or fees, the
district shall adopt regulations for waiving and reducing such fees in
the cases of those ((students)) kids at hope whose families, by reason
of their low income, would have difficulty in paying the entire amount
of such fees and may likewise waive or reduce such fees for nonstudents
of the age of sixty-five or over who, by reason of their low income,
would have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees. An
optional comprehensive fee may be established and collected for any
combination or all of such events or, in the alternative, a fee may be
established and collected as a condition to attendance at any single
event. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in
the associated student body program fund of the school district, and
may be expended to defray the costs of optional noncredit
extracurricular events of such a cultural, social, recreational, or
athletic nature, or to otherwise support the activities and programs of
associated student bodies.

Sec. 50 RCW 28A.400.350 and 2001 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of any of the state's school districts
or educational service districts may make available liability, life,
health, health care, accident, disability and salary protection or
insurance or any one of, or a combination of the enumerated types of
insurance, or any other type of insurance or protection, for the
members of the boards of directors, the students, and employees of the
school district or educational service district, and their dependents.
Such coverage may be provided by contracts with private carriers, with
the state health care authority after July 1, 1990, pursuant to the
approval of the authority administrator, or through self-insurance or
self-funding pursuant to chapter 48.62 RCW, or in any other manner
authorized by law.
(2) Whenever funds are available for these purposes the board of
directors of the school district or educational service district may
contribute all or a part of the cost of such protection or insurance
for the employees of their respective school districts or educational
service districts and their dependents. The premiums on such liability
insurance shall be borne by the school district or educational service
district.
After October 1, 1990, school districts may not contribute to any
employee protection or insurance other than liability insurance unless
the district's employee benefit plan conforms to RCW 28A.400.275 and
28A.400.280.
(3) For school board members, educational service district board
members, and students, the premiums due on such protection or insurance
shall be borne by the assenting school board member, educational
service district board member, or student. The school district or
educational service district may contribute all or part of the costs,
including the premiums, of life, health, health care, accident or
disability insurance which shall be offered to all students
participating in interschool activities on the behalf of or as
representative of their school, school district, or educational service
district. The school district board of directors and the educational
service district board may require any student participating in
extracurricular interschool activities to, as a condition of
participation, document evidence of insurance or purchase insurance
that will provide adequate coverage, as determined by the school
district board of directors or the educational service district board,
for medical expenses incurred as a result of injury sustained while
participating in the extracurricular activity. In establishing such a
requirement, the district shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the premiums of such coverage as may be offered through the
school district or educational service district to students
participating in extracurricular activities, for ((those)) kids at
hope, who are students whose families, by reason of their low income,
would have difficulty paying the entire amount of such insurance
premiums. The district board shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the insurance coverage requirements for low-income students in
order to assure such students are not prohibited from participating in
extracurricular interschool activities.
(4) All contracts for insurance or protection written to take
advantage of the provisions of this section shall provide that the
beneficiaries of such contracts may utilize on an equal participation
basis the services of those practitioners licensed pursuant to chapters
18.22, 18.25, 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW.

Sec. 51 RCW 28A.655.090 and 2008 c 165 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year
thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall report to
schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the
Washington assessment of student learning and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests.
(2) The reports shall include the assessment results by school and
school district, and include changes over time. For the Washington
assessment of student learning, results shall be reported as follows:
(a) The percentage of students meeting the standards;
(b) The percentage of students performing at each level of the
assessment;
(c) Disaggregation of results by at least the following subgroups
of students: White, Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native,
Asian, Pacific Islander/Hawaiian Native, kids at hope, who are kids
from families with a low income, transitional bilingual, migrant,
special education, and, beginning with the 2009-10 school year,
students covered by section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of
1973, as amended (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794); and
(d) A learning improvement index that shows changes in student
performance within the different levels of student learning reported on
the Washington assessment of student learning.
(3) The reports shall contain data regarding the different
characteristics of schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English
as a second language students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of
students in special education, and student mobility so that districts
and schools can learn from the improvement efforts of other schools and
districts with similar characteristics.
(4) The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by
comparable Washington schools of similar characteristics.
(5) The reports shall contain information on public school choice
options available to students, including vocational education.
(6) The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public
instruction's internet web site.
(7) To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and
districts that test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not
be reported. In addition, in order to ensure that results are reported
accurately, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the
confidentiality of statewide data files until the superintendent
determines that the data are complete and accurate.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the
percentage and number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted from taking the assessments by schools and
school districts to ensure the exemptions are in compliance with
exemption guidelines.

Sec. 52 RCW 28A.700.005 and 2008 c 170 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that many secondary career and technical
education programs have made progress in retooling for the twenty-first
century by aligning with state and nationally certified programs that
meet industry standards and by increasing the rigor of academic content
in core skills such as reading, writing, mathematics, and science.
(2) However, the legislature also finds that increased expectations
for students to meet the state's academic learning standards require
students to take remedial courses. The state board of education is
considering increasing credit requirements for high school graduation.
Together these policies could restrict students from pursuing high
quality career and technical education programs because students would
not have adequate time in their schedules to enroll in a progressive
sequence of career and technical courses.
(3) The legislature further finds that teachers, counselors,
students, and parents are not well-informed about the opportunities
presented by high quality career and technical education. Secondary
career and technical education is not a stopping point but a beginning
point for further education, including through a bachelor's degree.
Secondary preapprenticeships and courses aligned to industry standards
can lead directly to workforce entry as well as to additional
education. Career and technical education is a proven strategy to
engage and motivate students, including kids at hope, who are students
at risk of dropping out of school entirely.
(4) Finally, the legislature finds that state policies have been
piecemeal in support of career and technical education. Laws exist to
require state approval of career and technical programs, but could be
strengthened by requiring alignment with industry standards and
focusing on high-demand fields. Tech prep consortia have developed
articulation agreements for dual credit and smooth transitions between
high schools and colleges, but agreements remain highly decentralized
between individual faculty and individual schools. Laws require school
districts to create equivalences between academic and career and
technical courses, but more support and professional development is
needed to expand these opportunities.
(5) Therefore it is the legislature's intent to identify the gaps
in current laws and policies regarding secondary career and technical
education and fill those gaps in a comprehensive fashion to create a
coherent whole. This act seeks to increase the quality and rigor of
secondary career and technical education, improve links to
postsecondary education, encourage and facilitate academic instruction
through career and technical courses, and expand access to and
awareness of the opportunities offered by high quality career and
technical education.

Sec. 53 RCW 28A.700.090 and 2008 c 170 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall provide grants to
eligible students to offset the costs of required examination or
testing fees associated with obtaining state or industry certification
in the student's career and technical education program.
(2) The office shall establish maximum grant amounts and a process
for students to apply for the grants.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible student" means:
(a) A student enrolled in a secondary career and technical
education program where state or industry certification can be obtained
without additional postsecondary work or study; or
(b) A student who completed a secondary career and technical
education program in a Washington public school and is seeking state or
industry certification in a program requiring additional postsecondary
work or study or where there are age limitations on certification.
(4) Eligible students must be kids at hope, which for the purposes
of this section means the student must have a family income that is at
or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level using the
most current guidelines available from the United States department of
health and human services.

Sec. 54 RCW 43.310.005 and 1993 c 497 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The number of youth who are members and associates of gangs and
commit gang violence has significantly increased throughout the entire
greater Puget Sound, Spokane, and other areas of the state;
(2) Youth gang violence has caused a tremendous strain on the
progress of the communities impacted. The loss of life, property, and
positive opportunity for growth caused by youth gang violence has
reached intolerable levels. Increased youth gang activity has
seriously strained the budgets of many local jurisdictions, as well as
threatened the ability of the educational system to educate our youth;
(3) Among youth gang members the high school drop-out rate is
significantly higher than among nongang members. Since the economic
future of our state depends on a highly educated and skilled workforce,
this high school drop-out rate threatens the economic welfare of our
future workforce, as well as the future economic growth of our state;
(4) The unemployment rate among youth gang members is higher than
that among the general youth population. The unusual unemployment
rate, lack of education and skills, and the increased criminal activity
could significantly impact our future prison population;
(5) Most youth gangs are subcultural. This implies that gangs
provide the nurturing, discipline, and guidance to gang youth and
potential gang youth that is generally provided by communities and
other social systems. The subcultural designation means that youth
gang participation and violence can be effectively reduced in
Washington communities and schools through the involvement of
community, educational, criminal justice, and employment systems
working in a unified manner with parents and individuals who have a
firsthand knowledge of youth gangs and ((at-risk youth)) kids at hope;
and
(6) A strong unified effort among parents and community,
educational, criminal justice, and employment systems would facilitate:
(a) The learning process; (b) the control and reduction of gang
violence; (c) the prevention of youth joining negative gangs; and (d)
the intervention into youth gangs.

Sec. 55 RCW 43.310.010 and 1993 c 497 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context otherwise requires, the ((following))
definitions ((shall)) in this section apply throughout RCW 43.310.005
through 43.310.040 ((and sections 5 and 7 through 10, chapter 497, Laws
of 1993:)).
(1) "School" means any public school within a school district any
portion of which is in a county with a population of over one hundred
ninety thousand.
(2) "Community organization" means any organization recognized by
a city or county as such, as well as private, nonprofit organizations
registered with the secretary of state.
(3) "Gang risk prevention and intervention pilot program" means a
community-based positive prevention and intervention program for ((gang
members, potential gang members, at-risk youth,)) kids at hope and
elementary through high school-aged youth directed at all of the
following:
(a) Reducing the probability of youth involvement in gang
activities and consequent violence.
(b) Establishing ties, at an early age, between youth and community
organizations.
(c) Committing local business and community resources to positive
programming for youth.
(d) Committing state resources to assist in creating the gang risk
prevention and intervention pilot programs.
(4) "Kids at hope" means gang members, potential gang members, and
at-risk youth.
(5) "Cultural awareness retreat" means a program that temporarily
relocates at-risk youth or gang members and their parents from their
usual social environment to a different social environment, with the
specific purpose of having them performing activities which will
enhance or increase their positive behavior and potential life
successes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 56 This act may be known and cited as the kids
at hope act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 Section 3 of this act expires September 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 Section 4 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2011.

--- END ---