BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.230 and 2004 c 160 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine
importer, and wine distributor licensed under this title shall make
((monthly)) reports to the board of its operations, pursuant to ((the))
such regulations as the board may adopt. However, such reports,
including without limitation tax returns pursuant to RCW 66.24.210, may
not be required more frequently than annually from any winery or wine
certificate of approval holder that had total taxable sales of wine in
Washington state of six thousand gallons or less during the calendar
year preceding the date on which the report would otherwise be due.
Such domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, wine
importer, and wine distributor shall make no sales of wine within the
state of Washington except to the board, or as otherwise provided in
this title.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.210 and 2009 c 479 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production shall pay taxes imposed by this
section. There is hereby imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors and the Washington state liquor control board within the
state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents
per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to
another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by
direct payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every
person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section shall on or
before the twentieth day of each month report to the board all
purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and upon
such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report
shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such report unless
the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine whose
applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following
the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two
percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every
such person shall execute to and file with the board a bond to be
approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix, securing
the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax when
due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all
taxes are paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
domestic winery shall make monthly reports to the liquor control board
on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in the manner and
upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax shall be transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth
day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) shall be
disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use in
carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries shall
pay taxes under this section on wine sold and shipped directly to
Washington state residents in a manner consistent with the requirements
of a wine distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, except wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the
resident purchaser.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any
domestic winery or wine certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production that had total taxable sales of wine
in Washington state of six thousand gallons or less during the calendar
year preceding the date on which the tax would otherwise be due is not
required to pay taxes under this section more often than annually.

--- END ---