BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that commercial
forestry produces jobs and revenue while also providing clean water,
clean air, renewable energy, wildlife habitat, open space, and carbon
storage. For these reasons, maintaining a base of forest lands that
may be utilized for commercial forestry is of utmost importance to the
state.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.09.010 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 901 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature hereby finds and declares that the forest land
resources are among the most valuable of all resources in the state;
that a viable forest products industry is of prime importance to the
state's economy; that it is in the public interest for public and
private commercial forest lands to be managed consistent with sound
policies of natural resource protection; that coincident with
maintenance of a viable forest products industry, it is important to
afford protection to forest soils, fisheries, wildlife, water quantity
and quality, air quality, recreation, and scenic beauty.
(2) The legislature further finds and declares it to be in the
public interest of this state to create and maintain through the
adoption of this chapter a comprehensive statewide system of laws and
forest practices rules which will have a balanced focus of voluntary,
incentive-based measures, provide meaningful incentives for landowners,
and achieve the following purposes and policies:
(a) Promote and foster the economic success of the forest products
industry with the goal of keeping forestry as a priority land use, and
helping to secure the timber managing, growing, harvesting,
transporting, and manufacturing jobs made possible by a vibrant working
forest land base;
(b) Afford protection to, promote, foster and encourage timber
growth, and require such minimum reforestation of commercial tree
species on forest lands as will reasonably utilize the timber growing
capacity of the soil following current timber harvest;
(((b))) (c) Afford protection to forest soils and public resources
by utilizing all reasonable methods of technology in conducting forest
practices;
(((c))) (d) Recognize both the public and private interest in the
profitable growing and harvesting of timber;
(((d))) (e) Promote efficiency by permitting maximum operating
freedom consistent with the other purposes and policies stated herein;
(((e))) (f) Provide for regulation of forest practices so as to
avoid unnecessary duplication in such rules;
(((f))) (g) Provide for interagency input and intergovernmental and
tribal coordination and cooperation;
(((g))) (h) Achieve compliance with all applicable requirements of
federal and state law with respect to nonpoint sources of water
pollution from forest practices;
(((h))) (i) To consider reasonable land use planning goals and
concepts contained in local comprehensive plans and zoning regulations;
(((i))) (j) Foster cooperation among managers of public resources,
forest landowners, Indian tribes, and the citizens of the state; and
(((j))) (k) Develop a watershed analysis system that addresses the
cumulative effect of forest practices on, at a minimum, the public
resources of fish, water, and public capital improvements of the state
and its political subdivisions.
(3) The legislature further finds and declares that it is also in
the public interest of the state to encourage forest landowners to
undertake corrective and remedial action to reduce the impact of mass
earth movements and fluvial processes.
(4) The legislature further finds and declares that it is in the
public interest that the applicants for state forest practices permits
should assist in paying for the cost of review and permitting necessary
for the environmental protection of these resources.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.09.040 and 2009 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Where necessary to accomplish the purposes and policies
stated in RCW 76.09.010, and to implement the provisions of this
chapter, the board shall adopt forest practices rules pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW and in accordance with the procedures enumerated in
this section that:
(((a))) (i) Promote and foster a sound economic future for the
forest products industry;
(ii) Establish minimum standards for forest practices;
(((b))) (iii) Provide procedures for the voluntary development of
resource management plans, including voluntary conservation measures
proposed under section 4 of this act, which may be adopted as an
alternative to the minimum standards in (a)(ii) of this subsection if
the plan is consistent with the purposes and policies stated in RCW
76.09.010 and the plan meets or exceeds the objectives of the minimum
standards;
(((c))) (iv) Set forth necessary administrative provisions;
(((d))) (v) Establish procedures for the collection and
administration of forest practice fees as set forth by this chapter;
and
(((e))) (vi) Allow for the development of watershed analyses.
(b) Forest practices rules pertaining to water quality protection
shall be adopted by the board after reaching agreement with the
director of the department of ecology or the director's designee on the
board with respect thereto. All other forest practices rules shall be
adopted by the board.
(c) Forest practices rules shall be administered and enforced by
either the department or the local governmental entity as provided in
this chapter. Such rules shall be adopted and administered so as to
give consideration to all purposes and policies set forth in RCW
76.09.010.
(2)(a) The board shall prepare proposed forest practices rules. In
addition to any forest practices rules relating to water quality
protection proposed by the board, the department of ecology may submit
to the board proposed forest practices rules relating to water quality
protection.
(b)(i) Prior to initiating the rule-making process, the board must
both satisfy the requirements of section 4 of this act and submit any
proposed rules ((shall be submitted)) for review and comments to the
department of fish and wildlife and to the counties of the state.
After receipt of the proposed forest practices rules, the department of
fish and wildlife and the counties of the state shall have thirty days
in which to review and submit comments to the board, and to the
department of ecology with respect to its proposed rules relating to
water quality protection.
(ii) After the expiration of ((such)) the thirty day period, the
board and the department of ecology shall jointly hold one or more
hearings on the proposed rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. ((At
such hearing(s))) Any county representative may propose specific forest
practices rules relating to problems existing within ((such)) the
county at the hearings.
(iii) The board may adopt and the department of ecology may approve
such proposals if they find the proposals are consistent with the
purposes and policies of this chapter. However, if the board is
presented with two or more alternative proposed rules for adoption, the
board must adopt the rule that retains the greatest economic value to
forestry while achieving the minimum standard necessary requirements if
the level of environmental protection achieved by one of the
alternative rule proposals cannot be shown to substantially have more
benefits to the resource.
(3)(a) The board shall establish by rule a program for the
acquisition of riparian open space and critical habitat for threatened
or endangered species as designated by the board. Acquisition must be
a conservation easement. Lands eligible for acquisition are forest
lands within unconfined channel migration zones or forest lands
containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species as
designated by the board. Once acquired, these lands may be held and
managed by the department, transferred to another state agency,
transferred to an appropriate local government agency, or transferred
to a private nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in
RCW 64.04.130, in fee or transfer of management obligation. The board
shall adopt rules governing the acquisition by the state or donation to
the state of such interest in lands including the right of refusal if
the lands are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The rules shall
include definitions of qualifying lands, priorities for acquisition,
and provide for the opportunity to transfer such lands with limited
warranties and with a description of boundaries that does not require
full surveys where the cost of securing the surveys would be
unreasonable in relation to the value of the lands conveyed. The rules
shall provide for the management of the lands for ecological protection
or fisheries enhancement. For the purposes of conservation easements
entered into under this section, the following apply: (((a))) (i) For
conveyances of a conservation easement in which the landowner conveys
an interest in the trees only, the compensation must include the timber
value component, as determined by the cruised volume of any timber
located within the channel migration zone or critical habitat for
threatened or endangered species as designated by the board, multiplied
by the appropriate quality code stumpage value for timber of the same
species shown on the appropriate table used for timber harvest excise
tax purposes under RCW 84.33.091; (((b))) (ii) for conveyances of a
conservation easement in which the landowner conveys interests in both
land and trees, the compensation must include the timber value
component in (a)(i) of this subsection plus such portion of the land
value component as determined just and equitable by the department.
The land value component must be the acreage of qualifying channel
migration zone or critical habitat for threatened or endangered species
as determined by the board, to be conveyed, multiplied by the average
per acre value of all commercial forest land in western Washington or
the average for eastern Washington, whichever average is applicable to
the qualifying lands. The department must determine the western and
eastern Washington averages based on the land value tables established
by RCW 84.33.140 and revised annually by the department of revenue.
(((4))) (b) Subject to appropriations sufficient to cover the cost
of such an acquisition program and the related costs of administering
the program, the department must establish a conservation easement in
land that an owner tenders for purchase; provided that such lands have
been taxed as forest lands and are located within an unconfined channel
migration zone or contain critical habitat for threatened or endangered
species as designated by the board. Lands acquired under this section
shall become riparian or habitat open space. These acquisitions shall
not be deemed to trigger the compensating tax of chapters 84.33 and
84.34 RCW.
(((5))) (c) Instead of offering to sell interests in qualifying
lands, owners may elect to donate the interests to the state.
(((6))) (d) Any acquired interest in qualifying lands by the state
under this section shall be managed as riparian open space or critical
habitat.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to adopting new forest practices rules under RCW
76.09.040, the board is required, when appropriate, to propose related
incentives for landowners to provide voluntary conservation measures.
The proposed voluntary conservation measures must include criteria for
evaluating whether or not the intended outcomes of the measures are
being achieved, and the identification of the party or parties
responsible for conducting the evaluation.
(2) Proposed voluntary conservation measures that require public
funding for a new or expanded landowner incentive program or a similar
initiative only satisfy the requirements of this section if adequate
funding for the initiative has been secured concurrently with the
adoption of the proposal.

--- END ---