BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The utilities and transportation commission
shall study and make recommendations on developing optional time of use
electric rates that reflect the costs of serving customers at different
time periods, including peak and off-peak periods. The utilities and
transportation commission shall submit a report of its findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2012.

--- END ---