BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.217 and 1998 c 285 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to furnishing utility services, a city or town may
require a deposit to guarantee payment for services. However, failure
to require a deposit does not affect the validity of any lien
authorized by RCW 35.21.290 or 35.67.200. A city or town may determine
how to apply partial payments on past due accounts.
(2) A city or town may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicates of tenant utility service bills, or may notify
an owner or the owner's designee that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent. However, if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the
city or town in writing that a property served by the city or town is
a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and
has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing address, the
city or town shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the city
or town notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail.
When a city or town provides a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicates of tenant utility service bills or notice that
a tenant's utility account is delinquent, the city or town shall notify
the tenant that it is providing the duplicate bills or delinquency
notice to the owner or the owner's designee. After ((January 1, 1999))
August 1, 2010, if a city or town fails to notify the owner of a
tenant's delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and
after receiving the other information required by this subsection, the
city or town shall have no lien against the premises for the tenant's
delinquent and unpaid charges and is prohibited from collecting the
tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges for electric light or power
services from the owner or the owner's designee.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.290 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.290 are each amended to
read as follows:
Cities and towns owning their own waterworks, or electric light or
power plants shall have a lien against the premises to which water,
electric light, or power services were furnished for four months
charges therefor due or to become due, but not for any charges more
than four months past due((: PROVIDED, That the owner of the premises
or the owner of a delinquent mortgage thereon may give written notice
to the superintendent or other head of such works or plant to cut off
service to such premises accompanied by payment or tender of payment of
the then delinquent and unpaid charges for such service against the
premises together with the cut-off charge, whereupon the city or town
shall have no lien against the premises for charges for such service
thereafter furnished, nor shall the owner of the premises or the owner
of a delinquent mortgage thereon be held for the payment thereof)).
However, if a real property owner or the owner's designee notifies the
city or town providing electric light or power services in writing that
the property served by the city or town is a rental property, asks to
be notified of a tenant's delinquency, and has provided in writing a
complete and accurate mailing address, the city or town shall notify
the owner or the owner's designee of a tenant's delinquency at the same
time and in the same manner the city or town notifies the tenant of the
tenant's delinquency, or by mail, and the city or town is prohibited
from collecting from the owner or owner's designee any charges for
electric light or power services more than four months past due.
Before disconnecting utility services, a city or town shall determine
whether the property served is rental property and if so, whether the
customer of record is the real property owner or a tenant. When the
city or town has reasonable grounds to believe that the property served
is rental property and the customer of record is the real property
owner and not the tenant, the city or town shall undertake reasonable
efforts to inform the tenant of the impending disconnection at the same
time and in the same manner that it notifies the customer of record.
This notice shall inform the tenant that, upon request, the city or
town shall delay the disconnection of services for ten business days to
give the tenant an opportunity to resolve the delinquency or dispute
with his or her landlord or to arrange for continued service by opening
his or her own utility service account. A city or town shall provide
utility services to a tenant on the same terms and conditions as other
utility customers, without requiring that he or she pay delinquent
amounts for services previously provided to the rental property and
owed by the landlord or a previous tenant.

--- END ---