BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Association" means the Washington vaccine association.
(2) "Covered lives" means all persons under the age of nineteen in
Washington state who are:
(a) Covered under an individual or group health benefit plan issued
or delivered in Washington state; or
(b) Enrolled in a group health benefit plan administered by a
third-party administrator. Persons under the age of nineteen for whom
federal funding is used to purchase vaccines are not considered
"covered lives" under this chapter.
(3) "Estimated vaccine cost" means the estimated cost to the state
over the course of a state fiscal year for the purchase and
distribution of vaccines purchased at the federal discount rate by the
department of health.
(4) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(5) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
48.43.005.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.
(7) "Third-party administrator" means any person or entity who, on
behalf of a health insurer or health care purchaser, receives or
collects charges, contributions, or premiums for, or adjusts or settles
claims on or for, residents of Washington state or Washington health
care providers and facilities.
(8) "Total nonfederal program cost" means the estimated vaccine
cost less the amount of federal revenue available to the state for the
purchase and distribution of vaccines.
(9) "Vaccine" means a preparation of killed or attenuated living
microorganisms, or fraction thereof, that upon administration
stimulates immunity that protects against disease and is approved by
the federal food and drug administration as safe and effective and
recommended by the advisory committee on immunization practices of the
centers for disease control and prevention for administration to
children under the age of nineteen years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is created a nonprofit corporation to
be known as the Washington vaccine association. The association is
formed to assess health carriers and third-party administrators for the
cost of vaccines provided to certain children in Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The association is comprised of all
health carriers issuing or renewing health benefit plans in Washington
state and all third-party administrators conducting business on behalf
of residents of Washington state or Washington health care providers
and facilities. Third-party administrators are subject to registration
under section 9 of this act.
(2) The association is a nonprofit corporation under chapter 24.03
RCW and has the powers granted under that chapter.
(3)(a) The board of directors includes the following voting
members:
(i) Five representatives selected from the licensed health carriers
having the most covered lives in Washington state;
(ii) Four third-party administrators, two representing Taft-Hartley
health benefit plans and two representing self-funded health care
purchasers;
(iii) Two health care provider representatives, one of whom must be
a board-certified pediatrician, appointed by the secretary; and
(iv) The secretary, or secretary's designee, who shall serve as an
ex officio member.
(b) The carrier members of the board must be selected by election
from among the carrier members of the association. The third-party
administrator members of the board must be selected by election from
among the third-party administrator members of the association.
(4) The directors' terms and appointments must be specified in the
plan of operation adopted by the association.
(5) The board of directors of the association shall:
(a) Prepare and adopt articles of association and bylaws;
(b) Prepare and adopt a plan of operation;
(c) Submit the plan of operation to the secretary for approval;
(d) Conduct all activities in accordance with the approved plan of
operation;
(e) On an annual basis, beginning on November 1, 2010, and by
November 1st of each year thereafter, establish the amount of the
assessment;
(f) Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to collect and
disburse the assessment;
(g) Enter into contracts as necessary or proper to administer the
plan of operation;
(h) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action necessary or
proper for the recovery of any assessment for, on behalf of, or against
members of the association or other participating person;
(i) Appoint, from among its directors, committees as necessary to
provide technical assistance in the operation of the association,
including the hiring of independent consultants as necessary;
(j) Notify, in writing, each carrier and third-party administrator
of the carrier's or third-party administrator's assessment by November
15th of each year;
(k) Submit an annual report to the secretary listing those carriers
or third-party administrators that failed to remit their assessments;
(l) Allow each carrier or third-party administrator up to ninety
days after the notification required by (j) of this subsection to remit
its assessment or submit an assessment payment plan, subject to
approval by the association and initial payment under an approved
assessment payment plan;
(m) Deposit annual assessments collected by the association, less
the association's administrative costs, with the state treasurer to the
credit of the universal vaccine purchase account established in RCW
43.70.720; and
(n) Perform any other functions as may be necessary or proper to
carry out the plan of operation.
(6) The secretary shall convene the initial meeting of the
association board of directors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The secretary shall calculate the total
nonfederal program cost for the upcoming calendar year by October 1,
2010, and October 1st of each year thereafter. In addition, by October
1, 2010, the secretary shall calculate the total anticipated nonfederal
program cost for the period of May 1st through December 31st, 2010.
(2) The board of directors of the association shall determine the
amount to be raised in assessments each upcoming year based upon the
number of covered lives for whom vaccine must be purchased and the
total anticipated nonfederal program cost calculated by the department
under subsection (1) of this section. The amount to be raised includes
reasonable costs for the association's administration.
(3) Except to the extent authorized in subsection (4) of this
section, each licensed health carrier and third-party administrator
must be assessed in proportion to the number of its covered lives.
(4) The board of the association shall develop a mechanism through
which the number and cost of doses of vaccine purchased under this
chapter that have been administered to children covered by each
licensed health carrier and registered third-party administrator are
attributed to each such carrier and third-party administrator. This
mechanism must include date of service, patient name, vaccine received,
and health benefit plan eligibility. The data must be collected and
maintained in a manner consistent with applicable state and federal
health information privacy laws. Beginning November 1, 2011, and each
November 1st thereafter, the board shall factor the results of this
mechanism for the previous year into the determination of the
appropriate assessment amount for each health carrier and third-party
administrator for the upcoming year.
(5) For any year in which the total calculated cost to be received
from association members through assessments is less than the total
nonfederal program cost, the association must pay the difference to the
state for deposit into the universal vaccine purchase account
established in RCW 43.70.720.
(6) The aggregate amount to be raised by the association in any
year must be reduced by any surpluses remaining from prior years.
(7) The amount to be raised by the association through its initial
assessments in 2010, notification of which must be sent to carriers and
third-party administrators by November 15, 2010, includes amounts
necessary to recover the total nonfederal program cost for calendar
year 2011 as well as the anticipated total nonfederal program cost for
the period of May 1st through December 31st, 2010. The amount of each
carrier's or third-party administrator's assessment for this initial
period must be reduced to reflect amounts voluntarily deposited into
the universal vaccine purchase account established in RCW 43.70.720 by
each carrier or third-party administrator prior to December 31, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The board of the association shall
establish a committee for the purpose of selecting vaccines to be
purchased in each upcoming year by the department of health. The
committee must be composed of at least five voting board members,
including at least one carrier representative, one third-party
administrator representative, and one physician, and the secretary or
the secretary's designee. The committee also must include a
representative of vaccine manufacturers, who shall be a nonvoting
member of the committee. The representative of vaccine manufacturers
must be chosen by the secretary from a list of three nominees submitted
collectively by vaccine manufacturers on an annual basis.
(2) In selecting vaccines to purchase, the following factors should
be strongly considered by the committee: Patient safety and clinical
efficacy, public health and purchaser value, patient and provider
choice, and stability of vaccine supply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In addition to the duties and powers
enumerated elsewhere in this chapter:
(1) The secretary shall assess a civil penalty against any carrier
or third-party administrator that fails to pay an assessment within six
months of notification under section 3 of this act. The civil penalty
is one hundred twenty-five percent of the amount of the delinquent
assessment. Civil penalties so levied must be deposited in the
universal vaccine purchase account created in RCW 43.70.720.
(2) The secretary may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The board of directors of the association
shall submit to the secretary, no later than one hundred twenty days
after the close of the association's fiscal year, a financial report in
a form approved by the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 No liability on the part of, and no cause of
action of any nature, shall arise against any member of the board of
the association or against an employee or agent of the association for
any lawful action taken by them in the performance of their duties
under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning September 1, 2010, a third-party administrator
must register with the department of licensing and renew its
registration on an annual basis thereafter prior to December 31st of
each year, or within ten days after the registrant changes its name,
business name, business address, or business telephone number,
whichever occurs sooner.
(b) The registrant shall pay the registration or renewal fee
established by the department of licensing as provided in RCW
43.24.086.
(c) Any person or entity that is acting as or holding itself out to
be a third-party administrator while failing to have registered under
this section is subject to a civil penalty of not less than one
thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.
The civil penalty is in addition to any other penalties that may be
imposed for violations of other laws of this state.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "third-party administrator"
has the same meaning as defined in section 1 of this act.
(3) The department of licensing may adopt rules under chapter 34.05
RCW as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.70.720 and 2009 c 564 s 934 are each amended to
read as follows:
The universal vaccine purchase account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Receipts from public and private sources for the
purpose of increasing access to vaccines for children may be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account must be used
exclusively for the purchase of vaccines, at no cost to health care
providers in Washington, to administer to children under nineteen years
old who are not eligible to receive vaccines at no cost through federal
programs. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The Washington vaccine association, established in sections 1
through 8 of this act, and its powers and duties shall be terminated on
June 30, 2015, as provided in section 13 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.131
RCW to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2016:
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 2 of this act;
(3) Section 3 of this act;
(4) Section 4 of this act;
(5) Section 5 of this act;
(6) Section 6 of this act;
(7) Section 7 of this act; and
(8) Section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---