BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.045 and 2004 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Agency" means a department of state government created under
RCW 43.17.010 and the office of the state auditor.
(b) "Audit" means an examination of records or financial accounts
to evaluate accuracy and monitor compliance with statutory or
regulatory requirements.
(c) "Hospital" means a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.
(d) "Survey" means an inspection, examination, or site visit
conducted by an agency to evaluate and monitor the compliance of a
hospital or hospital services or facilities with statutory or
regulatory requirements.
(2) By July 1, 2004, each state agency which conducts hospital
surveys or audits shall post to its agency web site a list of the most
frequent problems identified in its hospital surveys or audits along
with information on how to avoid or address the identified problems,
and a person within the agency that a hospital may contact with
questions or for further assistance.
(3) ((By July 1, 2004, the department of health, in cooperation
with other state agencies which conduct hospital surveys or audits,
shall develop an instrument, to be provided to every hospital upon
completion of a state survey or audit, which allows the hospital to
anonymously evaluate the survey or audit process in terms of quality,
efficacy, and the extent to which it supported improved patient care
and compliance with state law without placing an unnecessary
administrative burden on the hospital. The evaluation may be returned
to the department of health for distribution to the appropriate agency.
The department of health shall annually compile the evaluations in a
report to the legislature.
(4))) Except when responding to complaints or immediate public
health and safety concerns or when such prior notice would conflict
with other state or federal law, any state agency that provides notice
of a hospital survey or audit must provide such notice to the hospital
no less than four weeks prior to the date of the survey or audit.

--- END ---