BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Water is an essential element for economic
prosperity and it generates new, family-wage jobs and state revenues.
It is the intent of the legislature to provide both the water right
applicants and the department of ecology with the necessary tools to
expedite the processing of water right applications depending on the
needs of the project and agency workload.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Sufficient resources to support the
department of ecology's water resource program are essential for
effective and sustainable water management that provides certainty to
processed applications. The department of ecology shall review current
water resource functions and report to the legislature and the governor
by September 1, 2010, on improvements to make the program more self-sustaining and efficient.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.03.265 and 2003 c 70 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any applicant for a new withdrawal or a change, transfer, or
amendment of a water right pending before the department((,)) may
initiate a cost-reimbursement agreement with the department to provide
expedited review of the application. A cost-reimbursement agreement
may ((only)) be initiated under this section if the applicant agrees to
pay for, or as part of a cooperative effort agrees to pay for, the cost
of processing his or her application and all other applications from
the same source of supply which must be acted upon before the
applicant's request because they were filed prior to the date of when
the applicant filed.
(b) The requirement to pay for the cost of other applications under
(a) of this subsection does not apply to an application for a new
appropriation that would not diminish the water available to earlier
pending applicants for new appropriations from the same source of
supply.
(c) The requirement to pay for the cost of processing other
applications under (a) of this subsection does not apply to an
application for a change, transfer, or other amendment that would not
diminish the water available to earlier pending applicants for changes
or transfers from the same source of supply.
(d) In determining whether an application would not diminish the
water available to earlier pending applicants, the department shall
consider any water impoundment or other water resource management
mitigation technique proposed by the applicant under RCW 90.03.255 or
90.44.055.
(e) The department may enter into cost-reimbursement agreements
provided resources are available and shall use the process established
under RCW 43.21A.690 for entering into cost-reimbursement agreements.
The department's share of work related to a cost-reimbursement
application, such as final certificate approval, must be prioritized
within the framework of other water right processing needs and as
determined by agency rule.
(f) Each individual applicant is responsible for his or her own
appeal costs that may result from a water right decision made by the
department. In the event that the department's approval of an
application is appealed under chapter 43.21B RCW by a third party, the
applicant for the water right in question must reimburse the department
for the cost of defending the decision before the pollution control
hearings board unless otherwise agreed to by the applicant and the
department. If an applicant appeals either an approval or a denial by
the department, the applicant is responsible only for its own appeal
costs.
(2) In pursuing a cost-reimbursement project, the department must
determine the source of water proposed to be diverted or withdrawn
from, including the boundaries of the area that delimits the source.
The department must determine if any other water right permit
applications are pending from the same source. A water source may
include surface water only, groundwater only, or surface and
groundwater together if the department finds they are hydraulically
connected. The department shall consider technical information
submitted by the applicant in making its determinations under this
subsection. The department may recover from a cost-reimbursement
applicant its own costs in making the same source determination under
this subsection.
(3) Upon request of the applicant seeking cost-reimbursement
processing, the department may elect to initiate a coordinated cost-reimbursement process. To initiate this process, the department must
notify in writing all persons who have pending applications on file for
a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of a water right
from that water source. A water source may include surface water only,
groundwater only, or surface and groundwater together if the department
determines that they are hydraulically connected. The notice must be
made by way of mail and by publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area where affected properties are located. The
notice must:
(a) Inform those applicants that cost-reimbursement processing of
applications within the described water source is being initiated;
(b) Provide to individual applicants the criteria under which the
applications will be examined and determined;
(c) Provide to individual applicants the estimated cost for having
an application processed;
(d) Provide an estimate of how long the cost-reimbursement process
will take before an application is approved or denied; and
(e) Provide at least sixty days for the applicants to respond in
writing regarding the applicant's decision to participate in the cost-reimbursement process.
(4) The applicant initiating cost-reimbursement request must pay
for the cost of the determination under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section and other costs necessary for the initial phase of cost-reimbursement processing. The cost for each applicant for conducting
processing under a coordinated cost-reimbursement agreement must be
based on the proportionate quantity of water requested by each
applicant.
(5) For any cost-reimbursement process under this section, the
applicant may select the consultant from the department's prequalified
consultant's list or may be assigned a prequalified consultant by the
department. The applicant may also use its own consultant at the
discretion of the department if the consultant meets the requirements
in subsection (6) of this section.
(6)(a) If the applicant proposes to use its own consultant for one
or more of the work products or reports associated with the work
generally performed under a cost-reimbursement agreement, and the
department agrees to such use, all investigations, work products,
technical reports and analysis, findings, and documentation undertaken
by the consultant relating to the application, including preparation of
a draft report of examination, is subject to the review, comment,
modification, refusal, or approval of the department before being used
in the department's decision-making process. At any point during the
cost-reimbursement process, the department may request or accept
technical information, data, and analysis from the applicant or the
applicant's consultant to support the cost-reimbursement process or the
department's decision on the application.
(b) The department is authorized to adopt rules or guidance
providing: (i) Minimum qualifications and standards for the submission
of such technical information; and (ii) technical information,
scientific analysis, work product documentation, and report
presentation standards that an applicant's consultant must meet.
(7) The department must provide notice to potential consultants of
the opportunity to be considered for inclusion on the list of cost-reimbursement consultants to whom work assignments will be made. The
department must competitively select an appropriate number of
consultants who are qualified by training and experience to investigate
and make recommendations on the disposition of water right
applications. The consultant list must be renewed at least every six
years, though the department may add qualified cost-reimbursement
consultants to the list at any time. The department must enter a
master contract with each consultant selected and thereafter make work
assignments based on availability and qualifications.
(8) The department may remove any consultant from the consultant
list for poor performance, malfeasance, or excessive complaints from
cost-reimbursement participants. The department may interview any
cost-reimbursement consultant to determine whether the person is
qualified for this work, and must spot-check the work of consultants to
ensure that the public is being competently served.
(9) When assigned or selected for an application or set of
applications to investigate, the consultant must document its findings
and recommended disposition in the form of written draft reports of
examination. Within two weeks of the department receiving the draft
reports of examination, an applicant may provide comments to the
department on the contents of the report. The department may modify
the reports of examination submitted by the consultant. The
department's decision on a permit application is final unless it is
appealed to the pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B
RCW.
(10) The department must provide the applicant the opportunity to
review and comment on the consultant's findings, technical reports, and
preliminary draft reports of examination prior to the completion of
final documents by the consultant. The department must consider such
comments by the applicant prior to the department's issuance of a draft
report of examination.
(11) If an applicant elects not to participate in a cost-reimbursement process, the application remains on file with the
department, retains its priority date, and may be processed in the
future under regular processing, expedited processing, or through cost-reimbursement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The water rights processing account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the fees collected under sections 5 and 12
of this act must be deposited into the account. Money in the account
may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may only be used to support the processing of water right applications
for a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right or for the examination, certification, and renewal of
certification of water right examiners as provided in this chapter and
chapters 90.42 and 90.44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may expedite processing of applications within
the same source of water on its own volition when there is interest
from a sufficient number of applicants or upon receipt of written
requests from at least ten percent of the applicants within the same
source of water.
(2) If the conditions of subsection (1) of this section have been
met and the department determines that the public interest is best
served by expediting applications within a water source, the department
must notify in writing all persons who have pending applications on
file for a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right from that water source. A water source may include surface water
only, groundwater only, or surface and groundwater together if the
department determines that they are hydraulically connected. The
notice must be made by way of mail and by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area where affected properties are located.
The notice must:
(a) Inform those applicants that expedited processing of
applications with the described water source is being initiated;
(b) Provide to individual applicants the criteria under which the
applications will be examined and determined;
(c) Provide to individual applicants the estimated cost for having
an application processed on an expedited basis;
(d) Provide an estimate of how long the expedited process will take
before an application is approved or denied; and
(e) Provide at least sixty days for the applicants to respond in
writing regarding the applicant's decision to participate in the
expedited processing of their applications.
(3) In addition to the application fees provided in RCW 90.03.470,
the department must recover the full cost of processing all the
applications from applicants who elect to participate within the water
source through expedited processing fees. The department must
calculate an expedited processing fee based primarily on the
proportionate quantity of water requested by each applicant and may
adjust the fee if it appears that the application will require a
disproportionately greater amount of time and effort to process due to
its complexity. Any application fees that were paid by the applicant
under RCW 90.03.470 must be credited against the applicant's share of
the cost of processing applications under the provisions of this
section.
(4) The expedited processing fee must be collected by the
department prior to the expedited processing of an application. An
applicant who has stated in writing that he or she wants his or her
application processed using the expedited procedures in this section
must transmit the processing fee within sixty days of the written
request. Failure to do so will result in the applicant not being
included in expedited processing for that water source.
(5) If an applicant elects not to participate in expedited
processing, the application remains on file with the department, the
applicant retains his or her priority date, and the application may be
processed in the future through regular processing, expedited
processing, coordinated cost-reimbursement processing, or cost-reimbursement. Such an application may not be processed through
expedited processing within twelve months after the department's
issuance of decisions on participating applications at the conclusion
of expedited processing unless the applicant agrees to pay the full
proportionate share that would otherwise have been paid during such
processing. Any proceeds collected from an applicant under this
delayed entry into expedited processing may be used to reimburse the
other applicants who participated in the previous expedited processing
of applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must provide electronic notice and opportunity for
comment to affected federally recognized tribal governments
concurrently when providing notice to applicants under RCW 90.03.265
and sections 5 and 12 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and maintain a list of certified
water right examiners. Certified water right examiners on the list are
eligible to perform final proof examinations of permitted water uses
leading to the issuance of a water right certificate under RCW
90.03.330. The list must be updated annually and must be made
available to the public through written and electronic media.
(2) In order to qualify, an individual must be registered in
Washington as a professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or
registered hydrogeologist, or an individual must demonstrate at least
five years of applicable experience to the department, or be a board
member of a water conservancy board. Qualified individuals must also
pass a written examination prior to being certified by the department.
Such an examination must be administered by either the department or an
entity formally approved by the department. Each certified water right
examiner must demonstrate knowledge and competency regarding:
(a) Water law in the state of Washington;
(b) Measurement of the flow of water through open channels and
enclosed pipes;
(c) Water use and water level reporting;
(d) Estimation of the capacity of reservoirs and ponds;
(e) Irrigation crop water requirements;
(f) Aerial photo interpretation;
(g) Legal descriptions of land parcels;
(h) Location of land and water infrastructure through the use of
maps and global positioning;
(i) Proper construction and sealing of well bores; and
(j) Other topics related to the preparation and certification of
water rights in Washington state.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, upon
completion of a water appropriation and putting water to beneficial
use, in order to receive a final water right certificate, the permit
holder must secure the services of a certified water right examiner who
has been tested and certified by the department. The examiner shall
carry out a final examination of the project to verify its completion
and to determine and document for the permit holder and the department
the amount of water that has been appropriated for beneficial use, the
location of diversion or withdrawal and conveyance facilities, and the
actual place of use. The examiner shall take measurements or make
estimates of the maximum diversion or withdrawal, the capacity of water
storage facilities, the acreage irrigated, the type and number of
residences served, the type and number of stock watered, and other
information relevant to making a final determination of the amount of
water beneficially used. The examiner shall make photographs of the
facilities to document the use or uses of water and the photographs
must be submitted with the examiner's report to the department. The
department shall specify the format and required content of the reports
and may provide a form for that purpose.
(4) The department may suspend or revoke a certification based on
poor performance, malfeasance, failure to acquire continuing education
credits, or excessive complaints from the examiner's customers. The
department may require the retesting of an examiner. The department
may interview any examiner to determine whether the person is qualified
for this work. The department shall spot-check the work of examiners
to ensure that the public is being competently served. Any person
aggrieved by an order of the department including the granting, denial,
revocation, or suspension of a certificate issued by the department
under this chapter may appeal pursuant to chapter 43.21B RCW.
(5) The decision regarding whether to issue a final water right
certificate is solely the responsibility and function of the
department.
(6) The department shall make its final decision under RCW
90.03.330 within sixty days of the date of receipt of the proof of
examination from the certified water right examiner, unless otherwise
requested by the applicant.
(7) Each certified water right examiner must complete eight hours
annually of qualifying continuing education in the water resources
field. The department shall determine and specify the qualifying
continuing education and shall inform examiners of the opportunities.
The department shall track whether examiners are current in their
continuing education and may suspend the certification of an examiner
who has not complied with the continuing education requirement.
(8) Each certified water right examiner must be bonded for at least
fifty thousand dollars.
(9) The department may waive the requirement to secure the services
of a certified water right examiner in situations in which the
department deems it unnecessary for purposes of issuing a certificate
of water right.
(10) The department shall establish and collect fees for the
examination, certification, and renewal of certification of water right
examiners. Revenue collected from these fees must be deposited into
the water rights processing account created in section 4 of this act.
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to set fees
for examination, certification, and renewal of certification for water
right examiners.
(11) The department may adopt rules appropriate to carry out the
purposes of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.14.065 and 1987 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person or entity, or successor to such person or entity,
having a statement of claim on file with the water rights claims
registry ((on April 20, 1987,)) may submit to the department of ecology
for filing((,)) an amendment to such a statement of claim if the
submitted amendment is based on:
(((1))) (i) An error in estimation of the quantity of the
applicant's water claim prescribed in RCW 90.14.051 if the applicant
provides reasons for the failure to claim such right in the original
claim;
(((2))) (ii) A change in circumstances not foreseeable at the time
the original claim was filed, if such change in circumstances relates
only to the manner of transportation or diversion of the water and not
to the use or quantity of such water; or
(((3))) (iii) The amendment is ministerial in nature.
(b) The department shall accept any such submission and file the
same in the registry unless the department by written determination
concludes that the requirements of (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (((1), (2), or (3) of this section)) have not been
satisfied.
(2) In addition to subsection (1) of this section, a surface water
right claim may be changed or transferred in the same manner as a
permit or certificate under RCW 90.03.380, and a water right claim for
groundwater may be changed or transferred as provided under RCW
90.03.380 and 90.44.100.
(3) Any person aggrieved by a determination of the department may
obtain a review thereof by filing a petition for review with the
pollution control hearings board within thirty days of the date of the
determination by the department. The provisions of RCW 90.14.081 shall
apply to any amendment filed or approved under this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.44.100 and 2009 c 183 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" of a water right permit or certificate is the area described as
the point of withdrawal in the original public notice published for the
application for the water right for the well. The location of the
original well or wells of a water right claim filed under chapter 90.14
RCW is the area located within a one-quarter mile radius of the current
well or wells.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090 or a banked water
right under RCW 90.92.070.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" of a water right permit or certificate is the area described as
the point of withdrawal in the original public notice published for the
application for the water right for the well. The location of the
original well or wells of a water right claim filed under chapter 90.14
RCW is the area located within a one-quarter mile radius of the current
well or wells.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Applications to appropriate groundwater under a cost-reimbursement
agreement must be processed in accordance with RCW 90.03.265 when an
applicant requests the assignment of a cost-reimbursement consultant as
provided in RCW 43.21A.690.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may expedite processing of applications within
the same source of water on its own volition when there is interest
from a sufficient number of applicants or upon receipt of written
requests from at least ten percent of the applicants within the same
source of water.
(2) If the conditions of subsection (1) of this section have been
met and the department determines that the public interest is best
served by expediting applications within a water source, the department
must notify in writing all persons who have pending applications on
file for a new appropriation, change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right from that water source. A water source may include surface water
only, groundwater only, or surface and groundwater together if the
department determines that they are hydraulically connected. The
notice must be made by way of mail and by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area where affected properties are located.
The notice must:
(a) Inform those applicants that expedited processing of
applications with the described water source is being initiated;
(b) Provide to individual applicants the criteria under which the
applications will be examined and determined;
(c) Provide to individual applicants the estimated cost for having
an application processed on an expedited basis;
(d) Provide an estimate of how long the expedited process will take
before an application is approved or denied; and
(e) Provide at least sixty days for the applicants to respond in
writing regarding the applicant's decision to participate in expedited
processing of their applications.
(3) In addition to the application fees provided in RCW 90.03.470,
the department must recover the full cost of processing all the
applications from applicants who elect to participate within the water
source through expedited processing fees. The department must
calculate an expedited processing fee based primarily on the
proportionate quantity of water requested by each applicant and may
adjust the fee if it appears that the application will require a
disproportionately greater amount of time and effort to process due to
its complexity. Any application fees that were paid by the applicant
under RCW 90.03.470 must be credited against the applicant's share of
the cost of processing applications under the provisions of this
section.
(4) The expedited processing fee must be collected by the
department prior to the expedited processing of an application. An
applicant who has stated in writing that he or she wants his or her
application processed using the expedited procedures in this section
must transmit the processing fee within sixty days of the written
request. Failure to do so will result in the applicant not being
included in expedited processing for that water source.
(5) If an applicant elects not to participate in expedited
processing, the application remains on file with the department, the
applicant retains his or her priority date, and the application may be
processed in the future through regular processing, expedited
processing, coordinated cost-reimbursement processing, or cost-reimbursement. Such an application may not be processed through
expedited processing within twelve months after the department's
issuance of decisions on participating applications at the conclusion
of expedited processing unless the applicant agrees to pay the full
proportionate share that would otherwise have been paid during such
processing. Any proceeds collected from an applicant under this
delayed entry into expedited processing may be used to reimburse the
other applicants who participated in the previous expedited processing
of applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 9 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 10 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---