BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 34.05.360 and 1988 c 288 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
The order of adoption by which each rule is adopted by an agency
shall contain all of the following:
(1) The date the agency adopted the rule;
(2) A concise statement of the purpose of the rule;
(3) A reference to all rules repealed, amended, or suspended by the
rule;
(4) A reference to the specific statutory or other authority
authorizing adoption of the rule;
(5) Any findings required by any provision of law as a precondition
to adoption or effectiveness of the rule; ((and))
(6) The effective date of the rule if other than that specified in
RCW 34.05.380(2); and
(7) The number of votes for and against adoption of the rule, if
the rule-making authority includes more than one person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Adoption of a rule requires an affirmative vote of the majority of
all members of a body that has the legal authority to adopt an agency's
rules. An affirmative vote of a majority of the members present is not
sufficient to adopt a rule. Ex officio members may not participate in
rule making and may not be considered when counting a majority of the
members of the body to determine the necessary votes to adopt a rule.

Sec. 3 RCW 34.05.534 and 1997 c 409 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person may file a petition for judicial review under this
chapter only after exhausting all administrative remedies available
within the agency whose action is being challenged, or available within
any other agency authorized to exercise administrative review, except:
(((1))) (a) A petitioner for judicial review of a rule need not
have participated in the rule-making proceeding upon which that rule is
based, have petitioned for its amendment or repeal, have petitioned the
joint administrative rules review committee for its review, or have
appealed a petition for amendment or repeal to the governor;
(((2))) (b) A petitioner for judicial review need not exhaust
administrative remedies to the extent that this chapter or any other
statute states that exhaustion is not required; or
(((3))) (c) The court may relieve a petitioner of the requirement
to exhaust any or all administrative remedies upon a showing that:
(((a))) (i) The remedies would be patently inadequate;
(((b))) (ii) The exhaustion of remedies would be futile; or
(((c))) (iii) The grave irreparable harm that would result from
having to exhaust administrative remedies would clearly outweigh the
public policy requiring exhaustion of administrative remedies.
(2) An agency must identify and consolidate any and all legal
challenges or defenses to a petition in its initial answer. An agency
may not omit a claim or defense and raise the defense or claim later in
the review proceedings or in another action. All grounds to deny a
petitioner's request must be identified in the agency's initial
response and consolidated into one proceeding.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.554 and 1988 c 288 s 512 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issues not raised before the agency may not be raised on
appeal, except to the extent that:
(a) The person did not know and was under no duty to discover or
could not have reasonably discovered facts giving rise to the issue;
(b) The agency action subject to judicial review is a rule and the
person has not been a party in adjudicative proceedings that provided
an adequate opportunity to raise the issue;
(c) The agency action subject to judicial review is an order and
the person was not notified of the adjudicative proceeding in
substantial compliance with this chapter; or
(d) The interests of justice would be served by resolution of an
issue arising from:
(i) A change in controlling law occurring after the agency action;
or
(ii) Agency action occurring after the person exhausted the last
feasible opportunity for seeking relief from the agency.
(2) The court shall remand to the agency for determination any
issue that is properly raised pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) An agency may not raise a defense or theory to oppose a
petition that it has failed to identify in its answer to a petition.

Sec. 5 RCW 34.05.566 and 1989 c 175 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within thirty days after service of the petition for judicial
review, or within further time allowed by the court or by other
provision of law, the agency shall transmit to the court the original
or a certified copy of the agency record for judicial review of the
agency action. The record shall consist of any agency documents
expressing the agency action, other documents identified by the agency
as having been considered by it before its action and used as a basis
for its action, and any other material described in this chapter as the
agency record for the type of agency action at issue, subject to the
provisions of this section. An agency must transcribe or certify audio
recordings of oral presentations at adjudicative proceedings.
(2) If part of the record has been preserved without a transcript,
the agency shall prepare a transcript for inclusion in the record
transmitted to the court, except for portions that the parties
stipulate to omit in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(3) The agency may charge a nonindigent petitioner with the
reasonable costs of preparing any necessary copies and transcripts for
transmittal to the court. A failure by the petitioner to pay any of
this cost to the agency relieves the agency from the responsibility for
preparation of the record and transmittal to the court.
(4) The record may be shortened, summarized, or organized
temporarily or, by stipulation of all parties, permanently.
(5) The court may tax the cost of preparing transcripts and copies
of the record:
(a) Against a party who unreasonably refuses to stipulate to
shorten, summarize, or organize the record; or
(b) In accordance with any provision of law.
(6) Additions to the record pursuant to RCW 34.05.562 must be made
as ordered by the court.
(7) The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or
additions to the record.

Sec. 6 RCW 34.05.558 and 1988 c 288 s 513 are each amended to
read as follows:
Judicial review of disputed issues of fact shall be conducted by
the court without a jury and must be confined to the agency record for
judicial review as defined by this chapter, supplemented by additional
evidence taken pursuant to this chapter. The court may consider
certified audio recordings, meeting minutes, or transcripts of
adjudicative proceedings without supplementing the record. The
certified audio recordings, meeting minutes, or transcripts of
adjudicative proceedings may be attached to a declaration or brief as
an appendix for the court's consideration when relevant to the issues
before the court.

Sec. 7 RCW 34.05.570 and 2004 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Generally. Except to the extent that this chapter or another
statute provides otherwise:
(a) The burden of demonstrating the invalidity of agency action is
on the party asserting invalidity;
(b) The burden of proof required of any agency action related to a
license is clear, cogent, and convincing;
(c) The validity of agency action shall be determined in accordance
with the standards of review provided in this section, as applied to
the agency action at the time it was taken;
(((c))) (d) The court shall make a separate and distinct ruling on
each material issue on which the court's decision is based; and
(((d))) (e) The court shall grant relief only if it determines that
a person seeking judicial relief has been substantially prejudiced by
the action complained of.
(2) Review of rules. (a) A rule may be reviewed by petition for
declaratory judgment filed pursuant to this subsection or in the
context of any other review proceeding under this section. In an
action challenging the validity of a rule, the agency shall be made a
party to the proceeding.
(b)(i) The validity of any rule may be determined upon petition for
a declaratory judgment addressed to the superior court of Thurston
county, when it appears that the rule, or its threatened application,
interferes with or impairs or immediately threatens to interfere with
or impair the legal rights or privileges of the petitioner. The
declaratory judgment order may be entered whether or not the petitioner
has first requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the rule in
question. A petition for declaratory judgment to invalidate a rule
filed directly in superior court of Thurston county may be served upon
the agency and the attorney general's office. The petitioner may not
be required to serve any other person or entity. The agency shall post
notice of the declaratory judgment filing in the same manner as it
posts notice of proposed rule making under this chapter. The parties
may proceed with reasonable discovery under the civil rules to present
evidence not available in the official rule-making file.
(ii) From June 10, 2004, until July 1, 2008:
(A) If the petitioner's residence or principal place of business is
within the geographical boundaries of the third division of the court
of appeals as defined by RCW 2.06.020(3), the petition may be filed in
the superior court of Spokane, Yakima, or Thurston county; and
(B) If the petitioner's residence or principal place of business is
within the geographical boundaries of district three of the first
division of the court of appeals as defined by RCW 2.06.020(1), the
petition may be filed in the superior court of Whatcom or Thurston
county.
(c) In a proceeding involving review of a rule, the court shall
declare the rule invalid only if it finds that: The rule violates
constitutional provisions; the rule exceeds the statutory authority of
the agency; the rule was adopted without compliance with statutory
rule-making procedures; or the rule is arbitrary and capricious.
(3) Review of agency orders in adjudicative proceedings. The court
shall grant relief from an agency order in an adjudicative proceeding
only if it determines that:
(a) The order, or the statute or rule on which the order is based,
is in violation of constitutional provisions on its face or as applied.
When the review concerns a license, the action necessarily concerns a
life, liberty, and property interest of the petitioner for purposes of
constitutional analysis;
(b) The order is outside the statutory authority or jurisdiction of
the agency conferred by any provision of law;
(c) The agency has engaged in unlawful procedure or decision-making
process, or has failed to follow a prescribed procedure;
(d) The agency has erroneously interpreted or applied the law;
(e) The order is not supported by evidence that is substantial when
viewed in light of the whole record before the court, which includes
the agency record for judicial review, supplemented by any additional
evidence received by the court under this chapter;
(f) The agency has not decided all issues requiring resolution by
the agency;
(g) A motion for disqualification under RCW 34.05.425 or 34.12.050
was made and was improperly denied or, if no motion was made, facts are
shown to support the grant of such a motion that were not known and
were not reasonably discoverable by the challenging party at the
appropriate time for making such a motion;
(h) The order is inconsistent with a rule of the agency unless the
agency explains the inconsistency by stating facts and reasons to
demonstrate a rational basis for inconsistency; or
(i) The order is arbitrary or capricious.
(4) Review of other agency action.
(a) All agency action not reviewable under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section shall be reviewed under this subsection.
(b) A person whose rights are violated by an agency's failure to
perform a duty that is required by law to be performed may file a
petition for review pursuant to RCW 34.05.514, seeking an order
pursuant to this subsection requiring performance. Within twenty days
after service of the petition for review, the agency shall file and
serve an answer to the petition, made in the same manner as an answer
to a complaint in a civil action. The court may hear evidence,
pursuant to RCW 34.05.562, on material issues of fact raised by the
petition and answer.
(c) Relief for persons aggrieved by the performance of an agency
action, including the exercise of discretion, or an action under (b) of
this subsection can be granted only if the court determines that the
action is:
(i) Unconstitutional. When the review concerns a license, the
action necessarily concerns a life, liberty, and property interest of
the petitioner for purposes of constitutional analysis;
(ii) Outside the statutory authority of the agency or the authority
conferred by a provision of law;
(iii) Arbitrary or capricious; or
(iv) Taken by persons who were not properly constituted as agency
officials lawfully entitled to take such action.

Sec. 8 RCW 34.05.010 and 1997 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout
this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adjudicative proceeding" means a proceeding before an agency
in which an opportunity for hearing before that agency is required by
statute or constitutional right before or after the entry of an order
by the agency. Adjudicative proceedings also include all cases of
licensing and rate making in which an application for a license or rate
change is denied except as limited by RCW 66.08.150, or a license is
revoked, suspended, or modified, or in which the granting of an
application is contested by a person having standing to contest under
the law.
(2) "Agency" means any state board, commission, department,
institution of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make
rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings, except those in the
legislative or judicial branches, the governor, or the attorney general
except to the extent otherwise required by law and any local
governmental entity that may request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 42.41 RCW.
(3) "Agency action" means licensing, the implementation or
enforcement of a statute, the adoption or application of an agency rule
or order, the imposition of sanctions, or the granting or withholding
of benefits.
Agency action does not include an agency decision regarding (a)
contracting or procurement of goods, services, public works, and the
purchase, lease, or acquisition by any other means, including eminent
domain, of real estate, as well as all activities necessarily related
to those functions, or (b) determinations as to the sufficiency of a
showing of interest filed in support of a representation petition, or
mediation or conciliation of labor disputes or arbitration of labor
disputes under a collective bargaining law or similar statute, or (c)
any sale, lease, contract, or other proprietary decision in the
management of public lands or real property interests, or (d) the
granting of a license, franchise, or permission for the use of
trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency.
(4) "Agency head" means the individual or body of individuals in
whom the ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by any
provision of law. If the agency head is a body of individuals, a
majority of those individuals constitutes the agency head.
(5) "Entry" of an order means the signing of the order by all
persons who are to sign the order, as an official act indicating that
the order is to be effective.
(6) "Filing" of a document that is required to be filed with an
agency means delivery of the document to a place designated by the
agency by rule for receipt of official documents, or in the absence of
such designation, at the office of the agency head.
(7) "Institutions of higher education" are the University of
Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, Western Washington University, The
Evergreen State College, the various community colleges, and the
governing boards of each of the above, and the various colleges,
divisions, departments, or offices authorized by the governing board of
the institution involved to act for the institution, all of which are
sometimes referred to in this chapter as "institutions."
(8) "Interpretive statement" means a written expression of the
opinion of an agency, entitled an interpretive statement by the agency
head or its designee, as to the meaning of a statute or other provision
of law, of a court decision, or of an agency order.
(9)(a) "License" means a franchise, permit, certification,
approval, registration, charter, or similar form of authorization
required by law, but does not include (i) a license required solely for
revenue purposes, or (ii) a certification of an exclusive bargaining
representative, or similar status, under a collective bargaining law or
similar statute, or (iii) a license, franchise, or permission for use
of trademarks, symbols, and similar property owned or controlled by the
agency. Even if an agency does not use the term "license," the
required agency authorization is a license under this chapter if an
agency requires its consent before a person or entity may provide
services, or use products, equipment, or specific sites or locations.
Whether a license is a professional license, an occupational license,
a product or equipment license, or a site license is a distinction that
may not impact the rights of the licensee specified in this chapter.
(b) "Licensing" includes the agency process respecting the
issuance, denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a license.
(10) "Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to rule
making or policy or interpretive statements, means regular mail or
electronic distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by electronic mail
or facsimile mail.
(11)(a) "Order," without further qualification, means a written
statement of particular applicability that finally determines the legal
rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of a
specific person or persons.
(b) "Order of adoption" means the official written statement by
which an agency adopts, amends, or repeals a rule.
(12) "Party to agency proceedings," or "party" in a context so
indicating, means:
(a) A person to whom the agency action is specifically directed; or
(b) A person named as a party to the agency proceeding or allowed
to intervene or participate as a party in the agency proceeding.
(13) "Party to judicial review or civil enforcement proceedings,"
or "party" in a context so indicating, means:
(a) A person who files a petition for a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding; or
(b) A person named as a party in a judicial review or civil
enforcement proceeding, or allowed to participate as a party in a
judicial review or civil enforcement proceeding.
(14) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
association, governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or
private organization or entity of any character, and includes another
agency.
(15) "Policy statement" means a written description of the current
approach of an agency, entitled a policy statement by the agency head
or its designee, to implementation of a statute or other provision of
law, of a court decision, or of an agency order, including where
appropriate the agency's current practice, procedure, or method of
action based upon that approach.
(16) "Rule" means any agency order, directive, or regulation of
general applicability (a) the violation of which subjects a person to
a penalty or administrative sanction; (b) which establishes, alters, or
revokes any procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency
hearings; (c) which establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification
or requirement relating to the enjoyment of benefits or privileges
conferred by law; (d) which establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualifications or standards for the issuance, suspension, or revocation
of licenses to pursue any commercial activity, trade, or profession; or
(e) which establishes, alters, or revokes any mandatory standards for
any product or material which must be met before distribution or sale.
The term includes the amendment or repeal of a prior rule, but does not
include (i) statements concerning only the internal management of an
agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the
public, (ii) declaratory rulings issued pursuant to RCW 34.05.240,
(iii) traffic restrictions for motor vehicles, bicyclists, and
pedestrians established by the secretary of transportation or his
designee where notice of such restrictions is given by official traffic
control devices, or (iv) rules of institutions of higher education
involving standards of admission, academic advancement, academic
credit, graduation and the granting of degrees, employment
relationships, or fiscal processes.
(17) "Rules review committee" or "committee" means the joint
administrative rules review committee created pursuant to RCW 34.05.610
for the purpose of selectively reviewing existing and proposed rules of
state agencies.
(18) "Rule making" means the process for formulation and adoption
of a rule.
(19) "Service," except as otherwise provided in this chapter, means
posting in the United States mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid,
or personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the
United States mail. Agencies may, by rule, authorize service by
electronic telefacsimile transmission, where copies are mailed
simultaneously, or by commercial parcel delivery company.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW
to read as follows:
All materials made available to boards and commissions in the
boards and commissions notebooks prepared by the agency for their
meetings shall be posted electronically on the agency web site in
advance of the meeting when the agency publishes the agenda. Any
materials not subject to public disclosure may be redacted or withheld.

--- END ---