BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that trail-based
recreational opportunities provide important health, aesthetic,
cultural, social, and economic opportunities for the people of
Washington state. As the population of Washington state has grown and
new forms of trail-based recreation have emerged, interactions among
individual trail users and user groups have increased. The legislature
intends to create a work group to examine and make recommendations to
improve trail access and interactions in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington state trail interactions
work group is established.
(2) The work group must consist of appropriate and balanced
representation from:
(a) Nonmotorized recreation associations and organizations;
(b) Motorized recreation associations and organizations;
(c) Landowners and managers, including private landowners, local
governments, state and federal agencies, and tribal governments; and
(d) Associations and organizations representing individuals
employed or volunteering in the parks and recreation services field.
(3) The work group must examine trail interactions in Washington
state, including backcountry, rural, and urban trail interactions, and
make recommendations to improve such interactions, which must include
recommendations relating to: Trail access; the accessibility of online
trail-based information; signage; and trail enjoyment and safety.
(4) The work group shall hold meetings at diverse locations
throughout the state to ensure that key stakeholders, citizens, and
local jurisdictions from across the state have the opportunity to
provide input.
(5) The work group must provide a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature containing its recommendations by
December 1, 2010.
(6) The work group must be staffed by the recreation and
conservation office. The director of the recreation and conservation
office shall appoint members to the work group.
(7) Work group members that are not employees of state or federal
agencies are entitled to receive reimbursement for travel expenses as
provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(8) This section expires June 30, 2011.

--- END ---