BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2009 c 574 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, the governing board((s)) of ((the state
universities)) Washington State University, the regional universities,
The Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and
technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for
all students other than resident undergraduates, including summer
school students and students in other self-supporting degree programs.
Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may exceed the fiscal
growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made for all or portions
of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing board((s)) of ((the state universities)) Washington State
University, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College
shall consult with existing student associations or organizations with
student undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be
required to provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving
financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(d) The board of regents of the University of Washington shall
establish tuition fees rates for students at the University of
Washington.
(4) Except as provided for in subsection (3)(d) of this section,
academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.

--- END ---