BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.160 and 2007 c 156 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person has the right to control the disposition of his or her
own remains without the predeath or postdeath consent of another
person. A valid written document expressing the decedent's wishes
regarding the place or method of disposition of his or her remains,
signed by the decedent in the presence of a witness, is sufficient
legal authorization for the procedures to be accomplished.
(2) Prearrangements that are prepaid, or filed with a licensed
funeral establishment or cemetery authority, under RCW 18.39.280
through 18.39.345 and chapter 68.46 RCW are not subject to cancellation
or substantial revision by survivors. Absent actual knowledge of
contrary legal authorization under this section, a licensed funeral
establishment or cemetery authority shall not be held criminally nor
civilly liable for acting upon such prearrangements.
(3) If the decedent has not made a prearrangement as set forth in
subsection (2) of this section or the costs of executing the decedent's
wishes regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains exceeds a
reasonable amount or directions have not been given by the decedent,
the right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased
person vests in, and the duty of disposition and the liability for the
reasonable cost of preparation, care, and disposition of such remains
devolves upon the following in the order named:
(a) The surviving spouse or state registered domestic partner.
(b) The surviving adult children of the decedent.
(c) The surviving parents of the decedent.
(d) The surviving siblings of the decedent.
(e) A person acting as a representative of the decedent under the
signed authorization of the decedent.
(4)(a) There shall exist an action known as a petition for
relinquishment of the right to control the disposition of human
remains. The action may only be filed when the person to whom the
right of control has vested pursuant to subsection (3) of this section
has been arrested or charged with first or second degree murder or
first degree manslaughter in connection with the decedent's death.
(b) A petition for relinquishment of the right to control the
disposition of human remains may only be filed by the party to which
the right to control the disposition would next vest pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section. A party must file such petition with
the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the respondent
is in custody within seven days of the arrest or charge, whichever
occurs first, as described under (a) of this subsection. Upon receipt
of the petition, the court shall order a hearing, which shall be held
not later than seven court days from the date that the petition was
filed, and enjoin the respondent from exercising his or her rights
under subsection (3) of this section pending the judicial disposition
of the petition. Personal service shall be made upon the respondent
not less than five court days before the hearing.
(c) A petition for relinquishment of the right to control the
disposition of human remains shall allege:
(i) The petitioner is the party to which the right to control the
disposition would next vest pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;
(ii) Facts supporting the petitioner's relationship to the
deceased;
(iii) The legal relationship of the deceased to the respondent; and
(iv) Good cause why the court should grant the petition. Good
cause may include a showing of the emotional distress to the petitioner
if the decision to control the disposition of human remains is made by
the person arrested or charged with the decedent's death. Good cause
may also include facts regarding the history of the personal
relationship between both the decedent and the person arrested or
charged with his or her killing, and the decedent and the petitioner.
(d) No fees for filing or service of process may be charged by a
public agency to petitioners seeking relief under this subsection.
(e) No result from a hearing on the petition for relinquishment of
the right to control the disposition of human remains is admissible in
a criminal proceeding related to the death of the decedent.
(5) If a cemetery authority as defined in RCW 68.04.190 or a
funeral establishment licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW has made a good
faith effort to locate the person cited in subsection (3)(a) through
(e) of this section or the legal representative of the decedent's
estate, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment shall have the
right to rely on an authority to bury or cremate the human remains,
executed by the most responsible party available, and the cemetery
authority or funeral establishment may not be held criminally or
civilly liable for burying or cremating the human remains. In the
event any government agency provides the funds for the disposition of
any human remains and the government agency elects to provide funds for
cremation only, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment may not
be held criminally or civilly liable for cremating the human remains.
(((5))) (6) The liability for the reasonable cost of preparation,
care, and disposition devolves jointly and severally upon all kin of
the decedent in the same degree of kindred, in the order listed in
subsection (3) of this section, and upon the estate of the decedent.

--- END ---