BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 52.04 RCW
to read as follows:
All property located within the boundaries of a city, partial city
as set forth in RCW 52.04.061(2), or town annexing into a fire
protection district, which property is subject to an excess levy by the
city or town for the repayment of voter-approved indebtedness for fire
protection related capital improvements incurred prior to the effective
date of the annexation is exempt from voter-approved excess property
taxes levied by the annexing fire protection district for the repayment
of indebtedness issued prior to the effective date of the annexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---