BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
Counties may, by ordinance, require a state and federal background
investigation of license applicants or licensees in occupations
specified by ordinance for the purpose of receiving criminal history
record information by county officials. The investigation shall
consist of a background check as allowed through the Washington state
criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through
43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation. These background
checks must be done through the Washington state patrol identification
and criminal history section and may include a national check from the
federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission
of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol shall serve as the sole
source for receipt of fingerprint submissions and the responses to the
submissions from the federal bureau of investigation, which must be
disseminated to the county. The county shall transmit appropriate fees
for a state and national criminal history check to the Washington state
patrol, unless alternately arranged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Cities or towns may, by ordinance, require a state and federal
background investigation of license applicants or licensees in
occupations specified by ordinance for the purpose of receiving
criminal history record information by city or town officials. The
investigation shall consist of a background check as allowed through
the Washington state criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050,
the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW
43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation.
These background checks must be done through the Washington state
patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a
national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be
through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol
shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions
and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of
investigation, which must be disseminated to the city or town. The
city or town shall transmit appropriate fees for a state and national
criminal history check to the Washington state patrol, unless
alternately arranged.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
Code cities may, by ordinance, require a state and federal
background investigation of license applicants or licensees in
occupations specified by ordinance for the purpose of receiving
criminal history record information by code city officials. The
investigation shall consist of a background check as allowed through
the Washington state criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050,
the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW
43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation.
These background checks must be done through the Washington state
patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a
national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be
through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol
shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions
and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of
investigation, which must be disseminated to the code city. The code
city shall transmit appropriate fees for a state and national criminal
history check to the Washington state patrol, unless alternately
arranged.

--- END ---