BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Whenever a person who is the subject of an involuntary
commitment order under this chapter is discharged from an evaluation
and treatment facility or state hospital, the evaluation and treatment
facility or state hospital shall provide notice of the person's
discharge to the designated mental health professional office
responsible for the initial commitment and the designated mental health
professional office that serves the county in which the person is
expected to reside. The evaluation and treatment facility or state
hospital must also provide these offices with a copy of any less
restrictive order or conditional release order entered in conjunction
with the discharge of the person, unless the evaluation and treatment
facility or state hospital has entered into a memorandum of
understanding obligating another entity to provide these documents.
(2) The notice and documents referred to in subsection (1) of this
section shall be provided as soon as possible and no later than one
business day following the discharge of the person. Notice is not
required under this section if the discharge is for the purpose of
transferring the person for continued detention and treatment under
this chapter at another treatment facility.
(3) The department shall maintain and make available an updated
list of contact information for designated mental health professional
offices around the state.

--- END ---