BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person
may operate a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle upon a highway of this
state having a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less if:
(a) The person does not operate a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle
upon state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW;
(b) The person does not operate a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first having obtained and having
in full force and effect a current and proper vehicle license and
display vehicle license number plates in compliance with chapter 46.16
RCW;
(c) The person does not operate a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle
upon a highway of this state without first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW;
(d) The person does not operate a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW on a highway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW; and
(e) The person operating a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle does not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per
hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway with a speed
limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less and occurs at an
intersection of approximately ninety degrees, except that the operator
of a four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle must not cross an uncontrolled
intersection of streets and highways that are part of the state highway
system subject to Title 47 RCW unless that intersection has been
authorized by local authorities under subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Any four-wheel, all-terrain vehicle operated under this section
must have a headlight, taillight, and brake light, and a mirror both on
the left and right handlebar.
(3) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(4) This section does not prevent local authorities, with respect
to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the
reasonable exercise of their police power, from regulating the
operation of four-wheel, all-terrain vehicles on streets and highways
under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing
body, if the regulation is consistent with this title, except that:
(a) Local authorities may not authorize the operation of four-wheel, all-terrain vehicles on streets and highways that are part of
the state highway system subject to Title 47 RCW; and
(b) Local authorities may not establish requirements for the
registration and licensing of four-wheel, all-terrain vehicles.

--- END ---