BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or town may not photograph or record images of a person
driving a vehicle or of passengers in the vehicle.
(2) A city or town may not photograph or record images of a vehicle
or vehicle license plate except as expressly authorized by statute.
(3) For purposes of this section, "photograph" or "record" means
the making of a photograph, microphotograph, a videotape, an electronic
image, or other recorded images.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may not photograph or record images of a person
driving a vehicle or of passengers in the vehicle.
(2) A county may not photograph or record images of a vehicle or
vehicle license plate except as expressly authorized by statute.
(3) For purposes of this section, "photograph" or "record" means
the making of a photograph, microphotograph, a videotape, an electronic
image, or other recorded images.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW
to read as follows:
The state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire
field of regulation over photo enforcement systems and automated
traffic safety cameras. Cities, towns, and counties, or other
municipalities, may adopt only those laws and ordinances relating to
photo enforcement systems and automated traffic safety cameras that are
consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not photograph or record images of a person
driving a vehicle on any state highway or of passengers in the vehicle.
(2) The department may not photograph or record images of a vehicle
or vehicle license plate except as expressly authorized by statute.
(3) For purposes of this section, "photograph" or "record" means
the making of a photograph, microphotograph, a videotape, an electronic
image, or other recorded images.

--- END ---