BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vehicle must be
submitted by the owner or the owner's representative to the department
or participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the
director on a form furnished or approved by the department and must
contain:
(a) A description of the vehicle, including make, model, vehicle
identification number, type of body, and the odometer reading at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, when required;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information the department may require.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a certificate of
ownership;
(b) A quick title service fee of twenty-five dollars to be
distributed under section 2 of this act; and
(c) The most recent certificate of ownership or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of ownership printed at the time of application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The quick title service fee imposed under section 1(3)(b) of this
act must be distributed as follows:
(1) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070.
(2) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other
agent appointed by the director, twelve dollars and fifty cents must be
deposited to the motor vehicle fund established under RCW 46.68.070.
The remainder must be retained by the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The application for a quick title of a vessel must be submitted
by the owner or the owner's representative to the department or
participating county auditor or other agent appointed by the director
on a form furnished or approved by the department and must contain:
(a) A description of the vessel, including make, model, hull
identification number, series, and body;
(b) The name and address of the person who is to be the registered
owner of the vessel and, if the vessel is subject to a security
interest, the name and address of the secured party; and
(c) Other information the department may require.
(2) The application for a quick title must be signed by the person
applying to be the registered owner and be sworn to by that person in
the manner described under RCW 9A.72.085. The department must keep a
copy of the application.
(3) The application for a quick title must be accompanied by:
(a) All fees and taxes due for an application for a vessel
certificate of ownership;
(b) A quick title service fee of twenty-five dollars to be
distributed under section 4 of this act; and
(c) The most recent certificate of ownership or other satisfactory
evidence of ownership.
(4) All applications for quick title must meet the requirements
established by the department.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "quick title" means a
certificate of ownership printed at the time of application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
The quick title fee imposed under section 3(3)(b) of this act must
be distributed as follows:
(1) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the general fund.
(2) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or other
agent appointed by the director, twelve dollars and fifty cents must be
deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained by the
county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by the
county auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act applies to quick title transactions
that are processed on or after September 1, 2010.

--- END ---