BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.36.005 and 2003 c 39 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Animal" means all members of the animal kingdom except humans,
fish, and insects. However, "animal" does not mean noncaptive wildlife
as defined in RCW 77.08.010(((16))), except as used in RCW 16.36.050(1)
and 16.36.080 (1), (2), (3), and (5).
(2) "Animal reproductive product" means sperm, ova, fertilized ova,
and embryos from animals.
(3) "Certificate of veterinary inspection" means a legible
veterinary health inspection certificate on an official electronic or
paper form from the state of origin or from the animal and plant health
inspection service (APHIS) of the United States department of
agriculture, executed by a licensed and accredited veterinarian or a
veterinarian approved by the animal and plant health inspection
service. "Certificate of veterinary inspection" is also known as an
"official health certificate."
(4) "Farm-raised fish" means fish raised by aquaculture as defined
in RCW 15.85.020. Farm-raised fish are considered to be a part of
animal agriculture; however, disease inspection, prevention, and
control programs and related activities for farm-raised fish are
administered by the department of fish and wildlife under chapter
77.115 RCW.
(5) "Communicable disease" means a disease due to a specific
infectious agent or its toxic products transmitted from an infected
person, animal, or inanimate reservoir to a susceptible host, either
directly or indirectly through an intermediate plant or animal host,
vector, or the environment.
(6) "Contagious disease" means a communicable disease that is
capable of being easily transmitted from one animal to another animal
or a human.
(7) "Director" means the director of ((agriculture of the state of
Washington)) the department or his or her authorized representative.
(8) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(9) "Deputized state veterinarian" means a Washington state
licensed and accredited veterinarian appointed and compensated by the
director according to state law and department policies.
(10) "Garbage" means the solid animal and vegetable waste and offal
together with the natural moisture content resulting from the handling,
preparation, or consumption of foods in houses, restaurants, hotels,
kitchens, markets, meat shops, packing houses and similar
establishments or any other food waste containing meat or meat
products.
(11) "Herd or flock plan" means a written management agreement
between the owner of a herd or flock and the state veterinarian, with
possible input from a private accredited veterinarian designated by the
owner and the area veterinarian-in-charge of the United States
department of agriculture, animal and plant health inspection service,
veterinary services in which each participant agrees to undertake
actions specified in the herd or flock plan to control the spread of
infectious, contagious, or communicable disease within and from an
infected herd or flock and to work toward eradicating the disease in
the infected herd or flock.
(12) "Hold order" means an order by the director to the owner or
agent of the owner of animals or animal reproductive products which
restricts the animals or products to a designated holding location
pending an investigation by the director of the disease, disease
exposure, well-being, movement, or import status of the animals or
animal reproductive products.
(13) "Infectious agent" means an organism including viruses,
rickettsia, bacteria, fungi, protozoa, helminthes, or prions that is
capable of producing infection or infectious disease.
(14) "Infectious disease" means a clinical disease of humans or
animals resulting from an infection with an infectious agent that may
or may not be communicable or contagious.
(15) "Livestock" means horses, mules, donkeys, cattle, bison,
sheep, goats, swine, rabbits, llamas, alpacas, ratites, poultry,
waterfowl, game birds, and other species so designated by statute.
"Livestock" does not mean free ranging wildlife as defined in Title 77
RCW.
(16) "Person" means a person, persons, firm, or corporation.
(17) "Quarantine" means the placing and restraining of any animal
or its reproductive products by the owner or agent of the owner within
a certain described and designated enclosure or area within this state,
or the restraining of any animal or its reproductive products from
entering this state, as may be directed in an order by the director.
(18) "Reportable disease" means a disease designated by rule by the
director as reportable to the department by veterinarians and others
made responsible to report by statute.
(19) "Veterinary biologic" means any virus, serum, toxin, and
analogous product of natural or synthetic origin, or product prepared
from any type of genetic engineering, such as diagnostics, antitoxins,
vaccines, live microorganisms, killed microorganisms, and the antigenic
or immunizing components intended for use in the diagnosis, treatment,
or prevention of diseases in animals.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.36.050 and 2007 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for ((any)) a person to((:
(1))) bring an animal into ((this)) Washington state ((for any
purpose any animals)) without first ((having secured an official health
certificate or)) securing a certificate of veterinary inspection,
reviewed by the state veterinarian of the state of origin, verifying
that the animal((s)) meets the Washington state animal health
requirements ((of the state of Washington)). This subsection does not
apply to:
(a) Livestock ((destined for immediate slaughter at a federally
inspected slaughter facility where federal disease control standards
are applied)), which are governed by section 3 of this act; or
(b) Other animals exempted by the director by rule((;)).
(2)(((a) Divert en route to other than an approved, inspected
feedlot for subsequent slaughter or (b) sell for other than immediate
slaughter or (c) fail to slaughter or deliver to a slaughter
establishment within three calendar days after entry, any animal
imported into this state for immediate slaughter;
(3))) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally falsely make,
complete, alter, use, or sign ((an animal health certificate,)) a
certificate of veterinary inspection((,)) or official ((written))
animal health document of the department((;)).
(((4))) (3) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally falsely
apply, alter, or remove an official animal health or official animal
identification tag, permanent mark, or other device((;)).
(((5))) (4) It is unlawful for a person to willfully hinder,
obstruct, or resist the director, or any peace officer or deputized
state veterinarian acting under him or her, when engaged in the
performance of their duties((; or)).
(((6))) (5) It is unlawful for a person to willfully fail to comply
with or to violate any rule or order adopted by the director under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 16.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to bring livestock into Washington
state without first securing a certificate of veterinary inspection,
reviewed by the state veterinarian of the state of origin, verifying
that the livestock meet Washington state animal health requirements.
This subsection does not apply to livestock that:
(a) Have been exempted by the director by rule; or
(b) Will be delivered within twelve hours after entry into
Washington state to:
(i) An approved, inspected feed lot for slaughter;
(ii) A federally inspected slaughter plant; or
(iii) A licensed public livestock market for sale and subsequent
delivery within twelve hours to:
(A) An approved, inspected feed lot for slaughter; or
(B) A federally inspected slaughter plant.
(2) The director may monitor livestock entering Washington state.
Persons importing, transporting, receiving, feeding, or housing
imported livestock shall:
(a) Comply with the requirement and any exemptions specified in
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Make the livestock and related records available for inspection
by the director.
(3) The department may charge a time and mileage fee for inspecting
livestock and related records during an investigation of a proven
violation of this section. The fee is eighty-five dollars per hour and
the current mileage rate set by the office of financial management.
The director may increase the hourly fee by rule as necessary to cover
costs of investigations. All fees collected pursuant to this
subsection shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural local
fund and used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
(4) The director may adopt and enforce rules necessary to carry out
the purpose and provisions of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 16.36.060 and 2004 c 251 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director has the authority to enter ((the animal premises
of any animal owner)) a property at any reasonable time to:
(a) Conduct tests, examinations, or inspections ((for disease
conditions)) to take samples, and to examine and copy records when
there is reasonable cause to investigate whether animals on the
((premises)) property or that have been on the ((premises)) property
are infected with or have been exposed to ((a reportable)) disease; and
(b) Determine, when there is reasonable cause to investigate,
whether livestock on the property have been imported into Washington
state in violation of requirements of this chapter, and to conduct
tests, examinations, and inspections, take samples, and examine and
copy records during such investigations.
(2) It is unlawful for any person to interfere with ((the))
investigations, tests, inspections, or examinations, or to alter any
segregation or identification systems made in connection with ((the))
tests, inspections, or examinations conducted pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section. ((When the director has determined that there is
probable cause that there is a serious risk from disease or
contamination, the director may seize those items necessary to conduct
the tests, inspections, or examinations.
(2))) (3) If the director is denied access to ((the animal
premises)) a property or ((the)) animals for purposes of ((conducting
tests, inspections, or examinations or the animal owner)) this chapter,
or a person fails to comply with an order of the director, the director
may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant.
To show that access is denied, the director shall file with the court
an affidavit or declaration containing a description of all attempts to
notify and locate the owner or owner's agent and secure consent. The
court may issue a search warrant ((may authorize)) authorizing access
to any animal or ((animal premises for purposes of conducting))
property at reasonable times to conduct investigations, tests,
inspections, or examinations of any animal or ((animal premises))
property, or ((taking)) to take samples, and examine and copy records,
and may authorize seizure or destruction of property. ((The warrant
shall be issued upon probable cause being found by the court. It is
sufficient probable cause to show a potential threat to the
agricultural interests of this state or a potential threat which
seriously endangers animals, human health, the environment, or public
welfare. To show that access is denied, the director shall file with
the court an affidavit or declaration containing a description of all
attempts to notify and locate the owner or the owner's agent and to
secure consent.))

Sec. 5 RCW 16.57.010 and 2003 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purpose of this chapter:)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
duly authorized representative.
(3) "Person" means a natural person, individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, society, and association, and every officer,
agent or employee thereof. This term shall import either the singular
or the plural as the case may be.
(4) "Livestock" includes, but is not limited to, horses, mules,
cattle, sheep, swine, and goats.
(5) "Brand" means a permanent fire brand or any artificial mark,
other than an individual identification symbol, approved by the
director to be used in conjunction with a brand or by itself.
(6) "Production record brand" means a number brand which shall be
used for production identification purposes only.
(7) "Livestock inspection" or "inspection" means the examination of
livestock or livestock hides for brands or any means of identifying
livestock or livestock hides including the examination of documents
providing evidence of ownership.
(8) "Individual identification symbol" means a permanent mark
placed on a horse for the purpose of individually identifying and
registering the horse and which has been approved for use as such by
the director.
(9) "Registering agency" means any person issuing an individual
identification symbol for the purpose of individually identifying and
registering a horse.
(10) "Ratite" means, but is not limited to, ostrich, emu, rhea, or
other flightless bird used for human consumption, whether live or
slaughtered.
(11) "Microchipping" means the implantation of an identification
microchip or similar electronic identification device to establish the
identity of an individual animal:
(a) In the pipping muscle of a chick ratite or the implantation of
a microchip in the tail muscle of an otherwise unidentified adult
ratite;
(b) In the nuchal ligament of a horse unless otherwise specified by
rule of the director; and
(c) In locations of other livestock species as specified by rule of
the director when requested by an association of producers of that
species of livestock.
(12) "Certificate of permit" means a form prescribed by and
obtained from the director that is completed by the owner or a person
authorized to act on behalf of the owner to show the ownership of
livestock. It is used to document ownership of livestock while in
transit within the state or on consignment to any public livestock
market, special sale, slaughter plant or certified feed lot. It does
not evidence inspection of livestock.
(13) "Inspection certificate" means a certificate issued by the
director or a veterinarian certified by the director documenting the
ownership of an animal based on an inspection of the animal. It
includes an individual identification certificate.
(14) "Individual identification certificate" means an inspection
certificate that authorizes the livestock owner to transport the animal
out of state multiple times within a set period of time.
(15) "Self-inspection certificate" means a form prescribed by and
obtained from the director that ((is)) was completed and signed by the
buyer and seller of livestock to document a change in ownership before
the effective date of this section.
(16) "Horses" means horses, burros, and mules.

Sec. 6 RCW 16.57.160 and 2006 c 156 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(((1))) (a) Designating any point for mandatory inspection of
cattle or horses or the furnishing of proof that cattle or horses
passing or being transported through the point have been inspected or
identified and are lawfully being transported;
(((2) Providing for self-inspection of twenty-five head or less of
cattle;
(3))) (b) Providing for issuance of individual horse and cattle
identification certificates or other means of horse and cattle
identification; and
(((4))) (c) Designating the documents that constitute other
satisfactory proof of ownership for cattle and horses. A bill of sale
may not be designated as documenting satisfactory proof of ownership
for cattle.
(2) A self-inspection certificate may be accepted as satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle if the director determines that the self-inspection certificate, together with other available documentation,
sufficiently establishes ownership. Self-inspection certificates
completed after the effective date of this section are not satisfactory
proof of ownership for cattle.

Sec. 7 RCW 16.57.220 and 2006 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided for in RCW 16.65.090 and otherwise in this
section, the fee for livestock inspection is one dollar and sixty cents
per head for cattle and three dollars and fifty cents for horses or the
time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(2) When cattle are identified with the owner's brand or other form
of identification specified by the director by rule, the fee for
livestock inspection is one dollar and ten cents per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater. ((This fee does not apply for
inspection of cattle when documenting a change of ownership with a
self-inspection certificate.))
(3) No inspection fee is charged for a calf that is inspected
before moving out-of-state under an official temporary grazing permit
if the calf is part of a cow-calf unit and the calf is identified with
the owner's Washington-recorded brand or other form of identification
specified by the director by rule.
(4) The fee for inspection of cattle at a processing plant with a
daily capacity of no more than five hundred head of cattle where the
United States department of agriculture maintains a meat inspection
program is four dollars per head.
(5) When a single inspection certificate issued for thirty or more
horses belonging to one person, the fee for livestock inspection is two
dollars per head or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
(6) The fee for individual identification certificates is twenty
dollars for an annual certificate and sixty dollars for a lifetime
certificate or the time and mileage fee, whichever is greater.
However, the fee for an annual certificate listing thirty or more
animals belonging to one person is five dollars per head or the time
and mileage fee, whichever is greater. A lifetime certificate shall
not be issued until the fee has been paid to the director.
(7) The minimum fee for the issuance of an inspection certificate
by the director is five dollars. The minimum fee does not apply to
livestock consigned to a public livestock market or special sale or
inspected at a cattle processing plant.
(8) For purposes of this section, "the time and mileage fee" means
seventeen dollars per hour and the current mileage rate set by the
office of financial management.

Sec. 8 RCW 16.57.240 and 2003 c 326 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, and self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160 shall
show the owner, number, breed, sex, brand, or other method of
identification of the cattle or horses and any other necessary
information required by the director.
(2) The director may issue certificate of permit forms to any
person on payment of a fee established by rule.
(3) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or
other satisfactory proof of ownership shall be kept by the owner and/or
person in possession of any cattle and shall be furnished to the
director or any peace officer upon demand.
(4) A self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW
16.57.160 is not valid if proof of ownership ((is)) had not been
provided by the seller to the buyer for cattle bearing brands not
recorded to the seller.

Sec. 9 RCW 16.57.243 and 2003 c 326 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cattle may not be moved or transported within ((this))
Washington state without being accompanied by a certificate of permit,
inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the
requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of
ownership, except((:
(1))) when the cattle are moved or transported:
(a) Upon lands under the exclusive control of the person moving or
transporting the cattle; or
(((2) When the cattle are being moved or transported)) (b) For
temporary grazing or feeding purposes and have the recorded brand of
the person having or transporting the cattle.
(2) Certificates of permit, inspection certificates, self-inspection certificates meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or
other satisfactory proof of ownership accompanying cattle being moved
or transported within ((this)) Washington state shall be subject to
inspection at any time by the director or any peace officer.

Sec. 10 RCW 16.57.245 and 2003 c 326 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director or any peace officer may stop vehicles carrying cattle
or horses to determine if the livestock being transported are
accompanied by a certificate of permit, inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.010, or
other satisfactory proof of ownership, as determined by the director.

Sec. 11 RCW 16.57.280 and 2003 c 326 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person shall knowingly have possession of any cattle or
horse marked with a recorded brand of another person unless the:
(((1))) (a) Cattle or horse lawfully bears the person's own healed
recorded brand; ((or
(2))) (b) Cattle or horse is accompanied by a certificate of permit
from the owner of the recorded brand; ((or
(3))) (c) Cattle or horse is accompanied by an inspection
certificate; ((or
(4))) (d) Cattle ((is)) are accompanied by a self-inspection
certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.010; ((or
(5))) (e) Horse is accompanied by a bill of sale from the previous
owner; or
(((6))) (f) Cattle or horse is accompanied by other satisfactory
proof of ownership as designated in rule.
(2) A violation of this section constitutes a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 12 RCW 16.57.290 and 2003 c 326 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
All cattle and horses that are not accompanied by a certificate of
permit, inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the
requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of ownership
when offered for sale and presented for inspection by the director,
shall be impounded. If theft is suspected, the director shall
immediately initiate an investigation. If theft is not suspected, the
animal shall be sold and the proceeds retained by the director. Upon
the sale of the cattle or horses, the director shall give the
purchasers an inspection certificate for the cattle or horses
documenting their ownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 16.57 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may:
(1) Adopt rules governing issuance of replacement copies of brand
inspection documents; and
(2) Charge a fee of twenty-five dollars for such copies, which may
be increased by rule.

--- END ---