BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In order to plan for a new primary commercial service airport,
every county, city, and town in which there is planned to be a primary
commercial service airport shall, through its comprehensive plan and
development regulations, create an aviation protection zone of at least
seven miles around a future primary commercial service airport site in
which the siting of incompatible uses is prohibited. Incompatible uses
include, but are not limited to, housing, K-12 educational facilities,
and hospitals. All proposed and adopted plans and regulations shall be
filed with the aviation division of the department of transportation
within a reasonable time after release for public consideration and
comment. Each county, city, and town may obtain technical assistance
from the aviation division of the department of transportation to
develop plans and regulations consistent with this section.
(2) "Primary commercial service airport" means an airport that
receives scheduled passenger service and enplanes ten thousand or more
passengers annually, as reported by the federal aviation
administration.
(3) This section applies to every county, city, and town, whether
operating under this chapter or chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70A RCW,
or under a charter.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.63.250 and 1996 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Adoption and amendment of comprehensive plan provisions and
development regulations under this chapter affecting a general aviation
airport are subject to RCW 36.70.547.
Adoption and amendment of comprehensive plan provisions and
development regulations under this chapter affecting a primary
commercial service airport are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 35A.63.270 and 1996 c 239 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Adoption and amendment of comprehensive plan provisions and
development regulations under this chapter affecting a general aviation
airport are subject to RCW 36.70.547.
Adoption and amendment of comprehensive plan provisions and
development regulations under this chapter affecting a primary
commercial service airport are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 36.70A.510 and 1996 c 239 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Adoption and amendment of comprehensive plan provisions and
development regulations under this chapter affecting a general aviation
airport are subject to RCW 36.70.547.
Adoption and amendment of comprehensive plan provisions and
development regulations under this chapter affecting a primary
commercial service airport are subject to section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The aviation division of the department
of transportation shall hire an independent consultant to identify the
location within the state of the next primary commercial service
airport. In conducting the work, the consultant shall use the findings
of the long-term air transportation study completed under RCW 47.68.390
and 47.68.400. The department shall submit the consultant's findings
to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, the
governor, the transportation commission, and regional transportation
planning organizations by July 1, 2010.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2011, from the multimodal transportation
account--state to the department of transportation for the purposes of
section 5 of this act.

--- END ---