BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to:
(1) Improve public health and safety;
(2) Control the ever-increasing costs of health care;
(3) Require that prescribing decisions by medical professionals are
based on the latest scientific and clinical data of the quality and
effectiveness of prescription medications and medical devices; and
(4) Improve health outcomes and reduce unnecessary costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall develop an evidence-based prescriber
education program, in cooperation with the school of medicine at the
University of Washington and the state health care authority, known as
the prescriber education program. In designing the program, the
commission shall consult with appropriate health care professionals or
organizations knowledgeable about the practice of medicine and
continuing medical education.
(2) The prescriber education program must provide health care
professionals who are prescribers with timely, balanced, unbiased,
evidence-based information and education about the comparative
efficacy, quality, safety, and cost-effectiveness of commonly used
prescribed products.
(3) The commission may seek funding to establish and maintain the
prescriber education program through public or private grants or gifts
but may not seek or accept funding from any pharmaceutical-related
manufacturer, company, or representative.
(4) The commission and the department of health may adopt rules
necessary to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The prescriber education account is established in the state
treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited in the prescriber
education account:
(a) Money appropriated or transferred to the account by the
legislature;
(b) Money obtained through public or private grants or gifts; and
(c) At least ten percent of any state share of an award or
settlement made in favor of the state from any lawsuit involving the
state of Washington and any pharmaceutical company.
(3) Moneys in the account may be used to establish, administer, and
maintain the prescriber education program established in section 2 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---