BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Real property owned by a nonprofit organization that is leased
to another nonprofit organization is exempt from taxation.
(2) To qualify for the exemption under this section:
(a) The nonprofit organization that is the tenant must:
(i) Be exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended as of
January 1, 2010;
(ii) Use the property exclusively for a purpose which qualifies the
nonprofit organization for exemption from federal income tax under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended
as of January 1, 2010. Use under this subsection must be actual; and
(iii) Occupy the leased property; and
(b) The nonprofit organization that is the lessor must be exempt
from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the
federal internal revenue code, as amended as of January 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---