BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.84.010 and 2009 c 525 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abuser" means any person who participates, either as a
principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful
financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
(2) "Decedent" means:
(a) Any person whose life is taken by a slayer; or
(b) Any deceased person who, at any time during life in which he or
she was a vulnerable adult, was the victim of financial exploitation by
an abuser.
(3) "Financial exploitation" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 74.34.020, as enacted or hereafter amended.
(4) "Property" includes any real and personal property and any
right or interest therein.
(5) "Slayer" means any person who participates, either as a
principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful
killing of any other person, even if found not guilty by reason of
insanity for such killing.
(6) "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
74.34.020.

--- END ---