BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A defendant who offers a timely defense
of insanity under RCW 10.77.030 may be found "guilty and mentally ill"
at trial if the trier of fact finds that:
(a) The state has proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the
defendant is guilty of the crime charged;
(b) The defendant has failed to prove by a preponderance of the
evidence the asserted insanity defense; and
(c) The defendant or the state has proven by a preponderance of the
evidence that the defendant was mentally ill at the time of the
commission of the offense and that the defendant's actions at the time
of the commission of the offense were affected by symptoms of mental
illness.
(2) For the purposes of this section, the terms "mental illness"
and "mentally ill" refer to a substantial disorder of thought, mood, or
behavior that has a substantial adverse effect on the defendant's
cognitive or volitional functions, but not rising to the level of
insanity under RCW 9A.12.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A defendant who waives the right to trial
may plead guilty and mentally ill under section 1 of this act. No plea
of guilty and mentally ill shall be accepted by the court unless the
defendant has undergone examination by a psychologist or psychiatrist,
and following a review of the medical evidence and a hearing on the
defendant's mental condition, the court is satisfied that there is a
factual basis for the plea of guilty and mentally ill. If the court
refuses to accept a defendant's plea of guilty and mentally ill, the
defendant shall be permitted to withdraw the plea.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A defendant who is found guilty and
mentally ill under section 1 of this act may receive any sentence,
including a standard range sentence or an exceptional sentence, which
could have lawfully been imposed if the defendant were found guilty of
the same offense. For the purposes of sentencing, a finding of guilty
and mentally ill shall be treated as equivalent to a finding of guilty.
(2) A defendant who has been found guilty and mentally ill shall be
placed under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections. If the
defendant's sentence calls for a term of confinement, the defendant
shall be committed to the custody of the department of social and
health services, which shall place the defendant in a secure mental
health facility for an initial period of mental health treatment and
evaluation. Following this period, the defendant shall be discharged
by the department of social and health services to the custody of the
department of corrections for the balance of the defendant's sentence.
(3) A defendant in the custody of the department of social and
health services who has been found guilty and mentally ill who
cooperates with treatment may remain in the custody of the department
of social and health services for only such time as is reasonably
necessary to stabilize the defendant's condition and determine an
appropriate course of treatment for the defendant in a correctional
setting. If the defendant refuses to cooperate with treatment, the
defendant must be discharged to the custody of the department of
corrections. The decision to discharge the defendant shall be made at
the sole discretion of the department of social and health services.
(4) The department of social and health services must discharge a
defendant found guilty and mentally ill to the department of
corrections within ninety days, or submit written justification to the
department of corrections at ninety-day intervals explaining why
continued treatment is necessary in order to achieve the goals stated
in subsection (3) of this section. Lack of success in treatment which
is caused by a lack of cooperation on the part of the defendant is not
justification for a failure to discharge the defendant.
(5) When a defendant who has been found guilty and mentally ill is
discharged to the custody of the department of corrections, the
department of social and health services shall provide the department
of corrections with a report describing the defendant's condition and
recommended course of treatment, and shall provide the department of
corrections with any other medical information it requests relating to
the treatment of the defendant.
(6) A defendant who has been found guilty and mentally ill shall
not be confined for longer than the confinement term of the defendant's
sentence, and shall be eligible for earned release time under RCW
9.94A.728, while in the custody of the department of social and health
services, in a manner to be determined by the department of corrections
and the department of social and health services.
(7) No defendant who has been found guilty and mentally ill shall
be eligible for unescorted privileges on or off the grounds of a
facility operated by the department of social and health services
without written permission from the secretary of the department of
corrections or the secretary's designee.
(8) The department of corrections and department of social and
health services may adopt rules or make agreements necessary for the
implementation of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.77.040 and 1998 c 297 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the issue of insanity is submitted to the jury, the court
shall instruct the jury to return a special verdict in substantially
the following form:

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.501 and 2009 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall supervise every offender convicted of a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense who is sentenced to probation
in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, for
an offense included in (a) and (b) of this subsection. The superior
court shall order probation for:
(a) Offenders convicted of fourth degree assault, violation of a
domestic violence court order pursuant to RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050,
26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or 74.34.145,
and who also have a prior conviction for one or more of the following:
(i) A violent offense;
(ii) A sex offense;
(iii) A crime against a person as provided in RCW 9.94A.411;
(iv) Fourth degree assault; or
(v) Violation of a domestic violence court order; and
(b) Offenders convicted of:
(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;
(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;
(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and
(iv) Failure to register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.
(2) Misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenders supervised by the
department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community
custody.
(3) The department shall supervise every felony offender sentenced
to community custody whose risk assessment, conducted pursuant to
subsection (6) of this section, classifies the offender as one who is
at a high risk to reoffend.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
department shall supervise an offender sentenced to community custody
regardless of risk classification if the offender:
(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally
ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;
(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant
to RCW 9.95.017;
(d) Was found guilty and mentally ill under section 1 of this act;
(e) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.660, or 9.94A.670; or
(((e))) (f) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745.
(5) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any
offender sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer
unless the offender or probationer is one for whom supervision is
required under subsection (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section.
(6) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every felony
offender sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to
supervision under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 10.77 RCW.

--- END ---