BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that corporate
surety bail bond premium fees that fall below ten percent of the
penalty amount of the bond to be posted encourage flight and thus make
it more likely that a defendant will forfeit the bond and fail to
appear in court at the designated time. Accordingly, the legislature
intends to create uniformity of law and promote public safety by
creating a standard bail bond premium fee throughout the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A bail bond agent shall charge and
collect for his or her premium, commission, or fee an amount of ten
percent of the amount of the corporate surety bail bond posted by him
or her.
(2) The bail bond agent shall certify to the court that the
premium, commission, or fee is at least ten percent of the amount of
the corporate surety bail bond posted by him or her. The certification
shall be submitted to the court along with the bond.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section applies to a bond posted for
persons convicted of a crime against a person, as provided in RCW
9.94A.411.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The director may impose a civil penalty
for a violation of this chapter. The civil penalty shall consist of:
(a) For a first violation, a written warning and a monetary penalty
of one thousand dollars;
(b) For a second violation, mandatory suspension of the bail bond
agent's license for a maximum of one year and a monetary penalty of one
thousand dollars;
(c) For a third violation, mandatory revocation of the bail bond
agent's license and a monetary penalty of five thousand dollars.
(2) At the request of the director, the attorney general may bring
an action in the name of the state seeking:
(a) Injunctive relief to prevent the bail bond agent from further
violation of this chapter;
(b) To recover civil penalties imposed under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(c) To recover attorneys' fees and other enforcement costs and
disbursements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 All revenues derived from any civil
penalties assessed under section 3 of this act shall be deposited in
the business and professions account, pursuant to RCW 43.24.150(1)(f).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 18.185 RCW.

--- END ---