BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A city or county must establish an objective classification
system to determine those persons eligible for a special detention
facility. The city or county and its employees are immune from civil
liability for damages caused by individual eligibility decisions,
unless the city, county, or its employees acted with gross negligence
or in bad faith.
(2) A city or county may establish and maintain alternative
supervision or rehabilitation programs, other than those authorized in
RCW 70.48.090, within the special detention facility.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.48.020 and 2009 c 411 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((As used in this chapter the words and phrases in this section
shall have the meanings indicated)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Administration" means the direct application of a drug whether
by ingestion or inhalation, to the body of an inmate by a practitioner
or nonpractitioner jail personnel.
(2) "Correctional facility" means a facility operated by a
governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the housing of
adult persons serving terms not exceeding one year for the purposes of
punishment, correction, and rehabilitation following conviction of a
criminal offense.
(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or
attempted transfer from one person to another of medication whether or
not there is an agency relationship.
(4) "Detention facility" means a facility operated by a governing
unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of
adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or
sentencing and for the housing of adult persons for purposes of
punishment and correction after sentencing or persons serving terms not
to exceed ninety days.
(5) "Drug" and "legend drug" have the same meanings as provided in
RCW 69.41.010.
(6) "Governing unit" means the city and/or county or any
combinations of cities and/or counties responsible for the operation,
supervision, and maintenance of a jail.
(7) "Health care" means preventive, diagnostic, and rehabilitative
services provided by licensed health care professionals and/or
facilities; such care to include providing prescription drugs where
indicated.
(8) "Holding facility" means a facility operated by a governing
unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of
adult persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or
sentencing and for the temporary housing of such persons during or
after trial and/or sentencing, but in no instance shall the housing
exceed thirty days.
(9) "Jail" means any holding, detention, special detention, or
correctional facility as defined in this section.
(10) "Major urban" means a county or combination of counties which
has a city having a population greater than twenty-six thousand based
on the 1978 projections of the office of financial management.
(11) "Medication" means a drug, legend drug, or controlled
substance requiring a prescription or an over-the-counter or
nonprescription drug.
(12) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by
nonpractitioner jail personnel to an inmate residing in a jail to
facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or
controlled substance or nonprescription medication. "Medication
assistance" includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the
medication container to the individual, opening the individual's
medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in
the individual's hand.
(13) "Medium urban" means a county or combination of counties which
has a city having a population equal to or greater than ten thousand
but less than twenty-six thousand based on the 1978 projections of the
office of financial management.
(14) "Nonpractitioner jail personnel" means appropriately trained
staff who are authorized to manage, deliver, or administer prescription
and nonprescription medication under RCW 70.48.490.
(15) "Office" means the office of financial management.
(16) "Practitioner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
69.41.010.
(17) "Rural" means a county or combination of counties which has a
city having a population less than ten thousand based on the 1978
projections of the office of financial management.
(18) "Special detention facility" means a minimum security facility
operated by a governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for
the housing of special populations of adult persons charged with a
criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing or for punishment and
correction after sentencing when those sentenced persons ((who)) do not
require the level of security normally provided in detention and
correctional facilities including, but not necessarily limited to,
persons convicted of offenses under RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of:
(a) Items that become components of a special detention facility as
defined in RCW 70.48.020; or
(b) Labor and services rendered for constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving a special detention facility as defined in RCW
70.48.020.
(2) A person taking an exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. The exemption is available only when the buyer provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by
the department. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for
the seller's files.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use
of items that become components of a special detention facility as
defined in RCW 70.48.020. A person taking an exemption under this
section must keep records necessary for the department to verify
eligibility under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect
August 1, 2010.

--- END ---