BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.31.100 and 2006 c 138 s 23 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person
has committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to
arrest the person without a warrant.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a police officer
may arrest a person without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the presence of
the officer((, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of
this section)).
(((1))) (3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property or involving the use or
possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition, possession, or
consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(((2))) (4) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody,
pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a
person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe
that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence between the persons involved.
(((3))) (5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(((4))) (6) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of
a motor vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle
involved in the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe
that the driver has committed in connection with the accident a
violation of any traffic law or regulation.
(((5))) (7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW
79A.60.040 (operation of vessel in a reckless manner or operation of
vessel under the influence of intoxicating liquor) shall have the
authority to arrest the person.
(((6))) (8) An officer may act upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was
committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic
infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed the
infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an
officer the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the
state of Washington.
(((7))) (9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has committed or is committing any act of indecent
exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(((8))) (10) A police officer may arrest and take into custody,
pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a
person without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe
that an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(((9))) (11) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 (interference with health care
facility) may arrest such person.
(((10))) (12) A police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm
or other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(((11))) (13) Any police officer having probable cause to believe
that a person being supervised by the department of corrections has
violated a condition of his or her community custody may detain and
arrest the person if the officer has obtained oral or written
authorization to detain the person from the department.
(14) Except as specifically provided in subsections (((2), (3),))
(4), (5), ((and)) (6), and (8) of this section, nothing in this section
extends or otherwise affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title
46 RCW.
(((12))) (15) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly
liable for making an arrest pursuant to ((RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8)))
subsection (4) or (10) of this section if the police officer acts in
good faith and without malice.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.28A.040 and 2009 c 31 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No later than July 1, 2002, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs shall implement and operate an electronic
statewide city and county jail booking and reporting system. The
system shall serve as a central repository and instant information
source for offender information and jail statistical data. The system
may be placed on the Washington state justice information network and
be capable of communicating electronically with every Washington state
city and county jail and with all other Washington state criminal
justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030.
(2) After the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
has implemented an electronic jail booking system as described in
subsection (1) of this section, if a city or county jail or law
enforcement agency receives state or federal funding to cover the
entire cost of implementing or reconfiguring an electronic jail booking
system, the city or county jail or law enforcement agency shall
implement or reconfigure an electronic jail booking system that is in
compliance with the jail booking system standards developed pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section.
(3) After the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
has implemented an electronic jail booking system as described in
subsection (1) of this section, city or county jails, or law
enforcement agencies that operate electronic jail booking systems, but
choose not to accept state or federal money to implement or reconfigure
electronic jail booking systems, shall electronically forward jail
booking information to the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs. At a minimum the information forwarded shall include
the name of the offender, vital statistics, the date the offender was
arrested, the offenses arrested for, the date and time an offender is
released or transferred from a city or county jail, and if available,
the mug shot. The electronic format in which the information is sent
shall be at the discretion of the city or county jail, or law
enforcement agency forwarding the information. City and county jails
or law enforcement agencies that forward jail booking information under
this subsection are not required to comply with the standards developed
under subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(4) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall
appoint, convene, and manage a statewide jail booking and reporting
system standards committee. The committee shall include
representatives from the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs correction committee, the information service board's justice
information committee, the judicial information system, at least two
individuals who serve as jailers in a city or county jail, and other
individuals that the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs places on the committee. The committee shall have the authority
to:
(a) Develop and amend as needed standards for the statewide jail
booking and reporting system and for the information that must be
contained within the system. At a minimum, the system shall contain:
(i) The offenses the individual has been charged with;
(ii) Descriptive and personal information about each offender
booked into a city or county jail. At a minimum, this information
shall contain the offender's name, vital statistics, address, and
mugshot;
(iii) Information about the offender while in jail, which could be
used to protect criminal justice officials that have future contact
with the offender, such as medical conditions, acts of violence, and
other behavior problems;
(iv) Statistical data indicating the current capacity of each jail
and the quantity and category of offenses charged;
(v) The ability to communicate directly and immediately with the
city and county jails and other criminal justice entities; and
(vi) The date and time that an offender was released or transferred
from a local jail;
(b) Develop and amend as needed operational standards for city and
county jail booking systems, which at a minimum shall include the type
of information collected and transmitted, and the technical
requirements needed for the city and county jail booking system to
communicate with the statewide jail booking and reporting system;
(c) Develop and amend as needed standards for allocating grants to
city and county jails or law enforcement agencies that will be
implementing or reconfiguring electronic jail booking systems.
(5)(a) A statewide automated victim information and notification
system shall be added to the city and county jail booking and reporting
system. The system shall:
(i) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when any of the following events
affect an offender housed in any Washington state city or county jail
or department of corrections facility:
(A) Is transferred or assigned to another facility;
(B) Is transferred to the custody of another agency outside the
state;
(C) Is given a different security classification;
(D) Is released on temporary leave or otherwise;
(E) Is discharged;
(F) Has escaped; or
(G) Has been served with a protective order that was requested by
the victim;
(ii) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when an offender has:
(A) An upcoming court event where the victim is entitled to be
present, if the court information is made available to the statewide
automated victim information and notification system administrator at
the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;
(B) An upcoming parole, pardon, or community supervision hearing;
or
(C) A change in the offender's parole, probation, or community
supervision status including:
(I) A change in the offender's supervision status; or
(II) A change in the offender's address;
(iii) Automatically notify a registered victim via the victim's
choice of telephone, letter, or e-mail when a sex offender has:
(A) Updated his or her profile information with the state sex
offender registry; or
(B) Become noncompliant with the state sex offender registry;
(iv) Permit a registered victim to receive the most recent status
report for an offender in any Washington state city and county jail,
department of corrections, or sex offender registry by calling the
statewide automated victim information and notification system on a
toll-free telephone number or by accessing the statewide automated
victim information and notification system via a public web site. All
registered victims calling the statewide automated victim information
and notification system will be given the option to have live operator
assistance to help use the program on a twenty-four hour, three hundred
sixty-five day per year basis;
(v) Permit a crime victim to register, or registered victim to
update, the victim's registration information for the statewide
automated victim information and notification system by calling a toll-free telephone number or by accessing a public web site; and
(vi) Ensure that the offender information contained within the
statewide automated victim information and notification system is
updated frequently to timely notify a crime victim that an offender has
been released or discharged or has escaped. However, the failure of
the statewide automated victim information and notification system to
provide notice to the victim does not establish a separate cause of
action by the victim against state officials, local officials, law
enforcement officers, or any related correctional authorities.
(b) Participation in the statewide automated victim information and
notification program satisfies any obligation to notify the crime
victim of an offender's custody status and the status of the offender's
upcoming court events so long as:
(i) Information making offender and case data available is provided
on a timely basis to the statewide automated victim information and
notification program; and
(ii) Information a victim submits to register and participate in
the victim notification system is only used for the sole purpose of
victim notification.
(c) Automated victim information and notification systems in
existence and operational as of July 22, 2007, shall not be required to
participate in the statewide system.
(6) No later than July 1, 2011, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs shall implement procedures as part of the
city and county jail booking and reporting system to automatically
notify the department of corrections when any of the following events
affect an offender housed in any Washington state city or county jail
who is being supervised by the department:
(a) Is booked into a facility;
(b) Is transferred or assigned to another facility;
(c) Is released on temporary leave or otherwise;
(d) Is discharged; or
(e) Has escaped.
(7) When funded, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs shall implement and operate an electronic statewide unified sex
offender notification and registration program.
(((7))) (8) An appointed or elected official, public employee, or
public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470, or combination of units of
government and its employees, as provided in RCW 36.28A.010, are immune
from civil liability for damages for any release of information or the
failure to release information related to the statewide automated
victim information and notification system, the electronic statewide
unified sex offender notification and registration program, and the
jail booking and reporting system as described in this section, so long
as the release was without gross negligence. The immunity provided
under this subsection applies to the release of relevant and necessary
information to other public officials, public employees, or public
agencies, and to the general public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of corrections shall,
subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, provide law enforcement
with access to a hotline staffed by a community corrections officer who
can provide authorization to detain any individual under the
supervision of the department as provided in RCW 10.31.100(13). The
hotline shall be available twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week.
(2) An offender arrested pursuant to RCW 10.31.100(13) shall be
subject to the same proceedings as if the person were arrested by a
community corrections officer under RCW 9.94A.716.
(3) The department of corrections and Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs shall work cooperatively to inform all law
enforcement in the state of the community corrections hotline and the
availability of electronic access to view the community custody status
of an offender.
(4) No later than November 1, 2011, the department of corrections
shall provide a report to the governor and the appropriate committees
of the legislature including, but not limited to, the following
information:
(a) The number of total calls to the hotline and the number of
resulting arrests;
(b) The type of violation alleged and ultimate disposition of
violation;
(c) Utilization of the hotline and electronic information by
county;
(d) A survey of law enforcement regarding their experience using
the hotline and accessing electronic information;
(e) An assessment of the workability of the community corrections
hotline and recommendations for its continued use.
(5) The state, local governments, and their agencies, officers, or
employees are immune from civil liability for damages for the access or
operation of the community corrections hotline or any decision to
detain or not to detain an individual.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---