BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.06.133 and 2009 c 534 s 2 and 2009 c 5 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes
and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(b) Training and career development;
(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except that entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months;
(d) Transfers;
(e) Promotional preferences;
(f) Sick leaves and vacations;
(g) Hours of work;
(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for
the financial basis for layoffs;
(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;
(j) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the
prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other
governmental units. The rates in the salary schedules or plans shall
be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an
implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and, for institutions of higher
education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions of a
similar nature in the state or the locality in which an institution of
higher education or related board is located. Such adoption and
revision is subject to approval by the director of financial management
in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;
(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service. For the twelve months following February 18, 2009,
a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any exempt position
under this chapter;
(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military
service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability
incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the
government and who, upon termination of such service, has received an
honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable
record, or a release from active military service with evidence of
service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or
dishonorable discharge shall be given. However, the surviving spouse
of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of
the veteran's length of active military service. ((For the purposes of
this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily
retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose
military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per
month.))
(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide
for local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.
(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section may be
superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The
supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the
respective collective bargaining units.
(4)(a) The director shall require that each state agency report
annually the following data:
(i) The number of classified, Washington management service, and
exempt employees in the agency and the change compared to the previous
report;
(ii) The number of bonuses and performance-based incentives awarded
to agency staff and the base wages of such employees; and
(iii) The cost of each bonus or incentive awarded.
(b) A report that compiles the data in (a) of this subsection for
all agencies will be provided annually to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature and must be posted for the
public on the department of personnel's agency web site.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.150 and 2002 c 371 s 906, 2002 c 354 s 203, 2002
c 354 s 202, and 2002 c 110 s 1 are each reenacted to read as follows:
The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(1) Certification of names for vacancies;
(2) Examinations for all positions in the competitive and
noncompetitive service;
(3) Appointments;
(4) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan,
in accordance with rules adopted by the board under RCW 41.06.136, for
all positions in the classified service, based on investigation and
analysis of the duties and responsibilities of each such position and
allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification
plan.
(a) The director shall not adopt job classification revisions or
class studies unless implementation of the proposed revision or study
will result in net cost savings, increased efficiencies, or improved
management of personnel or services, and the proposed revision or study
has been approved by the director of financial management in accordance
with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(b) Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments are
governed by (a) of this subsection and RCW 41.06.152;
(5) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint,
reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if
such agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so
delegate: PROVIDED, That the director may not authorize such
delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision
of the agency;
(6) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified
positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment,
reemployment, transfer, and promotion in respect to classified
positions covered by this chapter;
(7) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer,
recruitment, training, and career development; development and
implementation of affirmative action goals and timetables; and
monitoring of progress against those goals and timetables.
The director shall consult with the human rights commission in the
development of rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department
of personnel shall transmit a report annually to the human rights
commission which states the progress each state agency has made in
meeting affirmative action goals and timetables.
Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for
local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.

--- END ---