BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrative office of the courts shall update the law
enforcement information form which it provides for the use of a
petitioner who is seeking an ex parte protection order in such a
fashion as to prompt the person to disclose on the form whether the
person who the petitioner is seeking to restrain has a disability,
brain injury, or impairment requiring special assistance.
(2) Any peace officer who serves a protection order on a respondent
with the knowledge that the respondent requires special assistance due
to a disability, brain injury, or impairment shall make a reasonable
effort to accommodate the needs of the respondent to the extent
practicable without compromise to the safety of the petitioner.

--- END ---