BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are many
issues facing the forest sector, such as climate change, forest health
and fire, carbon accounting, habitat and diversity, timber and water
supplies, economic competitiveness, and the economic health of forest
dependent communities. These forest issues, and the approaches taken
to address them, transcend the expertise and missions of the current
University of Washington school of forest resources and its centers and
cooperatives. While each center and cooperative contributes important
expertise and resources, the structure and continuity for the
integrated, interdisciplinary approach to address these complex issues
is lacking. The institute of forest resources will provide this
structure and continuity by drawing contributions from the centers and
cooperatives into a more consolidated, collaborative,
interdisciplinary, and integrated process that is responsive to the
critical issues confronting the forest sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The director of the school of forest
resources of the University of Washington must coordinate the existing
school of forest resource's cooperatives and centers to promote a more
holistic, efficient, and integrated approach to broaden its research
program to address the issues facing the forest section.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.44.030 and 1979 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The institute of forest resources ((shall)) must pursue
coordinated research and education related to the forest ((resource))
sector and its multiple uses including: Its conservation, ((management
and utilization; its evaluation of forest land use and the maintenance
of its rural environment)) sustainable management, and utilization; its
economic, ecological, and societal value; the manufacture and marketing
of forest products, including timber, nontimber, and environmental
services; and the provision of recreation and aesthetic values.
(2) The institute of forest resources must also seek to provide a
framework to identify, prioritize, fund, and conduct interdisciplinary
research critical to the forest sector and to develop integrated,
synthesized information and decision support tools to improve
understanding of these complex issues for policymakers and others.
(3) In pursuit of these objectives, the institute of forest
resources is authorized to cooperate with other entities, including,
but not limited to, universities, state and federal agencies,
industrial institutions, domestic or foreign, where such cooperation
advances these objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the school of forest resources of the University of
Washington must appoint a policy advisory board consisting of eleven
members to advise the director of the school of forest resources of the
University of Washington on policies for the institute of forest
resources that are consistent with the purposes of the institute.
Membership on the policy advisory board must broadly represent the
various interests concerned with the purposes of the institute of
forest resources, including the state and federal governments,
environmental organizations, local communities, the timber industry,
and tribes.
Members of the policy advisory committee must be compensated as
provided in RCW 43.03.220 and must be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The institute of forest resources shall
provide progress reports to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by July 1, 2011, on the coordination required by section 2
of this act and the implementation of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The timber recovery fund board is created. The timber recovery
fund board is composed of five members, of whom two members must be
appointed by the governor. The commissioner of public lands, or the
commissioner's designee, shall serve ex officio as a voting member of
the timber recovery fund board. The director of the University of
Washington school of forest resources and the dean of the Washington
State University college of agriculture, human, and natural resource
sciences, or their designees, shall serve as members of the timber
recovery fund board. In making appointments to the timber recovery
fund board, the governor shall ensure that one member each representing
the interests of forest landowners and conservation interests are
timber recovery fund board members at all times. The governor shall
solicit and give substantial consideration to nominations provided by
organizations representing these interests. Appointments to the timber
recovery fund board by the governor are subject to senate confirmation.
(2) The timber recovery fund board shall select a chair from among
the members of the timber recovery fund board.
(3) Timber recovery fund board members serve four-year terms,
except that the governor shall designate one of the initial
appointments to serve for a term of two years. The terms commence
January 1, 2011.
(4) Staff support to the timber recovery fund board must be
provided by the recreation and conservation office. For administrative
purposes, the timber recovery fund board shall be located within the
office.
(5) Members of the timber recovery fund board shall be compensated
as provided by RCW 43.03.250, and reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
The recreation and conservation office shall provide necessary
grants and loan administration support to the timber recovery fund
board. The office shall provide necessary coordination with the
institute of forest resources.
When requested by the timber recovery fund board or the office, the
institute of forest resources shall furnish assistance to the timber
recovery fund board and the office for the analysis and review of
proposed plans, activities, and projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to available resources, the timber recovery fund board is
responsible for allocating grants and loans for the protection of
working forest lands to projects and activities that include, but are
not limited to, the following:
(1) Projects and activities that will sustain the working forest
land base and strengthen the connection between economic health and
conservation of forests in Washington, such as forest health, providing
carbon sequestration, production of wood-based biomass energy,
protection of forest ecosystems, benefits for habitats, biodiversity,
and watershed functions;
(2) Projects and activities that preserve forest lands over the
long term for working forestry and resist forest land conservation,
such as land exchanges and transfer of development rights programs; and
(3) Projects and activities for planning, research, and policy
development related to maintaining working forests as well as for long-term sustainable supplies of timber products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The timber recovery fund board shall establish procedures and
criteria consistent with section 8 of this act for making grants and
loans for the protection of working forest lands. To accomplish this
purpose, the timber recovery fund board may:
(a) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the procedures
and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(b) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements with
grant recipients, and with other public and private parties as the
timber recovery fund board deems necessary, consistent with the
purposes of sections 6 through 10 of this act;
(c) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or
financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any terms
that are not in conflict with sections 6 through 10 of this act;
(d) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out
the purposes of sections 6 through 10 of this act; and
(e) Do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under sections 6 through 10 of this act.
(2) The recreation and conservation office shall provide all
necessary grant and loan administration assistance to the timber
recovery fund board and shall distribute and account for funds
appropriated or provided to the timber recovery fund board for the
purposes of sections 6 through 10 of this act.
(3) The timber recovery fund board shall adopt guidelines for the
amount of nonstate resources that must be committed for grants from the
categories established by the timber recovery fund board.
(4) The timber recovery fund board shall adopt guidelines that
limit the amount of a grant or loan that may be allocated to those
administrative or other expenses of a grant or loan recipient not
directly applied to maintaining Washington's working forest land base.
(5) In order to fund as many projects and activities as possible,
the timber recovery fund board shall establish goals to encourage loan
applications and to maximize the amount of funds awarded in the form of
low-interest loans. Only local governments are eligible for low-interest loans awarded by the timber recovery fund board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25
RCW to read as follows:
The timber recovery fund board account is created in the state
treasury. The recreation and conservation office may receive gifts,
grants, or endowments from public and private sources that are made
from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of
the purposes of sections 6 through 10 of this act and spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources
according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or
endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.
Any funds appropriated by the legislature for distribution by the
timber recovery fund board, repayments of principal and interest on
loans extended by the timber recovery fund board, or other public or
private funds provided for distribution by the timber recovery fund
board must be placed in the account. Grants, gifts, or other financial
assistance, proceeds received from public bodies as administrative cost
contributions, and moneys made available to the state of Washington by
the federal government may be deposited into the account.
Only the timber recovery fund board may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures. Moneys in the account may be used for administrative
expenses of the timber recovery fund board and the recreation and
conservation office.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2009 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund shall be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment
fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund, the foster care
endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with dependents grant
account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the
contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington state combined
fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection
account, the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the
energy account, the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the
food animal veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and
vegetable inspection account, the future teachers conditional
scholarship account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready
for math and science scholarship account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan 2 expense fund, the local
tourism promotion account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar
pool account, the regional transportation investment district account,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, ((and)) the reading
achievement account, and the timber recovery fund board account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.
(c) The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent
of their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the city and county advance right-of-way revolving fund, the
federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle
account, the local rail service assistance account, and the
miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The code reviser is directed to alphabetize
the accounts listed in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(b) by their common name.

--- END ---