BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
PROVIDING UNIFORMITY IN TAX INCENTIVE ACCOUNTABILITY PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that
accountability and effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax
policy. In order to make policy choices regarding the best use of
limited state resources, the legislature needs information on how a tax
preference is used. In recent years, the legislature has enacted or
extended numerous tax preferences that require the reporting of
information to the department of revenue. Although there are many
similarities in the requirements, and only two distinct accountability
documents, there is a lack of uniformity in the information reported,
penalties for failure to file, due dates, filing extensions, and filing
requirements. Greater uniformity in the data reported is necessary to
adequately compare tax preference programs. The legislature intends to
create two sets of uniform reporting requirements that apply to the
existing tax preferences and can be used in future legislation granting
additional tax preferences.
(2) The legislative fiscal committees or the department of revenue
are required to study many of the existing tax preferences and report
to the legislature at least once. Because chapter 43.136 RCW now
requires the joint legislative audit and review committee, with support
from the department of revenue, to comprehensively review most tax
preferences every ten years and provide a report to the legislature, a
number of redundant studies by the legislative fiscal committees and
the department of revenue have been eliminated. However, the
department of revenue will continue to prepare summary descriptive
statistics by category and report the statistics to the legislature
each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
survey under this section must file a complete annual survey with the
department.
(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection, the survey is
due by April 30th of the year following any calendar year in which a
person becomes eligible to claim the tax preference that requires a
survey under this section.
(ii) If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, the first survey
must be filed by April 30th of the calendar year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
operationally complete, and a survey must be filed by April 30th of
each of the seven succeeding calendar years.
(b) The department may extend the due date for timely filing of
annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(2)(a) The survey must include the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the calendar year covered by the survey.
(b) The survey must also include the following information for
employment positions in Washington, not to include names of employees,
for the year that the tax preference was claimed:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) For persons claiming the tax preference provided under chapter
82.60 or 82.63 RCW, the survey must also include the number of new
products or research projects by general classification, and the number
of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at
the investment project.
(d) For persons claiming the credit provided under RCW 82.04.4452,
the survey must also include the qualified research and development
expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit was claimed,
the taxable amount during the calendar year for which the credit was
claimed, the number of new products or research projects by general
classification, the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights
associated with the research and development activities for which the
credit was claimed, and whether the tax preference has been assigned,
and who assigned the credit. The definitions in RCW 82.04.4452 apply
to this subsection (2)(d).
(e) If the person filing a survey under this section did not file
a survey with the department in the previous calendar year, the survey
filed under this section must also include the employment, wage, and
benefit information required under (b)(i) through (iv) of this
subsection for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(3) As part of the annual survey, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(4) All information collected under this section, except the amount
of the tax preference claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under RCW
82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax preference claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in subsection
(5) of this section. If the amount of the tax preference claimed as
reported on the survey is different than the amount actually claimed or
otherwise allowed by the department based on the taxpayer's excise tax
returns or other information known to the department, the amount
actually claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(5) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax reduced or saved
is less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the
survey may request the department to treat the amount of the tax
reduction or savings as confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(6)(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a
tax preference that requires an annual survey under this section but
fails to submit a complete annual survey by the due date of the survey
or any extension under RCW 82.32.590, the department must declare the
amount of the tax preference claimed for the previous calendar year to
be immediately due. If the tax preference is a deferral of tax, twelve
and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee, the lessee is
responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has received the
economic benefit.
(b) The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(7) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(8) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 A new section is added to chapter 82.32
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Every person claiming a tax preference that requires a
report under this section must file a complete annual report with the
department. The report is due by April 30th of the year following any
calendar year in which a person becomes eligible to claim the tax
preference that requires a report under this section. The department
may extend the due date for timely filing of annual reports under this
section as provided in RCW 82.32.590.
(b) The report must include information detailing employment,
wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits for
employment positions in Washington for the year that the tax preference
was claimed. However, persons engaged in manufacturing commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes may report employment, wage,
and benefit information per job at the manufacturing site for the year
that the tax preference was claimed. The report must not include names
of employees. The report must also detail employment by the total
number of full-time, part-time, and temporary positions for the year
that the tax preference was claimed.
(c) Persons receiving the benefit of the tax preference provided by
RCW 82.16.0421 or claiming any of the tax preferences provided by RCW
82.04.2909, 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5) must
indicate on the annual report the quantity of product produced in this
state during the time period covered by the report.
(d) If a person filing a report under this section did not file a
report with the department in the previous calendar year, the report
filed under this section must also include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which a tax preference was claimed.
(2) As part of the annual report, the department may request
additional information necessary to measure the results of, or
determine eligibility for, the tax preference.
(3) Other than information requested under subsection (2) of this
section, the information contained in an annual report filed under this
section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(4) Except as otherwise provided by law, if a person claims a tax
preference that requires an annual report under this section but fails
to submit a complete report by the due date or any extension under RCW
82.32.590, the department must declare the amount of the tax preference
claimed for the previous calendar year to be immediately due and
payable. The department must assess interest, but not penalties, on
the amounts due under this subsection. The interest must be assessed
at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under this chapter,
retroactively to the date the tax preference was claimed, and accrues
until the taxes for which the tax preference was claimed are repaid.
Amounts due under this subsection are not subject to the
confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the
public upon request.
(5) The department must use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers may be included in any category. The department must
report these statistics to the legislature each year by October 1st.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030 and also
includes the state and its departments and institutions.
(b) "Tax preference" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.136.021 and
includes only the tax preferences requiring a survey under this
section.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.04.240 and 2003 c 149 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
manufacturer, except persons taxable as manufacturers under other
provisions of this chapter; as to such persons the amount of the tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of manufacturing semiconductor materials, as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case of
manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product manufactured,
or, in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. For
the purposes of this subsection "semiconductor materials" means silicon
crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor wafers, compound
semiconductors, integrated circuits, and microchips.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (2) must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.
(c) This subsection (2) expires twelve years after the effective
date of this act.
(3) The measure of the tax is the value of the products, including
byproducts, so manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact
that deliveries may be made to points outside the state.

Sec. 105 RCW 82.04.2404 and 2006 c 84 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing or processing for hire semiconductor materials, as to
such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall))
is, in the case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or, in the case of processors for hire, ((be))
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of
0.275 percent.
(2) For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
means silicon crystals, silicon ingots, raw polished semiconductor
wafers, and compound semiconductor wafers.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) This section expires ((twelve years after)) December 1,
((2006)) 2018.

Sec. 106 RCW 82.04.250 and 2008 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail, except persons taxable as retailers under other
provisions of this chapter, as to such persons, the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(11) or
subsection (3) of this section, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.
(3)(a) Upon every person classified by the federal aviation
administration as a federal aviation regulation part 145 certificated
repair station and that is engaging within this state in the business
of making sales at retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under
chapter 82.08 RCW by reason of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or
82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (3) must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.04.260 and 2009 c 479 s 64, 2009 c 461 s 1, and
2009 c 162 s 34 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to
the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such
sales, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the
products manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) ((Alcohol fuel or)) Wood biomass fuel((,)) as ((those terms
are)) defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such persons the amount of tax
with respect to the business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
((alcohol fuel or)) wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the
rate of 0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the value of
the peas split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds
derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities ((shall be)) is equal
to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation
under this subsection ((shall be)) are exempt from payment of taxes
imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject
to taxation under this subsection. Stevedoring and associated
activities pertinent to the conduct of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce are defined as all activities
of a labor, service or transportation nature whereby cargo may be
loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or
under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to a
warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or
otherwise segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode
of transportation for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities
included in this definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading,
unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the
consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery,
checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee;
terminal stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not
limited to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, excluding any fees
imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3
percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state ((shall)) must be determined in accordance with the methods
of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied
by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities ((shall be)) is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995,
and 1.5 percent thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case of manufacturers,
((be)) equal to the value of the product manufactured and the gross
proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, ((be)) equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through ((the later of))
June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case
of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product manufactured
and the gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the
case of processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((eligible for)) reporting under the tax rate ((under)) provided
in this subsection (11) must ((report as required)) file a complete
annual report with the department under ((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103
of this act.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business ((shall)) is, in the case of extractors, ((be)) equal to the
value of products, including by-products, extracted, or in the case of
extractors for hire, ((be)) equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall)) is, in the
case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of products, including
by-products, manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire,
((be)) equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and
0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is equal to
the gross proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood
products multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006,
through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through
June 30, 2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business ((shall be)) is
equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of
0.2904 percent. For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling
standing timber" means the sale of timber apart from the land, where
the buyer is required to sever the timber within thirty months from the
date of the original contract, regardless of the method of payment for
the timber and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or
after severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under section
102 of this act.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
((shall be)) is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, or both, the
amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.

Sec. 108 RCW 82.04.2909 and 2006 c 182 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing aluminum; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is,
in the case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904
percent.
(2) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of aluminum
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the aluminum multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2012.

Sec. 109 RCW 82.04.294 and 2009 c 469 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon to be
used exclusively in components of such systems; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is, in the case
of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.2904
percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing solar energy systems using
photovoltaic modules, or of manufacturing solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the value of the
product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(2)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules and manufactured by the seller, or
of solar grade silicon manufactured by the seller to be used
exclusively in components of such systems((, manufactured by that
person)); as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to ((such))
the business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of
the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the solar
grade silicon to be used exclusively in components of such systems,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(b) Beginning October 1, 2009, upon every person engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of solar energy
systems using photovoltaic modules, or of solar grade silicon, silicon
solar wafers, silicon solar cells, thin film solar devices, or compound
semiconductor solar wafers to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, manufactured by that person; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the solar energy systems using photovoltaic modules, or of the
solar grade silicon to be used exclusively in components of such
systems, multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(3) Beginning October 1, 2009, silicon solar wafers, silicon solar
cells, thin film solar devices, or compound semiconductor solar wafers
are "semiconductor materials" for the purposes of RCW 82.08.9651 and
82.12.9651.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Compound semiconductor solar wafers" means a semiconductor
solar wafer composed of elements from two or more different groups of
the periodic table.
(b) "Module" means the smallest nondivisible self-contained
physical structure housing interconnected photovoltaic cells and
providing a single direct current electrical output.
(c) "Photovoltaic cell" means a device that converts light directly
into electricity without moving parts.
(d) "Silicon solar cells" means a photovoltaic cell manufactured
from a silicon solar wafer.
(e) "Silicon solar wafers" means a silicon wafer manufactured for
solar conversion purposes.
(f) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity.
(g) "Solar grade silicon" means high-purity silicon used
exclusively in components of solar energy systems using photovoltaic
modules to capture direct sunlight. "Solar grade silicon" does not
include silicon used in semiconductors.
(h) "Thin film solar devices" means a nonparticipating substrate on
which various semiconducting materials are deposited to produce a
photovoltaic cell that is used to generate electricity.
(5) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2014.

Sec. 110 RCW 82.04.426 and 2003 c 149 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed by RCW 82.04.240(2) does not apply to any
person in respect to the manufacturing of semiconductor microchips.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Manufacturing semiconductor microchips" means taking raw
polished semiconductor wafers and embedding integrated circuits on the
wafers using processes such as masking, etching, and diffusion; and
(b) "Integrated circuit" means a set of microminiaturized,
electronic circuits.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) This section expires nine years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 111 RCW 82.04.4266 and 2006 c 354 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the value of products
or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing fruits or vegetables by canning, preserving,
freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables; or
(b) Selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured by the
seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating
fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who transport in the
ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A person
taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve
records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the
goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of
business out of this state.
(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 112 RCW 82.04.4268 and 2006 c 354 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the value of products
or the gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing dairy products; or
(b) Selling manufactured dairy products to purchasers who transport
in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state. A
person taking an exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and
preserve records for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing
that the goods were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course
of business out of this state.
(2) "Dairy products" means dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including byproducts from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein.
(3) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 113 RCW 82.04.4269 and 2006 c 354 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to the value of products or the
gross proceeds of sales derived from:
(a) Manufacturing seafood products that remain in a raw, raw
frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing by
that person; or
(b) Selling manufactured seafood products that remain in a raw, raw
frozen, or raw salted state to purchasers who transport in the ordinary
course of business the goods out of this state. A person taking an
exemption under this subsection (1)(b) must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state.
(2) A person claiming the exemption provided in this section must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2012.

Sec. 114 RCW 82.04.4452 and 2005 c 514 s 1003 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for each person whose research and development spending during
the year in which the credit is claimed exceeds 0.92 percent of the
person's taxable amount during the same calendar year.
(2) The credit ((shall be)) is calculated as follows:
(a) Determine the greater of the amount of qualified research and
development expenditures of a person or eighty percent of amounts
received by a person other than a public educational or research
institution in compensation for the conduct of qualified research and
development;
(b) Subtract 0.92 percent of the person's taxable amount from the
amount determined under (a) of this subsection;
(c) Multiply the amount determined under (b) of this subsection by
the following:
(i) For the period June 10, 2004, through December 31, 2006, the
person's average tax rate for the calendar year for which the credit is
claimed;
(ii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2007, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 0.75 percent;
(iii) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2008, the greater
of the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.0 percent;
(iv) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2009, the greater of
the person's average tax rate for that calendar year or 1.25 percent;
(v) For the calendar year ending December 31, 2010, and thereafter,
1.50 percent.
For purposes of calculating the credit, if a person's reporting
period is less than annual, the person may use an estimated average tax
rate for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed by using the
person's average tax rate for each reporting period. A person who uses
an estimated average tax rate must make an adjustment to the total
credit claimed for the calendar year using the person's actual average
tax rate for the calendar year when the person files its last return
for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(3) Any person entitled to the credit provided in subsection (2) of
this section as a result of qualified research and development
conducted under contract may assign all or any portion of the credit to
the person contracting for the performance of the qualified research
and development.
(4) The credit, including any credit assigned to a person under
subsection (3) of this section, ((shall)) must be claimed against taxes
due for the same calendar year in which the qualified research and
development expenditures are incurred. The credit, including any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, for
each calendar year ((shall)) may not exceed the lesser of two million
dollars or the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
calendar year.
(5) For any person claiming the credit, including any credit
assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section, whose
research and development spending during the calendar year in which the
credit is claimed fails to exceed 0.92 percent of the person's taxable
amount during the same calendar year or who is otherwise ineligible,
the department ((shall)) must declare the taxes against which the
credit was claimed to be immediately due and payable. The department
((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the taxes against
which the credit was claimed. Interest ((shall)) must be assessed at
the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW,
retroactively to the date the credit was claimed, and ((shall)) accrues
until the taxes against which the credit was claimed are repaid. Any
credit assigned to a person under subsection (3) of this section that
is disallowed as a result of this section may be claimed by the person
who performed the qualified research and development subject to the
limitations set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(6)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b))) A person claiming the credit ((shall)) provided in this
section must file a complete annual survey with the department under
section 102 of this act. ((The survey is due by March 31st following
any year in which a credit is claimed. The department may extend the
due date for timely filing of annual surveys under this section as
provided in RCW 82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of the
tax credit claimed, the qualified research and development expenditures
during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the taxable
amount during the calendar year for which the credit is claimed, the
number of new products or research projects by general classification,
the number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with the
research and development activities for which a credit was claimed, and
whether the credit has been assigned under subsection (3) of this
section and who assigned the credit. The survey shall also include the
following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the tax credit program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d)(i) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax credit claimed, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax credit claimed is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request, except as provided in this
subsection (6)(d). If the amount of the tax credit as reported on the
survey is different than the amount actually claimed on the taxpayer's
tax returns or otherwise allowed by the department, the amount actually
claimed or allowed may be disclosed.
(ii) Persons for whom the actual amount of the tax credit claimed
on the taxpayer's returns or otherwise allowed by the department is
less than ten thousand dollars during the period covered by the survey
may request the department to treat the tax credit amount as
confidential under RCW 82.32.330.
(e) If a person fails to file a complete annual survey required
under this subsection with the department by the due date or any
extension under RCW 82.32.590, the person entitled to the credit
provided in subsection (2) of this section is not eligible to claim or
assign the credit provided in subsection (2) of this section in the
year the person failed to timely file a complete survey.
(7) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No
fewer than three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The
department shall report these statistics to the legislature each year
by September 1st.
(8) The department shall use the information from subsection (6) of
this section to study the tax credit program authorized under this
section. The department shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2009, and December 1, 2013. The reports shall measure the effect of
the program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(9))) (7) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Average tax rate" means a person's total tax liability under
this chapter for the calendar year for which the credit is claimed
divided by the taxpayer's total taxable amount under this chapter for
the calendar year for which the credit is claimed.
(b) "Qualified research and development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined under rules adopted by the
department, benefits, supplies, and computer expenses, directly
incurred in qualified research and development by a person claiming the
credit provided in this section. The term does not include amounts
paid to a person other than a public educational or research
institution to conduct qualified research and development. Nor does
the term include capital costs and overhead, such as expenses for land,
structures, or depreciable property.
(c) "Qualified research and development" shall have the same
meaning as in RCW 82.63.010.
(d) "Research and development spending" means qualified research
and development expenditures plus eighty percent of amounts paid to a
person other than a public educational or research institution to
conduct qualified research and development.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's
combined excise tax returns for the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, less any taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under
RCW 82.04.440.
(((10))) (8) This section expires January 1, 2015.

Sec. 115 RCW 82.04.4461 and 2008 c 81 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a)(i) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit
is allowed for each person for qualified aerospace product development.
For a person who is a manufacturer or processor for hire of commercial
airplanes or components of such airplanes, credit may be earned for
expenditures occurring after December 1, 2003. For all other persons,
credit may be earned only for expenditures occurring after June 30,
2008.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection, "commercial airplane" and
"component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, any credits earned under this section must
be accrued and carried forward and may not be used until July 1, 2005.
These carryover credits may be used at any time thereafter, and may be
carried over until used. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a
credit.
(2) The credit is equal to the amount of qualified aerospace
product development expenditures of a person, multiplied by the rate of
1.5 percent.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section the
credit ((shall)) must be ((taken)) claimed against taxes due for the
same calendar year in which the qualified aerospace product development
expenditures are incurred. Credit earned on or after July 1, 2005, may
not be carried over. The credit for each calendar year ((shall)) may
not exceed the amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter for the
calendar year. Refunds may not be granted in the place of a credit.
(4) Any person claiming the credit ((shall)) must file a form
prescribed by the department that ((shall)) must include the amount of
the credit claimed, an estimate of the anticipated aerospace product
development expenditures during the calendar year for which the credit
is claimed, an estimate of the taxable amount during the calendar year
for which the credit is claimed, and such additional information as the
department may prescribe.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Aerospace product" has the meaning given in RCW 82.08.975.
(b) "Aerospace product development" means research, design, and
engineering activities performed in relation to the development of an
aerospace product or of a product line, model, or model derivative of
an aerospace product, including prototype development, testing, and
certification. The term includes the discovery of technological
information, the translating of technological information into new or
improved products, processes, techniques, formulas, or inventions, and
the adaptation of existing products and models into new products or new
models, or derivatives of products or models. The term does not
include manufacturing activities or other production-oriented
activities, however the term does include tool design and engineering
design for the manufacturing process. The term does not include
surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market
research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service,
computer software developed for internal use, and research in areas
such as improved style, taste, and seasonal design.
(c) "Qualified aerospace product development" means aerospace
product development performed within this state.
(d) "Qualified aerospace product development expenditures" means
operating expenses, including wages, compensation of a proprietor or a
partner in a partnership as determined by the department, benefits,
supplies, and computer expenses, directly incurred in qualified
aerospace product development by a person claiming the credit provided
in this section. The term does not include amounts paid to a person or
to the state and any of its departments and institutions, other than a
public educational or research institution to conduct qualified
aerospace product development. The term does not include capital costs
and overhead, such as expenses for land, structures, or depreciable
property.
(e) "Taxable amount" means the taxable amount subject to the tax
imposed in this chapter required to be reported on the person's tax
returns during the year in which the credit is claimed, less any
taxable amount for which a credit is allowed under RCW 82.04.440.
(6) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section must file a
complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under ((RCW
82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(7) Credit may not be claimed for expenditures for which a credit
is claimed under RCW 82.04.4452.
(8) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 116 RCW 82.04.4463 and 2008 c 81 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for property taxes and leasehold excise taxes paid during the
calendar year.
(2) The credit is equal to:
(a)(i)(A) Property taxes paid on buildings, and land upon which the
buildings are located, constructed after December 1, 2003, and used
exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such
airplanes; and
(B) Leasehold excise taxes paid with respect to buildings
constructed after January 1, 2006, the land upon which the buildings
are located, or both, if the buildings are used exclusively in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes; and
(C) Property taxes or leasehold excise taxes paid on, or with
respect to, buildings constructed after June 30, 2008, the land upon
which the buildings are located, or both, and used exclusively for
aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling specifically
designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or their
components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not within
the scope of (a)(i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2) and are((: (I)
Engaged in manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components; or (II)))
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(11)(b), or 82.04.250(3); or
(ii) Property taxes attributable to an increase in assessed value
due to the renovation or expansion, after: (A) December 1, 2003, of a
building used exclusively in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes; and (B) June 30, 2008, of buildings used
exclusively for aerospace product development, manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
their components, or in providing aerospace services, by persons not
within the scope of (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (2) and are((: (I)
Engaged in manufacturing tooling specifically designed for use in
manufacturing commercial airplanes or their components; or (II)))
taxable under RCW 82.04.290(3), 82.04.260(11)(b), or 82.04.250(3); and
(b) An amount equal to:
(i)(A) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(11)(a), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after December 1, 2003;
(B) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(11)(b), on machinery and equipment exempt under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 and acquired after June 30, 2008; or
(C) Property taxes paid, by persons taxable under RCW
((82.04.0250(3) [82.04.250(3)])) 82.04.250(3) or 82.04.290(3), on
computer hardware, computer peripherals, and software exempt under RCW
82.08.975 or 82.12.975 and acquired after June 30, 2008.
(ii) For purposes of determining the amount eligible for credit
under (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection (2)(b), the amount of property
taxes paid is multiplied by a fraction.
(((I))) (A) The numerator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under RCW 82.04.260(11) (a) or (b) on
the applicable business activities of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, components of such airplanes, or tooling specifically
designed for use in the manufacturing of commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes.
(((II))) (B) The denominator of the fraction is the total taxable
amount subject to the tax imposed under all manufacturing
classifications in chapter 82.04 RCW.
(((III))) (C) For purposes of both the numerator and denominator of
the fraction, the total taxable amount refers to the total taxable
amount required to be reported on the person's returns for the calendar
year before the calendar year in which the credit under this section is
earned. The department may provide for an alternative method for
calculating the numerator in cases where the tax rate provided in RCW
82.04.260(11) for manufacturing was not in effect during the full
calendar year before the calendar year in which the credit under this
section is earned.
(((IV))) (D) No credit is available under (b)(i)(A) or (B) of this
subsection (2) if either the numerator or the denominator of the
fraction is zero. If the fraction is greater than or equal to nine-tenths, then the fraction is rounded to one.
(((V))) (E) As used in (((III))) (C) of this subsection
(2)(b)(ii)(((C))), "returns" means the tax returns for which the tax
imposed under this chapter is reported to the department.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(a) "Aerospace product development" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.4461.
(b) "Aerospace services" has the same meaning given in RCW
82.08.975.
(c) "Commercial airplane" and "component" have the same meanings as
provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(4) A credit earned during one calendar year may be carried over to
be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year, but
may not be carried over a second year. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(5) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section must file a
complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under ((RCW
82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 117 RCW 82.04.448 and 2003 c 149 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under RCW 82.04.240(2) for
persons engaged in the business of manufacturing semiconductor
materials. For the purposes of this section "semiconductor materials"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2)(a) The credit under this section ((shall)) equals three
thousand dollars for each employment position used in manufacturing
production that takes place in a new building exempt from sales and use
tax under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965. A credit is earned for the
calendar year a person fills a position. Additionally a credit is
earned for each year the position is maintained over the subsequent
consecutive years, up to eight years. Those positions that are not
filled for the entire year are eligible for fifty percent of the credit
if filled less than six months, and the entire credit if filled more
than six months.
(b) To qualify for the credit, the manufacturing activity of the
person must be conducted at a new building that qualifies for the
exemption from sales and use tax under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation,
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the person is eligible for credit for employment at the
existing building and new building, with the limitation that the
combined eligible employment not exceed full employment at the new
building. "Full employment" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.965.
The credit may not be earned until the commencement of commercial
production, as that term is used in RCW 82.08.965.
(3) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person is
subject to all of the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In no case
may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried over to be
credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(4) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall))
must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be)) is retroactive to the date the tax
credit was taken, and ((shall)) accrues until the taxes for which a
credit has been used are repaid.
(5) A person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section must
file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act.
(6) Credits may be ((taken)) claimed after twelve years after the
effective date of this act, for those buildings at which commercial
production began before twelve years after the effective date of this
act, subject to all of the eligibility criteria and limitations of this
section.
(7) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 118 RCW 82.04.4481 and 2006 c 182 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all property taxes paid during the calendar year on
property owned by a direct service industrial customer and reasonably
necessary for the purposes of an aluminum smelter.
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the credit under this section is
subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned
during one calendar year may be carried over to be credited against
taxes incurred in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried
over a second year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax
liability before new credits. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for property
taxes levied for collection in 2012 and thereafter.
(4) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual report with the department under section 103 of this
act.

Sec. 119 RCW 82.04.4483 and 2004 c 25 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of manufacturing
computer software or programming, as those terms are defined in this
section.
(2) A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one
rural county to another rural county is eligible for any new qualifying
employment positions created as a result of the relocation but is not
eligible to receive credit for the jobs moved from one county to the
other.
(3)(a) To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the
person must be conducted in a rural county and the new qualified
employment position must be located in the rural county.
(b) If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and
outside of a rural county, the credit is available if at least ninety
percent of the qualifying activity is conducted within a rural county.
If the qualifying activity is a service taxable activity, the place
where the work is performed is the place at which the activity is
conducted.
(4)(a) The credit under this section shall equal one thousand
dollars for each new qualified employment position created after
January 1, 2004, in an eligible area. A credit is earned for the
calendar year the person is hired to fill the position. Additionally
a credit is earned for each year the position is maintained over the
subsequent consecutive years, up to four years. The county must meet
the definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled.
If the county does not have a rural county status the following year or
years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.
(b) Participants who claimed credit under RCW 82.04.4456 for
qualified employment positions created before December 31, 2003, are
eligible to earn credit for each year the position is maintained over
the subsequent consecutive years, for up to four years, which four
years include any years claimed under RCW 82.04.4456. Those persons
who did not receive a credit under RCW 82.04.4456 before December 31,
2003, are not eligible to earn credit for qualified employment
positions created before December 31, 2003.
(c) Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new qualified
employment positions created on or after January 1, 2004. New
qualified employment positions filled by existing employees are
eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated
by the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is
a sole proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one
employee position and this type of business is eligible to receive
credit for one position.
(d) If a position is filled before July 1st, the position is
eligible for the full yearly credit for that calendar year. If it is
filled after June 30th, the position is eligible for half of the credit
for that calendar year.
(5) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. This information includes information relating to
description of qualifying activity conducted in the rural county and
outside the rural county by the person as well as detailed records on
positions and employees.
(6) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been claimed ((shall be)) is immediately due. The
department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall))
must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be assessed)) applies retroactively to the
date the tax credit was taken, and ((shall accrue)) accrues until the
taxes for which a credit has been used are repaid.
(7) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. A person is not eligible to receive a
credit under this section if the person is receiving credit for the
same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW 82.04.44525 or is taking
a credit under this chapter for information technology help desk
services conducted from a rural county. No refunds may be granted for
credits under this section.
(8) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the successive credits are available to the successor for
remaining periods in the five years only if the eligibility conditions
of this section are met.
(9) A person ((taking)) claiming a tax credit((s)) under this
section ((shall make an)) must file a complete annual ((report to))
survey with the department under section 102 of this act. ((The report
shall be in a letter form and shall include the following information:
Number of positions for which credit is being claimed, type of position
for which credit is being claimed, type of activity in which the person
is engaged in the county, how long the person has been located in the
county, and taxpayer name and registration number. The report must be
filed by January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed during
the previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in the
loss of eligibility under this section. However, the department,
through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not
filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.))
(10) As used in this section:
(a) "Computer software" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215
after June 30, 2004, and includes "software" as defined in RCW
82.04.215 before July 1, 2004.
(b) "Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under RCW
82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers
and processors for hire.
(c) "Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of computer software, as that term is defined in this
chapter, and that are taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as
a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.
(d) "Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of computer software
or programming.
(e) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
position doing programming of computer software or manufacturing of
computer software. This excludes administrative, professional,
service, executive, and other similar positions. If an employee is
either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from employment, the
employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis if the
employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a
week.
(f) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(11) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or
after January 1, 2011.
(((12) This section expires January 1, 2011.))

Sec. 120 RCW 82.04.4484 and 2004 c 25 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit
is authorized against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for
persons engaged in a rural county in the business of providing
information technology help desk services to third parties.
(2) To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be
conducted from a rural county.
(3) The amount of the tax credit for persons engaged in the
activity of providing information technology help desk services in
rural counties ((shall be)) is equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing
the services from the rural county. In order to qualify for the credit
under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of rural
county at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county.
(4) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. These records include information relating to
description of activity engaged in a rural county by the person.
(5) If at any time the department finds that a person is not
eligible for tax credit under this section, the amount of taxes for
which a credit has been used is immediately due. The department
((shall)) must assess interest, but not penalties, on the credited
taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest ((shall))
must be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, ((shall be assessed)) retroactively to the date the
tax credit was taken, and ((shall)) will accrue until the taxes for
which a credit has been used are repaid.
(6) The credit under this section may be used against any tax due
under this chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one
calendar year be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred in
a subsequent calendar year. No refunds may be granted for credits
under this section.
(7) Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility.
However, the credit is available to the successor only if the
eligibility conditions of this section are met.
(8) A person ((taking)) claiming a tax credit((s)) under this
section ((shall make an)) must file a complete annual ((report to))
survey with the department under section 102 of this act. ((The report
shall be in a letter form and shall include the following information:
Type of activity in which the person is engaged in the county, number
of employees in the rural county, how long the person has been located
in the county, and taxpayer name and registration number. The report
must be filed by January 30th of each year for which credit was claimed
during the previous year. Failure to file a report will not result in
the loss of eligibility under this section. However, the department,
through its research division, shall contact taxpayers who have not
filed the report and obtain the data from the taxpayer or assist the
taxpayer in the filing of the report, so that the data and information
necessary to measure the program's effectiveness is maintained.))
(9) As used in this section:
(a) "Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:
(i) Software and hardware maintenance;
(ii) Software and hardware diagnostics and troubleshooting;
(iii) Software and hardware installation;
(iv) Software and hardware repair;
(v) Software and hardware information and training; and
(vi) Software and hardware upgrade.
(b) "Rural county" means the same as in RCW 82.14.370.
(10) This section expires January 1, 2011.

Sec. 121 RCW 82.04.449 and 2009 c 296 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for participants in the Washington customized employment
training program created in RCW 28B.67.020. The credit allowed under
this section is equal to fifty percent of the value of a participant's
payments to the employment training finance account created in RCW
28B.67.030. If a participant in the program does not meet the
requirements of RCW 28B.67.020(2)(b)(ii), the participant must remit to
the department the value of any credits taken plus interest. The
credit earned by a participant in one calendar year may be carried over
to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year.
No credit may be allowed for repayment of training allowances received
from the Washington customized employment training program on or after
July 1, 2016.
(2) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of this
act.

Sec. 122 RCW 82.08.805 and 2009 c 535 s 513 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for personal
property used at an aluminum smelter, tangible personal property that
will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or
other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services
rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal
property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax
in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. A person
claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then take a credit equal
to the state share of retail sales tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. The
person ((shall)) must submit information, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of qualifying
purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the
amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) A person claiming the tax preference provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2012.

Sec. 123 RCW 82.08.965 and 2003 c 149 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
constructing of new buildings used for the manufacturing of
semiconductor materials, to sales of tangible personal property that
will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings
during the course of the constructing, or to labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, during the course of constructing,
building fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) To be eligible under this section the manufacturer or processor
for hire must meet the following requirements for an eight-year period,
such period beginning the day the new building commences commercial
production, or a portion of tax otherwise due ((shall)) will be
immediately due and payable pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The manufacturer or processor for hire must maintain at least
seventy-five percent of full employment at the new building for which
the exemption under this section is claimed.
(b) Before commencing commercial production at a new facility the
manufacturer or processor for hire must meet with the department to
review projected employment levels in the new buildings. The
department, using information provided by the taxpayer, ((shall)) must
make a determination of the number of positions that would be filled at
full employment. This number ((shall)) must be used throughout the
eight-year period to determine whether any tax is to be repaid. This
information is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(c) In those situations where a production building in existence on
the effective date of this section will be phased out of operation
during which time employment at the new building at the same site is
increased, the manufacturer or processor for hire ((shall)) must
maintain seventy-five percent of full employment at the manufacturing
site overall.
(d) No application is necessary for the tax exemption. The person
is subject to all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A person
((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section must file a
complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act.
(3) If the employment requirement is not met for any one calendar
year, one-eighth of the exempt sales and use taxes ((shall)) will be
due and payable by April 1st of the following year. The department
((shall)) must assess interest to the date the tax was imposed, but not
penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not eligible.
(4) The exemption applies to new buildings, or parts of buildings,
that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of semiconductor
materials, including the storage of raw materials and finished product.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Commencement of commercial production" is deemed to have
occurred when the equipment and process qualifications in the new
building are completed and production for sale has begun; and
(b) "Full employment" is the number of positions required for full
capacity production at the new building, for positions such as line
workers, engineers, and technicians.
(c) "Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.240(2).
(6) No exemption may be taken after twelve years after the
effective date of this act, however all of the eligibility criteria and
limitations are applicable to any exemptions claimed before that date.
(7) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 124 RCW 82.08.9651 and 2009 c 469 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire in the
production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is limited to
gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow the product,
deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the product, to etch
or remove material from the product, to anneal the product, to immerse
the product, to clean the product, and other such uses whereby the
gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the product during
the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals to clean the
chambers and other like equipment in which such processing takes place.
For the purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials" has the
meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.5351)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires ((twelve years after)) December 1,
((2006)) 2018.

Sec. 125 RCW 82.08.970 and 2003 c 149 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for
hire in the manufacturing of semiconductor materials. This exemption
is limited to gases and chemicals used in the manufacturing process to
grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on
the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the manufacturing process, or uses of gases and
chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such
processing takes place. For the purposes of this section,
"semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
82.04.240(2).
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 126 RCW 82.08.980 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
constructing of new buildings by a manufacturer engaged in the
manufacturing of superefficient airplanes or by a port district, to be
leased to a manufacturer engaged in the manufacturing of superefficient
airplanes, to sales of tangible personal property that will be
incorporated as an ingredient or component of such buildings during the
course of the constructing, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b). The exemption is available only when the buyer
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller ((shall)) must retain a copy
of the certificate for the seller's files.
(2) No application is necessary for the tax exemption in this
section, however in order to qualify under this section before starting
construction the port district must have entered into an agreement with
the manufacturer to build such a facility. A person ((taking))
claiming the exemption under this section is subject to all the
requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. In addition, the person must file
a complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under
((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(3) The exemption in this section applies to buildings, or parts of
buildings, that are used exclusively in the manufacturing of
superefficient airplanes, including buildings used for the storage of
raw materials and finished product.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "superefficient airplane" has
the meaning given in RCW 82.32.550.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 127 RCW 82.12.022 and 2006 c 182 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from)) A
use tax is levied on every person in this state ((a use tax)) for the
privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas within this state as
a consumer.
(2) The tax ((shall)) must be levied and collected in an amount
equal to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by
the rate in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution
businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does
not include any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas
distribution business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(((7))) (2) in
transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if those
amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.
(3) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other
means than through a pipeline.
(4) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to
the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas
for which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(5)(a) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to
the use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that
term is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2012.
(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5)
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(6) There ((shall be)) is a credit against the tax levied under
this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by
another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought
under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect
to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(7) The use tax ((hereby)) imposed ((shall)) in this section must
be paid by the consumer to the department.
(8) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who
delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the
department. Such report ((shall)) must contain the volume of gas
delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other
information as the department ((shall)) may require by rule.
(9) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384,
Laws of 1989.

Sec. 128 RCW 82.12.805 and 2009 c 535 s 620 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under RCW 82.12.020 for personal
property used at an aluminum smelter, or for tangible personal property
that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or
other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services
rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal
property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax
in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. The amount of
the credit ((shall be)) equals ((to)) the state share of use tax
computed to be due under RCW 82.12.020. The person ((shall)) must
submit information, in a form and manner prescribed by the department,
specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which
the exemption is claimed and the amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under section
103 of this act.
(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2012.

Sec. 129 RCW 82.12.965 and 2003 c 149 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings used for the manufacturing of
semiconductor materials during the course of constructing such
buildings or to labor and services rendered in respect to installing,
during the course of constructing, building fixtures not otherwise
eligible for the exemption under RCW 82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
RCW 82.08.965 apply to this section, including the filing of a complete
annual report with the department under section 103 of this act.
(3) No exemption may be taken twelve years after the effective date
of this act, however all of the eligibility criteria and limitations
are applicable to any exemptions claimed before that date.
(4) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 130 RCW 82.12.9651 and 2009 c 469 s 503 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the production of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the production process to grow
the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on the
product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the production process, or uses of gases and chemicals
to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such processing
takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor materials"
has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.2404 and 82.04.294(3).
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.5351)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires ((twelve years after)) December 1,
((2006)) 2018.

Sec. 131 RCW 82.12.970 and 2003 c 149 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of gases and chemicals used by a manufacturer or processor for hire
in the manufacturing of semiconductor materials. This exemption is
limited to gases and chemicals used in the manufacturing process to
grow the product, deposit or grow permanent or sacrificial layers on
the product, to etch or remove material from the product, to anneal the
product, to immerse the product, to clean the product, and other such
uses whereby the gases and chemicals come into direct contact with the
product during the manufacturing process, or uses of gases and
chemicals to clean the chambers and other like equipment in which such
processing takes place. For purposes of this section, "semiconductor
materials" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2) A person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under ((RCW
82.32.535)) section 103 of this act. No application is necessary for
the tax exemption. The person is subject to all of the requirements of
chapter 82.32 RCW.
(3) This section expires twelve years after the effective date of
this act.

Sec. 132 RCW 82.12.980 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of tangible personal property that will be incorporated as an
ingredient or component of new buildings by a manufacturer engaged in
the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes or owned by a port
district and to be leased to a manufacturer engaged in the
manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, during the course of
constructing such buildings, or to labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, during the course of constructing, building
fixtures not otherwise eligible for the exemption under RCW
82.08.02565(2)(b).
(2) The eligibility requirements, conditions, and definitions in
RCW 82.08.980 apply to this section, including the filing of a complete
annual report with the department under section 103 of this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 133 RCW 82.16.0421 and 2009 c 434 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business" means a person
who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average megawatts
of electricity per month in a chlor-alkali electrolytic process to
split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water to make
chlorine and sodium hydroxide. A "chlor-alkali electrolytic processing
business" does not include direct service industrial customers or their
subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power from the
Bonneville power administration as of June 10, 2004.
(b) "Sodium chlorate electrolytic processing business" means a
person who is engaged in a business that uses more than ten average
megawatts of electricity per month in a sodium chlorate electrolytic
process to split the electrochemical bonds of sodium chloride and water
to make sodium chlorate and hydrogen. A "sodium chlorate electrolytic
processing business" does not include direct service industrial
customers or their subsidiaries that contract for the purchase of power
from the Bonneville power administration as of June 10, 2004.
(2) Effective July 1, 2004, the tax levied under this chapter does
not apply to sales of electricity made by a light and power business to
a chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business or a sodium chlorate
electrolytic processing business for the electrolytic process if the
contract for sale of electricity to the business contains the following
terms:
(a) The electricity to be used in the electrolytic process is
separately metered from the electricity used for general operations of
the business;
(b) The price charged for the electricity used in the electrolytic
process will be reduced by an amount equal to the tax exemption
available to the light and power business under this section; and
(c) Disallowance of all or part of the exemption under this section
is a breach of contract and the damages to be paid by the chlor-alkali
electrolytic processing business or the sodium chlorate electrolytic
processing business are the amount of the tax exemption disallowed.
(3) The exemption provided for in this section does not apply to
amounts received from the remarketing or resale of electricity
originally obtained by contract for the electrolytic process.
(4) In order to claim an exemption under this section, the chlor-alkali electrolytic processing business or the sodium chlorate
electrolytic processing business must provide the light and power
business with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed
by the department.
(5) A person receiving the benefit of the exemption provided in
this section must file a complete annual report with the department
under section 103 of this act.
(6)(a) This section does not apply to sales of electricity made
after December 31, 2018.
(b) This section expires June 30, 2019.

Sec. 134 RCW 82.29A.137 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 13 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) All leasehold interests in port district facilities exempt from
tax under RCW 82.08.980 or 82.12.980 and used by a manufacturer engaged
in the manufacturing of superefficient airplanes, as defined in RCW
82.32.550, are exempt from tax under this chapter. A person ((taking))
claiming the credit under RCW 82.04.4463 is not eligible for the
exemption under this section.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section must file
a complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under
((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2024.

Sec. 135 RCW 82.32.590 and 2009 c 461 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under section 102 of this act or annual report under
((RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.650, 82.32.630, 82.32.610,
82.82.020, 82.32.632, or 82.74.040)) section 103 of this act by the due
date was the result of circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer, the department ((shall)) must extend the time for filing the
survey or report. Such extension ((shall)) must be for a period of
thirty days from the date the department issues its written
notification to the taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under
this section. The department may grant additional extensions as it
deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
((shall)) must be guided by rules adopted by the department for the
waiver or cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely
payment of any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
taxpayer.

Sec. 136 RCW 82.32.600 and 2009 c 461 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Persons required to file annual surveys or annual reports under
((RCW 82.04.4452, 82.32.5351, 82.32.545, 82.32.610, 82.32.630,
82.82.020, 82.32.632, or 82.74.040)) section 102 or 103 of this act
must electronically file with the department all surveys, reports,
returns, and any other forms or information the department requires in
an electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As
used in this section, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in RCW
82.32.050.
(2) Any survey, report, return, or any other form or information
required to be filed in an electronic format under subsection (1) of
this section is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format.
(3) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
subsection (1) of this section for good cause shown.

Sec. 137 RCW 82.32.710 and 2006 c 301 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A client under the terms of a professional employer agreement
is deemed to be the sole employer of a covered employee for purposes of
eligibility for any tax credit, exemption, or other tax incentive,
arising as the result of the employment of covered employees, provided
in RCW 82.04.4333, 82.04.44525, 82.04.448, 82.04.4483, 82.08.965,
82.12.965, 82.16.0495, or 82.60.049 or chapter 82.62 or 82.70 RCW, or
any other provision in this title. A client, and not the professional
employer organization, ((shall be)) is entitled to the benefit of any
tax credit, exemption, or other tax incentive arising as the result of
the employment of covered employees of that client.
(2) A client under the terms of a professional employer agreement
is deemed to be the sole employer of a covered employee for purposes of
reports or surveys that require the reporting of employment information
relating to covered employees of the client, as provided in ((RCW
82.04.4452, 82.04.4483, 82.04.4484, 82.32.535, 82.32.540, 82.32.545,
82.32.560, 82.32.570, 82.32.610, 82.32.620, 82.60.070, 82.62.050,
82.63.020, or 82.74.040, or any other provision in this title)) section
102 or 103 of this act. A client, and not the professional employer
organization, ((shall be)) is required to complete any survey or report
that requires the reporting of employment information relating to
covered employees of that client.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "client," "covered employee,"
"professional employer agreement," and "professional employer
organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 82.04.540.

Sec. 138 RCW 82.60.020 and 2006 c 142 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(3) "Eligible area" means a rural county as defined in RCW
82.14.370.
(4)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment project in
an eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under RCW 82.60.070; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(c) "Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of
an investment project undertaken by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010(((5))) (4), other than that portion of a
cogeneration project that is used to generate power for consumption
within the manufacturing site of which the cogeneration project is an
integral part, or investment projects which have already received
deferrals under this chapter.
(5) "Initiation of construction" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.63.010.
(6) "Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings
or qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services
rendered in the planning, installation, and construction of the
project.
(((6))) (7) "Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW
82.04.120. "Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the
production of computer software, and other computer-related services,
the activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories, and the conditioning of vegetable
seeds.
(((7))) (8) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(((8))) (9) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new
structures, and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the
purpose of increasing floor space or production capacity used for
manufacturing and research and development activities, including plant
offices and warehouses or other facilities for the storage of raw
material or finished goods if such facilities are an essential or an
integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory used for
manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used
partly for manufacturing or research and development and partly for
other purposes, the applicable tax deferral ((shall)) must be
determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(((9))) (10) "Qualified employment position" means a permanent
full-time employee employed in the eligible investment project during
the entire tax year. The term "entire tax year" means a full-time
position that is filled for a period of twelve consecutive months. The
term "full-time" means at least thirty-five hours a week, four hundred
fifty-five hours a quarter, or one thousand eight hundred twenty hours
a year.
(((10))) (11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new
industrial and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities
that are an integral and necessary part of a manufacturing or research
and development operation. "Qualified machinery and equipment"
includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment; laboratory
equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and
moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures; and all
equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(((11))) (12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral
under this chapter.
(((12))) (13) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product,
service, or process before commercial sales have begun. As used in
this subsection, "commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or
sales for market testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of
the product, service, or process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec. 139 RCW 82.60.070 and 2004 c 25 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) ((The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b))) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this
chapter ((after June 30, 1994, shall)) must file a complete ((an))
annual survey with the department under section 102 of this act. If
the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as
provided in RCW 82.60.020(4), the lessee ((shall agree to)) must file
a complete ((the)) annual survey, and the applicant is not required to
file a complete ((the)) annual survey. ((The survey is due by March
31st of the year following the calendar year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally
complete and the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey shall
include the amount of tax deferred, the number of new products or
research projects by general classification, and the number of
trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with activities at the
investment project. The survey shall also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(f))) (b) The department ((shall also)) must use the information
reported on the annual survey required by this section to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department
((shall)) must report to the legislature by December 1, 2009. The
report ((shall)) must measure the effect of the program on job
creation, the number of jobs created for residents of eligible areas,
company growth, the introduction of new products, the diversification
of the state's economy, growth in research and development investment,
the movement of firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into
the state, and such other factors as the department selects.
(2)(((a))) If, on the basis of a survey under ((this)) section 102
of this act or other information, the department finds that an
investment project is not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter,
the amount of deferred taxes outstanding for the project ((shall be))
is immediately due.
(((b) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under subsection (1) of this section by the date due,
twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax shall be immediately
due. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee
as provided in RCW 82.60.020(4), the lessee shall be responsible for
payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.))
(3) ((Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section,
deferred taxes need not be repaid on machinery and equipment for lumber
and wood products industries, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, of the type which qualifies for exemption under RCW
82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 to the extent the taxes have not been repaid
before July 1, 1995)) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under
subsection (2) of this section because the department has found that an
investment project is not eligible for tax deferral under this chapter
is no longer required to file annual surveys under section 102 of this
act beginning on the date an investment project is used for
nonqualifying purposes.
(4) Notwithstanding any other ((subsection)) provision of this
section or section 102 of this act, deferred taxes on the following
need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 140 RCW 82.63.020 and 2009 c 268 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be
made before initiation of construction of, or acquisition of equipment
or machinery for the investment project. In the case of an investment
project involving multiple qualified buildings, applications must be
made for, and before the initiation of construction of, each qualified
building. The application ((shall)) must be made to the department in
a form and manner prescribed by the department. The application
((shall)) must contain information regarding the location of the
investment project, the applicant's average employment in the state for
the prior year, estimated or actual new employment related to the
project, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the project,
estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion and operation,
and other information required by the department. The department
((shall)) must rule on the application within sixty days.
(2)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for)) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes under
this chapter ((shall)) must file a complete ((an)) annual survey with
the department under section 102 of this act. If the economic benefits
of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee ((shall)) must file a complete ((the)) annual survey, and
the applicant is not required to ((complete)) file the annual survey.
((The survey is due by March 31st of the year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
having been operationally complete and the seven succeeding calendar
years. The survey shall include the amount of tax deferred, the number
of new products or research projects by general classification, and the
number of trademarks, patents, and copyrights associated with
activities at the investment project. The survey shall also include
the following information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(4))) (3) The department ((shall)) must use the information
reported on the annual survey required by this section to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department
((shall)) must report to the legislature by December 1, 2009, and
December 1, 2013. The reports ((shall)) must measure the effect of the
program on job creation, the number of jobs created for Washington
residents, company growth, the introduction of new products, the
diversification of the state's economy, growth in research and
development investment, the movement of firms or the consolidation of
firms' operations into the state, and such other factors as the
department selects.
(4) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW 82.63.045
because the department has found that an investment project is used for
purposes other than research and development performed within this
state in the fields of advanced computing, advanced materials,
biotechnology, electronic device technology, and environmental
technology is no longer required to file annual surveys under section
102 of this act beginning on the date an investment project is used for
nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 141 RCW 82.63.045 and 2009 c 268 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.63.020))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is used for purposes other than qualified
research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any time
during the calendar year in which the investment project is certified
by the department as having been operationally completed, or at any
time during any of the seven succeeding calendar years, a portion of
deferred taxes ((shall be)) is immediately due according to the
following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) ((If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.63.020 by the date due, 12.5 percent of
the deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has
received the economic benefit.
(c) If an investment project is used for purposes other than
qualified research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any
time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified as having been operationally complete and the recipient of
the deferral fails to complete the annual survey due under RCW
82.63.020, the portion of deferred taxes immediately due is the amount
on the schedule in (a) of this subsection.)) If the economic benefits
of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.63.010(7),
the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has
received the economic benefit.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, in the case
of an investment project consisting of multiple qualified buildings,
the lessee is solely liable for payment of any deferred tax determined
by the department to be due and payable under this section beginning on
the date the department certifies that the project is operationally
complete.
(b) This subsection does not relieve the lessors of its obligation
to the lessee under RCW 82.63.010(7) to pass the economic benefit of
the deferral to the lessee.
(4) The department ((shall)) must assess interest at the rate
provided for delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the
date of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished
by insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section or section 102
of this act, deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 142 RCW 82.74.040 and 2006 c 354 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b))) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this
chapter ((shall)) must file a complete ((an)) annual survey with the
department under section 102 of this act. If the economic benefits of
the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.74.010(6),
the lessee ((shall)) must file a complete ((the)) annual survey, and
the applicant is not required to ((complete)) file the annual survey.
((The survey is due by March 31st of the year following the calendar
year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
having been operationally complete and each of the seven succeeding
calendar years. The department may extend the due date for timely
filing of annual surveys under this section as provided in RCW
82.32.590. The survey shall include the amount of tax deferred. The
survey shall also include the following information for employment
positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330. Information on the amount of tax deferral taken is not
subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be
disclosed to the public upon request.
(e) The department shall use the information from this section to
prepare summary descriptive statistics by category. No fewer than
three taxpayers shall be included in any category. The department
shall report these statistics to the legislature each year by September
1st.
(f) The department shall also use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department shall
report to the legislature by December 1, 2011. The report shall
measure the effect of the program on job creation, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects.
(2)(a) If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under subsection (1) of this section by the date due or
any extension under RCW 82.32.590, twelve and one-half percent of the
deferred tax shall be immediately due. If the economic benefits of the
deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.74.010(6), the
lessee shall be responsible for payment to the extent the lessee has
received the economic benefit. The department shall assess interest,
but not penalties, on the amounts due under this section. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, and shall accrue until the amounts due are repaid.
(b))) (2) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW
82.74.050(2) because the department has found that an investment
project is used for purposes other than fresh fruit and vegetable
processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product manufacturing,
cold storage warehousing, or research and development is no longer
required to file annual surveys under ((this)) section 102 of this act
beginning on the date an investment project is used for nonqualifying
purposes.

Sec. 143 RCW 82.74.050 and 2006 c 354 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.74.040))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is used for purposes other than fresh fruit and
vegetable processing, dairy product manufacturing, seafood product
manufacturing, cold storage warehousing, or research and development at
any time during the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as having been operationally completed, or
at any time during any of the seven succeeding calendar years, a
portion of deferred taxes ((shall be)) is immediately due according to
the following schedule:

Year in which nonqualifying use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee
as provided in RCW 82.74.010(6), the lessee is responsible for payment
to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3) The department ((shall)) must assess interest, but not
penalties, on the deferred taxes under subsection (2) of this section.
The interest ((shall)) must be assessed at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, retroactively to the date of
deferral, and ((shall)) will accrue until the deferred taxes are
repaid. The debt for deferred taxes will not be extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer of ownership
does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is transferred, subject
to the successor meeting the eligibility requirements of this chapter,
for the remaining periods of the deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section or section 102
of this act, deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 144 A new section is added to chapter 82.75
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes granted under this
chapter must file a complete annual survey with the department under
section 102 of this act. If the economic benefits of the deferral are
passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.75.010(5), the lessee must
file a complete annual survey, and the applicant is not required to
file the annual survey.
(2) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW
82.75.040(2) because the department has found that an investment
project is used for purposes other than qualified biotechnology product
manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities is no longer
required to file annual surveys under section 102 of this act beginning
on the date an investment project is used for nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 145 RCW 82.75.010 and 2009 c 549 s 1033 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under
this chapter.
(2) "Biotechnology" means a technology based on the science of
biology, microbiology, molecular biology, cellular biology,
biochemistry, or biophysics, or any combination of these, and includes,
but is not limited to, recombinant DNA techniques, genetics and genetic
engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses, using living
organisms, or parts of organisms.
(3) "Biotechnology product" means any virus, therapeutic serum,
antibody, protein, toxin, antitoxin, vaccine, blood, blood component or
derivative, allergenic product, or analogous product produced through
the application of biotechnology that is used in the prevention,
treatment, or cure of diseases or injuries to humans.
(4) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(5)(a) "Eligible investment project" means an investment in
qualified buildings or qualified machinery and equipment, including
labor and services rendered in the planning, installation, and
construction of the project.
(b) The lessor or owner of a qualified building is not eligible for
a deferral unless:
(i) The underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and
equipment vests exclusively in the same person; or
(ii)(A) The lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the deferral to the lessee;
(B) The lessee that receives the economic benefit of the deferral
agrees in writing with the department to complete the annual survey
required under ((RCW 82.32.645)) section 144 of this act; and
(C) The economic benefit of the deferral passed to the lessee is no
less than the amount of tax deferred by the lessor and is evidenced by
written documentation of any type of payment, credit, or other
financial arrangement between the lessor or owner of the qualified
building and the lessee.
(6)(a) "Initiation of construction" means the date that a building
permit is issued under the building code adopted under RCW 19.27.031
for:
(i) Construction of the qualified building, if the underlying
ownership of the building vests exclusively with the person receiving
the economic benefit of the deferral;
(ii) Construction of the qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section; or
(iii) Tenant improvements for a qualified building, if the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
subsection (5)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(b) "Initiation of construction" does not include soil testing,
site clearing and grading, site preparation, or any other related
activities that are initiated before the issuance of a building permit
for the construction of the foundation of the building.
(c) If the investment project is a phased project, "initiation of
construction" ((shall apply)) applies separately to each phase.
(7) "Manufacturing" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.120.
(8) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar or
related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is
designed or developed and:
(a) Recognized in the national formulary, or the United States
pharmacopeia, or any supplement to them;
(b) Intended for use in the diagnosis of disease, or in the cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease or other conditions in
human beings or other animals; or
(c) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
human beings or other animals, and which does not achieve any of its
primary intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body
of human beings or other animals and which is not dependent upon being
metabolized for the achievement of any of its principal intended
purposes.
(9) "Person" has the meaning provided in RCW 82.04.030.
(10) "Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures,
and expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of
increasing floor space or production capacity used for biotechnology
product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing activities,
including plant offices, commercial laboratories for process
development, quality assurance and quality control, and warehouses or
other facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if
the facilities are an essential or an integral part of a factory,
plant, or laboratory used for biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing. If a building is used partly for
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing and
partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral ((shall)) must
be determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules
adopted by the department.
(11) "Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial
and research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an
integral and necessary part of a biotechnology product manufacturing or
medical device manufacturing operation. "Qualified machinery and
equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing equipment;
laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such as belts, pulleys,
shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating structures;
and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.
(12) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

Sec. 146 RCW 82.75.020 and 2006 c 178 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter must be made
((and approved)) before initiation of the construction of the
investment project or acquisition of equipment or machinery. The
application ((shall)) must be made to the department in a form and
manner prescribed by the department. The application ((shall)) must
contain information regarding the location of the investment project,
the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year,
estimated or actual new employment related to the project, estimated or
actual wages of employees related to the project, estimated or actual
costs, time schedules for completion and operation, and other
information required by the department. The department ((shall)) must
rule on the application within sixty days.

Sec. 147 RCW 82.75.040 and 2006 c 178 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and ((RCW
82.32.645)) section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter
need not be repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.32.645))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is used for purposes other than qualified
biotechnology product manufacturing or medical device manufacturing
activities at any time during the calendar year in which the eligible
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes ((shall be)) is
immediately due and payable according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) ((If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.32.645 by the date due, the amount of
deferred tax specified in RCW 82.32.645(6) shall be immediately due and
payable.)) If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a
lessee as provided in RCW 82.75.010, the lessee is responsible for
payment to the extent the lessee has received the economic benefit.
(3) For a violation of subsection (2)(a) of this section, the
department ((shall)) must assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral. The debt for deferred taxes ((shall)) will not be
extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient. Transfer
of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The deferral is
transferred, subject to the successor meeting the eligibility
requirements of this chapter, for the remaining periods of the
deferral.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section or section 102
of this act, deferred taxes on the following need not be repaid:
(a) Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor
and services, which at the time of purchase would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.08.02565; and
(b) Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would
have qualified for exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

Sec. 148 RCW 82.82.020 and 2008 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application for deferral of taxes under this chapter can be
made at any time prior to completion of construction of a qualified
building or buildings, but tax liability incurred prior to the
department's receipt of an application may not be deferred. The
application must be made to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The application must contain information
regarding the location of the investment project, the applicant's
average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated or actual
new employment related to the project, estimated or actual wages of
employees related to the project, estimated or actual costs, time
schedules for completion and operation, and other information required
by the department. The department must rule on the application within
sixty days.
(2)(((a) The legislature finds that accountability and
effectiveness are important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to
make policy choices regarding the best use of limited state resources
the legislature needs information on how a tax incentive is used.
(b) Applicants for deferral of taxes under this chapter must agree
to complete an annual survey. If the economic benefits of the deferral
are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW 82.82.010(5), the lessee must
agree to complete the annual survey and the applicant is not required
to complete the annual survey. The survey is due by March 31st of the
year following the calendar year in which the investment project is
certified by the department as having been operationally complete and
the seven succeeding calendar years. The survey must include the
amount of tax deferred. The survey must also include the following
information for employment positions in Washington:
(i) The number of total employment positions;
(ii) Full-time, part-time, and temporary employment positions as a
percent of total employment;
(iii) The number of employment positions according to the following
wage bands: Less than thirty thousand dollars; thirty thousand dollars
or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; and sixty thousand
dollars or greater. A wage band containing fewer than three
individuals may be combined with another wage band; and
(iv) The number of employment positions that have employer-provided
medical, dental, and retirement benefits, by each of the wage bands.
(c) The department may request additional information necessary to
measure the results of the deferral program, to be submitted at the
same time as the survey.
(d) All information collected under this subsection, except the
amount of the tax deferral taken, is deemed taxpayer information under
RCW 82.32.330 and is not disclosable. Information on the amount of tax
deferral taken is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(3) The department must use the information to study the tax
deferral program authorized under this chapter. The department must
report to the legislature by December 1, 2014, and December 1, 2018.
The reports must measure the effect of the program on job creation, the
number of jobs created for Washington residents, company growth, the
introduction of new products, the diversification of the state's
economy, growth in research and development investment, the movement of
firms or the consolidation of firms' operations into the state, and
such other factors as the department selects. If fewer than three
deferrals are granted under this chapter, the department may not report
statistical information.
(4))) Applications for deferral of taxes under this section may not
be made after December 31, 2020.
(3) Each recipient of a deferral of taxes under this chapter must
file a complete annual survey with the department under section 102 of
this act. If the economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a
lessee as provided in RCW 82.82.010(5), the lessee must file a complete
annual survey, and the applicant is not required to file the annual
survey.
(4) A recipient who must repay deferred taxes under RCW 82.82.040
because the department has found that an investment project is no
longer an eligible investment project is no longer required to file
annual surveys under section 102 of this act beginning on the date an
investment project is used for nonqualifying purposes.

Sec. 149 RCW 82.82.040 and 2008 c 15 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and
section 102 of this act, taxes deferred under this chapter need not be
repaid.
(2)(a) If, on the basis of the survey under ((RCW 82.82.020))
section 102 of this act or other information, the department finds that
an investment project is no longer an "eligible investment project"
under RCW 82.82.010 at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified by the department as having been
operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes are immediately
due according to the following schedule:

Year in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2 87.5%

3 75%

4 62.5%

5 50%

6 37.5%

7 25%

8 12.5%

(b) ((If a recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual
survey required under RCW 82.82.020 by the date due, twelve and one-half percent of the deferred tax is immediately due.)) If the economic
benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in RCW
82.82.010(5), the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent the
lessee has received the economic benefit.
(((c) If an investment project is meeting the requirement of RCW
82.82.010(5) at any time during the calendar year in which the
investment project is certified as having been operationally complete
and the recipient of the deferral fails to complete the annual survey
due under RCW 82.82.020, the portion of deferred taxes immediately due
is the amount on the schedule in (a) of this subsection. If the
economic benefits of the deferral are passed to a lessee as provided in
RCW 82.82.010(5), the lessee is responsible for payment to the extent
the lessee has received the economic benefit.))
(3) The department must assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent taxes under chapter 82.32 RCW, but not penalties,
retroactively to the date of deferral. The debt for deferred taxes
will not be extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the
recipient. Transfer of ownership does not terminate the deferral. The
deferral is transferred, subject to the successor meeting the
eligibility requirements of this chapter, for the remaining periods of
the deferral.

Sec. 150 RCW 84.36.645 and 2003 c 149 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Machinery and equipment exempt under RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 used in manufacturing semiconductor materials at a building
exempt from sales and use tax and in compliance with the employment
requirement under RCW 82.08.965 and 82.12.965 are ((tax)) exempt from
property taxation. "Semiconductor materials" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 82.04.240(2).
(2) A person seeking this exemption must make application to the
county assessor, on forms prescribed by the department.
(3) A person ((receiving)) claiming an exemption under this section
must file a complete annual report ((in the manner prescribed in RCW
82.32.535)) with the department under section 103 of this act.
(4) This section is effective for taxes levied for collection one
year after the effective date of this act and thereafter.
(5) This section expires December 31st of the year occurring twelve
years after the effective date of this act, for taxes levied for
collection in the following year.

Sec. 151 RCW 84.36.655 and 2003 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2005, all buildings, machinery, equipment,
and other personal property of a lessee of a port district eligible
under RCW 82.08.980 and 82.12.980, used exclusively in manufacturing
superefficient airplanes, are exempt from property taxation. A person
taking the credit under RCW 82.04.4463 is not eligible for the
exemption under this section. For the purposes of this section,
"superefficient airplane" and "component" have the meanings given in
RCW 82.32.550.
(2) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person ((taking)) claiming the exemption under this section must file
a complete annual report ((as required)) with the department under
((RCW 82.32.545)) section 103 of this act.
(3) Claims for exemption authorized by this section ((shall)) must
be filed with the county assessor on forms prescribed by the department
and furnished by the assessor. The assessor ((shall)) must verify and
approve claims as the assessor determines to be justified and in
accordance with this section. No claims may be filed after December
31, 2023. The department may adopt rules, under the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW, as necessary to properly administer this section.
(4) This section applies to taxes levied for collection in 2006 and
thereafter.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2024.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 152 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.32.535 (Annual report by semiconductor businesses) and
2003 c 149 s 11;
(2) RCW 82.32.5351 (Annual report by semiconductor businesses--Report to legislature) and 2006 c 84 s 5;
(3) RCW 82.32.545 (Annual report for airplane manufacturing tax
preferences) and 2008 c 283 s 2, 2008 c 81 s 10, 2007 c 54 s 19, & 2003
2nd sp.s. c 1 s 16;
(4) RCW 82.32.560 (Electrolytic processing business tax exemption--Annual report) and 2009 c 434 s 2 & 2004 c 240 s 2;
(5) RCW 82.32.570 (Smelter tax incentives -- Goals -- Annual report)
and 2006 c 182 s 6 & 2004 c 24 s 14;
(6) RCW 82.32.610 (Annual survey for fruit and vegetable business
tax incentive -- Report to legislature) and 2006 c 354 s 5 & 2005 c 513
s 3;
(7) RCW 82.32.620 (Annual report for tax incentives under RCW
82.04.294) and 2005 c 301 s 4;
(8) RCW 82.32.630 (Annual survey for timber tax incentives) and
2007 c 48 s 6 & 2006 c 300 s 9;
(9) RCW 82.32.632 (Annual report for tax incentives for printing or
publishing newspapers) and 2009 c 461 s 6;
(10) RCW 82.32.645 (Annual survey for biotechnology and medical
device manufacturing business tax incentive -- Report to legislature) and
2006 c 178 s 8;
(11) RCW 82.32.650 (Annual survey -- Customized employment training--Report to legislature) and 2006 c 112 s 6;
(12) RCW 82.16.140 (Renewable energy system cost recovery -- Report
to legislature) and 2005 c 300 s 5; and
(13) 2005 c 301 s 5 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 153 The repeals in section 152 of this act do
not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the statutes repealed or under any rule or order adopted
under those statutes, nor do they affect any proceeding instituted
under those statutes.

PART II
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
Sec. 201 2009 c 461 s 9 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) Sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150, chapter
..., Laws of 2010 (sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129, 131, and 150
of this act), section 3, chapter 461, Laws of 2009, section 7, chapter
300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149, Laws of 2003 are
contingent upon the siting and commercial operation of a significant
semiconductor microchip fabrication facility in the state of
Washington.
(b) For the purposes of this section:
(i) "Commercial operation" means the same as "commencement of
commercial production" as used in RCW 82.08.965.
(ii) "Semiconductor microchip fabrication" means "manufacturing
semiconductor microchips" as defined in RCW 82.04.426.
(iii) "Significant" means the combined investment of new buildings
and new machinery and equipment in the buildings, at the commencement
of commercial production, will be at least one billion dollars.
(2) Chapter 149, Laws of 2003 takes effect the first day of the
month in which a contract for the construction of a significant
semiconductor fabrication facility is signed, as determined by the
director of the department of revenue.
(3)(a) The department of revenue must provide notice of the
effective date of ((this act)) sections 104, 110, 117, 123, 125, 129,
131, and 150, chapter ..., Laws of 2010 (sections 104, 110, 117, 123,
125, 129, 131, and 150 of this act) section 3, chapter 461, Laws of
2009, section 7, chapter 300, Laws of 2006, and section 4, chapter 149,
Laws of 2003 to affected taxpayers, the legislature, and others as
deemed appropriate by the department.
(b) If, after making a determination that a contract has been
signed and chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is effective, the department
discovers that commencement of commercial production did not take place
within three years of the date the contract was signed, the department
must make a determination that chapter 149, Laws of 2003 is no longer
effective, and all taxes that would have been otherwise due are deemed
deferred taxes and are immediately assessed and payable from any person
reporting tax under RCW 82.04.240(2) or claiming an exemption or credit
under section 2 or 5 through 10, chapter 149, Laws of 2003. The
department is not authorized to make a second determination regarding
the effective date of chapter 149, Laws of 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Those provisions of sections 101 through
103, 105 through 109, 111 through 116, 118 through 122, 124, 126
through 128, 130, 132 through 149, and 151 through 153 of this act that
relate to annual surveys and annual reports apply beginning with annual
surveys and annual reports due in 2011 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Section 106 of this act expires July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 2010 c . . . s 201 (section 201 of this
act), 2009 c 461 s 9, 2006 c 300 s 12, and 2003 c 149 s 12 (uncodified)
are codified as a section within chapter 82.32 RCW.

--- END ---