BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may work with human trafficking victim advocates in
developing informational posters for placement in rest areas. The
department may adopt policies for the placement of these posters in
rest areas and these policies must address, at a minimum, placement of
the posters in bathroom stalls. The posters may be in a variety of
languages and include toll-free telephone numbers a person may call for
assistance, including the number for the national human trafficking
resource center at (888)373-7888 and the number for the Washington
state office of crime victims advocacy at (800)822-1067.

--- END ---