BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.2909 and 2006 c 182 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing aluminum; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business ((shall)) is,
in the case of manufacturers, ((be)) equal to the value of the product
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, ((be)) equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of .2904
percent.
(2) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of aluminum
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business ((shall be)) is equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the aluminum multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(3) This section expires January 1, ((2012)) 2017.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.4481 and 2006 c 182 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all property taxes paid during the calendar year on
property owned by a direct service industrial customer and reasonably
necessary for the purposes of an aluminum smelter.
(2) A person taking the credit under this section is subject to all
the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax liability before new
credits. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for property
taxes levied for collection in ((2012)) 2017 and thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.805 and 2009 c 535 s 513 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for personal
property used at an aluminum smelter, tangible personal property that
will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or
other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services
rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal
property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax
in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. A person
claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then take a credit equal
to the state share of retail sales tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. The
person ((shall)) must submit information, in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of qualifying
purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the
amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, ((2012)) 2017.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.12.805 and 2009 c 535 s 620 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under RCW 82.12.020 for personal
property used at an aluminum smelter, or for tangible personal property
that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or
other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services
rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal
property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax
in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. The amount of
the credit ((shall be)) is equal to the state share of use tax computed
to be due under RCW 82.12.020. The person ((shall)) must submit
information, in a form and manner prescribed by the department,
specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which
the exemption is claimed and the amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, ((2012)) 2017.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.12.022 and 2006 c 182 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) levied and ((there shall be)) collected
from every person in this state a use tax for the privilege of using
natural gas or manufactured gas within this state as a consumer.
(2) The tax ((shall be)) is levied and collected in an amount equal
to the value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate
in effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses
under RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include
any amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(((7))) (2) in transporting the gas
subject to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to
tax under that chapter.
(3) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other
means than through a pipeline.
(4) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to
the consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas
for which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(5) The tax levied in this section ((shall)) does not apply to the
use of natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term
is defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, ((2012)) 2017.
(6) There ((shall be)) is a credit against the tax levied under
this section in an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by
another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought
under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect
to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(7) The use tax hereby imposed ((shall)) must be paid by the
consumer to the department.
(8) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who
delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the
department. Such report ((shall)) must contain the volume of gas
delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other
information as the department ((shall)) requires by rule.
(9) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384,
Laws of 1989.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.32.570 and 2006 c 182 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "smelter tax incentive" means
the preferential tax rate under RCW 82.04.2909, or an exemption or
credit under RCW 82.04.4481, 82.08.805, 82.12.805, or 82.12.022(5).
(2) The legislature finds that accountability and effectiveness are
important aspects of setting tax policy. In order to make policy
choices regarding the best use of limited state resources the
legislature needs information to evaluate whether the stated goals of
legislation were achieved.
(3) The goals of the smelter tax incentives are to retain family-wage jobs in rural areas by:
(a) Enabling the aluminum industry to maintain production of
aluminum at a level that will preserve at least 75 percent of the jobs
that were on the payroll effective January 1, 2004, as adjusted for
employment reductions publicly announced before November 30, 2003; and
(b) Allowing the aluminum industry to continue producing aluminum
in this state through ((2012)) 2017 so that the industry will be
positioned to preserve and create new jobs when the anticipated
reduction of energy costs occurs.
(4)(a) An aluminum smelter receiving the benefit of a smelter tax
incentive shall make an annual report to the department detailing
employment, wages, and employer-provided health and retirement benefits
per job at the manufacturing site. The report is due by March 31st
following any year in which a tax incentive is claimed or used. The
report shall not include names of employees. The report shall detail
employment by the total number of full-time, part-time, and temporary
positions. The report shall indicate the quantity of aluminum smelted
at the plant during the time period covered by the report. The first
report filed under this subsection shall include employment, wage, and
benefit information for the twelve-month period immediately before
first use of a tax incentive. Employment reports shall include data
for actual levels of employment and identification of the number of
jobs affected by any employment reductions that have been publicly
announced at the time of the report. Information in a report under
this section is not subject to the confidentiality provisions of RCW
82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon request.
(b) If a person fails to submit an annual report under (a) of this
subsection by the due date of the report, the department shall declare
the amount of taxes exempted or credited, or reduced in the case of the
preferential business and occupation tax rate, for that year to be
immediately due and payable. Excise taxes payable under this
subsection are subject to interest but not penalties, as provided under
this chapter. This information is not subject to the confidentiality
provisions of RCW 82.32.330 and may be disclosed to the public upon
request.
(((5) By December 1, 2007, December 1, 2010, and December 1, 2015,
the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the senate,
in consultation with the department, shall report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of the smelter tax incentives under RCW 82.04.4482
and 82.16.0498. The reports shall measure the effect of the tax
incentives on job retention for Washington residents and any other
factors the committees may select.))

--- END ---