BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.320.010 and 2009 c 492 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Domestic employers of foreign workers" or "domestic employer"
means a person or persons residing in the state of Washington who
recruit or employ a foreign worker to perform work in Washington state.
(2) "Foreign worker" or "worker" means a person who is not a
citizen of the United States ((and)), who comes to Washington state
based on an offer of employment, and who holds a nonimmigrant visa for
temporary visitors. (("Foreign worker" or "worker" does not include
persons who hold an H-1B visa and come to work in the state.))
(3) "International labor recruitment agency" means a corporation,
partnership, business, or other legal entity, whether or not organized
under the laws of the United States or any state, that does business in
the United States and offers Washington state entities engaged in the
employment or recruitment of foreign workers, employment referral
services involving citizens of a foreign country or countries by acting
as an intermediary between these foreign workers and Washington
employers.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.320.020 and 2009 c 492 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, domestic
employers of foreign workers and international labor recruitment
agencies must provide a disclosure statement as described in this
section to foreign workers who have been referred to or hired by a
Washington employer on or after the effective date of this section.
(2) The disclosure statement must:
(a) Be provided in English or, if the worker is not fluent or
literate in English, another language that is understood by the worker;
(b) State that the worker may be considered an employee under the
laws of the state of Washington and is subject to state worker health
and safety laws and may be eligible for workers' compensation insurance
and unemployment insurance;
(c) State that the worker may be subject to both state and federal
laws governing overtime and work hours, including the minimum wage act
under chapter 49.46 RCW;
(d) Include an itemized listing of any deductions the employer
intends to make from the worker's pay for food and housing;
(e) Include an itemized listing of the international labor
recruitment agency's fees;
(f) State that the worker has the right to control over his or her
travel and labor documents, including his or her visa, at all times and
that the employer may not require the employee to surrender those
documents to the employer or to the international labor recruitment
agency while the employee is working in the United States, except as
otherwise required by law or regulation or for use as supporting
documentation in visa applications;
(g) Include a list of services or a hot line a worker may contact
if he or she thinks that he or she may be a victim of trafficking.
(3) The department of labor and industries may create a model
disclosure form and post the model form on its web site so that
domestic employers of foreign workers and international labor
recruitment agencies may download the form, or mail the form upon
request. The disclosure statement must be given to the worker no later
than the date that the worker arrives at the place of employment in
Washington.
(4) If a foreign worker has been provided an informational pamphlet
developed under the William Wilberforce trafficking victims protection
reauthorization act of 2008, the domestic employer or international
labor recruitment agency is not required to provide the disclosure
statement under this section. For the purposes of this subsection a
worker is presumed to have been provided an informational pamphlet so
long as the William Wilberforce trafficking victims protection
reauthorization act is in effect and he or she holds an A-3, G-5, NATO-7, H, J, or B-1 personal or domestic servant visa.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.320 RCW
to read as follows:
Any domestic employer or international labor recruitment agency
which fails to complete the requirements of this chapter with respect
to any foreign worker is liable to that foreign worker in a civil
action by the foreign worker. The court shall award to a foreign
worker who prevails in an action under this section an amount between
two hundred dollars and five hundred dollars, or actual damages,
whichever is greater. The court may also award other equitable relief.
A foreign worker who prevails in an action under this section must be
awarded court costs and attorneys' fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 19.320 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall integrate into
existing posters and brochures information on assisting victims of
human trafficking. Both the posters and the brochures must contain the
toll-free telephone number of the national human trafficking resource
center and the Washington state office of crime victims advocacy.

--- END ---