BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.642 and 2009 c 470 s 716 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective June 1, 2006, for agencies complying with the ultra-low sulfur diesel mandate of the United States environmental protection
agency for on-highway diesel fuel, agencies shall use biodiesel as an
additive to ultra-low sulfur diesel for lubricity, provided that the
use of a lubricity additive is warranted and that the use of biodiesel
is comparable in performance and cost with other available lubricity
additives. The amount of biodiesel added to the ultra-low sulfur
diesel fuel shall be not less than two percent.
(2) Effective June 1, 2009, state agencies are required to use a
minimum of twenty percent biodiesel as compared to total volume of all
diesel purchases made by the agencies for the operation of the
agencies' diesel-powered vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment.
(3) All state agencies using biodiesel fuel shall, beginning on
July 1, 2006, file biannual reports with the department of general
administration documenting the use of the fuel and a description of how
any problems encountered were resolved.
(4) For the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the Washington state ferries
is required to use a minimum of five percent biodiesel as compared to
total volume of all diesel purchases made by the Washington state
ferries for the operation of the Washington state ferries diesel-powered vessels so long as the per gallon ((price)) cost of diesel
containing a five percent biodiesel blend level does not exceed the per
gallon ((price)) cost of diesel by more than five percent. If the per
gallon ((price)) cost of diesel containing a five percent biodiesel
blend level exceeds the per gallon ((price)) cost of diesel by more
than five percent, the requirements of this section do not apply to
vessel fuel purchases by the Washington state ferries. The Washington
state ferries shall issue a request for proposals when seeking to
purchase ferry fuel in order to best determine the true cost to the
department of transportation of using a biodiesel blend versus diesel
fuel.
(5) By December 1, 2009, the department of general administration
shall:
(a) Report to the legislature on the average true price
differential for biodiesel by blend and location; and
(b) Examine alternative fuel procurement methods that work to
address potential market barriers for in-state biodiesel producers and
report these findings to the legislature.

--- END ---