BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) A number of governmental agencies and programs of the state
share goals and missions relating to food, nutrition, agriculture,
health, education, and economic development through sustained
agricultural production and improved access to nutritious foods;
(b) The food and agriculture industry generates forty-two billion
dollars annually, employs one hundred sixty thousand people, and
contributes thirteen percent to the state's economy;
(c) Agriculture is a leading employer in the state, produces over
three hundred different crops, and is composed of many diverse types of
agricultural endeavors;
(d) Washington state continues to lose approximately seventy
thousand acres of farmland every year to nonfarming uses and the
average age of farmers in the state is fifty-seven;
(e) Washington is currently ranked twenty-eighth in the nation for
very low food security with one hundred twelve thousand households
experiencing hunger, a twenty-four percent increase from 2008;
(f) According to data average for the years 2004 through 2008,
nearly sixty-one percent of Washington adults are either obese or
overweight;
(g) Obesity contributes substantially to the burden of preventable
illnesses and premature death, which are estimated to cost Washington
almost two billion dollars annually; and
(h) The current food system in Washington state is complex and
directly affected by the activities and policies of multiple
nongovernmental organizations, state agencies, and local governments,
and a coordinated, systemic approach is necessary to improve the health
of Washington's citizens and improve the economic viability of
agriculture.
(2) The legislature recognizes the need to understand the impacts
of governmental rules and regulations on the viability of the
agricultural sector and on the ability of citizens of all backgrounds
to obtain sufficient, high quality foods for themselves and their
families.
(3) The purpose of this act is to provide for the establishment of
a forum whereby state food policy, food-related programs, and food-related issues can be examined, improved, and better integrated to
accomplish the overarching public goals. It is the intent of the
legislature to place the state in a favorable position to qualify for
available federal funds, moneys from foundations, and other sources to
fund the activities of the forum.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The Washington food policy forum is
established. The purpose of the forum is to develop recommendations to
advance the following food system goals:
(a) To increase production, sales, and consumption of Washington-grown foods;
(b) To develop and promote programs that bring healthy Washington
grown foods to Washington residents, including increased state
purchasing of local food products for school, adult care programs, and
other state-funded food programs;
(c) To review and develop programs that support providing proper
nutrition and avoid burdens of obesity and chronic diet-related
diseases;
(d) To protect the land and water resources needed for sustained
local food production;
(e) To examine ways to encourage retention of an adequate number of
farmers, the educational needs for an adequate agricultural workforce,
and to provide for the continued economic viability of local food
production, processing, and distribution in the state; and
(f) To reduce food insecurity and hunger in the state and ensure
that the benefits of a healthy Washington food system are shared with
families at all income levels, and particularly with vulnerable
children, the elderly, people with disabilities, and communities of
color.
(2) Recommendations shall include benchmarks and criteria for
measuring progress in achieving each goal.
(3) Recommendations shall consider, but not be limited to, ways in
which the following may help achieve each of the five goals:
(a) Increased collaboration and communication between state
agencies;
(b) Increased collaboration and communication between local, state,
and federal agencies;
(c) Innovative public-private partnerships that can leverage
private and public market influence such as through institutional
purchasing and contracts;
(d) A review of (i) the future of farming study that was
coordinated by the department of agriculture with regard to the goals
established in this section, (ii) reports issued by the office of
farmland preservation with regard to the goals established in this
section, and (iii) data and analysis of food insecurity across the
state as reported by the department of health behavioral risk factors
surveillance surveys;
(e) Improvements to state or federal laws or regulations relevant
to the food system and food security in the state;
(f) Improvements in state or federal program implementation
relevant to the food system and food security in the state;
(g) Identifying additional federal, state, local, and private
investments needed to accomplish the recommendations.
(4) In developing its recommendations, the forum:
(a) Shall coordinate with the office of farmland preservation to
avoid duplication of effort;
(b) Shall solicit public input through public hearings or
informational sessions;
(c) May conduct research and analysis as needed within financial
resources available to the forum; and
(d) Shall invite additional stakeholder participation through an
advisory committee created to address issues identified by the forum as
requiring study or particular expertise.
(5) The forum may establish advisory committees to address specific
issue areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All members of the Washington food
policy forum are voting members.
(2) The following are invited to participate as ex officio members
of the Washington food policy forum convened under section 4(1) of this
act:
(a) The director of the department of agriculture or the director's
designee;
(b) The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's
designee;
(c) The superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee;
(d) The director of the department of commerce or the director's
designee;
(e) The secretary of the department of social and health services
or the secretary's designee;
(f) The dean of the college of agricultural, human, and natural
resource sciences at Washington State University or the dean's
designee;
(g) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(h) A representative from the state conservation commission office
of farmland preservation; and
(i) A representative from the University of Washington who has
expertise in food systems or nutrition appointed by the president of
the University of Washington.
(3) The following members shall be appointed by the governor to the
food policy forum:
(a) Five farmer representatives. The governor shall endeavor to
ensure that geographic diversity, size of operation, and farmer age are
balanced among the five farmer representatives, and shall select the
farmer representatives from persons nominated by established
agricultural organizations;
(b) One representative who represents food distribution,
processing, and marketing interests;
(c) One representative who represents direct-to-consumer marketing
efforts;
(d) One representative who represents community-based efforts to
address nutrition and public health;
(e) One representative who represents nongovernmental statewide
anti-hunger efforts;
(f) One representative who represents food banks;
(g) One representative who represents nongovernmental statewide
efforts to protect the state's land, air, and water;
(h) One representative from a labor union that represents workers
in the food industry;
(i) One representative from the international trade sector with
expertise in the trade of food products; and
(j) One person representing retail grocers who own a single store
or a regional chain with less than ten million five hundred thousand
dollars in gross revenue per location annually, nominated by an
established food industry association.
(4) The fourteen governor-appointed members shall be appointed for
terms of three years or until a successor is appointed. Members are
eligible to be reappointed.
(5) The chair of the forum shall be elected by the members of the
forum for a term not to exceed two years.
(6) The public members of the forum shall serve without
compensation from state funds. The ex officio members of the forum
shall serve without additional compensation of state funds. Members of
the forum may receive reimbursement from the forum for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 if funds for forum
operations are available as determined by the director of the office of
financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The governor shall appoint a person to
convene an organizational meeting of the food policy forum. At its
first meeting, the forum must, at a minimum, (a) elect a forum chair
from among its members, (b) identify funding sources for the forum, and
(c) begin the development of a work plan.
(2) No state agency or state university may be compelled to incur
expenses in connection with the operation of the forum.
(3) The forum shall report its initial findings and recommendations
by December 1st of the year following the date of the second meeting of
the forum. Thereafter, the forum shall submit an annual report that
includes recommendations and progress on benchmarks by December 1st
each year. These reports shall be submitted to the office of the
governor and to the offices of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives and the secretary of the senate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This chapter expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

--- END ---