BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.20.055 and 2006 c 219 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee of twenty dollars, and meets the following
requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280(((4))).
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit; ((and))
(b) The person is not using a wireless communications device,
unless the person is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property; and
(c) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to renew an instruction permit must submit
the application to the department in person.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.075 and 2009 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor
vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant
for an intermediate license must be at least sixteen years of age and:
(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not
less than six months;
(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the
department;
(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with
the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;
(d) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or
employer to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at
least fifty hours of driving experience, ten of which were at night,
during which the driver was supervised by a person at least twenty-one
years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three
years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of
traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at
the time of the application for the intermediate license;
(e) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
violation within the last six months before the application for the
intermediate license; and
(f) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of
alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction
permit.
(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate
license or until the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever
occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle
that is carrying any passengers under the age of twenty who are not
members of the holder's immediate family as defined in RCW 42.17.020.
For the remaining period of the intermediate license, the holder may
not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than three passengers
who are under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's
immediate family.
(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor
vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when the holder
is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at
least twenty-five years of age.
(4) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a moving
motor vehicle while using a wireless communications device unless the
holder is using the device to report illegal activity, summon medical
or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person or property.
(5) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate
license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions
imposed under this section.
(((5))) (6) Except for a violation of subsection (4) of this
section, enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be
accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(((6))) (7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary
for agricultural purposes.
(((7))) (8) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without
restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the
twelve-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license,
he or she:
(a) Has not been involved in an accident involving only one motor
vehicle;
(b) Has not been involved in an accident where he or she was cited
in connection with the accident or was found to have caused the
accident;
(c) Has not been involved in an accident where no one was cited or
was found to have caused the accident; and
(d) Has not been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic
offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed
on an intermediate licensee under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.61.667 and 2007 c 417 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
a person operating a moving motor vehicle while holding a wireless
communications device to his or her ear is guilty of a traffic
infraction.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person
operating:
(a) An authorized emergency vehicle, or a tow truck responding to
a disabled vehicle;
(b) A moving motor vehicle using a wireless communications device
in hands-free mode;
(c) A moving motor vehicle using a hand-held wireless
communications device to:
(i) Report illegal activity;
(ii) Summon medical or other emergency help;
(iii) Prevent injury to a person or property; or
(iv) Relay information that is time sensitive between a transit or
for-hire operator and that operator's dispatcher, in which the device
is permanently affixed to the vehicle;
(d) A moving motor vehicle while using a hearing aid.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not restrict the operation
of an amateur radio station by a person who holds a valid amateur radio
operator license issued by the federal communications commission.
(4) For purposes of this section, "hands-free mode" means the use
of a wireless communications device with a speaker phone, headset, or
earpiece.
(5) The state preempts the field of regulating the use of wireless
communications devices in motor vehicles, and this section supersedes
any local laws, ordinances, orders, rules, or regulations enacted by a
political subdivision or municipality to regulate the use of wireless
communications devices by the operator of a motor vehicle.
(6) ((Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(7))) Infractions that result from the use of a wireless
communications device while operating a motor vehicle under this
section shall not become part of the driver's record under RCW
46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, a finding that a person has
committed a traffic infraction under this section shall not be made
available to insurance companies or employers.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.61.668 and 2007 c 416 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person
operating a moving motor vehicle who, by means of an electronic
wireless communications device, ((other than a voice-activated global
positioning or navigation system that is permanently affixed to the
vehicle,)) sends, reads, or writes a text message, is guilty of a
traffic infraction. A person does not send, read, or write a text
message when he or she reads, selects, or enters a phone number or name
in a wireless communications device for the purpose of making a phone
call.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a person
operating:
(a) An authorized emergency vehicle; ((or))
(b) A voice-operated global positioning or navigation system that
is affixed to the vehicle and that allows the user to send or receive
messages without diverting visual attention from the road or engaging
the use of either hand; or
(c) A moving motor vehicle while using an electronic wireless
communications device to:
(i) Report illegal activity;
(ii) Summon medical or other emergency help;
(iii) Prevent injury to a person or property; or
(iv) Relay information that is time sensitive between a transit or
for-hire operator and that operator's dispatcher, in which the device
is permanently affixed to the vehicle.
(3) ((Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor
vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an
equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.
(4))) Infractions under this section shall not become part of the
driver's record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, a
finding that a person has committed a traffic infraction under this
section shall not be made available to insurance companies or
employers.

--- END ---