BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Puget Sound partnership shall establish
a work group to study seawater desalination. The purpose of the study
is to identify the impacts of desalination facilities and to determine
the feasibility of seawater desalination as a solution to water supply
issues.
(1) The Puget Sound partnership shall convene and chair a work
group that includes representatives from the department of health,
department of natural resources, department of fish and wildlife, and
department of ecology.
(2) In conducting the study, the work group shall consider, at a
minimum, the following issues:
(a) The environmental impacts of seawater desalination facilities,
including noise, air, and water pollution;
(b) Impacts to nearshore habitat;
(c) Disposal of waste and by-products;
(d) Energy use and efficiency and the energy requirements needed to
operate a desalination facility;
(e) An analysis of management and operational requirements to
ensure financial and long-term viability, including fiscal impacts to
entities relying on a desalination plant for their primary potable
water;
(f) Public health and safety issues, including residential
requirements for water, possible health impacts, and risks;
(g) The impacts of enhancing or limiting potable water availability
for established communities and for new subdivisions or short plats;
and
(h) Laws and regulations of other states regarding desalination,
impact assessments, and energy usage costs.
(3) By December 1, 2010, the Puget Sound partnership shall report
to the legislature the results of the study and make recommendations to
the legislature as to:
(a) The need for a regulatory system or permit process for siting
and administering seawater desalination facilities;
(b) Appropriate guidelines for siting, sizing, and operating
seawater desalination facilities;
(c) Methods for determining the feasibility of a seawater
desalination facility and ensuring the long-term viability of a
facility that may serve entities with limited access to potable water;
and
(d) Alternatives to seawater desalination.

--- END ---