BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some lottery game
promotions involve second chance drawings of nonwinning tickets for
promotional prizes, and that players may register for these second
chance drawings by mailing their nonwinning ticket using the United
States postal service. The legislature further finds that to enhance
player opportunities and increase the number of games offered, players
should be allowed to register for second chance drawings using the
internet. The legislature finds that because registration is not a
sale and therefore does not constitute gambling, allowing internet
registration does not in any way modify the prohibition against the
sale of tickets or shares over the internet.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.70.040 and 2006 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:
(1) To adopt rules governing the establishment and operation of a
state lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a
lottery be initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and
in order that such lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues
for the state consonant with the dignity of the state and the general
welfare of the people. Such rules shall include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the
selling of tickets or shares, but such tickets or shares may not be
sold over the internet. Previously purchased tickets and shares that
secondarily allow for voluntary registration of those tickets or shares
for the opportunity to receive additional prizes at no additional cost
may be registered via the internet and such registration does not
constitute a sale. The awarding of a prize may not be conducted via
the internet. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or video
terminals which allow for individual play against such devices or
terminals shall be prohibited. An affirmative vote of sixty percent of
both houses of the legislature is required before offering any game
allowing or requiring a player to become eligible for a prize or to
otherwise play any portion of the game by interacting with any device
or terminal involving digital, video, or other electronic
representations of any game of chance, including scratch tickets, pull-tabs, bingo, poker or other cards, dice, roulette, keno, or slot
machines. Approval of the legislature shall be required before
entering any agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared
games;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or
shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares, except
as limited by (a) of this subsection;
(e) The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of
winning tickets or shares which, at the director's option, may be paid
in lump sum amounts or installments over a period of years;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets
or shares. Approval of the legislature is required before conducting
any online game in which the drawing or selection of winning tickets
occurs more frequently than once every twenty-four hours;
(g) Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at
which tickets or shares may be sold;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares, except as
limited by (a) of this subsection;
(i) The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or
shares, except that a person under the age of eighteen shall not be
licensed as an agent;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid
licensed sales agents necessary to provide for the adequate
availability of tickets or shares to prospective buyers and for the
convenience of the public;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale
of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The
payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which
shall not be less than forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue
from such lottery, (ii) transfers to the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii) transfer to the state's general
fund. Transfers to the state general fund shall be made in compliance
with RCW 43.01.050;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and
economical operation and administration of the lottery and for the
convenience of the purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of
winning tickets or shares.
(2) To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets
or shares, on the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising
or promotion there shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the
probability of purchasing a winning ticket.
(3) To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to
time as it deems necessary or desirable.
(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

--- END ---