BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 6.15.010 and 2005 c 272 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 6.15.050, the following personal
property ((shall be)) is exempt from execution, attachment, and
garnishment:
(((1))) (a) All wearing apparel of every individual and family, but
not to exceed ((one)) three thousand five hundred dollars in value in
furs, jewelry, and personal ornaments for any individual.
(((2))) (b) All private libraries including electronic media, which
includes audio-visual, entertainment, or reference media in digital or
analogue format, of every individual, but not to exceed ((fifteen
hundred)) three thousand five hundred dollars in value, and all family
pictures and keepsakes.
(((3))) (c) To each individual or, as to community property of
spouses maintaining a single household as against a creditor of the
community, to the community:
(((a))) (i) The individual's or community's household goods,
appliances, furniture, and home and yard equipment, not to exceed
((two)) six thousand ((seven)) five hundred dollars in value for the
individual or ((five)) thirteen thousand ((four hundred)) dollars for
the community, no single item to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars,
said amount to include provisions and fuel for the comfortable
maintenance of the individual or community;
(((b))) (ii) Other personal property, except personal earnings as
provided under RCW 6.15.050(1), not to exceed ((two)) three thousand
dollars in value, of which not more than ((two hundred)) one thousand
dollars in value may consist of cash, and of which not more than ((two
hundred)) one thousand dollars in value may consist of bank accounts,
savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities;
(((c))) (iii) For an individual, a motor vehicle used for personal
transportation, not to exceed ((two)) four thousand ((five hundred))
dollars or for a community two motor vehicles used for personal
transportation, not to exceed ((five)) eight thousand dollars in
aggregate value;
(((d))) (iv) Any past due, current, or future child support paid or
owed to the debtor, which can be traced;
(((e))) (v) All professionally prescribed health aids for the
debtor or a dependent of the debtor; and
(((f))) (vi) To any individual, the right to or proceeds of a
payment not to exceed ((sixteen)) twenty thousand ((one hundred fifty))
dollars on account of personal bodily injury, not including pain and
suffering or compensation for actual pecuniary loss, of the debtor or
an individual of whom the debtor is a dependent; or the right to or
proceeds of a payment in compensation of loss of future earnings of the
debtor or an individual of whom the debtor is or was a dependent, to
the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any
dependent of the debtor. The exemption under this subsection
(((3)(f))) (1)(c)(vi) does not apply to the right of the state of
Washington, or any agent or assignee of the state, as a lienholder or
subrogee under RCW 43.20B.060.
(((4))) (d) To each qualified individual, one of the following
exemptions:
(((a))) (i) To a farmer, farm trucks, farm stock, farm tools, farm
equipment, supplies and seed, not to exceed ((five)) ten thousand
dollars in value;
(((b))) (ii) To a physician, surgeon, attorney, clergyman, or other
professional person, the individual's library, office furniture, office
equipment and supplies, not to exceed ((five)) ten thousand dollars in
value;
(((c))) (iii) To any other individual, the tools and instruments
and materials used to carry on his or her trade for the support of
himself or herself or family, not to exceed ((five)) ten thousand
dollars in value.
(e) Tuition units, under chapter 28B.95 RCW, purchased more than
two years prior to the date of a bankruptcy filing or court judgment,
and contributions to any other qualified tuition program under 26
U.S.C. Sec. 529 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and
to a Coverdell education savings account, also known as an education
individual retirement account, under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 530 of the internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, contributed more than two years prior
to the date of a bankruptcy filing or court judgment.
(2) For purposes of this section, "value" means the reasonable
market value of the debtor's interest in an article or item at the time
it is selected for exemption, exclusive of all liens and encumbrances
thereon.
(((5) Tuition units, under chapter 28B.95 RCW, purchased more than
two years prior to the date of a bankruptcy filing or court judgment.))

Sec. 2 RCW 6.15.020 and 2007 c 492 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the policy of the state of Washington to ensure the well-being of its citizens by protecting retirement income to which they are
or may become entitled. For that purpose generally and pursuant to the
authority granted to the state of Washington under 11 U.S.C. Sec.
522(b)(2), the exemptions in this section relating to retirement
benefits are provided.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, any money received by
any citizen of the state of Washington as a pension from the government
of the United States, whether the same be in the actual possession of
such person or be deposited or loaned, shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever, and when a debtor dies, or absconds, and leaves his or her
family any money exempted by this subsection, the same shall be exempt
to the family as provided in this subsection. This subsection shall
not apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter
26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law.
(3) The right of a person to a pension, annuity, or retirement
allowance or disability allowance, or death benefits, or any optional
benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any citizen of the
state of Washington under any employee benefit plan, and any fund
created by such a plan or arrangement, shall be exempt from execution,
attachment, garnishment, or seizure by or under any legal process
whatever. This subsection shall not apply to child support collection
actions issued under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW if otherwise
permitted by federal law. This subsection shall permit benefits under
any such plan or arrangement to be payable to a spouse, former spouse,
child, or other dependent of a participant in such plan to the extent
expressly provided for in a qualified domestic relations order that
meets the requirements for such orders under the plan, or, in the case
of benefits payable under a plan described in 26 U.S.C. Sec((tions)).
403(b) or 408 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, or
section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1, 1984, to the
extent provided in any order issued by a court of competent
jurisdiction that provides for maintenance or support. This subsection
((shall)) does not prohibit actions against an employee benefit plan,
or fund for valid obligations incurred by the plan or fund for the
benefit of the plan or fund.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term "employee benefit
plan" means any plan or arrangement that is described in RCW 49.64.020,
including any Keogh plan, whether funded by a trust or by an annuity
contract, and in 26 U.S.C. Sec((tions)). 401(a) or 403(a) of the
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; or that is a tax-sheltered
annuity or a custodial account described in section 403(b) of such code
or an individual retirement account or an individual retirement annuity
described in section 408 of such code; or a Roth individual retirement
account described in section 408A of such code; or a medical savings
account or a health savings account described in sections 220 and 223,
respectively, of such code; ((or an education individual retirement
account described in section 530 of such code;)) or a retirement bond
described in section 409 of such code as in effect before January 1,
1984. ((The term "employee benefit plan" also means any rights
accruing on account of money paid currently or in advance for purchase
of tuition units under the advanced college tuition payment program in
chapter 28B.95 RCW.)) The term "employee benefit plan" shall not
include any employee benefit plan that is established or maintained for
its employees by the government of the United States, by the state of
Washington under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32, 41.34, 41.35, 41.37,
41.40, or 43.43 RCW or RCW 41.50.770, or by any agency or
instrumentality of the government of the United States.
(5) An employee benefit plan shall be deemed to be a spendthrift
trust, regardless of the source of funds, the relationship between the
trustee or custodian of the plan and the beneficiary, or the ability of
the debtor to withdraw or borrow or otherwise become entitled to
benefits from the plan before retirement. This subsection shall not
apply to child support collection actions issued under chapter 26.18,
26.23, or 74.20A RCW, if otherwise permitted by federal law. This
subsection shall permit benefits under any such plan or arrangement to
be payable to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant in such plan to the extent expressly provided for in a
qualified domestic relations order that meets the requirements for such
orders under the plan, or, in the case of benefits payable under a plan
described in 26 U.S.C. Sec((tions)). 403(b) or 408 of the internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, or section 409 of such code as in
effect before January 1, 1984, to the extent provided in any order
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction that provides for
maintenance or support.
(6) Unless ((contrary to applicable)) prohibited by federal law,
nothing contained in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section shall
be construed as a termination or limitation of a spouse's community
property interest in an ((individual retirement account)) employee
benefit plan held in the name of or on account of the other spouse, who
is the participant or the account holder spouse. Unless prohibited by
applicable federal law, at the death of the nonparticipant, nonaccount
holder spouse, the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse may
transfer or distribute the community property interest of the
nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse in the participant or account
holder spouse's ((individual retirement account)) employee benefit plan
to the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's estate, testamentary
trust, inter vivos trust, or other successor or successors pursuant to
the last will of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse or the
law of intestate succession, and that distributee may, but shall not be
required to, obtain an order of a court of competent jurisdiction,
including a nonjudicial ((dispute resolution)) binding agreement or
((other)) order entered under chapter 11.96A RCW, to confirm the
distribution. For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, the
distributee of the nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community
property interest in an ((individual retirement account)) employee
benefit plan shall be considered a person entitled to the full
protection of subsection (3) of this section. The nonparticipant,
nonaccount holder spouse's consent to a beneficiary designation by the
participant or account holder spouse with respect to an ((individual
retirement account)) employee benefit plan shall not, absent clear and
convincing evidence to the contrary, be deemed a release, gift,
relinquishment, termination, limitation, or transfer of the
nonparticipant, nonaccount holder spouse's community property interest
in an ((individual retirement account)) employee benefit plan. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "nonparticipant, nonaccount
holder spouse" means the spouse of the person who is a participant in
an employee benefit plan or in whose name ((the)) an individual
retirement account is maintained. ((The term "individual retirement
account" includes an individual retirement account and an individual
retirement annuity both as described in section 408 of the internal
revenue code of 1986, as amended, a Roth individual retirement account
as described in section 408A of the internal revenue code of 1986, as
amended, and an individual retirement bond as described in section 409
of the internal revenue code as in effect before January 1, 1984.)) As
used in this subsection, an order of a court of competent jurisdiction
entered under chapter 11.96A RCW includes an agreement, as that term is
used under RCW 11.96A.220.

Sec. 3 RCW 6.27.140 and 2009 c 521 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The notice required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or
served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form,
printed or typed in type no smaller than elite type:

NOTICE OF GARNISHMENT
AND OF YOUR RIGHTS

A Writ of Garnishment issued in a Washington court has been or
will be served on the garnishee named in the attached copy of
the writ. After receipt of the writ, the garnishee is required
to withhold payment of any money that was due to you and to
withhold any other property of yours that the garnishee held or
controlled. This notice of your rights is required by law.

YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING EXEMPTION RIGHTS:

WAGES. If the garnishee is your employer who owes wages or
other personal earnings to you, your employer is required to
pay amounts to you that are exempt under state and federal
laws, as explained in the writ of garnishment. You should
receive a copy of your employer's answer, which will show how
the exempt amount was calculated. If the garnishment is for
child support, the exempt amount paid to you will be forty
percent of wages due you, but if you are supporting a spouse,
state registered domestic partner, or dependent child, you are
entitled to claim an additional ten percent as exempt.

BANK ACCOUNTS. If the garnishee is a bank or other institution
with which you have an account in which you have deposited
benefits such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families,
Supplemental Security Income (SSI), Social Security, veterans'
benefits, unemployment compensation, or a United States
pension, you may claim the account as fully exempt if you have
deposited only such benefit funds in the account. It may be
partially exempt even though you have deposited money from
other sources in the same account. An exemption is also
available under RCW 26.16.200, providing that funds in a
community bank account that can be identified as the earnings
of a stepparent are exempt from a garnishment on the child
support obligation of the parent.

OTHER EXEMPTIONS. If the garnishee holds other property of
yours, some or all of it may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010, a
Washington statute that exempts ((up to five hundred dollars
of)) certain property of your choice (including ((up to one
hundred dollars in)) specified cash or money in a bank account)
and certain other property such as household furnishings, tools
of trade, and a motor vehicle (all limited by differing dollar
values).

HOW TO CLAIM EXEMPTIONS. Fill out the enclosed claim form and
mail or deliver it as described in instructions on the claim
form. If the plaintiff does not object to your claim, the
funds or other property that you have claimed as exempt must be
released not later than 10 days after the plaintiff receives
your claim form. If the plaintiff objects, the law requires a
hearing not later than 14 days after the plaintiff receives
your claim form, and notice of the objection and hearing date
will be mailed to you at the address that you put on the claim
form.

THE LAW ALSO PROVIDES OTHER EXEMPTION RIGHTS. IF NECESSARY, AN
ATTORNEY CAN ASSIST YOU TO ASSERT THESE AND OTHER RIGHTS, BUT
YOU MUST ACT IMMEDIATELY TO AVOID LOSS OF RIGHTS BY DELAY.

(2) The claim form required by RCW 6.27.130(1) to be mailed to or
served on an individual judgment debtor shall be in the following form,
printed or typed in type no smaller than elite type:

CAUTION: If the plaintiff objects to your claim, you will have to
go to court and give proof of your claim. For example, if you claim
that a bank account is exempt, you may have to show the judge your bank
statements and papers that show the source of the money you deposited
in the bank. Your claim may be granted more quickly if you attach
copies of such proof to your claim.

IF THE JUDGE DENIES YOUR EXEMPTION CLAIM, YOU WILL HAVE TO PAY THE
PLAINTIFF'S COSTS. IF THE JUDGE DECIDES THAT YOU DID NOT MAKE THE
CLAIM IN GOOD FAITH, HE OR SHE MAY DECIDE THAT YOU MUST PAY THE
PLAINTIFF'S ATTORNEY FEES.

Sec. 4 RCW 48.18.430 and 2005 c 223 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The benefits, rights, privileges, and options under any annuity
contract that are due the annuitant who paid the consideration for the
annuity contract are not subject to execution and the annuitant may not
be compelled to exercise those rights, powers, or options, and
creditors are not allowed to interfere with or terminate the contract,
except:
(a) As to amounts paid for or as premium on an annuity with intent
to defraud creditors, with interest thereon, and of which the creditor
has given the insurer written notice at its home office prior to making
the payments to the annuitant out of which the creditor seeks to
recover. The notice must specify the amount claimed or the facts that
will enable the insurer to determine the amount, and must set forth the
facts that will enable the insurer to determine the insurance or
annuity contract, the person insured or annuitant and the payments
sought to be avoided on the basis of fraud.
(b) The total exemption of benefits presently due and payable to an
annuitant periodically or at stated times under all annuity contracts
may not at any time exceed ((two)) three thousand ((five hundred))
dollars per month for the length of time represented by the
installments, and a periodic payment in excess of ((two)) three
thousand ((five hundred)) dollars per month is subject to garnishee
execution to the same extent as are wages and salaries.
(c) If the total benefits presently due and payable to an annuitant
under all annuity contracts at any time exceeds payment at the rate of
((two)) three thousand ((five hundred)) dollars per month, then the
court may order the annuitant to pay to a judgment creditor or apply on
the judgment, in installments, the portion of the excess benefits that
the court determines to be just and proper, after due regard for the
reasonable requirements of the judgment debtor and the judgment
debtor's dependent family, as well as any payments required to be made
by the annuitant to other creditors under prior court orders.
(2) The benefits, rights, privileges, or options accruing under an
annuity contract to a beneficiary or assignee are not transferable or
subject to commutation, and if the benefits are payable periodically or
at stated times, the same exemptions and exceptions contained in this
section for the annuitant apply to the beneficiary or assignee.
(3) An annuity contract within the meaning of this section is any
obligation to pay certain sums at stated times, during life or lives,
or for a specified term or terms, issued for a valuable consideration,
regardless of whether or not the sums are payable to one or more
persons, jointly or otherwise, but does not include payments under life
insurance contracts at stated times during life or lives, or for a
specified term or terms.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 2.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state bar association must review the monetary
threshold amounts set forth in RCW 6.15.010 and 48.18.430 regarding
personal property and annuities exempt from execution, attachment, and
garnishment to determine whether such amounts should be modified. The
bar association shall include in its first report a review of
historical exemption amounts set by the legislature and conclusions as
to whether historical exemption amounts are an appropriate basis for
future modifications.
(2) The Washington state bar association must report to the
legislature with its recommendations by November 1, 2013, and every
five years thereafter.

--- END ---