BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that students often
bring a wealth of formal and informal learning experiences from which
they have benefited before enrolling at Washington institutions of
higher education. The legislature further finds that many of these
experiences may represent learning outcomes equivalent or superior to
those achieved by students in more traditional academic settings. It
is the intent of the legislature that Washington institutions of higher
education develop valued, reliable, and transparent policies regarding
the academic recognition of prior significant life and learning
experiences to be consistently applied at all Washington institutions
of higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The state board for community and
technical colleges, in consultation with the higher education
coordinating board, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the council of presidents, representatives from Washington
institutions of higher education, representatives from two and four-year faculty, representatives from private career schools, and
representatives from business and labor, shall develop policies for
awarding academic credit for learning from work and military
experience, military and law enforcement training, career college
training, internships and externships, and apprenticeships.
(2) The policies shall address, but are not limited to, issues
regarding verification, accreditation, transfer of academic credit,
licensing and professional recognition, and financial aid. To the
greatest extent possible, the policies shall provide for consistent
application by all institutions of higher education and a basis for
accurate and complete academic counseling.
(3) Policies developed by the state board for community and
technical colleges along with recommendations shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2010.

--- END ---