BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.695 and 2003 c 407 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each four-year institution of higher education and the state
board for community and technical colleges shall develop policies that
ensure undergraduate students enrolled in degree or certificate
programs complete their programs in a timely manner in order to make
the most efficient use of instructional resources and provide capacity
within the institution for additional students.
(2) Policies adopted under this section shall address, but not be
limited to, undergraduate students in the following circumstances:
(a) Students who accumulate more than one hundred twenty-five
percent of the number of credits required to complete their respective
baccalaureate or associate degree or certificate programs;
(b) Students who drop more than twenty-five percent of their course
load before the grading period for the quarter or semester, which
prevents efficient use of instructional resources; ((and))
(c) Students who remain on academic probation for more than one
quarter or semester; and
(d) Students who have received a passing grade in a course but wish
to repeat the course for an improved grade.
(3) Students who wish to repeat a course who have already obtained
a passing grade must wait to enroll in that course until the fourth day
of the academic quarter or semester. Enrollment will be permitted on
a space available basis as determined by the college or university.
(4) Policies adopted under this section ((may)) shall include
assessment by the institution of a surcharge in addition to regular
tuition and fees to be paid by a student for continued enrollment. The
amount of the surcharge shall result in a tuition fees assessment for
that student equivalent to the full cost of instruction for the
subsequent quarter or semester after a finding that a policy under
subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section has been violated. The
surcharge shall continue to be assessed until the institution of higher
education determines that the policy is no longer being violated.
(5) It is presumed that the surcharge shall apply to all students
described in subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section unless the
student presents to his or her registrar evidence that one or more of
the following exemptions may apply:
(a) The student is a dislocated worker as defined by RCW 50.04.075
or a person engaging in a job training program under the purview of the
workforce training and education coordinating board;
(b) The student participates in the border county higher education
opportunity project under RCW 28B.76.685;
(c) The student is a certificated teacher of the K-12 school system
pursuing continuing education credits according to certification
requirements; or
(d) The student has not been enrolled in an institution of higher
education during the preceding five years.
(6) Students who believe they are under extraordinary or unforeseen
academic or personal circumstances or were unable to complete their
baccalaureate degree program within the number of credits specified due
to an institution's constraints may petition the institution of higher
education for a special waiver from the tuition surcharge provisions of
subsection (4) of this section. The institution of higher education
shall create a process through which student petitions may be fairly
processed, heard, and determined. The process shall include a one
hundred dollar administrative fee. The entire amount of the fee shall
be refunded for those students who make a successful petition.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "full cost of instruction"
means the average instructional support in state general funds and
tuition fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020, per full-time equivalent
undergraduate at each institution of higher education for that academic
year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---