BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that Washington's
community and technical college system consists of thirty-four two-year
institutions geographically dispersed across the state to encourage and
enable student access and participation. The legislature also finds
that, compared with other states, Washington's two-year public
participation rate is ranked as high as fifth in the nation. The
legislature further finds that Washington's community and technical
colleges have been making and are continuing to make great progress
towards system efficiencies and coordination of their efforts through
such things as common course numbering, the student achievement
initiative, associate transfer degrees, eLearning and integrated basic
education, skills training, and some common administrative systems. To
encourage further efficiencies while maintaining Washington's
recognized leadership in community and technical college education,
enhance student access and success, strengthen academic programs, and
develop and retain high quality faculty, the legislature intends to
provide mechanisms for cost-effective partnerships and coordination
between institutions, including shared services, and increased
complementary programming, as well as structural administrative
efficiencies.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.020 and 2009 c 64 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the dramatically
increasing number of students requiring high standards of education
either as a part of the continuing higher education program or for
occupational education and training, or for adult basic skills and
literacy education, by creating a new, independent system of community
and technical colleges which will:
(1) Offer an open door to every citizen, regardless of his or her
academic background or experience, at a cost normally within his or her
economic means;
(2) Ensure that each college district, in coordination with
adjacent college districts, shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training, and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; community
services of an educational, cultural, and recreational nature; and
adult education, including basic skills and general, family, and
workforce literacy programs and services;
(3) Provide for basic skills and literacy education, and
occupational education and technical training ((at technical colleges))
in order to prepare students for careers in a competitive workforce;
(4) Provide or coordinate related and supplemental instruction for
apprentices at community and technical colleges;
(5) Provide administration by state and local boards which will
avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities ((or)), programs, student
services, or administrative functions; and which will encourage
efficiency in operation and creativity and imagination in education,
training, and service to meet the needs of the community and students;
(6) Allow for the growth, improvement, flexibility and modification
of the community colleges and their education, training, and service
programs as future needs occur; and
(7) Establish firmly that, except on a pilot basis as provided
under RCW 28B.50.810, community colleges are, for purposes of academic
training, two year institutions, and are an independent, unique, and
vital section of our state's higher education system, separate from
both the common school system and other institutions of higher
learning, and never to be considered for conversion into four-year
liberal arts colleges.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.50.090 and 2009 c 64 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The college board shall have general supervision and control over
the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to
the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this
chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers,
duties and responsibilities:
(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare
a single budget for the support of the state system of community and
technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the
governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;
(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive
and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and
operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance
with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter
43.88 RCW;
(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:
(a) That each college district, in coordination with colleges,
within a regional area, shall offer thoroughly comprehensive
educational, training, and service programs to meet the needs of both
the communities and students served by combining high standards of
excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical
courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and
community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational
nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and workforce literacy programs and services;
(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy,
to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the
location of the student's residence or because of the student's
educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the
judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to
meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and
the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their
differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the
administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny
admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student
if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit
from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her
presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college
not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection
(3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger
attending a technical college;
(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of
community and technical college education and training in the state;
and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of
enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college
facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include
implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role
and mission. The master plan shall also contain measurable performance
indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the
goals and priorities;
(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the
establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses
within the existing districts;
(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district
boundary lines and consolidating district structures to form multiple
campus districts consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW
28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make
such changes as it deems advisable;
(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the
community and technical colleges with respect to:
(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key
administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state
plan for vocational education,
(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial
procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements
prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW,
(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and
training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates
awarded by the colleges,
(d) Standard admission policies,
(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;
(8) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all
capital construction including the establishment, installation, and
expansion of facilities within the various college districts;
(9) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and
training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research
efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;
(10) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;
(11) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to
offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that
such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020
as now or hereafter amended;
(12) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of
state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any
community and technical college real and personal property, except such
property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW
28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that
such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and
technical college system;
(13) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community
and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may
make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by
the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of
the current biennium and on July 1 of each succeeding biennium from the
state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the
average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for
the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by
the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by
the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW:
PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual
expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less
the initial advance made in such biennium;
(14) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this
section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the
same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income
thereof; and
(15) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The state board for community and
technical colleges, in collaboration with the boards of trustees for
the community and technical colleges, shall identify potential
administrative efficiencies, complementary administrative functions,
and complementary academic programs based upon consultation with
colleges within a regional area. To identify administrative
efficiencies and complementary administrative functions and programs,
colleges within the regional area shall work in coordination with an
equal number of stakeholders from their boards of trustees,
administration, faculty, employee union representatives, student
representatives, and community representatives. Factors to be
considered include, but are not limited to:
(a) The economic feasibility and cost savings anticipated from the
proposed changes;
(b) The extent to which the changes will contribute to student
access to academic programs and services, including greater flexibility
for students to transfer credits and obtain degrees and certificates
from other colleges within the regional area;
(c) The extent to which the changes contribute to the vision,
goals, priorities, and statewide strategies in the comprehensive master
plan and the statewide strategic master plan for higher education; and
(d) The extent to which the changes will contribute to
strengthening the retention and recruitment of high quality faculty,
including, but not limited to, full-time faculty, faculty development,
and academic programs.
(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
develop and adopt a detailed plan for the implementation of any
identified changes that would result in cost savings while maintaining
or enhancing student access and achievement. The plan must establish
a time frame within which any proposed changes must be accomplished and
must include any agreements, approved by the state board for community
and technical colleges, between colleges within a regional area to
provide complementary academic programs or coordinate administrative
functions. The implementation plan shall take effect upon approval by
the state board for community and technical colleges. The state board
shall submit a preliminary report on the plan to the appropriate
legislative committees and the governor December 1, 2010, and shall
submit a final report December 1, 2011.
(3) Any cost savings realized as a result of the implementation of
administrative efficiencies, complementary administrative functions,
and complementary academic programming under the plan shall be retained
by the respective districts to be used for enhancing student access and
success.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board, using the criteria established under RCW
28B.50.090(6) and in consultation with the boards of trustees for the
community and technical colleges, shall identify adjacent college
districts that can feasibly be consolidated or whose boundaries can
feasibly be modified to form a multiple campus district. The primary
considerations shall be the extent to which the changes will: (a)
Affect student access to academic programs and services, (b) affect the
retention and recruitment of high quality faculty, and (c) result in
financial efficiencies.
(2) By December 1, 2012, the college board, in consultation with
local boards of trustees, shall evaluate any proposed district
consolidations or boundary changes identified in subsection (1) of this
section as it deems advisable and shall submit any required supporting
legislative changes to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature.

--- END ---