BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2011, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2009 c 497 s 1005 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (1) $64,319 of the remaining
reappropriation for El Centro de la raza may be used for building
infrastructure. (2) $10,000 of the remaining reappropriation for
miracle league handicapped baseball may be used for pre-grading and
resurfacing construction. (3) $1,394,107 of the remaining
reappropriation for MOBIUS/inland northwest science and technology
center may be used for acquisition, design, and ((construction))
renovation. (4) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the
Vancouver national reserve west barracks project may be used for
preservation activities. (5) $500,000 of the remaining reappropriation
for the Soundway property preservation project may be used by the city
of Seattle, in cooperation with the nature consortium for habitat,
recreation improvements, or stewardship of the property, if the city of
Seattle enacts pending city legislation to preserve the property and
place it under the jurisdiction of city of Seattle parks and
recreation. (6) The reappropriation shall be used for projects in
order of their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of
matching funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and
reappropriation authority among the following sections of this act in
order to prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed:
1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017,
and 1018.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,658,000))
$8,471,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,799,000))
$45,612,000

Sec. 1002 2009 c 497 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The ((re))appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The ((re))appropriation is subject to the provisions of section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) The ((re))appropriation is subject to the project list in
section 107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(3) Up to $1,000,000 of the ((re))appropriation for the Pacific
Northwest national labs campus infrastructure project is provided
solely for giga-pop infrastructure.
(4) Up to $2,200,000 of the ((re))appropriation is provided solely
for military communities infrastructure projects. Military communities
infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements and the purchase of real property in fee simple to restrict
the use of accident potential zones and clear zones. The office of
financial management shall establish a competitive process for
selecting projects to receive the grants. Final allocation of these
grants shall be at the discretion and with the approval of the director
of the office of financial management.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones allowed by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Up to $481,000 of the ((re))appropriation is provided solely
for improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air force
base.
(5) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,172,000))
$1,733,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,828,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$46,890,000

Sec. 1003 2009 c 497 s 1023 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The ((re))appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The ((re))appropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: ((The)) $3,000,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for a grant to the port of Grays Harbor for the bulk
liquid facility project.
The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,228,000))
$1,298,000

Appropriation:
((Job Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,697,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,702,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,930,000))
$41,697,000

Sec. 1004 2009 c 497 s 1029 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(3) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition. If the facility is not constructed by June 30, 2015, the
school district shall reimburse the state an amount equal to $1,000,000
increased by the average percentage appreciation in property values for
undeveloped land in the surrounding area between the date the school
district acquired the property and June 30, 2015 or the date the school
district disposes of the property.
(4) $600,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the institute for
community leadership may be used for land acquisition.
(5) $250,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest ilocandia association may be used for acquisition and
renovation.
(6) $200,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the library
connection at Greenbridge may be used for construction and equipment.
(7) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition.
(8) $1,100,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Kitsap SEED
(Port of Bremerton) project may be used by the Port of Bremerton for
infrastructure to support economic development efforts.
(9) The reappropriation for the Tacoma Narrows bridge lights
project is reduced by $1,400,000. It is the intent of the legislature
that the project must complete a fund raising plan for installation and
maintenance of the lights before consideration of funding the full
project.
(10) The remaining reappropriation for MOBIUS/inland northwest
science and technology center may be used for acquisition, design, and
renovation.
(11) The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of
their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,200,000))
$52,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,694,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($132,894,000))
$124,157,000

Sec. 1005 2009 c 497 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 1019, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,751,000))
$10,342,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,378,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,129,000))
$15,720,000

Sec. 1006 2009 c 497 s 1031 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Belfair Sewer Improvements (20084852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
((Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000))
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

Sec. 1007 2009 c 497 s 1034 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Quillayute Valley Wood-Fire Boiler (20084858)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$20,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Sec. 1008 2009 c 497 s 1035 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Snohomish County Biodiesel (20084859)

Reappropriation:
Energy Freedom Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$419,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Sec. 1009 2009 c 497 s 1039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,000,000))
$10,930,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,201,000))
$42,131,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,974,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($255,175,000))
$258,105,000

Sec. 1010 2009 c 497 s 1040 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Projects must be selected based on their readiness to proceed.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:
(3) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Admiral Theatre-No Theatre Left
Behind $140,000

((Artspace Everett Lofts $1,000,000))

Building a Foundation for Discovery $250,000

Campus Consolidation (Cornish) $375,000

Convert Key Bank to Everett's Plaza
Theatre $500,000

Cottage Renovation (Hedgebrook) $20,000

Downstairs at the 5th $800,000

Federal Way Performing Arts Center $325,000

Gateway Center (Lummi) $150,000

James Center for the Performing Arts
(Sequim) $150,000

Langston Hughes Performing Arts
Center $475,000

Legacy Project (Imagine) $200,000

Modular Classrooms for Dance
(Gladish) $30,000

Mt. Baker Theatre $1,000,000

Museum Expansion (Maryhill) $1,500,000

New Hands On Children's Museum $1,000,000

Reconstruction of First Stage
(Issaquah) $400,000

Seattle Opera Center $650,000

Stage Two (Whidbey) $450,000

Vashon Arts Center $1,115,000

Visual Arts Education Center
(Snohomish County) $1,000,000

Viva Vera Capital Campaign $70,000

Total (($11,600,000)) $10,600,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,600,000))
$7,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,600,000))
$55,950,000

Sec. 1011 2009 c 497 s 1048 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:
(8) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Local Community Projects

7th St. Theater $330,000

Arc of Tri-Cities $900,000

Bellevue Clinic--Seattle Children's Hospital $2,000,000

Blessed Sacrament Food and Emergency Facilities Renovation $200,000

Children's Village Expansion Project $500,000

Clark County Food Distribution Facility $1,500,000

Coal Creek YMCA (Newcastle) $800,000

Dawson Place Child Advocacy Center $1,000,000

Federal Way National Little League Field Lighting Project and Monument Entry Sign $177,000

Harlequin Theater $235,000

Home Dialysis Center and Professional Workforce Training $250,000

Kirkland Park Place Redevelopment $2,000,000

Livingston Baker Fire and Life Safety $750,000

Marshland Diking District $500,000

Marysville Boys & Girls Club $500,000

McClure Middle School Energy Saving Performance Contract Demonstration Project $1,000,000

Mountains to Sound Greenway $100,000

Mukilteo Boys & Girls Club $150,000

Neighborcare Health Clinic and Rainier Beach Medical Clinic $1,000,000

Parkland at Japanese Gulch $1,000,000

Petrovitsky Park Upgrade $750,000

Phoenix House $200,000

Poulsbo Marine Center $500,000

Public Broadcasting Frequency Expansion $223,000

((Ready by Five Early Learning Center $1,000,000))

Renovations to Mill Creek City Annex Building $30,000

Snohomish County Emergency Center $1,000,000

South Tacoma Community Center $1,000,000

Whatcom Hospice House $700,000

Zina Linnik $950,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,245,000))
$15,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,245,000))
$15,184,000

Sec. 1012 2009 c 497 s 1014 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Jobs in Communities (20064951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,960,000))
$8,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,250,000))
$9,510,000

Sec. 1013 2009 c 497 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (20074003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
43.63A.135.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1007, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(3) The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of
their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,050,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,050,000))
$8,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(2) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(3) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(4) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(5) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(6) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Local Community Projects

Aviation High School $2,000,000

Children's Village Expansion $250,000

East King County Performing Arts Center (PACE) $2,000,000

Hanford Reach Interpretive Center $500,000

Lake Boren Park - Replace Unsafe Playground $325,000

Museum of Flight Space Gallery $3,000,000

Pike Market Workforce Childcare Facility $1,000,000

Rainier Beach Medical & Dental Clinic (Neighborcare Health) $500,000

Relocation of NAVOS Mental Health Center in Burien $1,000,000

Restoration of Historic Pickford Theater $250,000

San Juan Island Farmers Market - Purchase Historic Building $375,000

South King County Multiservice Center $300,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000

Sec. 1015 2009 c 497 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000007)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Projects must be selected based on their readiness to proceed.
(2) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.
(3) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Allen Place $800,000

Auburn Boys & Girls Club $800,000

Central Kitsap Community Campus
YMCA $800,000

Coal Creek Family YMCA $800,000

East Pierce County HOPE Center $800,000

Highline YMCA $800,000

Hough Pool Renovation $150,000

Jim Parsley Community Center $800,000

Kitsap Girl Scout Center $205,000

Naval Avenue Boys & Girls Club $80,000

Toutle River Ranch $360,000

West Sound Teen Center $305,000

YMCA Spokane Central $800,000

Total $7,500,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,500,000))
$5,625,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,500,000))
$35,625,000

Sec. 1016 2009 c 497 s 1030 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1014, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(2) $105,521 of the remaining reappropriation for El Centro de la
raza center may be used for building infrastructure.
(3) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Salishan
housing community project may be used for infrastructure and housing.
(4) The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of
their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,715,000))
$8,440,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,451,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,166,000))
$19,891,000

Sec. 1017 2009 c 497 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Community Schools (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following:
(1) The acquisition, rehabilitation, expansion, or improvement of
surplus school buildings to be converted into community facilities for
the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for children and
families.
(a) Eligible applicants include local governments, nonprofit
organizations, nonprofit early learning providers, and tribal
governments. Only the following surplus schools may be eligible for
grant funding under this section: Fauntleroy school, University
Heights school, and Martin Luther King elementary school.
(b) As part of the grant process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan for the use of the surplus school that includes
information on the following:
(i) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
applicant to provide or coordinate services for children and families;
(ii) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible
applicant and each partner; and
(iii) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and coordinated services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this section or from other federal, state, local, or private
sources.
(c) Project applicants must demonstrate that the proposed project
is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and requires
state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project
that may include acquisition.
(d) If grant funds under this subsection are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, the sale proceeds must be
used by the local school board disposing of such property for
renovation, replacement, or new construction of school facilities in
the district, but shall not be used as local match for projects
receiving state school construction assistance grants.
(e) In contracts for grants authorized under this subsection, the
department shall include provisions that require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(2) The construction of a non-mobile facility, accessible to
students in central and eastern Washington for the purpose of financial
literacy education, for the eastern and western Washington junior
achievement world initiative.
(3) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$3,750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$3,750,000

Sec. 1018 2009 c 497 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000008)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as otherwise directed before the effective date of this
section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 1001, 1002,
1003, 1004, 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, and 1018.
(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

A Home for Opportunity - CASA Latina $325,000

Building the new Eastside Clinic - Community Health Care $1,900,000

Community Center for Sand Point Housing $350,000

Donald G. Topping HOPE Center - Boys & Girls Clubs of Puget Sound $1,934,250

Dove House (Domestic Violence/Sexual Assault Program of Jefferson County) $240,000

Duvall Multi-Service Center - Hopelink $617,985

Education and Training Center Mt. Baker Planned Parenthood $881,847

Emmanuel Family Life Center - Richard Allen Enterprises $400,594

Eritrean Community Center Expansion $300,000

Ferndale Boys & Girls Club $752,847

Giant Step - RRA $520,761

Greenbridge Early Learning Center $1,419,281

High Point Neighborhood Center $2,000,000

Highline YMCA $1,163,000

Milgard Work Opportunity Center - Tacoma Goodwill $1,850,000

Northeast Community Center Expansion $1,300,000

Pierce County Therapy Center $128,000

Rainier Vista & Rainier Valley Teen Center $2,400,000

Repurposing Daybreak Star $87,500

Riverwalk Point Community Building - Spokane Neighborhood Action Program $79,253

Rotary Support Center for Families $3,500,000

Safety & Systems Improvements at El Centro de la raza $250,031

TAF Community Learning Space (CLS) $1,500,000

The Keller House Services Center $600,000

YMCA/YWCA Central Spokane Facility $3,500,000

Total $28,000,349

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,001,000))
$21,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,001,000))
$21,001,000

Sec. 1019 2009 c 497 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,000,000))
$132,000,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($327,000,000))
$227,000,000
Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

Sec. 1020 2009 c 497 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $313,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $687,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Port Angeles Economic Development Agreement (30000024)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriation is provided solely to carry out paragraph 2.C. of
the economic development agreement associated with the case of Lower
Elwha Klallam Tribe et al v. State et al, Thurston county superior
court, cause No. 05-2-01595-8. The state has already provided $250,000
to carry out that paragraph. After disbursement of the appropriation
in this section, the state will provide no further funding under the
economic development agreement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Sec. 1022 2009 c 497 s 1055 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,640,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
nonfederal matching funds and state agency costs associated with the
army corps of engineers flood hazard mitigation projects for the
Chehalis river basin.
(2) $1,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the
Chehalis basin flood control authority or other authorized local
government groups to develop governance agreements for development of
flood hazard mitigation measures throughout the basin. The agreements
must be executed by July 1, 2011.
(3) $1,700,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for the
Chehalis basin flood control authority to administer studies for
development of basin-wide flood hazard mitigation measures, provided
that any expenditures from the reappropriation for studies, plans, or
investigations of large scale retention structures shall be limited to
fifty percent of the total cost for such studies, plans, or
investigations.
(4) $200,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for an early
flood warning system.
(5) It is the intent of the legislature to fulfill the commitment
of section 101, chapter 179, Laws of 2008 and chapter 180, Laws of
2008, by appropriating funds when the federal match requirement is
needed.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,351,000))
$4,540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,649,000))
$3,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$42,010,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Sec. 1023 2009 c 497 s 1071 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Capital Lake Plan Completion (20082953)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided for lake
management efforts to control invasive species. The Capital Lake
adaptive management planning process must be suspended.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($200,000))
$100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$400,000

Sec. 1024 2009 c 497 s 1060 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (20021008)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$395,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,105,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,116,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,706,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,322,000

Sec. 1025 2009 c 497 s 1061 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Highway-License Building Repair and Renewal (20061013)

Reappropriation:
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$76,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,423,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,523,000

Sec. 1026 2009 c 497 s 1063 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Natural Resources Building Repairs and Renewal (20061014)

Reappropriation:
State Vehicle Parking Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$22,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,000))
$52,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $78,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,853,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,520,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,503,000

Sec. 1027 2009 c 497 s 1064 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (20081004)

Reappropriation:
((Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000))
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $584,000
((Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000))
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,121,000

Sec. 1028 2009 c 497 s 1068 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (20081015)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000
((Thurston County Capital Facilities Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $723,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,103,000))
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,583,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,686,000

Sec. 1029 2009 c 497 s 1073 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works Preservation (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,800,000))
$3,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,109,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,909,000))
$37,509,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus Heating System Improvements (30000486)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 1031 2009 c 497 s 1081 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
Pro Arts Building (91000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Predesign and design funds are provided
solely to develop a new office building. Up to $225,000 may be used to
develop the predesign for the Pro Arts site to include a new office
building that may house tenants from the general administration
building including the office of financial management, the Puget Sound
partnership, the office of the state treasurer, and other small
commissions and agencies. The predesign shall be developed with
representatives from the capitol campus design advisory committee, the
department of general administration, and the office of financial
management. The predesign shall be used to develop the optimum use of
space for the Pro Arts site, identify any required mitigation, parking
requirements, schedule of construction, and cost of construction. The
predesign shall be provided to the appropriate fiscal committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management by February 1, 2010.
The allotment for design funds will be made after the predesign is
approved by the office of financial management and the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$225,000

Sec. 1032 2009 c 497 s 1065 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (20081007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,671,000))
$8,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,481,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,329,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,981,000))
$16,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Camp Murray New Primary Gate Entrance (30000482)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,270,000
Military Department Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,657,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,927,000

Sec. 1034 2009 c 497 s 1086 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,069,000))
$8,672,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,709,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,778,000))
$10,381,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,478,000))
$29,081,000

Sec. 1035 2009 c 497 s 1087 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000003)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($679,000))
$3,139,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,229,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,908,000))
$13,368,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop (20082006)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,736,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,164,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,900,000

Sec. 1037 2009 c 497 s 1091 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historical Courthouse Rehabilitation (20082851)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for courthouse
protection and preservation, including character defining architectural
features, general repairs, system upgrades, payments for renovation
completed since January 1, 2006, and improvements to access and
accommodations for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation work
must comply with the secretary of interior's standards for
rehabilitation. Grants may not be used for expenditures for courthouse
maintenance. Only counties with historic courthouses that continue to
maintain county functions are eligible for grants. Counties receiving
grants shall provide an equal amount of matching funds from public or
private sources. The department shall use up to two percent of the
appropriation for program administration.
(2) The society shall continue to use the revised eligibility
criteria and grant application process that includes the review of
projects selected for funding by the courthouse advisory committee.
Those projects chosen for funding shall undergo a review by the
department of general administration's barrier free program to ensure
that they meet Americans with disabilities act standards and
accessibility and all other Americans with disabilities act
requirements are maintained during the construction. The existing
historic courthouse advisory committee shall continue to review grant
applications and make funding recommendations to the state historic
preservation officer.
(3) The society and the courthouse advisory committee shall include
readiness to proceed when developing the priority list of projects to
fund.
(4) The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of
their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: This section
and 1038.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,800,000))
$2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$4,300,000

Sec. 1038 2009 c 497 s 1093 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000004)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for courthouse protection
and preservation, including character defining architectural features,
general repairs, system upgrades, payments for renovation completed
since January 1, 2006, and improvements to access and accommodations
for persons with disabilities. All rehabilitation work must comply
with the secretary of interior's standards for rehabilitation. Grants
may not be used for expenditures for courthouse maintenance. Only
counties with historic courthouses that continue to maintain county
functions are eligible for grants. Counties receiving grants shall
provide an equal amount of matching funds from public or private
sources. The department shall use up to two percent of the
appropriation for program administration.
(2) The department shall continue to use the revised eligibility
criteria and grant application process that includes the review of
projects selected for funding by the courthouse advisory committee.
Those projects chosen for funding shall undergo a review by the
department of general administration's barrier free program to ensure
that they meet the Americans with disabilities act standards and that
all other Americans with disabilities act requirements are maintained
during the construction. The existing historic courthouse advisory
committee shall continue to review grant applications and make funding
recommendations to the state historic preservation officer.
(3) The department and the courthouse advisory committee shall
include readiness to proceed when developing the priority list of
projects to fund.
(4) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: This section
and 1037.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$1,500,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 2001 2009 c 497 s 2001 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
Replace Hawthorne Hall Dormitory (20082001)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office of financial management shall
allot funds for the dormitory construction at the criminal justice
training commission only after the recommendation of the steering
committee participating in the analysis in section 1057 of this act has
been provided to the legislative fiscal committees and submitted to the
office of financial management for review.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,745,000))

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $632,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,293,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($0))
$16,934,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,670,000))
$18,859,000

Sec. 2002 2009 c 497 s 2002 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
School Mapping (30000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The legislature intends to complete ((half
of)) the remaining community and technical college mapping with this
appropriation ((and to appropriate funding for the remaining half of
unmapped square feet in community and technical colleges in the 2011-13
biennium)).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($546,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,046,000))
$1,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
Central Office Roof Replacement and Fall Restraint Upgrade
(30000012)

Appropriation:
Accident Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Medical Aid Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 2004 2009 c 497 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $38,462,000 is provided from the American
recovery and reinvestment act of 2009.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,348,000))
$38,348,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,462,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,810,000))
$76,810,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($62,810,000))
$76,810,000

Sec. 2005 2009 c 497 s 2037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
State Veterans Cemetery (20082004)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,815,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,909,000
Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,010,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,825,000))
$9,734,000

Sec. 2006 2009 c 497 s 2038 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works - Facilities Preservation (30000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,585,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,085,000))
$7,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen, and Site
Work (30000482)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,819,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,819,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Westside Corrections Complex: Siting and Predesign (92000032)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2009 c 497 s 3007 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (20052851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,850,000))
$7,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,147,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,797,000))
$18,197,000

Sec. 3002 2009 c 497 s 3020 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Breazeale Interpretive Center (20082856)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($270,000))
$419,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,000))
$76,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Settlement Funding to Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $17,500,000 of the cleanup settlement
account--state appropriation is provided solely for cleanup activities
associated with the Asarco contamination in the city of Everett.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $511,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,300,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,452,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,263,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,263,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Diesel Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000139)

The appropriation in this section is provided contingent upon the
department working with the Port of Tacoma to establish a diesel idling
reduction program. The department shall report to the legislature by
December 1, 2010, on the progress of the diesel idling reduction
program and other efforts to reduce diesel particle emissions in
Tacoma.

Appropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Wood Smoke Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000140)

Appropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000
Water Pollution Control Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

Sec. 3008 2009 c 497 s 3049 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$500,000

Sec. 3009 2009 c 497 s 3052 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$2,380,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 3010 2009 c 497 s 3054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following terms
and conditions: $1,343,000 of the storm water account--state
appropriation is provided solely for storm water retrofit and low-impact development in the city of Bremerton.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account - Waste
Disposal Facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,284,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account - Waste
Disposal Facilities, 1980 . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
Storm Water Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,609,000))
$47,109,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,609,000))
$47,109,000

Sec. 3011 2009 c 497 s 3047 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000013)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $4,270,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for grants to local governments for local waste and
pollution prevention projects. Grants must fund new organics
composting and conversion, green building, and moderate risk waste
initiatives described in the state "beyond waste" plan, including
alternatives to backyard burning of organic materials.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($135,680,000))
$152,680,000

Sec. 3012 2009 c 497 s 3060 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,700,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,737,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,140,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $81,577,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($217,700,000))
$261,577,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for wastewater
treatment and reclamation projects as follows:

Project Funding

Potlatch wastewater treatment and reclamation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,645,000

Willapa Harbor sewer project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Omak sanitary sewer project . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Sultan wastewater treatment facility . . . . . . . . . . . . $335,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

Sec. 3014 2009 c 497 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) If department of ecology and Kittitas county reach an agreement
on a preferred approach, after consultation with major Yakima basin
governments and stakeholders, the appropriation may be redirected to
provide funds to Kittitas county to purchase water for domestic
groundwater users in the Yakima basin water resource inventory area
thirty-nine that have a groundwater right with a priority date later
than May 10, 1905, as well as for all out-of-priority groundwater users
in the Yakima basin.
(2) If an agreement is reached, a portion of the appropriation may
be used for administrative costs, not to exceed four percent, and other
costs associated with acquiring and transferring the water rights.
Kittitas county shall recover all costs from participating domestic
water users for their prorated portion of the cost of securing a water
right or rights for this purpose and associated annual operational and
federal water service contract costs owed to the United States bureau
of reclamation. Funds recovered in this manner shall be placed in a
Kittitas county domestic groundwater users drought preparedness
account, created herein.
(3) Moneys may also be expended to develop and implement various
agricultural transfer methods as alternatives to permanent purchase and
dry-up of agricultural water rights, including interruptible water
supply agreements, long-term agricultural land fallowing, water banks,
reduced consumptive use through efficiency, or cropping while
maintaining historic return flows, and purchase by end users with
leasebacks under defined conditions.

Appropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup Asarco Contamination on Vashon/Maury Islands and Mines
(91000009)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,100,000 of the cleanup settlement account appropriation and
$10,900,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation are
provided solely for the department of ecology to assist King County in
the acquisition and remediation of property on Vashon and Maury
Islands. The properties are in the Tacoma smelter plume area and are
contaminated with arsenic and other heavy metals from the Asarco
smelter.
(2) $1,500,000 of the cleanup settlement account appropriation is
provided solely for the department of ecology to commence cleanup
activities related to the former Asarco mine sites: Monte Cristo, Van
Stone, Cholett, and Golden King.

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,600,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,900,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,500,000

Sec. 3016 2009 c 497 s 3039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Protection Study (20082855)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to conduct a study to determine the
number of decertified levees in the state and to identify strategies
for maintaining accreditation, re-accrediting, or recertifying ((the))
levees so that they ((provide)) are recognized by federal agencies as
providing optimum protection for the communities protected by the
levees. The department must prioritize areas to include in the study
based on population and the economic impact of potential flood damage.
The study must include the following components:
(1) A working group of levee managers, local agencies, and
stakeholders to advise and inform the study;
(2) ((A)) In-state examples of the costs and processes of technical
review of the structural integrity of levee systems;
(3) An inventory, map, and ((rate the effectiveness)) description
of the level of protection of existing levee systems; ((and))
(4) The development of strategies and actions needed to improve the
existing levee system and to ensure certification by the United States
army corps of engineers for one-hundred year flood protection;
(5) The identification of current funding sources and the amounts
available for levee improvements; and
(6) Recommendation for additional new funding sources and options.
(7) The study must be completed and a report provided to the
appropriate legislative committees by ((July)) December 1, 2010.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Sec. 3017 2009 c 497 s 3085 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (30000006)

The appropriation in this section is provided contingent upon the
commission providing advance notice to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management
before applying for federal grants for acquisition of park lands and
facilities. The commission shall submit this information in the form
of a report that explains the funding source, the match and use
requirements, a description of the project that will be funded, and a
description of future impacts to the operating budget.

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($990,000))
$1,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,990,000))
$5,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park - Wastewater System (30000483)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Sec. 3019 2009 c 497 s 3168 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

((The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:))
(1) The reappropriation and the appropriation in this section are
provided contingent upon the department providing advance notice to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature and the office of
financial management before applying for federal grants for acquisition
of fish and wildlife habitat lands. The department shall submit this
information in the form of a report that explains the funding source,
the match and use requirements, a description of the project that will
be funded, and a description of future impacts to the operating budget.
(2) Up to $2,300,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
capital projects and engineering to pay the total cost of labor and
materials provided by the department of fish and wildlife.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Game Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000,000))
$31,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,000,000))
$35,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($171,925,000))
$177,925,000

Sec. 3020 2009 c 497 s 3157 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for the
repair necessary to restore the facility for limited operations;
(2) $550,000 of the amount appropriated is provided ((solely)) for
property acquisition and permitting. No later than June 1, 2010, the
department shall submit to the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature construction costs that total no
more than fourteen million dollars.
If the department does not acquire property, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse; and
(3) $50,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for the
department to participate in a work group with the Puyallup Tribe of
Indians that will make recommendations no later than December 1, 2009,
regarding the options for improving production from hatcheries along
the Puyallup river system while reducing cost. Options to be
considered include shifting production among the hatcheries,
consolidation of hatcheries, and shifting responsibilities for
construction, maintenance and operations of hatcheries.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,105,000

Sec. 3021 2009 c 497 s 3169 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000149)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($677,000))
$420,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,677,000))
$10,420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Lecque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

Sec. 3023 2009 c 497 s 3172 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000022)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,050,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,050,000))
$5,000,000

Sec. 3024 2009 c 497 s 3178 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (30000145)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($943,000))
$897,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,780,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,723,000))
$4,677,000

Sec. 3025 2009 c 497 s 3182 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Programmatic (30000179)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($400,000))
$250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,900,000))
$5,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Carpenter Creek Estuary Restoration (92000023)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for estuary
restoration in Carpenter Creek.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

Sec. 3027 2009 c 497 s 3197 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement (30000051)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
acquisition of working forest lands at risk of conversion to nonforest
uses and working natural resource lands that will protect and enhance
the value of trust land holdings. The legislature finds that the
chronic loss of working forest lands threatens the long-term prospects
of the timber products and other natural resource industries, which in
turn threatens the long-term economic return for the beneficiaries of
state trust lands. Acquisition of these lands is intended to help
stabilize the primary source of revenue to trust land beneficiaries.
The department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by October 1, 2010, and every two years thereafter,
indicating the lands purchased under this section, showing the
locations, acres, purchase price, and within that purchase price, the
value of the property attributed to the future value of timber harvests
given an expected rate of return for timber lands, and the value of the
property attributed to future development of the property. It is the
intent of the legislature to lease the development rights of these
conversion lands and retain them as long-term working natural resource
lands under the sustainable harvest plan. Working forest lands
acquired under this section shall be managed at a level equal to or
greater than seventy-five percent of the expected harvest under the
sustainable harvest plan.
The department shall not proceed with the Ice Harbor land exchange
prior to June 30, 2011.

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Real Property Replacement
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000070)

(1) $600,000 of the forest and fish support account appropriation
is provided contingent upon the sale of the king air by the department.
The office of financial management shall allot only an amount that is
equivalent to the proceeds received from the sale of the king air and
no more than $600,000.
(2) If the appropriation in this section is less than the level
demanded in submitted applications, the department of natural resources
shall prioritize the use of the funds as follows:
(3) Highest priority shall be given to applications that include
one or more of the following conditions, in the following priority
order: (a) The greatest proportion of riparian buffer impacted in the
related forest practices application; (b) lands in deferred tax status
of classified timber land or classified open space as defined in RCW
84.34.020; (c) lands at greatest risk of conversion to other land uses
as determined by county zoning and land classifications and proximity
to urban growth areas or other areas of concentrated land development;
(d) lands that are certified by a forest certification recognized by
the department; (e) the applicant has not received a forestry riparian
easement since July 1, 2007; (f) the applicant is not a nonprofit
organization; (g) the applicant has been waiting three years or more
for a forestry easement purchase; and (h) the application does not
include any of the conditions specified in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The lowest priority shall be given to applications that include
any of the following conditions: (a) The forest management activities
for the aggregated ownership of the landowner referenced in the
application, his or her spouse, and his or her children exceed the
small forest landowner definition in RCW 76.13.120(2)(c); (b) the
applicant has had legal ownership for less than five years, except when
the applicant is a lineal descendant of a landowner meeting this
condition; (c) the applicant has an outstanding violation of the forest
practices act under chapter 76.09 RCW; (d) the applicant is in default
on a financial obligation to an agency of the state including
noncompliance with a child support order under RCW 74.20A.320; (e) the
application is for land on which other conservation easements have been
executed and recorded on the title; or (f) the land is owned by a
nonprofit organization that does not have deferred tax designations of
either classified timber land or classified open space as defined in
RCW 84.34.020 and does not have a county-recognized forest management
plan.
(5) The department of natural resources shall use legally binding
affidavits to obtain from the applicants any supplemental information
necessary to assist in prioritizing the use of the funds appropriated
in this section. The department must verify the prioritized use of the
funds appropriated in this section by: (a) Investigating a random
subset of affidavits for easements purchased for an amount less than
one hundred thousand dollars; and (b) investigating all easements
purchased for an amount in excess of one hundred thousand dollars.
(6) The department shall work with interested stakeholders to
develop recommendations for changes to the ongoing eligibility,
prioritization, and policy provisions of the forestry riparian easement
program specified in RCW 76.13.120. In developing these
recommendations, the department and the interested stakeholders shall
consider the inclusion of the conditions utilized in this section to
establish eligibility and prioritization of funding. The department
and the interested stakeholders shall submit final recommendations in
the form of legislation to the office of financial management and the
legislature by October 1, 2010.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Forest and Fish Support Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000

Sec. 3029 2009 c 497 s 3203 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Trust Land Transfer (30000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to
transfer from trust status, or enter into fifty year leases for,
certain trust lands of statewide significance deemed appropriate for
state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, housing and essential
government services, or recreation purposes. The approved list of
properties for lease or transfer is identified in the LEAP capital
document No. 2009-2a, developed April 23, 2009.
(2) Property transferred under this section must be appraised and
transferred at fair market value. The value of the timber transferred
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred must be
deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account.
(3) Property subject to lease agreements under this section must be
appraised at fair market value. Lease terms must be fifty years with
options to renew for an additional fifty years. Lease payments must be
lump sum payments for the entire term of the lease at the beginning of
the lease. The department shall calculate such lump sum payments using
professional appraisal standards. These lease payments may not exceed
the fee simple purchase price based on current fair market value and
must be deposited by the department to the common school construction
account in the same manner as lease revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction may be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040.
(4) All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement
this section are authorized to be paid out of the appropriations.
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs and shall not
exceed one and nine-tenths percent of the appropriation.
(5) Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust
lands of equal value may occur if the exchange is in the interest of
each trust, as determined by the board of natural resources.
(6) Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the
department, with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall
execute and record a real property instrument that dedicates the
transferred properties to the purposes identified in subsection (1) of
this section. Transfer and lease agreements for properties identified
in subsection (1) of this section must include terms that restrict the
use of the property to the intended purpose. Transfer and lease
agreements may include provisions for receiving agencies to request
alternative uses of the property, provided the alternative uses are
compatible with the original intended public purpose and the department
and legislature approves such uses.
(7) The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith
to carry out the intent of this section. However, the department or
receiving agencies may remove a property from the transfer list based
on new, substantive information, if it is determined that transfer of
the property is not in the statewide interest of either the common
school trust or the receiving agency.
(8) The department shall execute trust land transfers that, after
the deduction of reasonable costs as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, eighty percent of the total value of transferred property is
timber value and is deposited in the common school construction
account. To achieve the eighty percent requirement, the department may
choose to lease properties originally intended as transfers.
(9) $4,189,000 of the amount appropriated is provided solely for
fifty-year leases of development rights from timber lands at risk of
conversion to non-timber land uses purchased from appropriations in the
2007-2009 fiscal period.
(10) ((On June 30, 2011,)) The state treasurer shall transfer all
remaining uncommitted funds from this appropriation to the common
school construction account and the appropriations in this section
shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,133,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,133,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Puget Sound Cleanup and Recovery (92000003)

$1,030,000 of the cleanup settlement account--state appropriation
is provided solely for removal of contaminated pilings and habitat
restoration in Commencement Bay. These funds are provided contingent
upon receiving concurrence from the department of ecology that the
project is aligned with the ten year plan for cleaning up Asarco-related contamination.

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Hazard Reduction and Biomass Equipment (91000003)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The natural resources equipment account appropriation in this
section is provided solely for the purchase of forest biomass feedstock
processing equipment appropriate for forest biomass-to-energy projects
in eastern Washington in areas with a scarcity of primary wood
processing facilities, or for making grants on a competitive basis to
local governments or nonprofit entities in such local areas for
purchase of such equipment. Equipment purchased, either by the
department or a grantee, must be made available for lease, or other
lawful means of conveyance, or be operated directly, for use in forest
biomass-to-energy projects in an area of eastern Washington with a
scarcity of primary wood processing facilities. In providing for the
use of such equipment, consideration shall be given by the department
or grantee in the opportunity for the forest biomass-to-energy project
to promote forest treatments to improve forest health and/or remove
hazardous buildup of forest fuels. Consideration may also be given to
generating jobs in counties with high rates of unemployment.
(2) The state building construction account--state appropriation is
provided solely for forest improvement treatments on forest lands of
eastern Washington with the five highest priority fire and disease
hazards in Stevens, Ferry, Lincoln, Pend Oreille, Okanogan, and Spokane
counties. Forest treatments on private lands funded by this
appropriation require an agreement with the property owner that
includes a commitment to maintain the improvements to forest health.

Appropriation:
Natural Resources Equipment Account . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,021,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,771,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,771,000

Sec. 3032 2009 c 497 s 3106 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20024003)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund projects in the
following order: (1) The department of natural resources Cypress
Island project; and (2) alternate projects approved by the legislature
from the same account in biennia succeeding that in which the funds
were originally appropriated. The reappropriations shall be used for
projects in order of their readiness to proceed for the intended scope
and level of matching funds and shall not be awarded to alternate
projects after the effective date of this act. The agency may
redistribute reappropriations in this section as needed to fund
projects that are ready to proceed in sections 3032, 3033, 3034, and
3035 of this act.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($479,000))
$400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($637,000))
$558,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,363,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$44,921,000

Sec. 3033 2009 c 497 s 3109 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated. The
reappropriations shall be used for projects in order of their readiness
to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching funds and shall
not be awarded to alternate projects after the effective date of this
act. The agency may redistribute reappropriations in this section as
needed to fund projects that are ready to proceed in sections 3032,
3033, 3034, and 3035 of this act.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,499,000))
$1,480,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,789,000))
$4,056,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,288,000))
$5,536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,712,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$44,248,000

Sec. 3034 2009 c 497 s 3133 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March
17, 2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February
13, 2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the committee may: Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000
each to counties requesting assistance in developing farmlands
preservation strategies for the purpose of seeking grants from the
farmlands preservation account in future grant cycles.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) Up to $627,299 of the reappropriation from the riparian
protection account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge
plain natural area preserve. This amount may not be expended for the
project until the department of natural resources has completed a
management plan for the preserve that maintains recreational access and
that management plan is presented to the house of representatives
capital budget and senate ways and means committees.
(5) The reappropriations shall be used for projects in order of
their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds and shall not be awarded to alternate projects after the
effective date of this act. The agency may redistribute
reappropriations in this section as needed to fund projects that are
ready to proceed in sections 3032, 3033, 3034, and 3035 of this act.

Reappropriation:
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,300,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,500,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,956,000))
$18,706,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,994,000))
$19,377,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,750,000))
$55,883,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000,000))
$91,133,000

Sec. 3035 2009 c 497 s 3117 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20064002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2005-14 as developed on April
9, 2005.
(2) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to RCW
79A.15.050 must fulfill the uses and restrictions of each category
whether the funds are distributed according to the statutory allotment,
the unallocated distribution, or a reassignment of reappropriations.
If the cumulative total for acquisition projects is less than the
statutory requirement, the difference may be allocated to the remaining
development projects.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) The reappropriations shall be used for projects in order of
their readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds and shall not be awarded to alternate projects after the
effective date of this act. The agency may redistribute
reappropriations in this section as needed to fund projects that are
ready to proceed in sections 3032, 3033, 3034, and 3035 of this act.

Reappropriation:
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,725,000))
$6,479,000
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,859,000))
$6,705,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,584,000))
$13,184,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,416,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$49,600,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
High Speed Driving Simulators (92000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the purchase of two mobile high speed driving simulators. The
Washington state patrol must assist in the purchase of the simulators
and vehicle for transporting the simulator, and transfer ownership of
the simulators and vehicle to the appropriate agency after consultation
with stakeholders. The Washington state patrol must train the trainers
on the use of the simulators. The simulators are intended to move
among local police and sheriff departments in order to reduce the risks
to officers and the public from high speed pursuits.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2009 c 497 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Appropriation:
School Construction/Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,049,000))
$8,052,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,599,000))
$8,602,000

Sec. 5002 2009 c 497 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
School Construction Assistance Grants (20084200)

The appropriation and the reappropriation in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
For school construction projects funded through the school
construction assistance grant program, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require mapping the design of new facilities and
remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $176,922,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $137,267,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $477,570,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

Sec. 5003 2009 c 497 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) ((The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop a tracking system to increase accuracy in predicting the timing
of school district claims for reimbursement for school construction
assistance grants. The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall also improve its communication with school districts
regarding the status of grant projects and create requirements
regarding the timing of reimbursement claims. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report on the
progress of the new tracking and communication system to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15, 2009. The
report must include a list of school district capital projects
receiving state funding and each project's anticipated final
reimbursement date.
(2))) $786,000 of the common school construction account--state is
provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to develop a K-12 facility inventory and condition system
based on option number 3, described in the joint legislative audit and
review committee's January 2010 report, "K-12 Pilot Facility Inventory,
Condition and Use System" as providing semi-customized information
capabilities with complete state data.
(2) $350,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to undertake a study of the school construction
assistance program's funding formulas to include: (a) Space
allocation, (b) cost allocation, (c) equalization ratio, and (d)
regional cost variations in relation to the formula. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report on the
results to the appropriate committees of the legislature by September
1, 2011.
(3) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(4) For school construction projects funded through the school
construction assistance grant program, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require mapping the design of new facilities and
remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled.
(5) Up to $17,000,000 of the State Building Construction Account--State appropriation in this section is provided for the Grand Coulee
Dam school district school project, contingent on the availability of
sufficient contributions from federal, local, or private sources to
make up the remainder of the total cost of the project. The Grand
Coulee Dam school district is faced with a unique set of local funding
barriers and federal funds may substitute as the usual requirement for
school district participation. In the event sufficient matching
contributions are not secured, these funds shall lapse.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($369,920,000))
$258,286,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($259,029,000))
$200,826,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--Bond--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,284,000))
$59,428,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($689,733,000))
$521,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,921,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,610,733,000))
$4,442,040,000

Sec. 5004 2009 c 497 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($58,546,000))
$55,546,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,161,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,707,000))
$70,707,000

Sec. 5005 2009 c 497 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
North Central Technical Skills Center (20084861)

Appropriation:
School Construction/Skills Center Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,007,000))
$3,960,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,557,000))
$22,510,000

Sec. 5006 2009 c 497 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Center Minor Capital Projects (30000002)

Appropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,694,000))
$3,594,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,694,000))
$3,594,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Lloyd Auditorium Emergency Repairs (30000012)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Sec. 5008 2009 c 497 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Clark Hall Renovation (20061007)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,000,000))
$967,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $183,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,054,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,054,000))
$17,204,000

Sec. 5009 2009 c 497 s 5027 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Balmer Hall Reconstruction (20081004)

For construction of the facility identified in this section, the
university is authorized to issue a bond or bonds financed from
building fee and trust land revenue deposited into the university bond
retirement account in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700 through
28B.20.740, provided that: (1) The total amount of debt to be serviced
from the building account shall not exceed $36,360,000; (2) if bonds
for the project are issued as build America bonds, federal refunds on
the bond interest cost shall be deposited into the University of
Washington building account proportional to this project's share of the
total bond issuance; and (3) for the portion of the project that is
serviced by building fee and trust land revenues, the university shall
select the financing method that results in the lowest cost to the
University of Washington building account.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,600,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,600,000))
$4,000,000

Sec. 5010 2009 c 497 s 5029 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Interdisciplinary Academic Building (20082003)

In conjunction with the reappropriation in this section, the
University of Washington is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an
amount not to exceed $53,554,000 in value for construction of the
molecular engineering building identified in this section. The bond
shall be financed from building fee and trust land revenues deposited
into the university's bond retirement account, in accordance with RCW
28B.20.700 through 28B.20.740, provided that (1) if bonds for the
project are issued as build America bonds, federal refunds on the bond
interest cost shall be deposited into the University of Washington
building account proportional to this project's share of the total bond
issuance; and (2) for the portion of the project that is serviced by
building fee and trust land revenues, the university shall select the
financing method that results in the lowest cost to the University of
Washington building account.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Sec. 5011 2009 c 497 s 5028 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Intermediate Student Service and Classroom Improvements (20081005)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,245,000))
$311,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,934,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,036,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,281,000

Sec. 5012 2009 c 497 s 5030 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma (20082005)

For construction of the facility identified in this section, the
university is authorized to issue a bond or bonds financed from
building fee and trust land revenue deposited into the university bond
retirement account in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700 through
28B.20.740, provided that: (1) The total amount of debt to be serviced
for this project from the building account shall not exceed $7,450,000;
(2) if bonds for all or a portion of the project are issued as build
America bonds, federal refunds on the bond interest cost shall be
deposited into the University of Washington building account
proportional to this project's share of the total bond issuance; and
(3) for the portion of the project that is serviced by building fee and
trust land revenues, the university shall select the financing method
that results in the lowest cost to the University of Washington
building account.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,000,000))
$30,775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,044,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,194,000))
$36,925,000

Sec. 5013 2009 c 497 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
UW Tacoma - Land Acquisition (20092003)

In addition to the appropriation in this section, the university is
authorized to issue a bond or bonds financed from building fee and
trust land revenue deposited into the university bond retirement
account in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700 through 28B.20.740, provided
that: (1) The total amount of debt to be serviced for this project
from the building account shall not exceed $2,000,000; (2) if bonds for
the project are issued as build America bonds, federal refunds on the
bond interest cost shall be deposited into the University of Washington
building account proportional to this project's share of the total bond
issuance; and (3) for the portion of the project that is serviced by
building fee and trust land revenues, the university shall select the
financing method that results in the lowest cost to the University of
Washington building account.

((Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000))
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $469,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,531,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Sec. 5014 2009 c 497 s 5023 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Savery Hall Renovation (20061005)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,000,000))
$10,822,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,510,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,510,000))
$61,332,000

Sec. 5015 2009 c 497 s 5041 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,825,000))
$20,741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,125,000))
$124,041,000

Sec. 5016 2009 c 497 s 5037 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Lewis Hall Renovation (20081003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$478,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,585,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,585,000))
$25,063,000

Sec. 5017 2009 c 497 s 5039 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,000,000))
$19,135,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,175,000))
$15,040,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,175,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $146,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,175,000

Sec. 5018 2009 c 497 s 5055 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Preservation (30000065)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,128,000))
$23,903,000
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$2,225,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,128,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,128,000

Sec. 5019 2009 c 497 s 5047 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Vancouver - Applied Technology and Classroom Building
(20062950)

In conjunction with the appropriation in this section, Washington
State University is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an amount
not to exceed $10,000,000 in value for construction of the facility
identified in this section. The bond must be financed from building
fee and trust land revenues deposited into the university's bond
retirement account in accordance with RCW 28B.30.700 through
28B.30.780.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,742,000))
$23,593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,420,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,662,000))
$28,513,000

Sec. 5020 2009 c 497 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
WSU Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical & Health Sciences (20162953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,340,000))
$7,840,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,775,000))
$70,775,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,115,000))
$78,615,000

Sec. 5021 2009 c 497 s 5056 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (30000066)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,042,000))
$17,527,000
((Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,485,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,527,000))

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,073,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,600,000

Sec. 5022 2009 c 497 s 5057 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,115,000))
$28,375,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,460,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,575,000))
$68,835,000

Sec. 5023 2009 c 497 s 5061 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081002)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$157,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Sec. 5024 2009 c 497 s 5065 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Maintenance and Building System Repairs (30000044)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,217,000))
$4,409,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,868,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,085,000))
$13,277,000

Sec. 5025 2009 c 497 s 5068 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000054)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$1,375,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,625,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Sec. 5026 2009 c 497 s 5064 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,600,000))
$24,877,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,734,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,416,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,150,000))
$61,427,000

Sec. 5027 2009 c 497 s 5079 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Infrastructure Preservation (30000009)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($690,000))
$601,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,050,000))
$2,139,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,740,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,740,000

Sec. 5028 2009 c 497 s 5080 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000016)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State))
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,610,000

Sec. 5029 2009 c 497 s 5083 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital
Project Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,422,000))
$4,407,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,110,000))
$14,095,000

Sec. 5030 2009 c 497 s 5092 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Preservation (30000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($760,000))
$4,007,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,765,000))
$518,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,525,000

Sec. 5031 2009 c 497 s 5094 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Laboratory and Art Annex Building Renovation (30000026)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State)) The
Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,849,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,849,000

Sec. 5032 2009 c 497 s 5093 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works - Health, Safety, Code Compliance (30000016)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,515,000))
$1,953,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

Sec. 5033 2009 c 497 s 5097 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($760,000))
$4,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($760,000))
$4,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Feasibility Study of Biomass Gasification Project (92000007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000

Sec. 5035 2009 c 497 s 5104 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$587,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$2,087,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,913,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Sec. 5036 2009 c 497 s 5100 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (20041953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,625,000))
$45,744,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,773,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,398,000))
$51,517,000

Sec. 5037 2009 c 497 s 5111 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,614,000))
$5,814,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,456,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,070,000))
$20,270,000

Sec. 5038 2009 c 497 s 5115 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Projects (20044004)

The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 5038, 5039,
5040, and 5041.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($690,000))
$360,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,310,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$3,670,000

Sec. 5039 2009 c 497 s 5116 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 733, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.
The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 5038, 5039,
5040, and 5041.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,318,000))
$1,003,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,346,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,664,000))
$4,349,000

Sec. 5040 2009 c 497 s 5118 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
project list in section 5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
The reappropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 5038, 5039,
5040, and 5041.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,630,000))
$5,722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,370,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$8,092,000

Sec. 5041 2009 c 497 s 5120 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects.
(3) The 2011-13 projects must be selected based on their readiness
to proceed.
(4) The appropriation shall be used for projects in order of their
readiness to proceed for the intended scope and level of matching
funds. The department may reallocate appropriation and reappropriation
authority among the following sections of this act in order to
prioritize funding of projects that are ready to proceed: 5038, 5039,
5040, and 5041.
(5) Within available funds, Washington historical society, after
consulting with maritime heritage stakeholders and the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, must establish an appropriate
definition of historic vessel for use by a future maritime historic
vessel restoration and preservation grant program.

Project Recommended

Wenatchee Valley Museum $150,000

West Point Light Station $300,000

Des Moines Field House $420,000

Washington Hall $381,000

Percival Landing $567,000

Roslyn City Hall & Library $194,000

Spokane County courthouse $500,000

Snoqualmie Chapel car #5 $125,000

Edmonds Carnegie Library
museum $48,000

Ilwaco museum collections $41,000

Minkler Mansion $200,000

Cheney house for a museum $87,000

Longview Columbia theatre $1,000,000

Chinook School $350,000

Territorial Courthouse of 1858 $167,000

Hanford Interpretive Center $147,000

Carnegie Library Museum $883,000

Dynamite Train Canopy $50,000

King Street Station $750,000

Lakewood Carriage House $110,000

Lincoln School $175,000

Quincy Pioneer Church $195,000

Ezra Meeker Mansion $100,000

Port Townsend Storage Facility $450,000

Puyallup Church Spire $17,000

Morris House and Washington
Harbor School $27,000

Kalama Interpretive Center $212,000

Foss Waterway Seaport
Building $750,000

Pioneer State Bank Building $201,000

Kirkman House $32,000

Malo Sawmill $70,000

Stimson-Green Mansion $23,000

Lightship #83 $335,000

Masonic Temple Building $350,000

Wilkeson Centennial
Monument $10,000

Eddon Boatyard ways and dock $243,000

Commencement Restoration $86,000

Vessel Shenandoah $179,000

Walt's Mill $75,000

TOTAL $10,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$7,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,000,000))
$47,500,000

Sec. 5042 2009 c 497 s 5127 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College - Science Building (20012687)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,773,000))
$855,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,123,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,896,000))
$30,978,000

Sec. 5043 2009 c 497 s 5135 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Clark College - East County Satellite (20041689)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$4,780,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,876,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,876,000))
$29,656,000

Sec. 5044 2009 c 497 s 5151 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Green River Community College - Humanities and Classroom Building
(20061205)

The community and technical college capital projects account
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions
and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for debt service
on the capital project account certificate of participation issued for
construction of this facility. The state board shall work with the
office of the state treasurer to identify ways to either: (1) Allocate
the debt that has been issued on this project that is in excess of
probable project costs to other projects authorized for state building
construction account or community and technical college capital account
expenditures, or (2) expedite repayment of the debt incurred in order
to minimize unnecessary demands upon building account revenue.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,054,000

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,044,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,827,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,881,000))
$6,925,000

Sec. 5045 2009 c 497 s 5165 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College - Allied Health Building
(20062697)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,986,000))
$23,876,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,029,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,915,000))
$25,805,000

Sec. 5046 2009 c 497 s 5168 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College - Employment Resource Center
(20062851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,000,000))
$6,870,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,790,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,490,000))
$9,360,000

Sec. 5047 2009 c 497 s 5171 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Minor Works - Facility Preservation - Roof Repairs (20081010)

Reappropriation:
Education Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,500,000))
$392,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,500,000))
$1,392,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,108,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,176,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,676,000

Sec. 5048 2009 c 497 s 5174 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,645,000))
$19,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $549,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,194,000))
$22,309,000

Sec. 5049 2009 c 497 s 5176 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Business and Humanities Center (20081218)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,627,000))
$29,644,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,927,000))
$31,944,000

Sec. 5050 2009 c 497 s 5177 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Falls Community College - Chemistry and Life Science
Building (20081219)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,800,000))
$21,007,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,320,000))
$23,527,000

Sec. 5051 2009 c 497 s 5178 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,718,000))
$18,981,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $793,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,111,000))
$21,374,000

Sec. 5052 2009 c 497 s 5191 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College - Music Building 15 Renovation
(20081320)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $475,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,806,000))
$10,459,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $667,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,948,000))
$11,601,000

Sec. 5053 2009 c 497 s 5192 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom - Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$14,204,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,704,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,042,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,242,000))
$24,946,000

Sec. 5054 2009 c 497 s 5210 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000010)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,493,000))
$2,627,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,854,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,481,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,000,000))
$42,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,493,000))
$51,481,000

Sec. 5055 2009 c 497 s 5181 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College - Instructional Resource Center
(20081223)

The community and technical college capital projects account
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions
and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for debt service
on the capital project account-backed certificate of participation
issued for construction of this facility. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall notify the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees of the construction
bids received on the project prior to approving issuance of the
certificate, and shall authorize only as much debt as is actually
needed to complete the project within the scope proposed to the
legislature in its 2009 session.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Appropriation:
Community and Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$3,438,000

Sec. 5056 2009 c 497 s 5213 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Minor Works - Program (30000078)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,858,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,714,000))
$12,227,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,572,000))
$16,085,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($93,572,000))
$96,085,000

Sec. 5057 2009 c 497 s 5195 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College - L Building Emergency Repairs
(20081850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,460,000))
$387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,663,000))
$590,000

Sec. 5058 2009 c 497 s 5223 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Minor Works - Preservation (30000210)

Appropriation:
((State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,116,000))
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,116,000))
$16,000,000

Sec. 5059 2009 c 497 s 5190 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Spokane Community College - Building 7 Renovation (20081319)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,748,000))
$8,343,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,757,000))
$9,352,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Construction Contingency Pool (92000007)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for allocation
by the state board for community and technical colleges for major
construction and renovation projects that confront emergent and
unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency and
management reserves included in the project appropriation. The board
shall report at least quarterly to the office of financial management
and the legislative capital budget committees on requests for and
allocations from the pool.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,914,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,312,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,312,000

Sec. 5061 2009 c 497 s 5224 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Preventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000287)

Appropriation:
Community and Technical Colleges Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,800,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($91,208,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($114,008,000))
$0

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
Sec. 6001 2009 c 497 s 6009 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL
CONTRACTS. The following agencies may enter into financial contracts,
paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for
the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Department of corrections:
((Enter into a financing contract for up to $17,958,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to purchase or build work release beds, violator beds, or other
community-based re-entry facilities.))
Enter into a financing contract for up to $12,400,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
to move correctional industries facilities and operations from McNeil
island corrections center to Stafford creek corrections center.
(2) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellingham
Technical College for up to $1,390,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
instructional resource center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bellingham
Technical College for up to $28,968,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
instructional resource center. The cost of this financing contract
shall be paid from the community and technical colleges capital
projects account. This facility shall be eligible for maintenance and
operations funding on the same terms as if constructed with state
general obligation bonds.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community
College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to provide space for allied
health and construction industry.
(e) Contingent upon the sale and purchase specified in section 5071
of this act, enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane
Community College for up to $3,400,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the
Riverpoint One building.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of North Seattle
Community College for up to $8,900,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop an
employment resource center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community
College for up to $25,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a student fitness and
health center.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase a music and
art center.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River
Community College for up to $20,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 40,000
square foot addition to Green River Kent station.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the water and
environment center.
(k) Enter into a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
on behalf of Green River Community College for up to $26,532,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves to construct a new classrooms
facility as specified in project 20061205. The cost of this financing
contract shall be paid from the community and technical colleges
capital projects account. This facility shall be eligible for
maintenance and operations funding on the same terms as if constructed
with state general obligation bonds.
(3) Parks and recreation commission: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Mount Spokane lodge.
The parks and recreation commission shall use energy savings
performance contracting if practicable. The lodge shall be operated by
a private concessionaire under a contract with the parks and recreation
commission that is a qualified management contract under the applicable
internal revenue service guidelines.
(4) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $27,144,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the rehabilitation of the
John L. O'Brien building, subject to approval of the project scope by
the speaker of the house of representatives and the chief clerk of the
house of representatives.
(5) Department of ecology: Enter into a financing contract for up
to $11,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to rebuild the east wall of the department of
ecology's headquarters building in Lacey, Washington.
(6) Washington State University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserve
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a student information system.
(7) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct or
renovate specialized housing and treatment facilities for youth
committed to the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The debt
service is to be paid with the savings associated with closure of the
Maple Lane school.

Sec. 6002 RCW 90.71.370 and 2009 c 479 s 74 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2008, and by September 1st of each even-numbered
year beginning in 2010, the council shall provide to the governor and
the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives its recommendations for the funding necessary to
implement the action agenda in the succeeding biennium. The
recommendations shall:
(a) Identify the funding needed by action agenda element;
(b) Address funding responsibilities among local, state, and
federal governments, as well as nongovernmental funding; and
(c) Address funding needed to support the work of the partnership,
the panel, the ecosystem work group, and entities assisting in
coordinating local efforts to implement the plan.
(2) In the 2008 report required under subsection (1) of this
section, the council shall include recommendations for projected
funding needed through 2020 to implement the action agenda; funding
needs for science panel staff; identify methods to secure stable and
sufficient funding to meet these needs; and include proposals for new
sources of funding to be dedicated to Puget Sound protection and
recovery. In preparing the science panel staffing proposal, the
council shall consult with the panel.
(3) By November 1st of each odd-numbered year beginning in 2009,
the council shall produce a state of the Sound report that includes, at
a minimum:
(a) An assessment of progress by state and nonstate entities in
implementing the action agenda, including accomplishments in the use of
state funds for action agenda implementation;
(b) A description of actions by implementing entities that are
inconsistent with the action agenda and steps taken to remedy the
inconsistency;
(c) The comments by the panel on progress in implementing the plan,
as well as findings arising from the assessment and monitoring program;
(d) A review of citizen concerns provided to the partnership and
the disposition of those concerns;
(e) A review of the expenditures of funds to state agencies for the
implementation of programs affecting the protection and recovery of
Puget Sound, and an assessment of whether the use of the funds is
consistent with the action agenda; and
(f) An identification of all funds provided to the partnership, and
recommendations as to how future state expenditures for all entities,
including the partnership, could better match the priorities of the
action agenda.
(4)(a) The council shall review state programs that fund facilities
and activities that may contribute to action agenda implementation. By
November 1, 2009, the council shall provide initial recommendations
regarding program changes to the governor and appropriate fiscal and
policy committees of the senate and house of representatives. By
November 1, 2010, the council shall provide final recommendations
regarding program changes, including proposed legislation to implement
the recommendation, to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives.
(b) The review in this subsection shall be conducted with the
active assistance and collaboration of the agencies administering these
programs, and in consultation with local governments and other entities
receiving funding from these programs:
(i) Water pollution control facilities financing, chapter 70.146
RCW;
(ii) The water pollution control revolving fund, chapter 90.50A
RCW;
(iii) The public works assistance account, chapter 43.155 RCW;
(iv) The aquatic lands enhancement account, RCW 79.105.150;
(v) The state toxics control account and local toxics control
account and clean-up program, chapter 70.105D RCW;
(vi) The acquisition of habitat conservation and outdoor recreation
land, chapter 79A.15 RCW;
(vii) The salmon recovery funding board, RCW 77.85.110 through
77.85.150;
(viii) The community economic revitalization board, chapter 43.160
RCW;
(ix) Other state financial assistance to water quality-related
projects and activities; and
(x) Water quality financial assistance from federal programs
administered through state programs or provided directly to local
governments in the Puget Sound basin.
(c) The council's review shall include but not be limited to:
(i) Determining the level of funding and types of projects and
activities funded through the programs that contribute to
implementation of the action agenda;
(ii) Evaluating the procedures and criteria in each program for
determining which projects and activities to fund, and their
relationship to the goals and priorities of the action agenda;
(iii) Assessing methods for ensuring that the goals and priorities
of the action agenda are given priority when program funding decisions
are made regarding water quality-related projects and activities in the
Puget Sound basin and habitat-related projects and activities in the
Puget Sound basin;
(iv) Modifying funding criteria so that projects, programs, and
activities that are inconsistent with the action agenda are ineligible
for funding;
(v) Assessing ways to incorporate a strategic funding approach for
the action agenda within the outcome-focused performance measures
required by RCW 43.41.270 in administering natural resource-related and
environmentally based grant and loan programs.
(5) During the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the council's review must
result in a ranking of projects affecting the protection and recovery
of the Puget Sound basin that are proposed in the governor's capital
budget submitted under RCW 43.88.060. The ranking shall include
recommendations for reallocation of total requested funds for Puget
Sound basin projects to achieve the greatest positive outcomes for
protection and recovery of Puget Sound and shall be submitted to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than February
1, 2011.

Sec. 6003 RCW 79A.15.030 and 2009 c 341 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Moneys appropriated for this chapter shall be divided as
follows:
(a) Appropriations for a biennium of forty million dollars or less
must be allocated equally between the habitat conservation account and
the outdoor recreation account.
(b) If appropriations for a biennium total more than forty million
dollars, the money must be allocated as follows: (i) Twenty million
dollars to the habitat conservation account and twenty million dollars
to the outdoor recreation account; (ii) any amount over forty million
dollars up to fifty million dollars shall be allocated as follows: (A)
Ten percent to the habitat conservation account; (B) ten percent to the
outdoor recreation account; (C) forty percent to the riparian
protection account; and (D) forty percent to the farmlands preservation
account; and (iii) any amounts over fifty million dollars must be
allocated as follows: (A) Thirty percent to the habitat conservation
account; (B) thirty percent to the outdoor recreation account; (C)
thirty percent to the riparian protection account; and (D) ten percent
to the farmlands preservation account.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 303, Laws of 2005,
moneys deposited in these accounts shall be invested as authorized for
other state funds, and any earnings on them shall be credited to the
respective account.
(3) All moneys deposited in the habitat conservation, outdoor
recreation, riparian protection, and farmlands preservation accounts
shall be allocated as provided under RCW 79A.15.040, 79A.15.050,
79A.15.120, and 79A.15.130 as grants to state or local agencies or
nonprofit nature conservancy organizations or associations for
acquisition, development, and renovation within the jurisdiction of
those agencies, subject to legislative appropriation. The board may
use or permit the use of any funds appropriated for this chapter as
matching funds where federal, local, or other funds are made available
for projects within the purposes of this chapter. Moneys appropriated
to these accounts that are not obligated to a specific project may be
used to fund projects from lists of alternate projects from the same
account in biennia succeeding the biennium in which the moneys were
originally appropriated. In order to achieve the reduced level of
funding in this act, from the effective date of this act and through
the remainder of the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, the recreation and
conservation office as specified in chapter 79A.25 RCW: (a) Shall not
award new contracts for alternate projects from lists from biennia
prior to the 2009-11 biennium; (b) may reallocate funds among the
habitat conservation, outdoor recreation, riparian protection, and
farmlands preservation accounts and among subcategories within those
accounts; and (c) by October 1, 2010, shall submit a report to the
senate ways and means committee and the house of representatives
capital budget committee describing the major causes of project delay
for projects funded in reappropriations. The report must: (i)
Identify projects that were authorized on original project lists and
projects that were funded as alternates; (ii) describe the sources of
matching funds for authorized projects and analyze whether certain
sources of certified matching funds contribute to project delays; (iii)
identify land acquisition projects that were delayed due to the absence
of a willing seller; and (iv) include recommendations for reducing
reappropriations for projects more than four years past their original
authorization. In describing sources of certified matching funds as
required in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the report must distinguish
available match from pledged match. Available match must only include
the following: (A) Funds from government sources only if an
appropriation has been approved by the local government applicant or an
award letter has been received from another government agency; (B)
funds from a nongovernment source only after an award letter has been
received and funds from that source have been made available to make
payments on the project; and (C) funds from in-kind source are
documented and available. All other sources of certified match must be
described as pledge match.
(4) Projects receiving grants under this chapter that are developed
or otherwise accessible for public recreational uses shall be available
to the public.
(5) The board may make grants to an eligible project from the
habitat conservation, outdoor recreation, riparian protection, and
farmlands preservation accounts and any one or more of the applicable
categories under such accounts described in RCW 79A.15.040, 79A.15.050,
79A.15.120, and 79A.15.130.
(6) The board may accept private donations to the habitat
conservation account, the outdoor recreation account, the riparian
protection account, and the farmlands preservation account for the
purposes specified in this chapter.
(7) The board may apply up to three percent of the funds
appropriated for this chapter for its office for the administration of
the programs and purposes specified in this chapter.
(8) Habitat and recreation land and facilities acquired or
developed with moneys appropriated for this chapter may not, without
prior approval of the board, be converted to a use other than that for
which funds were originally approved. The board shall adopt rules and
procedures governing the approval of such a conversion.

Sec. 6004 2008 c 5 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans
recommended by the public works board are authorized to be made with
funds appropriated from the public works assistance account, and no
loan authorized in this act shall bear an interest rate greater than
one-half of one percent:
(1) Arlington--sanitary sewer project--expand and upgrade the
wastewater treatment plant and biosolids composting facility to meet
new discharge limitations, produce a higher quality effluent, and
accommodate future growth . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(2) Auburn--street project--reconstruct approximately 0.3 miles of
roadway with four travel lanes to bring up to current arterial and
truck route standards and modify intersection to optimize efficiency
and level of service . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
(3) Blaine--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant and section of outfall pipe to increase treatment
capacity, produce reuse quality water, and improve Puget Sound water
quality for shellfish . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(4) Bonney Lake--domestic water project--replace approximately
71,000 linear feet of leaky water mains to reduce current water loss by
ten percent . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,352,000
(5) Bonney Lake--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately
12,000 linear feet of failing interceptor sewer pipes . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,648,000
(6) Buckley--sanitary sewer project--rebuild the wastewater
treatment plant to provide nutrient removal and meet state and federal
discharge regulations and the construction of an interceptor . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(7) Camas--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to the
wastewater treatment facilities to provide class A biosolids at the
main sewage pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(8) Clark county--road project--construct new road segments, widen
roadways, improve and redesign intersections, and install and modify
traffic signals necessary to improve a major interchange with two
freeways . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(9) Clark regional wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--modify existing and construct new wastewater facilities to process
approximately 4.65 million gallons more of wastewater per day and
ensure treatment processes continue to be in compliance with current
regulations . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(10) Coal creek utility district--sanitary sewer project--construct
sewer lift station, approximately 1,250 lineal feet of gravity sewer
main, and 500 feet of force main to provide public sewer to
approximately 25 properties on a lake that have private septic systems
that have failed or are in prefailure status . . . . . . . . . . . . $898,875
(11) College Place--domestic water project--construct two steel
tanks, a booster station, approximately 6,000 feet of transmission
line, 3,400 feet of water mains, three pressure reducing valves, and
associated telemetry to rectify a deficiency in fire flow and standby
water storage protection . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,710,051
(12) Cowlitz county public utility district No. 1--domestic water
project--construction of approximately six new groundwater supply
wells, 2,100 feet of raw water piping a new water treatment plant
producing approximately 20 million gallons per day of potable water,
and approximately 4,350 feet of transmission main to connect to the
system to replace current water supply that is being impacted by
increasing water sediment . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,213,000
(13) Ephrata--domestic water project--replace approximately 68,000
feet of failing water mains, 50,000 feet of failing water service
pipes, and the resurfacing of 20 miles of overlaying roadway, including
approximately 100 fire hydrants, 400 catch basins, 15 storm sewer
drywells, 22,000 feet of curb and gutter, and 16,000 feet of storm
sewer pipe . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,605,727
(14) Freeland water district--domestic water project--connect a new
well and new reservoir to the existing system, rehabilitate the
existing well, and install new equipment to increase system
reliability, redundancy, and capacity. Install new chlorination
equipment to improve water quality . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,516
(15) Gig Harbor--sanitary sewer project--improvements to the
wastewater treatment plant including new equipment and electrical work,
add a third clarifier, install ultraviolet disinfection, and extend and
upsize the outfall . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(16) Highline water district--domestic water project--construction
of 11,350 feet of transmission main and looping of pipes to eliminate
low pressures and fire flows and improve water quality, and create a
new pressure zone to correct high pressures . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,390,418
(17) Karcher creek sewer district--sanitary sewer project--install
a new sewer system, including a lift station and approximately 3,600
lineal feet of sewer main, in conjunction with a road project to
service approximately 17 homes that will lose their septic systems due
to the road project . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,130
(18) Kennewick--sanitary sewer project--construct improvements to
critical wastewater treatment plant processes to enhance reliability,
improve energy efficiency and redundancy, as well as increase the
capacity of the sludge pumping station . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000
(19) Kent--street project--construct two bridges, one for the
roadway over a set of railroad tracks, and one for railroad tracks over
a lowered roadway. This will grade separate the tracks from the
roadway to provide safe and reliable operations twenty-four hours a day
. . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(20) King county--sanitary sewer project--construct 13,100 lineal
feet of pipe to convey approximately 9 million gallons per day of
reclaimed water to reduce withdrawals of 250-acre feet per year from
the Sammamish river . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
(21) La Center--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater
treatment plant to reduce the levels of nitrogen discharged in the
effluent and approximately doubling the operation of the plant and
producing class A reuse water . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(22) Lake Forest Park water district--domestic water project--replace approximately 6,915 lineal feet of undersized and corroded
water pipes to improve safety and reliability of the system by reducing
pipe failures and increasing fire flow . . . . . . . . . . . . $917,935
(23) Lake Stevens--sanitary sewer project--construct a new
wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a pump
station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with Lake Stevens sewer
district . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(24) Lake Stevens sewer district--sanitary sewer project--construct
a new wastewater treatment plant, 9,500 feet of interceptor line, a
pump station, and an outfall pipe in partnership with the city of Lake
Stevens . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(25) Lakewood--sanitary sewer project--construct 3 pump stations,
approximately 17,200 linear feet of force mains, 13,500 linear feet of
gravity collector pipe line, and 320 side sewer stubs to service two
neighborhoods currently served exclusively by septic
systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,840,000
(26) LOTT alliance--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
7,400 feet of force main and replace existing pump station with new
1,000 gallon per minute pump station . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,003,807
(27) Mansfield--sanitary sewer project--expand and rehabilitate
wastewater treatment lagoons and effluent spray irrigation system as
well as remove the discharge of groundwater from basement sump pumps to
the collection system . . . . . . . . . . . . $235,600
(28) Midway sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace
approximately 16,500 lineal feet of sewer mains and 50 manholes to
reduce infiltration and inflow . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,782,500
(29) Mount Vernon--sanitary sewer project--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant, including a new pretreatment facility, 4
additional clarifiers, upgrade aeration basins, installation of an
ultraviolet disinfection system, and odor control system . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(30) Newcastle--road project--reconstruct, widen, and signalize
approximately 5,200 linear feet of road to 2 lanes in each direction,
add left turn lanes, sidewalks, bicycle lanes, install lighting
systems, replace two-lane bridge with a four-lane bridge, and install
new traffic signals . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
(31) Olympia--sanitary sewer project--install approximately 6,500
linear feet of sewer mains and construct a lift station to serve 63
homes with failing on-site sewage systems . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,808,375
(32) Olympus Terrace sewer district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate approximately 9,350 linear feet of sewer trunkline,
construct approximately 9,800 linear feet of high-flow storm water
bypass piping for excess flow, construct approximately 4,150 linear
feet of road access, and restore creek habitat . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
(33) Omak--sanitary sewer project((--add 2 compost containers,
convert storage tank to sludge holding tank, and install a second
headworks screen to increase the wastewater treatment plant capacity by
35 percent)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
(34) Port Angeles--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
11,500 feet of sewer main, modify a storage tank, and modify the
wastewater treatment plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(35) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--close landfill
site by capping and sealing with a soil cap . . . . . . . . . . . . $859,500
(36) Regional board of mayors--solid waste project--construct a new
solid waste transfer station, including structures and
equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,541,000
(37) Ronald wastewater district--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate 2 lift stations by replacing pumps, valves, fittings,
piping, odor control systems, and electrical equipment . . . . . . . . . . . . $955,400
(38) Seattle--domestic water project--replace floating pumps with
land-based pump station with a maximum capacity of approximately 250
million gallons per day, including 8 pumps, concrete structure, a
tunnel, approximately 4,000 feet of pipeline, and a standby
generator. . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(39) Sedro-Woolley--sanitary sewer project--rehabilitate or replace
4 interceptor segments totaling approximately 29,700 linear feet,
install 2 pump stations, and upgrade the secondary clarifier in order
to lift a building moratorium . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,023,491
(40) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--construct a satellite
reclamation plant with a capacity of approximately 0.4 million gallons
per day to produce class A reclaimed water, approximately 22,000 linear
feet of sewer pipelines, and approximately 25,000 linear feet of
reclaimed water force main . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,079,360
(41) Shelton--sanitary sewer project--replace approximately 38,480
linear feet of mainline sewers to reduce inflow and
infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,737,500
(42) Skagit county sewer district No. 2--sanitary sewer project--upgrade wastewater treatment plant to a water reclamation facility to
provide class A reclaimed water with a capacity of approximately 0.35
million gallons per day . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(43) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project--construct approximately
1,900 feet of sewer pipe, a new pump station with a capacity of
approximately 8,000 gallons per minute, and approximately 4,300 feet of
force main to reduce overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
(44) Snohomish--sanitary sewer project((--upgrade existing
wastewater treatment plant including a new influent flow structure,
screens, aerators, effluent filtration, ultraviolet disinfection,
effluent pump station, improvements to the existing lagoons, and
electrical improvements)) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
(45) Snohomish county--road project--construct a new, approximately
two-mile, two-lane truck route around the city of Granite Falls,
including 3 roundabouts to improve safety and air quality in the
downtown area . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(46) Southwest Suburban sewer district--sanitary sewer project--replace and/or slipline approximately 5,470 feet of trunk/interceptor
sewer main and construct a new lift station to reduce
overflows . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,268,250
(47) Tacoma--domestic water project--replace 3 open-topped concrete
reservoirs with 2 enclosed concrete reservoirs of approximately 33
million gallons each and related piping to comply with the safe
drinking water act and a bilateral compliance agreement . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
(48) Tekoa--sanitary sewer system--reconstruct approximately 1,000
feet of failing sewer line and manholes to reduce significant
groundwater infiltration . . . . . . . . . . . . $135,115
(49) Three rivers regional wastewater authority--sanitary sewer
project--construct 2 clarifiers and associated piping to replace 2
failed clarifiers at the wastewater plant . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,630,750
(50) Washougal--sanitary sewer project--construct a new wastewater
treatment plant headworks, including a fine screen, grit removal, and
replace approximately 150 linear feet of gravity sewer, and make
improvements to the lagoons, including 450 linear feet of piping,
modify overflow structures, and a new pump . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000
(51) Yakima--domestic water project--develop a new, approximately
3,000 gallon per minute, domestic water well, including drilling,
placement of casing, a new pump house, and connection to the existing
water distribution system in order to augment the water supply during
drought conditions . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,257,200
(52) Yakima--street project--construct 2 underpasses and
reconstruct 3 lanes on each roadway under a railroad mainline to
accommodate additional rail and reduce traffic and emergency response
delays and air pollution . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 DEBT AFFORDABILITY STUDY. The office of
the state treasurer shall prepare a debt affordability study by October
1, 2010, that provides an assessment of the state's current debt
portfolio and an analysis of the impact of future debt issuance. The
study will include but is not limited to: An overview of the state's
outstanding and projected debt, the structure of the debt portfolio,
the cost of existing debt, sources of funds for interest, principal,
and/or lease payments, and the purposes for which debt instruments and
financing contracts are issued. To assist with this work, the office
of the state treasurer shall convene and staff a work group to include
staff from the fiscal committees of the state house of representatives
and state senate, and the office of financial management.

Sec. 6006 2009 c 497 s 6004 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) ((The office of financial management may authorize a transfer
of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in
excess of the amount required for the completion of such project to
another capital project for which the appropriation is insufficient.
No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of any facility
beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such transfers may
be effected only between capital appropriations to a specific
department, commission, agency, or institution of higher education and
only between capital projects that are funded from the same fund or
account. No transfers may occur between projects to local government
agencies except where the grants are provided within a single omnibus
appropriation and where such transfers are specifically authorized by
the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3))) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(((4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.))
(2) The office of financial management shall not allot any portion
of a capital budget appropriation for:
(a) Contingencies above the amount required for completion of a
project as described in budget documents submitted as part of the
governor's capital budget request or consistent with legislative
history;
(b) Proposed alternates submitted in bid documents if agencies
cannot document a programmatic need and an operational budget savings
resulting from the completion of the alternate project component that
would pay for the cost of the alternate within eight years; or
(c) For any equipment costs or project scope beyond what was
described in the budget documents submitted as part of the governor's
capital budget request.
(3) The office of financial management shall submit a monthly
report of approved allotments, subject to this section, by project.
The report shall include the accepted base bid and any approved
alternates with the analysis demonstrating sufficient operational
budget savings.

Sec. 6007 RCW 39.10.210 and 2007 c 494 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build, general contractor/construction manager, and job order
contracting procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.300, 39.10.340, and
39.10.420, respectively.
(2) "Board" means the capital projects advisory review board.
(3) "Committee" means the project review committee.
(4) "Design-build procedure" means a contract between a public body
and another party in which the party agrees to both design and build
the facility, portion of the facility, or other item specified in the
contract.
(5) "Total contract cost" means the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, and the percent fee on the negotiated maximum
allowable construction cost.
(6) "General contractor/construction manager" means a firm with
which a public body has selected and negotiated a maximum allowable
construction cost to provide services during the design phase and to
act as construction manager and general contractor during the
construction phase.
(7) "Job order contract" means a contract in which the contractor
agrees to a fixed period, indefinite quantity delivery order contract
which provides for the use of negotiated, definitive work orders for
public works as defined in RCW 39.04.010.
(8) "Job order contractor" means a registered or licensed
contractor awarded a job order contract.
(9) "Maximum allowable construction cost" means the maximum cost of
the work to construct the project including a percentage for risk
contingency, negotiated support services, and approved change orders.
(10) "Negotiated support services" means items a general contractor
would normally manage or perform on a construction project including,
but not limited to surveying, hoisting, safety enforcement, provision
of toilet facilities, temporary heat, cleanup, and trash removal.
(11) "Percent fee" means the percentage amount to be earned by the
general contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit.
(12) "Public body" means any general or special purpose government,
including but not limited to state agencies, institutions of higher
education, counties, cities, towns, ports, school districts, and
special purpose districts, provided that for the 2009-2011 fiscal
biennium, the definition of public body for this chapter does not
include public bodies funded in section 1015 of this act if alternative
requirements or procedures of federal law or regulations are
authorized.
(13) "Certified public body" means a public body certified to use
design-build or general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures, or both, under RCW 39.10.270.
(14) "Public works project" means any work for a public body within
the definition of "public work" in RCW 39.04.010.
(15) "Total project cost" means the cost of the project less
financing and land acquisition costs.
(16) "Unit price book" means a book containing specific prices,
based on generally accepted industry standards and information, where
available, for various items of work to be performed by the job order
contractor. The prices may include: All the costs of materials;
labor; equipment; overhead, including bonding costs; and profit for
performing the items of work. The unit prices for labor must be at the
rates in effect at the time the individual work order is issued.
(17) "Work order" means an order issued for a definite scope of
work to be performed pursuant to a job order contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 2009 c 497 s 5224 (uncodified) is
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 80
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
DEBT AFFORDABILITY STUDY . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 36, 41
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 64
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 59
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 69
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
--- END ---