BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "major transportation corridor
project" means a transportation project that is part of a state highway
corridor improvement program whose total costs will exceed one billion
dollars.
(2) For major transportation corridor projects, the following
provisions apply:
(a) If the project is permitted under critical areas development
regulations adopted under this chapter, permits may be appealed to a
local hearing officer or through any other local appeal process if the
department of transportation consents, but if the department of
transportation does not consent, permits must be appealed directly to
superior court and local agencies may not require that such permits be
first appealed to a local hearing examiner or through any other local
appeal process;
(b) If the project is permitted under section 404 of the federal
clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344), a critical area permit issued by
a city or county due to critical areas development regulations is not
required for any critical areas within the city or county that are the
subject of the section 404 permit;
(c) A city or county may issue a critical area permit for critical
areas that are outside the areas covered by a section 404 permit; and
(d) If the project is identified as an essential public facility
under RCW 36.70A.200, city street use permits are presumed approved as
submitted unless negotiated otherwise within one hundred twenty days of
submittal of the permit application. City street use permits may be
appealed to a local hearing officer or through any other local appeal
process if the department of transportation consents, but if the
department of transportation does not consent, city street use permits
must be appealed directly to superior court and local agencies may not
require that such permits be first appealed to a local hearing examiner
or through any other local appeal process. The department of
transportation may begin a project while a city street use permit is
being appealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
If a building permit is issued by a city or town as part of a major
transportation corridor project, as defined in section 1 of this act,
for a building that is temporary in nature and will be removed when no
longer necessary to facilitate the project, the building permit may not
be appealed by any party other than the permittee or the department of
transportation. If an appeal is filed, a third party may intervene in
such proceedings by petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW
to read as follows:
If a building permit is issued by a county as part of a major
transportation corridor project, as defined in section 1 of this act,
for a building that is temporary in nature and will be removed when no
longer necessary to facilitate the project, the building permit may not
be appealed by any party other than the permittee or the department of
transportation. If an appeal is filed, a third party may intervene in
such proceedings by petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW
to read as follows:
If a building permit is issued by a code city as part of a major
transportation corridor project, as defined in section 1 of this act,
for a building that is temporary in nature and will be removed when no
longer necessary to facilitate the project, the building permit may not
be appealed by any party other than the permittee or the department of
transportation. If an appeal is filed, a third party may intervene in
such proceedings by petition.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.58.140 and 1995 c 347 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable guidelines,
rules, or master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their
adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii) so far
as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
rules adopted by the department, for the administration and enforcement
of the permit system provided in this section. The administration of
the system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one
days from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in
subsection (6) of this section; or until all review proceedings are
terminated if the proceedings were initiated within twenty-one days
from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this section
except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the ((state of
Washington,)) department of transportation, for the construction ((and
modification of SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the
construction may begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and
the permits are valid until December 31, 1995)) of major transportation
corridor projects as defined in section 1 of this act, construction may
begin immediately after the date of filing. The department of
transportation must make every effort to avoid work that may affect the
permitted areas until any permit appeals are resolved;
(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, construction may
be commenced no sooner than thirty days after the date of the appeal of
the board's decision is filed if a permit is granted by the local
government and (i) the granting of the permit is appealed to the
shorelines hearings board within twenty-one days of the date of filing,
(ii) the hearings board approves the granting of the permit by the
local government or approves a portion of the substantial development
for which the local government issued the permit, and (iii) an appeal
for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request, within ten days of the
filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before the court to
determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved by the
hearings board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the order of
the hearings board should not commence. If, at the conclusion of the
hearing, the court finds that construction pursuant to such a permit
would involve a significant, irreversible damaging of the environment,
the court shall prohibit the permittee from commencing the construction
pursuant to the approved or revised permit until all review proceedings
are final. Construction pursuant to a permit revised at the direction
of the hearings board may begin only on that portion of the substantial
development for which the local government had originally issued the
permit, and construction pursuant to such a revised permit on other
portions of the substantial development may not begin until after all
review proceedings are terminated. In such a hearing before the court,
the burden of proving whether the construction may involve significant
irreversible damage to the environment and demonstrating whether such
construction would or would not be appropriate is on the appellant;
(c) If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant
to that permit may not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days
from the date the permit decision was filed as provided in subsection
(6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to ((subsections)) (a),
(b), or (c) of this subsection, the construction is begun at the
permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the courts
order the removal of any portion of the construction or the restoration
of any portion of the environment involved or require the alteration of
any portion of a substantial development constructed pursuant to a
permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs
involved in adhering to such requirements from the local government
that granted the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or
intervener. As a result of judicial review, the courts may order
mitigation if the shoreline is degraded in any manner after the
permittee began construction pursuant to (a) of this subsection.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
filed with the department and the attorney general. With regard to a
permit other than a permit governed by subsection (10) of this section,
"date of filing" as used herein means the date of actual receipt by the
department. With regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional
use, "date of filing" means the date a decision of the department
rendered on the permit pursuant to subsection (10) of this section is
transmitted by the department to the local government. The department
shall notify in writing the local government and the applicant of the
date of filing.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10) Any permit for a variance or a conditional use by local
government under approved master programs must be submitted to the
department for its approval or disapproval.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect June 1, 2011.

--- END ---