BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The internet provides for instant access to
public records at a significantly reduced cost to the agency and the
public. Agencies are encouraged to make commonly requested records
available on agency web sites. When an agency has made records
available on its web site, members of the public with computer access
should be encouraged to preserve taxpayer resources by accessing those
records online.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.520 and 1995 c 397 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Responses to requests for public records shall be made promptly by
agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives. Within five business
days of receiving a public record request, an agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives must respond by either (1) providing the record; (2)
providing an internet address and link on the agency's web site to the
specific records requested, except that if the requester notifies the
agency that he or she cannot access the records through the internet,
then the agency must provide copies of the record or allow the
requester to view copies using an agency computer; (3) acknowledging
that the agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives has received
the request and providing a reasonable estimate of the time the agency,
the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief
clerk of the house of representatives will require to respond to the
request; or (((3))) (4) denying the public record request. Additional
time required to respond to a request may be based upon the need to
clarify the intent of the request, to locate and assemble the
information requested, to notify third persons or agencies affected by
the request, or to determine whether any of the information requested
is exempt and that a denial should be made as to all or part of the
request. In acknowledging receipt of a public record request that is
unclear, an agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives may ask the
requestor to clarify what information the requestor is seeking. If the
requestor fails to clarify the request, the agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives need not respond to it. Denials of requests must be
accompanied by a written statement of the specific reasons therefor.
Agencies, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall establish
mechanisms for the most prompt possible review of decisions denying
inspection, and such review shall be deemed completed at the end of the
second business day following the denial of inspection and shall
constitute final agency action or final action by the office of the
secretary of the senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives for the purposes of judicial review.

--- END ---