BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
conservation district laws were enacted seven decades ago based on
circumstances that were significantly different from what exists today.
The legislature finds that these districts provide a valuable service
with their unique and proven approach to stewardship of private land,
water, and natural resources especially in areas with altered and built
environments. Districts are noted for their high degree of success in
engaging with private landowners in terms of developing practical
solutions cooperatively with landowners on a range of land, water, and
natural resource stewardship concerns. The legislature finds that this
cooperative voluntary approach is especially important today in highly
populated urban and suburban areas and, given the Puget Sound
initiative, in the western region of the state.
However, the legislature believes that conservation districts have
not been able to fully achieve their potential to advance workable
solutions for improved stewardship of natural resources. As a result,
the gap in understanding between rural landowner needs and concerns and
those of urban constituencies continues to exist and cause significant
tension. Further, given projected population growth with its attendant
impacts, given the imperative to achieve and maintain healthy major
waterways such as the Columbia and Spokane rivers and Puget Sound, and
given the growing realization that food security from local sources is
dependent upon the continued viability of local farming operations,
there is a critical need at this time to evaluate the functions and
operations of conservation districts.
The purpose of this act is to convene a broadly based task force to
examine the conservation district laws, review the functions and
operations of conservation districts, and to recommend changes that
will allow conservation districts to be more effective in fulfilling
their roles and mission in addressing twenty-first century needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The conservation district task force is
established. The task force shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member representing the state conservation commission
appointed by the chair of the state conservation commission;
(b) One member representing the Puget Sound partnership appointed
by its leadership council;
(c) Up to seven members representing the range of conservation
districts in the state, one of whom shall be from a county with a
population that exceeds one million five hundred thousand people,
appointed by the state association representing conservation districts;
(d) Three representatives of statewide agricultural associations,
one of whom shall be from an organization that represents livestock
producers, appointed by the governor in consultation with the director
of agriculture;
(e) Two representatives of statewide environmental organizations
that have an ongoing interest and experience in working with
conservation districts on projects and activities in the existing
altered and built environments and with land trusts, appointed by the
governor;
(f) Two representatives of cities reflecting the size spectrum of
cities, appointed by a statewide association representing city
governments; and
(g) Two representatives of county governments, one whom shall
represent counties with a population of over five hundred thousand,
appointed by the state association representing county governments.
(2) Tribal governments shall be invited by the governor to send a
representative who is familiar with agricultural and urban concerns to
serve on the task force.
(3) The task force shall examine the following:
(a) The process of selecting conservation district board members
and whether the method of selecting members should be altered;
(b) The methods by which conservation district activities are
funded and whether the source of funding districts should be altered,
including revenue from conservation district assessments and from state
funding sources;
(c) The current role and mission of conservation districts and
whether conservation districts are structured to effectively fulfill
their role and mission;
(d) The jurisdictional areas of conservation districts and whether
the differences between urban and rural areas are being successfully
bridged by conservation district programs;
(e) What needs that conservation districts are filling and what the
public expectations are in the twenty-first century;
(f) What makes natural resource stewardship projects and activities
successful by inquiring with various groups with experience including
the Ruckelshaus center, local salmon recovery boards, conservation
districts, and the participants of successful programs; and
(g) Other issues relevant to operation and function of conservation
districts identified in the governor's natural resources reform report,
including but not limited to the conservation incentives service
delivery proposal.
(4) The task force shall vote to select its chair or cochairs.
(5) The task force shall be staffed by a facilitator who has proven
understanding of the differences between urban, suburban, and rural
culture and values, and has experience and familiarity with successful
implementation of conservation programs. The facilitator, or
cofacilitators, shall be appointed as independent contractors by the
governor in consultation with this act's sponsoring legislators.
(6) The task force shall issue a report of its findings and
conclusions by December 1, 2011, to the governor's office, the chief
clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.
(7) This section expires March 1, 2012.

--- END ---