BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.235.010 and 2008 c 14 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" means a metric measure used to
compare the emissions from various greenhouse gases based upon their
global warming potential.
(2) "Climate advisory team" means the stakeholder group formed in
response to executive order 07-02.
(3) "Climate impacts group" means the University of Washington's
climate impacts group.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) (("Direct emissions" means emissions of greenhouse gases from
sources of emissions, including stationary combustion sources, mobile
combustion emissions, process emissions, and fugitive emissions.
(6))) "Director" means the director of the department.
(((7))) (6) "Greenhouse gas" and "greenhouse gases" includes carbon
dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons,
((and)) sulfur hexafluoride, and any other gas or gases designated by
the department by rule.
(((8) "Indirect emissions" means emissions of greenhouse gases
associated with the purchase of electricity, heating, cooling, or
steam.
(9))) (7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise
holder, association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any
subdivision or instrumentality of the state.
(((10))) (8) "Program" means the department's climate change
program.
(((11) "Total emissions of greenhouse gases" means all direct
emissions and all indirect emissions.
(12))) (9) "Western climate initiative" means the collaboration of
states, Canadian provinces, Mexican states, and tribes to design a
multisector market-based mechanism as directed under the western
regional climate action initiative signed by the governor on February
22, 2007.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.94.151 and 2008 c 14 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may
classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or
regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air
pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other
characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may
require registration or reporting or both for any such class or
classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state
as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall
be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and
social factors, and physical effects on property.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any
person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant
sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or
regulations of the department or board of the authority, require
registration or reporting shall register therewith and make reports
containing information as may be required by such department or board
concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information
as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of
being assembled. In the case of emissions of greenhouse gases as
defined in RCW 70.235.010 the department shall adopt rules requiring
reporting of those emissions. The department or board may require that
such registration or reporting be accompanied by a fee, and may
determine the amount of such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED,
That the amount of the fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of
administering such registration or reporting program which shall be
defined as initial registration and annual or other periodic reports
from the source owner providing information directly related to air
pollution registration, on-site inspections necessary to verify
compliance with registration requirements, data storage and retrieval
systems necessary for support of the registration program, emission
inventory reports and emission reduction credits computed from
information provided by sources pursuant to registration program
requirements, staff review, including engineering or other reliable
analysis for accuracy and currentness, of information provided by
sources pursuant to registration program requirements, clerical and
other office support provided in direct furtherance of the registration
program, and administrative support provided in directly carrying out
the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such registration
made with either the board or the department shall preclude a further
registration and reporting with any other board or the department,
except that emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70.235.010
must be reported as required under subsection (5) of this section.
All registration program and reporting fees collected by the
department shall be deposited in the air pollution control account.
All registration program fees collected by the local air authorities
shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.
(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain
warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section,
registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after
January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse
or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed
as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since
the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity
of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or
elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or
elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after
the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.
This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain
elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million
bushels of grain annually.
(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment
classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for
wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is
not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning
operations for grain;
(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of
agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator
under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government
licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for
purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW; and
(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.
(5)(a) The department shall adopt rules requiring ((the reporting
of)) persons to report emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW
70.235.010((. The rules must include a de minimis amount of emissions
below which reporting will not be required for both indirect and direct
emissions. The rules must require that emissions of greenhouse gases
resulting from the burning of fossil fuels be reported separately from
emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the burning of biomass.
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the department shall,
under the authority granted in subsection (1) of this section, adopt
rules requiring any owner or operator: (i) Of a fleet of on-road motor
vehicles that as a fleet emit at least twenty-five hundred metric tons
of greenhouse gas annually in the state to report the emissions of
greenhouse gases generated from or emitted by that fleet; or (ii) of a
source or combination of sources that emit at least ten thousand metric
tons of greenhouse gas annually in the state to report their total
annual emissions of greenhouse gases. In calculating emissions of
greenhouse gases for purposes of determining whether or not reporting
is required, only direct emissions shall be included. For purposes of
reporting emissions of greenhouse gases in chapter 14, Laws of 2008,
"source" means any stationary source as defined in RCW 70.94.030, or
mobile source used for transportation of people or cargo. The
emissions of greenhouse gases must be reported as carbon dioxide
equivalents. The rules must require that persons report 2009 emissions
starting in 2010. The rules must establish an annual reporting
schedule that takes into account the time needed to allow the owner or
operator reporting emissions of greenhouse gases to gather the
information needed and to verify the emissions being reported.
However, in no event may reports be submitted later than October 31st
of the year in which the report is due. The department may phase in
the reporting requirements for sources or combinations of sources under
(a)(ii) of this subsection until the reporting threshold is met, which
must be met by January 1, 2012. The department may from time to time
amend the rules to include other persons that emit less than the annual
greenhouse gas emissions levels set out in this subsection if necessary
to comply with any federal reporting requirements for emissions of
greenhouse gases.
(b) In its rules, the department may defer the reporting
requirement under (a) of this subsection for emissions associated with
interstate and international commercial aircraft, rail, truck, or
marine vessels until (i) there is a federal requirement to report these
emissions; or (ii) the department finds that there is a generally
accepted reporting protocol for determining interstate emissions from
these sources.)) where those emissions from a single facility, source,
or site, or from fossil fuels sold in Washington by a single supplier
meet or exceed ten thousand metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent
annually. The department may phase in the requirement to report
greenhouse gas emissions until the reporting threshold in this
subsection is met, which must occur by January 1, 2012. In addition,
the rules must require that:
(i) Emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the combustion of
fossil fuels be reported separately from emissions of greenhouse gases
resulting from the combustion of biomass;
(ii) Reporting will start in 2010 for 2009 emissions. Each annual
report must include emissions data for the preceding calendar year and
must be submitted to the department by October 31st of the year in
which the report is due. However, starting in 2011, a person who is
required to report greenhouse gas emissions to the United States
environmental protection agency under 40 C.F.R. Part 98, as adopted on
September 22, 2009, must submit the report required under this section
to the department concurrent with the submission to the United States
environmental protection agency. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the data for emissions in Washington and any corrections
thereto that are reported to the United States environmental protection
agency must be the emissions data reported to the department; and
(iii) Emissions of carbon dioxide associated with the complete
combustion or oxidation of liquid motor vehicle fuel, special fuel, or
aircraft fuel that is sold in Washington where the annual emissions
associated with that combustion or oxidation equal or exceed ten
thousand metric tons be reported to the department. Each person who is
required to file periodic tax reports of motor vehicle fuel sales under
RCW 82.36.031 or special fuel sales under RCW 82.38.150, or each
distributor of aircraft fuel required to file periodic tax reports
under RCW 82.42.040 must report to the department the annual emissions
of carbon dioxide from the complete combustion or oxidation of the
fuels listed in those reports as sold in the state of Washington. The
rules may allow this information to be aggregated when reported to the
department. The department and the department of licensing may enter
into an interagency agreement if necessary to share reported
information and protect proprietary information. Any proprietary
information exempt from disclosure when reported to the department of
licensing is exempt from disclosure when shared by the department of
licensing with the department under this provision.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the rules
adopted by the department under (a) of this subsection must be
consistent with the regulations adopted by the United States
environmental protection agency in 40 C.F.R. Part 98 on September 22,
2009. The department may by rule include additional gases to the
definition of "greenhouse gas" in RCW 70.235.010 only if the gas has
been designated as a greenhouse gas by the United States congress or by
the United States environmental protection agency. The department may
by rule exempt persons who are required to report greenhouse gas
emissions to the United States environmental protection agency and who
emit less than ten thousand metric tons carbon dioxide equivalent
annually.
(c) The department shall review and if necessary update its rules
whenever the United States environmental protection agency adopts final
amendments to 40 C.F.R. Part 98 to ensure consistency with federal
reporting requirements for emissions of greenhouse gases. However, the
department shall not amend its rules in a manner that conflicts with
(a) of this subsection.
(d) The department shall share any reporting information reported
to it with the local air authority in which the ((owner or operator))
person reporting under the rules adopted by the department operates.
(((d))) (e) The fee provisions in subsection (2) of this section
apply to reporting of emissions of greenhouse gases. ((Owners and
operators)) Persons required to report under (a) of this subsection who
fail to report or pay the fee required in subsection (2) of this
section are subject to enforcement penalties under this chapter. The
department shall enforce the reporting rule requirements unless it
approves a local air authority's request to enforce the requirements
for ((sources)) persons operating within the authority's jurisdiction.
(((e))) (f) The energy facility site evaluation council shall,
simultaneously with the department, adopt rules that impose greenhouse
gas reporting requirements in site certifications on owners or
operators of a facility permitted by the energy facility site
evaluation council. The greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed
by the energy facility site evaluation council must be the same as the
greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed by the department. The
department shall share any information reported to it from facilities
permitted by the energy facility site evaluation council with the
council, including notice of a facility that has failed to report as
required. The energy facility site evaluation council shall contract
with the department to monitor the reporting requirements adopted under
this section.
(((f) In developing its rules, the department shall, with the
assistance of the department of transportation, identify a mechanism to
report an aggregate estimate of the annual emissions of greenhouse
gases generated from or emitted by otherwise unreported on-road motor
vehicles.))
(g) The inclusion or failure to include any person, source, classes
of persons or sources, or types of emissions of greenhouse gases into
the department's rules for reporting under this section does not
indicate whether such a person, source, or category is appropriate for
inclusion in the ((multisector market-based system designed under RCW
70.235.020)) state, regional, or national greenhouse gas reduction
program or strategy.
(h) ((Should the federal government adopt rules sufficient to track
progress toward the emissions reductions required by chapter 14, Laws
of 2008 governing the reporting of greenhouse gases, the department
shall amend its rules, as necessary, to seek consistency with the
federal rules to ensure duplicate reporting is not required. Nothing
in this section requires the department to increase the reporting
threshold established in (a) of this subsection or otherwise require
the department's rules be identical to the federal rules in scope.))
(i) The definitions in RCW 70.235.010 apply throughout this subsection
(5) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(ii) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "supplier"
includes: (A) A motor vehicle fuel supplier or a motor vehicle fuel
importer, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.36.010; (B) a special
fuel supplier or a special fuel importer, as those terms are defined in
RCW 82.38.020; and (C) a distributor of aircraft fuel, as those terms
are defined in RCW 82.42.010.
(iii) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "person"
includes: (A) An owner or operator, as those terms are defined by the
United States environmental protection agency in its mandatory
greenhouse gas reporting regulation in 40 C.F.R. Part 98, as adopted on
September 22, 2009; and (B) a supplier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---