BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.010 and 2007 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Contractor" includes any person, firm, corporation, or other
entity who or which, in the pursuit of an independent business
undertakes to, or offers to undertake, or submits a bid to, construct,
alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, develop, move, wreck, or
demolish any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other
structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate
or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting or
other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures
or works in connection therewith, the installation or repair of roofing
or siding, performing tree removal services, or cabinet or similar
installation; or, who, to do similar work upon his or her own property,
employs members of more than one trade upon a single job or project or
under a single building permit except as otherwise provided in this
chapter. "Contractor" also includes a consultant acting as a general
contractor. "Contractor" also includes any person, firm, corporation,
or other entity covered by this subsection, whether or not registered
as required under this chapter or who are otherwise required to be
registered or licensed by law, who offer to sell their property without
occupying or using the structures, projects, developments, or
improvements for more than one year from the date the structure,
project, development, or improvement was substantially completed or
abandoned.
(2) "Department" means the department of ((labor and industries))
licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ((labor and
industries)) licensing or a designated representative employed by the
department.
(4) "Filing" means delivery of a document that is required to be
filed with an agency to a place designated by the agency.
(5) "General contractor" means a contractor whose business
operations require the use of more than one building trade or craft
upon a single job or project or under a single building permit. A
general contractor also includes one who superintends, or consults on,
in whole or in part, work falling within the definition of a
contractor.
(6) "Notice of infraction" means a form used by the department to
notify contractors that an infraction under this chapter has been filed
against them.
(7) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.
(8) "((Registration)) License cancellation" means a written notice
from the department that a contractor's action is in violation of this
chapter and that the contractor's ((registration)) license has been
revoked.
(9) "((Registration)) License suspension" means either an automatic
suspension as provided in this chapter, or a written notice from the
department that a contractor's action is a violation of this chapter
and that the contractor's ((registration)) license has been suspended
for a specified time, or until the contractor shows evidence of
compliance with this chapter.
(10) "Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons
owning or leasing real property:
(a) Upon which one single-family residence is to be built and in
which the owner or lessee intends to reside upon completion of any
construction; or
(b) Upon which there is a single-family residence to which
improvements are to be made and in which the owner or lessee intends to
reside upon completion of any construction.
(11) "Service," except as otherwise provided in RCW 18.27.225 and
18.27.370, means posting in the United States mail, properly addressed,
postage prepaid, return receipt requested, or personal service.
Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the United States mail to
the last known address provided to the department.
(12) "Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do
not fall within the definition of "general contractor". A specialty
contractor may only subcontract work that is incidental to the
specialty contractor's work.
(13) "Substantial completion" means the same as "substantial
completion of construction" in RCW 4.16.310.
(14) "((Unregistered)) Unlicensed contractor" means a person, firm,
corporation, or other entity doing work as a contractor without being
((registered)) licensed in compliance with this chapter.
"((Unregistered)) Unlicensed contractor" includes contractors whose
((registration)) license is expired, revoked, or suspended.
"((Unregistered)) Unlicensed contractor" does not include a contractor
who has maintained a valid bond and the insurance or assigned account
required by RCW 18.27.050, and whose ((registration)) license has
lapsed for thirty or fewer days.
(15) "Unsatisfied final judgment" means a judgment or final tax
warrant that has not been satisfied either through payment, court
approved settlement, discharge in bankruptcy, or assignment under RCW
19.72.070.
(16) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city,
town, or county of a contractor's ((registration card)) license that is
current on its face, checking the department's contractor
((registration)) license database, or calling the department to confirm
that the contractor is ((registered)) licensed.
(17) "Board" means the contractor licensing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contractor licensing board is established. The board shall
be appointed by the governor and shall consist of at least seven, but
no more than nine, contractors who shall represent the diversity of the
contracting industry, including builders and remodelers. The board
shall appoint its chair from among its membership.
(2) The members shall serve six-year terms. Of the initial
members, two must be appointed for a two-year term, two must be
appointed for a four-year term, and the remaining must be appointed for
six-year terms. Thereafter, members must be appointed for six-year
terms.
(3) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240, plus travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(4) The board shall assist the director in enforcing this chapter.
This assistance includes the following:
(a) Establishing rules, including board organization and assignment
of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by the
director;
(b) Approving the method of administration of examinations required
by this chapter or as established by the director;
(c) Setting the time and place of examinations with the approval of
the director;
(d) Overseeing the continuing education requirements established by
the director;
(e) Establishing and reviewing standards of professional conduct,
practice, and ethics for adoption by the director; and
(f) Other duties as requested by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The director, with the advice and approval of the board:
(1) May adopt rules to govern the activities of licensed
contractors, consistent with this chapter, fix the times and places for
holding examinations of applicants for licenses, and prescribe the
method of conducting the examinations;
(2) Shall enforce all laws and rules relating to the licensing of
contractors;
(3) Shall establish by rule standards for the licensing of
applicants licensed in other jurisdictions and for reciprocity,
including the use of written recognition agreements;
(4) Shall establish by rule exemptions to the licensing
requirements for contractors currently registered under this chapter;
(5) May adopt rules requiring all applicants to submit to a
criminal background check, and the applicant is responsible for the
payment of any fees incurred;
(6) Shall adopt rules and establish standards relating to
permissible forms of clear and conspicuous advertising by licensees;
(7) Shall institute a program of contractor education. The program
may include courses at institutions of higher education in Washington,
trade schools, private contractor schools, and preapproved forums and
conferences. The program must establish minimum levels of continuing
education for licensees in accordance with subsection (9) of this
section. The program may also include the development of
implementation of curricula courses, educational materials, or
approaches to education relating to contractors when required or
approved for continuing education credit. The director may enter into
contracts with other persons or entities, whether publicly or privately
owned or operated, to assist in developing or implementing the
contractor education program;
(8) Shall charge a fee for the certification of courses of
instruction, instructors, and schools;
(9) Shall adopt continuing education requirements for licensees to
complete every two years. These requirements must include:
(a) Between eight and sixteen hours of classroom instruction,
distance learning, or internet classes; and
(b) A waiver of continuing education requirements for contractors
who have one of the following national association of home builders
designations and are in good standing:
(i) Certified graduate builder;
(ii) Graduate master builder;
(iii) Certified graduate remodeler; or
(iv) Graduate master remodeler;
(10) May take disciplinary action against contractor programs and
instructors providing services under this section based upon conduct,
acts, or conditions prescribed by rule, and may impose any or all of
the following sanctions and fines:
(a) Withdrawal of the certificate of approval;
(b) Suspension of the certificate of approval for a fixed or
indefinite term;
(c) Stayed suspension for a designated period of time;
(d) Censure or reprimand;
(e) Payment of a fine for each violation not to exceed one thousand
dollars per day per violation. Each day a violation continues or
occurs is a separate violation for purposes of imposing a penalty;
(f) Denial of an initial or renewal application for a certificate
of approval; and
(g) Other corrective action; and
(11) May develop and provide educational programs and materials for
members of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall adopt a seal with the words "Washington state
contractor licensing" and such other device as the director may approve
engraved on the seal, by which the director shall authenticate the
proceedings of the office. Copies of all records and papers in the
office of the director certified to be true copies under the hand and
seal of the director must be received in evidence in all cases equally
and with like effect as the originals. The director may authorize one
or more assistants to certify records and papers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The director may publish a copy of this chapter and information
relative to the enforcement of this chapter and mail a copy of this
chapter and the enforcement information to each licensed contractor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
While employed with the department, the director and employees who
administer, regulate, or enforce contractor laws and rules must
relinquish interest in any contractor business regulated under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
All fees required under this chapter must be set by the director in
accordance with RCW 43.24.086 and must be paid to the state treasurer.
All fees paid under this chapter must be placed in the contractor
licensing account in the state treasury. All moneys derived from fines
imposed under this chapter must be reinvested in the contractor
education program under section 3(7) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The contractor licensing account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from fees paid under this chapter must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
administering this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall appoint adequate staff to assist him or her.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.27.020 and 2007 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor ((shall register)) must be licensed with the
department.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being ((registered)) licensed as required by
this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's ((registration)) license is
suspended or revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired ((registration)) license number in
purchasing or offering to purchase an advertisement for which a
contractor ((registration)) license number is required;
(d) Transfer a valid ((registration)) license to an
((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor or allow an ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor to work under a ((registration)) license issued
to another contractor; or
(e) Subcontract to or use an ((unregistered)) unlicensed
contractor.
(3) It is not unlawful for a ((registered)) licensed contractor to
employ an ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor who was ((registered))
licensed at the time he or she entered into a contract with the
((registered)) licensed contractor, unless the ((registered)) licensed
contractor or his or her representative has been notified in writing by
the department ((of labor and industries)) that the contractor has
become ((unregistered)) unlicensed.
(4) All gross misdemeanor actions under this chapter shall be
prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a citation from the department,
the person works while ((unregistered)) unlicensed, or while his or her
((registration)) license is suspended or revoked, or works under a
((registration)) license issued to another contractor. A person is
guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor for each worksite on which he or
she violates subsection (2) of this section. Nothing in this
subsection applies to a ((registered)) licensed contractor.
(6) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not ((registered)) licensed under
this chapter who becomes ((registered)) licensed after receiving an
infraction or conviction under this chapter as an ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor. The director shall notify the departments of
revenue and employment security of the infractions or convictions and
shall cooperate with these departments to determine whether any taxes
or registration, license, or other fees or penalties are owed the
state.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.27.030 and 2008 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((An applicant for registration as a contractor shall)) The
minimum requirements for an individual to receive a contractor's
license are that the individual:
(a) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Has the education and work experience as established by the
board;
(c) Submits an application under oath upon a form to be prescribed
by the director and which shall include the following information
pertaining to the applicant:
(((a))) (i) Employer social security number.
(((b))) (ii) Unified business identifier number.
(((c))) (iii) Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the
applicant's employees working in Washington, as follows:
(((i))) (A) The applicant's industrial insurance account number
issued by the department of labor and industries;
(((ii))) (B) The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the
department of labor and industries; or
(((iii))) (C) For applicants domiciled in a state or province of
Canada subject to an agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as
permitted by the agreement, filing a certificate of coverage issued by
the agency that administers the workers' compensation law in the
applicant's state or province of domicile certifying that the applicant
has secured the payment of compensation under the other state's or
province's workers' compensation law.
(((d))) (iv) Employment security department number.
(((e))) (v) Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be
substituted for the information required by (c) (iii) and (((d))) (iv)
of this subsection if the applicant will not employ employees in
Washington.
(((f))) (vi) Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a
specialty contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.
(((g))) (vii) The name and address of each partner if the applicant
is a firm or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the
applicant is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of
the corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is
a corporation or the name and address of all members of other business
entities. The information contained in such application is a matter of
public record and open to public inspection; and
(d) Has passed the contractor's license examination.
(2) The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage
information provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(c)(iii) of
this section, including but not limited to information regarding the
coverage of an individual employee of the applicant. If coverage is
provided under the laws of another state, the department may notify the
other state that the applicant is employing employees in Washington.
(3)(a) The department shall deny ((an)) a license application ((for
registration)) if: (i) The applicant has been previously performing
work subject to this chapter as a sole proprietor, partnership,
corporation, or other entity and the department has notice that the
applicant has an unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an
action based on work performed subject to this chapter or the applicant
owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (ii) the applicant was an
owner, principal, or officer of a partnership, corporation, or other
entity that either has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in an
action that was incurred for work performed subject to this chapter or
owes the department money for penalties assessed or fees due under this
chapter as a result of a final judgment; (iii) the applicant does not
have a valid unified business identifier number; (iv) the department
determines that the applicant has falsified information on the
application, unless the error was inadvertent; or (v) the applicant
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue.
(b) The department shall suspend an active ((registration)) license
if (i) the department has determined that the ((registrant)) licensee
has an unsatisfied final judgment against it for work within the scope
of this chapter; (ii) the department has determined that the
((registrant)) licensee is a sole proprietor or an owner, principal, or
officer of a ((registered)) licensed contractor that has an unsatisfied
final judgment against it for work within the scope of this chapter;
(iii) the ((registrant)) licensee does not maintain a valid unified
business identifier number; (iv) the department has determined that the
((registrant)) licensee falsified information on the application,
unless the error was inadvertent; or (v) the ((registrant)) licensee
does not have an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue.
(c) The department may suspend an active ((registration)) license
if the department has determined that an owner, principal, partner, or
officer of the ((registrant)) licensee was an owner, principal, or
officer of a previous partnership, corporation, or other entity that
has an unsatisfied final judgment against it.
(4) The department shall not deny an application or suspend a
((registration)) license because of an unsatisfied final judgment if
the applicant's or ((registrant's)) licensee's unsatisfied final
judgment was determined by the director to be the result of the fraud
or negligence of another party.
(5) The contractor's license may be renewed upon completion of
continuing education courses and payment of the renewal fee as
prescribed by the director.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.27.040 and 2007 c 436 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28
RCW in the sum of twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general
contractor and six thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty
contractor. If no valid bond is already on file with the department at
the time the application is filed, a bond must accompany the
((registration)) license application. The bond shall have the state of
Washington named as obligee with good and sufficient surety in a form
to be approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and may
be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director. A cancellation or revocation of the bond or withdrawal of
the surety from the bond automatically suspends the ((registration))
license issued to the contractor until a new bond or reinstatement
notice has been filed and approved as provided in this section. The
bond shall be conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons
performing labor, including employee benefits, for the contractor, will
pay all taxes and contributions due to the state of Washington, and
will pay all persons furnishing material or renting or supplying
equipment to the contractor and will pay all amounts that may be
adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of contract
including improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A
change in the name of a business or a change in the type of business
entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long
as one of the original applicants for such bond maintains partial
ownership in the business covered by the bond.
(2) At the time of initial ((registration)) licensing or renewal,
the contractor shall provide a bond or other security deposit as
required by this chapter and comply with all of the other provisions of
this chapter before the department shall issue or renew the
contractor's ((certificate of registration)) license. Any contractor
registered as of July 1, 2001, who maintains that ((registration))
license in accordance with this chapter is in compliance with this
chapter until the next renewal of the contractor's ((certificate of
registration)) license.
(3) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring
suit against the contractor and the bond or deposit in the superior
court of the county in which the work was done or of any county in
which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety issuing
the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action
upon the bond or deposit brought by a residential homeowner for breach
of contract by a party to the construction contract shall be commenced
by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk of the appropriate
superior court within two years from the date the claimed contract work
was substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first.
Action upon the bond or deposit brought by any other authorized party
shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint with the clerk
of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date the
claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes and
contributions owing the state of Washington became due, materials and
equipment were furnished, or the claimed contract work was
substantially completed or abandoned, whichever occurred first.
Service of process in an action filed under this chapter against the
contractor and the contractor's bond or the deposit shall be
exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of the
summons and complaint and a fee adopted by rule of not less than fifty
dollars to cover the costs shall be served by registered or certified
mail, or other delivery service requiring notice of receipt, upon the
department at the time suit is started and the department shall
maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits so
commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives the
fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service shall
constitute service and confer personal jurisdiction on the contractor
and the surety for suit on claimant's claim against the contractor and
the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and
complaint or a copy thereof to the contractor at the address listed in
the contractor's application and to the surety within two days after it
shall have been received.
(4) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate
amount in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary
penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The
liability of the surety shall not cumulate where the bond has been
renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued or otherwise extended. The
surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the department and the
parties, tender to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the
action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the amount of the
bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond
shall be exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending and
provided to the department as required in subsection (3) of this
section, at any one time exceed the amount of the bond then unimpaired,
claims shall be satisfied from the bond in the following order:
(a) Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee
benefits;
(b) Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction
contract;
(c) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;
(d) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;
(e) Any court costs, interest, and attorneys' fees plaintiff may be
entitled to recover. The surety is not liable for any amount in excess
of the penal limit of its bond.
A payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to
the extent of any payment made by the surety.
(5) The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a
general contractor by this section to claimants other than residential
homeowners must not exceed one-half of the bond amount. The total
amount paid from a bond or deposit required of a specialty contractor
by this section to claimants other than residential homeowners must not
exceed one-half of the bond amount or four thousand dollars, whichever
is greater.
(6) The prevailing party in an action filed under this section
against the contractor and contractor's bond or deposit, for breach of
contract by a party to the construction contract involving a
residential homeowner, is entitled to costs, interest, and reasonable
attorneys' fees. The surety upon the bond or deposit is not liable in
an aggregate amount in excess of the amount named in the bond or
deposit nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter
for an infraction.
(7) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon
the bond or deposit so furnished that there is not in effect a bond or
deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the
((registration)) license of the contractor is automatically suspended
until the bond or deposit liability in the required amount unimpaired
by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished.
(8) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
contractor may file with the department an assigned savings account,
upon forms provided by the department.
(9) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against
the ((registrant)) licensee for any items referred to in this section
may execute upon the security held by the department by serving a
certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment by registered or
certified mail upon the department within one year of the date of entry
of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy
the department shall pay or order paid from the deposit, through the
registry of the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the
amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the
department shall be the order of receipt by the department, but the
department shall have no liability for payment in excess of the amount
of the deposit.
(10) Within ten days after resolution of the case, a certified copy
of the final judgment and order, or any settlement documents where a
case is not disposed of by a court trial, a certified copy of the
dispositive settlement documents must be provided to the department by
the prevailing party. Failure to provide a copy of the final judgment
and order or the dispositive settlement documents to the department
within ten days of entry of such an order constitutes a violation of
this chapter and a penalty adopted by rule of not less than two hundred
fifty dollars may be assessed against the prevailing party.
(11) The director may require an applicant applying to renew or
reinstate a ((registration)) license or applying for a new
((registration)) license to file a bond of up to three times the
normally required amount, if the director determines that an applicant,
or a previous ((registration)) license of a corporate officer, owner,
or partner of a current applicant, has had in the past five years a
total of three final judgments in actions under this chapter involving
a residential single-family dwelling on two or more different
structures.
(12) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.27.050 and 2001 c 159 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of ((registration)) licensing and subsequent
((reregistration)) renewal, the applicant shall furnish insurance or
financial responsibility in the form of an assigned account in the
amount of fifty thousand dollars for injury or damages to property, and
one hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage including death to
any one person, and two hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage
including death to more than one person.
(2) An expiration, cancellation, or revocation of the insurance
policy or withdrawal of the insurer from the insurance policy
automatically suspends the ((registration)) license issued to the
((registrant)) licensee until a new insurance policy or reinstatement
notice has been filed and approved as provided in this section.
(3)(a) Proof of financial responsibility authorized in this section
may be given by providing, in the amount required by subsection (1) of
this section, an assigned account acceptable to the department. The
assigned account shall be held by the department to satisfy any
execution on a judgment issued against the contractor for damage to
property or injury or death to any person occurring in the contractor's
contracting operations, according to the provisions of the assigned
account agreement. The department shall have no liability for payment
in excess of the amount of the assigned account.
(b) The assigned account filed with the director as proof of
financial responsibility shall be canceled at the expiration of three
years after:
(i) The contractor's ((registration)) license has expired or been
revoked; or
(ii) The contractor has furnished proof of insurance as required by
subsection (1) of this section;
if, in either case, no legal action has been instituted against the
contractor or on the account at the expiration of the three-year
period.
(c) If a contractor chooses to file an assigned account as
authorized in this section, the contractor shall, on any contracting
project, notify each person with whom the contractor enters into a
contract or to whom the contractor submits a bid that the contractor
has filed an assigned account in lieu of insurance and that recovery
from the account for any claim against the contractor for property
damage or personal injury or death occurring in the project requires
the claimant to obtain a court judgment.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.27.060 and 2006 c 185 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A ((certificate of registration)) license shall be valid for
two years and shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The
department shall issue to the applicant a ((certificate of
registration)) license upon compliance with the ((registration))
requirements of this chapter.
(2) If the department approves an application, it shall issue a
((certificate of registration)) license to the applicant.
(3) If a contractor's surety bond or other security has an
unsatisfied judgment against it or is canceled, or if the contractor's
insurance policy is canceled, the contractor's ((registration)) license
shall be automatically suspended on the effective date of the
impairment or cancellation. The department shall mail notice of the
suspension to the contractor's address on the ((certificate of
registration)) license by certified and by first-class mail within two
days after suspension.
(4) Renewal of ((registration)) a license is valid on the date the
department receives a certificate showing completion of the required
continuing education credit, the required fee, and proof of bond and
liability insurance, if sent by certified mail or other means requiring
proof of delivery. The receipt or proof of delivery shall serve as the
contractor's proof of a renewed ((registration)) license until he or
she receives verification from the department.
(5) The department shall immediately suspend the ((certificate of
registration)) license of a contractor who has been certified by the
department of social and health services as a person who is not in
compliance with a support order or a visitation order as provided in
RCW 74.20A.320. The ((certificate of registration)) license shall not
be reissued or renewed unless the person provides to the department a
release from the department of social and health services stating that
he or she is in compliance with the order and the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for ((certification)) licensing during
the suspension.
(6) For a contractor who employs plumbers, as described in RCW
18.106.010(10)(c), and is also required to be licensed as an electrical
contractor as required in RCW 19.28.041, while doing pump and
irrigation or domestic pump work described in rule as authorized by RCW
19.28.251, the department shall establish a single
((registration/licensing)) licensing document for those who qualify for
both a general contractor ((registration)) license as defined by this
chapter and an electrical contractor license as defined by chapter
19.28 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 18.27.065 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
A partnership or joint venture shall be deemed ((registered))
licensed under this chapter if any one of the general partners or
venturers whose name appears in the name under which the partnership or
venture does business is ((registered)) licensed.

Sec. 16 RCW 18.27.070 and 1997 c 314 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall charge fees for issuance, renewal, and
reinstatement of ((certificates of registration)) licenses; and changes
of name, address, or business structure. The department shall set the
fees by rule.
The entire amount of the fees are to be used solely to cover the
full cost of issuing ((certificates)) licenses, filing papers and
notices, and administering and enforcing this chapter. The costs shall
include reproduction, travel, per diem, and administrative and legal
support costs.

Sec. 17 RCW 18.27.075 and 2001 c 159 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall charge a fee of one hundred dollars for
issuing or renewing a ((certificate of registration)) license during
the 2001-2003 biennium. The department shall revise this amount at
least once every two years for the purpose of recognizing economic
changes as reflected by the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135
RCW.

Sec. 18 RCW 18.27.080 and 2007 c 436 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a
contractor may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state
for the collection of compensation for the performance of any work or
for breach of any contract for which ((registration)) a license is
required under this chapter without alleging and proving that he was a
duly ((registered)) licensed contractor and held a current and valid
((certificate of registration)) license at the time he or she
contracted for the performance of such work or entered into such
contract. For the purposes of this section, the court shall not find
a contractor in substantial compliance with the ((registration))
license requirements of this chapter unless: (1) The department has on
file the information required by RCW 18.27.030; (2) the contractor has
at all times had in force a current bond or other security as required
by RCW 18.27.040; and (3) the contractor has at all times had in force
current insurance as required by RCW 18.27.050. In determining under
this section whether a contractor is in substantial compliance with the
((registration)) licensing requirements of this chapter, the court
shall take into consideration the length of time during which the
contractor did not hold a valid ((certificate of registration))
license.

Sec. 19 RCW 18.27.090 and 2007 c 436 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((registration)) licensing provisions of this chapter do not
apply to:
(1) An authorized representative of the United States government,
the state of Washington, or any incorporated city, town, county,
township, irrigation district, reclamation district, or other municipal
or political corporation or subdivision of this state;
(2) Officers of a court when they are acting within the scope of
their office;
(3) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the
utilities and transportation commission in construction, maintenance,
or development work incidental to their own business;
(4) Any construction, repair, or operation incidental to the
discovering or producing of petroleum or gas, or the drilling, testing,
abandoning, or other operation of any petroleum or gas well or any
surface or underground mine or mineral deposit when performed by an
owner or lessee;
(5) The sale of any finished products, materials, or articles of
merchandise that are not fabricated into and do not become a part of a
structure under the common law of fixtures;
(6) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of
personal property performed by the registered or legal owner, or by a
mobile/manufactured home retail dealer or manufacturer licensed under
chapter 46.70 RCW who shall warranty service and repairs under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(7) Any construction, alteration, improvement, or repair carried on
within the limits and boundaries of any site or reservation under the
legal jurisdiction of the federal government;
(8) Any person who only furnished materials, supplies, or equipment
without fabricating them into, or consuming them in the performance of,
the work of the contractor;
(9) Any work or operation on one undertaking or project by one or
more contracts, the aggregate contract price of which for labor and
materials and all other items is less than five hundred dollars, such
work or operations being considered as of a casual, minor, or
inconsequential nature. The exemption prescribed in this subsection
does not apply in any instance wherein the work or construction is only
a part of a larger or major operation, whether undertaken by the same
or a different contractor, or in which a division of the operation is
made into contracts of amounts less than five hundred dollars for the
purpose of evasion of this chapter or otherwise. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who advertises
or puts out any sign or card or other device which might indicate to
the public that he or she is a contractor, or that he or she is
qualified to engage in the business of contractor;
(10) Any construction or operation incidental to the construction
and repair of irrigation and drainage ditches of regularly constituted
irrigation districts or reclamation districts; or to farming, dairying,
agriculture, viticulture, horticulture, or stock or poultry raising; or
to clearing or other work upon land in rural districts for fire
prevention purposes; except when any of the above work is performed by
a ((registered)) licensed contractor;
(11) An owner who contracts for a project with a ((registered))
licensed contractor, except that this exemption shall not deprive the
owner of the protections of this chapter against ((registered))
licensed and ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractors. The exemption
prescribed in this subsection does not apply to a person who performs
the activities of a contractor for the purpose of leasing or selling
improved property he or she has owned for less than twelve months;
(12) Any person working on his or her own property, whether
occupied by him or her or not, and any person working on his or her
personal residence, whether owned by him or her or not but this
exemption shall not apply to any person who performs the activities of
a contractor on his or her own property for the purpose of selling,
demolishing, or leasing the property;
(13) An owner who performs maintenance, repair, and alteration work
in or upon his or her own properties, or who uses his or her own
employees to do such work;
(14) A licensed architect or civil or professional engineer acting
solely in his or her professional capacity, an electrician certified
under the laws of the state of Washington, or a plumber certified under
the laws of the state of Washington or licensed by a political
subdivision of the state of Washington while operating within the
boundaries of such political subdivision. The exemption provided in
this subsection is applicable only when the person certified is
operating within the scope of his or her certification;
(15) Any person who engages in the activities herein regulated as
an employee of a ((registered)) licensed contractor with wages as his
or her sole compensation or as an employee with wages as his or her
sole compensation;
(16) Contractors on highway projects who have been prequalified as
required by RCW 47.28.070, with the department of transportation to
perform highway construction, reconstruction, or maintenance work;
(17) A mobile/manufactured home dealer or manufacturer who
subcontracts the installation, set-up, or repair work to actively
((registered)) licensed contractors. This exemption only applies to
the installation, set-up, or repair of the mobile/manufactured homes
that were manufactured or sold by the mobile/manufactured home dealer
or manufacturer;
(18) An entity who holds a valid electrical contractor's license
under chapter 19.28 RCW that employs a certified journeyman
electrician, a certified residential specialty electrician, or an
electrical trainee meeting the requirements of chapter 19.28 RCW to
perform plumbing work that is incidentally, directly, and immediately
appropriate to the like-in-kind replacement of a household appliance or
other small household utilization equipment that requires limited
electric power and limited waste and/or water connections. An
electrical trainee must be supervised by a certified electrician while
performing plumbing work.

Sec. 20 RCW 18.27.100 and 2008 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint
ventures, no person who has ((registered)) a license under one name as
provided in this chapter shall engage in the business, or act in the
capacity, of a contractor under any other name unless such name also is
((registered)) licensed under this chapter.
(2) All advertising and all contracts, correspondence, cards,
signs, posters, papers, and documents which show a contractor's name or
address shall show the contractor's name or address as ((registered))
licensed under this chapter.
(3)(a) All advertising that shows the contractor's name or address
shall show the contractor's current ((registration)) license number.
The ((registration)) license number may be omitted in an alphabetized
listing of ((registered)) licensed contractors stating only the name,
address, and telephone number: PROVIDED, That signs on motor vehicles
subject to RCW 46.16.010 and on-premise signs shall not constitute
advertising as provided in this section. All materials used to
directly solicit business from retail customers who are not businesses
shall show the contractor's current ((registration)) license number.
A contractor shall not use a false or expired ((registration)) license
number in purchasing or offering to purchase an advertisement for which
a contractor ((registration)) license number is required. Advertising
by airwave transmission shall not be subject to this subsection (3)(a).
(b) The director may issue a subpoena to any person or entity
selling any advertising subject to this section for the name, address,
and telephone number provided to the seller of the advertising by the
purchaser of the advertising. The subpoena must have enclosed a
stamped, self-addressed envelope and blank form to be filled out by the
seller of the advertising. If the seller of the advertising has the
information on file, the seller shall, within a reasonable time, return
the completed form to the department. The subpoena must be issued no
more than two days after the expiration of the issue or publication
containing the advertising or after the broadcast of the advertising.
The good-faith compliance by a seller of advertising with a written
request of the department for information concerning the purchaser of
advertising shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or
criminal action brought against the seller of advertising arising from
such compliance. Advertising by airwave or electronic transmission is
subject to this subsection (3)(b).
(4) No contractor shall advertise that he or she is bonded and
insured because of the bond required to be filed and sufficiency of
insurance as provided in this chapter.
(5) A contractor shall not falsify a ((registration)) license
number and use it, or use an expired ((registration)) license number,
in connection with any solicitation or identification as a contractor.
All individual contractors and all partners, associates, agents,
salesmen, solicitors, officers, and employees of contractors shall use
their true names and addresses at all times while engaged in the
business or capacity of a contractor or activities related thereto.
(6) Any advertising by a person, firm, or corporation soliciting
work as a contractor when that person, firm, or corporation is not
((registered)) licensed pursuant to this chapter is a violation of this
chapter.
(7) An applicant or ((registrant)) licensee who falsifies
information on ((an)) a license application ((for registration))
commits a violation under this section.
(8)(a) The finding of a violation of this section by the director
at a hearing held in accordance with the administrative procedure act,
chapter 34.05 RCW, shall subject the person committing the violation to
a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars as determined by the
director.
(b) Penalties under this section shall not apply to a violation
determined to be an inadvertent error.

Sec. 21 RCW 18.27.104 and 2007 c 436 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, upon investigation, the director or the director's designee
has probable cause to believe that a person holding a ((registration))
license, ((an)) a license applicant ((for registration)), or a person
acting in the capacity of a contractor who is not otherwise exempted
from this chapter, has violated RCW 18.27.100 by unlawfully advertising
for work covered by this chapter, the department may issue a citation
containing an order of correction. Such order shall require the
violator to cease the unlawful advertising.
(2) If the person to whom a citation is issued under subsection (1)
of this section notifies the department in writing that he or she
contests the citation, the department shall afford an opportunity for
an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 22 RCW 18.27.110 and 1997 c 314 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No city, town or county shall issue a construction building
permit for work which is to be done by any contractor required to be
((registered)) licensed under this chapter without verification that
such contractor is currently ((registered)) licensed as required by
law. When such verification is made, nothing contained in this section
is intended to be, nor shall be construed to create, or form the basis
for any liability under this chapter on the part of any city, town or
county, or its officers, employees or agents. However, failure to
verify the contractor ((registration)) license number results in
liability to the city, town, or county to a penalty to be imposed
according to RCW 18.27.100(((7))) (8)(a).
(2) At the time of issuing the building permit, all cities, towns,
or counties are responsible for:
(a) Printing the contractor ((registration)) license number on the
building permit; and
(b) Providing a written notice to the building permit applicant
informing them of contractor ((registration)) licensing laws and the
potential risk and monetary liability to the homeowner for using an
((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor.
(3) If a building permit is obtained by an applicant or contractor
who falsifies information to obtain an exemption provided under RCW
18.27.090, the building permit shall be forfeited.

Sec. 23 RCW 18.27.114 and 2007 c 436 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project:
(a) For the repair, alteration, or construction of four or fewer
residential units or accessory structures on such residential property
when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more; or
(b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial
building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or
more but less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer
with the following disclosure statement in substantially the following
form using lower case and upper case twelve-point and bold type where
appropriate, prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is ((registered)) licensed with the state of
Washington, ((registration)) license no. . . ., and has posted
with the state a bond or deposit of . . . . . for the purpose
of satisfying claims against the contractor for breach of
contract including negligent or improper work in the conduct of
the contractor's business. The expiration date of this
contractor's ((registration)) license is . . . . ..

THIS BOND OR DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM
THAT MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use because it
covers all work performed by this contractor. The bond or
deposit is intended to pay valid claims up to . . . . . that
you and other customers, suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing
authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY WITHHOLD A PERCENTAGE OF YOUR
CONTRACT.

You may withhold a contractually defined percentage of your
construction contract as retainage for a stated period of time
to provide protection to you and help insure that your project
will be completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If a supplier of materials used in your construction project or
an employee or subcontractor of your contractor or
subcontractors is not paid, your property may be liened to
force payment and you could pay twice for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU MAY REQUEST THE CONTRACTOR TO
PROVIDE YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS FROM EACH
SUPPLIER OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The contractor is required to provide you with further
information about lien release documents if you request it.
General information is also available from the state Department
of ((Labor and Industries)) Licensing.

I have received a copy of this disclosure statement.

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

(Signature of customer)
"

(2) The contractor must retain a signed copy of the disclosure
statement in his or her files for a minimum of three years, and produce
a signed or electronic signature copy of the disclosure statement to
the department upon request.
(3) A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer
to whom notice is required under subsection (1) of this section if the
contractor's ((registration)) license has expired or is revoked or
suspended by the department prior to completion or other termination of
the contract with the consumer.
(4) No contractor subject to this section may bring or maintain any
lien claim under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this
section applies without alleging and proving that the contractor has
provided the customer with a copy of the disclosure statement as
required in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) This section does not apply to contracts authorized under
chapter 39.04 RCW or to contractors contracting with other contractors.
(6) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an
infraction under the provisions of this chapter.
(7) The department shall produce model disclosure statements, and
public service announcements detailing the information needed to assist
contractors and contractors' customers to comply under this section.
As necessary, the department shall periodically update these education
materials.

Sec. 24 RCW 18.27.117 and 1997 c 314 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that setting up and siting
mobile/manufactured homes must be done properly for the health, safety,
and enjoyment of the occupants. Therefore, when any of the following
cause a health and safety risk to the occupants of a
mobile/manufactured home, or severely hinder the use and enjoyment of
the mobile/manufactured home, a violation of RCW 19.86.020 shall have
occurred:
(1) The mobile/manufactured home has been improperly installed by
a contractor ((registered)) licensed under this chapter ((18.27 RCW)),
or a mobile/manufactured dealer or manufacturer licensed under chapter
46.70 RCW;
(2) A warranty given under this chapter ((18.27 RCW)) or chapter
46.70 RCW has not been fulfilled by the person or business giving the
warranty; and
(3) A bonding company that issues a bond under this chapter ((18.27
RCW)) or chapter 46.70 RCW does not reasonably and professionally
investigate and resolve claims made by injured parties.

Sec. 25 RCW 18.27.120 and 2005 c 274 s 221 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall compile a list of all contractors
((registered)) licensed under this chapter and update the list at least
bimonthly. The list shall be considered as public record information
and shall be available to the public upon request: PROVIDED, That the
department may charge a reasonable fee under RCW 42.56.120.
(2) The department shall inform any person, firm, or corporation,
if a contractor is ((registered)) licensed, and if a contractor is
bonded or insured, without charge except for a reasonable fee under RCW
42.56.120 for copies made.

Sec. 26 RCW 18.27.130 and 1972 ex.s. c 118 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter relating to the ((registration or))
licensing of any person, firm, or corporation, including the
requirement of a bond with the state of Washington named as obligee
therein and the collection of a fee therefor, shall be exclusive and no
political subdivision of the state of Washington shall require or issue
any ((registrations,)) licenses((,)) or bonds nor charge any fee for
the same or a similar purpose: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall
limit or abridge the authority of any city or town to levy and collect
a general and nondiscriminatory license fee levied upon all businesses,
or to levy a tax based upon gross business conducted by any firm within
said city: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That nothing herein shall limit the
authority of any city or town with respect to contractors not required
to be ((registered)) licensed under this chapter.

Sec. 27 RCW 18.27.200 and 2007 c 436 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is a violation of this chapter and an infraction for any
contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being ((registered)) licensed as required by
this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's ((registration)) license is
suspended or revoked;
(c) Transfer a valid ((registration)) license to an
((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor or allow an ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor to work under a ((registration)) license issued
to another contractor;
(d) If the contractor is a contractor as defined in RCW 18.106.010,
violate RCW 18.106.320; or
(e) Subcontract to, or use, an ((unregistered)) unlicensed
contractor.
(2) Each day that a contractor works without being ((registered))
licensed as required by this chapter, works while the contractor's
((registration)) license is suspended or revoked, or works under a
((registration)) license issued to another contractor is a separate
infraction. Each worksite at which a contractor works without being
((registered)) licensed as required by this chapter, works while the
contractor's ((registration)) license is suspended or revoked, or works
under a ((registration)) license issued to another contractor is a
separate infraction.

Sec. 28 RCW 18.27.205 and 2008 c 120 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A contractor found to have committed an infraction or violation
under this chapter for performing work as an ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor shall, in addition to any penalties under this
chapter, be subject to the penalties in RCW 39.12.055.

Sec. 29 RCW 18.27.210 and 2007 c 436 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint compliance inspectors to investigate
alleged or apparent violations of this chapter.
(a) The director, or authorized compliance inspector, upon
presentation of appropriate credentials, may inspect and investigate
job sites at which a contractor had bid or presently is working to
determine whether the contractor is ((registered)) licensed in
accordance with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter or
whether there is a violation of this chapter.
(b) Upon request of the compliance inspector of the department, a
contractor or an employee of the contractor shall provide information
identifying the contractor.
(c) The director or the director's authorized representative may
apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant
authorizing access to any job site at which a contractor is presently
working. The court may, upon such an application, issue a search
warrant for the purpose requested. The costs for obtaining the search
warrant must be added to the penalty for a violation of this chapter if
such a violation becomes final.
(2) If the employee of an ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor is
cited by a compliance inspector, that employee is cited as the agent of
the employer-contractor, and issuance of the infraction to the employee
is notice to the employer-contractor that the contractor is in
violation of this chapter. An employee who is cited by a compliance
inspector shall not be liable for any of the alleged violations
contained in the citation unless the employee is also the contractor.

Sec. 30 RCW 18.27.215 and 2007 c 436 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation of
this chapter, the director and the director's authorized
representatives may issue subpoenas to enforce the production and
examination of any of the following, whether written or electronic: A
listing of the contractors working on the property; contracts between
the contractor and any suppliers or subcontractors; and any other
information necessary to enforce this chapter. The subpoena may be
issued only if a contractor fails to provide the above information when
requested by the department. The superior court has the power to
enforce such a subpoena by proper proceedings. This section applies to
((registered)) licensed and ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractors.

Sec. 31 RCW 18.27.225 and 1987 c 419 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If, upon inspection or investigation, the director or
authorized compliance inspector reasonably believes that a contractor
has failed to ((register)) obtain a license in accordance with this
chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the director shall
issue an order immediately restraining further construction work at the
job site by the contractor. The order shall describe the specific
violation that necessitated issuance of the restraining order. The
contractor or representative to whom the restraining order is directed
may request a hearing before an administrative law judge, such hearing
to be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A request for hearing
shall not stay the effect of the restraining order.
(2) In addition to and after having invoked the powers of restraint
vested in the director as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
the director, through the attorney general, may petition the superior
court of the state of Washington to enjoin any activity in violation of
this chapter. A prima facie case for issuance of an injunction shall
be established by affidavits and supporting documentation demonstrating
that a restraining order was served upon the contractor and that the
contractor continued to work after service of the order. Upon the
filing of the petition, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to
grant injunctive or other appropriate relief, pending the outcome of
enforcement proceedings under this chapter, or to enforce restraining
orders issued by the director. If the contractor fails to comply with
any court order, the director shall request the attorney general to
petition the superior court for an order holding the contractor in
contempt of court and for any other appropriate relief.

Sec. 32 RCW 18.27.240 and 2007 c 436 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The form of the notice of infraction issued under this chapter
shall include the following:
(1) A statement that the notice represents a determination that the
infraction has been committed by the contractor named in the notice and
that the determination shall be final unless contested as provided in
this chapter;
(2) A statement that the infraction is a noncriminal offense for
which imprisonment shall not be imposed as a sanction;
(3) A statement of the violation which necessitated issuance of the
infraction;
(4) A statement of penalty involved if the infraction is
established;
(5) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for
responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options;
(6) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of
the evidence, that the infraction was committed; and that the
contractor may subpoena witnesses, including the compliance inspector
of the department who issued and served the notice of infraction;
(7) A statement that at any hearing to contest the notice of
infraction against an ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor, the
((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor has the burden of proving that
the infraction did not occur;
(8) A statement that the contractor must respond to the notice of
infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter; and
(9) A statement that a contractor's failure to timely select one of
the options for responding to the notice of infraction after receiving
a statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to
the notice of infraction and the procedures necessary to exercise these
options is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine
or imprisonment in jail.

Sec. 33 RCW 18.27.270 and 2007 c 436 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A contractor who is issued a notice of infraction shall respond
within twenty days of the date of issuance of the notice of infraction.
(2) If the contractor named in the notice of infraction does not
elect to contest the notice of infraction, then the contractor shall
pay to the department, by check or money order, the amount of the
penalty prescribed for the infraction. When a response which does not
contest the notice of infraction is received by the department with the
appropriate penalty, the department shall make the appropriate entry in
its records.
(3) If the contractor named in the notice of infraction elects to
contest the notice of infraction, the contractor shall respond by
filing an appeal to the department in the manner specified in RCW
18.27.250.
(4) If any contractor issued a notice of infraction fails to
respond within the prescribed response period, the contractor shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and prosecuted in the county where the
infraction occurred.
(5) After final determination by an administrative law judge that
an infraction has been committed, a contractor who fails to pay a
monetary penalty within thirty days, that is not waived pursuant to RCW
18.27.340(2), and who fails to file an appeal pursuant to RCW
18.27.310(4), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the
county where the infraction occurred.
(6) A contractor who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty
days after exhausting appellate remedies pursuant to RCW 18.27.310(4),
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where
the infraction occurred.
(7) If a contractor who is issued a notice of infraction is a
contractor who has failed to ((register)) obtain a license as a
contractor under this chapter, the contractor is subject to a monetary
penalty per infraction as provided in the schedule of penalties
established by the department, and each day the person works without
becoming ((registered)) licensed is a separate infraction.

Sec. 34 RCW 18.27.310 and 2007 c 436 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The administrative law judge shall conduct contractors' notice
of infraction cases pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The burden of proof is on the department to establish the
commission of the infraction by a preponderance of the evidence, unless
the infraction is issued against an ((unregistered)) unlicensed
contractor in which case the burden of proof is on the contractor. The
notice of infraction shall be dismissed if the appellant establishes
that, at the time the advertising occurred, offer or bid was made, or
work was performed, the appellant was ((registered)) licensed by the
department, without suspension, or was exempt from ((registration))
licensing.
(3) After consideration of the evidence and argument, the
administrative law judge shall determine whether the infraction was
committed. If it has not been established that the infraction was
committed, an order dismissing the notice shall be entered in the
record of the proceedings. If it has been established that the
infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order
determining whether the infraction was committed.
(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or
order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior
court is subject only to discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of
the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Sec. 35 RCW 18.27.320 and 2001 c 159 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The administrative law judge shall dismiss the notice of infraction
at any time upon written notification from the department that the
contractor named in the notice of infraction was ((registered))
licensed, without suspension, at the time the work was performed.

Sec. 36 RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c 314 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200
shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than two hundred
dollars and not more than five thousand dollars.
(2) The director may waive collection in favor of payment of
restitution to a consumer complainant.
(3) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW
18.27.200 for failure to ((register)) obtain a license shall be
assessed a fine of not less than one thousand dollars, nor more than
five thousand dollars. The director may reduce the penalty for failure
to ((register)) obtain a license, but in no case below five hundred
dollars, if the person becomes ((registered)) licensed within ten days
of receiving a notice of infraction and the notice of infraction is for
a first offense.
(4) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the general fund.

Sec. 37 RCW 18.27.342 and 1997 c 314 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
Beginning December 1, 1997, the department shall report by December
1st each year to the commerce and labor committees of the senate and
house of representatives and the ways and means committees of the
senate and ((the appropriations committee of the)) house of
representatives, or successor committees, the following information for
the previous three fiscal years:
(1) The number of contractors found to have committed an infraction
for failure to ((register)) obtain a license;
(2) The number of contractors identified in subsection (1) of this
section who were assessed a monetary penalty and the amount of the
penalties assessed;
(3) The amount of the penalties reported in subsection (2) of this
section that was collected; and
(4) The amount of the penalties reported in subsection (2) of this
section that was waived.

Sec. 38 RCW 18.27.360 and 1996 c 293 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall suspend the ((certificate of registration))
license of any person who has been certified by a lending agency and
reported to the director for nonpayment or default on a federally or
state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship.
Prior to the suspension, the agency must provide the person an
opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485
through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or default on a
federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional
scholarship. The person's ((certificate of registration)) license
shall not be reissued until the person provides the director a written
release issued by the lending agency stating that the person is making
payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement approved
by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet all other
licensing requirements ((for certification of registration)) during the
suspension, reinstatement shall be automatic upon receipt of the notice
and payment of any reinstatement fee the director may impose.

Sec. 39 RCW 18.27.370 and 2001 c 159 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor defaults in a
payment, penalty, or fine due to the department, the director or the
director's designee may issue a notice of assessment certifying the
amount due. The notice must be served upon the ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor by mailing the notice to the ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor by certified mail to the ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractor's last known address or served in the manner
prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action.
(2) A notice of assessment becomes final thirty days from the date
the notice was served upon the ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor
unless a written request for reconsideration is filed with the
department or an appeal is filed in a court of competent jurisdiction
in the manner specified in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598. The
request for reconsideration must set forth with particularity the
reason for the ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor's request. The
department, within thirty days after receiving a written request for
reconsideration, may modify or reverse a notice of assessment, or may
hold a notice of assessment in abeyance pending further investigation.
If a final decision of a court in favor of the department is not
appealed within the time allowed by law, then the amount of the
unappealed assessment, or such amount of the assessment as is found due
by the final decision of the court, is final.
(3) The director or the director's designee may file with the clerk
of any county within the state, a warrant in the amount of the notice
of assessment, plus interest, penalties, and a filing fee of twenty
dollars. The clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall
immediately designate a superior court cause number for the warrant,
and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under
the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of
the ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor mentioned in the warrant,
the amount of payment, penalty, fine due on it, or filing fee, and the
date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant
as docketed shall become a lien upon the title to, and interest in, all
real and personal property of the ((unregistered)) unlicensed
contractor against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment
in a civil case docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall
proceed upon the warrant in all respects and with like effect as
prescribed by law with respect to execution or other process issued
against rights or property upon judgment in a court of competent
jurisdiction. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the
issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in a manner
provided by law in case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied.
The clerk of the court is entitled to a filing fee which will be added
to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to
the ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor within three days of filing
with the clerk.
(4) The director or the director's designee may issue to any
person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal corporation,
political subdivision of the state, a public corporation, or any agency
of the state, a notice and order to withhold and deliver property of
any kind whatsoever when he or she has reason to believe that there is
in the possession of the person, firm, corporation, other entity,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state, property that is or will become
due, owing, or belonging to an ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor
upon whom a notice of assessment has been served by the department for
payments, penalties, or fines due to the department. The effect of a
notice and order is continuous from the date the notice and order is
first made until the liability out of which the notice and order arose
is satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by the
sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified mail,
return receipt requested, or by an authorized representative of the
director. A person, firm, corporation, other entity, municipal
corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation, or
agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall answer the
notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under oath
and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of
in the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the
party served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of
the department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the
director or the director's authorized representative. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the
((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor's indebtedness to the
department, or for return without interest, in accordance with a final
determination of a petition for review. In the alternative, the party
shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the
director conditioned upon final determination of liability. If a party
served and named in the notice fails to answer the notice within the
time prescribed in this section, the court may render judgment by
default against the party for the full amount claimed by the director
in the notice, together with costs. If a notice is served upon an
((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor and the property subject to it
is wages, the ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractor may assert in the
answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the
wage earner is entitled.
(5) In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment,
penalty, or fine due to the department as set forth in this section,
the department may recover civil penalties imposed under this chapter
in a civil action in the name of the department brought in a court of
competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is alleged to
have occurred.

Sec. 40 RCW 18.27.385 and 2008 c 120 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall create an expanded social marketing campaign
using currently available materials and newly created materials as
needed. This campaign should be aimed at consumers and warn them of
the risks and potential consequences of hiring ((unregistered))
unlicensed contractors or otherwise assisting in the furtherance of the
underground economy. The campaign may include: Providing public
service announcements and other similar materials, made available in
English as well as other languages, to the media and to community
groups; providing information on violations and penalties; and
encouraging legitimate contractors and the public to report fraud.

Sec. 41 RCW 18.27.390 and 2001 c 159 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that it is contrary to public policy to
allow ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractors to continue doing
business illegally.
(2) The department of licensing, department of labor and
industries, the employment security department, and the department of
revenue shall establish an ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractors
enforcement team. The team shall develop a written plan to coordinate
the activities of the participating agencies to enforce the state's
contractor ((registration)) licensing laws and rules and other state
laws and rules deemed appropriate by the team. In developing the plan,
the team shall seek the input and advice of interested stakeholders who
support the work of the team.
(3) The director or the director's designee shall call the initial
meeting of the ((unregistered)) unlicensed contractors enforcement team
by September 1, 2001. The team shall complete the plan and forward it
to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature and to the
departments that contribute members to the team by December 1, 2001.
(4) The department of licensing, department of labor and
industries, the employment security department, and the department of
revenue shall accomplish the tasks listed in this section within
existing resources, including but not limited to fees charged under RCW
18.27.075.

--- END ---