BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the motor
vehicle fuel tax is the primary source of funding for the state's
transportation system. As the state's fleet changes from motor
vehicles powered by traditional sources, such as gasoline and diesel,
to those powered by electricity, the ability of the state to fund the
maintenance and preservation of the transportation system is
compromised. In order to mitigate the impacts of the diminishing motor
vehicle fuel tax, and to create a system where each driver pays for a
fair portion of his or her use of the road, an additional fee is
imposed on electric vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to other fees for the licensing of motor vehicles,
an additional fee of one hundred dollars is imposed on electric
vehicles that use propulsion units powered solely by electricity, and
is due at the time of initial vehicle registration and annual
registration renewal.
(2) The fee under this section is imposed to provide funds to
mitigate the impact of vehicles on state roads and highways, and is
separate and distinct from other vehicle registration fees. Proceeds
from the fee must be used for highway purposes, and must be deposited
in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

--- END ---