BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The purpose of this chapter is to establish
a certification program for managers of manufactured housing
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory council" means the advisory council on manufactured
housing community manager training and certification created in section
6 of this act.
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(4) "Manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as in RCW
59.20.030.
(5) "Manufactured housing community management" means those
actions, functions, or duties related to the management of a
manufactured housing community to include the collection of rent and
other charges, renting mobile home lots, and the implementation of
landlord duties and responsibilities under chapter 59.20 RCW.
(6) "Manufactured housing community manager" means a person who
performs manufactured housing community management duties and is
required to be certified under this chapter to perform manufactured
housing community management services and includes resident owners of
manufactured housing communities who perform management duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) No person shall manage a manufactured
housing community with more than fifteen manufactured housing lots in
this state until the person has been certified as a manufactured
housing community manager by the director in accordance with this
chapter.
(2) A manager who lives in the manufactured housing community must
be certified.
(3) Any person engaged in the business of managing a manufactured
housing community must be certified unless a certified manager lives in
the manufactured housing community.
(4) An owner not living in the manufactured housing community, or
living in a manufactured housing community but not performing
manufactured housing community management duties, is not required to be
certified.
(5) If a person becomes a manufactured housing community manager,
and the person does not have a current certification issued under
section 4 of this act, the person shall complete the manager
certification within six months, or upon a determination of good cause
by the director, within one year of becoming a manager.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director shall not issue an initial
certification to any person to act as a manufactured housing community
manager until that person has:
(a) Executed a written application on a form prescribed by the
director, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant;
(b) Attended and completed a department-approved training course
for manufactured housing community managers;
(c) Passed an examination approved by the department that
demonstrates that the applicant has a fundamental knowledge of the
manufactured/mobile home landlord-tenant act under chapter 59.20 RCW;
and
(d) Paid to the director a fee as prescribed in section 7 of this
act.
(2) Certifications are effective on the date issued by the
department and must be renewed annually.
(3) A certification may be renewed annually provided that the
applicant provides evidence of completion of continuing education as
approved by the department. This evidence must be submitted with an
application to renew certification. A maximum of four hours of
continuing education annually is required by the department for renewal
of certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department, in consultation with the
advisory council created in section 6 of this act, shall administer,
coordinate, and enforce this chapter, develop the examination of
applicants, and be responsible for the granting of certification to
qualified persons.
(2) The department may adopt rules that are necessary to implement,
enforce, and interpret this chapter.
(3) The department shall contract with a statewide association
exclusively representing manufactured housing communities for the
delivery of training courses required under this chapter. The
association may charge a fee for delivery of the training courses. The
department, in consultation with the advisory council created under
section 6 of this act, shall approve the curriculum of the training
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An advisory council on manufactured
housing community manager training and certification is created. The
council must consist of four members selected by the director as
follows: Two members of the council must be residents of manufactured
housing communities, and two members must be owners of manufactured
housing communities or their designees. The resident members of the
council must be selected from nominees submitted by statewide
associations representing manufactured housing community tenants. The
park owner members of the council must be selected from nominees
submitted by statewide associations exclusively representing
manufactured housing communities. The director shall appoint the
members for terms of four years. The advisory council shall select a
chair from its members for a four-year term.
(2) Members of the council shall serve without compensation but are
entitled to receive reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The functions of the advisory council are to:
(a) Review, evaluate, and advise the department concerning
revisions and adoption of rules affecting certification of manufactured
housing community managers and the fees to be charged under section 7
of this act; and
(b) Develop, review, revise, and provide consultation for the
approval of the department of the curriculum for the program for
certification of manufactured housing community managers.
(4) The advisory council shall meet at the call of its chair, at
the request of a majority of its membership, at the request of the
department, or at such times as prescribed by rule.
(5) The department shall provide adequate staff support to the
advisory council to assist it in fulfilling its duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The department shall set, by rule, and
charge fees for the application, issuance, and renewal of
certifications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 No department, trade association, or
instructor is responsible for the conduct of a landlord, manager,
owner, or other person attending manager certification training or
continuing education under this section. This section does not create
a cause of action against the department, a trade association, or
instructor related to the training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A violation of this chapter is a class 1
civil infraction under RCW 7.80.120.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect
January 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---