BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.105 and 2004 c 246 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees of race meets that are nonprofit in nature and are of
ten days or less shall be exempt from payment of a parimutuel tax.
(2) Licensees that do not fall under subsection (1) of this section
shall withhold and pay to the commission daily for each authorized day
of parimutuel wagering the following applicable percentage of all daily
gross receipts from its in-state parimutuel machines:
(a) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are more than fifty million dollars in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.30 percent of
the daily gross receipts; and
(b) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are fifty million dollars or less in the previous calendar year, the
licensee shall withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.803 percent
of the daily gross receipts.
(3)(a) In addition to those amounts in subsection (2) of this
section, a licensee shall forward one-tenth of one percent of the daily
gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines to the
commission for payment to those nonprofit race meets as set forth in
RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section, but said percentage
shall not be charged against the licensee.
(b) Payments to nonprofit race meets under this subsection shall be
distributed on a ((pro rata)) per-race-day basis and used only for
purses at race tracks that have been operating under RCW 67.16.130 and
subsection (1) of this section for the five consecutive years
immediately preceding the year of payment.
(c) As provided in this subsection, the commission shall
((transfer)) distribute funds equal to fifteen thousand eight hundred
dollars per race day from funds generated under ((subsection (2) of
this section equal to the difference between:
(a)(i) Funds collected under this subsection (3);
(ii) Interest earned from the Washington horse racing commission
operating account created in RCW 67.16.280; and
(iii) Fines imposed by the board of stewards in a calendar year;
and
(b) Three hundred thousand dollars;
and distribute that amount under)) this subsection (3).
(4) If the funds generated under subsection (3) of this section are
not sufficient to fund purses equal to fifteen thousand eight hundred
dollars per race day, the commission is authorized to fund these purses
from the following in the order provided below:
(a) First from fines imposed by the board of stewards and the
commission in a calendar year;
(b) Second from a commission approved percentage of any source
market fee generated from advance deposit wagering as authorized in RCW
67.16.260;
(c) Third from interest earned from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account created in RCW 67.16.280; and
(d) Fourth from the Washington horse racing commission operating
account created in RCW 67.16.280.
(5) Funds generated under subsection (3) of this section that are
in excess of fifteen thousand eight hundred dollars per race day must
be returned to the licensee or licensees from which the funds were
collected.
(6) Funds generated from any of the sources listed in subsection
(4) of this section that are not needed in a calendar year to fund
purses under subsection (3) of this section must be deposited in the
Washington horse racing commission operating account.
(((4))) (7) Beginning July 1, 1999, at the conclusion of each
authorized race meet, the commission shall calculate the mathematical
average daily gross receipts of parimutuel wagering that is conducted
only at the physical location of the live race meet at those race meets
of licensees with gross receipts of all their in-state parimutuel
machines of more than fifty million dollars. Such calculation shall
include only the gross parimutuel receipts from wagering occurring on
live racing dates, including live racing receipts and receipts derived
from one simulcast race card that is conducted only at the physical
location of the live racing meet, which, for the purposes of this
subsection, is "the handle." If the calculation exceeds eight hundred
eighty-six thousand dollars, the licensee shall within ten days of
receipt of written notification by the commission forward to the
commission a sum equal to the product obtained by multiplying 0.6
percent by the handle. Sums collected by the commission under this
subsection shall be forwarded on the next business day following
receipt thereof to the state treasurer to be deposited in the fair fund
created in RCW 15.76.115.

--- END ---