BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) It is concerned about lawsuits brought primarily to chill the
valid exercise of the constitutional rights of freedom of speech and
petition for the redress of grievances;
(b) Such lawsuits, called "Strategic Lawsuits Against Public
Participation" or "SLAPPs," are typically dismissed as groundless or
unconstitutional, but often not before the defendants are put to great
expense, harassment, and interruption of their productive activities;
(c) The costs associated with defending such suits can deter
individuals and entities from fully exercising their constitutional
rights to petition the government and to speak out on public issues;
(d) It is in the public interest for citizens to participate in
matters of public concern and provide information to public entities
and other citizens on public issues that affect them without fear of
reprisal through abuse of the judicial process; and
(e) An expedited judicial review would avoid the potential for
abuse in these cases.
(2) The purposes of this act are to:
(a) Strike a balance between the rights of persons to file lawsuits
and to trial by jury and the rights of persons to participate in
matters of public concern;
(b) Establish an efficient, uniform, and comprehensive method for
speedy adjudication of strategic lawsuits against public participation;
and
(c) Provide for attorneys' fees, costs, and additional relief where
appropriate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Claim" includes any lawsuit, cause of action, claim, cross-claim, counterclaim, or other judicial pleading or filing requesting
relief;
(b) "Government" includes a branch, department, agency,
instrumentality, official, employee, agent, or other person acting
under color of law of the United States, a state, or subdivision of a
state or other public authority;
(c) "Moving party" means a person on whose behalf the motion
described in subsection (4) of this section is filed seeking dismissal
of a claim;
(d) "Other governmental proceeding authorized by law" means a
proceeding conducted by any board, commission, agency, or other entity
created by state, county, or local statute or rule, including any self-regulatory organization that regulates persons involved in the
securities or futures business and that has been delegated authority by
a federal, state, or local government agency and is subject to
oversight by the delegating agency.
(e) "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association,
joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity;
(f) "Responding party" means a person against whom the motion
described in subsection (4) of this section is filed.
(2) This section applies to any claim, however characterized, that
is based on an action involving public participation and petition. As
used in this section, an "action involving public participation and
petition" includes:
(a) Any oral statement made, or written statement or other document
submitted, in a legislative, executive, or judicial proceeding or other
governmental proceeding authorized by law;
(b) Any oral statement made, or written statement or other document
submitted, in connection with an issue under consideration or review by
a legislative, executive, or judicial proceeding or other governmental
proceeding authorized by law;
(c) Any oral statement made, or written statement or other document
submitted, that is reasonably likely to encourage or to enlist public
participation in an effort to effect consideration or review of an
issue in a legislative, executive, or judicial proceeding or other
governmental proceeding authorized by law;
(d) Any oral statement made, or written statement or other document
submitted, in a place open to the public or a public forum in
connection with an issue of public concern; or
(e) Any other lawful conduct in furtherance of the exercise of the
constitutional right of free speech in connection with an issue of
public concern, or in furtherance of the exercise of the constitutional
right of petition.
(3) This section does not apply to any action brought by the
attorney general, prosecuting attorney, or city attorney, acting as a
public prosecutor, to enforce laws aimed at public protection.
(4)(a) A party may bring a special motion to strike any claim that
is based on an action involving public participation and petition, as
defined in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) A moving party bringing a special motion to strike a claim
under this subsection has the initial burden of showing by a
preponderance of the evidence that the claim is based on an action
involving public participation and petition. If the moving party meets
this burden, the burden shifts to the responding party to establish by
clear and convincing evidence a probability of prevailing on the claim.
If the responding party meets this burden, the court shall deny the
motion.
(c) In making a determination under (b) of this subsection, the
court shall consider pleadings and supporting and opposing affidavits
stating the facts upon which the liability or defense is based.
(d) If the court determines that the responding party has
established a probability of prevailing on the claim:
(i) The fact that the determination has been made and the substance
of the determination may not be admitted into evidence at any later
stage of the case; and
(ii) The determination does not affect the burden of proof or
standard of proof that is applied in the underlying proceeding.
(e) The attorney general's office or any government body to which
the moving party's acts were directed may intervene to defend or
otherwise support the moving party.
(5)(a) The special motion to strike may be filed within sixty days
of the service of the most recent complaint or, in the court's
discretion, at any later time upon terms it deems proper. A hearing
shall be held on the motion not later than thirty days after the
service of the motion unless the docket conditions of the court require
a later hearing. Notwithstanding this subsection, the court is
directed to hold a hearing with all due speed and such hearings should
receive priority.
(b) The court shall render its decision as soon as possible but no
later than seven days after the hearing is held.
(c) All discovery and any pending hearings or motions in the action
shall be stayed upon the filing of a special motion to strike under
subsection (4) of this section. The stay of discovery shall remain in
effect until the entry of the order ruling on the motion.
Notwithstanding the stay imposed by this subsection, the court, on
motion and for good cause shown, may order that specified discovery or
other hearings or motions be conducted.
(d) Every party has a right of expedited appeal from a trial court
order on the special motion or from a trial court's failure to rule on
the motion in a timely fashion.
(6)(a) The court shall award to a moving party who prevails, in
part or in whole, on a special motion to strike made under subsection
(4) of this section, without regard to any limits under state law:
(i) Costs of litigation and any reasonable attorneys' fees incurred
in connection with each motion on which the moving party prevailed;
(ii) An amount of ten thousand dollars, not including the costs of
litigation and attorney fees; and
(iii) Such additional relief, including sanctions upon the
responding party and its attorneys or law firms, as the court
determines to be necessary to deter repetition of the conduct and
comparable conduct by others similarly situated.
(b) If the court finds that the special motion to strike is
frivolous or is solely intended to cause unnecessary delay, the court
shall award to a responding party who prevails, in part or in whole,
without regard to any limits under state law:
(i) Costs of litigation and any reasonable attorneys' fees incurred
in connection with each motion on which the responding party prevailed;
(ii) An amount of ten thousand dollars, not including the costs of
litigation and attorneys' fees; and
(iii) Such additional relief, including sanctions upon the moving
party and its attorneys or law firms, as the court determines to be
necessary to deter repetition of the conduct and comparable conduct by
others similarly situated.
(7) Nothing in this section limits or precludes any rights the
moving party may have under any other constitutional, statutory, case
or common law, or rule provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act shall be applied and construed
liberally to effectuate its general purpose of protecting participants
in public controversies from an abusive use of the courts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act may be cited as the Washington Act
Limiting Strategic Lawsuits Against Public Participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---