BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.080 and 2009 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of malicious harassment if he or she
maliciously and intentionally commits one of the following acts because
of his or her perception of the victim's race, color, religion,
ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, or mental,
physical, or sensory handicap:
(a) Causes physical injury to the victim or another person;
(b) Causes physical damage to or destruction of the property of the
victim or another person; or
(c) Threatens a specific person or group of persons and places that
person, or members of the specific group of persons, in reasonable fear
of harm to person or property. The fear must be a fear that a
reasonable person would have under all the circumstances. For purposes
of this section, a "reasonable person" is a reasonable person who is a
member of the victim's race, color, religion, ancestry, national
origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or who has the same mental,
physical, or sensory handicap as the victim. Words alone do not
constitute malicious harassment unless the context or circumstances
surrounding the words indicate the words are a threat. Threatening
words do not constitute malicious harassment if it is apparent to the
victim that the person does not have the ability to carry out the
threat.
(2) In any prosecution for malicious harassment, unless evidence
exists which explains to the trier of fact's satisfaction that the
person did not intend to threaten the victim or victims, the trier of
fact may infer that the person intended to threaten a specific victim
or group of victims because of the person's perception of the victim's
or victims' race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender,
sexual orientation, or mental, physical, or sensory handicap if the
person commits one of the following acts:
(a) Burns a cross on property of a victim who is or whom the actor
perceives to be of African American heritage; or
(b) Defaces property of a victim who is or whom the actor perceives
to be of Jewish heritage by defacing the property with a swastika.
This subsection only applies to the creation of a reasonable
inference for evidentiary purposes. This subsection does not restrict
the state's ability to prosecute a person under subsection (1) of this
section when the facts of a particular case do not fall within (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(3) It is not a defense that the accused was mistaken that the
victim was a member of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry,
national origin, gender, or sexual orientation, or had a mental,
physical, or sensory handicap.
(4) Evidence of expressions or associations of the accused may not
be introduced as substantive evidence at trial unless the evidence
specifically relates to the crime charged. Nothing in this chapter
shall affect the rules of evidence governing impeachment of a witness.
(5) Every person who commits another crime during the commission of
a crime under this section may be punished and prosecuted for the other
crime separately.
(6) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Sexual orientation" ((for the purposes of this section)) has
the same meaning as in RCW 49.60.040.
(b) "Threat" means to communicate, directly or indirectly, the
intent to:
(i) Cause bodily injury immediately or in the future to the person
threatened or to any other person; or
(ii) Cause physical damage immediately or in the future to the
property of a person threatened or that of any other person.
(7) Malicious harassment is a class C felony.
(8) The penalties provided in this section for malicious harassment
do not preclude the victims from seeking any other remedies otherwise
available under law.
(9) Nothing in this section confers or expands any civil rights or
protections to any group or class identified under this section, beyond
those rights or protections that exist under the federal or state
Constitution or the civil laws of the state of Washington.

--- END ---