BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.19.001 and 1988 c 275 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature intends, in establishing a child support schedule,
to insure that child support orders are adequate to meet a child's
basic needs and to provide additional child support commensurate with
the parents' income, resources, and standard of living. The
legislature also intends that the child support obligation should be
equitably apportioned between the parents.
The legislature finds that these goals will be best achieved by the
adoption and use of a statewide child support schedule which is based
on the income-shares model using economic estimates of the current cost
of child rearing. The estimates are reviewed under RCW 26.19.025 in
order to maintain a child support schedule that reflects current
economic data. The Betson-Rothbarth estimate of the cost of child
rearing and the Betson-Engel estimate of the cost of child rearing with
necessary adjustments to remove costs of day care and health care have
been averaged to arrive at the economic table set forth in RCW
26.19.020. Use of a statewide schedule will benefit children and their
parents by:
(1) Increasing the adequacy of child support orders through the use
of economic data as the basis for establishing the child support
schedule;
(2) Increasing the equity of child support orders by providing for
comparable orders in cases with similar circumstances; and
(3) Reducing the adversarial nature of the proceedings by
increasing voluntary settlements as a result of the greater
predictability achieved by a uniform statewide child support schedule.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.19.011 and 2005 c 282 s 35 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjustment" means the application of the provisions of this
chapter that result in a child support obligation that may be more or
less than the standard calculation, but that are not deviations from
the standard calculation as defined by RCW 26.19.075.
(2) "Basic child support obligation" means the monthly child
support obligation determined from the economic table based on the
parties' combined monthly net income and the number of children (a) for
whom support is owed, and (b) who are before the court.
(((2))) (3) "Child support schedule" means the standards, economic
table, worksheets, and instructions, as defined in this chapter.
(((3))) (4) "Court" means a superior court judge, court
commissioner, and presiding and reviewing officers who administratively
determine or enforce child support orders.
(((4))) (5) "Deviation" means a child support amount that differs
from the standard calculation based on one or more of the factors set
forth in RCW 26.19.075.
(((5))) (6) "Economic table" means the child support table for the
basic support obligation provided in RCW 26.19.020.
(((6))) (7) "Instructions" means the instructions developed by the
administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW 26.19.050 for use
in completing the worksheets.
(((7))) (8) "Limits" or "limitations" means the lower and upper
limits on the amount of the income of the obligor and obligee when the
amount of child support to be paid would reduce or exceed the lower or
upper limits provided in RCW 26.19.065. The application of the lower
and upper limits standards based on the amount of the income of the
obligor or the obligee in relation to the amount of the child support
to be paid is not a deviation from the standard calculation.
(9) "Self-support reserve" means one hundred twenty-five percent of
the federal poverty guidelines for one person published annually in the
federal register by the United States department of health and human
services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9902(2).
(10) "Standards" means the standards for determination of child
support as provided in this chapter.
(((8))) (11) "Standard calculation" means the presumptive amount of
child support owed as determined from the child support schedule before
the court considers any reasons for adjustments, limitations, or
deviations.
(((9))) (12) "Support transfer payment" means the amount of money
the court orders one parent to pay to another parent or custodian for
child support after determination of the standard calculation and
adjustments, limitations, or deviations. If certain expenses or
credits are expected to fluctuate and the order states a formula or
percentage to determine the additional amount or credit on an ongoing
basis, the term "support transfer payment" does not mean the additional
amount or credit.
(((10))) (13) "Worksheets" means the forms developed by the
administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW 26.19.050 for use
in determining the amount of child support.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.19.020 and 2009 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:

((ECONOMIC TABLE

MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION

PER CHILD

KEY: A AGE 0-11 B AGE 12-18

COMBINED

MONTHLY ONE TWO

NET CHILD CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B

For income less than $1000 the obligation is
based upon the resources and living expenses of
each household. Minimum support may not be
less than $50 per child per month except when
allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000 220 272 171 211

1100 242 299 188 232

1200 264 326 205 253

1300 285 352 221 274

1400 307 379 238 294

1500 327 404 254 313

1600 347 428 269 333

1700 367 453 285 352

1800 387 478 300 371

1900 407 503 316 390

2000 427 527 331 409

2100 447 552 347 429

2200 467 577 362 448

2300 487 601 378 467

2400 506 626 393 486

2500 526 650 408 505

2600 534 661 416 513

2700 542 670 421 520

2800 549 679 427 527

2900 556 686 431 533

3000 561 693 436 538

3100 566 699 439 543

3200 569 704 442 546

3300 573 708 445 549

3400 574 710 446 551

3500 575 711 447 552

3600 577 712 448 553

3700 578 713 449 554

3800 581 719 452 558

3900 596 736 463 572

4000 609 753 473 584

4100 623 770 484 598

4200 638 788 495 611

4300 651 805 506 625

4400 664 821 516 637

4500 677 836 525 649

4600 689 851 535 661

4700 701 866 545 673

4800 713 882 554 685

4900 726 897 564 697

5000 738 912 574 708

5100 751 928 584 720

5200 763 943 593 732

5300 776 959 602 744

5400 788 974 612 756

5500 800 989 622 768

5600 812 1004 632 779

5700 825 1019 641 791

5800 837 1035 650 803

5900 850 1050 660 815

6000 862 1065 670 827

6100 875 1081 680 839

6200 887 1096 689 851

6300 899 1112 699 863

6400 911 1127 709 875

6500 924 1142 718 887

6600 936 1157 728 899

6700 949 1172 737 911

6800 961 1188 747 923

6900 974 1203 757 935

7000 986 1218 767 946

7100 998 1233 776 958

7200 1009 1248 785 971

7300 1021 1262 794 982

7400 1033 1276 803 993

7500 1044 1290 812 1004

7600 1055 1305 821 1015

7700 1067 1319 830 1026

7800 1078 1333 839 1037

7900 1089 1346 848 1048

8000 1100 1360 857 1059

8100 1112 1374 865 1069

8200 1123 1387 874 1080

8300 1134 1401 882 1091

8400 1144 1414 891 1101

8500 1155 1428 899 1112

8600 1166 1441 908 1122

8700 1177 1454 916 1133

8800 1187 1467 925 1143

8900 1198 1481 933 1153

9000 1208 1493 941 1163

9100 1219 1506 949 1173

9200 1229 1519 957 1183

9300 1239 1532 966 1193

9400 1250 1545 974 1203

9500 1260 1557 982 1213

9600 1270 1570 989 1223

9700 1280 1582 997 1233

9800 1290 1594 1005 1242

9900 1300 1606 1013 1252

10000 1310 1619 1021 1262

10100 1319 1631 1028 1271

10200 1329 1643 1036 1281

10300 1339 1655 1044 1290

10400 1348 1666 1051 1299

10500 1358 1678 1059 1308

10600 1367 1690 1066 1318

10700 1377 1701 1073 1327

10800 1386 1713 1081 1336

10900 1395 1724 1088 1345

11000 1404 1736 1095 1354

11100 1413 1747 1102 1363

11200 1422 1758 1110 1371

11300 1431 1769 1117 1380

11400 1440 1780 1124 1389

11500 1449 1791 1131 1398

11600 1458 1802 1138 1406

11700 1467 1813 1145 1415

11800 1475 1823 1151 1423

11900 1484 1834 1158 1431

12000 1492 1844 1165 1440

COMBINED

MONTHLY THREE FOUR FIVE

NET CHILDREN CHILDREN CHILDREN

INCOME FAMILY FAMILY FAMILY

A B A B A B

For income less than $1000 the
obligation is based upon the resources
and living expenses of each household.
Minimum support may not be less than
$50 per child per month except when
allowed by RCW 26.19.065(2).

1000 143 177 121 149 105 130

1100 157 194 133 164 116 143

1200 171 211 144 179 126 156

1300 185 228 156 193 136 168

1400 199 246 168 208 147 181

1500 212 262 179 221 156 193

1600 225 278 190 235 166 205

1700 238 294 201 248 175 217

1800 251 310 212 262 185 228

1900 264 326 223 275 194 240

2000 277 342 234 289 204 252

2100 289 358 245 303 213 264

2200 302 374 256 316 223 276

2300 315 390 267 330 233 288

2400 328 406 278 343 242 299

2500 341 421 288 356 251 311

2600 346 428 293 362 256 316

2700 351 435 298 368 259 321

2800 356 440 301 372 262 324

2900 360 445 305 376 266 328

3000 364 449 308 380 268 331

3100 367 453 310 383 270 334

3200 369 457 312 386 272 336

3300 371 459 314 388 273 339

3400 372 460 315 389 274 340

3500 373 461 316 390 275 341

3600 374 462 317 391 276 342

3700 375 463 318 392 277 343

3800 377 466 319 394 278 344

3900 386 477 326 404 284 352

4000 395 488 334 413 291 360

4100 404 500 341 422 298 368

4200 413 511 350 431 305 377

4300 422 522 357 441 311 385

4400 431 532 364 449 317 392

4500 438 542 371 458 323 400

4600 446 552 377 467 329 407

4700 455 562 384 475 335 414

4800 463 572 391 483 341 422

4900 470 581 398 491 347 429

5000 479 592 404 500 353 437

5100 487 602 411 509 359 443

5200 494 611 418 517 365 451

5300 503 621 425 525 371 458

5400 511 632 432 533 377 466

5500 518 641 439 542 383 473

5600 527 651 446 551 389 480

5700 535 661 452 559 395 488

5800 543 671 459 567 401 495

5900 551 681 466 575 407 502

6000 559 691 473 584 413 509

6100 567 701 479 593 418 517

6200 575 710 486 601 424 524

6300 583 721 493 609 430 532

6400 591 731 500 617 436 539

6500 599 740 506 626 442 546

6600 607 750 513 635 448 554

6700 615 761 520 643 454 561

6800 623 770 527 651 460 568

6900 631 780 533 659 466 575

7000 639 790 540 668 472 583

7100 647 800 547 677 478 591

7200 654 809 554 684 484 598

7300 662 818 560 693 490 605

7400 670 828 567 701 496 613

7500 677 837 574 709 502 620

7600 685 846 581 718 507 627

7700 692 855 587 726 513 634

7800 700 865 594 734 519 642

7900 707 874 601 742 525 649

8000 714 883 607 750 531 656

8100 722 892 614 759 536 663

8200 729 901 620 767 542 670

8300 736 910 627 775 548 677

8400 743 919 633 783 553 684

8500 750 928 640 791 559 691

8600 758 936 646 799 565 698

8700 765 945 653 807 570 705

8800 772 954 659 815 576 712

8900 779 962 665 822 582 719

9000 786 971 672 830 587 726

9100 792 980 678 838 593 732

9200 799 988 684 846 598 739

9300 806 996 691 854 604 746

9400 813 1005 697 861 609 753

9500 820 1013 703 869 614 759

9600 826 1021 709 877 620 766

9700 833 1030 716 884 625 773

9800 840 1038 722 892 631 779

9900 846 1046 728 900 636 786

10000 853 1054 734 907 641 793

10100 859 1062 740 915 647 799

10200 866 1070 746 922 652 806

10300 872 1078 752 930 657 812

10400 879 1086 758 937 662 819

10500 885 1094 764 944 668 825

10600 891 1102 770 952 673 832

10700 898 1109 776 959 678 838

10800 904 1117 782 966 683 844

10900 910 1125 788 974 688 851

11000 916 1132 794 981 693 857

11100 922 1140 799 988 698 863

11200 928 1147 805 995 703 869

11300 934 1155 811 1002 708 876

11400 940 1162 817 1009 714 882

11500 946 1170 822 1017 719 888

11600 952 1177 828 1024 723 894

11700 958 1184 834 1031 728 900

11800 964 1191 839 1038 733 906

11900 970 1199 845 1045 738 912

12000 975 1206 851 1051 743 919))

(1) For combined monthly net income less than one thousand dollars,
the basic support obligation is based upon the resources and living
expenses of each household. Minimum support shall not be less than
fifty dollars per child per month, except when allowed by RCW
26.19.065(2).
(2)

ECONOMIC TABLE
MONTHLY BASIC SUPPORT OBLIGATION PER CHILD

COMBINED
MONTHLY
NET INCOME ONE CHILD
FAMILY
TWO
CHILDREN
FAMILY THREE
CHILDREN
FAMILY FOUR
CHILDREN
FAMILY FIVE
CHILDREN
FAMILY

1000 273 195 151 126 110

1100 300 215 166 138 121

1200 327 234 180 155 132

1300 354 253 195 163 142

1400 381 272 210 175 153

1500 406 292 225 187 164

1600 434 310 239 199 174

1700 459 328 253 210 183

1800 484 345 266 221 194

1900 509 363 280 233 203

2000 535 380 294 245 214

2100 561 399 308 257 224

2200 588 418 323 269 235

2300 614 436 338 281 246

2400 640 455 353 293 256

2500 666 473 366 305 266

2600 691 491 380 316 276

2700 717 509 394 328 286

2800 743 527 408 339 296

2900 769 545 423 351 306

3000 794 563 436 363 317

3100 820 582 455 374 327

3200 846 600 465 387 338

3300 868 616 477 397 346

3400 881 624 482 402 350

3500 894 633 489 406 355

3600 908 641 494 411 359

3700 921 650 500 416 363

3800 934 659 506 421 367

3900 947 667 512 426 372

4000 960 676 518 431 376

4100 974 684 524 436 381

4200 987 693 530 441 385

4300 1000 701 536 446 390

4400 1013 710 542 451 394

4500 1027 719 549 457 399

4600 1041 728 555 462 403

4700 1055 737 562 468 408

4800 1069 747 568 473 413

4900 1081 755 575 478 417

5000 1092 763 581 483 422

5100 1103 771 587 489 426

5200 1110 776 591 491 429

5300 1116 779 593 494 431

5400 1121 783 596 496 433

5500 1127 787 599 498 435

5600 1132 791 601 501 437

5700 1138 794 603 503 439

5800 1145 799 607 506 441

5900 1153 803 611 508 444

6000 1160 808 614 511 446

6100 1172 816 620 516 450

6200 1188 826 628 522 456

6300 1203 837 636 529 462

6400 1218 847 644 536 467

6500 1234 858 652 543 474

6600 1249 868 660 549 480

6700 1266 880 669 557 486

6800 1282 891 678 564 492

6900 1299 903 686 571 498

7000 1314 914 694 578 504

7100 1327 923 701 583 509

7200 1340 932 708 589 514

7300 1354 941 715 595 519

7400 1367 949 722 600 524

7500 1378 957 727 605 528

7600 1388 965 733 610 532

7700 1399 972 739 615 537

7800 1409 980 744 619 540

7900 1419 987 750 624 545

8000 1429 994 756 629 549

8100 1440 1002 761 633 553

8200 1450 1009 767 639 557

8300 1460 1017 773 643 561

8400 1471 1025 779 648 565

8500 1482 1032 784 653 569

8600 1492 1040 790 657 573

8700 1503 1047 796 662 577

8800 1514 1054 801 666 582

8900 1524 1062 807 671 586

9000 1535 1069 812 676 590

9100 1546 1076 818 681 594

9200 1556 1084 824 685 598

9300 1567 1091 829 690 602

9400 1584 1098 835 694 606

9500 1588 1106 840 699 610

9600 1599 1113 846 704 614

9700 1610 1121 852 709 618

9800 1620 1128 857 713 623

9900 1630 1135 862 717 626

10000 1639 1142 867 721 630

10100 1648 1147 872 725 631

10200 1657 1154 876 729 636

10300 1666 1160 881 733 640

10400 1674 1166 886 737 643

10500 1683 1172 890 741 646

10600 1692 1178 895 744 649

10700 1700 1183 899 748 652

10800 1708 1189 903 751 655

10900 1717 1194 907 754 658

11000 1725 1200 911 758 661

11100 1733 1205 915 761 664

11200 1741 1211 919 764 667

11300 1750 1216 923 768 670

11400 1758 1222 927 771 673

11500 1766 1227 931 774 675

11600 1774 1233 935 778 679

11700 1783 1238 939 781 682

11800 1791 1244 943 785 684

11900 1799 1250 947 788 687

12000 1808 1255 951 791 690

12100 1816 1261 955 795 693

12200 1824 1266 960 798 696

12300 1832 1272 963 802 699

12400 1841 1277 967 805 702

12500 1849 1283 972 808 705

12600 1858 1289 976 812 708

12700 1865 1294 980 815 711

12800 1874 1300 984 818 714

12900 1882 1305 988 821 717

13000 1891 1311 992 825 720

13100 1899 1316 996 828 723

13200 1907 1322 1000 832 725

13300 1915 1327 1004 835 728

13400 1924 1333 1008 838 732

13500 1932 1338 1012 842 734

13600 1940 1344 1016 845 737

13700 1949 1349 1020 849 740

13800 1957 1355 1024 852 743

13900 1965 1360 1028 855 746

14000 1973 1366 1032 859 749

14100 1982 1371 1037 862 752

14200 1990 1377 1041 866 755

14300 1996 1381 1044 868 757

14400 2003 1385 1047 871 760

14500 2008 1390 1050 873 762

14600 2013 1394 1053 876 764

14700 2021 1399 1058 880 767

14800 2029 1405 1062 883 770

14900 2037 1410 1066 887 773

15000 2045 1416 1070 890 776

15100 2052 1421 1074 893 779

15200 2060 1426 1078 897 782

15300 2068 1432 1082 900 785

15400 2075 1437 1086 904 788

15500 2083 1442 1090 907 791

15600 2090 1447 1094 910 794

15700 2098 1453 1098 913 796

15800 2105 1458 1102 917 799

15900 2113 1463 1106 920 802

16000 2120 1468 1110 923 805

16100 2128 1474 1114 927 808

16200 2135 1479 1118 930 811

16300 2143 1484 1122 933 814

16400 2150 1489 1126 936 816

16500 2158 1494 1129 940 819

16600 2165 1499 1133 943 822

16700 2172 1504 1137 946 825

16800 2179 1509 1141 949 828

16900 2187 1515 1145 952 830

17000 2194 1519 1148 955 833

17100 2201 1525 1153 959 836

17200 2208 1530 1156 962 839

17300 2215 1535 1160 965 842

17400 2223 1539 1164 968 844

17500 2230 1545 1167 971 847

17600 2237 1550 1172 974 850

17700 2244 1554 1175 977 853

17800 2251 1559 1179 981 855

17900 2258 1565 1183 984 858

18000 2265 1569 1186 987 861

18100 2272 1574 1190 990 863

18200 2279 1579 1194 993 866

18300 2286 1584 1197 996 869

18400 2293 1589 1201 999 872

18500 2300 1594 1205 1002 874

18600 2307 1598 1208 1005 877

18700 2314 1603 1212 1008 880

18800 2321 1608 1216 1012 882

18900 2328 1613 1219 1015 885

19000 2335 1617 1223 1018 887

19100 2342 1623 1227 1020 890

19200 2348 1627 1230 1023 893

19300 2355 1632 1234 1026 895

19400 2362 1637 1237 1029 898

19500 2368 1641 1241 1032 900

19600 2375 1646 1245 1036 903

19700 2383 1651 1248 1039 905

19800 2389 1655 1252 1041 908

19900 2396 1660 1255 1044 910

20000 2402 1665 1259 1047 913

(3) The economic table is presumptive for combined monthly net
incomes up to and including ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars. When
combined monthly net income exceeds ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars,
the court may exceed the presumptive amount of support set for combined
monthly net incomes of ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars upon written
findings of fact.

Sec. 4 RCW 26.19.035 and 2005 c 282 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Application of the child support schedule. The child support
schedule shall be applied:
(a) In each county of the state;
(b) In judicial and administrative proceedings under this title or
Title 13 or 74 RCW;
(c) In all proceedings in which child support is determined or
modified;
(d) In setting temporary and permanent support;
(e) In automatic modification provisions or decrees entered
pursuant to RCW 26.09.100; and
(f) In addition to proceedings in which child support is determined
for minors, to adult children who are dependent on their parents and
for whom support is ordered pursuant to RCW 26.09.100.
The provisions of this chapter for determining child support and
reasons for adjustments, limitations, or deviations from the standard
calculation shall be applied in the same manner by the court, presiding
officers, and reviewing officers.
(2) Written findings of fact supported by the evidence. An order
for child support shall be supported by written findings of fact upon
which the support determination is based and shall include reasons for
any adjustment, limitation, or deviation from the standard calculation
and reasons for denial of a party's request for adjustment, limitation,
or deviation from the standard calculation. The court shall enter
written findings of fact in all cases ((whether or not the court: (a)
Sets the support at the presumptive amount, for combined monthly net
incomes below five thousand dollars; (b) sets the support at an
advisory amount, for combined monthly net incomes between five thousand
and seven thousand dollars; or (c) deviates from the presumptive or
advisory amounts)) when the court approves limitations, adjustments, or
deviations.
(3) Completion of worksheets. Worksheets in the form developed by
the administrative office of the courts shall be completed under
penalty of perjury and filed in every proceeding in which child support
is determined. The court shall not accept incomplete worksheets or
worksheets that vary from the worksheets developed by the
administrative office of the courts.
(4) Court review of the worksheets and order. The court shall
review the worksheets and the order setting support for the adequacy of
the reasons set forth for any deviation or denial of any request for
deviation and for the adequacy of the amount of support ordered. Each
order shall state the amount of child support calculated using the
standard calculation and the amount of child support actually ordered.
Worksheets shall be attached to the decree or order or if filed
separately shall be initialed or signed by the judge and filed with the
order.

Sec. 5 RCW 26.19.065 and 2009 c 84 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Limit at forty-five percent of a parent's net income. Neither
parent's current child support obligation owed for all his or her
biological or legal children, which includes the support transfer
payment ordered and the parent's proportional share of other court-ordered child support obligations for day care and health care expenses
for the children before the court, may exceed forty-five percent of net
income except for good cause shown.
(a) ((Each child is entitled to a pro rata share of the income
available for support, but the court only applies the pro rata share to
the children in the case before the court.
(b))) Before determining whether to apply the forty-five percent
limitation, the court must consider whether it would be unjust to apply
the limitation after considering the best interests of the child and
the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances include, but are
not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the custodial parent's
household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative hardship to
the affected households, assets or liabilities, and any involuntary
limits on either parent's earning capacity including incarceration,
disabilities, or incapacity.
(((c))) (b) Good cause includes, but is not limited to, possession
of substantial wealth, children with day care expenses, special medical
need, educational need, psychological need, and larger families.
(2) Presumptive minimum support obligation. (a) When a parent's
monthly net income is below one hundred twenty-five percent of the
federal poverty guideline, a support order of not less than fifty
dollars per child per month shall be entered unless the obligor parent
establishes that it would be unjust to do so in that particular case.
The decision whether there is a sufficient basis to deviate below the
presumptive minimum payment must take into consideration the best
interests of the child and the circumstances of each parent. Such
circumstances can include leaving insufficient funds in the custodial
parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative
hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and earning
capacity.
(b) The basic support obligation of the parent making the transfer
payment, excluding health care, day care, and special child-rearing
expenses, shall not reduce his or her net income below the self-support
reserve of one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty
level, except for the presumptive minimum payment of fifty dollars per
child per month or when it would be unjust to apply the self-support
reserve limitation after considering the best interests of the child
and the circumstances of each parent. Such circumstances include, but
are not limited to, leaving insufficient funds in the custodial
parent's household to meet the basic needs of the child, comparative
hardship to the affected households, assets or liabilities, and earning
capacity. This section shall not be construed to require monthly
substantiation of income.
(3) Income above ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars. The economic
table is presumptive for combined monthly net incomes up to and
including ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars. When combined monthly
net income exceeds ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars, the court may
exceed the presumptive amount of support set for combined monthly net
incomes of ((twelve)) twenty thousand dollars upon written findings of
fact.

Sec. 6 RCW 26.19.071 and 2009 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Consideration of all income. All income and resources of each
parent's household shall be disclosed and considered by the court when
the court determines the child support obligation of each parent. Only
the income of the parents of the children whose support is at issue
shall be calculated for purposes of calculating the basic support
obligation. Income and resources of any other person shall not be
included in calculating the basic support obligation.
(2) Verification of income. Tax returns for the preceding two
years and current paystubs shall be provided to verify income and
deductions. Other sufficient verification shall be required for income
and deductions which do not appear on tax returns or paystubs.
(3) Income sources included in gross monthly income. Except as
specifically excluded in subsection (4) of this section, monthly gross
income shall include income from any source, including:
(a) Salaries;
(b) Wages;
(c) Commissions;
(d) Deferred compensation;
(e) Overtime, except as excluded for income in subsection (4)(h) of
this section;
(f) Contract-related benefits;
(g) Income from second jobs, except as excluded for income in
subsection (4)(h) of this section;
(h) Dividends;
(i) Interest;
(j) Trust income;
(k) Severance pay;
(l) Annuities;
(m) Capital gains;
(n) Pension retirement benefits;
(o) Workers' compensation;
(p) Unemployment benefits;
(q) Maintenance actually received;
(r) Bonuses;
(s) Social security benefits;
(t) Disability insurance benefits; and
(u) Income from self-employment, rent, royalties, contracts,
proprietorship of a business, or joint ownership of a partnership or
closely held corporation.
(4) Income sources excluded from gross monthly income. The
following income and resources shall be disclosed but shall not be
included in gross income:
(a) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner or income of
other adults in the household;
(b) Child support received from other relationships;
(c) Gifts and prizes;
(d) Temporary assistance for needy families;
(e) Supplemental security income;
(f) General assistance;
(g) Food stamps; and
(h) Overtime or income from second jobs beyond forty hours per week
averaged over a twelve-month period worked to provide for a current
family's needs, to retire past relationship debts, or to retire child
support debt, when the court finds the income will cease when the party
has paid off his or her debts.
Receipt of income and resources from temporary assistance for needy
families, supplemental security income, general assistance, and food
stamps shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.
(5) Determination of net income. The following expenses shall be
disclosed and deducted from gross monthly income to calculate net
monthly income:
(a) Federal and state income taxes;
(b) Federal insurance contributions act deductions;
(c) Mandatory pension plan payments;
(d) Mandatory union or professional dues;
(e) State industrial insurance premiums;
(f) Court-ordered maintenance to the extent actually paid;
(g) Up to five thousand dollars per year in voluntary retirement
contributions actually made if the contributions show a pattern of
contributions during the one-year period preceding the action
establishing the child support order ((unless there is a determination
that the contributions were made for the purpose of reducing child
support)); and
(h) Normal business expenses and self-employment taxes for self-employed persons. Justification shall be required for any business
expense deduction about which there is disagreement.
Items deducted from gross income under this subsection shall not be
a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.
(6) Imputation of income. (a) The court shall impute income to a
parent when the parent is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily
underemployed. The court shall determine whether the parent is
voluntarily underemployed or voluntarily unemployed based upon that
parent's work history, education, health, and age, or any other
relevant factors. A court shall not impute income to a parent who is
gainfully employed on a full-time basis, unless the court finds that
the parent is voluntarily underemployed and finds that the parent is
purposely underemployed to reduce the parent's child support
obligation. Income shall not be imputed for an unemployable parent.
Income shall not be imputed to a parent to the extent the parent is
unemployed or significantly underemployed due to the parent's efforts
to comply with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child. (b) In the absence of records of a parent's actual
earnings, the court shall impute a parent's income in the following
order of priority:
(((a))) (i) Full-time earnings at the current rate of pay;
(((b))) (ii) Full-time earnings at the historical rate of pay based
on reliable information, such as employment security department data;
(((c))) (iii) Full-time earnings at a past rate of pay where
information is incomplete or sporadic;
(((d))) (iv) Full-time earnings at minimum wage in the jurisdiction
where the parent resides if the parent has a recent history of minimum
wage earnings, is recently coming off public assistance, general
assistance-unemployable, supplemental security income, or disability,
has recently been released from incarceration, or is a high school
student;
(((e))) (v) Median net monthly income of year-round full-time
workers as derived from the United States bureau of census, current
population reports, or such replacement report as published by the
bureau of census.

Sec. 7 RCW 26.19.075 and 2009 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Reasons for deviation from the standard calculation include but
are not limited to the following:
(a) Sources of income and tax planning. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation after consideration of the following:
(i) Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner if the parent
who is married to the new spouse or in a partnership with a new
domestic partner is asking for a deviation based on any other reason.
Income of a new spouse or new domestic partner is not, by itself, a
sufficient reason for deviation;
(ii) Income of other adults in the household if the parent who is
living with the other adult is asking for a deviation based on any
other reason. Income of the other adults in the household is not, by
itself, a sufficient reason for deviation;
(iii) Child support actually received from other relationships;
(iv) Gifts;
(v) Prizes;
(vi) Possession of wealth, including but not limited to savings,
investments, real estate holdings and business interests, vehicles,
boats, pensions, bank accounts, insurance plans, or other assets;
(vii) Extraordinary income of a child;
(viii) Tax planning considerations. A deviation for tax planning
may be granted only if the child would not receive a lesser economic
benefit due to the tax planning; or
(ix) Income that has been excluded under RCW 26.19.071(4)(h) if the
person earning that income asks for a deviation for any other reason.
(b) Nonrecurring income. The court may deviate from the standard
calculation based on a finding that a particular source of income
included in the calculation of the basic support obligation is not a
recurring source of income. Depending on the circumstances,
nonrecurring income may include overtime, contract-related benefits,
bonuses, or income from second jobs. Deviations for nonrecurring
income shall be based on a review of the nonrecurring income received
in the previous two calendar years.
(c) Debt and high expenses. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation after consideration of the following expenses:
(i) Extraordinary debt not voluntarily incurred;
(ii) A significant disparity in the living costs of the parents due
to conditions beyond their control;
(iii) Special needs of disabled children;
(iv) Special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the
children; or
(v) Costs incurred or anticipated to be incurred by the parents in
compliance with court-ordered reunification efforts under chapter 13.34
RCW or under a voluntary placement agreement with an agency supervising
the child.
(((d) Residential schedule. The court may deviate from the
standard calculation if the child spends a significant amount of time
with the parent who is obligated to make a support transfer payment.
The court may not deviate on that basis if the deviation will result in
insufficient funds in the household receiving the support to meet the
basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving temporary
assistance for needy families. When determining the amount of the
deviation, the court shall consider evidence concerning the increased
expenses to a parent making support transfer payments resulting from
the significant amount of time spent with that parent and shall
consider the decreased expenses, if any, to the party receiving the
support resulting from the significant amount of time the child spends
with the parent making the support transfer payment.
(e) Children from other relationships. The court may deviate from
the standard calculation when either or both of the parents before the
court have children from other relationships to whom the parent owes a
duty of support.
(i) The child support schedule shall be applied to the mother,
father, and children of the family before the court to determine the
presumptive amount of support.
(ii) Children from other relationships shall not be counted in the
number of children for purposes of determining the basic support
obligation and the standard calculation.
(iii) When considering a deviation from the standard calculation
for children from other relationships, the court may consider only
other children to whom the parent owes a duty of support. The court
may consider court-ordered payments of child support for children from
other relationships only to the extent that the support is actually
paid.
(iv) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children from other relationships, deviations under this section shall
be based on consideration of the total circumstances of both
households. All child support obligations paid, received, and owed for
all children shall be disclosed and considered.))
(2) All income and resources of the parties before the court, new
spouses or new domestic partners, and other adults in the households
shall be disclosed and considered as provided in this section. The
presumptive amount of support shall be determined according to the
child support schedule. Unless specific reasons for deviation are set
forth in the written findings of fact and are supported by the
evidence, the court shall order each parent to pay the amount of
support determined by using the standard calculation.
(3) The court shall enter findings that specify reasons for any
deviation or any denial of a party's request for any deviation from the
standard calculation made by the court. The court shall not consider
reasons for deviation until the court determines the standard
calculation for each parent.
(4) When reasons exist for deviation, the court shall exercise
discretion in considering the extent to which the factors would affect
the support obligation.
(5) Agreement of the parties is not by itself adequate reason for
any deviations from the standard calculation.

Sec. 8 RCW 26.19.080 and 2009 c 84 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The basic child support obligation derived from the economic
table shall be allocated between the parents based on each parent's
share of the combined monthly net income.
(2) Health care costs are not included in the economic table.
Monthly health care costs shall be shared by the parents in the same
proportion as the basic child support obligation. Health care costs
shall include, but not be limited to, medical, dental, orthodontia,
vision, chiropractic, mental health treatment, and prescription
medications((, and other similar costs for care and treatment)).
(3) Day care and special child rearing expenses, such as tuition
and long-distance transportation costs to and from the parents for
visitation purposes, are not included in the economic table. These
expenses shall be shared by the parents in the same proportion as the
basic child support obligation. If an obligor pays court or
administratively ordered day care or special child rearing expenses
that are not actually incurred, the obligee must reimburse the obligor
for the overpayment if the overpayment amounts to at least twenty
percent of the obligor's annual day care or special child rearing
expenses. The obligor may institute an action in the superior court or
file an application for an adjudicative hearing with the department of
social and health services for reimbursement of day care and special
child rearing expense overpayments that amount to twenty percent or
more of the obligor's annual day care and special child rearing
expenses. Any ordered overpayment reimbursement shall be applied first
as an offset to child support arrearages of the obligor. If the
obligor does not have child support arrearages, the reimbursement may
be in the form of a direct reimbursement by the obligee or a credit
against the obligor's future support payments. If the reimbursement is
in the form of a credit against the obligor's future child support
payments, the credit shall be spread equally over a twelve-month
period. Absent agreement of the obligee, nothing in this section
entitles an obligor to pay more than his or her proportionate share of
day care or other special child rearing expenses in advance and then
deduct the overpayment from future support transfer payments.
(4) The court may exercise its discretion to determine the
necessity for and the reasonableness of all amounts ordered in excess
of the basic child support obligation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 26.19 RCW
to read as follows:
ADJUSTMENTS TO THE STANDARD CALCULATION. Reasons for adjustments
to the standard calculation include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(1) Shared residential schedule thirty-three percent or more. (a)
The court may adjust the standard calculation if there is a written
parenting plan or court order that the child or children spend thirty-three percent or one hundred twenty or more overnights in a calendar
year with the parent who is obligated to make a support transfer
payment. The court shall determine the residential schedule adjustment
by a cross credit method after application of a 1.5 multiplier as set
forth below:
(i) Multiply the basic child support obligation based on the
combined net income of both parents by 1.5;
(ii) Apply the proportional share of net income of each parent to
the basic child support obligation after it has been multiplied by 1.5;
(iii) Calculate the percentage of overnights spent with the
obligated parent in order to determine the percentage of time spent
with each parent;
(iv) Multiply the percentage of the time spent with the other
parent by the obligation of each parent as determined in (a)(ii) of
this subsection; and
(v) Subtract the lesser amount from the greater amount in (a)(iv)
of this subsection to determine the adjusted amount of child support to
be paid by the obligor.
(b) An example of how to calculate the residential schedule
adjustment is as follows: The father's net income is $3000 per month
and the mother's net income is $2000 per month. The parties have two
children. The father spends thirty-five percent of overnights with the
children, while the mother has the children in her care sixty-five
percent of the time. The adjustment would be calculated using the
following steps:
(i) Application of (a)(i) of this subsection: Using the table in
RCW 19.26.020(2), the basic child support obligation with a combined
monthly net income of $5000 for a two children family is $1526. The
cross credit method applies the 1.5 multiplier, to equal $2289.
(ii) Application of (a)(ii) of this subsection: The proportional
share of net income for the father is sixty percent. This is
multiplied by the basic child support obligation after it has been
multiplied by 1.5, which equals $1373.40. The proportional share of
net income for the mother is forty percent. This is multiplied by the
basic child support obligation after it has been multiplied by 1.5, to
equal $915.60.
(iii) Application of (a)(iii) of this subsection: The father's
share of $1373.40 is multiplied by the percentage of time the children
spend with the mother, or sixty-five percent, to equal $892.71.
(iv) Application of (a)(iv) of this subsection: The mother's share
of $892.71 is multiplied by the percentage of time the children spend
with the father, or thirty-five percent, to equal $320.46.
(v) Application of (a)(v) of this subsection: The lesser amount of
$320.46 is subtracted from the greater amount of $915.60, to equal
$572.25. This is the obligor's adjusted child support based on the
residential schedule.
(c) The court may not adjust the standard calculation on the basis
of the residential schedule if the adjustment will result in
insufficient funds in the household receiving the support to meet the
basic needs of the child or if the child is receiving temporary
assistance for needy families.
(d) If the obligor who has been granted an adjustment fails to
exercise thirty-three percent or more of the overnights that were used
to calculate the child support adjustment for more than six months
without reasonable justification for the failure to exercise the time,
the obligee shall be entitled to move to terminate the adjustment by
motion to the court or by making a request for a review of the
administrative order which established the adjustment.
(2) Split residential placement. If there is a current written
parenting plan or court order that provides for split residential
placement of the children of the parties, the court shall apply the
Arvey formula as set forth in In re Marriage of Arvey, 77 Wn. App. 817
(1995) to calculate child support. The net child support obligation of
each parent will be determined by use of the standard child support
worksheet. The court shall adjust the amount of each parent's
obligation to reflect each parent's proportional share of the
obligation. The proportional share to be applied will depend on the
number of children residing in the other parent's home, for example if
the parties have three children where one child resides with the father
and two children reside with the mother, then the adjustment
proportional share would be two-thirds for the father and one-third for
the mother. The transfer payment will be the difference between the
parental proportional share that is greater and the parental
proportional share that is smaller.
(3) Children from other relationships. The court shall adjust the
standard calculation when the obligor before the court has children
from other relationships to whom the parent owes a duty of support by
using the whole family formula in (e) of this subsection unless to do
so would result in insufficient funds to meet the basic needs of the
children in the receiving household and when taking the totality of the
circumstances of both parents, the application of the formula would be
unjust.
(a) The child support schedule shall be applied to the mother,
father, and children of the family before the court to determine the
presumptive amount of support.
(b) Children from other relationships shall not be counted in the
number of children for purposes of determining the basic support
obligation and the standard calculation.
(c) When considering an adjustment to the standard calculation for
children from other relationships, the court may consider only other
children to whom the parent owes a duty of support. The court may
consider court-ordered payments of child support for children from
other relationships only to the extent that the support is actually
paid.
(d) When the court has determined that either or both parents have
children from other relationships, adjustments under this section shall
be based on consideration of the total circumstances of both
households. Both parties must disclose, and the court must consider,
all child support obligations paid, received, and owed for all
children.
(e) The whole family formula, to determine the adjusted amount of
child support, is calculated as follows:
(i) Determine a per-child secondary basic support obligation under
RCW 26.19.020 for all children for whom the obligor has a legal support
obligation and is actually providing support. This includes the
children whose support is in question and all of the following:
(A) The obligor's children with the obligee;
(B) The obligor's other children for whom the obligor owes a duty
of support or for whom the obligor is ordered to provide support; and
(C) Stepchildren for whom the obligor is ordered to pay support;
(ii) Determine the secondary basic support obligation only for
those children whose support is in question;
(iii) Multiply the total secondary basic support obligation from
(e)(ii) of this subsection by the proportional share of the obligor's
income;
(iv) Determine the adjusted amount by subtracting the total from
(e)(iii) of this subsection from the original basic support obligation;
and
(v) Subtract the adjusted amount in (e)(iv) of this subsection from
the net support obligation. This is the actual transfer payment the
obligor owes.

--- END ---