BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
situations in which insured consumers receive emergency health care
services in a facility participating in a carrier's provider network,
when other health care professionals rendering services in the facility
may not be employees of the facility or participating providers in the
consumer's health benefit plan. In such situations, the consumer is
not aware that the providers are nonparticipating providers. Further,
the consumer may have little or no direct contact with the
nonparticipating providers. The legislature further finds that
consumers should be held harmless for additional charges from
nonparticipating providers for emergency care rendered in a
participating facility. It is the intent of the legislature that
consumers in these emergency situations not be billed for charges in
excess of what the applicable cost sharing would be under the
consumer's health benefit plan for the use of participating providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.005 and 2008 c 145 s 20 and 2008 c 144 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan
(other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three
thousand five hundred dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by
the insurance commissioner; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least six thousand
dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance
commissioner; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
In July 2008, and in each July thereafter, the insurance
commissioner shall adjust the minimum deductible and out-of-pocket
expense required for a plan to qualify as a catastrophic plan to
reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for medical
care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United States
department of labor. The adjusted amount shall apply on the following
January 1st.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Employee" has the same meaning given to the term, as of
January 1, 2008, under section 3(6) of the federal employee retirement
income security act of 1974.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital ((emergency department)).
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 or 48.83
RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance,
hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment
insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that employed an average of at least two but no more than
fifty employees, during the previous calendar year and employed at
least two employees on the first day of the plan year, is not formed
primarily for purposes of buying health insurance, and in which a bona
fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number
of employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are
eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this
state, shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of
a health plan to a small employer and for the purpose of determining
eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually.
Except as otherwise specifically provided, a small employer shall
continue to be considered a small employer until the plan anniversary
following the date the small employer no longer meets the requirements
of this definition. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor who
is covered as a group of one on the day prior to June 10, 2004, shall
also be considered a "small employer" to the extent that individual or
group of one is entitled to have his or her coverage renewed as
provided in RCW 48.43.035(6).
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.43.093 and 1997 c 231 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When conducting a review of the necessity and appropriateness
of emergency services or making a benefit determination for emergency
services:
(a) A health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to
screen and stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson acting
reasonably would have believed that an emergency medical condition
existed. In addition, a health carrier shall not require prior
authorization of such services provided prior to the point of
stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have
believed that an emergency medical condition existed. With respect to
care obtained from a nonparticipating hospital emergency department, a
health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to screen and
stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson would have reasonably
believed that use of a participating hospital emergency department
would result in a delay that would worsen the emergency, or if a
provision of federal, state, or local law requires the use of a
specific provider or facility. In addition, a health carrier shall not
require prior authorization of such services provided prior to the
point of stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would
have believed that an emergency medical condition existed and that use
of a participating hospital emergency department would result in a
delay that would worsen the emergency.
(b) If an authorized representative of a health carrier authorizes
coverage of emergency services, the health carrier shall not
subsequently retract its authorization after the emergency services
have been provided, or reduce payment for an item or service furnished
in reliance on approval, unless the approval was based on a material
misrepresentation about the covered person's health condition made by
the provider of emergency services.
(c) Coverage of emergency services may be subject to applicable
copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles((, and a health carrier may
impose reasonable differential cost-sharing arrangements for emergency
services rendered by nonparticipating providers, if such differential
between cost-sharing amounts applied to emergency services rendered by
participating provider versus nonparticipating provider does not exceed
fifty dollars. Differential cost sharing for emergency services may
not be applied when a covered person presents to a nonparticipating
hospital emergency department rather than a participating hospital
emergency department when the health carrier requires preauthorization
for postevaluation or poststabilization emergency services if:
(i) Due to circumstances beyond the covered person's control, the
covered person was unable to go to a participating hospital emergency
department in a timely fashion without serious impairment to the
covered person's health; or
(ii) A prudent layperson possessing an average knowledge of health
and medicine would have reasonably believed that he or she would be
unable to go to a participating hospital emergency department in a
timely fashion without serious impairment to the covered person's
health)).
(d)(i) For covered emergency services rendered to a covered person
by a nonparticipating health care provider in a participating hospital
on or after January 1, 2011, the health carrier shall pay the claim
submitted by the health care provider at the greater of:
(A) One hundred forty percent of the rate paid by the medicare
program, as published by the centers for medicare and medicaid
services, for the same covered service, to a similarly licensed
provider; or
(B) The rate that the carrier would pay in the same geographic
area, for the same covered service, to a similarly licensed
participating provider. The rate paid to the provider shall be net of
applicable cost-sharing payable by the covered person under (c) of this
subsection.
(ii) A health carrier shall disclose, upon request of the
nonparticipating provider, the reimbursement rate required under this
subsection. The amount paid under this subsection, in combination with
any applicable cost-sharing payable by the covered person under (c) of
this subsection, shall constitute payment in full for the services
rendered by the nonparticipating provider. Any attempt by the provider
to recover excess funds from the covered person in a manner
inconsistent with this subsection constitutes a violation of RCW
18.130.080(7).
(e) If a health carrier requires preauthorization for
postevaluation or poststabilization services, the health carrier shall
provide access to an authorized representative twenty-four hours a day,
seven days a week, to facilitate review. In order for postevaluation
or poststabilization services to be covered by the health carrier, the
provider or facility must make a documented good faith effort to
contact the covered person's health carrier within thirty minutes of
stabilization, if the covered person needs to be stabilized. The
health carrier's authorized representative is required to respond to a
telephone request for preauthorization from a provider or facility
within thirty minutes. Failure of the health carrier to respond within
thirty minutes constitutes authorization for the provision of
immediately required medically necessary postevaluation and
poststabilization services, unless the health carrier documents that it
made a good faith effort but was unable to reach the provider or
facility within thirty minutes after receiving the request.
(((e))) (f) A health carrier shall immediately arrange for an
alternative plan of treatment for the covered person if a
nonparticipating emergency provider and health plan cannot reach an
agreement on which services are necessary beyond those immediately
necessary to stabilize the covered person consistent with state and
federal laws.
(2) Nothing in this section is to be construed as prohibiting the
health carrier from requiring notification within the time frame
specified in the contract for inpatient admission or as soon thereafter
as medically possible but no less than twenty-four hours. Nothing in
this section is to be construed as preventing the health carrier from
reserving the right to require transfer of a hospitalized covered
person upon stabilization. Follow-up care that is a direct result of
the emergency must be obtained in accordance with the health plan's
usual terms and conditions of coverage. All other terms and conditions
of coverage may be applied to emergency services.
(3) This section does not govern payment for emergency services
rendered to persons who are enrolled in medicare, Title XVIII of the
federal social security act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For covered emergency services rendered to a covered person
by a nonparticipating health care provider in a participating hospital
on or after January 1, 2011, each health plan offered to public
employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not
subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW shall pay the claim submitted
by the health care provider at the greater of:
(i) One hundred forty percent of the rate paid by the medicare
program, as published by the centers for medicare and medicaid
services, for the same covered service, to a similarly licensed
provider; or
(ii) The rate that the carrier would pay in the same geographic
area, for the same covered service, to a similarly licensed
participating provider.
The rate paid to the provider shall be net of applicable
cost-sharing payable by the covered person under (b) of this
subsection.
(b) The health plan must disclose, upon request of the
nonparticipating provider, the reimbursement rate required under this
section. The amount paid under this section, in combination with any
applicable cost-sharing payable by the covered person under the health
plan, constitutes payment in full for the services rendered by the
nonparticipating provider. Any attempt by the provider to recover
excess funds from the covered person in a manner inconsistent with this
subsection constitutes a violation of RCW 18.130.080(7).
(2) As used in this section, "emergency services" means otherwise
covered health care services medically necessary to evaluate and treat
an emergency medical condition provided in a hospital.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For covered emergency services rendered to a covered medical
assistance enrollee by a nonparticipating health care provider in a
participating hospital on or after January 1, 2011, each managed health
care system contracting with the department under RCW 74.09.522 shall
pay the claim submitted by the health care provider at a rate no
greater than the medical assistance rate paid by the department to
providers for comparable services rendered to clients in the fee-for-service delivery system.
(b) The managed health care system must disclose, upon request of
the nonparticipating provider, the reimbursement rate required under
this section. The amount paid under this section constitutes payment
in full for the services rendered by the nonparticipating provider.
Any attempt by the provider to recover excess funds from the enrollee
in a manner inconsistent with this subsection constitutes a violation
of RCW 18.130.080(7).
(2) As used in this section, "emergency services" means otherwise
covered health care services medically necessary to evaluate and treat
an emergency medical condition provided in a hospital.

--- END ---