BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.44.105 and 1997 c 446 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon the issuance by the department of an amendment to the
appropriate permit or certificate of groundwater right, the holder of
a valid right to withdraw public groundwaters may consolidate that
right with a groundwater right exempt from the permit requirement under
RCW 90.44.050, without affecting the priority of either of the water
rights being consolidated.
(b) Such a consolidation amendment shall be issued only after
publication of a notice of the application, a comment period, and a
determination made by the department, in lieu of meeting the conditions
required for an amendment under RCW 90.44.100, that: (((1))) (i) The
exempt well either taps or is in connection with the same body of
public groundwater ((as the well to)) in which the holder has a water
right ((of the exempt well is to be consolidated)) to withdraw
groundwater; (((2))) (ii) use of the exempt well shall be discontinued
upon approval of the consolidation amendment to the permit or
certificate; (((3))) (iii) legally enforceable agreements have been
entered to prohibit the construction of another exempt well to serve
the area previously served by the exempt well to be discontinued, and
such agreements are binding upon subsequent owners of the land through
appropriate binding limitations on the title to the land; (((4))) (iv)
the exempt well or wells the use of which is to be discontinued will be
properly decommissioned in accordance with chapter 18.104 RCW and the
rules of the department unless the department authorizes that the well
may continue to be used for groundwater monitoring purposes; and
(((5))) (v) other existing rights, including ground and surface water
rights and minimum stream flows adopted by rule, shall not be impaired.
(c) The notice shall be published by the applicant in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county or counties in which the wells for
the rights to be consolidated are located once a week for two
consecutive weeks. The applicant shall provide evidence of the
publication of the notice to the department. The comment period shall
be for thirty days beginning on the date the second notice is
published.
(2) The amount of the water to be added to the holder's permit or
certificate upon discontinuance of the exempt well shall be the average
withdrawal from the well, in gallons per day, for the most recent five-year period preceding the date of the application, except that the
amount shall not be less than eight hundred gallons per day for each
residential connection or such alternative minimum amount as may be
established by the department in consultation with the department of
health, and shall not exceed five thousand gallons per day. The
department shall presume that an amount identified by the applicant as
being the average withdrawal from the well during the most recent five-year period is accurate if the applicant establishes that the amount
identified for the use or uses of water from the exempt well is
consistent with the average amount of water used for similar use or
uses in the general area in which the exempt well is located. The
department shall develop, in consultation with the department of
health, a schedule of average household and small-area landscaping
water usages in various regions of the state to aid the department and
applicants in identifying average amounts used for these purposes. The
presumption does not apply if the department finds credible evidence of
nonuse of the well during the required period or credible evidence that
the use of water from the exempt well or the intensity of the use of
the land supported by water from the exempt well is substantially
different than such uses in the general area in which the exempt well
is located. The department shall also accord a presumption in favor of
approval of such consolidation if the requirements of this subsection
are met and the discontinuance of the exempt well is consistent with an
adopted coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW, an
adopted comprehensive land use plan under chapter 36.70A RCW, or other
comprehensive watershed management plan applicable to the area
containing an objective of decreasing the number of existing and newly
developed small groundwater withdrawal wells. The department shall
provide a priority to reviewing and deciding upon applications subject
to this subsection, and shall make its decision within sixty days of
the end of the comment period following publication of the notice by
the applicant or within sixty days of the date on which compliance with
the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, is completed,
whichever is later. The applicant and the department may by prior
mutual agreement extend the time for making a decision.
(3) Until December 31, 2015, if an existing, publicly owned and
operated group A or group B water system, as those terms are defined in
RCW 70.119A.020, that holds a permitted or certificated right to
withdraw public groundwaters is unable to serve proposed new
development within or adjacent to the approved service area of the
water system because it does not have adequate water rights or a
sufficient number of connections, and the proposed new development
would then seek to obtain water supply under the groundwater permit
exemption in RCW 90.44.050, the water system may consolidate with its
water right an additional quantity of water authorized to be withdrawn
under the permit exemption in RCW 90.44.050 and necessary to serve the
proposed new development subject to the following requirements:
(a) The water system shall publish public notice of the intent to
consolidate an exempt withdrawal in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county or counties in which the water system and the proposed
new development are located once a week for two consecutive weeks;
(b) The water system shall provide evidence of publication of the
notice to the department, the department of health, and the local
government with land use authority over the proposed new development;
(c) Upon the date of receipt by the department of evidence of the
notice of publication from the water system, a thirty-day review and
comment period shall exist during which the department shall: (i)
Review public comments; (ii) determine whether water is legally
available for purposes of the consolidation; and (iii) determine
whether the proposed consolidation would impair existing rights
including instream flows;
(d) The local government with land use authority over the proposed
new development shall ensure that the proposed consolidation is
consistent with an adopted coordinated water system plan under chapter
70.116 RCW, an adopted comprehensive land use plan under chapter 36.70A
RCW, or other comprehensive watershed management plan applicable to the
area containing an objective of decreasing the number of existing and
newly developed small groundwater withdrawal wells;
(e) The water system must make any necessary amendments to its
water system plan and receive approval from the department of health to
authorize the addition of new connections, new uses, or revise or
modify the retail service area boundary;
(f) Legally enforceable agreements have been entered to prohibit
the construction of an exempt well to serve the area of the proposed
new development, and such agreements are binding upon subsequent owners
of the land through appropriate binding limitations on the title to the
land;
(g) The department shall consult with the department of health and
the local government with land use authority over the proposed new
development to ensure compliance with this subsection prior to deciding
upon applications subject to this subsection;
(h) The department shall provide a priority to reviewing and
deciding upon applications subject to this subsection, and shall make
its decision within sixty days of the end of the comment period
following publication of the notice by the applicant or within sixty
days of the date on which compliance with the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, is completed, whichever is later,
except that the department may extend the sixty-day time period by
forty-five days for good cause or for any period of time at the request
of the applicant;
(i) In no case may the quantity of water consolidated with the
water system's water rights exceed five thousand gallons per day or the
number of new connections exceed fourteen, and the quantity of water
withdrawn must also comply with rules adopted by the department and
ordinances adopted by the local government with land use authority over
the proposed new development;
(j) The water system must separately meter both existing
connections and new connections to be added under this section;
(k) Any letter, certificate, or other statement that water is
available to serve the proposed new development utilizing the procedure
in this subsection to satisfy the water availability requirement of RCW
19.27.097 or 58.17.110 must be provided to the department, the
department of health, and the local government with land use authority
upon issuance by the water system;
(l) A water system may exercise the authority in this section on
multiple occasions, but only until a total of fourteen residential
connections or five thousand gallons per day of water has been
consolidated with the water rights of the water system; and
(m) After beneficial use has occurred, the water system shall
submit a proof of appropriation demonstrating the actual quantity of
water beneficially used in order to obtain a consolidation amendment
from the department.
(4) Any determination by the department under this section is
appealable to the pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B
RCW.

--- END ---