BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that by preventing
one high school student from dropping out the annual savings is
approximately ten thousand five hundred dollars, including lost state
and local taxes and savings to the temporary assistance to needy
families program, food stamps, housing assistance, the criminal justice
system, and the health care system.
(2) The legislature further finds that school districts need both
accountability and technical assistance to improve high school
graduation rates.
(3) The legislature further finds that many vulnerable students
fail to graduate from high school without adequate dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems at the school district level.
(4) The legislature further finds that school districts need the
support of families, agencies, and organizations in the local community
to prevent dropouts. In order to significantly improve statewide high
school graduation rates, it is the intent of the legislature to
facilitate the development of a collaborative infrastructure at the
local, regional, and state level between systems that serve vulnerable
youth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 and 4
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Critical community members" means representatives in the local
community from among the following agencies and organizations:
Student/parent organizations, parents and families, local government,
law enforcement, juvenile corrections, any tribal organization in the
local school district, the local health district, nonprofit and social
service organizations serving youth, and faith organizations.
(2) "Dropout early warning and intervention data system" means a
student information system that provides the data needed to conduct a
universal screening to identify students at risk of dropping out,
catalog student interventions, and monitor student progress towards
graduation.
(3) "K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
system" means a system that provides all of the following functions:
(a) Engaging in school improvement planning specifically focused on
improving high school graduation rates, including goal-setting and
action planning, based on a comprehensive assessment of strengths and
challenges;
(b) Providing prevention activities including, but not limited to,
emotionally and physically safe school environments, implementation of
a comprehensive guidance and counseling model facilitated by certified
school counselors, core academic instruction, and career and technical
education exploratory and preparatory programs;
(c) Identifying vulnerable students based on a dropout early
warning and intervention data system;
(d) Timely academic and nonacademic group and individual
interventions for vulnerable students based on a response to
intervention model, including planning and sharing of information at
critical academic transitions;
(e) Providing graduation coaches, mentors, certified school
counselors, and/or case managers for vulnerable students identified as
needing a more intensive one-on-one adult relationship;
(f) Establishing and providing staff to coordinate a
school/family/community partnership that assists in building a K-12
dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system;
(g) Providing retrieval or reentry activities; and
(h) Providing alternative educational programming including, but
not limited to, credit retrieval and online learning opportunities.
(4) "School/family/community partnership" means a partnership
between a school or schools, families, and the community, that engages
critical community members in a formal, structured partnership with
local school districts in a coordinated effort to provide comprehensive
support services and improve outcomes for vulnerable youth.
(5) "Vulnerable students" means students who are in foster care,
involved in the juvenile justice system, receiving special education
services under chapter 28A.155 RCW, recent immigrants, homeless,
emotionally traumatized, or are facing behavioral health issues, and
students deemed at-risk of school failure as identified by a dropout
early warning data system or other assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By September 15, 2010, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the work
group established in RCW 28A.175.075, shall develop and report
recommendations to the quality education council and the legislature
for the development of a comprehensive, K-12 dropout reduction
initiative designed to integrate multiple tiers of dropout prevention,
intervention, and technical assistance provided through federal and
state programs and to support a K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement system as defined in section 2 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2007 c 408 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12
and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at
risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
following divisions and offices of the department of social and health
services: Children's services, juvenile rehabilitation, behavioral
health and recovery, and the office of juvenile justice. The ((state-level leadership)) work group ((shall)) should also consist of one
representative from each of the following agencies and organizations:
((The workforce training and education coordinating board;)) A
statewide organization representing career and technical education
programs including skill centers; ((relevant divisions of the
department of social and health services;)) the juvenile courts; the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state
office of public defense; ((the employment security department;))
accredited institutions of higher education; the educational service
districts; the area workforce development councils; parent and educator
associations; ((the department of health)) achievement gap oversight
and accountability committee; office of the education ombudsman; local
school districts; agencies or organizations that provide services to
special education students; community organizations serving youth;
federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; each of the major
political caucuses of the senate and house of representatives; and the
minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in RCW ((28A.175.055)) 28A.175.025, the state-level work
group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3)(a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor on
an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies
for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not
limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices,
needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding formulas for supporting career guidance
and the planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention and
intervention systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
formulas into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013 biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in, beginning in the 2011-2013 biennium,
the expansion of the current school improvement planning program to
include state-funded, dropout-focused school improvement technical
assistance for school districts in significant need of improvement
regarding high school graduation rates.
(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work
together on the following activities to support school/family/community
partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding, where feasible;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(b) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.

--- END ---