BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to have
licensing fees be consistent for both county auditors and licensing
subagents so that the public pays the same fee at all licensing
locations. The base fee for passenger vehicles will now include the
subagent licensing fee, where before it was added by the subagent when
the subagent registered the vehicle. The intent of this act is to be
revenue neutral to the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.16.0621 and 2003 c 1 s 2 and 2002 c 352 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) License tab fees are ((required to be $30)) thirty-two
dollars and forty-three cents per year for motor vehicles, regardless
of year, value, make, or model.
(((2))) (b) Any subagent authorized to collect the thirty-two
dollar and forty-three cent fee shall retain four dollars from the fee
upon collection.
(2) If, at the end of each fiscal year, the aggregate amount of the
fees collected under this section minus the aggregate amount of service
fees retained by subagents pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this
section exceeds the aggregate amount that would have been collected
otherwise for a thirty-dollar license tab fee, the excess amount must
be transferred from the motor vehicle fund to the title and licensing
system account created in section 5 of this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are
defined as the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles
and trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.620 and 46.04.623, including cars,
sport utility vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes. Trailers
licensed under RCW 46.16.068 or 46.16.085 and campers licensed under
RCW 46.16.505 are not required to pay license tab fees under this
section.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16.070 and 2005 c 314 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In lieu of all other vehicle licensing fees, unless
specifically exempt, and in addition to the mileage fees prescribed for
buses and stages in RCW 46.16.125, there shall be paid and collected
annually for each truck, motor truck, truck tractor, road tractor,
tractor, bus, auto stage, or for hire vehicle with seating capacity of
more than six, based upon the declared combined gross weight or
declared gross weight under chapter 46.44 RCW, the following licensing
fees by weight:

WEIGHT SCHEDULE A SCHEDULE B

4,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((40.00))
42.43 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((40.00))
42.43

6,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((50.00))
52.43 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((50.00))
52.43

8,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((60.00))
62.43 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((60.00))
62.43

10,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((62.00))
64.43 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((62.00))
64.43

12,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((79.00))
81.43 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ ((79.00))
81.43

14,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90.00

16,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 102.00

18,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 154.00

20,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 171.00

22,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 185.00

24,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200.00

26,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 211.00

28,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249.00

30,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 287.00

32,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 346.00

34,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 368.00

36,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 399.00

38,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 438.00

40,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 501.00

42,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 521.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 611.00

44,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 532.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 622.00

46,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 572.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662.00

48,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 596.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 686.00

50,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 647.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 737.00

52,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 680.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 770.00

54,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 734.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 824.00

56,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 775.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 865.00

58,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 806.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 896.00

60,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 859.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 949.00

62,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 921.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,011.00

64,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 941.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,031.00

66,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,048.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,138.00

68,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,093.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,183.00

70,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,177.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,267.00

72,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,259.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,349.00

74,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,368.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,458.00

76,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,478.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568.00

78,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,614.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,704.00

80,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,742.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,832.00

82,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,863.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,953.00

84,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,983.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,073.00

86,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,104.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,194.00

88,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,225.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,315.00

90,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,346.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,436.00

92,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,466.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,556.00

94,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,587.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,677.00

96,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,708.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,798.00

98,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,829.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,919.00

100,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,949.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,039.00

102,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,070.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,160.00

104,000 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,191.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,281.00

105,500 lbs. . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,312.00 . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,402.00

Schedule A applies to vehicles either used exclusively for hauling
logs or that do not tow trailers. Schedule B applies to vehicles that
tow trailers and are not covered under Schedule A.
Every truck, motor truck, truck tractor, and tractor exceeding
6,000 pounds empty scale weight registered under chapter 46.16, 46.87,
or 46.88 RCW shall be licensed for not less than one hundred fifty
percent of its empty weight unless the amount would be in excess of the
legal limits prescribed for such a vehicle in RCW 46.44.041 or
46.44.042, in which event the vehicle shall be licensed for the maximum
weight authorized for such a vehicle or unless the vehicle is used only
for the purpose of transporting any well drilling machine, air
compressor, rock crusher, conveyor, hoist, donkey engine, cook house,
tool house, bunk house, or similar machine or structure attached to or
made a part of such vehicle.
The following provisions apply when increasing gross or combined
gross weight for a vehicle licensed under this section:
(a) The new license fee will be one-twelfth of the fee listed above
for the new gross weight, multiplied by the number of months remaining
in the period for which licensing fees have been paid, including the
month in which the new gross weight is effective.
(b) Upon surrender of the current certificate of registration or
cab card, the new licensing fees due shall be reduced by the amount of
the licensing fees previously paid for the same period for which new
fees are being charged.
(2)(a) Any subagent authorized to collect the gross weight fee
under this section for personal use trucks up to 13,999 gross vehicle
weight shall retain four dollars from the fee upon collection.
(b) If, at the end of each fiscal year, the aggregate amount of the
fees collected under this section for personal use trucks up to 13,999
gross vehicle weight minus the aggregate amount of service fees
retained by subagents pursuant to (a) of this subsection exceeds the
aggregate amount that would have been collected otherwise for the fee
amount in existence before August 1, 2010, for personal use trucks up
to 13,999 gross vehicle weight, the excess amount must be transferred
from the motor vehicle fund to the title and licensing system account
created in section 5 of this act.
(3) The proceeds from the fees collected under subsection (1) of
this section shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 46.68.035.
(((3))) (4) In lieu of the gross weight fee under subsection (1) of
this section, farm vehicles may be licensed upon payment of the fee in
effect under subsection (1) of this section on May 1, 2005. In order
to qualify for the reduced fee under this subsection, the farm vehicle
must be exempt from property taxes in accordance with RCW 84.36.630.
The applicant must submit copies of the forms required under RCW
84.36.630. The application for the reduced fee under this subsection
shall require the applicant to attest that the vehicle shall be used
primarily for farming purposes. The department shall provide licensing
agents and subagents with a schedule of the appropriate licensing fees
for farm vehicles.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.01.140 and 2005 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county auditor, if appointed by the director of licensing
shall carry out the provisions of this title relating to the licensing
of vehicles and the issuance of vehicle license number plates under the
direction and supervision of the director and may with the approval of
the director appoint assistants as special deputies and recommend
subagents to accept applications and collect fees for vehicle licenses
and transfers and to deliver vehicle license number plates.
(2) A county auditor appointed by the director may request that the
director appoint subagencies within the county.
(a) Upon authorization of the director, the auditor shall use an
open competitive process including, but not limited to, a written
business proposal and oral interview to determine the qualifications of
all interested applicants.
(b) A subagent may recommend a successor who is either the
subagent's sibling, spouse, or child, or a subagency employee, as long
as the recommended successor participates in the open, competitive
process used to select an applicant. In making successor
recommendation and appointment determinations, the following provisions
apply:
(i) If a subagency is held by a partnership or corporate entity,
the nomination must be submitted on behalf of, and agreed to by, all
partners or corporate officers.
(ii) No subagent may receive any direct or indirect compensation or
remuneration from any party or entity in recognition of a successor
nomination. A subagent may not receive any financial benefit from the
transfer or termination of an appointment.
(iii) (a) and (b) of this subsection are intended to assist in the
efficient transfer of appointments in order to minimize public
inconvenience. They do not create a proprietary or property interest
in the appointment.
(c) The auditor shall submit all proposals to the director, and
shall recommend the appointment of one or more subagents who have
applied through the open competitive process. The auditor shall
include in his or her recommendation to the director, not only the name
of the successor who is a relative or employee, if applicable and if
otherwise qualified, but also the name of one other applicant who is
qualified and was chosen through the open competitive process. The
director has final appointment authority.
(3)(a) A county auditor who is appointed as an agent by the
department shall enter into a standard contract provided by the
director, developed with the advice of the title and registration
advisory committee.
(b) A subagent appointed under subsection (2) of this section shall
enter into a standard contract with the county auditor, developed with
the advice of the title and registration advisory committee. The
director shall provide the standard contract to county auditors.
(c) The contracts provided for in (a) and (b) of this subsection
must contain at a minimum provisions that:
(i) Describe the responsibilities, and where applicable, the
liability, of each party relating to the service expectations and
levels, equipment to be supplied by the department, and equipment
maintenance;
(ii) Require the specific type of insurance or bonds so that the
state is protected against any loss of collected motor vehicle tax
revenues or loss of equipment;
(iii) Specify the amount of training that will be provided by the
state, the county auditor, or subagents;
(iv) Describe allowable costs that may be charged to vehicle
licensing activities as provided for in (d) of this subsection;
(v) Describe the causes and procedures for termination of the
contract, which may include mediation and binding arbitration.
(d) The department shall develop procedures that will standardize
and prescribe allowable costs that may be assigned to vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities performed by county
auditors.
(e) The contracts may include any provision that the director deems
necessary to ensure acceptable service and the full collection of
vehicle and vessel tax revenues.
(f) The director may waive any provisions of the contract deemed
necessary in order to ensure that readily accessible service is
provided to the citizens of the state.
(4)(a) At any time any application is made to the director, the
county auditor, or other agent pursuant to any law dealing with
licenses, registration, or the right to operate any vehicle or vessel
upon the public highways or waters of this state, excluding applicants
already paying such fee under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, the applicant
shall pay to the director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of
three dollars for each application in addition to any other fees
required by law.
(b) Counties that do not cover the expenses of vehicle licensing
and vessel registration and title activities may submit to the
department a request for cost-coverage moneys. The request must be
submitted on a form developed by the department. The department shall
develop procedures to verify whether a request is reasonable. Payment
shall be made on requests found to be allowable from the licensing
services account.
(c) Applicants for certificates of ownership, including applicants
paying fees under RCW 46.16.070 or 46.16.085, shall pay to the
director, county auditor, or other agent a fee of four dollars in
addition to any other fees required by law.
(d) The fees under (a) and (c) of this subsection, if paid to the
county auditor as agent of the director, or if paid to a subagent of
the county auditor, shall be paid to the county treasurer in the same
manner as other fees collected by the county auditor and credited to
the county current expense fund. If the fee is paid to another agent
of the director, the fee shall be used by the agent to defray his or
her expenses in handling the application.
(e) Applicants required to pay the three-dollar fee established
under (a) of this subsection, must pay an additional seventy-five
cents, which must be collected and remitted to the state treasurer and
distributed as follows:
(i) Fifty cents must be deposited into the department of licensing
services account of the motor vehicle fund and must be used for agent
and subagent support, which is to include but not be limited to the
replacement of department-owned equipment in the possession of agents
and subagents.
(ii) Twenty-five cents must be deposited into the license plate
technology account created under RCW 46.16.685.
(5) A subagent shall collect a service fee of (a) ten dollars for
changes in a certificate of ownership, with or without registration
renewal, or verification of record and preparation of an affidavit of
lost title other than at the time of the title application or transfer
and (b), except for (i) vehicles subject to the fee under RCW
46.16.0621 and (ii) personal use trucks up to 13,999 gross vehicle
weight subject to the fee under RCW 46.16.070, four dollars for
registration renewal only, issuing a transit permit, or any other
service under this section.
(6) If the fee is collected by the state patrol as agent for the
director, the fee so collected shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the state patrol highway
account. If the fee is collected by the department of transportation
as agent for the director, the fee shall be certified to the state
treasurer and deposited to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. All
such fees collected by the director or branches of his office shall be
certified to the state treasurer and deposited to the credit of the
highway safety fund.
(7) Any county revenues that exceed the cost of providing vehicle
licensing and vessel registration and title activities in a county,
calculated in accordance with the procedures in subsection (3)(d) of
this section, shall be expended as determined by the county legislative
authority during the process established by law for adoption of county
budgets.
(8) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The title and licensing system account is created in the state
treasury. The excess amount of fees collected as described in RCW
46.61.0621(2) and 46.16.070(2)(b) must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for developing,
implementing, and maintaining an updated vehicle licensing system.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.17.010 and 2006 c 337 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be paid and collected annually for motor vehicles
subject to the fee under RCW 46.16.0621, except motor homes, a vehicle
weight fee. The amount of the fee shall be based upon the vehicle
scale weight, which is correlated with vehicle size and roadway lane
usage. Fees imposed under this section must be used for transportation
purposes, and shall not be used for the general support of state
government. The vehicle weight fee shall be that portion of the fee as
reflected on the scale weight set forth in schedule B provided in RCW
46.16.070 that is in excess of ((the fee imposed under RCW 46.16.0621))
thirty dollars. This fee is due at the time of initial and renewal of
vehicle registration.
(2) If the resultant weight according to this section is not listed
in schedule B provided in RCW 46.16.070, it shall be increased to the
next higher weight pursuant to chapter 46.44 RCW.
(3) For the purpose of administering this section, the department
shall rely on the vehicle empty scale weights as provided by vehicle
manufacturers, or other sources defined by the department, to determine
the weight of each vehicle. The department shall adopt rules for
determining weight for vehicles without manufacturer empty scale
weights.
(4) The vehicle weight fee under this section is imposed to provide
funds to mitigate the impact of vehicle loads on the state roads and
highways and is separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees.
Proceeds from the fee may be used for transportation purposes, or for
facilities and activities that reduce the number of vehicles or load
weights on the state roads and highways.
(5) The vehicle weight fee collected under this section shall be
deposited as follows:
(a) On July 1, 2006, six million dollars shall be deposited into
the freight mobility multimodal account created in RCW 46.68.310, and
the remainder collected from June 7, 2006, through June 30, 2006, shall
be deposited into the multimodal transportation account;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2007, and every July 1st thereafter, three
million dollars shall be deposited into the freight mobility multimodal
account created in RCW 46.68.310, and the remainder shall be deposited
into the multimodal transportation account.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.68.035 and 2006 c 337 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
All proceeds from combined vehicle licensing fees received by the
director for vehicles licensed under RCW 46.16.070, less the amount
retained by subagents as authorized under RCW 46.16.070(2)(a), and
46.16.085 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer to be distributed
into accounts according to the following method:
(1) The sum of two dollars for each vehicle shall be deposited into
the multimodal transportation account, except that for each vehicle
registered by a county auditor or agent to a county auditor pursuant to
RCW 46.01.140, the sum of two dollars shall be credited to the current
county expense fund.
(2) The remainder and the proceeds from the license fee under RCW
46.16.086 and the farm vehicle trip permit under RCW 46.16.162 shall be
distributed as follows:
(a) 22.36 percent shall be deposited into the state patrol highway
account of the motor vehicle fund;
(b) 1.375 percent shall be deposited into the Puget Sound ferry
operations account of the motor vehicle fund;
(c) 5.237 percent shall be deposited into the transportation 2003
account (nickel account);
(d) 11.533 percent shall be deposited into the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290; and
(e) The remaining proceeds shall be deposited into the motor
vehicle fund.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.68.080 and 2006 c 337 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Motor vehicle license fees collected under RCW 46.16.0621 and
46.16.070, less the amounts retained by subagents as authorized under
RCW 46.16.0621(1)(b) and 46.16.070(2)(a), and fuel taxes collected
under RCW 82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) and directly or indirectly paid
by the residents of those counties composed entirely of islands and
which have neither a fixed physical connection with the mainland nor
any state highways on any of the islands of which they are composed,
shall be paid into the motor vehicle fund of the state of Washington
and shall monthly, as they accrue, and after deducting therefrom the
expenses of issuing such licenses and the cost of collecting such
vehicle fuel tax, be paid to the county treasurer of each such county
to be ((by him)) disbursed by the county treasurer as hereinafter
provided.
(2) One-half of the motor vehicle license fees collected under RCW
46.16.0621 and 46.16.070, less one-half of the amounts retained by
subagents as authorized under RCW 46.16.0621(1)(b) and 46.16.070(2)(a),
and one-half of the fuel taxes collected under RCW 82.36.025(1) and
82.38.030(1) and directly or indirectly paid by the residents of those
counties composed entirely of islands and which have either a fixed
physical connection with the mainland or state highways on any of the
islands of which they are composed, shall be paid into the motor
vehicle fund of the state of Washington and shall monthly, as they
accrue, and after deducting therefrom the expenses of issuing such
licenses and the cost of collecting such motor vehicle fuel tax, be
paid to the county treasurer of each such county to be ((by him))
disbursed by the county treasurer as hereinafter provided.
(3) All funds paid to the county treasurer of the counties of
either class referred to in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
shall be by such county treasurer distributed and credited to the
several road districts of each such county and paid to the city
treasurer of each incorporated city and town within each such county,
in the direct proportion that the assessed valuation of each such road
district and incorporated city and town shall bear to the total
assessed valuation of each such county.
(4) The amount of motor vehicle fuel tax paid by the residents of
those counties composed entirely of islands shall, for the purposes of
this section, be that percentage of the total amount of motor vehicle
fuel tax collected in the state that the motor vehicle license fees
paid by the residents of counties composed entirely of islands bears to
the total motor vehicle license fees paid by the residents of the
state.
(5)(a) An amount of fuel taxes shall be deposited into the Puget
Sound ferry operations account. This amount shall equal the difference
between the total amount of fuel taxes collected in the state under RCW
82.36.020 and 82.38.030 less the total amount of fuel taxes collected
in the state under RCW 82.36.020(1) and 82.38.030(1) and be multiplied
by a fraction. The fraction shall equal the amount of motor vehicle
license fees collected under RCW 46.16.0621 and 46.16.070, less the
amounts retained by subagents as authorized under RCW 46.16.0621(1)(b)
and 46.16.070(2)(a), from counties described in subsection (1) of this
section divided by the total amount of motor vehicle license fees
collected in the state under RCW 46.16.0621 and 46.16.070, less the
amounts retained by subagents as authorized under RCW 46.16.0621(1)(b)
and 46.16.070(2)(a).
(b) An additional amount of fuel taxes shall be deposited into the
Puget Sound ferry operations account. This amount shall equal the
difference between the total amount of fuel taxes collected in the
state under RCW 82.36.020 and 82.38.030 less the total amount of fuel
taxes collected in the state under RCW 82.36.020(1) and 82.38.030(1)
and be multiplied by a fraction. The fraction shall equal the amount
of motor vehicle license fees collected under RCW 46.16.0621 and
46.16.070, less the amounts retained by subagents as authorized under
RCW 46.16.0621(1)(b) and 46.16.070(2)(a), from counties described in
subsection (2) of this section divided by the total amount of motor
vehicle license fees collected in the state under RCW 46.16.0621 and
46.16.070, less the amounts retained by subagents as authorized under
RCW 46.16.0621(1)(b) and 46.16.070(2)(a), and this shall be multiplied
by one-half.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to vehicle registrations
that are due or become due on or after August 1, 2010.

--- END ---