BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.26.510 and 2009 c 523 s 7 and 2009 c 226 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested
member who has not completed at least ten years of service dies, the
amount of the accumulated contributions standing to such member's
credit in the retirement system at the time of such member's death,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing
to such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as
if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or
domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) ((If)) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if
a member who is killed in the course of employment or a member who is
eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at least ten
years of service dies, the surviving spouse, domestic partner, or
eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.26.430, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and
actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option under RCW 41.26.460 and if the member was not eligible
for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as
described in RCW 41.26.430; if a surviving spouse or domestic partner
who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or
children of the member under the age of majority, then such child or
children shall continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to
that which was being received by the surviving spouse or domestic
partner, share and share alike, until such child or children reach the
age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner
eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the member's death,
such member's child or children under the age of majority shall receive
an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein provided making
the assumption that the ages of the spouse or domestic partner and
member were equal at the time of the member's death; or
(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or
(ii) If the member dies on or after July 25, 1993, one hundred
fifty percent of the member's accumulated contributions, less any
amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any
accumulated contributions attributable to restorations made under RCW
41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and
is not survived by a spouse, domestic partner, or an eligible child,
then the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW
41.50.670, shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, or the retirement allowance of a member who
has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard
or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national
guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW
41.04.005, is not subject to an actuarial reduction for early
retirement as provided in RCW 41.26.430 or an actuarial reduction to
reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW
41.26.460. The member's retirement allowance is computed under RCW
41.26.420, except that the member shall be entitled to a minimum
retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final
average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement
allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary
for each year of service beyond five.
(5) The retirement allowance paid to the spouse or domestic partner
and dependent children of a member who is killed in the course of
employment, as set forth in RCW 41.05.011(((14))) (16), shall include
reimbursement for any payments of premium rates to the Washington state
health care authority pursuant to RCW 41.05.080.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.26.048 and 2009 c 523 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse
or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if
there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such
member's legal representatives.
(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only when death
occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (b) as a result of an occupational disease or infection
that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under
this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall
be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.
(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2010, and every year thereafter, the
department shall determine the following information:
(i) The index for the 2008 calendar year, to be known as "index A;"
(ii) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of
determination, to be known as "index B;" and
(iii) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.
(b) The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment
to the original death benefit and shall be applied beginning every July
1st. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:
(i) Produce a benefit which is lower than two hundred fourteen
thousand dollars;
(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or
(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more
than three percent.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's average consumer price index -- Seattle,
Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.32.050 and 2007 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Where death results from the injury the expenses of burial not
to exceed two hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state
as defined in RCW 51.08.018 shall be paid.
(2)(a) Where death results from the injury, a surviving spouse of
a deceased worker eligible for benefits under this title shall receive
monthly for life or until remarriage payments according to the
following schedule:
(i) If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty percent
of the wages of the deceased worker;
(ii) If there is one child of the deceased worker and in the legal
custody of such spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the deceased
worker;
(iii) If there are two children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of the
deceased worker;
(iv) If there are three children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of the
deceased worker;
(v) If there are four children of the deceased worker and in the
legal custody of such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages of the
deceased worker; or
(vi) If there are five or more children of the deceased worker and
in the legal custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the wages of
the deceased worker.
(b) A surviving spouse of a member of the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW or the
state patrol retirement system under chapter 43.43 RCW who is entitled
to benefits under this section must continue to receive benefits under
this section monthly for life. Such surviving spouse shall not be
eligible to receive a lump-sum payment under (g) of this subsection.
After the effective date of this section, the monthly payments to any
such surviving spouse which have been suspended pursuant to (d) or (g)
of this subsection shall resume. However, the monthly payments to any
spouse who received a lump-sum payment under (g) of this subsection
shall be actuarially reduced to reflect the amount of the lump-sum
payment.
(c) Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any
child or children of the deceased worker or where after the death of
the worker legal custody of such child or children passes from such
surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or
children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made
to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or
children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the
monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each
such child but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent.
Such payments on account of such child or children shall be subtracted
from the amount to which such surviving spouse would have been entitled
had such surviving spouse had legal custody of all of the children and
the surviving spouse shall receive the remainder after such payments on
account of such child or children have been subtracted. Such payments
on account of a child or children not in the legal custody of such
surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such children.
(((c))) (d) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, payments
to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall cease at the end
of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED, That a monthly
payment shall be made to the child or children of the deceased worker
from the month following such remarriage in a sum equal to five percent
of the wages of the deceased worker for one child and a sum equal to
five percent for each additional child up to a maximum of five such
children. Payments to such child or children shall be apportioned
equally among such children. Such sum shall be in place of any
payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account of any such
child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal custody
of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after the death
of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes from such
surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or
children not in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made
to the person or persons having legal custody of such child or
children.
(((d))) (e) In no event shall the monthly payments provided in
subsection (2) of this section:
(i) Exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in
the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(ii) For dates of injury or disease manifestation after July 1,
2008, be less than fifteen percent of the average monthly wage in the
state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 plus an additional ten dollars
per month for a surviving spouse and an additional ten dollars per
month for each child of the worker up to a maximum of five children.
However, if the monthly payment computed under this subsection
(2)(((d))) (e)(ii) is greater than one hundred percent of the wages of
the deceased worker as determined under RCW 51.08.178, the monthly
payment due to the surviving spouse shall be equal to the greater of
the monthly wages of the deceased worker or the minimum benefit set
forth in this section on June 30, 2008.
(((e))) (f) In addition to the monthly payments provided for in
subsection (2)(a) through (((c))) (d) of this section, a surviving
spouse or child or children of such worker if there is no surviving
spouse, or dependent parent or parents, if there is no surviving spouse
or child or children of any such deceased worker shall be forthwith
paid a sum equal to one hundred percent of the average monthly wage in
the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to
share and share alike in said sum.
(((f))) (g) Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly
payments for the child or children shall continue as provided in this
section, but the monthly payments to such surviving spouse shall cease
at the end of the month during which remarriage occurs, except as
provided in (b) of this subsection. However, after September 8, 1975,
an otherwise eligible surviving spouse of a worker who died at any time
prior to or after September 8, 1975, shall have an option of:
(i) Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times
the monthly compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage
allocable to the spouse for himself or herself pursuant to subsection
(2)(a)(i) of this section and subject to any modifications specified
under subsection (2)(((d))) (e) of this section and RCW 51.32.075(3) or
fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of his or her
pension, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury
occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum
available shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then
in effect; or
(ii) If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in
subsection (2)(((f))) (g)(i) of this section to accept the lump sum
payment, the remarriage of the surviving spouse of a worker shall not
bar him or her from claiming the lump sum payment authorized in
subsection (2)(((f))) (g)(i) of this section during the life of the
remarriage, or shall not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or
to her if the remarriage has been terminated by death or has been
dissolved or annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not
previously accepted the lump sum payment.
(((g))) (h) If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should
die without having previously received the lump sum payment provided in
subsection (2)(((f))) (g)(i) of this section, his or her estate shall
be entitled to receive the sum specified under subsection (2)(((f)))
(g)(i) of this section or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity
value of his or her pension whichever is the lesser.
(((h))) (i) The effective date of resumption of payments under
subsection (2)(((f))) (g)(ii) of this section to a surviving spouse
based upon termination of a remarriage by death, annulment, or
dissolution shall be the date of the death or the date the judicial
decree of annulment or dissolution becomes final and when application
for the payments has been received.
(((i))) (j) If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in
the reserve fund or to create a new pension reserve fund as a result of
the amendments in chapter 45, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess., the
amount of such increase in pension reserve in any such case shall be
transferred to the reserve fund from the supplemental pension fund.
(3) If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the
deceased worker or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits
under this title, a sum equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of
the deceased worker shall be paid monthly for one child and a sum
equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage shall be paid monthly for
each additional child, the total of such sum to be divided among such
children, share and share alike: PROVIDED, That benefits under this
subsection or subsection (4) of this section shall not exceed the
lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the
time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average
monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

(4) In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments
dies, the child or children of the deceased worker shall receive the
same payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but leaves
a dependent or dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to each
dependent equal to fifty percent of the average monthly support
actually received by such dependent from the worker during the twelve
months next preceding the occurrence of the injury, but the total
payment to all dependents in any case shall not exceed the lesser of
sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at the time of
his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average monthly
wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER
PERCENTAGE

June 30, 1993 105%

June 30, 1994 110%

June 30, 1995 115%

June 30, 1996 120%

If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time of
the occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall cease
when such dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such
payments shall continue until the dependent reaches age twenty-three
while permanently enrolled at a full time course in an accredited
school. The payment to any dependent shall cease if and when, under
the same circumstances, the necessity creating the dependency would
have ceased if the injury had not happened.
(6) For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker
dies during the period of permanent total disability, whatever the
cause of death, leaving a surviving spouse, or child, or children, the
surviving spouse or child or children shall receive benefits as if
death resulted from the injury as provided in subsections (2) through
(4) of this section. Upon remarriage or death of such surviving
spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be made as
provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of
a deceased worker remarries.
(7) For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who
becomes eligible for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an
option as provided in RCW 51.32.067.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.380 and 2005 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College ((may)) shall exempt the following students from the
payment of all ((or a portion of)) tuition fees and services and
activities fees:
(1) Children of any law enforcement officer ((or)), firefighter, or
Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became
totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law
enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this
state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if
they begin their course of study at a state-supported college or
university within ten years of their graduation from high school; and
(2) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer, firefighter,
or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became
totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law
enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this
state.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.15.520 and 2007 c 355 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the community colleges may:
(1) Waive all or a portion of tuition fees and services and
activities fees for:
(a) Students nineteen years of age or older who are eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 through
28B.15.015, who enroll in a course of study or program which will
enable them to finish their high school education and obtain a high
school diploma or certificate, but who are not eligible students as
defined by RCW 28A.600.405; and shall waive all of tuition fees and
services and activities fees for:
(b) Children of any law enforcement officer ((or)), firefighter, or
Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became
totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law
enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this
state: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the waiver only if they
begin their course of study at a community college within ten years of
their graduation from high school; and
(c) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer, firefighter,
or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became
totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law
enforcement agency or full time or volunteer fire department in this
state;
(2) Waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees
differential for:
(a) Nonresident students enrolled in a community college course of
study or program which will enable them to finish their high school
education and obtain a high school diploma or certificate but who are
not eligible students as defined by RCW 28A.600.405. The waiver shall
be in effect only for those courses which lead to a high school diploma
or certificate; and
(b) Up to forty percent of the students enrolled in the regional
education program for deaf students, subject to federal funding of such
program.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.43.295 and 2009 c 522 s 8 and 2009 c 226 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For members commissioned on or after January 1, 2003, except as
provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not
completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the
accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the
retirement system at the time of such member's death, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be
no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the
member's death, such member's accumulated contributions standing to
such member's credit in the retirement system, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as
if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or
domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.
(2) If a member who is killed in the course of employment or a
member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or domestic
partner or eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:
(a) A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW
43.43.260, actuarially reduced, except under subsection (4) of this
section, by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to
reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor option under RCW
43.43.278 and if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at
the date of death a further reduction from age fifty-five or when the
member could have attained twenty-five years of service, whichever is
less; if a surviving spouse or domestic partner who is receiving a
retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the member
under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue
to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being
received by the surviving spouse or domestic partner, share and share
alike, until such child or children reach the age of majority; if there
is no surviving spouse or domestic partner eligible to receive an
allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or
children under the age of majority shall receive an allowance share and
share alike calculated under this section making the assumption that
the ages of the spouse or domestic partner and member were equal at the
time of the member's death; or
(b)(i) The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or
(ii) If the member dies, one hundred fifty percent of the member's
accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any accumulated contributions
attributable to restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be
refunded at one hundred percent.
(3) If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has
completed at least ten years of service dies, and is not survived by a
spouse or domestic partner or an eligible child, then the accumulated
contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid:
(a) To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as
the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed
and filed with the department; or
(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal
representatives.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, or the retirement allowance of a member who
has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard
or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national
guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW
41.04.005, is not subject to an actuarial reduction for early
retirement if the member was not eligible for normal retirement or an
actuarial reduction to reflect a joint and one hundred percent survivor
option under RCW 43.43.278. The member is entitled to a minimum
retirement allowance equal to ten percent of such member's final
average salary. The member shall additionally receive a retirement
allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final salary
for each year of service beyond five.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.43.285 and 2009 c 522 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((one hundred fifty)) two hundred fourteen thousand dollar
death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust or organization as the member shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If
there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time
of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the
member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse
or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if
there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such
member's legal representatives.
(2)(a) The benefit under this section shall be paid only where
death occurs as a result of (i) injuries sustained in the course of
employment; or (ii) an occupational disease or infection that arises
naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter.
The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries.
The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of
retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.
(b) The retirement allowance paid to the spouse or domestic partner
and dependent children of a member who is killed in the course of
employment, as set forth in RCW 41.05.011(((14))) (16), shall include
reimbursement for any payments of premium rates to the Washington state
health care authority under RCW 41.05.080.
(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2010, and every year thereafter, the
department shall determine the following information:
(i) The index for the 2008 calendar year, to be known as "index A";
(ii) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of
determination, to be known as "index B"; and
(iii) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.
(b) The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment
to the original death benefit and shall be applied beginning every July
1st. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:
(i) Produce a benefit which is lower than two hundred fourteen
thousand dollars;
(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or
(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more
than three percent.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any
calendar year, that year's average consumer price index -- Seattle,
Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items,
compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of
labor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 1 of this act applies prospectively
to the benefits of all members killed in the course of employment since
October 1, 1977.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 2 and 7 of this act apply to the
benefits of all members killed in the course of employment since
January 1, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 6 of this act applies prospectively
to the benefits of all members killed in the course of employment since
January 1, 2003.

--- END ---