BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that institutions of
higher education are key to the future employment opportunities of
Washington citizens and to the economic well-being of the state. The
legislature finds that the recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers
at institutions of higher education and the formation of research
innovation teams will further enhance faculty recruitment and economic
development. The legislature further finds that current financial aid
and early childhood education programs are underfunded and subject to
the unpredictability of the state budget. It is the intent of the
legislature to direct lottery account moneys toward the Washington
opportunity pathways account and that those funds stabilize and
increase existing resources for the recruitment of entrepreneurial
researchers, innovation partnership zones and research teams, early
childhood education, opportunity grants, educational opportunity
grants, get ready for math and science scholarships, passport to
college promise scholarships, college bound scholarships, the state
work study program, the state need grant, Washington scholars awards,
the Washington award for vocational excellence, and Washington promise
scholarships. It is also the intent of the legislature to continue
funding the education construction fund by redirecting a portion of
general state revenues to that fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington opportunity pathways account is created in the state
treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for programs
in chapter 28B.12 RCW (state work-study), chapter 28B.50 RCW
(opportunity grant), RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award), RCW
28B.76.670 (Washington award for vocational excellence), chapter 28B.92
RCW (state need grant program), chapter 28B.101 RCW (educational
opportunity grant), chapter 28B.105 RCW (GET ready for math and science
scholarship), chapter 28B.117 RCW (passport to college promise),
chapter 28B.118 RCW (college bound scholarship), chapter 28B.119 RCW
(Washington promise scholarship), chapter 43.215 RCW (early childhood
education and assistance program), and RCW 43.330.280 (recruitment of
entrepreneurial researchers, innovation partnership zones and research
teams).

Sec. 3 RCW 67.70.240 and 2009 c 500 s 11 and 2009 c 479 s 44 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:
(1) For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery
tickets or shares;
(2) For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account
created by RCW 67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account
created by RCW 67.70.260;
(3) For purposes of making deposits into the education construction
fund created in RCW 43.135.045 and the Washington opportunity pathways
account created in section 2 of this act. On and after July 1,
((2004)) 2010, all deposits not otherwise obligated under this section
shall be placed in the ((education construction fund)) Washington
opportunity pathways account. Moneys in the state lottery account
deposited in the ((education construction fund)) Washington opportunity
pathways account are included in "general state revenues" under RCW
39.42.070;
(4) For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the county to
construct a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including
reasonably necessary preconstruction costs. Three million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during calendar year 1996.
During subsequent years, such distributions shall equal the prior
year's distributions increased by four percent. Distributions under
this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the construction
of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty years
after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;
(5) For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account,
created in RCW 43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW
43.99N.070, six million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during the calendar year 1998. During subsequent years,
such distribution shall equal the prior year's distributions increased
by four percent. No distribution may be made under this subsection
after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of the
bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this
subsection shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than
December 31, 2020;
(6) For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and
(7) For the payment of agent compensation.
The office of financial management shall require the allotment of
all expenses paid from the account and shall report to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives any changes
in the allotments.

Sec. 4 RCW 67.70.340 and 2009 c 576 s 2 and 2009 c 479 s 45 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that creating a shared game lottery
could result in less revenue being raised by the existing state lottery
ticket sales. The legislature further recognizes that the fund most
impacted by this potential event is the ((education construction))
Washington opportunity pathways account. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to use some of the proceeds from the shared game
lottery to make up the difference that the potential state lottery
revenue loss would have on the ((education construction)) Washington
opportunity pathways account. The legislature further intends to use
some of the proceeds from the shared game lottery to fund programs and
services related to problem and pathological gambling.
(2) The ((education construction)) Washington opportunity pathways
account is expected to receive one hundred two million dollars annually
from state lottery games other than the shared game lottery. For
fiscal year ((2003)) 2011 and thereafter, if the amount of lottery
revenues earmarked for the ((education construction)) Washington
opportunity pathways account is less than one hundred two million
dollars, the commission, after making the transfer required under
subsection (3) of this section, must transfer sufficient moneys from
revenues derived from the shared game lottery into the ((education
construction)) Washington opportunity pathways account to bring the
total revenue up to one hundred two million dollars.
(3)(a) The commission shall transfer, from revenue derived from the
shared game lottery, to the problem gambling account created in RCW
43.20A.892, an amount equal to the percentage specified in (b) of this
subsection of net receipts. For purposes of this subsection, "net
receipts" means the difference between (i) revenue received from the
sale of lottery tickets or shares and revenue received from the sale of
shared game lottery tickets or shares; and (ii) the sum of payments
made to winners.
(b) In fiscal year 2006, the percentage to be transferred to the
problem gambling account is one-tenth of one percent. In fiscal year
2007 and subsequent fiscal years, the percentage to be transferred to
the problem gambling account is thirteen one-hundredths of one percent.
(4) The commission shall transfer the remaining net revenues, if
any, derived from the shared game lottery "Powerball" authorized in RCW
67.70.044(1) after the transfers pursuant to this section into the
state general fund for the student achievement program under RCW
28A.505.220.
(5) The remaining net revenues, if any, in the shared game lottery
account after the transfers pursuant to this section shall be deposited
into the ((general fund)) Washington opportunity pathways account.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.135.045 and 2009 c 564 s 939 and 2009 c 479 s 37
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from
the education construction fund to the state general fund such amounts
as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall
be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each
school district.
(4) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 In consultation with independent experts and
in collaboration with the higher education coordinating board, the
state lottery commission shall upon the effective date of this section
develop and begin implementation of a strategy and plan for actively
marketing the state lottery as an essential contributor to Washington's
opportunity pathways. The commission shall report to the economic
development, higher education, and commerce committees of the
legislature on the key messages, components, performance objectives,
and anticipated revenue impacts of the strategy by September 1, 2010,
and by December 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The joint legislative audit and review
committee shall conduct a review of marketing and vendor expenditures
and incentive payment programs at the state lottery commission to
identify cost savings and efficiencies to maximize contributions to
beneficiaries under this act. This review shall include examination of
the following:
(1) The expenditures at the state lottery commission related to
marketing and vendors compared with ticket sales. This review shall
include an analysis of: Marketing expenses for fiscal years 2005 to
2010 and the impact on ticket sales; the impact to sales of tickets
from the change in lottery beneficiaries provided in this act from the
education construction fund to the Washington opportunity pathways
account; and the competitive bidding process for vendors in Washington.
In its final report on this subject, due to the legislature by November
2010, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall provide:
A description of the competitive contracting processes for marketing
services and vendors, and any marketing programs or expenditures funded
through the lottery administrative account; an all-state survey of
marketing and vendor contractors for other state lotteries;
identification of whether there are duplicative or unproductive
marketing activities; identification of whether savings may occur from
changing vendors; and an analysis of marketing expenses and ticket
sales for fiscal year 2000 through the months of fiscal year 2011 for
which data are available.
(2) The incentive payment program for employees at the state
lottery commission. This review shall include an analysis of the
state's laws, policies, procedures, and practices as they relate to
incentive payments. In its final report on this subject, due to the
legislature by November 2010, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall provide: A description of how the incentive payment
program at the state lottery commission operates, and comparison to
best practices for outcome-based performance payments.

--- END ---