BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.029 and 2004 c 167 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) An institution of higher education may exercise
independently those powers otherwise granted to the director of general
administration in chapter 43.19 RCW in connection with the purchase and
disposition of all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed
for the support, maintenance, and use of the respective institution of
higher education.
(b) Property disposition policies followed by institutions of
higher education shall be consistent with policies followed by the
department of general administration.
(c) Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of
higher education shall be in compliance with chapters 39.19, 39.29, and
43.03 RCW, and RCW 43.19.1901, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1917,
43.19.1937, 43.19.534, 43.19.685, 43.19.700 through 43.19.704, and
43.19.560 through 43.19.637.
(d) Purchases under chapter 39.29, 43.19, or 43.105 RCW by
institutions of higher education may be made by using contracts for
materials, supplies, services, or equipment negotiated or entered into
by, for, or through group purchasing organizations.
(e) The community and technical colleges shall comply with RCW
43.19.450.
(f) Except for the University of Washington, institutions of higher
education shall comply with RCW 43.41.310, 43.41.290, and 43.41.350.
(g) If an institution of higher education can satisfactorily
demonstrate to the director of the office of financial management that
the cost of compliance is greater than the value of benefits from any
of the following statutes, then it shall be exempt from them: RCW
43.19.685; 43.19.534; and 43.19.637.
(h) Any institution of higher education that chooses to exercise
independent purchasing authority for a commodity or group of
commodities shall notify the director of general administration.
Thereafter the director of general administration shall not be required
to provide those services for that institution for the duration of the
general administration contract term for that commodity or group of
commodities.
(2) The council of presidents and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall convene its correctional industries business
development advisory committee, and work collaboratively with
correctional industries, to:
(a) Reaffirm purchasing criteria and ensure that quality, service,
and timely delivery result in the best value for expenditure of state
dollars;
(b) Update the approved list of correctional industries products
from which higher education shall purchase; and
(c) Develop recommendations on ways to continue to build
correctional industries' business with institutions of higher
education.
(3) Higher education and correctional industries shall develop a
plan to build higher education business with correctional industries to
increase higher education purchases of correctional industries
products, based upon the criteria established in subsection (2) of this
section. The plan shall include the correctional industries'
production and sales goals for higher education and an approved list of
products from which higher education institutions shall purchase, based
on the criteria established in subsection (2) of this section. Higher
education and correctional industries shall report to the legislature
regarding the plan and its implementation no later than January 30,
2005.
(4) Institutions of higher education shall set as a target to
contract, beginning not later than June 30, 2006, to purchase one
percent of the total goods and services required by the institutions
each year produced or provided in whole or in part from class II inmate
work programs operated by the department of corrections. Institutions
of higher education shall set as a target to contract, beginning not
later than June 30, 2008, to purchase two percent of the total goods
and services required by the institutions each year produced or
provided in whole or in part from class II inmate work programs
operated by the department of corrections.
(5) An institution of higher education may exercise independently
those powers otherwise granted to the public printer in chapter 43.78
RCW in connection with the production or purchase of any printing and
binding needed by the respective institution of higher education.
Purchasing policies and procedures followed by institutions of higher
education shall be in compliance with chapter 39.19 RCW. Any
institution of higher education that chooses to exercise independent
printing production or purchasing authority shall notify the public
printer. Thereafter the public printer shall not be required to
provide those services for that institution.

--- END ---