BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.08.063 and 2005 c 95 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior
court; in the county of Skagit, four judges of the superior court; in
the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court; in the
county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the county of
Yakima, ((eight)) nine judges of the superior court; in the county of
Adams, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, three
judges of the superior court.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The additional judicial position created by
section 1 of this act in Yakima county becomes effective only if the
county through its legislative authority documents its approval of the
additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county
funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of such
additional judicial position as provided by statute.

--- END ---