BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.34.060 and 2007 c 413 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or
26.44.050 shall be immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken
by a relative of the child in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070
shall be placed in shelter care only when permitted under RCW
13.34.055. No child may be held longer than seventy-two hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after such child is taken
into custody unless a court order has been entered for continued
shelter care. In no case may a child who is taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050, or 26.44.050 be detained in a
secure detention facility.
(2)(a) Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that the
efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, priority
placement for a child in shelter care, pending a court hearing, shall
be with any person described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) or 13.34.130(1)(b).
The person must be willing and available to care for the child and be
able to meet any special needs of the child and the court must find
that such placement is in the best interests of the child. The person
must be willing to facilitate the child's visitation with siblings, if
such visitation is part of the supervising agency's plan or is ordered
by the court.
(b) If a child is not initially placed with a relative or other
suitable person requested by the parent pursuant to this section, the
supervising agency shall make an effort within available resources to
place the child with a relative or other suitable person requested by
the parent on the next business day after the child is taken into
custody.
(c) The supervising agency shall document its effort to place the
child with a relative or other suitable person requested by the parent
pursuant to this section. Nothing within this subsection (2)
establishes an entitlement to services or a right to a particular
placement.
(d) When the parent requests relative placement, there is a
presumption that the placement is in the best interests of the child as
long as the placement will not impede reasonable efforts to reunify.
The department has the burden to overcome the presumption by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(3) Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this
section, the supervising agency may authorize evaluations of the
child's physical or emotional condition, routine medical and dental
examination and care, and all necessary emergency care.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.34.130 and 2009 c 520 s 27, 2009 c 491 s 2, and
2009 c 397 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
If, after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has
been proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is
dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 after consideration of
the social study prepared pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a
disposition hearing has been held pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court
shall enter an order of disposition pursuant to this section.
(1) The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the
case:
(a) Order a disposition other than removal of the child from his or
her home, which shall provide a program designed to alleviate the
immediate danger to the child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child
has already suffered, and to aid the parents so that the child will not
be endangered in the future. In determining the disposition, the court
should choose services to assist the parents in maintaining the child
in the home, including housing assistance, if appropriate, that least
interfere with family autonomy and are adequate to protect the child.
(b)(i) Order the child to be removed from his or her home and into
the custody, control, and care of a relative or other suitable person,
the department, or a supervising agency for supervision of the child's
placement.
(ii) Absent good cause, the department or supervising agency shall
follow the wishes of the parent regarding placement of the child as
provided in RCW 13.34.260.
(iii) If the parent requests the relative placement, there is a
presumption that the placement is in the best interests of the child as
long as the placement does not impede reasonable efforts to reunify.
The department has the burden of overcoming the presumption by a
preponderance of evidence.
(iv) If the child is not placed with a relative as requested by the
parent, the department or supervising agency has the authority to place
the child, subject to review and approval by the court (((i))) (A) with
a relative as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), (((ii))) (B) in the home
of another suitable person if the child or family has a preexisting
relationship with that person, and the person has completed all
required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to
the department or supervising agency to be suitable and competent to
provide care for the child, or (((iii))) (C) in a foster family home or
group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW. ((Absent
good cause, the department or supervising agency shall follow the
wishes of the natural parent regarding the placement of the child in
accordance with RCW 13.34.260.))
(v) The department or supervising agency may only place a child
with a person not related to the child as defined in RCW
74.15.020(2)(a) when the court finds that such placement is in the best
interest of the child. Unless there is reasonable cause to believe
that the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized
or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, the
child shall be placed with a person who is: (A) Related to the child
as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) with whom the child has a
relationship and is comfortable; or (B) a suitable person as described
in this subsection (1)(b); and (C) willing, appropriate, and available
to care for the child. The court shall consider the child's existing
relationships and attachments when determining placement.
(2) Placement of the child with a relative or other suitable person
as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be given
preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be
made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's
home and to make it possible for the child to return home, specifying
the services, including housing assistance, that have been provided to
the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and
that preventive services have been offered or provided and have failed
to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health,
safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the
home, and that:
(a) There is no parent or guardian available to care for such
child;
(b) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take
custody of the child; or
(c) The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a
manifest danger exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or
neglect if the child is not removed from the home and an order under
RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the child from danger.
(3) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court shall consider
whether it is in a child's best interest to be placed with, have
contact with, or have visits with siblings.
(a) There shall be a presumption that such placement, contact, or
visits are in the best interests of the child provided that:
(i) The court has jurisdiction over all siblings subject to the
order of placement, contact, or visitation pursuant to petitions filed
under this chapter or the parents of a child for whom there is no
jurisdiction are willing to agree; and
(ii) There is no reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of any child subject to the order of placement,
contact, or visitation would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite
the parent and child would be hindered by such placement, contact, or
visitation. In no event shall parental visitation time be reduced in
order to provide sibling visitation.
(b) The court may also order placement, contact, or visitation of
a child with a step-brother or step-sister provided that in addition to
the factors in (a) of this subsection, the child has a relationship and
is comfortable with the step-sibling.
(4) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and placed into
nonparental or nonrelative care, the court shall order a placement that
allows the child to remain in the same school he or she attended prior
to the initiation of the dependency proceeding when such a placement is
practical and in the child's best interest.
(5) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that
a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be
filed if the requirements of RCW 13.34.132 are met.
(6) If there is insufficient information at the time of the
disposition hearing upon which to base a determination regarding the
suitability of a proposed placement with a relative or other suitable
person, the child shall remain in foster care and the court shall
direct the department or supervising agency to conduct necessary
background investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report
the results of such investigation to the court within thirty days.
However, if such relative or other person appears otherwise suitable
and competent to provide care and treatment, the criminal history
background check need not be completed before placement, but as soon as
possible after placement. Any placements with relatives or other
suitable persons, pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon
cooperation by the relative or other suitable person with the agency
case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders
regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any other
conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case plan or
court order shall be grounds for removal of the child from the
relative's or other suitable person's home, subject to review by the
court.

--- END ---