BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city with a population greater
than five hundred thousand may, by simple majority vote, impose or
authorize some or all of the following revenue sources in order to fund
a highway improvement as defined in this section:
(a) A sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of up to
0.1 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or value
of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the occurrence of
any taxable event in the city;
(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW
82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the
city. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as
defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined
under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;
(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;
(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060;
(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.010; and
(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030.
(2) The city legislative authority may contract with the department
of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration and
collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in this section.
(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes,
at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not
intended to be altered by this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "highway improvement" means a
deep bore tunnel highway project with project costs in excess of one
billion dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department may not enter into contracts applicable to the deep
bore tunnel project identified in RCW 47.01.402, unless project cost
overruns are secured through action by a legislative authority
authorizing or imposing revenue sources under section 1 of this act
that are directed toward covering the excess costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.14.430 and 2006 c 311 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a sales and use tax of up to 0.1 percent of the
selling price or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.
The tax authorized by this section is in addition to the tax authorized
by RCW 82.14.030 and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the taxing district. Motor
vehicles are exempt from the sales and use tax imposed under this
subsection.
(2) If approved by the majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may impose a tax on the use of a motor vehicle within a
regional transportation investment district. The tax applies to those
persons who reside within the regional transportation investment
district. The rate of the tax may not exceed 0.1 percent of the value
of the motor vehicle. The tax authorized by this subsection is in
addition to the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030 and must be imposed
and collected at the time a taxable event under RCW 82.08.020(1) or
82.12.020 takes place. All revenue received under this subsection must
be deposited in the local sales and use tax account and distributed to
the regional transportation investment district according to RCW
82.14.050. The following provisions apply to the use tax in this
subsection:
(a) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
shall collect the use tax from the buyer using the collection
provisions of RCW 82.08.050.
(b) Where persons are taxable under chapter 82.12 RCW, the use tax
must be collected using the provisions of RCW 82.12.045.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but
does not include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW
46.04.180 and 46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in
RCW 46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010.
(d) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(e) The value of a motor vehicle must be determined under RCW
82.12.010.
(f) Except as specifically stated in this subsection (2), chapters
82.12 and 82.32 RCW apply to the use tax. The use tax is a local tax
imposed under the authority of chapter 82.14 RCW, and chapter 82.14 RCW
applies fully to the use tax.
(3) In addition to fulfilling the notice requirements under RCW
82.14.055(1), and unless waived by the department, a regional
transportation investment district ((shall)) must provide the
department ((of revenue)) with digital mapping and legal descriptions
of areas in which the tax will be collected.
(4) The authority to impose taxes under this section, along with
the administrative provisions of this section, also applies to a city
legislative authority acting by simple majority vote under section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.80.100 and 2002 c 56 s 408 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon approval of a majority of the voters within its boundaries
voting on the ballot proposition, a regional transportation investment
district may set and impose an annual local option vehicle license fee,
or a schedule of fees based upon the age of the vehicle, of up to one
hundred dollars per motor vehicle registered within the boundaries of
the region on every motor vehicle. As used in this section "motor
vehicle" has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not
include farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181, off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW
46.09.020, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.10.010. Vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the international registration
plan are exempt from the annual local option vehicle license fee set
forth in this section. The department of licensing ((shall)) must
administer and collect this fee on behalf of regional transportation
investment districts and remit this fee to the custody of the state
treasurer for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.
(2) The local option vehicle license fee applies only when renewing
a vehicle registration, and is effective upon the registration renewal
date as provided by the department of licensing.
(3) A regional transportation investment district imposing the
local option vehicle license fee or initiating an exemption process
((shall)) must enter into a contract with the department of licensing.
The contract must contain provisions that fully recover the costs to
the department of licensing for collection and administration of the
fee.
(4) A regional transportation investment district imposing the
local option fee ((shall)) must delay the effective date of the local
option vehicle license fee imposed by this section at least six months
from the date of the final certification of the approval election to
allow the department of licensing to implement the administration and
collection of or exemption from the fee.
(5) The authority to impose taxes under this section, along with
the administrative provisions of this section, also applies to a city
legislative authority acting by simple majority vote under section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 81.100.060 and 2006 c 318 s 2 and 2006 c 311 s 15 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A county with a population of one million or more and a county
with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than one
million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million or
more, having within their boundaries existing or planned high occupancy
vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or a regional transportation
investment district, but only to the extent that the surcharge has not
already been imposed by the county, may, with voter approval, impose a
local surcharge of not more than three-tenths of one percent in the
case of a county, or eight-tenths of one percent in the case of a
regional transportation investment district, of the value on vehicles
registered to a person residing within the county or investment
district and not more than 13.64 percent on the state sales and use
taxes paid under the rate in RCW 82.08.020(2) on retail car rentals
within the county or investment district. A county may impose the
surcharge only to the extent that it has not been imposed by the
district. No surcharge may be imposed on vehicles licensed under RCW
46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds
or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090.
(2) Counties or investment districts imposing a surcharge under
this section ((shall)) must contract, before the effective date of the
resolution or ordinance imposing a surcharge, administration and
collection to the state department of licensing, and department of
revenue, as appropriate, which ((shall)) must deduct an amount, as
provided by contract, for administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department. All administrative provisions in chapters
82.03, 82.32, and 82.44 RCW, as existing on January 1, 2006, ((shall))
are, insofar as they are applicable to motor vehicle excise taxes,
((be)) applicable to surcharges imposed under this section before June
7, 2006. Motor vehicles subject to the local surcharge authorized in
this section ((shall)) must be administered in accordance with ((this
act)) chapter 318, Laws of 2006 if the surcharge is first imposed on or
after June 7, 2006. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03,
82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW ((shall)) are, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, ((be)) applicable to
surcharges imposed under this section.
(3) If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.030 is also imposed, the
total proceeds from tax sources imposed under this section and RCW
81.100.030 each year ((shall)) may not exceed the maximum amount which
could be collected under this section.
(4) The authority to impose taxes under this section, along with
the administrative provisions of this section, also applies to a city
legislative authority acting by simple majority vote under section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.80.010 and 2003 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Distributor" means every person who imports, refines,
manufactures, produces, or compounds motor vehicle fuel and special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and 82.38.020, respectively, and sells
or distributes the fuel into a county;
(b) "Person" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.030.
(2) Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy,
by approval of its legislative body and a majority of the registered
voters of the county voting on the proposition at a general or special
election, additional excise taxes equal to ten percent of the statewide
motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special
fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the
county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under this
section must be held not more than twelve months before the date on
which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the
proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The county's
authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The
additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights
of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed
tax shall not be levied less than one month from the date the election
results are certified by the county election officer. The commencement
date for the levy of any tax under this section shall be the first day
of January, April, July, or October.
(3) The local option motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon of motor
vehicle fuel and on each gallon of special fuel is imposed upon the
distributor of the fuel.
(4) A taxable event for the purposes of this section occurs upon
the first distribution of the fuel within the boundaries of a county to
a retail outlet, bulk fuel user, or ultimate user of the fuel.
(5) All administrative provisions in chapters 82.01, 82.03, and
82.32 RCW, insofar as they are applicable, apply to local option fuel
taxes imposed under this section.
(6) Before the effective date of the imposition of the fuel taxes
under this section, a county shall contract with the department of
revenue for the administration and collection of the taxes. The
contract must provide that a percentage amount, not to exceed one
percent of the taxes imposed under this section, will be deposited into
the local tax administration account created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The department of revenue may spend money from this
account, upon appropriation, for the administration of the local taxes
imposed under this section.
(7) The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying
county and cities contained therein the proceeds of the additional
excise taxes collected under this section, after the deductions for
payments and expenditures as provided in RCW 46.68.090(1) (a) and (b)
and under the conditions and limitations provided in RCW 82.80.080.
(8) The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this
section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070.
(9) A county may not levy the tax under this section if they are
levying the tax in RCW 82.80.110 or if they are a member of a regional
transportation investment district levying the tax in RCW 82.80.120.
(10) The authority to impose taxes under this section, along with
the administrative provisions of this section, also applies to a city
legislative authority acting by simple majority vote under section 1 of
this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 81.100.030 and 2002 c 56 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) A county with a population of one million or more, or a
county with a population of from two hundred ten thousand to less than
one million that is adjoining a county with a population of one million
or more, and having within its boundaries existing or planned high
occupancy vehicle lanes on the state highway system, or a regional
transportation investment district for capital improvements, but only
to the extent that the tax has not already been imposed by the county,
may, with voter approval impose an excise tax of up to two dollars per
employee per month on all employers or any class or classes of
employers, public and private, including the state located in the
agency's jurisdiction, measured by the number of full-time equivalent
employees. In no event may the total taxes imposed under this section
exceed two dollars per employee per month for any single employer. The
county or investment district imposing the tax authorized in this
section may provide for exemptions from the tax to such educational,
cultural, health, charitable, or religious organizations as it deems
appropriate.
(b) Counties or investment districts may contract with the state
department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of the tax. ((Such)) The contract ((shall)) must
provide for deduction of an amount for administration and collection
expenses.
(2) The tax ((shall)) does not apply to employment of a person when
the employer has paid for at least half of the cost of a transit pass
issued by a transit agency for that employee, valid for the period for
which the tax would otherwise be owed.
(3)(a) A county or investment district ((shall)) must adopt rules
that exempt from all or a portion of the tax any employer that has
entered into an agreement with the county or investment district that
is designed to reduce the proportion of employees who drive in single-occupant vehicles during peak commuting periods in proportion to the
degree that the agreement is designed to meet the goals for the
employer's location adopted under RCW 81.100.040.
(b) The agreement ((shall)) must include a list of specific actions
that the employer will undertake to be entitled to the exemption.
Employers having an exemption from all or part of the tax through this
subsection shall annually certify to the county or investment district
that the employer is fulfilling the terms of the agreement. The
exemption continues as long as the employer is in compliance with the
agreement.
(c) If the tax authorized in RCW 81.100.060 is also imposed, the
total proceeds from both tax sources each year ((shall)) may not exceed
the maximum amount which could be collected under RCW 81.100.060.
(4) The authority to impose taxes under this section, along with
the administrative provisions of this section, also applies to a city
legislative authority acting by simple majority vote under section 1 of
this act.

--- END ---