BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21F.010 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that energy drives the entire modern
economy from petroleum for vehicles to electricity to light homes and
businesses. The legislature further finds that the nation and the
world have started the transition to a clean energy economy, with
significant improvements in energy efficiency and investments in new
clean and renewable energy resources and technologies.
(2) The legislature finds and declares that it is the continuing
purpose of state government, consistent with other essential
considerations of state policy, to foster wise and efficient energy use
and to promote energy self-sufficiency through the use of indigenous
and renewable energy sources, consistent with the promotion of reliable
energy sources, the general welfare, and the protection of
environmental quality.
(3) The legislature further declares that the goals of the state's
energy strategy are to:
(a) Maintain competitive energy prices that have been an
instrumental part of our state's economic success to date;
(b) Increase competitiveness by fostering a clean energy economy
and jobs through business and workforce development; and
(c) Meet the state's obligations to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21F.025 and 2009 c 565 s 27 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) "Assistant director" means the assistant director of the
department of commerce responsible for energy policy activities;
(2) "Department" means the department of commerce;
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce;
(4) "Distributor" means any person, private corporation,
partnership, individual proprietorship, utility, including investor-owned utilities, municipal utility, public utility district, joint
operating agency, or cooperative, which engages in or is authorized to
engage in the activity of generating, transmitting, or distributing
energy in this state;
(5) "Energy" means petroleum or other liquid fuels; natural or
synthetic fuel gas; solid carbonaceous fuels; fissionable nuclear
material; electricity; solar radiation; geothermal resources;
hydropower; organic waste products; wind; tidal activity; any other
substance or process used to produce heat, light, or motion; or the
savings from nongeneration technologies, including conservation or
improved efficiency in the usage of any of the sources described in
this subsection;
(6) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, joint operating agency, or any other
entity, public or private, however organized; and
(7) "State energy strategy" means the document ((and energy policy
direction)) developed ((under section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991
including any related appendices)) and updated by the department as
required in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21F RCW
to read as follows:
To meet the state energy strategy goals as specified in RCW
43.21F.010, it is the policy of the state of Washington to:
(1) Pursue all cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation as
the state's preferred energy resource;
(2) Ensure that the state's energy system meets the health,
welfare, and economic needs of its citizens with particular emphasis on
meeting the needs of low-income and vulnerable populations;
(3) Maintain and enhance economic competitiveness by ensuring an
affordable and reliable supply of energy resources and by supporting
clean energy technology innovation, access to clean energy markets
worldwide, and clean energy business and workforce development;
(4) Reduce dependence on fossil fuel energy sources through
improved efficiency and development of cleaner energy sources, such as
bioenergy, natural gas, and other low-carbon energy sources;
(5) Improve efficiency of transportation energy use through
advances in vehicle technology, increased system efficiencies,
development of electricity, biofuels, and other clean fuels, and land
use policies that improve transportation choices;
(6) Meet the state's statutory climate change goals and targets and
other environmental requirements as the state develops and uses energy
resources;
(7) Build on the advantage provided by the state's clean regional
electrical grid by expanding and integrating additional carbon-free
generation and improving the transmission capacity serving the state;
(8) Make state government a model for energy efficiency, use of
clean and renewable energy, and greenhouse gas-neutral operations;
(9) During energy shortage emergencies, give priority in the
allocation of energy resources to maintaining the public health,
safety, and welfare of the state's citizens and industry in order to
minimize adverse impacts on their physical, social, and economic well-being;
(10) Develop and disseminate impartial and objective energy
information and analysis, while taking full advantage of the
capabilities of the state's institutions of higher education;
(11) Actively seek to maximize federal and other nonstate funding
and support to the state for energy efficiency, renewable energy,
emerging energy technologies, and other activities of benefit to the
state's overall energy future; and
(12) Ensure that the state energy strategy provides primary
guidance for implementation of the state's energy policy including
applicable statutory policies and goals relating to energy supply and
use.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.21F.090 and 1996 c 186 s 106 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) By December 1, 2010, and every five years thereafter, the
department ((shall review the state energy strategy as developed under
section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991, periodically with the guidance of
an advisory committee. For each review, an advisory committee shall be
established with a membership resembling as closely as possible the
original energy strategy advisory committee specified under section 1,
chapter 201, Laws of 1991. Upon completion of a public hearing
regarding the advisory committee's advice and recommendations for
revisions to the energy strategy, a written report shall be conveyed by
the department to the governor and the appropriate legislative
committees. Any advisory committee established under this section
shall be dissolved within three months after their written report is
conveyed.)) of commerce shall produce a fully updated and revised state
energy strategy and implementation report with the guidance of an
advisory committee. The strategy shall, to the maximum extent
feasible, examine the state's entire energy system and provide specific
recommendations for both further development of state analytical
capabilities and policies as well as implementation recommendations.
The strategy may also provide recommendations for legislation necessary
to facilitate implementation of the strategy to the governor and
legislature. In addition, the department shall review related
processes and documents relevant to a state energy strategy including
but not limited to prior state energy strategies, the work of the clean
energy leadership council, the climate advisory and action teams, the
evergreen jobs committee, and the northwest power and conservation
council. The strategy must build upon and be consistent with all
relevant and applicable statutorily authorized energy and climate
policies, goals, and programs, and may include recommendations for
legislation.
(b) The department may periodically review and update the state
energy strategy as necessary. The department shall engage an advisory
committee as required in this section when updating the strategy.
(c) The director shall appoint an advisory committee with a
membership reflecting a balance of the interests in energy generation,
distribution, and uses, including: Residential, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural users; electric and natural gas utilities,
both consumer-owned and investor-owned; petroleum and natural gas
industries; local governments; civic and environmental organizations;
key public agencies; and other interested stakeholders. Upon
completion of a public hearing regarding the advisory committee's
advice and recommendations for revisions to the energy strategy, a
written report must be conveyed by the department to the governor and
the appropriate legislative committees. Any advisory committee
established under this section must be dissolved within three months
after the written report is conveyed.
(2) To assist in updates of the state energy strategy, the
department of commerce shall actively seek both in-kind and financial
support for this process from the United States department of energy
and its national laboratories, other public agencies, private sector
entities, foundations, and other energy organizations. The department
of commerce shall develop a work plan for update of the strategy that
reflects the levels of activities and deliverables commensurate with
the level of funding and in-kind support available from state and
nonstate sources.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21F.055 and 1996 c 186 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall not intervene in any ((regulatory))
adjudicative proceeding before the Washington utilities and
transportation commission ((or)), but it may seek leave to submit
amicus curiae briefs on matters relevant to those proceedings. The
department may not intervene in proceedings of utilities not regulated
by the commission. Nothing in this chapter abrogates or diminishes the
functions, powers, or duties of the energy facility site evaluation
council pursuant to chapter 80.50 RCW, the utilities and transportation
commission pursuant to Title 80 RCW, or other state or local agencies
established by law.
The department shall avoid duplication of activity with other state
agencies and officers and other persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.21F.015 (State policy) and 1994 c 207 s 3 & 1981 c 295
s 1.

--- END ---