BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The following residential habilitation centers are permanently
established to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; Fircrest School,
located at Seattle, King county; and Frances Haddon Morgan Children's
Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county.)) The department is
authorized to provide residential and habilitation services, through
state residential habilitation centers, to persons with developmental
disabilities who are found eligible and in need of the level of care
provided by a nursing facility or intermediate care facility for the
mentally retarded, as those terms are described by federal law.

--- END ---