BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.450 and 2009 c 551 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing
proposition to the county voters at a primary or general election and,
if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose
a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which
the proposed sales and use tax will be used. ((Funds raised under this
tax shall not supplant existing funds used for these purposes, except
as follows: Up to one hundred percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2010; up to eighty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2011; up to sixty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2012; up to
forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year
2013; and up to twenty percent may be used to supplant existing funding
in calendar year 2014. For purposes of this subsection, existing funds
means the actual operating expenditures for the calendar year in which
the ballot measure is approved by voters. Actual operating
expenditures excludes lost federal funds, lost or expired state grants
or loans, extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions beyond the control of the county or city receiving
the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.)) The rate
of tax under this section may not exceed three-tenths of one percent of
the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article
used, in the case of a use tax.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county.
(3) The retail sale or use of motor vehicles, and the lease of
motor vehicles for up to the first thirty-six months of the lease, are
exempt from tax imposed under this section.
(4) One-third of all money received under this section must be used
solely for criminal justice purposes, fire protection purposes, or
both. For the purposes of this subsection, "criminal justice purposes"
has the same meaning as provided in RCW 82.14.340.
(5) Money received under this section must be shared between the
county and the cities as follows: Sixty percent must be retained by
the county and forty percent must be distributed on a per capita basis
to cities in the county.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.14.340 and 1995 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may fix and impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter,
provided that such sales and use tax is subject to repeal by
referendum, using the procedures provided in RCW 82.14.036. The
referendum procedure provided in RCW 82.14.036 is the exclusive method
for subjecting any county sales and use tax ordinance or resolution to
a referendum vote.
(2) The tax authorized in this section ((shall be)) is in addition
to any other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
such county. The rate of tax ((shall)) equals one-tenth of one percent
of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the
article used (in the case of a use tax).
(3) When distributing moneys collected under this section, the
state treasurer ((shall)) must distribute ten percent of the moneys to
the county in which the tax was collected. The remainder of the moneys
collected under this section ((shall)) must be distributed to the
county and the cities within the county ratably based on population as
last determined by the office of financial management. In making the
distribution based on population, the county ((shall)) must receive
that proportion that the unincorporated population of the county bears
to the total population of the county and each city shall receive that
proportion that the city incorporated population bears to the total
county population.
(4) Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section
((shall)) must be expended exclusively for criminal justice purposes
((and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding)).
Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially
assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances
where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which
includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic
violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined
in RCW 70.123.020. ((Existing funding for purposes of this subsection
is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for
criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control
of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.))
(5) In the expenditure of funds for criminal justice purposes as
provided in this section, cities and counties, or any combination
thereof, are expressly authorized to participate in agreements,
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to jointly expend funds for criminal
justice purposes of mutual benefit. Such criminal justice purposes of
mutual benefit include, but are not limited to, the construction,
improvement, and expansion of jails, court facilities, and juvenile
justice facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.46.113 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any county, city, or town ((which)) that collects a tax on gambling
activities authorized pursuant to RCW 9.46.110 ((shall)) must use the
revenue from such tax primarily for the purpose of ((enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter by the county, city or town law enforcement
agency)) public safety.

Sec. 4 2009 c 551 s 12 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
Section((s 1 and)) 2 of this act expires January 1, ((2015)) 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires January 1,
2014.

--- END ---