BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.250 and 2007 c 379 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every person who:
(a) Manufactures, sells, ((or)) disposes of, or possesses any
instrument or weapon of the kind usually known as slung shot, sand
club, or metal knuckles((, or));
(b) Manufactures, sells, disposes of, or possesses a spring blade
knife, or any knife the blade of which is automatically released by a
spring mechanism or other mechanical device, or any knife having a
blade which opens, or falls, or is ejected into position by the force
of gravity, or by an outward, downward, or centrifugal thrust or
movement;
(((b))) (c) Furtively carries with intent to conceal any dagger,
dirk, pistol, or other dangerous weapon; or
(((c))) (d) Uses any contrivance or device for suppressing the
noise of any firearm,
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) Subsection (1)(((a))) (b) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The possession of a spring blade knife by a law enforcement
officer while the officer:
(i) Is on official duty; or
(ii) Is transporting the knife to or from the place where the knife
is stored when the officer is not on official duty; or
(b) The storage of a spring blade knife by a law enforcement
officer.
(3) Subsection (1)(d) of this section does not apply to the use of
any contrivance or device for suppressing the noise of a firearm by a
law enforcement officer while on official duty. However, this
subsection only applies to the use of contrivances or devices that have
been legally registered in accordance with federal law.

--- END ---