BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.04.240 and 1999 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, a county, city, town, any other public entity,
and any private entity under the public-private transportation
initiatives authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW, that provides transit,
high-speed ground transportation, high capacity transportation service,
ferry service, toll facilities, or other public transportation service
or facilities may only use personally identifiable information obtained
from the use of electronic toll payments, transit passes, or other fare
media such as magnetic strip cards or stored value cards for billing
purposes. This information may not be used to track or monitor
individual use of the public transportation facilities or service,
except for billing purposes and to provide statistical compilations and
reports that do not identify an individual.
(2) The department, a county, city, town, and any other public
entity that provides transit, high-speed ground transportation, high
capacity transportation service, ferry service, or other public
transportation service or facilities may use video cameras or other
devices to record events on public transportation facilities, including
on buses, trains, and streetcars, for the purposes of promoting public
safety and assisting in crime or accident investigations. The
recordings may also be used for internal training purposes by the
recording entity. However, such data, whether audio or video, is not
subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, except that such
data may be disclosed to the news media when reporting on public
transportation or public safety.

--- END ---