BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.280.020 and 2008 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning September 1, 2009, a person shall not engage in or
conduct, or advertise or hold himself or herself out as engaging in or
conducting, the business of or acting in the capacity of a home
inspector within this state without first obtaining a license as
provided in this chapter.
(2)(a) Any person performing the duties of a home inspector on June
12, 2008, has until July 1, 2010, to meet the licensing requirements of
this chapter.
(b) However, if a person performing the duties of a home inspector
on June 12, 2008, has proof that he or she has worked as a home
inspector for at least two years and has conducted at least one hundred
home inspections, he or she may apply to the board before ((September
1, 2009)) July 1, 2010, for licensure without meeting the instruction
and training requirements of this chapter.
(3) The director may begin issuing licenses under this section
beginning on July 1, 2009.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.280.110 and 2008 c 119 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As a condition of renewing a license under this chapter, a
licensed home inspector shall present satisfactory evidence to the
board of having completed the continuing education requirements
provided for in this section.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each applicant
for license renewal shall complete at least twenty-four hours of
instruction in courses approved by the board every two years.
(b) An applicant for license renewal who applied for a license
under RCW 18.280.020(2)(b) and has enrolled in and paid for classes to
meet the instruction requirements of RCW 18.280.070(2) before the
effective date of this section, is not required to meet continuing
education requirements until the applicant renews his or her license in
2016 or thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.280.060 and 2008 c 119 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board has the following authority in administering this
chapter:
(1) To establish rules, including board organization and assignment
of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by the
director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for licensing
applicants as provided in this chapter;
(3) To approve programs of classroom instruction that may be taken
by applicants to meet their qualifications of licensure. In approving
programs of classroom instruction, the board must consult with
community and technical colleges in eastern Washington in order to
develop qualified classroom instruction programs in that area. If the
board has not approved programs of classroom instruction in eastern
Washington by December 1, 2010, it must report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature why it has not done so and identify
barriers to providing classroom instruction in eastern Washington;
(4) To approve the method of administration of examinations
required by this chapter or by rule as established by the director;
(((4))) (5) To approve the content of or recognition of
examinations prepared by other entities for adoption by the director;
(((5))) (6) To set the time and place of examinations with the
approval of the director; and
(((6))) (7) To establish and review standards of professional
conduct, practice, and ethics for adoption by the director. These
standards must address what constitutes certain fire and safety hazards
as used in RCW 18.280.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---