BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.280.060 and 2008 c 119 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board has the following authority in administering this
chapter:
(1) To establish rules, including board organization and assignment
of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by the
director;
(2) To establish the minimum qualifications for licensing
applicants as provided in this chapter;
(3) To approve programs of classroom instruction that may be taken
by applicants to meet their qualifications of licensure. Approved
programs must be offered in both eastern and western Washington;
(4) To approve the method of administration of examinations
required by this chapter or by rule as established by the director;
(((4))) (5) To approve the content of or recognition of
examinations prepared by other entities for adoption by the director;
(((5))) (6) To set the time and place of examinations with the
approval of the director; and
(((6))) (7) To establish and review standards of professional
conduct, practice, and ethics for adoption by the director. These
standards must address what constitutes certain fire and safety hazards
as used in RCW 18.280.030.

--- END ---