BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.27.540 and 2009 c 459 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The building code council shall adopt rules for electric
vehicle infrastructure requirements. Rules adopted by the state
building code council must consider applicable national and
international standards and be consistent with rules adopted under RCW
19.28.281.
(2) By July 1, 2012, the building code council must adopt rules for
new residential structures that require the installation of an
appropriate electrical outlet to charge electric vehicles at areas
commonly used for parking vehicles.

--- END ---