BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.320.160 (Prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
program -- Report) and 2009 c 386 s 1 & 2008 c 322 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.320.165 (Prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
program account) and 2009 c 386 s 2 & 2008 c 322 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.320.170 (Prevent or reduce owner-occupied foreclosure
program -- Households served) and 2009 c 386 s 3 & 2008 c 322 s 3; and
(4) 2009 c 386 s 5 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 No later than December 31, 2010, the state
treasurer shall transfer to the Washington financial education public-private partnership account the unexpended balance of the prevent or
reduce owner-occupied foreclosure program account as of the effective
date of this section.

--- END ---