BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.020 and 2009 c 479 s 66 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected as provided in
this chapter, a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling,
possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount equal to
((one and fifteen one-hundredths)) 12.125 cents per cigarette.
(2) ((An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to five hundred twenty-five one-thousandths of a cent per
cigarette. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the state general fund by the
twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount
equal to two and five one-hundredths cents per cigarette. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax shall be deposited
in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(4))) Wholesalers subject to the payment of this tax may, if they
wish, absorb five one-hundredths cents per cigarette of the tax and not
pass it on to purchasers without being in violation of this section or
any other act relating to the sale or taxation of cigarettes.
(((5))) (3) For purposes of this chapter, "possession" ((shall))
means both (a) physical possession by the purchaser and, (b) when
cigarettes are being transported to or held for the purchaser or his or
her designee by a person other than the purchaser, constructive
possession by the purchaser or his or her designee, which constructive
possession ((shall be)) is deemed to occur at the location of the
cigarettes being so transported or held.
(((6))) (4) In accordance with federal law and rules prescribed by
the department, an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian
tribe may purchase cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization under
the jurisdiction of the member's tribe for the member's own use exempt
from the applicable taxes imposed by this chapter. Except as provided
in subsection (((7))) (5) of this section, any person, who purchases
cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization and who is not an
enrolled member of the federally recognized Indian tribe within whose
jurisdiction the sale takes place, is not exempt from the applicable
taxes imposed by this chapter.
(((7))) (5) If the state enters into a cigarette tax contract or
agreement with a federally recognized Indian tribe under chapter 43.06
RCW, the terms of the contract or agreement ((shall)) take precedence
over any conflicting provisions of this chapter while the contract or
agreement is in effect.
(6) By July 1, 2011, and by July 1st of each year thereafter, the
state treasurer must transfer eighteen million dollars from the general
fund into the tobacco prevention and control account under RCW
43.79.480.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.24.026 and 2009 c 479 s 67 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW
82.24.020, there is imposed a tax in an amount equal to three cents per
cigarette.
(2) The revenue collected under this section ((shall)) must be
deposited as follows:
(a) ((28.5)) 16 percent ((shall)) must be deposited into the
general fund.
(b) The remainder ((shall)) must be deposited into the education
legacy trust account.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.26.010 and 2005 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Tobacco products" means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,
granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed, and other smoking
tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings,
cuttings and sweepings of tobacco, and other kinds and forms of
tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be suitable for chewing or
smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both for chewing and smoking, and
any other product, regardless of form, that contains tobacco and is
intended for human consumption or placement in the oral or nasal cavity
or absorption into the human body by any other means, but ((shall))
does not include cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010.
(2) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures and sells
tobacco products.
(3) "Distributor" means (a) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or causes to be
brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products
for sale, (b) any person who makes, manufactures, fabricates, or stores
tobacco products in this state for sale in this state, (c) any person
engaged in the business of selling tobacco products without this state
who ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this state, to
be sold by those retailers, (d) any person engaged in the business of
selling tobacco products in this state who handles for sale any tobacco
products that are within this state but upon which tax has not been
imposed.
(4) "Retailer" means any person engaged in the business of selling
tobacco products to ultimate consumers.
(5)(a) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter, in any
manner or by any means whatsoever, for a consideration, and includes
and means all sales made by any person.
(b) The term "sale" includes a gift by a person engaged in the
business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, promoting, or as
a means of evading the provisions of this chapter.
(6) "Business" means any trade, occupation, activity, or enterprise
engaged in for the purpose of selling or distributing tobacco products
in this state.
(7) "Place of business" means any place where tobacco products are
sold or where tobacco products are manufactured, stored, or kept for
the purpose of sale, including any vessel, vehicle, airplane, train, or
vending machine.
(8) "Retail outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco
products are sold to consumers.
(9) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(10) "Person" means any individual, receiver, administrator,
executor, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust, estate, firm,
copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, municipal corporation, the state and its departments
and institutions, political subdivision of the state of Washington,
corporation, limited liability company, association, society, any group
of individuals acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative,
fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise. The term excludes any person
immune from state taxation, including the United States or its
instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes and enrolled
tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(11) "Indian country" means the same as defined in chapter 82.24
RCW.
(12) "Actual price" means the total amount of consideration for
which tobacco products are sold, valued in money, whether received in
money or otherwise, including any charges by the seller necessary to
complete the sale such as charges for delivery, freight,
transportation, or handling.
(13) "Affiliated" means related in any way by virtue of any form or
amount of common ownership, control, operation, or management.
(14) "Board" means the liquor control board.
(15) "Cigar" means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape
and that is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective of whether
the tobacco is pure or flavored, adulterated or mixed with any other
ingredient, if the roll has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of
tobacco. "Cigar" does not include a cigarette.
(16) "Cigarette" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.24.010.
(17) "Manufacturer's representative" means a person hired by a
manufacturer to sell or distribute the manufacturer's tobacco products,
and includes employees and independent contractors.
(18)(a) "Taxable sales price" means:
(i) In the case of a taxpayer that is not affiliated with the
manufacturer, distributor, or other person from whom the taxpayer
purchased tobacco products, the actual price for which the taxpayer
purchased the tobacco products;
(ii) In the case of a taxpayer that purchases tobacco products from
an affiliated manufacturer, affiliated distributor, or other affiliated
person, and that sells those tobacco products to unaffiliated
distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate consumers, the actual
price for which that taxpayer sells those tobacco products to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers;
(iii) In the case of a taxpayer that sells tobacco products only to
affiliated distributors or affiliated retailers, the price, determined
as nearly as possible according to the actual price, that other
distributors sell similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers;
(iv) In the case of a taxpayer that is a manufacturer selling
tobacco products directly to ultimate consumers, the actual price for
which the taxpayer sells those tobacco products to ultimate consumers;
(v) In the case of a taxpayer that has acquired tobacco products
under a sale as defined in subsection (5)(b) of this section, the
price, determined as nearly as possible according to the actual price,
that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same tobacco products
or similar tobacco products of like quality and character to
unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or ultimate
consumers; or
(vi) In any case where (a)(i) through (v) of this subsection do not
apply, the price, determined as nearly as possible according to the
actual price, that the taxpayer or other distributors sell the same
tobacco products or similar tobacco products of like quality and
character to unaffiliated distributors, unaffiliated retailers, or
ultimate consumers.
(b) For purposes of (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection only,
"person" includes both persons as defined in subsection (10) of this
section and any person immune from state taxation, including the United
States or its instrumentalities, and federally recognized Indian tribes
and enrolled tribal members, conducting business within Indian country.
(c) The department may adopt rules regarding the determination of
taxable sales price under this subsection.
(19) "Taxpayer" means a person liable for the tax imposed by this
chapter.
(20) "Unaffiliated distributor" means a distributor that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the distributor has purchased tobacco products.
(21) "Unaffiliated retailer" means a retailer that is not
affiliated with the manufacturer, distributor, or other person from
whom the retailer has purchased tobacco products.
(22) "Moist snuff" means tobacco that is finely cut, ground, or
powdered; is not for smoking; and is intended to be placed in the oral,
but not the nasal, cavity. "Moist snuff" does not include capsular
smokeless tobacco.
(23) "Small cigar" means a cigar that weighs less than four one-thousandths of a pound.
(24) "Roll-your-own tobacco" has the meaning provided in 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5702 of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as existing on
January 1, 2010.
(25) "Capsular smokeless tobacco" means any product containing
tobacco that is intended or expected for oral consumption that does not
consist of loose tobacco and is offered in discrete single-dose or
single-use lozenges, pouches, pills, capsules, or other single-dose or
single-use units or in packages of such single-dose or single-use
units.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.26.020 and 2009 c 479 s 70 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected a tax upon the
sale, handling, or distribution of all tobacco products in this state
at the following rate:
(a) ((Seventy-five)) For cigars other than small cigars, the
greater of: Ninety-five percent of the taxable sales price of cigars
or the cigarette tax under chapter 82.24 RCW multiplied by five, but
not to exceed ((fifty cents)) an amount per cigar equal to the
cigarette tax under chapter 82.24 RCW multiplied by twenty; ((or))
(b) ((Seventy-five)) For all tobacco products except those covered
under separate provisions of this subsection, ninety-five percent of
the taxable sales price ((of all tobacco products that are not
cigars));
(c) For moist snuff, as established in this subsection (1)(c) and
computed on the net weight listed by the manufacturer:
(i) On each single unit consumer-sized can or package whose net
weight is one and two-tenths ounces or less, a rate that is equal to
the tax rate under chapter 82.24 RCW multiplied by twenty; or
(ii) On each single unit consumer-sized can whose net weight is
more than one and two-tenths ounces, a proportionate tax at the rate
established in (c)(i) of this subsection (1) on each ounce or
fractional part of an ounce.
(2) Taxes under this section ((shall)) must be imposed at the time
the distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state
from without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes,
manufactures, fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for
sale in this state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to
retailers in this state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles
for sale any tobacco products that are within this state but upon which
tax has not been imposed.
(3) The moneys collected under this section ((shall)) must be
deposited into the state general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.26 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Within one year following the date on which the requirement
for a tobacco product code is effective, payment of, or exemption from,
the tax imposed in section 4 of this act must be verifiable on each
single-unit consumer-sized can or package of moist snuff, as provided
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Within thirty days following the date on which notice of
proposed rulemaking to require a tobacco product code is published in
the federal register, the department must commence to develop a method
for using a tobacco product code to verify payment of, or exemption
from, the tax imposed in section 4 of this act; to develop and
implement a pilot project to test the method; and to develop a plan for
adoption of rules to implement the method. The department must report
to the legislature on its progress annually by December 1st through the
year following the year in which the method is implemented.
(2) If notice of proposed rulemaking to require a tobacco product
code is not published in the federal register by July 1, 2011, the
department must determine and recommend to the legislature by November
1, 2014, a method to verify payment of, or exemption from, the tax
imposed in section 4 of this act, by means of stamping, use of
manufacturers' digitally readable product identifiers, or any other
method, and must complete and present to the legislature a study of
compliance with the tax imposed in section 4 of this act, the effect of
noncompliance on state revenue, and the effect of adopting a method to
verify payment of, or exemption from, the tax.
(3) For purposes of this section, "tobacco product code" means a
code that is required on the label of a tobacco product for purposes of
tracking or tracing the product through the distribution system under
final regulations promulgated by the secretary of the United States
department of health and human services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.24.027 (Additional tax imposed -- Rate -- Deposited into the
general fund) and 2009 c 479 s 68, 2008 c 86 s 303, 1999 c 309 s 925,
& 1986 c 3 s 12; and
(2) RCW 82.24.028 (Additional tax imposed -- Rate -- Deposited into the
general fund) and 2009 c 479 s 69, 2008 c 86 s 304, & 2002 c 2 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 2010
(this act) applies only with respect to tax liability incurred under
this chapter on or after July 1, 2010, for the sale, use, consumption,
handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes.
(2) Section 5(1), chapter . . ., Laws of 2010 (this act) applies
only with respect to tax liability incurred under this chapter on or
after July 1, 2010, for the sale, handling, or distribution of moist
snuff, cigars, small cigars, roll-your-own tobacco, and other tobacco
products.

--- END ---