BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.155.010 and 2009 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to this
chapter. In addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless
otherwise required by the context:
(1) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.
(2) "Internet" means any computer network, telephonic network, or
other electronic network.
(3) "Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years
old.
(4) "Pipe tobacco" means only that tobacco which, because of its
appearance, type, packaging, and labeling, is intended and suitable for
use and offered to, or purchased by, consumers as tobacco to be smoked
in a pipe.
(5) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of the
general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion
purposes.
(((5))) (6) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members
of the public.
(((6))) (7) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco
and is intended for human use, including any product defined in RCW
82.24.010(2) or 82.26.010(1), except that for the purposes of RCW
70.155.140 only, "tobacco product" does not include: (a) Cigars
defined in RCW 82.26.010 as to which one thousand units weigh more than
three pounds; or (b) pipe tobacco.

--- END ---