BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.145.050 and 2002 c 86 s 243 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the director
may:
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that are
necessary to implement this chapter;
(2) Set all renewal, late renewal, duplicate, and verification fees
in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;
(3) Establish the forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue a certificate to any applicant who has met the
requirements for certification;
(5) Hire clerical and administrative staff as needed to implement
and administer this chapter;
(6) Maintain the official departmental record of all applicants and
certificate holders;
(7) Approve the preparation and administration of examinations for
certification;
(8) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of a failure of
an examination;
(9) Set the criteria for meeting the standard required for
certification;
(10) Establish continuing education requirements;
(11) Establish advisory committees whose membership shall include
representatives of professional court reporting and stenomasking
associations and representatives from accredited schools offering
degrees in court reporting or stenomasking to advise the director on
testing procedures, professional standards, disciplinary activities, or
any other matters deemed necessary;
(((11))) (12) Establish ad hoc advisory committees whose membership
shall include representatives of professional court reporting and
stenomasking associations and representatives from accredited schools
offering degrees in court reporting or stenomasking to advise the
director on testing procedures, professional standards, or any other
matters deemed necessary.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.145.100 and 1989 c 382 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall establish by rule the requirements, including
continuing education requirements, and the renewal and late renewal
fees for certification. Failure to renew the certificate on or before
the expiration date cancels all privileges granted by the certificate.
If an individual desires to reinstate a certificate which had not been
renewed for three years or more, the individual shall satisfactorily
demonstrate continued competence in conformance with standards
determined by the director.

--- END ---