BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 26.44.020 and 2009 c 520 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to
the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted
under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a
child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An
abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or
neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of
eighteen years of age.
(3) "Child protective services" means those services provided by
the department designed to protect children from child abuse and
neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and
conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports.
Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the
alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral
to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of
children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant
to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and
neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a
permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be
provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services
solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability
to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.
(4) "Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.
(5) "Children's advocacy center" means a child-focused facility in
good standing with the state chapter for children's advocacy centers
and that coordinates a multidisciplinary process for the investigation,
prosecution, and treatment of sexual and other types of child abuse.
Children's advocacy centers provide a location for forensic interviews
and coordinate access to services such as, but not limited to, medical
evaluations, advocacy, therapy, and case review by multidisciplinary
teams within the context of county protocols as defined in RCW
26.44.180 and 26.44.185.
(6) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister,
priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether
acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.
(((6))) (7) "Community sexual assault program" means that program
as defined in RCW 70.125.030.
(8) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington,
juvenile department.
(((7))) (9) "Department" means the state department of social and
health services.
(((8))) (10) "Founded" means the determination following an
investigation by the department that, based on available information,
it is more likely than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.
(((9))) (11) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an
investigation by the department, prior to October 1, 2008, that based
on available information a decision cannot be made that more likely
than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.
(((10))) (12) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or
any other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.
(((11))) (13) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department,
the prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public
safety, or the office of the sheriff.
(((12))) (14) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an intent, wish, or
design to intimidate, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may
be inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of
another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an
act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.
(((13))) (15) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or
a failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct,
behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of
consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present
danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not
limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering
whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's
substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share
a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or
maltreatment. Poverty, homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence
as defined in RCW 26.50.010 that is perpetrated against someone other
than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment
in and of itself.
(((14))) (16) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under
chapter 18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an
employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.
(((15))) (17) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner"
means a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine
and surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic
medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other
health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited
Christian Science practitioner. A person who is being furnished
Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science
practitioner will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected
person for the purposes of this chapter.
(((16))) (18) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not
limited to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility
personnel, and school nurses.
(((17))) (19) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice
psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual
capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution.
(((18))) (20) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child
abuse or neglect that the department has determined does not rise to
the level of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred
for investigation.
(((19))) (21) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing,
permitting, or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any
person; or (b) allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the
obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child
by any person.
(((20))) (22) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is
defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.
(((21))) (23) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a
professional capacity during the regular course of employment in
encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of
children, or providing social services to adults or families, including
mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence
programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent
of any public or private organization or institution.
(((22))) (24) "Supervising agency" means an agency licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.090 or an Indian tribe under RCW 74.15.190 that
has entered into a performance-based contract with the department to
provide child welfare services.
(((23))) (25) "Unfounded" means the determination following an
investigation by the department that available information indicates
that, more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or
that there is insufficient evidence for the department to determine
whether the alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

Sec. 2 RCW 26.44.180 and 1999 c 389 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each agency involved in investigating child sexual abuse shall
document its role in handling cases and how it will coordinate with
other local agencies or systems and shall adopt a local protocol based
on the state guidelines. The department and local law enforcement
agencies may include other agencies and systems that are involved with
child sexual abuse victims in the multidisciplinary coordination.
(2) Each county shall develop a written protocol for handling
criminal child sexual abuse investigations. The protocol shall address
the coordination of child sexual abuse investigations between the
prosecutor's office, law enforcement, ((the department)) children's
protective services, children's advocacy centers, where available,
community sexual assault programs, local advocacy groups, and any other
local agency involved in the criminal investigation of child sexual
abuse, including those investigations involving multiple victims and
multiple offenders. The protocol shall be developed by the prosecuting
attorney with the assistance of the agencies referenced in this
subsection.
(3) Local protocols under this section shall be adopted and in
place by July 1, 2000, and shall be submitted to the legislature prior
to that date.

Sec. 3 RCW 26.44.185 and 2007 c 410 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county shall revise and expand its existing child sexual
abuse investigation protocol to address investigations of child
fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal child neglect cases and to
incorporate the statewide guidelines for first responders to child
fatalities developed by the criminal justice training commission. The
protocols shall address the coordination of child fatality, child
physical abuse, and criminal child neglect investigations between the
county and city prosecutor's offices, law enforcement, children's
protective services, children's advocacy centers, where available,
community sexual assault programs, local advocacy groups, emergency
medical services, and any other local agency involved in the
investigation of such cases. The protocol revision and expansion shall
be developed by the prosecuting attorney in collaboration with the
agencies referenced in this section.
(2) Revised and expanded protocols under this section shall be
adopted and in place by July 1, 2008. Thereafter, the protocols shall
be reviewed every two years to determine whether modifications are
needed.

--- END ---