BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning July 1, 2009, the department of fish and wildlife is
liable for any damage to any public highway, bridge, elevated
structure, or other property owned by the department of transportation
sustained as the result of any direct action or inaction of the
department of fish and wildlife. Such damage to any public highway,
bridge, elevated structure, or other property owned by the department
of transportation may be recovered in a civil action instituted in the
name of the state of Washington by the department of transportation.
Any measure of damage determined by the department of transportation to
its highway, bridge, elevated structure, or other property under this
section is prima facie the amount of damage caused by the direct action
or inaction of the department of fish and wildlife and is presumed to
be the amount recoverable in any civil action. The damages available
under this section include the incident response costs, including
traffic control, incurred by the department of transportation. This
section may not be construed to conflict with RCW 43.17.330.

--- END ---