BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.48.082 and 2006 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 49.48.083 through 49.48.086:
(1) "Citation" means a written determination by the department that
a wage payment requirement has been violated.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(3) "Determination of compliance" means a written determination by
the department that wage payment requirements have not been violated.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's authorized representative.
(5) "Employee" has the meaning provided in: (a) RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020 or
49.46.130; and (b) RCW 49.12.005 for purposes of a wage payment
requirement set forth in RCW 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(6) "Employer" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010 for
purposes of a wage payment requirement set forth in RCW 49.46.020,
49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or 49.52.060.
(7) "Notice of assessment" means a written notice by the department
that, based on a citation, the employer shall pay the amounts assessed
under RCW 49.48.083.
(8) "Wage" has the meaning provided in RCW 49.46.010.
(9) "Wage complaint" means a complaint from an employee to the
department that asserts that an employer has violated one or more wage
payment requirements and that is reduced to writing.
(10) "Wage payment requirement" means a wage payment requirement
set forth in RCW 49.46.020, 49.46.130, 49.48.010, 49.52.050, or
49.52.060, and any related rules adopted by the department.
(11) "Willful" means a knowing and intentional action that is
neither accidental nor the result of a bona fide dispute, as evaluated
under the standards applicable to wage payment violations under RCW
49.52.050(2).
(12) "Repeat willful violator" means any employer that has been the
subject of a final and binding citation and notice of assessment for a
willful violation of a wage payment requirement within three years of
the date of issue of the most recent citation and notice of assessment
for a willful violation of a wage payment requirement.
(13) "Successor" means any person to whom an employer quitting,
selling out, exchanging, or disposing of a business sells or otherwise
conveys in bulk and not in the ordinary course of the employer's
business, more than fifty percent of the property, whether real or
personal, tangible or intangible, of the employer's business.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.48.083 and 2006 c 89 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an employee files a wage complaint with the department, the
department shall investigate the wage complaint. Unless otherwise
resolved, the department shall issue either a citation and notice of
assessment or a determination of compliance((: (a))) no later than
sixty days after the date on which the department received the wage
complaint((, unless the department extends this time period for good
cause; and (b) no later than three years after the date on which the
cause of action accrued, unless a longer period of time applies under
law. Such cause of action for wage claims accrues from the date when
the wages are due)). The department may extend the time period by
providing advance written notice to the employee and the employer
setting forth good cause for an extension of the time period and
specifying the duration of the extension. The department may not
investigate any alleged violation of a wage payment requirement that
occurred more than three years before the date that the employee filed
the wage complaint. The department shall send the citation and notice
of assessment or the determination of compliance to both the employer
and the employee by service of process or certified mail to their last
known addresses.
(2) If the department determines that an employer has violated a
wage payment requirement and issues to the employer a citation and
notice of assessment, the department may order the employer to pay
employees all wages owed, including interest of one percent per month
on all wages owed, to the employee. The wages and interest owed must
be calculated from the first date wages were owed to the employee,
except that the department may not order the employer to pay any wages
and interest that were owed more than three years before the date the
wage complaint was filed with the department.
(3) If the department determines that the violation of the wage
payment requirement was a willful violation, the department also may
order the employer to pay the department a civil penalty as specified
in (a) of this subsection.
(a) A civil penalty for a willful violation of a wage payment
requirement shall be not less than ((five hundred)) one thousand
dollars or an amount equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid
wages, whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a willful
violation of a wage payment requirement shall be twenty thousand
dollars.
(b) The department may not assess a civil penalty if the employer
reasonably relied on: (i) A rule related to any wage payment
requirement; (ii) a written order, ruling, approval, opinion, advice,
determination, or interpretation of the director; or (iii) an
interpretive or administrative policy issued by the department and
filed with the office of the code reviser. In accordance with the
department's retention schedule obligations under chapter 40.14 RCW,
the department shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all
written orders, rulings, approvals, opinions, advice, determinations,
and interpretations for purposes of determining whether an employer is
immune from civil penalties under (b)(ii) of this subsection.
(c) The department shall waive any civil penalty assessed against
an employer under this section if the employer is not a repeat willful
violator, and the director determines that the employer has provided
payment to the employee of all wages that the department determined
that the employer owed to the employee, including interest, within ten
business days of the employer's receipt of the citation and notice of
assessment from the department.
(d) The department may waive or reduce at any time a civil penalty
assessed under this section((, in whole or in part,)) if the director
determines that the employer paid all wages and interest owed to an
employee.
(e) The department shall deposit civil penalties paid under this
section in the supplemental pension fund established under RCW
51.44.033.
(4) Upon payment by an employer, and acceptance by an employee, of
all wages and interest assessed by the department in a citation and
notice of assessment issued to the employer, the fact of such payment
by the employer, and of such acceptance by the employee, shall: (a)
Constitute a full and complete satisfaction by the employer of all
specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and notice
of assessment; and (b) bar the employee from initiating or pursuing any
court action or other judicial or administrative proceeding based on
the specific wage payment requirements addressed in the citation and
notice of assessment. The citation and notice of assessment shall
include a notification and summary of the specific requirements of this
subsection.
(5) The applicable statute of limitations for civil actions is
tolled during the department's investigation of an employee's wage
complaint against an employer. For the purposes of this subsection,
the department's investigation begins on the date the employee files
the wage complaint with the department and ends when: (a) The wage
complaint is finally determined through a final and binding citation
and notice of assessment or determination of compliance; (b) the
department notifies the employer and the employee in writing that the
wage complaint has been otherwise resolved or that the employee has
elected to terminate the department's administrative action under RCW
49.48.085.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.48.084 and 2006 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by a citation and
notice of assessment or a determination of compliance issued by the
department under RCW 49.48.083 or the assessment of civil penalty due
to a determination of status as a repeat willful violator may appeal
the citation and notice of assessment ((or)), the determination of
compliance, or the assessment of civil penalty to the director by
filing a notice of appeal with the director within thirty days of the
department's issuance of the citation and notice of assessment ((or)),
the determination of compliance, or the assessment of civil penalty.
A citation and notice of assessment ((or)), a determination of
compliance, or an assessment of a civil penalty not appealed within
thirty days is final and binding, and not subject to further appeal.
(2) A notice of appeal filed with the director under this section
shall stay the effectiveness of the citation and notice of assessment
((or)), the determination of compliance, or the assessment of civil
penalty pending final review of the appeal by the director as provided
for in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(3) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the director shall assign
the hearing to an administrative law judge of the office of
administrative hearings to conduct the hearing and issue an initial
order. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the standard of review by the
administrative law judge of an appealed citation and notice of
assessment ((or)), an appealed determination of compliance, or an
appealed assessment of civil penalty shall be de novo. Any party who
seeks to challenge an initial order shall file a petition for
administrative review with the director within thirty days after
service of the initial order. The director shall conduct
administrative review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(4) The director shall issue all final orders after appeal of the
initial order. The final order of the director is subject to judicial
review in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) Orders that are not appealed within the time period specified
in this section and chapter 34.05 RCW are final and binding, and not
subject to further appeal.
(6) An employer who fails to allow adequate inspection of records
in an investigation by the department under this chapter within a
reasonable time period may not use such records in any appeal under
this section to challenge the correctness of any determination by the
department of wages owed or penalty assessed.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.48.086 and 2006 c 89 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After a final order is issued under RCW 49.48.084, if an
employer defaults in the payment of: (a) Any wages determined by the
department to be owed to an employee, including interest; or (b) any
civil penalty ordered by the department under RCW 49.48.083, the
director may file with the clerk of any county within the state a
warrant in the amount of the payment plus any filing fees. The clerk
of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate
a superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall
cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court
cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer
mentioned in the warrant, the amount of payment due on it plus any
filing fees, and the date when the warrant was filed. The aggregate
amount of the warrant as docketed becomes a lien upon the title to, and
interest in, all real and personal property of the employer against
whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case
docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon
the warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law
with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or
property upon judgment in a court of competent jurisdiction. The
warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the issuance of writs of
garnishment in favor of the state in a manner provided by law in case
of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court
is entitled to a filing fee which will be added to the amount of the
warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to the employer within
three days of filing with the clerk.
(2)(a) The director may issue to any person, firm, corporation,
other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the
state, a public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and
order to withhold and deliver property of any kind when he or she has
reason to believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that
is or will become due, owing, or belonging to an employer upon whom a
notice of assessment has been served by the department for payments or
civil penalties due to the department. The effect of a notice and
order is continuous from the date the notice and order is first made
until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is
satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The
department shall release the notice and order when the liability out of
which the notice and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable
by reason of lapse of time and shall notify the person against whom the
notice and order was made that the notice and order has been released.
(b) The notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by
the sheriff of the county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by the director. A person, firm,
corporation, other entity, municipal corporation, political subdivision
of the state, public corporation, or agency of the state upon whom
service has been made shall answer the notice within twenty days
exclusive of the day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall
make true answers to the matters inquired of in the notice and order.
Upon service of the notice and order, if the party served possesses any
property that may be subject to the claim of the department, the party
shall promptly deliver the property to the director. The director
shall hold the property in trust for application on the employer's
indebtedness to the department, or for return without interest, in
accordance with a final determination of a petition for review. In the
alternative, the party shall furnish a good and sufficient surety bond
satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final determination of
liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to answer
the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount
claimed by the director in the notice, together with costs. If a
notice is served upon an employer and the property subject to it is
wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions provided
for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner is entitled.
(3) In addition to the procedure for collection of wages owed,
including interest, and civil penalties as set forth in this section,
the department may recover wages owed, including interest, and civil
penalties assessed under RCW 49.48.083 in a civil action brought in a
court of competent jurisdiction of the county where the violation is
alleged to have occurred.
(4) Whenever any employer quits business, sells out, exchanges, or
otherwise disposes of the employer's business or stock of goods, any
person who becomes a successor to the business becomes liable for the
full amount of any outstanding citation and notice of assessment or
penalty against the employer's business under this chapter if, at the
time of the conveyance of the business, the successor has: (a) Actual
knowledge of the fact and amount of the outstanding citation and notice
of assessment or (b) a prompt, reasonable, and effective means of
accessing and verifying the fact and amount of the outstanding citation
and notice of assessment from the department. If the citation and
notice of assessment or penalty is not paid in full by the employer
within ten days of the date of the sale, exchange, or disposal, the
successor is liable for the payment of the full amount of the citation
and notice of assessment or penalty, and payment thereof by the
successor must, to the extent thereof, be deemed a payment upon the
purchase price. If the payment is greater in amount than the purchase
price, the amount of the difference becomes a debt due the successor
from the employer.
(5) This section does not affect other collection remedies that are
otherwise provided by law.

Sec. 5 RCW 49.48.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If upon investigation by the director, after taking assignments
of any wage claim under RCW 49.48.040 or after receiving a wage
complaint as defined in RCW 49.48.082 from an employee, it appears to
the director that the employer is representing to his employees that he
is able to pay wages for their services and that the employees are not
being paid for their services, the director may require the employer to
give a bond in such sum as the director deems reasonable and adequate
in the circumstances, with sufficient surety, conditioned that the
employer will for a definite future period not exceeding six months
conduct his business and pay his employees in accordance with the laws
of the state of Washington.
(2) If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer
fails to provide the same, the director may commence a suit against the
employer in the superior court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel
him to furnish such bond or cease doing business until he has done so.
The employer shall have the burden of proving the amount thereof to be
excessive.
(3) If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such
bond and that the same is reasonable, necessary or appropriate to
secure the prompt payment of the wages of the employees of such
employer and his compliance with ((RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.080))
one or more wage payment requirements as defined in RCW 49.48.082, the
court shall enjoin such employer from doing business in this state
until the requirement is met, or shall make other, and may make
further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the requirement.
(4) Upon being informed of a wage claim against an employer or
former employer, the director shall, if such claim appears to be just,
immediately notify the employer or former employer, of such claim by
mail. If the employer or former employer fails to pay the claim or
make satisfactory explanation to the director of his failure to do so,
within thirty days thereafter, the employer or former employer shall be
liable to a penalty of ten percent of that portion of the claim found
to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action against
the employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and
the same may be included in any subsequent action by the director on
said wage claim, or may be exercised separately after adjustment of
such wage claim without court action. This subsection does not apply
to wage complaints made under RCW 49.48.083.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall assess a civil penalty against any repeat
willful violator in an amount of not less than one thousand dollars or
an amount equal to ten percent of the total amount of unpaid wages,
whichever is greater. The maximum civil penalty for a repeat willful
violator under this section is twenty thousand dollars.
(2) The department may waive or reduce a civil penalty assessed
under this section if the director determines that the employer has
paid all wages and interest owed to the employee.

--- END ---