BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of
nuclear fuel assemblies manufactured or processed for hire in the state
of Washington that are delivered to nuclear powered electrical
generating stations located in the state of Washington.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of or
charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to preparing,
loading, transporting, and delivering nuclear fuel assemblies
manufactured or processed for hire in the state of Washington to
nuclear powered electrical generating stations located in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use by a manufacturer, processor for hire, or an owner of a nuclear
power generating station located in the state of Washington of nuclear
fuel assemblies manufactured or processed for hire in the state of
Washington that are delivered to nuclear powered electrical generating
stations located in the state of Washington.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of labor and services rendered in respect to preparing, loading,
transporting, and delivering nuclear fuel assemblies manufactured or
processed for hire in the state of Washington that are delivered to
nuclear powered electrical generating stations located in the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---