BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Any state or municipal firefighter, whether volunteer or paid, who
takes part in firefighting efforts outside his or her jurisdiction or
provides emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services at
the scene of an emergency is not liable for civil damages resulting
from any act or omission in the rendering of such services, other than
acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.

--- END ---