BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 52.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any firefighter that is present at the scene of a wildfire,
regardless of whether it is beyond the boundaries of his or her
district, has a duty to undertake firefighting efforts to suppress the
fire if the fire poses a danger to human life or structures. However,
the firefighter is under no duty to undertake firefighting efforts if
he or she does not have the equipment or manpower at the scene to fight
the fire in a safe and reasonable manner.
(2)(a) The priorities and methods under this section are determined
by the chain of command of the pertinent agency.
(b) If an official chain of command has not been established, the
firefighting priorities and methods shall be determined by the most
senior firefighter on the engine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Any state or municipal firefighter, whether volunteer or paid, who
takes part in firefighting efforts outside his or her jurisdiction or
provides emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services at
the scene of an emergency is not liable for civil damages resulting
from any act or omission in the rendering of such services, other than
acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.

--- END ---