BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.600 and 1986 c 100 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every owner of forest land in the state of Washington shall
furnish or provide, during the season of the year when there is danger
of forest fires, adequate protection against the spread of fire thereon
or therefrom which shall meet with the approval of the department.
(2)(a) Residents, landowners, and others in lawful possession and
control of land in the state have the right to access their residences,
forest land, and land not classified as forest land during a forest
fire or wildfire. Specifically, residents, landowners, and others in
lawful possession and control of land have the right to access their
residences and land in order to: (i) Conduct fire prevention or
suppression activities; (ii) protect or retrieve any property located
in their residences or on their land, including equipment, livestock,
or any other belongings; or (iii) undertake activities under both
(a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.
(b) To the maximum extent practicable, the department shall allow
and facilitate access to residences and land as set forth in (a) of
this subsection.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.04.016 and 1993 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department when acting, in good faith, in its statutory
capacity as a fire prevention and suppression agency, is carrying out
duties owed to the public in general and not to any individual person
or class of persons separate and apart from the public. Nothing
contained in this title, including but not limited to any provision
dealing with payment or collection of forest protection or fire
suppression assessments, may be construed to evidence a legislative
intent that the duty to prevent and suppress forest fires is owed to
any individual person or class of persons separate and apart from the
public in general. This section does not alter the department's duties
and responsibilities as a landowner.
(2) The department and its employees and agents are not liable for
any action, or failure to act, under RCW 76.04.600(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.48 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) During the closure of any state highway, county road, or city
street under this chapter due to forest fire or wildfire, those state
agencies and local governments authorizing or implementing the closure
shall, to the maximum extent practicable, allow and facilitate access
to residences and land as set forth in RCW 76.04.600(2).
(2) State agencies, counties, and cities, and their employees and
agents, are not liable for any action, or failure to act, under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Residents, landowners, and other in lawful possession and
control of land in the state are not liable for unintentional injuries
or loss suffered by persons entering upon, or passing through, their
land pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.48.040 and 2007 c 252 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided under ((RCW 47.48.060)) section 3 of this act,
when any state highway, county road, or city street or portion thereof
shall have been closed, or when the maximum speed limit thereon shall
have been reduced, for all vehicles or any class of vehicles, as by law
provided, any person, firm, or corporation disregarding such closing or
reduced speed limit shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall in
addition to any penalty for violation of the provisions of this
section, be liable in any civil action instituted in the name of the
state of Washington or the county or city or town having jurisdiction
for any damages occasioned to such state highway, county road, or city
street, as the case may be, as the result of disregarding such closing
or reduced speed limit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 36.28A.140 (Development of model policy to address property
access during forest fires and wildfires) and 2007 c 252 s 1; and
(2) RCW 47.48.060 (Registry of persons allowed access to property
to conduct fire prevention despite closures -- Liability) and 2007 c 252
s 2.

--- END ---