BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that certainty and
clarity in water resource administration is critical to the economic
vitality of the state, and that requiring water right holders to keep
water use records in perpetuity frustrates achievement of the certainty
and clarity needed for effective water resource management.
The legislature also finds that requiring water right holders to
prove full use of water rights over long periods of time contributes to
fear and uncertainty among all water users in a watershed, and is
overly costly and burdensome for water right holders and agencies
considering water right applications.
The legislature further finds that these extended recordkeeping and
burden of proof concerns create strong disincentives for more efficient
use of water and preclude many water right holders from seeking to
donate or transfer water that would benefit the instream resources and
economic vitality of the state.
Therefore the legislature declares that, in order to improve the
certainty and clarity of water resource management in the state,
holders of perfected water rights shall no longer be required to show
beneficial use of a water right beyond the most recent fifteen-year
period.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.14.140 and 2009 c 183 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of five or more
consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150;
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW;
(i) If such a right is involved in an approved local water plan
created under RCW 90.92.090, provided the right is subject to an
agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or provided the right is
banked under RCW 90.92.070; or
(j) If the full or partial nonuse of such a right occurred prior to
the fifteen-year period preceding the date upon which relinquishment
proceedings are commenced under RCW 90.14.130 or the date upon which
adjudication proceedings are commenced under RCW 90.03.105 through
90.03.245 or 90.44.220.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180,
"sufficient cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion
of the water by the owner of a water right for a period of five or more
consecutive years where such nonuse occurs as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW; or
(i) If the full or partial nonuse of such a right occurred prior to
the fifteen-year period preceding the date upon which relinquishment
proceedings are commenced under RCW 90.14.130 or the date upon which
adjudication proceedings are commenced under RCW 90.03.105 through
90.03.245 or 90.44.220.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this act do not apply to surface water rights and
claims already undergoing adjudication for which final orders or
conditional final orders have not yet been issued.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.03.380 and 2009 c 183 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water. The time period that the water right was
banked under RCW 90.92.070, in an approved local water plan created
under RCW 90.92.090, or the water right was subject to an agreement to
not divert under RCW 90.92.050 will not be included in the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use for the purpose of
determining the annual consumptive quantity under this section. If the
water right has not been used during the previous five years but the
nonuse of which qualifies for one or more of the statutory good causes
or exceptions to relinquishment in RCW 90.14.140 and 90.44.520, the
period of nonuse is not included in the most recent five-year period of
continuous beneficial use for purposes of determining the annual
consumptive quantity of water under this section.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, a water right
that is subject to an agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or
a banked water right under RCW 90.92.070.
(10) Determinations of a water right's extent and validity under
this section must be based solely on the extent to which the right was
originally perfected and the extent to which the right has been
beneficially used during the fifteen-year period preceding the date the
department commences processing a request for a change, transfer, or
amendment of a surface or groundwater right.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.03.380 and 2003 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.
(2) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(3) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users
of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval
for the change from the board of directors of the district if the use
of water continues within the irrigation district, and when water is
provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint
control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received
from the board of joint control if the use of water continues within
the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(4) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by
the state through the funding of water conservation projects under
chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(5)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled
to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an application
relating to an existing surface or ground water right is considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (5)(c) does not affect any
other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (5) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(6) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a water
right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's valid
water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights program,
or to other persons as a condition of processing the application.
(7) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(8) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring a change or
transfer of any existing water right to enable the holder of the right
to store water governed by the right.
(9) Determinations of a water right's extent and validity under
this section must be based solely on the extent to which the right was
originally perfected and the extent to which the right has been
beneficially used during the fifteen-year period preceding the date the
department commences processing a request for a change, transfer, or
amendment of a surface or groundwater right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 and 5 of this act expire June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3 and 6 of this act take effect
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---