BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To the extent permitted under federal programs, rules, or law,
the department may enter into a lease with private entities allowing
them to operate food or beverage retailers, restaurants, grocery and
convenience stores, service station businesses, or other private
enterprises that are of benefit to the traveling public at state-owned
safety rest areas.
(2) Before entering into a lease with an entity, the department
must contact food or beverage retailers, restaurants, grocery and
convenience stores, lodging, and service station businesses within one
mile from the highway exits immediately before and after the safety
rest area location, in each direction of traffic, and allow these
businesses an absolute right of first refusal. If these businesses do
not respond with a reasonable bid or offer within sixty days of the
initial contact, the department must open up the bid or negotiation
process to all interested entities.
(3) The department must take all necessary action to ensure the
most favorable lease rates for the state, whether by bid or other
reasonable manner, and to require the lessee to enter into any other
contract or agreement to protect the state and its citizens from
commercial harm or other type of harm.
(4) A lease must allow a nonprofit organization that had previously
conducted fund-raising activities on the safety rest area premises to
continue such activities. The department must reach an agreement with
the department of services for the blind ensuring that any activities
at safety rest areas do not materially affect the revenues forecasted
from their vending operations at each safety rest area.
(5) The department may adopt and enforce such reasonable rules that
are consistent with and necessary to carry out this section.

--- END ---