BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.380 and 2002 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and
enforce rules not inconsistent with the law of this state to govern the
design, marking, and mode of operation of all school buses owned and
operated by any school district or privately owned and operated under
contract or otherwise with any school district in this state for the
transportation of school children.
(2) School districts shall not be prohibited from placing or
displaying a flag of the United States on a school bus when it does not
interfere with the vehicle's safe operation. The state superintendent
of public instruction shall adopt and enforce rules not inconsistent
with the law of this state to govern the size, placement, and display
of the flag of the United States on all school buses referenced in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The Washington state school directors' association shall
develop a model policy and procedures regarding the content of
advertising and educational materials placed on school buses. Each
school district board of directors shall take into consideration the
model policy and procedures developed by the school directors'
association and establish and approve its own policy.
(4) School districts shall be permitted to place advertising and
educational material on and in school buses if the advertising and
educational material is approved by the school district board of
directors. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and
enforce rules, not inconsistent with the laws of this state, to govern
the placement and securing of any such advertising and educational
material. The advertising and educational material may not be placed
on the front or the rear of a school bus.
(5) Rules shall by reference be made a part of any such contract or
other agreement with the school district. Every school district, its
officers and employees, and every person employed under contract or
otherwise by a school district is subject to such rules. It is
unlawful for any officer or employee of any school district or for any
person operating any school bus under contract with any school district
to violate any of the provisions of such rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
School districts that receive revenue from advertising or
educational material under RCW 46.61.380 shall deposit the revenue in
the school district's general fund or transportation vehicle fund.

--- END ---