BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.130 and 2004 c 275 s 52 are each amended to
read as follows:
General powers and duties of the board of regents are as follows:
(1) To have full control of the university and its property of
various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) To employ the president of the university, his or her
assistants, members of the faculty, and employees of the institution,
who except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions
during the pleasure of said board of regents.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.76.290(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the
university may be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant at the
university's discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools
and other educational institutions whose courses of study meet the
approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the course of study in the various colleges, schools, and departments
of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.
(6) Grant to students such certificates or degrees as recommended
for such students by the faculty. The board, upon recommendation of
the faculty, may also confer honorary degrees upon persons other than
graduates of this university in recognition of their learning or
devotion to literature, art, or science: PROVIDED, That no degree
shall ever be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the
giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(7) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises,
whether real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, for
the use or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools,
departments, or agencies; and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend
the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof except as
limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and
devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to govern and protect the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises above-mentioned.
(8) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(9) To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the
governor and to the legislature in providing for the institution.
(10) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.
(11) To confer honorary degrees upon persons who request an
honorary degree if they were students at the university in 1942 and did
not graduate because they were ordered into an internment camp. The
honorary degree may also be requested by a representative of deceased
persons who meet these requirements. For the purposes of this
subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation center to which
persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential Executive Order 9066,
signed February 19, 1942.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.30.150 and 2004 c 275 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
The regents of Washington State University, in addition to other
duties prescribed by law, shall:
(1) Have full control of the university and its property of various
kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) Employ the president of the university, his or her assistants,
members of the faculty, and employees of the university, who, except as
otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions during the
pleasure of said board of regents.
(3) Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission
to the university which meet or exceed the standards specified under
RCW 28B.76.290(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the
university may be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant, at the
university's discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools
and other educational institutions whose courses of study meet the
approval of the university may be acceptable for entrance.
(4) Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to
carry out the purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by
law.
(5) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.
(6) With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe
the courses of instruction in the various colleges, schools, and
departments of the institution and publish the necessary catalogues
thereof.
(7) Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the
schemes of technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United
States and foreign countries.
(8) Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm
marketing forums.
(9) Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as
practicable, be conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in
connection with the university one or more physical, chemical, and
biological laboratories, and suitably furnish and equip the same.
(10) Provide training in military tactics for those students
electing to participate therein.
(11) Establish a department of elementary science and in connection
therewith provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including
elementary trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and
mechanical drawing, and land surveying.
(12) Establish a department of agriculture and in connection
therewith provide instruction in physics with special application of
its principles to agriculture, chemistry with special application of
its principles to agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with
special reference to common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology
and physiology of the lower forms of animal life, with special
reference to insect pests, morphology and physiology of the higher
forms of animal life and in particular of the horse, cow, sheep, and
swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and feeding
of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these
subjects to superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give
practical instruction therein.
(13) Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with
the department of agriculture, including at least one in the western
portion of the state, and appoint the officers and prescribe
regulations for their management.
(14) Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended
for such students by the faculty.
(15) Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of
the university in recognition of their learning or devotion to
literature, art, or science when recommended thereto by the faculty:
PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of
the payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.
(16) Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and
facilities or improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and
engineers to prepare such plans and specifications and supervise the
construction of buildings or facilities which the board is authorized
to erect, and fix the compensation for such services. The board shall
enter into contracts with one or more contractors for such suitable
buildings, facilities, or improvements as the available funds will
warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a public
competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they
contract for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond
for the faithful performance of the work and full protection against
all liens.
(17) Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of
all money appropriated to or belonging to the state university.
(18) Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of
congress approved May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for
cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural
colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the Act of
Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts supplemental thereto and the
United States Department of Agriculture" and organize and conduct
agricultural extension work in connection with the state university in
accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.
(19) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to university purposes.
(20) Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to
further the work of the university or for experimental or
demonstrational purposes.
(21) Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment
station in an irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon
the principles and practices of irrigational agriculture including the
utilization of water and its relation to soil types, crops, climatic
conditions, ditch and drain construction, fertility investigations,
plant disease, insect pests, marketing, farm management, utilization of
fruit by-products, and general development of agriculture under
irrigation conditions.
(22) Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at
Puyallup.
(23) Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment
substation for the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the
principles and practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization,
pollenization, new fruit varieties, fruit diseases and pests, by-products, marketing, management, and general horticultural problems.
(24) Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests,
whether real or personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use
or benefit of the university, its colleges, schools, or departments;
and sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds,
rents, profits, and income thereof except as limited by the terms of
said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises; and adopt
proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of
all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.
(25) Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a
mining, physical, technological building, and fabrication shop at the
university, or add to the present foundry and other buildings, in order
that both instruction and research be expanded to include permanent
molding and die casting with a section for new fabricating techniques,
especially for light metals, including magnesium and aluminum; purchase
equipment for the shops and laboratories in mechanical, electrical, and
civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the extraction of
alumina from native clays and other possible light metal research;
purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological research
generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics
of materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.
(26) Make and transmit to the governor and members of the
legislature upon request such reports as will be helpful in providing
for the institution.
(27) Confer honorary degrees upon persons who request an honorary
degree if they were students at the university in 1942 and did not
graduate because they were ordered into an internment camp. The
honorary degree may also be requested by a representative of deceased
persons who meet these requirements. For the purposes of this
subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation center to which
persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential Executive Order 9066,
signed February 19, 1942.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.35.205 and 2009 c 295 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other powers and duties given to them by
law, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, and
Western Washington University are hereby authorized to grant any degree
through the master's degree to any student who has completed a program
of study and/or research in those areas which are determined by the
faculty and board of trustees of the college to be appropriate for the
granting of such degree: PROVIDED, That before any degree is
authorized under this section it shall be subject to the review and
approval of the higher education coordinating board.
(2) The board of trustees, upon recommendation of the faculty, may
also confer honorary bachelor's, master's, or doctorate level degrees
upon persons in recognition of their learning or devotion to education,
literature, art, or science. No degree may be conferred in
consideration of the payment of money or the donation of any kind of
property.
(3) The board of trustees may also confer honorary degrees upon
persons who request an honorary degree if they were students at the
university in 1942 and did not graduate because they were ordered into
an internment camp. The honorary degree may also be requested by a
representative of deceased persons who meet these requirements. For
the purposes of this subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation
center to which persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential
Executive Order 9066, signed February 19, 1942.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.140 and 2009 c 64 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each board of trustees:
(1) Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in
its district;
(2) Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical
college education and training and maintain an open-door policy in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3);
(3) Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college
president for each community and technical college and, may appoint a
president for the district, and fix their duties and compensation,
which may include elements other than salary. Compensation under this
subsection shall not affect but may supplement retirement, health care,
and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to the presidents as
state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to be fixed
by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix
their salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under
this subsection shall not exceed the amount or percentage established
for those purposes in the state appropriations act by the legislature
as allocated to the board of trustees by the state board for community
and technical colleges. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall adopt rules defining the permissible elements of
compensation under this subsection;
(4) May establish, under the approval and direction of the college
board, new facilities as community needs and interests demand.
However, the authority of boards of trustees to purchase or lease major
off-campus facilities shall be subject to the approval of the higher
education coordinating board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230;
(5) May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain
dormitories, food service facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the operation of the community and
technical college;
(6) May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and
issue and sell revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the
construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent
fixtures, demolition and major alteration of buildings or other capital
assets, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances, for dormitories, food service
facilities, and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where applicable;
(7) May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized
hereunder, including reasonable rules and regulations for the
government thereof, not inconsistent with the rules of the college
board; each board of trustees operating a community and technical
college may enter into agreements, subject to rules of the college
board, with owners of facilities to be used for housing regarding the
management, operation, and government of such facilities, and any board
entering into such an agreement may:
(a) Make rules for the government, management and operation of such
housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable; and
(b) Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the
same;
(8) May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and
bequests of real or personal property from private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and
conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical
college programs as specified by law and the rules of the state college
board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the
proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms and
conditions thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof;
(9) May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the
discretion of the board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and
authorize classrooms and other facilities to be used for summer or
night schools, or for public meetings and for any other uses consistent
with the use of such classrooms or facilities for community and
technical college purposes;
(10) May make rules for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on
property owned, operated, or maintained by the district;
(11) Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the
course of study in the various departments of the community and
technical college or colleges under its control, and publish such
catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;
(12) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a course of study, a suitable diploma, degree, or certificate under the
rules of the state board for community and technical colleges that are
appropriate to their mission. The purposes of these diplomas,
certificates, and degrees are to lead individuals directly to
employment in a specific occupation or prepare individuals for a
bachelor's degree or beyond. Technical colleges may only offer
transfer degrees that prepare students for bachelor's degrees in
professional fields, subject to rules adopted by the college board. In
adopting rules, the college board, where possible, shall create
consistency between community and technical colleges and may address
issues related to tuition and fee rates; tuition waivers; enrollment
counting, including the use of credits instead of clock hours; degree
granting authority; or any other rules necessary to offer the associate
degrees that prepare students for transfer to bachelor's degrees in
professional areas. Only pilot colleges under RCW 28B.50.810 may award
baccalaureate degrees. The board, upon recommendation of the faculty,
may also confer honorary associate of arts degrees upon persons other
than graduates of the community college, in recognition of their
learning or devotion to education, literature, art, or science. No
degree may be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the
donation of any kind of property;
(13) Shall enforce the rules prescribed by the state board for
community and technical colleges for the government of community and
technical colleges, students and teachers, and adopt such rules and
perform all other acts not inconsistent with law or rules of the state
board for community and technical colleges as the board of trustees may
in its discretion deem necessary or appropriate to the administration
of college districts: PROVIDED, That such rules shall include, but not
be limited to, rules relating to housing, scholarships, conduct at the
various community and technical college facilities, and discipline:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the board of trustees may suspend or expel from
community and technical colleges students who refuse to obey any of the
duly adopted rules;
(14) May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the
president or district president any of the powers and duties vested in
or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties
may be exercised in the name of the district board;
(15) May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter
and not in conflict with the directives of the college board;
(16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis other than the tuition and
fee basis set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private
or governmental entities, consistent with rules adopted by the state
board for community and technical colleges: PROVIDED, That the whole
of such special fee shall go to the college district and be not less
than the full instructional costs of such services including any salary
increases authorized by the legislature for community and technical
college employees during the term of the agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That enrollments generated hereunder shall not be counted toward the
official enrollment level of the college district for state funding
purposes;
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer
educational services on a contractual basis, charging tuition and fees
as set forth in chapter 28B.15 RCW, counting such enrollments for state
funding purposes, and may additionally charge a special supplemental
fee when necessary to cover the full instructional costs of such
services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be subject to review by
the state board for community and technical colleges and to such rules
as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure that
the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the
basis of contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of
the course will be discounted to the percentage provided by the
college;
(18) Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees
that may be formed by the various boards of trustees; such association
may expend any or all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often
if necessary, to the governor and to the legislature, the
recommendations of the association regarding changes which would affect
the efficiency of such association;
(19) May participate in higher education centers and consortia that
involve any four-year public or independent college or university:
PROVIDED, That new degree programs or off-campus programs offered by a
four-year public or independent college or university in collaboration
with a community or technical college are subject to approval by the
higher education coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230; ((and))
(20) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities imposed by
law or rule of the state board; and
(21) May confer honorary associate of arts degrees upon persons who
request an honorary degree if they were students at the college in 1942
and did not graduate because they were ordered into an internment camp.
The honorary degree may also be requested by a representative of
deceased persons who meet these requirements. For the purposes of this
subsection, "internment camp" means a relocation center to which
persons were ordered evacuated by Presidential Executive Order 9066,
signed on February 19, 1942.

--- END ---