BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.32A.030 and 2000 c 123 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily
administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or
her designee.
(3) "At-risk youth" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive
hours without consent of his or her parent;
(b) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or any other person; or
(c) Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no
pending criminal charges related to the substance abuse.
(4) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean any unemancipated
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.
(5) "Child in need of services" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or other person;
(b) Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without
consent for at least twenty-four consecutive hours on two or more
separate occasions from the home of either parent, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement; and
(i) Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or
(ii) Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; ((or))
(c)(i) Who is in need of: (A) Necessary services, including food,
shelter, health care, clothing, or education; or (B) services designed
to maintain or reunite the family;
(ii) Who lacks access to, or has declined to utilize, these
services; and
(iii) Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful
efforts to maintain the family structure or are unable or unwilling to
continue efforts to maintain the family structure; or
(d) Who is a "sexually exploited child".
(6) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in
juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department seeking
adjudication of placement of the child.
(7) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure
facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.
(8) "Custodian" means the person or entity who has the legal right
to the custody of the child.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a grandparent,
brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin
with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is
willing and available to care for the child.
(11) "Guardian" means that person or agency that (a) has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than
a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the right to legal
custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian"
does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(12) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide
assistance and support to a child who is an at-risk youth or a child in
need of services and his or her parent. The team shall include the
parent, a department case worker, a local government representative
when authorized by the local government, and when appropriate, members
from the mental health and substance abuse disciplines. The team may
also include, but is not limited to, the following persons: Educators,
law enforcement personnel, probation officers, employers, church
persons, tribal members, therapists, medical personnel, social service
providers, placement providers, and extended family members. The team
members shall be volunteers who do not receive compensation while
acting in a capacity as a team member, unless the member's employer
chooses to provide compensation or the member is a state employee.
(13) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW.
(14) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or guardian.
(15) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or
portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured
perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving
without permission of the facility staff.
(16) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including but not
limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster family
homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed
there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the
department, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours
for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents
are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent
residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator,
where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon
the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the
administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the
administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave,
his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her
return to the center.
(17) "Sexually exploited child" means any person under the age of
eighteen who is a victim of the crime of commercial sex abuse of a
minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor
under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of
a minor under RCW 9.68A.102.
(18) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care facility
licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of at least
one adult staff member to every two children.
(((18))) (19) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at
a fact-finding hearing on a child in need of services petition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 13.32A RCW
to read as follows:
Within available funding, when a sexually exploited child is
referred to the department, the department shall connect that child
with the services and treatment specified in RCW 74.14B.060 and
74.14B.070.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.68.070 and 2009 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The right to benefits under this chapter and the amount thereof
will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained
in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided in this section:
(1) The provisions contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030,
51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180, 51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not
applicable to this chapter.
(2) Each victim injured as a result of a criminal act, including
criminal acts committed between July 1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or
the victim's family or dependents in case of death of the victim, are
entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter, subject to the
limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties, responsibilities,
limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as contained in RCW
51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.
(3)(a) The limitations contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to
claims under this chapter. In addition ((thereto)), no person or
spouse, child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits
under this chapter when the injury for which benefits are sought, was:
(((a))) (i) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by
the victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the
death of the victim;
(((b))) (ii) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the
attempt to commit, or the commission of, a felony; or
(((c))) (iii) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county
or city jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal
institution, or any state correctional institution maintained and
operated by the department of social and health services or the
department of corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or
confined or living in any other institution maintained and operated by
the department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(b) A person identified as the "minor" in the charge of commercial
sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial
sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for
commercial sexual abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.102 is considered a
victim of a criminal act for the purpose of the right to benefits under
this chapter even if the person is also charged with prostitution under
RCW 9A.88.030.
(4) The benefits established upon the death of a worker and
contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be the benefits obtainable under this
chapter and provisions relating to payment contained in that section
shall equally apply under this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). Benefits
for burial expenses shall not exceed the amount paid by the department
in case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW in
any claim((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). If the criminal act results in
the death of a victim who was not gainfully employed at the time of the
criminal act, and who was not so employed for at least three
consecutive months of the twelve months immediately preceding the
criminal act;
(a) Benefits payable to an eligible surviving spouse, where there
are no children of the victim at the time of the criminal act who have
survived the victim or where such spouse has legal custody of all of
his or her children, shall be limited to burial expenses and a lump sum
payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without reference to
number of children, if any;
(b) Where any such spouse has legal custody of one or more but not
all of such children, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and such
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody
of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or children;
(c) If any such spouse does not have legal custody of any of the
children, the burial expenses shall be paid and the spouse shall
receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody of the
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or
children;
(d) If no such spouse survives, then such burial expenses shall be
paid, and each surviving child of the victim at the time of the
criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children and where
there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.
No other benefits may be paid or payable under these circumstances.
(5) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total
disability proximately caused by the criminal act shall be the benefits
obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter: PROVIDED, That if
a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled as a proximate result
of the criminal act and was not gainfully employed at the time of the
criminal act, the victim shall receive monthly during the period of the
disability the following percentages, where applicable, of the average
monthly wage determined as of the date of the criminal act pursuant to
RCW 51.08.018:
(a) If married at the time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent
of the average monthly wage.
(b) If married with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(c) If married with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-eight percent of the average monthly wage.
(d) If married with three children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-one percent of the average monthly wage.
(e) If married with four children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the criminal act, twenty-five
percent of the average monthly wage.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty percent of the average monthly wage.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of the criminal
act, thirty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of the criminal
act, forty percent of the average monthly wage.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-three percent of the average monthly wage.
(6) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section equally apply
under this chapter.
(7) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under
this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). No person is eligible for temporary
total disability benefits under this chapter if such person was not
gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act, and was not so
employed for at least three consecutive months of the twelve months
immediately preceding the criminal act.
(8) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of
benefits during vocational rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable
under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment contained in
that section apply under this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)). Benefits
shall not exceed five thousand dollars for any single injury.
(9) The provisions for lump sum payment of benefits upon death or
permanent total disability as contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under
this chapter.
(10) The provisions relating to payment of benefits to, for or on
behalf of workers contained in RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100,
51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135, 51.32.140, 51.32.150, 51.32.160, and
51.32.210 are applicable to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of
victims under this chapter.
(11) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter where the person making a claim
for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to state
or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend and
convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which gave rise to the
claim.
(12) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
victims of sexual assault are entitled to receive appropriate
counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be determined by the
department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations
of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's
immediate family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.
(13) Except for medical benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080, no
more than thirty thousand dollars shall be granted as a result of a
single injury or death, except that benefits granted as the result of
total permanent disability or death shall not exceed forty thousand
dollars.
(14) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter and Title 51
RCW, benefits payable for total temporary disability under subsection
(7) of this section, shall be limited to fifteen thousand dollars.
(15) Any person who is responsible for the victim's injuries, or
who would otherwise be unjustly enriched as a result of the victim's
injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under this chapter.
(16) Crime victims' compensation is not available to pay for
services covered under chapter 74.09 RCW or Title XIX of the federal
social security act, except to the extent that the costs for such
services exceed service limits established by the department of social
and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to the
extent necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid
reimbursement.
(17) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
immediate family members of a homicide victim may receive appropriate
counseling to assist in dealing with the immediate, near-term
consequences of the related effects of the homicide. Fees for
counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with RCW
51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the
perpetrator of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be
provided only with respect to homicides committed on or after July 1,
1992.
(18) A dependent mother, father, stepmother, or stepfather, as
defined in RCW 51.08.050, who is a survivor of her or his child's
homicide, who has been requested by a law enforcement agency or a
prosecutor to assist in the judicial proceedings related to the death
of the victim, and who is not domiciled in Washington state at the time
of the request, may receive a lump-sum payment upon arrival in this
state. Total benefits under this subsection may not exceed seven
thousand five hundred dollars. If more than one dependent parent is
eligible for this benefit, the lump-sum payment of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among the dependent parents.
(19) A victim whose crime occurred in another state who qualifies
for benefits under RCW 7.68.060(4) may receive appropriate mental
health counseling to address distress arising from participation in the
civil commitment proceedings. Fees for counseling shall be determined
by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the
limitations of RCW 7.68.080.

Sec. 4 RCW 13.40.070 and 2009 c 252 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the
commission of an offense shall be referred directly to the prosecutor.
The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall screen the complaint
to determine whether:
(a) The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the
court; and
(b) On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to
believe that the juvenile did commit the offense.
(2) If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both
the law of this state and an ordinance of any city or county of this
state, state law shall govern the prosecutor's screening and charging
decision for both filed and diverted cases.
(3) If the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this
section are met, the prosecutor shall either file an information in
juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth in subsections (5),
(6), and (((7))) (8) of this section. If the prosecutor finds that the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are not met,
the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of such decision
and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or
diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion to modify community
supervision where such offense constitutes a violation of community
supervision.
(4) An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written
statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged. It
shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter
10.37 RCW.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 13.40.213 and subsection (7) of this
section, where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file
an information with the juvenile court if:
(a) An alleged offender is accused of a class A felony, a class B
felony, an attempt to commit a class B felony, a class C felony listed
in RCW 9.94A.411(2) as a crime against persons or listed in RCW
9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment, or a class C felony that is a
violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii); or
(b) An alleged offender is accused of a felony and has a criminal
history of any felony, or at least two gross misdemeanors, or at least
two misdemeanors; or
(c) An alleged offender has previously been committed to the
department; or
(d) An alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for
prosecution or desires prosecution instead of diversion; or
(e) An alleged offender has two or more diversion agreements on the
alleged offender's criminal history; or
(f) A special allegation has been filed that the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offense was committed.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, where a
case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert the case if the
alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor or violation and
the alleged offense is the offender's first offense or violation. If
the alleged offender is charged with a related offense that must or may
be filed under subsections (5) and (((7))) (8) of this section, a case
under this subsection may also be filed.
(7) Where a case is legally sufficient to charge an alleged
offender with either prostitution or prostitution loitering and the
alleged offense is the offender's first offense, the prosecutor shall
divert the case.
(8) Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither
subsection (5) nor (6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted.
In deciding whether to file or divert an offense under this section the
prosecutor shall be guided only by the length, seriousness, and recency
of the alleged offender's criminal history and the circumstances
surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.
(((8))) (9) Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not
placed in custody, referred to a diversion interview, the parent or
legal guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as soon as possible
concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the current
status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes
against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the
time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be
notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.
(((9))) (10) The responsibilities of the prosecutor under
subsections (1) through (((8))) (9) of this section may be performed by
a juvenile court probation counselor for any complaint referred to the
court alleging the commission of an offense which would not be a felony
if committed by an adult, if the prosecutor has given sufficient
written notice to the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not
review such complaints.
(((10))) (11) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor,
or diversion unit may, in exercising their authority under this section
or RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

Sec. 5 RCW 13.40.070 and 2003 c 53 s 98 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the
commission of an offense shall be referred directly to the prosecutor.
The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall screen the complaint
to determine whether:
(a) The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the
court; and
(b) On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to
believe that the juvenile did commit the offense.
(2) If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both
the law of this state and an ordinance of any city or county of this
state, state law shall govern the prosecutor's screening and charging
decision for both filed and diverted cases.
(3) If the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this
section are met, the prosecutor shall either file an information in
juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth in subsections (5),
(6), and (7) of this section. If the alleged acts constitute the crime
of prostitution or prostitution loitering, and this is the alleged
offender's first offense, the prosecutor shall divert the case. If the
prosecutor finds that the requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of
this section are not met, the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for
one year, of such decision and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing
an information or diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion
to modify community supervision where such offense constitutes a
violation of community supervision.
(4) An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written
statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged. It
shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter
10.37 RCW.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, where a
case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file an information
with the juvenile court if:
(a) An alleged offender is accused of a class A felony, a class B
felony, an attempt to commit a class B felony, a class C felony listed
in RCW 9.94A.411(2) as a crime against persons or listed in RCW
9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment, or a class C felony that is a
violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii); or
(b) An alleged offender is accused of a felony and has a criminal
history of any felony, or at least two gross misdemeanors, or at least
two misdemeanors; or
(c) An alleged offender has previously been committed to the
department; or
(d) An alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for
prosecution or desires prosecution instead of diversion; or
(e) An alleged offender has two or more diversion agreements on the
alleged offender's criminal history; or
(f) A special allegation has been filed that the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offense was committed.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, where a
case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert the case if the
alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor or violation and
the alleged offense is the offender's first offense or violation. If
the alleged offender is charged with a related offense that must or may
be filed under subsections (5) and (7) of this section, a case under
this subsection may also be filed.
(7) Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither
subsection (5) nor (6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted.
In deciding whether to file or divert an offense under this section the
prosecutor shall be guided only by the length, seriousness, and recency
of the alleged offender's criminal history and the circumstances
surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.
(8) Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not placed
in custody, referred to a diversion interview, the parent or legal
guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as soon as possible
concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the current
status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes
against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the
time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be
notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.
(9) The responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1)
through (8) of this section may be performed by a juvenile court
probation counselor for any complaint referred to the court alleging
the commission of an offense which would not be a felony if committed
by an adult, if the prosecutor has given sufficient written notice to
the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not review such complaints.
(10) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor, or
diversion unit may, in exercising their authority under this section or
RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

Sec. 6 RCW 13.40.213 and 2009 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a juvenile is alleged to have committed the offenses of
prostitution or prostitution loitering, and the allegation, if proved,
would not be the juvenile's first offense, a prosecutor may divert the
offense if the county in which the offense is alleged to have been
committed has a comprehensive program that provides:
(a) Safe and stable housing;
(b) Comprehensive on-site case management;
(c) Integrated mental health and chemical dependency services,
including specialized trauma recovery services;
(d) Education and employment training delivered on-site; and
(e) Referrals to off-site specialized services, as appropriate.
(2) A prosecutor may divert a case for prostitution or prostitution
loitering into the comprehensive program described in this section,
notwithstanding the filing criteria set forth in RCW 13.40.070(5).
(3) A diversion agreement under this section may extend to twelve
months.
(4)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall compile data
regarding:
(i) The number of juveniles whose cases are diverted into the
comprehensive program described in this section;
(ii) Whether the juveniles complete their diversion agreements
under this section; and
(iii) Whether juveniles whose cases have been diverted under this
section have been subsequently arrested or committed subsequent
offenses.
(b) A report of the data compiled shall be provided to the governor
and the appropriate committee of the legislature by November 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
In any proceeding under this chapter related to an arrest for
prostitution or prostitution loitering, there is a presumption that the
alleged offender meets the criteria for a certification as a victim of
a severe form of trafficking in persons as defined in section 7105 of
Title 22 of the United States code, and that the alleged offender is
also a victim of commercial sex abuse of a minor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall require that to be licensed or continue to be
licensed as a secure or semi-secure crisis residential center or HOPE
center that the center has on staff, or otherwise has access to, a
person who has been trained to work with the needs of sexually
exploited children. For purposes of this section, "sexually exploited
child" means that person as defined in RCW 13.32A.030(17).

Sec. 9 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2008 c 108 s 23 and 2008 c 38 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

((Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)))

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct (RCW
9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct (RCW 9.68A.070)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW
48.17.063(((3))) (2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

((Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)))

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063(((4))))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec. 10 RCW 9A.88.140 and 2009 c 387 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of patronizing a
prostitute, promoting prostitution in the first degree, promoting
prostitution in the second degree, promoting travel for prostitution((,
commercial sexual abuse of a minor, promoting commercial sexual abuse
of a minor, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a
minor)), the arresting law enforcement officer may impound the person's
vehicle if (i) the motor vehicle was used in the commission of the
crime; (ii) the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle or the
vehicle is a rental car as defined in RCW 46.04.465; and (iii) either
(A) the person arrested has previously been convicted of one of the
offenses listed in this subsection or (B) the offense was committed
within an area designated under (b) of this subsection.
(b) A local governing authority may designate areas within which
vehicles are subject to impoundment under this section regardless of
whether the person arrested has previously been convicted of any of the
offenses listed in (a) of this subsection.
(i) The designation must be based on evidence indicating that the
area has a disproportionately higher number of arrests for the offenses
listed in (a) of this subsection as compared to other areas within the
same jurisdiction.
(ii) The local governing authority shall post signs at the
boundaries of the designated area to indicate that the area has been
designated under this subsection.
(2) Upon an arrest for a suspected violation of commercial sexual
abuse of a minor, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or
promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, the arresting
law enforcement officer shall impound the person's vehicle if (a) the
motor vehicle was used in the commission of the crime; and (b) the
person arrested is the owner of the vehicle or the vehicle is a rental
car as defined in RCW 46.04.465.
(3) Impoundments performed under this section shall be in
accordance with chapter 46.55 RCW and the impoundment order must
clearly state "prostitution hold."
(((3))) (4)(a) Prior to redeeming the impounded vehicle, and in
addition to all applicable impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid
to the towing company under chapter 46.55 RCW, the owner of the
impounded vehicle must pay a fine ((of five hundred dollars)) to the
impounding agency. The fine shall be five hundred dollars for the
offenses specified in subsection (1) of this section, or two thousand
five hundred dollars for the offenses specified in subsection (2) of
this section. The fine shall be deposited in the prostitution
prevention and intervention account established under RCW 43.63A.740.
(b) Upon receipt of the fine paid under (a) of this subsection, the
impounding agency shall issue a written receipt to the owner of the
impounded vehicle.
(((4))) (5)(a) In order to redeem a vehicle impounded under this
section, the owner must provide the towing company with the written
receipt issued under subsection (((3))) (4)(b) of this section.
(b) The written receipt issued under subsection (((3))) (4)(b) of
this section authorizes the towing company to release the impounded
vehicle upon payment of all impoundment, towing, and storage fees.
(c) A towing company that relies on a forged receipt to release a
vehicle impounded under this section is not liable to the impounding
authority for any unpaid fine under subsection (((3))) (4)(a) of this
section.
(((5))) (6)(a) In any proceeding under chapter 46.55 RCW to contest
the validity of an impoundment under this section where the claimant
substantially prevails, the claimant is entitled to a full refund of
the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter 46.55 RCW
and the five hundred dollar fine paid under subsection (((3))) (4) of
this section.
(b) If the person is found not guilty at trial for a crime listed
under subsection (1) of this section, the person is entitled to a full
refund of the impoundment, towing, and storage fees paid under chapter
46.55 RCW and the ((five hundred dollar)) fine paid under subsection
(((3))) (4) of this section.
(c) All refunds made under this section shall be paid by the
impounding agency.
(d) Prior to receiving any refund under this section, the claimant
must provide proof of payment.

Sec. 11 RCW 9.68A.100 and 2007 c 368 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of commercial sexual abuse of a minor if:
(a) He or she pays a fee to a minor or a third person as
compensation for a minor having engaged in sexual conduct with him or
her;
(b) He or she pays or agrees to pay a fee to a minor or a third
person pursuant to an understanding that in return therefore such minor
will engage in sexual conduct with him or her; or
(c) He or she solicits, offers, or requests to engage in sexual
conduct with a minor in return for a fee.
(2) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class ((C)) B felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) In addition to any other penalty provided under chapter 9A.20
RCW, a person guilty of commercial sexual abuse of a minor is subject
to the provisions under RCW 9A.88.130 and 9A.88.140.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual
intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 9.68A.101 and 2007 c 368 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor if he or she knowingly advances commercial sexual abuse of a
minor or profits from a minor engaged in sexual conduct.
(2) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class ((B))
A felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A person "advances commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct or as a person engaged in commercial sexual
abuse of a minor, he or she causes or aids a person to commit or engage
in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, procures or solicits customers
for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, provides persons or premises
for the purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor,
operates or assists in the operation of a house or enterprise for the
purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or engages
in any other conduct designed to institute, aid, cause, assist, or
facilitate an act or enterprise of commercial sexual abuse of a minor.
(b) A person "profits from commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct, he or she accepts or receives money or other
property pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person
whereby he or she participates or will participate in the proceeds of
commercial sexual abuse of a minor.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual
intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 9.68A.105 and 2007 c 368 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, and 9.68A.102, a person who is either convicted or given a
deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a
statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest
for violating RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, or a comparable
county or municipal ordinance shall be assessed a five ((hundred
fifty)) thousand dollar fee.
(b) The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(c) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, or a comparable county or
municipal ordinance, the court shall assess the fee under (a) of this
subsection. The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the
fee unless it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the
fee.
(2) The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be
collected by the clerk of the court and distributed each month to the
state treasurer for deposit in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding
prostitution prevention and intervention activities.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.63A.740 and 2009 c 387 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The prostitution prevention and intervention account is created in
the state treasury. All designated receipts from fees under RCW
9.68A.105 and 9A.88.120 and fines collected under RCW 9A.88.140 shall
be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used as follows: Fifty percent of the money collected shall be used by
the department of social and health services only for secure and semi-secure crisis residential centers to provide sexually exploited
children with access to staff trained to meet their specific needs as
provided in section 8 of this act or to provide the services specified
in RCW 74.14B.060 and 74.14B.070. Fifty percent of the money shall be
used only for funding the grant program to enhance prostitution
prevention and intervention services under RCW 43.63A.720.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If funds are appropriated specifically for
this purpose, the criminal justice training commission, in consultation
with the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall,
by December 1, 2010, develop a model policy on law enforcement officer
implementation of the procedures provided in this act relating to
contact with a minor who is a "sexually exploited child" as defined in
this act or who is a victim of offenses related to commercial sexual
abuse of a minor as defined in chapter 9.68A RCW. The commission shall
develop a curriculum based on the model policy for inclusion in its
basic training academy by January 1, 2011.

Sec. 16 RCW 9.68A.110 and 2007 c 368 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, it is not a defense that
the defendant was involved in activities of law enforcement and
prosecution agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal
offenses. Law enforcement and prosecution agencies shall not employ
minors to aid in the investigation of a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or
9.68A.100. This chapter does not apply to lawful conduct between
spouses.
(2) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, or
9.68A.080, it is not a defense that the defendant did not know the age
of the child depicted in the visual or printed matter((: PROVIDED,
That)). It is a defense, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that at the time of the offense the
defendant was not in possession of any facts on the basis of which he
or she should reasonably have known that the person depicted was a
minor.
(3) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.090, 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, it is not a defense that the defendant did not
know the alleged victim's age((: PROVIDED, That)). It is a defense,
which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that
at the time of the offense, the defendant made a reasonable bona fide
attempt to ascertain the true age of the minor by requiring production
of a driver's license, marriage license, birth certificate, or other
governmental or educational identification card or paper and did not
rely solely on the oral allegations or apparent age of the minor.
(4) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, or 9.68A.070,
it shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant was a law
enforcement officer in the process of conducting an official
investigation of a sex-related crime against a minor, or that the
defendant was providing individual case treatment as a recognized
medical facility or as a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed under
Title 18 RCW.
(5) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, or 9.68A.070,
the state is not required to establish the identity of the alleged
victim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 4 and 6 of this act expire July 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2011.

--- END ---