BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that any
state or regional program to implement a cap and trade system or any
other program to address greenhouse gas emissions or motor vehicle fuel
economy that has been or may be proposed by a state agency requires
express legislative authorization following a comprehensive assessment
of the state fiscal and other economic, consumer, and small business
impacts of the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Neither the department nor any other state agency may adopt or
enforce a state or regional program to regulate the emission of
greenhouse gas or motor vehicle fuel economy without express
legislative authorization that is enacted after the effective date of
this section.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "greenhouse gas" means carbon
dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, sulfur hexafluoride,
hydrofluorocarbon, or perfluorocarbon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.235 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The director shall provide a written report to the governor,
the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives on each proposed program to address greenhouse gas
emissions or motor vehicle fuel economy, including any program that is
the subject of a pending or previous rule-making proceeding within
three months of either the effective date of this section or the
release of recommendations by the participants in the western climate
initiative for a regional cap and trade or other program to regulate
greenhouse gas emissions or motor vehicle fuel economy.
(2) The report must include a description of the proposed program,
a comprehensive analysis of the fiscal impact to the state and the
economic, consumer, and small business impacts of the proposed program,
and the legislation required to authorize the proposed program.

--- END ---