BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.420 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.420 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any city owning and operating a public utility and having
facilities for the generation of electricity located in a county other
than that in which the city is located, may provide for the public
peace, health, safety and welfare of such county as concerns the
facilities and the personnel employed in connection therewith, by
contributing to the support of the county government of any such county
and enter into contracts with any such county therefor.
(2) Any city with a population greater than five hundred thousand
people owning and operating a public utility and having facilities for
the generation of electricity located in a county other than that in
which the city is located, must provide for the impacts of lost revenue
and the public peace, health, safety, and welfare of such county as
concerns the facilities and the personnel employed in connection
therewith, by contributing to the support of the county, city, or town
government and school district of any such county and enter into
contracts with any such county therefor as specified in RCW 35.21.425.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.21.425 and 1965 c 7 s 35.21.425 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, whenever
after March 17, 1955, any city shall construct hydroelectric generating
facilities or acquire land for the purpose of constructing the same in
a county other than the county in which such city is located, and by
reason of such construction or acquisition shall (1) cause loss of
revenue and/or place a financial burden in providing for the public
peace, health, safety, welfare, and added road maintenance in such
county, in addition to road construction or relocation as set forth in
RCW 90.28.010 and/or (2) shall cause any loss of revenues and/or
increase the financial burden of any school district affected by the
construction because of an increase in the number of pupils by reason
of the construction or the operation of said generating facilities, the
city shall enter into an agreement with said county and/or the
particular school district or districts affected for the payment of
moneys to recompense such losses or to provide for such increased
financial burden, upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually
agreeable to the city and the county and/or school district or
districts.
(2) Whenever after March 17, 1955, a municipal owned utility
located in a city with a population greater than five hundred thousand
people constructs or operates hydroelectric generating facilities or
acquires land for the purpose of constructing or operating the same in
a county other than the county in which the city is located must enter
into an agreement with the county affected for the annual payment of
moneys to recompense such losses or to provide for such increased
financial burden equivalent to seven percent of the annual utility
taxes paid by the municipal owned utility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---