BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the fish and
wildlife of Washington state are among the most important of its
natural resources, and that fish and wildlife provide vital cultural,
recreational, aesthetic, and economic contributions to the state. In
order to continue to enjoy these benefits, the state must continue to
work to conserve its existing fish and wildlife resources and recover
its threatened and endangered species.
However, the legislature also recognizes that fish and wildlife
management and recovery activities sometimes have unintended
consequences. Intervention in the propagation and dispersal of a fish
or wildlife species has the potential to cause genetic change to a
population. For example, studies have shown that artificial
propagation of Pacific salmon species can result in adverse changes to
the genetics of the wild salmon population.
Therefore, the legislature intends to encourage the use of natural
fish and wildlife propagation and dispersal methods and to minimize
unintended consequences from artificial propagation and dispersal
activities in the future. The legislature does not seek to interfere
with management and recovery activities already underway for a
particular species, such as existing hatchery programs, or to prohibit
future artificial propagation or dispersal of fish and wildlife.
Instead, the legislature intends to ensure additional policy review for
artificial propagation and dispersal activities by directly reviewing
future proposals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must obtain specific legislative authorization prior
to implementing a species management, recovery, or reintroduction plan
that recognizes a method of propagation or dispersal other than natural
propagation or dispersal where:
(1) The plan is approved for implementation on or after the
effective date of this section; and
(2) The method of dispersal or propagation, other than natural
dispersal or propagation, recognized in the plan is not currently
employed by the department for that species.

--- END ---