BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.140 and 2008 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a license to distillers, including blending,
rectifying and bottling; fee two thousand dollars per annum, unless
provided otherwise as follows:
(1) For distillers producing ((twenty)) sixty thousand gallons or
less of spirits with at least half of the raw materials used in the
production grown in Washington, the license fee shall be reduced to one
hundred dollars per annum;
(2) The board shall license stills used and to be used solely and
only by a commercial chemist for laboratory purposes, and not for the
manufacture of liquor for sale, at a fee of twenty dollars per annum;
(3) The board shall license stills used and to be used solely and
only for laboratory purposes in any school, college or educational
institution in the state, without fee; and
(4) The board shall license stills which shall have been duly
licensed as fruit and/or wine distilleries by the federal government,
used and to be used solely as fruit and/or wine distilleries in the
production of fruit brandy and wine spirits, at a fee of two hundred
dollars per annum.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.145 and 2008 c 94 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any craft distillery may sell spirits of its own production for
consumption off the premises, up to two liters per person per day.
Spirits sold under this subsection must be purchased from the board and
sold at the retail price established by the board. A craft distillery
selling spirits under this subsection must comply with the applicable
laws and rules relating to retailers.
(2) Any craft distillery may contract distill spirits for, and sell
contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers'
licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export.
(3) (([(2)])) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may
provide, free of charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of
its own production to persons on the premises of the distillery. The
maximum total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who
participates in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a
class 12 alcohol server permit. Spirits used for samples must be
purchased from the board.
(4) (([(3)])) The board shall adopt rules to implement the alcohol
server permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement
this section.
(5) (([(4)])) Distilling is an agricultural practice.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.28.310 and 2009 c 506 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
providing retailers branded promotional items which are of nominal
value, singly or in the aggregate. Such items include but are not
limited to: Trays, lighters, blotters, postcards, pencils, coasters,
menu cards, meal checks, napkins, clocks, mugs, glasses, bottles or can
openers, corkscrews, matches, printed recipes, shirts, hats, visors,
and other similar items. Branded promotional items:
(i) Must be used exclusively by the retailer or its employees in a
manner consistent with its license;
(ii) Must bear imprinted advertising matter of the industry member
only;
(iii) May be provided by industry members only to retailers and
their employees and may not be provided by or through retailers or
their employees to retail customers; and
(iv) May not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.
(b) An industry member is not obligated to provide any such branded
promotional items, and a retailer may not require an industry member to
provide such branded promotional items as a condition for selling any
alcohol to the retailer.
(c) Any industry member or retailer or any other person asserting
that the provision of branded promotional items as allowed in (a) of
this subsection has resulted or is more likely than not to result in
undue influence or an adverse impact on public health and safety, or is
otherwise inconsistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection may
file a complaint with the board. Upon receipt of a complaint the board
may conduct such investigation as it deems appropriate in the
circumstances. If the investigation reveals the provision of branded
promotional items has resulted in or is more likely than not to result
in undue influence or has resulted or is more likely than not to result
in an adverse impact on public health and safety or is otherwise
inconsistent with (a) of this subsection the board may issue an
administrative violation notice to the industry member, to the
retailer, or both. The recipient of the administrative violation
notice may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
providing to a special occasion licensee and a special occasion
licensee from receiving services for:
(a) Installation of draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising;
((or))
(b) Advertising, pouring, or dispensing of beer or wine at a beer
or wine tasting exhibition or judging event; or
(c) Pouring or dispensing of spirits distilled by a licensed
domestic distiller or the accredited representative of a distiller,
manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor licensed
under RCW 66.24.310.
(3) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits industry members from
performing, and retailers from accepting the service of building,
rotating, and restocking displays and stockroom inventories; rotating
and rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products;
providing point of sale material and brand signs; pricing case goods of
their own brands; and performing such similar business services
consistent with board rules, or personal services as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits:
(a) Industry members from listing on their internet web sites
information related to retailers who sell or promote their products,
including direct links to the retailers' internet web sites; and
(b) Retailers from listing on their internet web sites information
related to industry members whose products those retailers sell or
promote, including direct links to the industry members' web sites; or
(c) Industry members and retailers from producing, jointly or
together with regional, state, or local industry associations,
brochures and materials promoting tourism in Washington state which
contain information regarding retail licensees, industry members, and
their products.
(5) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits the performance of personal
services offered from time to time by a domestic winery or certificate
of approval holder to retailers when the personal services are (a)
conducted at a licensed premises, and (b) intended to inform, educate,
or enhance customers' knowledge or experience of the manufacturer's
products. The performance of personal services may include
participation and pouring, bottle signing events, and other similar
informational or educational activities at the premises of a retailer
holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, a wine and/or
beer restaurant license, a specialty wine shop license, a special
occasion license, or a private club license. A domestic winery or
certificate of approval holder is not obligated to perform any such
personal services, and a retail licensee may not require a domestic
winery or certificate of approval holder to conduct any personal
service as a condition for selling any alcohol to the retail licensee.
Except as provided in RCW 66.28.150, the cost of sampling may not be
borne, directly or indirectly, by any domestic winery or certificate of
approval holder or any distributor. Nothing in this section prohibits
wineries, certificate of approval holders, and retail licensees from
identifying the producers on private labels authorized under RCW
66.24.400, 66.24.425, and 66.24.450.
(6) Nothing in RCW 66.28.305 prohibits an industry member from
entering into an arrangement with any holder of a sports entertainment
facility license or an affiliated business for brand advertising at the
licensed facility or promoting events held at the sports entertainment
facility as authorized under RCW 66.24.570.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.24.520 and 1986 c 214 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a grower's license to sell wine or spirits made from
grapes or other agricultural products owned at the time of vinification
or distillation by the licensee in bulk to holders of domestic
wineries', distillers', or manufacturers' licenses or for export. The
wine or spirits shall be made upon the premises of a domestic winery or
craft distillery licensee and is referred to in this section as
grower's wine or grower's spirits. A grower's license authorizes the
agricultural product grower to contract for the manufacturing of wine
or spirits from the grower's own agricultural product, store wine or
spirits in bulk made from agricultural products produced by the holder
of this license, and to sell wine or spirits in bulk made from the
grower's own agricultural products to a winery or distillery in the
state of Washington or to export in bulk for sale out-of-state. The
annual fee for a grower's license shall be seventy-five dollars. For
the purpose of chapter 66.28 RCW, a grower licensee shall be deemed a
manufacturer.

--- END ---