BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Hospitals licensed under this chapter shall adopt a policy that
at a minimum:
(a) Provides influenza vaccination, free of charge, to the
hospital's health care workers;
(b) Requires the hospital's health care workers who indicate they
will decline influenza vaccination to participate in an educational
program specified by the hospital about the influenza vaccine prior to
declining, including the risk posed to health care workers who contract
influenza and the risk to patients who may become ill as a result of
exposure to health care workers infected with influenza. Such training
must be completed within the time frame specified by the hospital;
(c) Requires the hospital's health care workers to provide annual
documentation of immunization for influenza or a signed declination
citing medical, religious, or philosophical objections; and
(d) Requires health care workers to wear a surgical mask or
alternative personal protective equipment as determined by the
hospital's infection control program when working with patients during
influenza season while unvaccinated for influenza.
(2) For purposes of this section, "health care worker" means an
employee, independent contractor, licensee, or other individual who is
involved in the delivery of health care services.
(3) Hospitals shall report to the department, on an annual basis,
vaccination rates for all health care workers.
(4) The secretary may, after consulting with hospitals regarding
vaccine supply, suspend the requirements of this section for a period
of time, not to exceed one year, if the secretary determines a shortage
of vaccine exists such that there would not be enough vaccine to
vaccinate health care workers in accordance with this section.
(5) Nothing in this section prohibits an individual hospital from
adopting a stricter policy than that provided for in this section.
(6) Nothing in this section may be interpreted as a mandate that
health care workers be vaccinated for influenza.

--- END ---