BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.053 and 2009 c 460 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when
authorized so to do by the voters of such school district in the manner
and for the purposes and number of years allowable under Article VII,
section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state. Elections for such
taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made or, in the
case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies for
maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support
the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities,
which includes the purposes of RCW 28A.320.330(2) (f) and (g), in the
year in which the first annual levy is made.
(2) Once additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance
and operation support of a school district for a two-year through four-year period as provided under subsection (1) of this section, no
further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support of
the district for that period may be authorized, except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section. For the purpose of applying the
limitation of this subsection, a two-year through six-year levy to
support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school
facilities shall not be deemed to be a tax levy for maintenance and
operation support of a school district.
(3) A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by
the board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication
in the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections,
at which special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy
shall be submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the
proposition to vote "yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".
(4) During calendar years 2011 through 2017, school districts where
voters have authorized a multiyear levy may seek voter authorization
for an additional maintenance and operations levy if all of the
following conditions are met:
(a) The district has a multiyear levy for maintenance and
operations during any of the calendar years 2011 through 2017 that was
authorized before or during calendar year 2010;
(b) The original maintenance and operations levy plus the
additional levy may not exceed the maximum levy percentage established
in RCW 84.52.0531; and
(c) The additional levy for maintenance and operations expires
before or concurrent with the original maintenance and operations levy
that was approved before or during calendar year 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2009 c 4 s 908 are each amended to read
as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and
thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or
minus (b) and (c) of this subsection minus (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (3) and (4)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section;
(b) For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((5))) (6) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the
maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(3) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005 and
thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in
(a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (4) of
this section, including allocations for compensation increases, plus
the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per full
time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(4) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through ((2011))
2017, in addition to the allocations included under subsection (3)(a)
through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also include
the following:
(a)(i) For calendar year 2010, the difference between the
allocation the district would have received in the current school year
had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st sp.
sess. and the allocation the district received in the current school
year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall offset the amount added to a district's levy
base pursuant to this subsection (4)(a)(i) by any additional per
student allocations included in a district's levy base pursuant to the
enactment of an initiative to the people subsequent to June 10, 2004;
(ii) For calendar years 2011 through 2017, the difference between
the allocation the district would have received in the prior school
year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of 2003 1st
sp. sess. and the allocation the district received in the prior school
year pursuant to RCW 84.52.068. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall offset the amount added to a district's levy
base pursuant to this subsection (4)(a)(ii) by any additional per
student allocations included in a district's levy base pursuant to the
enactment of an initiative to the people subsequent to June 10, 2004;
and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year had RCW 28A.400.205 not been amended by
chapter 20, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess. or chapter 4, Laws of 2009, and
the allocations the district actually received the prior school year
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205. The office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall offset the amount added to a district's levy
base pursuant to this subsection (4)(b) by any additional salary
increase allocations included in a district's levy base pursuant to the
enactment of an initiative to the people subsequent to June 10, 2004.
(5) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, in
addition to the allocations included under subsections (3)(a) through
(c) and (4)(a) of this section, a district's levy base shall also
include the difference between an allocation of fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four enrolled in the
prior school year and the allocation of certificated instructional
staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through four that the district actually received in the
prior school year, except that the levy base for a school district
whose allocation in the 2009-10 school year was less than fifty-three
and two-tenths certificated instructional staff units per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four shall
include the difference between the allocation the district actually
received in the 2009-10 school year and the allocation the district
actually received in the prior school year.
(6) For calendar years 2011 through 2017, a district's maximum levy
percentage shall be thirty-six percent. For calendar year 2010, a
district's maximum levy percentage shall be ((twenty-two percent in
1998 and)) twenty-four percent ((in 1999 and every year thereafter));
plus, for qualifying districts, the grandfathered percentage determined
as follows:
(a) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(b) For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:
(i) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (3) of this
section;
(ii) Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(iii) Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(iv) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii) of this subsection.
(((6))) (7) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section: (a) That are not attributable
to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy
reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after
the start of the current school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by
using prior school year data in place of current school year data.
Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school
districts from cities or counties.
(((7))) (8) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((8))) (9) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((9))) (10) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((10))) (11) The superintendent of public instruction shall
develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the
pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(((11))) (12) For calendar year 2009, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall recalculate school district
levy authority to reflect levy rates certified by school districts for
calendar year 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.500.020 and 2004 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(a) "Prior tax collection year" means the year immediately
preceding the year in which the local effort assistance shall be
allocated.
(b) "Statewide average twelve percent levy rate" means twelve
percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW 84.52.0531 (3) and
(4) summed for all school districts, and divided by the total assessed
valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax collection year for
all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(c) The "district's twelve percent levy amount" means the school
district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined under RCW
84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's maximum levy
percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(5) multiplied by twelve
percent.
(d) The "district's twelve percent levy rate" means the district's
twelve percent levy amount divided by the district's assessed valuation
for excess levy purposes for the prior tax collection year as adjusted
to one hundred percent by the county indicated ratio.
(e) "Statewide average eighteen percent levy rate" means eighteen
percent of the total levy bases as defined in RCW 84.52.0531 (3) and
(4) summed for all school districts, and divided by the total assessed
valuation for excess levy purposes in the prior tax collection year for
all districts as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio established in RCW 84.48.075.
(f) The "district's eighteen percent levy amount" means the school
district's maximum levy authority after transfers determined under RCW
84.52.0531(2) (a) through (c) divided by the district's maximum levy
percentage determined under RCW 84.52.0531(5) multiplied by eighteen
percent.
(g) The "district's eighteen percent levy rate" means the
district's eighteen percent levy amount divided by the district's
assessed valuation for excess levy purposes for the prior tax
collection year as adjusted to one hundred percent by the county
indicated ratio.
(h) "Districts eligible for twelve percent local effort assistance"
means:
(i) Before calendar year 2011, those districts with a twelve
percent levy rate that exceeds the statewide average twelve percent
levy rate; and
(ii) During calendar years 2011 through 2013, those districts with
a twelve percent levy rate that exceeds the statewide average twelve
percent levy rate and that, in the prior school year, were not in the
one-fourth of such districts receiving the least per-pupil funding from
state and federal sources.
(i) "Districts eligible for eighteen percent local effort
assistance" means, during calendar years 2011 through 2013, those
districts with a twelve percent levy rate that exceeds the statewide
average twelve percent levy rate and that, in the prior school year,
were in the one-fourth of such districts receiving the least per-pupil
funding from state and federal sources.
(2) Unless otherwise stated all rates, percents, and amounts are
for the calendar year for which local effort assistance is being
calculated under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.500.030 and 2006 c 372 s 904 and 2006 c 119 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Allocation of state matching funds to eligible districts for local
effort assistance shall be determined as follows:
(1) Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation
levies shall be matched with state funds using the following ratio of
state funds to levy funds:
(a) For districts eligible for twelve percent local effort
assistance,
(i) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; to
(((b))) (ii) The statewide average twelve percent levy rate.
(b) For districts eligible for eighteen percent local effort
assistance,
(i) The difference between the district's eighteen percent levy
rate and the statewide average eighteen percent levy rate; to
(ii) The statewide average eighteen percent levy rate.
(2) The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts
eligible for local effort assistance shall be the district's twelve
percent levy amount, multiplied by the following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate
and the statewide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's twelve percent levy rate.
(3) ((Calendar year 2003 allocations and maximum eligibility under
this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.99.
(4) From January 1, 2004, to December 31, 2005, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.937.
(5) From January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, allocations and
maximum eligibility under this chapter shall be multiplied by 0.9563.
Beginning with calendar year 2007, allocations and maximum eligibility
under this chapter shall be fully funded at one hundred percent and
shall not be reduced.)) The maximum amount of state matching funds for
districts eligible for eighteen percent local effort assistance shall
be the district's eighteen percent levy amount, multiplied by the
following percentage:
(a) The difference between the district's eighteen percent levy
rate and the statewide average eighteen percent levy rate; divided by
(b) The district's eighteen percent levy rate.

Sec. 5 2006 c 119 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
This act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2018.

Sec. 6 2009 c 4 s 909 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Section 908 of this act expires January 1, ((2012)) 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act expire
January 1, 2018.

--- END ---