BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.260 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall monitor television energy efficiency standards
proposed in California and Oregon. After either state adopts proposed
standards and the department determines that uniform standards among
west coast states would promote consistency and provide market
influence in achieving greater energy efficiency, the department shall,
by December 1st of the year in which it makes the determination,
provide recommendations regarding adoption of television energy
efficiency standards to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

--- END ---