BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 On September 1, 2010, the department shall
reinstate the driving privileges of a person whose driving privileges
were suspended pursuant to RCW 46.20.289 due solely to a notice of
failure to: Respond to a notice of traffic infraction, appear at a
requested hearing, comply with a written promise to appear in court, or
comply with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation;
provided such infraction was committed prior to September 1, 2010, and
the notice of infraction was issued in Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.031 and 2002 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall not issue a driver's license to a person:
(1) Who is under the age of sixteen years;
(2) Whose driving privilege has been withheld unless and until the
department may authorize the driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;
(3) Who is the subject of a notification from the court to the
department as provided in RCW 46.63.110(6) (a) or (b) until such time
as the department receives notification from the court that the
conditions set forth in RCW 46.63.110(6) (a) or (b) have been met;
(4) Who has been classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol
abuser, or drug abuser by a program approved by the department of
social and health services. The department may, however, issue a
license if the person:
(a) Has been granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05
RCW; or
(b) Is satisfactorily participating in or has successfully
completed an alcohol or drug abuse treatment program approved by the
department of social and health services and has established control of
his or her alcohol or drug abuse problem;
(((4))) (5) Who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill or
insane, or to be incompetent due to a mental disability or disease.
The department shall, however, issue a license to the person if he or
she otherwise qualifies and:
(a) Has been restored to competency by the methods provided by law;
or
(b) The superior court finds the person able to operate a motor
vehicle with safety upon the highways during such incompetency;
(((5))) (6) Who has not passed the driver's licensing examination
required by RCW 46.20.120 and 46.20.305, if applicable;
(((6))) (7) Who is required under the laws of this state to deposit
proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited such proof;
(((7))) (8) Who is unable to safely operate a motor vehicle upon
the highways due to a physical or mental disability. The department's
conclusion that a person is barred from licensing under this subsection
must be reasonable and be based upon good and substantial evidence.
This determination is subject to review by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.291 and 2007 c 393 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to suspend the license of a driver
upon a showing by its records or other sufficient evidence that the
licensee:
(1) Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or
suspension of license is provided by law;
(2) Has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle,
caused or contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury to
any person or serious property damage;
(3) Has been convicted of offenses against traffic regulations
governing the movement of vehicles, or found to have committed traffic
infractions, with such frequency as to indicate a disrespect for
traffic laws or a disregard for the safety of other persons on the
highways;
(4) Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);
(5) Has failed to ((respond to a notice of traffic infraction,
failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to
appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of
traffic infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289)) comply
with the terms of a traffic citation issued by another jurisdiction
that is a party to the nonresident violator compact, chapter 46.23 RCW,
or a jurisdiction with which Washington state has entered into an
agreement pursuant to RCW 46.23.020;
(6) Is subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.305 or 9A.56.078;
(7) Has committed one of the prohibited practices relating to
drivers' licenses defined in RCW 46.20.0921; or
(8) Has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support
order or a residential or visitation order as provided in RCW
74.20A.320.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.311 and 2006 c 73 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall not suspend a driver's license or
privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed
period of more than one year, except as specifically permitted under
RCW 46.20.267, 46.20.342, or other provision of law.
(b) Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.267, ((46.20.289,))
46.20.291(5), 46.61.740, or 74.20A.320, whenever the license or driving
privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a conviction, a
finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided
in chapter 46.29 RCW.
(c) If the suspension is the result of a nonfelony violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's
eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided by the
alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until enrollment and
participation in an approved program has been established and the
person is otherwise qualified. If the suspension is the result of a
violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the department shall
determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports
provided by the alcohol or drug dependency agency required under RCW
46.61.524 and shall deny reinstatement until satisfactory progress in
an approved program has been established and the person is otherwise
qualified. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and the person is required pursuant to RCW
46.20.720 to drive only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock, the department shall determine the person's
eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by a company
doing business in the state that it has installed the required device
on a vehicle owned or operated by the person seeking reinstatement.
If, based upon notification from the interlock provider or otherwise,
the department determines that an interlock required under RCW
46.20.720 is no longer installed or functioning as required, the
department shall suspend the person's license or privilege to drive.
Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended or
revoked as a result of noncompliance with an ignition interlock
requirement, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person
provides notice issued by a company doing business in the state that a
vehicle owned or operated by the person is equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock device.
(d) Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is
suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child
support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation
order, the suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides
a release issued by the department of social and health services
stating that the person is in compliance with the order.
(e)(i) The department shall not issue to the person a new,
duplicate, or renewal license until the person pays a reissue fee of
seventy-five dollars.
(ii) If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or is the result of administrative action under
RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.
(2)(a) Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor
vehicle on the public highways has been revoked, unless the revocation
was for a cause which has been removed, is not entitled to have the
license or privilege renewed or restored until: (i) After the
expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to drive
was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided
by RCW 46.20.265.
(b)(i) After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person
may make application for a new license as provided by law together with
a reissue fee in the amount of seventy-five dollars.
(ii) If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW
46.20.308, 46.61.502, or 46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars. If the revocation is the result of a nonfelony
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine
the person's eligibility for licensing based upon the reports provided
by the alcoholism agency or probation department designated under RCW
46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit, or privilege
to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502(6) or
46.61.504(6), the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcohol or drug
dependency agency required under RCW 46.61.524 and shall deny
reinstatement until satisfactory progress in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
and the person is required pursuant to RCW 46.20.720 to drive only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other
biological or technical device, the department shall determine the
person's eligibility for licensing based upon written verification by
a company doing business in the state that it has installed the
required device on a vehicle owned or operated by the person applying
for a new license. If, following issuance of a new license, the
department determines, based upon notification from the interlock
provider or otherwise, that an interlock required under RCW 46.20.720
is no longer functioning, the department shall suspend the person's
license or privilege to drive until the department has received written
verification from an interlock provider that a functioning interlock is
installed.
(c) Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department
shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe
to grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public
highways, and until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29
RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person
the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.
(3)(a) Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended
pursuant to Article IV of the nonresident violators compact or RCW
46.23.020 ((or 46.20.289)) or 46.20.291(5), the department shall not
issue to the person any new or renewal license until the person pays a
reissue fee of seventy-five dollars.
(b) If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of
this or any other state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i)
the operation or physical control of a motor vehicle upon the public
highways while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or
(ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test of the driver's blood
alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.342 and 2008 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this
state while that person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his
or her privilege to drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other
state. Any person who has a valid Washington driver's license is not
guilty of a violation of this section.
(a) A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65
RCW, who violates this section while an order of revocation issued
under chapter 46.65 RCW prohibiting such operation is in effect, is
guilty of driving while license suspended or revoked in the first
degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first such conviction, the
person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than ten days.
Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or
subsequent conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than one hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted
of the offense defined in RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both
convictions arise from the same event, the minimum sentence of
confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The minimum sentence
of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from
petitioning for reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.
(b) A person who violates this section while an order of suspension
or revocation prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the
person is not eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or
driving privilege, other than for a suspension for the reasons
described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor. This
subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving
privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:
(i) A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor
vehicle was used;
(ii) A previous conviction under this section;
(iii) A notice received by the department from a court or diversion
unit as provided by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has
committed, or who has entered a diversion unit concerning an offense
relating to alcohol, legend drugs, controlled substances, or imitation
controlled substances;
(iv) A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of
restrictions of an occupational driver's license, a temporary
restricted driver's license, or an ignition interlock driver's license;
(v) A conviction of RCW 46.20.345, relating to the operation of a
motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;
(vi) A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of
injury to or death of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(vii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to
elude pursuing police vehicles;
(viii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;
(ix) A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a
person under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(x) A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;
(xi) A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;
(xii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless
endangerment of roadway workers;
(xiii) A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of
vehicles on highways;
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children
in an unattended vehicle with motor running;
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.740, relating to theft of motor
vehicle fuel;
(xvi) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting,
aiding, abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(xvii) An administrative action taken by the department under
chapter 46.20 RCW; or
(xviii) A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution of a political subdivision of this state, the federal
government, or any other state, of an offense substantially similar to
a violation included in this subsection.
(c) A person who violates this section when his or her driver's
license or driving privilege is, at the time of the violation,
suspended or revoked solely because (i) the person must furnish proof
of satisfactory progress in a required alcoholism or drug treatment
program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of financial responsibility
for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii) the person has
failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW relating to
uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to ((respond to a
notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing,
violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply
with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289)) comply with the terms of a traffic citation
issued by another jurisdiction that is a party to the nonresident
violator compact, chapter 46.23 RCW, or a jurisdiction with which
Washington state has entered into an agreement pursuant to RCW
46.23.020, (v) the person has committed an offense in another state
that, if committed in this state, would not be grounds for the
suspension or revocation of the person's driver's license, (vi) the
person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or more of the
items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to reinstate
his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time of the
violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under
RCW 46.20.267 relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (vii), is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.
(2) Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon
receiving an order by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court
officer of the conviction of any juvenile under this section, the
department shall:
(a) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
first degree, as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend
the period of administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW
for an additional period of one year from and after the date the person
would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license or have
his or her driving privilege restored; or
(b) For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the
second degree, as provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not
issue a new license or restore the driving privilege for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise
have been entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her
driving privilege restored; or
(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the
conviction was under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section and the
court recommends against the extension and the convicted person has
obtained a valid driver's license, the period of suspension or
revocation shall not be extended.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.391 and 2008 c 282 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an
offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation
of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular homicide,
vehicular assault, driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
may submit to the department an application for a temporary restricted
driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee
and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to receive the
license, may issue a temporary restricted driver's license and may set
definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to ((failure to appear or pay a
traffic ticket under RCW 46.20.289;)) a violation of the financial
responsibility laws under chapter 46.29 RCW((;)) or for multiple
violations within a specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may
apply to the department for an occupational driver's license.
(b) ((If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c))) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation.
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first-class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. The effective date of
cancellation shall be fifteen days from the date of mailing the notice.
If at any time before the cancellation goes into effect the driver
submits evidence of continued enrollment in the program, the
cancellation shall be stayed. If the cancellation becomes effective,
the driver may obtain, at no additional charge, a new occupational
driver's license upon submittal of evidence of enrollment in another
program that meets the criteria set forth in this subsection; and
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license upon receipt of notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, or of a separate offense that under this chapter
((46.20 RCW)) would warrant suspension or revocation of a regular
driver's license. The cancellation is effective as of the date of the
conviction, and continues with the same force and effect as any
suspension or revocation under this title.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.52.101 and 2006 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every district court, municipal court, and clerk of a superior
court shall keep or cause to be kept a record of every traffic
complaint, traffic citation, notice of infraction, or other legal form
of traffic charge deposited with or presented to the court or a traffic
violations bureau, and shall keep a record of every official action by
the court or its traffic violations bureau regarding the charge,
including but not limited to a record of every conviction, forfeiture
of bail, judgment of acquittal, finding that a traffic infraction has
been committed, dismissal of a notice of infraction, and the amount of
fine, forfeiture, or penalty resulting from every traffic charge
deposited with or presented to the court or traffic violations bureau.
In the case of a record of a conviction for a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the court shall maintain the record permanently.
(2) After the conviction, forfeiture of bail, or finding that a
traffic infraction was committed for a violation of any provisions of
this chapter or other law regulating the operating of vehicles on
highways, the clerk of the court in which the conviction was had, bail
was forfeited, or the finding of commission was made shall prepare and
immediately forward to the director of licensing at Olympia an abstract
of the court record covering the case. Report need not be made of a
finding involving the illegal parking or standing of a vehicle.
(3) The abstract must be made upon a form or forms furnished by the
director and must include the name and address of the party charged,
the number, if any, of the party's driver's or chauffeur's license, the
registration number of the vehicle involved if required by the
director, the nature of the offense, the date of hearing, the plea, the
judgment, whether the offense was an alcohol-related offense as defined
in RCW 46.01.260(2), whether the incident that gave rise to the offense
charged resulted in a fatality, whether bail was forfeited, whether the
determination that a traffic infraction was committed was contested,
and the amount of the fine, forfeiture, or penalty, as the case may be.
The abstract for any infractions involving violations of RCW
46.30.020 shall include the vehicle license number for the vehicle that
was being driven at the time of the infraction.
(4) In courts where the judicial information system or other secure
method of electronic transfer of information has been implemented
between the court and the department of licensing, the court may
electronically provide the information required in subsections (2),
(3), and (5) of this section.
(5) The superior court clerk shall also forward a like report to
the director upon the conviction of a person of a felony in the
commission of which a vehicle was used.
(6) The director shall keep all abstracts received under this
section at the director's office in Olympia. The abstracts must be
open to public inspection during reasonable business hours.
(7) The officer, prosecuting attorney, or city attorney signing the
charge or information in a case involving a charge of driving under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug shall immediately request
from the director an abstract of convictions and forfeitures. The
director shall furnish the requested abstract.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.63.110 and 2009 c 479 s 39 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is
two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is
five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the court determines, in its discretion, that
a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more
than one year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date
the monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court
shall enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has
previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same
monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any
existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. ((If the court has notified the
department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person
has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial
payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has
been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of
the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to
respond to that infraction.)) "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial
ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount
at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment
plan.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment
plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court shall
notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of
the plan, and the department shall ((suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege)) not renew the person's driver's license
or allow a driver's license to be issued to the person until all
monetary obligations, including those imposed under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section, have been paid, and court authorized community
restitution has been completed, or until the department has been
notified that the court has entered into a new time payment or
community restitution agreement with the person.
Renewal or issuance of a person's driver's license may be processed
by the department only if the conditions set forth in this subsection
(6)(a) have been satisfied and the person pays an eighty dollar
surcharge to be deposited into the highway safety fund.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court shall notify the department of the
delinquency. The department shall ((suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege)) not renew the person's driver's license
or allow a driver's license to be issued to the person until all
monetary obligations have been paid, including those imposed under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, or until the person has
entered into a payment plan under this section.
Renewal or issuance of a person's driver's license may be processed
by the department only if the conditions set forth in this subsection
(6)(b) have been satisfied and the person pays an eighty dollar
surcharge to be deposited into the highway safety fund.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this
section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time
payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:
(a) A fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;
(b) A fee of ten dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington auto
theft prevention authority account; and
(c) A fee of two dollars per infraction. Revenue from this fee
shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic
brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 shall be assessed an additional penalty of twenty
dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional
penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court
authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in
the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a
part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in
the court authorized community restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the
state general fund. The balance of the revenue received by the county
or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the
county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or
county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to
collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty
imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its
discretion, enter into a payment plan.
(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two
hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars
for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each
violation thereafter.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.16.216 and 2004 c 231 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To renew a vehicle license, an applicant shall satisfy all
listed standing, stopping, and parking violations, and other
infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) for the vehicle incurred
while the vehicle was registered in the applicant's name and forwarded
to the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.270(3). For the purposes of
this section, "listed" standing, stopping, and parking violations, and
other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) include only those
violations for which notice has been received from state or local
agencies or courts by the department one hundred twenty days or more
before the date the vehicle license expires and that are placed on the
records of the department. Notice of such violations received by the
department later than one hundred twenty days before that date that are
not satisfied shall be considered by the department in connection with
any applications for license renewal in any subsequent license year.
The renewal application may be processed by the department or its
agents only if the applicant:
(a) Presents a preprinted renewal application showing no listed
standing, stopping, or parking violations, or other infractions issued
under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d), or in the absence of such presentation, the
agent verifies the information that would be contained on the
preprinted renewal application; or
(b) If listed standing, stopping, or parking violations, or other
infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) exist, presents proof of
payment and pays a fifteen dollar surcharge.
(2) To renew a vehicle license for any vehicle that had been driven
by any person in violation of RCW 46.30.020 during the twenty-four
month period prior to the vehicle license renewal, which infraction was
committed while the vehicle was registered in the applicant's name and
forwarded to the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.270(2), regardless of
the identity of the person who actually committed that moving
violation, an applicant shall attest to the vehicle being insured to
the level required by chapter 46.30 RCW and present that proof to the
department or its agents at the time of renewal, and pay a fifteen
dollar surcharge before the renewal application may be processed.
(3) The surcharge shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Ten dollars shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be
used exclusively for the administrative costs of the department of
licensing; and
(b) Five dollars shall be retained by the agent handling the
renewal application to be used by the agent for the administration of
this section.
(((3))) (4) If there is a change in the registered owner of the
vehicle, the department shall forward the information regarding the
change to the state or local charging jurisdiction and release any hold
on the renewal of the vehicle license resulting from parking violations
or other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) or 46.30.020
incurred while the certificate of license registration was in a
previous registered owner's name.
(((4))) (5) The department shall send to all registered owners of
vehicles who have been reported to have outstanding listed parking
violations or other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d), at
the time of renewal, a statement setting out the dates and
jurisdictions in which the violations occurred as well as the amounts
of unpaid fines and penalties relating to them and the surcharge to be
collected.
(6) The department shall send to all registered owners of vehicles
that have been reported to have been driven in violation of RCW
46.30.020, at the time of renewal, a statement setting out the dates
and jurisdictions in which the violations occurred as well as a
statement explaining that the renewal cannot be processed until the
applicant provides proof of insurance and payment of the surcharge as
required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 RCW 46.20.289 (Suspension for failure to
respond, appear, etc.) and 2005 c 288 s 5, 2002 c 279 s 4, 1999 c 274
s 1, 1995 c 219 s 2, & 1993 c 501 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act takes effect September 1, 2010.

--- END ---