BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND AND
STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW under the subchapter heading "state school for the blind and state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss" to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter,
the subchapter "Board of trustees--School for the blind" created in
section 204 of this act, and the subchapter "Board of trustees--Center
for childhood deafness and hearing loss" created in section 304 of this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assistant superintendent of the center" means the assistant
superintendent of the Washington state center for childhood deafness
and hearing loss, formerly called the director of the Washington state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss.
(2) "Assistant superintendent of the school for the blind" means
the assistant superintendent for the state school for the blind,
formerly called the superintendent of the state school for the blind.
(3) "Center" means the Washington state center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss serving the local school districts across the
state.
(4) "School" means the Washington state residential school for the
deaf located in Vancouver, Washington.
(5) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec. 102 RCW 72.40.010 and 2009 c 381 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
There are established at Vancouver, Clark county, a school which
shall be known as the state school for the blind, and a separate school
which shall be known as the state school for the deaf. The primary
purpose of the state school for the blind and the state school for the
deaf is to educate and train hearing and visually impaired children.
The state school for the blind and the state school for the deaf shall
be programs under the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
The school for the blind shall be under the direction of the
assistant superintendent of the school for the blind with the advice of
the board of trustees. The school for the deaf shall be under the
direction of the ((director)) assistant superintendent of the center or
the ((director's)) assistant superintendent's designee and the board of
trustees.

Sec. 103 RCW 72.40.015 and 2009 c 381 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing
loss is established to provide statewide leadership for the
coordination and delivery of educational services to children who are
deaf or hard of hearing. The activities of the center shall be under
the authority of the director and the board of trustees. ((The
superintendent and board of trustees of the state school for the deaf
as of July 26, 2009, shall be)) Effective July 1, 2010, the director
and board of trustees of the center shall be the assistant
superintendent of the center and the board of trustees.
(2) The center's primary functions are:
(a) Managing and directing the supervision of the state school for
the deaf;
(b) Providing statewide leadership and support for the coordination
of regionally delivered educational services in the full range of
communication modalities, for children who are deaf or hard of hearing;
and
(c) Collaborating with appropriate public and private partners for
the training and professional development of educators serving children
who are deaf or hard of hearing.

Sec. 104 RCW 72.40.019 and 2009 c 381 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((governor)) superintendent shall appoint ((a director for the
Washington state center for childhood deafness and hearing loss)) an
assistant superintendent of the center. The ((director)) assistant
superintendent of the center shall have a master's or higher degree
from an accredited college or university in school administration or
deaf education, five or more years of experience teaching or providing
habilitative services to deaf or hard of hearing students, and three or
more years administrative or supervisory experience in programs for
deaf or hard of hearing students.

Sec. 105 RCW 72.40.020 and 1985 c 378 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((governor)) superintendent shall appoint ((a)) an assistant
superintendent ((for)) of the ((state)) school for the blind. The
assistant superintendent shall have a master's degree from an
accredited college or university in school administration or blind
education, five years of experience teaching blind students in the
classroom, and three years administrative or supervisory experience in
programs for blind students.

Sec. 106 RCW 72.40.022 and 2002 c 209 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the
assistant superintendent of the ((state)) school for the blind:
(1) Shall have full control of the school and the property of
various kinds((.));
(2) May establish criteria, in addition to state certification, for
teachers at the school((.));
(3) Shall employ members of the faculty, administrative officers,
and other employees, who shall all be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, unless specifically exempted by other
provisions of law((.));
(4) Shall establish the course of study including vocational
training, with the assistance of the faculty and the advice of the
board of trustees((.));
(5) May establish new facilities as needs demand((.));
(6) May adopt rules, under chapter 34.05 RCW, as deemed necessary
for the government, management, and operation of the housing
facilities((.));
(7) Shall control the use of the facilities and authorize the use
of the facilities for night school, summer school, public meetings, or
other purposes consistent with the purposes of the school((.));
(8) May adopt rules for pedestrian and vehicular traffic on
property owned, operated, and maintained by the school((.));
(9) Shall purchase all supplies and lease or purchase equipment and
other personal property needed for the operation or maintenance of the
school((.));
(10) Except as otherwise provided by law, may enter into contracts
as the assistant superintendent deems essential to the purpose of the
school((.));
(11) May receive gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests
of real or personal property from whatever source, as may be made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions
will aid in carrying out the programs of the school; sell, lease or
exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income thereof except as limited by the terms and conditions
thereof; and adopt rules to govern the receipt and expenditure of the
proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof((.));
(12) May, except as otherwise provided by law, enter into contracts
the assistant superintendent deems essential for the operation of the
school((.));
(13) May adopt rules providing for the transferability of employees
between the ((school for the deaf)) center and the school for the blind
consistent with collective bargaining agreements in effect((.));
(14) Shall prepare and administer the school's budget consistent
with RCW 43.88.160 and the budget and accounting act, chapter 43.88 RCW
generally, as applicable((.)); and
(15) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
acts not forbidden by law as the assistant superintendent deems
necessary or appropriate to the administration of the school.

Sec. 107 RCW 72.40.024 and 2009 c 381 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and
72.40.0191 (as recodified by this act), the assistant superintendent of
the school for the blind and the ((director)) assistant superintendent
of the ((Washington state)) center ((for childhood deafness and hearing
loss, or the director's designee,)) shall:
(1) Monitor the location and educational placement of each student
reported to the assistant superintendents ((and the director, or the
director's designee,)) by the educational service district
superintendents;
(2) Provide information about educational programs, instructional
techniques, materials, equipment, and resources available to students
with visual or auditory impairments to the parent or guardian,
educational service district superintendent, and the superintendent of
the school district where the student resides; and
(3) ((Serve as a consultant)) Provide information and expertise to
the office of the superintendent ((of public instruction)), provide
instructional leadership, and assist school districts in improving
their instructional programs for students with visual or hearing
impairments.

Sec. 108 RCW 72.40.028 and 2009 c 381 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
All teachers employed by the ((Washington state)) center ((for
childhood deafness and hearing loss)) and the state school for the
blind shall meet all certification requirements and the programs shall
meet all accreditation requirements and conform to the standards
defined by law or by rule of the Washington professional educator
standards board or the office of the ((state)) superintendent ((of
public instruction)). The assistant superintendent of the school for
the blind and the ((director)) assistant superintendent of the center,
by rule, may adopt additional educational standards for their
respective facilities. Salaries of all certificated employees shall be
set so as to conform to and be contemporary with salaries paid to other
certificated employees of similar background and experience in the
school district in which the program or facility is located. The
assistant superintendent of the school for the blind and the
((director)) assistant superintendent of the center may provide for
provisional certification for teachers in their respective facilities
including certification for emergency, temporary, substitute, or
provisional duty.

Sec. 109 RCW 72.40.031 and 2009 c 381 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The school year for the state school for the blind and the state
school for the deaf shall commence on the first day of July of each
year and shall terminate on the 30th day of June of the succeeding
year. The regular school term shall be for a period of nine months and
shall commence as near as reasonably practical at the time of the
commencement of regular terms in other public schools, with the
equivalent number of days as are now required by law, and the
((regulations)) rules of the superintendent ((of public instruction as
now or hereafter amended)), during the school year in other public
schools. The school and the center shall observe all legal holidays,
in the same manner as other agencies of state government, and will not
be in session on such days and such other days as may be approved by
the assistant superintendent of the school for the blind or the
((director)) assistant superintendent of the center. During the period
when the schools are not in session during the regular school term,
schools may be operated, subject to the approval of the assistant
superintendent of the school for the blind or the ((director or the
director's designee)) assistant superintendent of the center, for the
instruction of students or for such other reasons which are in
furtherance of the objects and purposes of the respective facilities.

Sec. 110 RCW 72.40.040 and 2000 c 125 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The schools shall be free to residents of the state between the
ages of three and twenty-one years, who are blind/visually impaired or
deaf/hearing impaired, or with other disabilities where a vision or
hearing disability is the major need for services.
(2) The schools may provide nonresidential services to children
ages birth through three who meet the eligibility criteria in this
section, subject to available funding.
(3) Each school shall admit and retain students on a space
available basis according to criteria developed and published by each
school assistant superintendent in consultation with each board of
trustees and school faculty: PROVIDED, That students over the age of
twenty-one years, who are otherwise qualified may be retained at the
school, if in the discretion of the assistant superintendent in
consultation with the faculty they are proper persons to receive
further training given at the school and the facilities are adequate
for proper care, education, and training.
(4) The admission and retention criteria developed and published by
each school assistant superintendent shall contain a provision allowing
the schools to refuse to admit or retain a student who is an
adjudicated sex offender except that the schools shall not admit or
retain a student who is an adjudicated level III sex offender as
provided in RCW 13.40.217(3).

Sec. 111 RCW 72.40.050 and 2000 c 125 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The assistant superintendents may admit to their respective
schools visually or hearing impaired children from other states as
appropriate, but the parents or guardians of such children or other
state will be required to pay annually or quarterly in advance a
sufficient amount to cover the cost of maintaining and educating such
children as set by the applicable assistant superintendent.
(2) The admission and retention criteria developed and published by
each school assistant superintendent shall contain a provision allowing
the schools to refuse to admit or retain a nonresident student who is
an adjudicated sex offender, or the equivalent under the laws of the
state in which the student resides, except that the schools shall not
admit or retain a nonresident student who is an adjudicated level III
sex offender or the equivalent under the laws of the state in which the
student resides.

Sec. 112 RCW 72.40.070 and 2009 c 381 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be the duty of each educational service district to make
a full and specific report of visually impaired or deaf or hard of
hearing youth to the assistant superintendent of the school for the
blind or the ((director)) assistant superintendent of the ((Washington
state)) center ((for childhood deafness and hearing loss, or the
director's designee,)) as the case may be and the superintendent ((of
public instruction)), annually. The superintendent ((of public
instruction)) shall ((report)) provide information about the deaf or
hard of hearing or visually impaired youth to the school for the blind
and the ((Washington state)) center ((for childhood deafness and
hearing loss)), as the case may be, annually.

Sec. 113 RCW 72.40.210 and 2009 c 381 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((director)) assistant superintendent of the ((Washington
state)) center ((for childhood deafness and hearing loss)) and the
assistant superintendent of the ((state)) school for the blind ((or
their designees)) shall immediately report to the persons indicated the
following events:
(1) To the child's parent, custodian, or guardian:
(a) The death of the child;
(b) Hospitalization of a child in attendance or residence at the
facility;
(c) Allegations of child abuse or neglect in which the parent's
child in attendance or residence at the facility is the alleged victim;
(d) Allegations of physical or sexual abuse in which the parent's
child in attendance or residence at the facility is the alleged
perpetrator;
(e) Life-threatening illness;
(f) The attendance at the facility of any child who is a registered
sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 as permitted by RCW 4.24.550.
(2) Notification to the parent shall be made by the means most
likely to be received by the parent. If initial notification is made
by telephone, such notification shall be followed by notification in
writing within forty-eight hours after the initial verbal contact is
made.

Sec. 114 RCW 72.40.220 and 2009 c 381 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((director)) assistant superintendent of the ((Washington
state)) center ((for childhood deafness and hearing loss, or the
director's designee,)) and the assistant superintendent of the
((state)) school for the blind shall maintain in writing and implement
behavior management policies and procedures that accomplish the
following:
(a) Support the child's appropriate social behavior, self-control,
and the rights of others;
(b) Foster dignity and self-respect for the child;
(c) Reflect the ages and developmental levels of children in care.
(2) The state school for the deaf and the state school for the
blind shall use proactive, positive behavior support techniques to
manage potential child behavior problems. These techniques shall
include but not be limited to:
(a) Organization of the physical environment and staffing patterns
to reduce factors leading to behavior incidents;
(b) Intervention before behavior becomes disruptive, in the least
invasive and least restrictive manner available;
(c) Emphasis on verbal deescalation to calm the upset child;
(d) Redirection strategies to present the child with alternative
resolution choices.

Sec. 115 RCW 72.40.250 and 2009 c 381 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the powers and duties under RCW 72.40.022 and
72.40.024 (as recodified by this act), the ((director)) assistant
superintendent of the ((Washington state)) center ((for childhood
deafness and hearing loss, or the director's designee,)) and the
assistant superintendent of the state school for the blind shall:
(1) Develop written procedures for the supervision of employees and
volunteers who have the potential for contact with students. Such
procedures shall be designed to prevent child abuse and neglect by
providing for adequate supervision of such employees and volunteers,
taking into consideration such factors as the student population
served, architectural factors, and the size of the facility. Such
procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) Staffing patterns and the rationale for such;
(b) Responsibilities of supervisors;
(c) The method by which staff and volunteers are made aware of the
identity of all supervisors, including designated on-site supervisors;
(d) Provision of written supervisory guidelines to employees and
volunteers;
(e) Periodic supervisory conferences for employees and volunteers;
and
(f) Written performance evaluations of staff to be conducted by
supervisors in a manner consistent with applicable provisions of the
civil service law.
(2) Develop written procedures for the protection of students when
there is reason to believe an incident has occurred which would render
a minor student an abused or neglected child within the meaning of RCW
26.44.020. Such procedures shall include, but need not be limited to,
the following:
(a) Investigation. Immediately upon notification that a report of
child abuse or neglect has been made to the department of social and
health services or a law enforcement agency, the assistant
superintendent of the school for the blind or the ((director, or the
director's designee,)) assistant superintendent of the center shall:
(i) Preserve any potential evidence through such actions as
securing the area where suspected abuse or neglect occurred;
(ii) Obtain proper and prompt medical evaluation and treatment, as
needed, with documentation of any evidence of abuse or neglect; and
(iii) Provide necessary assistance to the department of social and
health services and local law enforcement in their investigations;
(b) Safety. Upon notification that a report of suspected child
abuse or neglect has been made to the department of social and health
services or a law enforcement agency, the assistant superintendent of
the school for the blind or the ((director or his or her designee))
assistant superintendent of the center, with consideration for causing
as little disruption as possible to the daily routines of the students,
shall evaluate the situation and immediately take appropriate action to
assure the health and safety of the students involved in the report and
of any other students similarly situated, and take such additional
action as is necessary to prevent future acts of abuse or neglect.
Such action may include:
(i) Consistent with federal and state law:
(A) Removing the alleged perpetrator from the school;
(B) Increasing the degree of supervision of the alleged
perpetrator; and
(C) Initiating appropriate disciplinary action against the alleged
perpetrator;
(ii) Provision of increased training and increased supervision to
volunteers and staff pertinent to the prevention and remediation of
abuse and neglect;
(iii) Temporary removal of the students from a program and
reassignment of the students within the school, as an emergency
measure, if it is determined that there is a risk to the health or
safety of such students in remaining in that program. Whenever a
student is removed, pursuant to this subsection (2)(b)(iii), from a
special education program or service specified in his or her
individualized education program, the action shall be reviewed in an
individualized education program meeting; and
(iv) Provision of counseling to the students involved in the report
or any other students, as appropriate;
(c) Corrective action plans. Upon receipt of the results of an
investigation by the department of social and health services pursuant
to a report of suspected child abuse or neglect, the assistant
superintendent of the school for the blind or the ((director, or the
director's designee)) assistant superintendent of the center, after
consideration of any recommendations by the department of social and
health services for preventive and remedial action, shall implement a
written plan of action designed to assure the continued health and
safety of students and to provide for the prevention of future acts of
abuse or neglect.

Sec. 116 RCW 72.40.280 and 2009 c 381 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services must periodically
monitor the residential program at the state school for the deaf,
including but not limited to examining the residential-related policies
and procedures as well as the residential facilities. The department
of social and health services must make recommendations to the
((director)) assistant superintendent of the center and the board of
trustees of the center or its successor board on health and safety
improvements related to child safety and well-being. The department of
social and health services must conduct the monitoring reviews at least
annually. The ((director or the director's designee)) assistant
superintendent of the center may from time to time request technical
assistance from the department of social and health services.
(2) The department of social and health services must conduct a
comprehensive child health and safety review, as defined in rule, of
the residential program at the state school for the deaf every three
years.
(3) The state school for the deaf must provide the department of
social and health services' staff with full and complete access to all
records and documents that the department staff may request to carry
out the requirements of this section. The department of social and
health services must have full and complete access to all students and
staff of the state school for the deaf to conduct interviews to carry
out the requirements of this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the department of social and
health services must use the safety standards established in this
chapter when conducting the reviews.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 The following sections are recodified as
sections in chapter 28A.155 RCW under the subchapter heading "state
school for the blind and state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss":
RCW 72.40.010
RCW 72.40.015
RCW 72.40.019
RCW 72.40.0191
RCW 72.40.020
RCW 72.40.022
RCW 72.40.024
RCW 72.40.028
RCW 72.40.031
RCW 72.40.040
RCW 72.40.050
RCW 72.40.060
RCW 72.40.070
RCW 72.40.080
RCW 72.40.090
RCW 72.40.100
RCW 72.40.110
RCW 72.40.200
RCW 72.40.210
RCW 72.40.220
RCW 72.40.230
RCW 72.40.240
RCW 72.40.250
RCW 72.40.260
RCW 72.40.270
RCW 72.40.280

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 RCW 72.40.120 (Center for childhood
deafness and hearing loss -- School for the blind -- Appropriations) and
2009 c 381 s 8 & 1991 c 65 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 (1) The powers, duties, and functions of
the state school for the blind are hereby transferred to the office of
the superintendent of public instruction. All references to the
superintendent or the state school for the blind in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the assistant supervisor of the
school for the blind or the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the state school for
the blind shall be delivered to the custody of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
state school for the blind shall be made available to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. All funds, credits, or other
assets held by the state school for the blind shall be assigned to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) Any appropriations made to the state school for the blind
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and
credited to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the state school for the blind are transferred
to the jurisdiction of the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the
state civil service law, are assigned to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to perform their usual duties upon
the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws
and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the state school for
the blind shall be continued and acted upon by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the state school for the blind shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) The existing bargaining units shall be transferred in their
entirety without the merging of other bargaining units or the inclusion
of employees from other bargaining units. Nothing contained in this
section may be construed to alter any of the existing collective
bargaining units unless and until the bargaining unit has been modified
by action of the public employment relations commission as provided by
law. Therefore, the certification of the existing bargaining units
shall remain. However, the public employment relations commission may,
upon request, amend the certification to reflect the name of the new
agency. Nothing in this section may be construed to alter the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the
agreement has expired. The existing bargaining units of employees
transferred under this section shall continue to be subject to the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 (1) The powers, duties, and functions of
the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss are hereby
transferred to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
All references to the director or the center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the assistant superintendent of the Washington state center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss or the office of the superintendent
of public instruction.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss shall be delivered to the custody
of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other
tangible property employed by the center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss shall be made available to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. All funds, credits, or other
assets held by the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall
be assigned to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(b) Any appropriations made to the center for childhood deafness
and hearing loss shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the center for childhood deafness and hearing
loss are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. All employees classified under
chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the center for
childhood deafness and hearing loss shall be continued and acted upon
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall
be performed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss shall not affect the
validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) The existing bargaining units shall be transferred in their
entirety without the merging of other bargaining units or the inclusion
of employees from other bargaining units. Nothing contained in this
section may be construed to alter any of the existing collective
bargaining units unless and until the bargaining unit has been modified
by action of the public employment relations commission as provided by
law. Therefore, the certification of the existing bargaining units
shall remain. However, the public employment relations commission may,
upon request, amend the certification to reflect the name of the new
agency. Nothing in this section may be construed to alter the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the
agreement has expired. The existing bargaining units of employees
transferred under this section shall continue to be subject to the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

PART II
BOARD OF TRUSTEES FOR THE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Sec. 201 RCW 72.41.010 and 1985 c 378 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intention of the legislature in creating a board of
trustees for the state school for the blind to perform the duties set
forth in this chapter, that the board of trustees perform needed
advisory services to the legislature and to the assistant
superintendent of the ((Washington state)) school for the blind, in the
development of programs for the visually impaired, and in the operation
of the Washington state school for the blind.

Sec. 202 RCW 72.41.020 and 1993 c 147 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for the state school
for the blind to be composed of a resident from each of the state's
congressional districts now or hereafter existing. Trustees with
voting privileges shall be appointed by the ((governor with the consent
of the senate)) superintendent. A representative of the parent-teachers association of the Washington state school for the blind, a
representative of the Washington council of the blind, a representative
of the national federation of the blind of Washington, one
representative designated by the teacher association of the Washington
state school for the blind, and a representative of the classified
staff designated by his or her exclusive bargaining representative
shall each be ex officio and nonvoting members of the board of trustees
and shall serve during their respective tenures in such positions.
Trustees shall be appointed by the ((governor)) superintendent to
serve for a term of five years except that any person appointed to fill
a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of any term shall be
appointed within sixty days of the vacancy and appointed only for the
remainder of the term.
One trustee shall be a resident and qualified elector from each of
the state's congressional districts. The board shall not be deemed to
be unlawfully constituted and a trustee shall not be deemed ineligible
to serve the remainder of the trustee's unexpired term on the board
solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for
congressional districts. No voting trustee may be an employee of the
state school for the blind, a member of the board of directors of any
school district, a member of the governing board of any public or
private educational institution, a school district or educational
service district administrator, appointed after July 1, 1986, or an
elected officer or member of the legislative authority or any municipal
corporation.
The board of trustees shall organize itself by electing a
((chairman)) chair from its members. The board shall adopt a seal and
may adopt such bylaws((,)) and rules((, and regulations)) as it deems
necessary for its own government. A majority of the voting members of
the board in office shall constitute a quorum, but a lesser number may
convene from time to time and may compel the attendance of absent
members in such manner as prescribed in its bylaws((,)) or rules((, or
regulations)). The assistant superintendent of the ((state)) school
for the blind shall serve as, or may designate another person to serve
as, the secretary of the board, who shall not be deemed to be a member
of the board.

Sec. 203 RCW 72.41.040 and 1985 c 378 s 30 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of trustees of the state school for the blind:
(1) Shall monitor and inspect all existing facilities of the state
school for the blind, and report its findings to the superintendent and
the assistant superintendent of the school for the blind;
(2) Shall study and recommend comprehensive programs of education
and training and review the admission policy as set forth in RCW
72.40.040 and 72.40.050 (as recodified by this act), and make
appropriate recommendations to the assistant superintendent of the
school for the blind;
(3) Shall submit a list of three qualified candidates for assistant
superintendent of the school for the blind to the ((governor))
superintendent and shall advise the assistant superintendent about the
criteria and policy to be used in the selection of members of the
faculty and such other administrative officers and other employees, who
shall with the exception of the assistant superintendent all be subject
to chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, unless specifically
exempted by other provisions of law. All employees and personnel
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW shall continue, after July 1, 1986,
to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without
any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing the state
civil service law;
(4) Shall submit an evaluation of the assistant superintendent of
the school for the blind to the ((governor)) superintendent by July 1st
of each odd-numbered year and may recommend to the ((governor))
superintendent that the assistant superintendent be removed for
misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty;
(5) May recommend to the assistant superintendent of the school for
the blind the establishment of new facilities as needs demand;
(6) May recommend to the assistant superintendent of the school for
the blind rules ((and regulations)) for the government, management, and
operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable;
(7) May make recommendations to the assistant superintendent of the
school for the blind concerning classrooms and other facilities to be
used for summer or night schools, or for public meetings and for any
other uses consistent with the use of such classrooms or facilities for
the school for the blind;
(8) May make recommendations to the assistant superintendent of the
school for the blind for adoption of rules ((and regulations)) for
pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated, or
maintained by the school for the blind;
(9) Shall recommend to the assistant superintendent of the school
for the blind, with the assistance of the faculty, the course of study
including vocational training in the school for the blind, in
accordance with other applicable provisions of law and rules ((and
regulations));
(10) May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of
a program or course of study, a suitable diploma, nonbaccalaureate
degree, or certificate;
(11) Shall participate in the development of, and monitor the
enforcement of the rules ((and regulations)) pertaining to the school
for the blind;
(12) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities prescribed
by the assistant superintendent of the school for the blind.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 The following sections are recodified as
sections in chapter 28A.155 RCW under the subchapter heading "Board of
trustees--School for the blind":
RCW 72.41.010
RCW 72.41.020
RCW 72.41.025
RCW 72.41.030
RCW 72.41.040
RCW 72.41.060
RCW 72.41.070

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 RCW 72.41.015 ("Superintendent" defined)
and 1985 c 378 s 27 are each repealed.

PART III
BOARD OF TRUSTEES FOR THE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS
AND HEARING LOSS
Sec. 301 RCW 72.42.010 and 2009 c 381 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
It is the intention of the legislature, in creating a board of
trustees for the Washington state center for childhood deafness and
hearing loss to perform the duties set forth in this chapter, that the
board of trustees perform needed oversight services to the ((governor))
superintendent and the legislature of the center in the development of
programs for the hard of hearing, and in the operation of the center,
including the school for the deaf.

Sec. 302 RCW 72.42.021 and 2009 c 381 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The governance of the center and the school shall be vested in
a board of trustees. The board shall consist of nine members appointed
by the ((governor, with the consent of the senate)) superintendent.
The board shall be composed of a resident from each of the state's
congressional districts and may include:
(a) One member who is deaf or hard of hearing;
(b) Two members who are experienced educational professionals;
(c) One member who is experienced in providing residential services
to youth; and
(d) One member who is the parent of a child who is deaf or hard of
hearing and who is receiving or has received educational services
related to deafness or hearing impairment from a public educational
institution.
(2) No voting trustee may be an employee of the school or the
center, a member of the board of directors of any school district, a
member of the governing board of any public or private educational
institution or an elected officer or member of the legislative
authority of any municipal corporation. No more than two voting
trustees may be school district or educational service district
administrators appointed after July 1, 1986.
(3) Trustees shall be appointed by the ((governor)) superintendent
to serve a term of five years, except that any person appointed to fill
a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of a term shall be
appointed within sixty days of the vacancy and appointed only for the
remainder of the term. Of the initial members, three must be appointed
for two-year terms, three must be appointed for three-year terms, and
the remainder must be appointed for five-year terms.
(4) The board shall not be deemed unlawfully constituted and a
trustee shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the remainder of the
trustee's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the
establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.
In such an event, each trustee may continue to serve in office for the
balance of the term for which he or she was appointed so long as the
trustee continues to reside within the boundaries of the congressional
district as they existed at the time of his or her appointment.
Vacancies which occur in a trustee position during the balance of any
term shall be filled pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by a
successor who resides within the boundaries of the congressional
district from which the member whose office was vacated was appointed
as they existed at the time of his or her appointment. At the
completion of such term, and thereafter, a successor shall be appointed
from the congressional district which corresponds in number with the
congressional district from which the incumbent was appointed.

Sec. 303 RCW 72.42.041 and 2009 c 381 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of trustees of the center:
(1) Shall adopt rules ((and regulations)) for its own governance;
(2) Shall direct the development of, approve, and monitor the
enforcement of policies((,)) and rules((, and regulations)) pertaining
to the school and the center, including but not limited to:
(a) The use of classrooms and other facilities for summer or night
schools or for public meetings and any other uses consistent with the
mission of the center;
(b) Pedestrian and vehicular traffic on property owned, operated,
or maintained by the center;
(c) Governance, management, and operation of the residential
facilities;
(d) Transferability of employees between the center and the school
for the blind consistent with collective bargaining agreements in
effect; and
(e) Compliance with state and federal education civil rights laws
at the school;
(3) Shall develop a process for recommending candidates for the
position of ((director)) assistant superintendent of the center and
upon a vacancy shall submit a list of three qualified candidates for
((director)) assistant superintendent of the center to the ((governor))
superintendent;
(4) Shall submit an evaluation of the ((director)) assistant
superintendent of the center to the ((governor)) superintendent by July
1st of each odd-numbered year that includes a recommendation regarding
the retention of the ((director)) assistant superintendent of the
center;
(5) May recommend to the ((governor)) superintendent at any time
that the ((director)) assistant superintendent of the center be removed
for conduct deemed by the board to be detrimental to the interests of
the center;
(6) Shall prepare and submit by July 1st of each even-numbered year
a report to the governor, the superintendent, and the appropriate
committees of the legislature which contains a detailed summary of the
center's progress on performance objectives and the center's work,
facility conditions, and revenues and costs of the center for the
previous year and which contains those recommendations it deems
necessary and advisable for the governor, the superintendent, and the
legislature to act on;
(7) Shall approve the center's budget and all funding requests,
both operating and capital, ((submitted)) recommended for submission to
the governor;
(8) Shall direct and approve the development and implementation of
comprehensive programs of education, training, and as needed
residential living, such that students served by the school receive a
challenging and quality education in a safe school environment;
(9) Shall direct, monitor, and approve the implementation of a
comprehensive continuous quality improvement system for the center;
(10) Shall monitor and inspect all existing facilities of the
center and report its findings in its biennial report to the
superintendent, the governor, and appropriate committees of the
legislature; and
(11) May grant to every student of the school, upon graduation or
completion of a program or course of study, a suitable diploma,
nonbaccalaureate degree, or certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 The following sections are recodified as
sections in chapter 28A.155 RCW under the subchapter heading "Board of
trustees--Center for childhood deafness and hearing loss":
RCW 72.42.010
RCW 72.42.021
RCW 72.42.031
RCW 72.42.041
RCW 72.42.060
RCW 72.42.070

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 72.42.015 ("Director" defined) and 2009 c 381 s 14 & 1985
c 378 s 32; and
(2) RCW 72.42.016 (Additional definitions) and 2009 c 381 s 15 &
2002 c 209 s 6.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 28A.155
RCW under the subchapter heading "state school for the blind and state
center for childhood deafness and hearing loss" to read as follows:
The assistant superintendent of the school for the blind and the
assistant superintendent of the center may each delegate any power or
duty vested in or transferred to him or her to any assistant or
subordinate. The respective assistant superintendent remains
responsible for the official act of his or her designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---