BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If he or she has reason to believe there has been a violation
of this chapter, the director and the director's authorized
representatives may issue subpoenas to enforce the production and
examination of any information, whether written or electronic,
necessary to enforce this chapter.
(2) The subpoena may be issued only if an electrical contractor,
administrator, electrician, or other entity or person to which this
chapter applies fails to provide information described in subsection
(1) of this section when requested by the department.
(3) The superior court has the power to enforce such a subpoena by
proper proceedings.
(4) This section applies to all electrical contractors,
administrators, electricians, other entities and persons, and
electrical work to which this chapter applies.
(5) The secretary of the board must provide the board with the
following information before the board's quarterly meetings: A list
detailing all the subpoenas that have been issued in the previous
quarter; why those subpoenas were issued; and the results of the
subpoena being issued. Any member of the board may request a full
discussion of any subpoena at the board meeting.

--- END ---