BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The Washington state institute for public
policy shall continue the study of long-term disability benefits for
public employees as authorized in section 105, chapter 564, Laws of
2009, during the 2010 interim for the limited purpose of continuing to
develop the options identified in the study, which included public
employees' benefits board programs, other long-term disability
insurance programs, and public employee retirement system benefits.
The institute shall report no later than November 17, 2010, new
findings and any additional recommendations on the options to the
select committee on pension policy, the senate committee on ways and
means, and the house committee on ways and means.
For the options that directly impact the public employees' benefits
board, the health care authority shall coordinate analysis and
recommendations with its contracted disability vendor and appropriate
stakeholders. The health care authority shall institute an improved
communication program to increase awareness of the importance of
participating in the employer's optional long-term disability insurance
plan. The health care authority shall report on its activities,
findings, and recommendations no later than November 17, 2010, to the
select committee on pension policy, the senate committee on ways and
means, and the house committee on ways and means.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2010, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---