BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 By June 30, 2011, the department of health
and the state board of health shall revise their rules pertaining to
primary and secondary school facilities to eliminate rules that are
obsolete or not specifically funded or implemented.

--- END ---