BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.01.030 and 2009 c 529 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Health care providers licensed under Title 18 RCW and health
care facilities licensed under Title 70 RCW shall provide the following
to a patient upon request:
(a) An estimate of fees and charges related to a specific service,
visit, or stay; and
(b) Information regarding other types of fees or charges a patient
may receive in conjunction with their visit to the provider or
facility. Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW may fulfill this
requirement by providing a statement and contact information as
described in RCW 70.41.400.
(2) Providers and facilities listed in subsection (1) of this
section may, after disclosing estimated charges and fees to a patient,
refer the patient to the patient's insurer, if applicable, for specific
information on the insurer's charges and fees, any cost-sharing
responsibilities required of the patient, and the network status of
ancillary providers who may or may not share the same network status as
the provider or facility.
(3) Except for hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and
ambulances and aid vehicles defined in RCW 18.73.030, providers and
facilities listed in subsection (1) of this section shall post a sign
in patient registration areas containing at least the following
language: "Information about the estimated charges of your health
services is available upon request. Please do not hesitate to ask for
information."

--- END ---