BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.56.200 and 2002 c 85 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of robbery in the first degree if:
(a) In the commission of a robbery or of immediate flight
therefrom, he or she:
(i) Is armed with a deadly weapon; or
(ii) Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon;
or
(iii) Inflicts bodily injury; ((or))
(b) He or she commits a robbery within and against a financial
institution as defined in RCW 7.88.010 or 35.38.060; or
(c) He or she commits a robbery against a pharmacy, by taking any
substance that may be obtained only from a licensed pharmacist.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "pharmacy" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 18.64.011.
(3) Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

--- END ---