BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.250 and 1984 c 228 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of any school district, the Washington
state teachers' retirement system, the superintendent of public
instruction, and educational service district superintendents are
authorized to provide and pay for tax deferred annuities or regulated
company stock held in a custodial account for their respective
employees in lieu of a portion of salary or wages as authorized under
the provisions of 26 U.S.C.((,)) section 403(b), as amended by Public
Law 87-370, 75 Stat. 796, as now or hereafter amended. The
superintendent of public instruction and educational service district
superintendents, if eligible, may also be provided with such
((annuities)) options.
(2) At the request of at least five employees, the employees'
employer shall arrange for the:
(a) Purchase of tax deferred annuity contracts which meet the
requirements of 26 U.S.C.((,)) section 403(b), as now or hereafter
amended, for the employees from any company the employees may choose
that is authorized to do business in this state through a Washington-licensed insurance agent that the employees may select; or
(b) Payment to a custodial account for investment in the stock of
a regulated investment company as defined in 26 U.S.C. section
403(b)(7)(c).
(3) Payroll deductions shall be made in accordance with the
arrangements for the purpose of paying the entire premium due and to
become due under the contracts. Employees' rights under the annuity
contract are nonforfeitable except for the failure to pay premiums.
(4) The board of directors of any school district, the Washington
state teachers' retirement system, the superintendent of public
instruction, and educational service district superintendents shall not
restrict, except as provided in this section, employees' right to
select the tax deferred annuity of their choice, the regulated company
stock held in a custodial account, or the agent, broker, or company
licensed by the state of Washington through which the tax deferred
annuity or regulated company stock is placed or purchased, and shall
not place limitations on the time or place that the employees make the
selection.
(5) The board of directors of any school district, the Washington
state teachers' retirement system, the superintendent of public
instruction, and educational service district superintendents may each
adopt rules regulating the sale of tax deferred annuities or regulated
company stock held in a custodial account which: (((1))) (a) Prohibit
solicitation of employees for the purposes of selling tax deferred
annuities or regulated company stock held in a custodial account on
school premises during normal school hours; (((2))) (b) only permit the
solicitation of tax deferred annuities or regulated company stock held
in a custodial account by agents, brokers, and companies licensed by
the state of Washington; and (((3))) (c) require participating
companies to execute reasonable agreements protecting the respective
employers from any liability attendant to procuring tax deferred
annuities or regulated company stock held in a custodial account.

--- END ---