BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.68.070 and 2009 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The right to benefits under this chapter and the amount thereof
will be governed insofar as is applicable by the provisions contained
in chapter 51.32 RCW except as provided in this section, provided that
no more than fifty thousand dollars shall be paid per claim:
(1) The provisions contained in RCW 51.32.015, 51.32.030,
51.32.072, 51.32.073, 51.32.180, 51.32.190, and 51.32.200 are not
applicable to this chapter.
(2) Each victim injured as a result of a criminal act, including
criminal acts committed between July 1, 1981, and January 1, 1983, or
the victim's family or dependents in case of death of the victim, are
entitled to benefits in accordance with this chapter, subject to the
limitations under RCW 7.68.015. The rights, duties, responsibilities,
limitations, and procedures applicable to a worker as contained in RCW
51.32.010 are applicable to this chapter.
(3) The limitations contained in RCW 51.32.020 are applicable to
claims under this chapter. In addition thereto, no person or spouse,
child, or dependent of such person is entitled to benefits under this
chapter when the injury for which benefits are sought, was:
(a) The result of consent, provocation, or incitement by the
victim, unless an injury resulting from a criminal act caused the death
of the victim;
(b) Sustained while the crime victim was engaged in the attempt to
commit, or the commission of, a felony; or
(c) Sustained while the victim was confined in any county or city
jail, federal jail or prison or in any other federal institution, or
any state correctional institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections, prior to release from lawful custody; or confined or
living in any other institution maintained and operated by the
department of social and health services or the department of
corrections.
(4) The benefits established upon the death of a worker and
contained in RCW 51.32.050 shall be the benefits obtainable under this
chapter and provisions relating to payment contained in that section
shall equally apply under this chapter((: PROVIDED)), except that
benefits for burial expenses shall not exceed ((the amount paid by the
department in case of the death of a worker as provided in chapter
51.32 RCW in any claim: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the criminal act
results in the death of a victim who was not gainfully employed at the
time of the criminal act, and who was not so employed for at least
three consecutive months of the twelve months immediately preceding the
criminal act;
(a) Benefits payable to an eligible surviving spouse, where there
are no children of the victim at the time of the criminal act who have
survived the victim or where such spouse has legal custody of all of
his or her children, shall be limited to burial expenses and a lump sum
payment of seven thousand five hundred dollars without reference to
number of children, if any;
(b) Where any such spouse has legal custody of one or more but not
all of such children, then such burial expenses shall be paid, and such
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody
of such spouse shall receive a lump sum of three thousand seven hundred
fifty dollars to be divided equally among such child or children;
(c) If any such spouse does not have legal custody of any of the
children, the burial expenses shall be paid and the spouse shall
receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars and any such child or children not in the legal custody of the
spouse shall receive a lump sum payment of up to three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars to be divided equally among the child or
children;
(d) If no such spouse survives, then such burial expenses shall be
paid, and each surviving child of the victim at the time of the
criminal act shall receive a lump sum payment of three thousand seven
hundred fifty dollars up to a total of two such children and where
there are more than two such children the sum of seven thousand five
hundred dollars shall be divided equally among such children.
No other benefits may be paid or payable under these
circumstances)) six thousand five hundred dollars per claim.
(5) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.060 for permanent total
disability proximately caused by the criminal act shall be the benefits
obtainable under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment
contained in that section apply under this chapter((: PROVIDED)),
except that if a victim becomes permanently and totally disabled as a
proximate result of the criminal act ((and was not gainfully employed
at the time of the criminal act)), the victim shall receive monthly
during the period of the disability the following percentages, where
applicable, of the average monthly wage determined as of the date of
the criminal act pursuant to RCW 51.08.018:
(a) If married at the time of the criminal act, twenty-nine percent
of the average monthly wage.
(b) If married with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(c) If married with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-eight percent of the average monthly wage.
(d) If married with three children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-one percent of the average monthly wage.
(e) If married with four children at the time of the criminal act,
forty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(f) If married with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(g) If unmarried at the time of the criminal act, twenty-five
percent of the average monthly wage.
(h) If unmarried with one child at the time of the criminal act,
thirty percent of the average monthly wage.
(i) If unmarried with two children at the time of the criminal act,
thirty-four percent of the average monthly wage.
(j) If unmarried with three children at the time of the criminal
act, thirty-seven percent of the average monthly wage.
(k) If unmarried with four children at the time of the criminal
act, forty percent of the average monthly wage.
(l) If unmarried with five or more children at the time of the
criminal act, forty-three percent of the average monthly wage.
(6) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.080 for permanent partial
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section equally apply
under this chapter, but shall not exceed seven thousand dollars per
claim.
(7) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.090 for temporary total
disability shall be the benefits obtainable under this chapter, and
provisions relating to payment contained in that section apply under
this chapter((: PROVIDED)), except that no person is eligible for
temporary total disability benefits under this chapter if such person
was not gainfully employed at the time of the criminal act((, and was
not so employed for at least three consecutive months of the twelve
months immediately preceding the criminal act)).
(8) The benefits established in RCW 51.32.095 for continuation of
benefits during vocational rehabilitation shall be benefits obtainable
under this chapter, and provisions relating to payment contained in
that section apply under this chapter((: PROVIDED)), except that
benefits shall not exceed five thousand dollars for any single injury.
(9) The provisions for lump sum payment of benefits upon death or
permanent total disability as contained in RCW 51.32.130 apply under
this chapter.
(10) The provisions relating to payment of benefits to, for or on
behalf of workers contained in RCW 51.32.040, 51.32.055, 51.32.100,
51.32.110, 51.32.120, 51.32.135, 51.32.140, 51.32.150, 51.32.160, and
51.32.210 are applicable to payment of benefits to, for or on behalf of
victims under this chapter.
(11) No person or spouse, child, or dependent of such person is
entitled to benefits under this chapter where the person making a claim
for such benefits has refused to give reasonable cooperation to state
or local law enforcement agencies in their efforts to apprehend and
convict the perpetrator(s) of the criminal act which gave rise to the
claim.
(12) In addition to other benefits provided under this chapter,
victims of sexual assault are entitled to receive appropriate
counseling. Fees for such counseling shall be determined by the
department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject to the limitations
of RCW 7.68.080. Counseling services may include, if determined
appropriate by the department, counseling of members of the victim's
immediate family, other than the perpetrator of the assault.
(13) ((Except for medical benefits authorized under RCW 7.68.080,
no more than thirty thousand dollars shall be granted as a result of a
single injury or death, except that benefits granted as the result of
total permanent disability or death shall not exceed forty thousand
dollars.
(14))) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter and Title
51 RCW, benefits payable for total temporary disability under
subsection (7) of this section, shall be limited to fifteen thousand
dollars.
(((15))) (14) Any person who is responsible for the victim's
injuries, or who would otherwise be unjustly enriched as a result of
the victim's injuries, shall not be a beneficiary under this chapter.
(((16))) (15) Crime victims' compensation is not available to pay
for services covered under chapter 74.09 RCW or Title XIX of the
federal social security act, except to the extent that the costs for
such services exceed service limits established by the department of
social and health services or, during the 1993-95 fiscal biennium, to
the extent necessary to provide matching funds for federal medicaid
reimbursement.
(((17))) (16) In addition to other benefits provided under this
chapter, immediate family members of a homicide victim may receive
appropriate counseling to assist in dealing with the immediate, near-term consequences of the related effects of the homicide. Fees for
counseling shall be determined by the department in accordance with RCW
51.04.030, subject to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080. Payment of
counseling benefits under this section may not be provided to the
perpetrator of the homicide. The benefits under this subsection may be
provided only with respect to homicides committed on or after July 1,
1992.
(((18))) (17) A dependent mother, father, stepmother, or
stepfather, as defined in RCW 51.08.050, who is a survivor of her or
his child's homicide, who has been requested by a law enforcement
agency or a prosecutor to assist in the judicial proceedings related to
the death of the victim, and who is not domiciled in Washington state
at the time of the request, may receive a lump-sum payment upon arrival
in this state. Total benefits under this subsection may not exceed
seven thousand five hundred dollars. If more than one dependent parent
is eligible for this benefit, the lump-sum payment of seven thousand
five hundred dollars shall be divided equally among the dependent
parents.
(((19))) (18) A victim whose crime occurred in another state who
qualifies for benefits under RCW 7.68.060(4) may receive appropriate
mental health counseling to address distress arising from participation
in the civil commitment proceedings. Fees for counseling shall be
determined by the department in accordance with RCW 51.04.030, subject
to the limitations of RCW 7.68.080.
(19) A victim who has been convicted of a felony within five years
preceding the criminal act for which they are applying which is a
violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030 or a crime against persons under
RCW 9.94A.411, or who is convicted of such a felony after applying, is
not eligible for benefits under this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.68.085 and 2009 c 479 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section has no force or effect from the effective date of
this section until July 1, 2013.
(2) The director of labor and industries shall institute a cap on
medical benefits of one hundred fifty thousand dollars per injury or
death. Payment for medical services in excess of the cap shall be made
available to any innocent victim under the same conditions as other
medical services and if the medical services are:
(((1))) (a) Necessary for a previously accepted condition;
(((2))) (b) Necessary to protect the victim's life or prevent
deterioration of the victim's previously accepted condition; and
(((3))) (c) Not available from an alternative source.
For the purposes of this section, an individual will not be
required to use his or her assets other than funds recovered as a
result of a civil action or criminal restitution, for medical expenses
or pain and suffering, in order to qualify for an alternative source of
payment.
The director shall, in cooperation with the department of social
and health services, establish by October 1, 1989, a process to aid
crime victims in identifying and applying for appropriate alternative
benefit programs, if any, administered by the department of social and
health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The crime victims' compensation account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the crime victims' compensation program under this chapter. Only
the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

Sec. 4 RCW 9A.82.110 and 2009 c 479 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In an action brought by the attorney general on behalf of the
state under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) in which the state prevails, any
payments ordered in excess of the actual damages sustained shall be
deposited in the ((state general fund)) crime victims' compensation
account provided in section 3 of this act.
(2)(a) The county legislative authority may establish an
antiprofiteering revolving fund to be administered by the county
prosecuting attorney under the conditions and for the purposes provided
by this subsection. Disbursements from the fund shall be on
authorization of the county prosecuting attorney. No appropriation is
required for disbursements.
(b) Any prosecution and investigation costs, including attorney's
fees, recovered for the state by the county prosecuting attorney as a
result of enforcement of civil and criminal statutes pertaining to any
offense included in the definition of criminal profiteering, whether by
final judgment, settlement, or otherwise, shall be deposited, as
directed by a court of competent jurisdiction, in the fund established
by this subsection. In an action brought by a prosecuting attorney on
behalf of the county under RCW 9A.82.100(1)(b)(i) in which the county
prevails, any payments ordered in excess of the actual damages
sustained shall be deposited in the ((state general fund)) crime
victims' compensation account provided in section 3 of this act.
(c) The county legislative authority may prescribe a maximum level
of moneys in the antiprofiteering revolving fund. Moneys exceeding the
prescribed maximum shall be transferred to the county current expense
fund.
(d) The moneys in the fund shall be used by the county prosecuting
attorney for the investigation and prosecution of any offense, within
the jurisdiction of the county prosecuting attorney, included in the
definition of criminal profiteering, including civil enforcement.
(e) If a county has not established an antiprofiteering revolving
fund, any payments or forfeitures ordered to the county under this
chapter shall be deposited to the county current expense fund.

Sec. 5 RCW 72.09.111 and 2009 c 479 s 60 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall deduct taxes and legal financial
obligations from the gross wages, gratuities, or workers' compensation
benefits payable directly to the inmate under chapter 51.32 RCW, of
each inmate working in correctional industries work programs, or
otherwise receiving such wages, gratuities, or benefits. The secretary
shall also deduct child support payments from the gratuities of each
inmate working in class II through class IV correctional industries
work programs. The secretary shall develop a formula for the
distribution of offender wages, gratuities, and benefits. The formula
shall not reduce the inmate account below the indigency level, as
defined in RCW 72.09.015.
(a) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class I gross wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:
(i) Five percent to the ((state general fund)) crime victims'
compensation account provided in section 3 of this act;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court.
(b) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class II gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the ((state general fund)) crime victims'
compensation account provided in section 3 of this act;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost
of incarceration;
(iv) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court; and
(v) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(c) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
any workers' compensation benefits paid pursuant to RCW 51.32.080:
(i) Five percent to the ((state general fund)) crime victims'
compensation account provided in section 3 of this act;
(ii) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(iii) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(iv) An amount equal to any legal financial obligations owed by the
inmate established by an order of any Washington state superior court
up to the total amount of the award.
(d) The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from
class III gratuities:
(i) Five percent for the ((state general fund)) crime victims'
compensation account provided in section 3 of this act; and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(e) The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from
class IV gross gratuities:
(i) Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration; and
(ii) Fifteen percent for any child support owed under a support
order.
(2) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility
of release or parole under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death
shall be exempt from the requirement under subsection (1)(a)(ii),
(b)(ii), or (c)(ii).
(3)(a) The department personal inmate savings account, together
with any accrued interest, shall only be available to an inmate at the
following times:
(i) The time of his or her release from confinement;
(ii) Prior to his or her release from confinement in order to
secure approved housing; or
(iii) When the secretary determines that an emergency exists for
the inmate.
(b) If funds are made available pursuant to (a)(ii) or (iii) of
this subsection, the funds shall be made available to the inmate in an
amount determined by the secretary.
(c) The management of classes I, II, and IV correctional industries
may establish an incentive payment for offender workers based on
productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.
(4)(a) Subject to availability of funds for the correctional
industries program, the expansion of inmate employment in class I and
class II correctional industries shall be implemented according to the
following schedule:
(i) Not later than June 30, 2005, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in
class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(ii) Not later than June 30, 2006, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least four hundred in the number of inmates employed
in class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(iii) Not later than June 30, 2007, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least six hundred in the number of inmates employed
in class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(iv) Not later than June 30, 2008, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed
in class I or class II correctional industries work programs above the
number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(v) Not later than June 30, 2009, the secretary shall achieve a net
increase of at least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates
employed in class I or class II correctional industries work programs
above the number so employed on June 30, 2003;
(vi) Not later than June 30, 2010, the secretary shall achieve a
net increase of at least one thousand five hundred in the number of
inmates employed in class I or class II correctional industries work
programs above the number so employed on June 30, 2003.
(b) Failure to comply with the schedule in this subsection does not
create a private right of action.
(5) In the event that the offender worker's wages, gratuity, or
workers' compensation benefit is subject to garnishment for support
enforcement, the ((state general fund)) crime victims' compensation
account, savings, and cost of incarceration deductions shall be
calculated on the net wages after taxes, legal financial obligations,
and garnishment.
(6) The department shall explore other methods of recovering a
portion of the cost of the inmate's incarceration and for encouraging
participation in work programs, including development of incentive
programs that offer inmates benefits and amenities paid for only from
wages earned while working in a correctional industries work program.
(7) The department shall develop the necessary administrative
structure to recover inmates' wages and keep records of the amount
inmates pay for the costs of incarceration and amenities. All funds
deducted from inmate wages under subsection (1) of this section for the
purpose of contributions to the cost of incarceration shall be
deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and shall be used
only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.
(8) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the
inmates between class I and class II depending on available contracts
and resources.
(9) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support from
taking collection action against an inmate's moneys, assets, or
property pursuant to chapter 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW.

Sec. 6 RCW 72.09.480 and 2009 c 479 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply to this section.
(a) "Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing an inmate
with shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, and other
services and supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and
support of the inmate while in the custody of the department, based on
the average per inmate costs established by the department and the
office of financial management.
(b) "Minimum term of confinement" means the minimum amount of time
an inmate will be confined in the custody of the department,
considering the sentence imposed and adjusted for the total potential
earned early release time available to the inmate.
(c) "Program" means any series of courses or classes necessary to
achieve a proficiency standard, certificate, or postsecondary degree.
(2) When an inmate, except as provided in subsections (4) and (8)
of this section, receives any funds in addition to his or her wages or
gratuities, except settlements or awards resulting from legal action,
the additional funds shall be subject to the following deductions and
the priorities established in chapter 72.11 RCW:
(a) Five percent to the ((state general fund)) crime victims'
compensation account provided in section 3 of this act;
(b) Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account;
(c) Twenty percent for payment of legal financial obligations for
all inmates who have legal financial obligations owing in any
Washington state superior court;
(d) Twenty percent for any child support owed under a support
order; and
(e) Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration.
(3) When an inmate, except as provided in subsection (8) of this
section, receives any funds from a settlement or award resulting from
a legal action, the additional funds shall be subject to the deductions
in RCW 72.09.111(1)(a) and the priorities established in chapter 72.11
RCW.
(4) When an inmate who is subject to a child support order receives
funds from an inheritance, the deduction required under subsection
(2)(e) of this section shall only apply after the child support
obligation has been paid in full.
(5) The amount deducted from an inmate's funds under subsection (2)
of this section shall not exceed the department's total cost of
incarceration for the inmate incurred during the inmate's minimum or
actual term of confinement, whichever is longer.
(6)(a) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to funds received by the department from an offender or
from a third party on behalf of an offender for payment of education or
vocational programs or postsecondary education degree programs as
provided in RCW 72.09.460 and 72.09.465.
(b) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to funds received by the department from a third party,
including but not limited to a nonprofit entity on behalf of the
department's education, vocation, or postsecondary education degree
programs.
(7) The deductions required under subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to any money received by the department, on behalf of
an inmate, from family or other outside sources for the payment of
postage expenses. Money received under this subsection may only be
used for the payment of postage expenses and may not be transferred to
any other account or purpose. Money that remains unused in the
inmate's postage fund at the time of release shall be subject to the
deductions outlined in subsection (2) of this section.
(8) When an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment without
possibility of release or sentenced to death under chapter 10.95 RCW
receives funds, deductions are required under subsection (2) of this
section, with the exception of a personal inmate savings account under
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(9) The secretary of the department of corrections, or his or her
designee, may exempt an inmate from a personal inmate savings account
under subsection (2)(b) of this section if the inmate's earliest
release date is beyond the inmate's life expectancy.
(10) The interest earned on an inmate savings account created as a
result of the plan in section 4, chapter 325, Laws of 1999 shall be
exempt from the mandatory deductions under this section and RCW
72.09.111.
(11) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the
department of social and health services division of child support, the
county clerk, or a restitution recipient from taking collection action
against an inmate's moneys, assets, or property pursuant to chapter
9.94A, 26.23, 74.20, or 74.20A RCW including, but not limited to, the
collection of moneys received by the inmate from settlements or awards
resulting from legal action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect April 1, 2010, for all claims of victims
of criminal acts occurring after July 1, 1981.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1,
2013.

--- END ---