BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to seek
the required federal approval to toll the existing Interstate 90
floating bridge corridor.
It is further the intent of the legislature to impose tolls on the
Interstate 90 floating bridge corridor to fully finance construction of
the replacement state route number 520 bridge.
Based on the financing strategy of the state route number 520 work
group created under RCW 47.01.418, unless additional state or federal
funds are secured, the state route number 520 bridge replacement and
HOV project is not fully funded without assuming tolls on the
Interstate 90 floating bridge corridor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) The initial imposition of tolls on the Interstate 90 floating
bridge corridor is authorized, the Interstate 90 floating bridge
corridor is designated an eligible toll facility, and toll revenue
generated in the corridor must only be expended as allowed under RCW
47.56.820.
(2) The Interstate 90 floating bridge corridor consists of that
portion of Interstate 90 between the junctions of Interstate 5 and
Interstate 405.
(3)(a) Tolling must commence on the Interstate 90 floating bridge
corridor concurrently with tolling commencement on the state route
number 520 corridor, or as soon as is practicable.
(b) In setting the toll rates for the corridor pursuant to RCW
47.56.850, the tolling authority shall set a variable schedule of toll
rates to maintain travel time, speed, and reliability on the corridor
and generate the necessary revenue to complete funding for the state
route number 520 corridor.
(c) The tolling authority shall initially set the variable schedule
of toll rates, which the tolling authority may adjust at least annually
to reflect inflation as measured by the consumer price index or as
necessary to meet the redemption of bonds issued to fund the state
route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project, and interest
payments on the bonds, to generate revenue as provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(4) The proceeds of the bonds designated in subsection 3(c) of this
section, together with tolls authorized under this section, and other
appropriated and identified state and federal funds are sufficient to
pay for the state route number 520 bridge replacement and HOV project,
but not to exceed four billion six hundred fifty million dollars.
(5) For the purposes of RCW 47.56.820, the Interstate 90 floating
bridge corridor is considered part of the state route number 520
corridor toll facility as designated in RCW 47.56.870(1).

Sec. 3 RCW 47.56.875 and 2009 c 472 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
A special account to be known as the state route number 520
corridor account is created in the state treasury.
(1) Deposits to the account must include:
(a) All proceeds of bonds issued for construction of the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings, including any capitalized interest;
(b) All of the tolls and other revenues received from the operation
of the state route number 520 corridor as a toll facility, to be
deposited at least monthly;
(c) All of the tolls and other revenues received from the operation
of the Interstate 90 floating bridge corridor as a toll facility, to be
deposited at least monthly;
(d) Any interest that may be earned from the deposit or investment
of those revenues;
(((d))) (e) Notwithstanding RCW 47.12.063, proceeds from the sale
of any surplus real property acquired for the purpose of building the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings; and
(((e))) (f) All damages, liquidated or otherwise, collected under
any contract involving the construction of the replacement state route
number 520 floating bridge and necessary landings.
(2) Subject to the covenants made by the state in the bond
proceedings authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds for the
replacement state route number 520 floating bridge and necessary
landings, toll charges, other revenues, and interest received from the
operation of the state route number 520 corridor as a toll facility may
be used to:
(a) Pay any required costs allowed under RCW 47.56.820; and
(b) Repay amounts to the motor vehicle fund as required.
(3) When repaying the motor vehicle fund, the state treasurer shall
transfer funds from the state route number 520 corridor account to the
motor vehicle fund on or before each debt service date for bonds issued
for the replacement state route number 520 floating bridge project and
necessary landings in an amount sufficient to repay the motor vehicle
fund for amounts transferred from that fund to the highway bond
retirement fund to provide for any bond principal and interest due on
that date. The state treasurer may establish subaccounts for the
purpose of segregating toll charges, bond sale proceeds, and other
revenues.

--- END ---