BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.100.020 and 2002 c 79 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Local retail sales and use tax" means the tax levied by a city
or town under RCW 82.14.030, excluding that portion which a county is
entitled to receive under RCW 82.14.030.
(2) "Local retail sales and use tax increment revenue" means that
portion of the local retail sales and use tax collected in each year
upon any retail sale or any use of an article of tangible personal
property within a downtown or neighborhood commercial district that is
in excess of the amount of local retail sales and use tax collected on
sales or uses within the downtown or neighborhood commercial district
in the year preceding.
(3) "Downtown or neighborhood commercial district" means (a) an
area or areas designated by the legislative authority of a city or town
with a population over one hundred thousand and that are typically
limited to the pedestrian core area or the central commercial district
and compact business districts that serve specific neighborhoods within
the city or town; or (b) commercial areas designated as main street
areas by the ((office of trade and economic development)) department of
archaeology and historic preservation.
(4) "Community revitalization project" means:
(a) Health and safety improvements authorized to be publicly
financed under chapter 35.80 or 35.81 RCW;
(b) Publicly owned or leased facilities within the jurisdiction of
a local government which the sponsor has authority to provide; and
(c) Expenditure for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management,
planning, and promotion within a downtown or neighborhood commercial
district including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the district;
(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the downtown or neighborhood commercial district;
(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395; or
(iv) Project design and planning, land acquisition, site
preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement,
operation, and installation of a public facility; the costs of
financing, including interest during construction, legal and other
professional services, taxes, and insurance; the costs of complying
with this chapter and other applicable law; and the administrative
costs reasonably necessary and related to these costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.360.010 and 2009 c 565 s 44 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Area" means a geographic area within a local government that
is described by a closed perimeter boundary.
(2) "Department" means the department of ((commerce)) archaeology
and historic preservation.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department ((of
commerce)).
(4) "Local government" means a city, code city, or town.
(5) "Qualified levels of participation" means a local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program that has been
designated by the department.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.73.010 and 2009 c 565 s 55 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(2) "Contribution" means cash contributions.
(3) "Department" means the department of revenue.
(4) "Main street trust fund" means the ((department of commerce's))
Washington main street trust fund account under RCW 43.360.050.
(5) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.
(6) "Program" means a nonprofit organization under internal revenue
code sections 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(6), with the sole mission of
revitalizing a downtown or neighborhood commercial district area, that
is designated by the department of ((commerce)) archaeology and
historic preservation as described in RCW 43.360.010 through
43.360.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.73.050 and 2005 c 514 s 906 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
archaeology and historic preservation shall provide information to the
department to administer this chapter, including a list of designated
programs that shall be updated as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
department of commerce pertaining to the Washington main street program
are transferred to the department of archaeology and historic
preservation.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be delivered to the custody of the department of archaeology and
historic preservation. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department
of commerce in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the department of archaeology
and historic preservation. All funds, credits, or other assets held in
connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
assigned to the department of archaeology and historic preservation.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of commerce for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
department of archaeology and historic preservation.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of commerce engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of archaeology and
historic preservation. All employees classified under chapter 41.06
RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of
archaeology and historic preservation to perform their usual duties
upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
commerce pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by the department of archaeology and
historic preservation. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of
archaeology and historic preservation.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of commerce shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the department of commerce assigned
to the department of archaeology and historic preservation under this
section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the department of archaeology and historic preservation
shall become a part of the existing bargaining unit at the department
of archaeology and historic preservation and shall be considered an
appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing bargaining unit,
if any, under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---