BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that the
state route number 166 description be updated to reflect the current
city limits of Port Orchard.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.17.328 and 1993 c 430 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 166 is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number 16 in the vicinity
west of Port Orchard, thence northeasterly to the eastern Port Orchard
city limits as they exist on the effective date of this act.

--- END ---