BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.635
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that gang activity on school grounds and
at school activities places staff and students at risk of intimidation
and violence, can create a hostile school atmosphere, and interferes
with the educational mission of schools. The legislature further finds
that gang activity has spread from urban areas to suburban and rural
areas of the state, and that because of the highly mobile nature of
modern gangs, no region is immune to the effects of criminal street
gang activity.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature that the schools of the
state will be free of the negative influences of criminal street gangs
that are inconsistent with the maintenance of a positive and safe
school climate. The legislature finds that discipline for gang
activity must be based on evidence of prohibited conduct and that
clearly stated school policies are necessary to protect student due
process rights. It is the intent of the legislature that all schools
will have consistent policies and procedures to address gangs and any
associated conduct and behavior.
(3) The legislature also finds that suppression must be combined
with prevention and intervention to effect long-term reductions in gang
activity, and intends that the use of school discipline will be
balanced against gang prevention and intervention programs, alternative
learning placements, and dropout prevention programs.
(4) Policies and procedures enacted pursuant to this section must
be constructed and applied in a manner that does not discriminate on
the basis of race, creed, color, national origin, religion, sex, or
sexual orientation, and must be consistent with the requirements of RCW
49.60.030. Beginning September 1, 2012, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require annual aggregate reporting of discipline for
criminal street gang conduct to monitor for disproportional impact on
protected groups.
(5) By September 1, 2011, the board of directors of each school
district shall enact a policy or modify an existing policy to be
consistent with the requirements in this section. The policy must
prohibit criminal street gang activity on school property and school
vehicles, and at all officially sanctioned school activities, and must
outline a procedure that implements the policy in a manner consistent
with all pertinent statutes, rules, and any guidance provided by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(6) The policy and associated procedure of each district shall, at
a minimum:
(a) Include a statement that criminal street gang activities are
prohibited on school properties and at officially sanctioned school
events for the purpose of promoting safety and the educational mission;
(b) Set forth definitions of all terms, including "criminal street
gang," "gang member or associate," and "gang activity," consistent with
the definitions in RCW 28A.600.455 and any definitions provided in
rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction;
(c) Include specific parameters to be used for determining if a
student falls under the definition of a member or associate of a
criminal street gang for the purpose of disciplinary action, and an
avenue for a student to appeal that determination and/or have it later
removed from his or her record;
(d) A provision that no student may be disciplined unless the
student knowingly violates the policy or published rules of the school
district, and methods by which parents and students are notified of
what specific clothing, symbols, gestures, or other activity are deemed
by the school district to be gang-related; and
(e) An outline of progressive discipline steps for violations of
the policy, including an initial warning and opportunity to correct
violations, and including appropriate interventions other than
suspension for first infractions, except in the case of exceptional
misconduct as defined under WAC 392-400-245.
(7) The Washington state school directors' association and the
office of superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with
the task force on gangs in schools and other stakeholders, shall
develop and make available to school districts a model policy and
procedure by January 1, 2011. Representatives of the following
stakeholder groups must be included in the development of the model
policy: School directors, school administrators, civil rights
organizations, the state ethnic commissions, the tribal leaders'
congress, the office of the education ombudsman, the achievement gap
oversight and accountability commission, parents, students, and law
enforcement.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.225 and 2009 c 380 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except for students who reside out-of-state and students under
RCW 28A.225.217, a district shall accept applications from nonresident
students who are the children of full-time certificated and classified
school employees, and those children shall be permitted to enroll:
(a) At the school to which the employee is assigned;
(b) At a school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(c) At a school in the district that provides early intervention
services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.065 or preschool services pursuant to
RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.
(2) A district may reject applications under subsection (1) of this
section if:
(a) The student's disciplinary records ((indicate)) raise
significant concerns for staff or student safety as evidenced by: (i)
A history of convictions for offenses or crimes((,)); or (ii)
disciplinary actions for violent or disruptive behavior((, or gang
membership)) that resulted in suspension or expulsion;
(b) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days and there is evidence that admission
of the student would present a significant risk of disruption of the
educational environment or significant concern for student safety. Any
policy allowing for readmission of expelled or suspended students under
this subsection (2)(b) must apply uniformly to both resident and
nonresident applicants; or
(c) Enrollment of a child under this section would displace a child
who is a resident of the district, except that if a child is admitted
under subsection (1) of this section, that child shall be permitted to
remain enrolled at that school, or in that district's kindergarten
through twelfth grade continuum, until he or she has completed his or
her schooling.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all
districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from
students receiving home-based instruction for admission to the
district's schools shall consider equally all applications received.
Each school district shall adopt a policy establishing rational, fair,
and equitable standards for acceptance and rejection of applications by
June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection of a nonresident
student if:
(a) Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the
district experiencing a financial hardship;
(b) The student's disciplinary records ((indicate)) raise
significant concerns for staff or student safety as evidenced by: (i)
A history of convictions for offenses or crimes((,)); or (ii)
disciplinary actions for violent or disruptive behavior((, or gang
membership)) that resulted in suspension or expulsion; or
(c) The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school
for more than ten consecutive days and there is evidence that admission
of the student would present a significant risk of disruption of the
educational environment or significant concern for student safety. Any
policy allowing for readmission of expelled or suspended students under
this subsection (3)(c) must apply uniformly to both resident and
nonresident applicants.
((For purposes of subsections (2)(a) and (3)(b) of this section,
"gang" means a group which: (i) Consists of three or more persons;
(ii) has identifiable leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing basis,
regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.))
(4) Any district accepting applications from nonresident students
for admission to an online learning program may not deny a nonresident
application on the basis of subsection (2)(a) or (b) or (3)(b) or (c)
of this section unless that program regularly requires the presence of
the student on school property and there is a significant risk of
disruption of the educational environment or a significant concern for
staff or student safety caused by the student's presence.
(5) The district shall provide to applicants written notification
of the approval or denial of the application in a timely manner not to
exceed five school days from receipt unless extenuating circumstances
exist. If the application is rejected, the notification shall include
the reason or reasons for denial and the right to appeal to the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.225.230(3).

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.600.455 and 1997 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A student who is enrolled in a public school or an alternative
school may be suspended or expelled, consistent with other laws and
rules related to student discipline, if the student is a member or
associate of a criminal street gang and knowingly engages in gang
activity on school grounds or while engaged in any officially
sanctioned school-sponsored activity.
(2) (("Gang" means a group which: (a) Consists of three or more
persons; (b) has identifiable leadership; and (c) on an ongoing basis,
regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.))
The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the task
force on gangs in schools and the school safety advisory committee, may
adopt rules pertaining to the discipline of students for gang-related
behavior. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to, reasonable
standards establishing whether a student falls under the definition of
a gang member or associate, specific definitions of conduct considered
gang activity, limits on disciplinary exclusions from school, and
required reporting or recordkeeping. The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide guidance to districts on the application of
this section, and shall thereafter update such guidance as necessary.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing organization,
association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal or
informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol,
having as one of its primary activities the commission of criminal
acts, and whose members or associates individually or collectively
engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street gang
activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide organizations or their members or
agents.
(b) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any person who
actively participates in any criminal street gang and who intentionally
promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the criminal
street gang.
(c) "Gang activity" means any act that is committed with the intent
to promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or
is committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(i) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(ii) To increase or maintain the gang's size, prestige, dominance,
or control in any geographical area;
(iii) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(iv) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(v) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(vi) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---