BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.635
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that gang activity and other
criminal activity in the vicinity of and on school campuses interferes
with the safe and orderly operation of public and private schools and
the educational rights of the children of the state. For the purpose
of promoting the safety of students and staff in the schools of the
state and the orderly operation of schools, the legislature intends to
designate school properties and adjacent areas as school safety zones.
(2) School safety zones are inclusive of all areas within a one
thousand-foot radius of any public school facility while that facility
is being used by students or school staff, and all school properties at
all times.
(a) For the purposes of this section, "school properties" includes
all real properties owned, operated, or under the control of any school
district; and
(b) Those portions of the properties of any community or technical
college or educational service district that are used to provide
educational services to students in kindergarten through grade twelve.
(3) It is unlawful for any person to remain on or return to public
properties or spaces within a school safety zone or to enter any school
properties:
(a) After being properly notified by any authorized school
administrator, designee, or law enforcement officer that probable cause
exists that the person's activities or conduct within the school safety
zone constitute a violation of one or more of the following, whether or
not the violation results in arrest, citation, or prosecution:
(i) Disorderly conduct under RCW 9A.84.030 or the local county or
municipal code;
(ii) Malicious harassment under RCW 9A.36.080, when the harassment
is aimed at any school employee, volunteer, student, person contracted
to the school district, or visitor;
(iii) Harassment under RCW 9A.46.020, when the harassment is aimed
at any school employee, volunteer, student, person contracted to the
school district, or visitor;
(iv) Stalking under RCW 9A.46.110 when the stalking is aimed at any
school employee, volunteer, student, person contracted to the school
district, or visitor;
(v) Criminal gang intimidation under RCW 9A.46.120;
(vi) Malicious mischief under chapter 9A.48 RCW, when the crime is
committed against a student or staff member's property, affects school
property, or impairs school operations;
(vii) Criminal street gang tagging and graffiti under RCW
9A.48.105;
(viii) Criminal trespass under chapter 9A.52 RCW, when the trespass
occurs on school property including school vehicles;
(ix) Threat to bomb or injure property under RCW 9.61.160, when the
threat is made against any school building or property, or the property
of any school employee, student, volunteer, or person contracted to the
school district, when the threat is reasonably related to that person's
legitimate school business;
(x) Delivery or possession with intent to deliver a controlled
substance under chapter 69.50 RCW;
(xi) Illegal possession of any dangerous weapon under RCW 9.41.250;
(xii) Unlawful display of a weapon under RCW 9.41.270 when the
violation places school employees, students, volunteers, persons under
contract to the school district, or visitors at risk of harm;
(xiii) Illegal possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon on
school property under RCW 9.41.280;
(xiv) Any other violation of chapter 9.41 RCW not otherwise
enumerated in this section;
(xv) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, when that
offense is directed at any school employee, volunteer, student, person
contracted to the school district, or visitor;
(xvi) Disturbing school, school activities, or meetings as
prohibited under RCW 28A.635.020;
(xvii) Interfering with any administrator, teacher, classified
employee, or student by threat of force or violence under RCW
28A.635.100;
(xviii) Intimidating any administrator, teacher, classified
employee, or student by threat of force or violence under RCW
28A.635.100;
(xix) Reckless driving as defined under RCW 46.61.500 when the act
endangers school employees, students, volunteers, persons under
contract to the school district, or visitors or when the act threatens
to or causes significant damage to school property; or
(xx) The distribution or delivery of any substance, item, or
material to any minor student when possession of that substance, item,
or material by the recipient student is prohibited by any state or
federal law;
(b) If the person has been convicted of any of the following, if
the person is notified by the convicting court or the person's
probation or parole officer of the requirement to be excluded from the
school safety zones:
(i) Criminal gang intimidation under RCW 9A.46.120;
(ii) Illegal possession of a firearm or dangerous weapon on school
property under RCW 9.41.280;
(iii) Threat to bomb or injure property under RCW 9.61.160 when
that offense was directed at any school building or property or the
property of any school employee, volunteer, person contracted to the
school district, or student;
(iv) Delivery or possession with intent to deliver a controlled
substance under chapter 69.50 RCW;
(v) Any violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 when the
offense was directed at any school employee, volunteer, student, person
contracted to the school district, or visitor;
(vi) Any serious violent felony offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, when the offense was directed at any school employee,
volunteer, student, person contracted to the school district, or
visitor;
(vii) Any criminal street gang-related offense, as defined in RCW
9.94A.030, if the offense either occurred within a school safety zone
or was directed at a school employee, student, volunteer, person
contracted to the school district, or visitor while engaged in school
business or under circumstances where it is reasonable to conclude that
the offense was connected to legitimate school business.
(4)(a) Persons excluded from a school safety zone pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section are not subject to enforcement action
unless they have received prior notice in accordance with this section
and reasonable opportunity to vacate the area.
(b) A person may be excluded from a school safety zone for a period
not to exceed twenty-four hours by verbal notice from an authorized
school administrator, designee, or law enforcement officer. Verbal
notice must include the reason for the exclusion, the duration of the
exclusion, and the penalty for failure to comply.
(c)(i) A person may be excluded from a school safety zone for a
period not exceeding ninety days if notice is delivered in writing to
the subject or delivery has been attempted and documented as provided
in this subsection (4)(c). An exclusion order may be extended for an
additional ninety days if there is good and sufficient cause to believe
the subject of the exclusion order is a continuing threat to the safety
of staff or students.
(ii) In the case of an exclusion exceeding twenty-four hours,
written notice must include the reason for the exclusion, the duration
and effective hours of the exclusion imposed, details of permissible
presence in the school safety zone or on school property, the penalty
for violation of the exclusion order, and the means of appealing the
exclusion.
(iii) The recipient of the notice under this subsection (4)(c) must
acknowledge receipt by his or her signature on the exclusion order and
must receive the original copy at the time of notice.
(iv) If the subject under this subsection (4)(c) refuses delivery
or signature, an exclusion order showing attempted delivery confirmed
by two witnesses carries the same weight as an exclusion order executed
with the signature of the subject.
(v) Exclusion orders imposed under this subsection (4)(c) must be
reported to the local law enforcement agency as soon as reasonably
possible, but in no case more than forty-eight hours after delivery to
the subject.
(5)(a) A person excluded from a school safety zone under subsection
(3) of this section may request an appeal hearing with the school
district superintendent to have the exclusion order rescinded, the
period shortened, or the provisions of the exclusion modified.
(b) Notice of appeal must be made in writing unless the
superintendent waives this requirement.
(c) An appeal hearing under this subsection (5) shall be an
adjudicative proceeding conducted by an impartial hearing officer
appointed by the school district superintendent. The hearing must be
concluded within fifteen business days after the notice of appeal. The
hearing examiner may extend this period at the request of the appellant
for an additional fifteen days if the appellant shows good cause.
(d) A hearing officer:
(i) Must not be an employee of the school district;
(ii) Must not be a person having a personal or professional
interest that conflicts with the person's objectivity in the hearing;
(iii) Must possess the knowledge and ability to conduct hearings in
accordance with appropriate, standard legal practice; and
(iv) Must possess the knowledge and ability to render and write
decisions in accordance with appropriate, standard legal practice.
(e) A person who otherwise qualifies to conduct an appeal hearing
under (d) of this subsection is not an employee of the school district
solely because he or she is paid by the school district to serve as a
hearing officer.
(f) Either party to the appeal hearing may call and cross-examine
witnesses, produce documents, or introduce other evidence. Any written
or physical material to be introduced must be made available to the
opposing party at least twenty-four hours before the scheduled hearing
time.
(g) A party to an appeal hearing may be advised and represented at
the party's own expense by counsel.
(h) The hearing officer shall determine whether a preponderance of
the evidence supports excluding the appellant under subsection (3) of
this section.
(i) The hearing officer shall issue a written decision within three
business days of the conclusion of the appeal hearing, to be delivered
by certified mail to the subject of the exclusion.
(j) The decision of the hearing officer is final. An appellant may
seek judicial review of the decision by filing a writ of review in
superior court.
(k) The exclusion order shall remain in full effect during the
pendency of any administrative or judicial proceeding.
(l) An appeal made under this subsection (5) shall be the exclusive
remedy for challenging the validity of an exclusion order issued
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
(6)(a) A violation of an exclusion order under subsection (3) of
this section constitutes criminal trespass in the first degree under
RCW 9A.52.070, punishable as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.
(b) A person who violates an exclusion order issued under
subsection (3) of this section and who is found to be illegally in
possession of any firearm defined in chapter 9.41 RCW or in illegal
possession of a dangerous weapon as provided under RCW 9.41.250 is
guilty of a class C felony.
(7) This section does not preclude or prohibit prosecution under
any other provision of law.
(8)(a) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution brought under
this section that the person who violates an exclusion order issued
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section:
(i) Was present in a school safety zone for a lawful purpose
reasonably requiring the person's presence at that time and location,
including legitimate business on school grounds, required commercial
business, legitimate employment, or business with a government agency
located within the school safety zone;
(ii) Was occupying private properties in the school safety zone as
an owner or tenant or was present on private properties within a school
safety zone when reasonably required for a lawful purpose at that time
and location, if the person is in compliance with all pertinent laws;
or
(iii) Was transiting through a school safety zone on a public
thoroughfare while on legitimate business as described in (a)(i) and
(ii) of this subsection if there was no other reasonable route of
travel, if the person followed the most direct route through the school
safety zone.
(b) Persons subject to an exclusion order but permitted to be in a
school safety zone under (a) of this subsection:
(i) May not loiter on public properties within a school safety zone
or purposely interact with staff, students, or visitors of a school
except when specifically required by legitimate school business; and
(ii) May be presumed to not have a legitimate lawful purpose to be
present in the school safety zone if they take flight upon the
appearance of a law enforcement officer, school administrator, or
designee, refuse to identify themselves, or manifestly endeavor to
conceal themselves or any object.
(c) Any authorized school administrator, designee, or law
enforcement officer who has provided a verbal or written exclusion
order to a person pursuant to this section shall provide a law
enforcement officer, for the purpose of establishing probable cause to
arrest a person for an offense under this section, with a signed
written statement attesting to the facts giving rise to the exclusion
order that the person is properly subject to exclusion from the school
safety zone and that the person was properly provided notice of the
exclusion order as required in this section.
(d) Unless flight by the person or other circumstance makes it
impracticable, a law enforcement officer shall, before any arrest for
an offense under this section, afford the person an opportunity to
explain how the person's presence in the school safety zone is for a
lawful purpose by requesting the person identify himself or herself and
explain his or her presence and conduct. No person may be convicted of
an offense under this section if the law enforcement officer did not
comply with this procedure.
(9) This section does not prohibit any person under an exclusion
order issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section from being
present on school property for legitimate purposes if the person has
the prior express permission of the principal or other authorized
school administrator. The parent or legal guardian of a student
enrolled in a school shall be assumed to have permission to be on
school grounds if he or she has been summoned to the school for a
disciplinary incident, medical emergency, scheduled meeting, or family
emergency.
(10) This section shall not be used as a means of student
discipline or to prohibit the access of a student to educational or
extracurricular opportunities, however a student who has been suspended
or expelled from a school district for conduct that satisfies the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section may be issued an
exclusion order not to exceed the period of the disciplinary suspension
or expulsion.
(11) This section may not be used to impinge upon the lawful
exercise of constitutionally protected rights of freedom of speech or
assembly, or to prohibit any lawful act, including picketing, strikes,
or collective bargaining, nor may this section be used to exclude a
person from public properties in a school safety zone solely on the
basis of his or her physical appearance.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.635.030 and 1984 c 258 s 315 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who shall willfully create a disturbance on school
premises during school hours or at school activities or school meetings
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, ((the penalty for which shall be a
fine in any sum not more than fifty dollars)) punishable as provided in
RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.84.030 and 2007 c 2 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) A person is guilty of disorderly conduct if the person:
(a) Uses abusive language and thereby intentionally creates a risk
of assault;
(b) Intentionally disrupts any lawful assembly or meeting of
persons without lawful authority;
(c) Intentionally disrupts any school operations or school activity
without lawful authority;
(d) Intentionally obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic without
lawful authority; or
(((d))) (e)(i) Intentionally engages in fighting or in tumultuous
conduct or makes unreasonable noise, within five hundred feet of:
(A) The location where a funeral or burial is being performed;
(B) A funeral home during the viewing of a deceased person;
(C) A funeral procession, if the person described in this
subsection (1)(((d))) (e) knows that the funeral procession is taking
place; or
(D) A building in which a funeral or memorial service is being
conducted; and
(ii) Knows that the activity adversely affects the funeral, burial,
viewing, funeral procession, or memorial service.
(2) Disorderly conduct is a misdemeanor, punishable as provided in
RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---