BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.835 and 2007 c 491 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All teachers who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, shall have a period of
ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2
or plan 3. At the end of ninety days, if the member has not made a
choice to become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan
3 or plan 2 as follows:
(a) Becomes a member of plan 3 if first employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, but prior to July 1,
2010;
(b) Becomes a member of plan 2 if first employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after July 1, 2010.
These plan choice and default provisions are subject to the rights
reserved by the legislature in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.
(3) The plan choice provision as set forth in section 3, chapter
491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as a replacement
benefit for gain-sharing. Until there is legal certainty with respect
to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to plan choice under
this section is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right
to amend or repeal this section. Legal certainty includes, but is not
limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions;
and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including
reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court
of the United States. Until that time, all teachers who first become
employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1,
2007, may choose either plan 2 or plan 3 under this section. If the
repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in a final
determination of a court of law, and the court orders reinstatement of
gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy, then all teachers
who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or
after the date of such reinstatement shall be members of plan 3.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.35.610 and 2007 c 491 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All classified employees who first become employed by an
employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, shall have
a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a
member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of ninety days, if the member
has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes
a member of plan 3 or plan 2 as follows:
(a) Becomes a member of plan 3 if first employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, but prior to July 1,
2010;
(b) Becomes a member of plan 2 if first employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after July 1, 2010.
These plan choice and default provisions are subject to the rights
reserved by the legislature in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under
subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.
(3) The plan choice provision as set forth in section 7, chapter
491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as a replacement
benefit for gain-sharing. Until there is legal certainty with respect
to the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW, the right to plan choice under
this section is noncontractual, and the legislature reserves the right
to amend or repeal this section. Legal certainty includes, but is not
limited to, the expiration of any: Applicable limitations on actions;
and periods of time for seeking appellate review, up to and including
reconsideration by the Washington supreme court and the supreme court
of the United States. Until that time, all classified employees who
first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or
after July 1, 2007, may choose either plan 2 or plan 3 under this
section. If the repeal of chapter 41.31A RCW is held to be invalid in
a final determination of a court of law, and the court orders
reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate benefits as a remedy,
then all classified employees who first become employed by an employer
in an eligible position on or after the date of such reinstatement
shall be members of plan 3.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.40.785 and 2000 c 247 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All employees who first become employed by an employer in an
eligible position on or after March 1, 2002, for state agencies or
institutes of higher education, or September 1, 2002, for other
employers, shall have a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable
choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of ninety
days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2,
he or she becomes a member of plan 3 or plan 2 as follows:
(a) Becomes a member of plan 3 if first employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after March 1, 2002, but prior to July 1,
2010, for state agencies or institutions of higher education, or on or
after September 1, 2002, but prior to July 1, 2010, for other
employers;
(b) Becomes a member of plan 2 if first employed by an employer in
an eligible position on or after July 1, 2010.
(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become
a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the
department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon
becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service
credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and
all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the
member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---