BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to make available
early learning preschool opportunities to every three and four-year old
child in the state. The legislature further finds that early learning
experiences are improved when all children have the opportunities to
learn together. Early learning opportunities can be expanded by
combining state support with private payments by families who can
afford to pay. Requiring programs to earn certification will improve
the quality of preschool programs, provide better information about
quality to parents, and improve outcomes for children.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.005 and 2007 c 415 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that:
(a) Parents are their children's first and most important teachers
and decision makers;
(b) Research across disciplines now demonstrates that what happens
in the earliest years makes a critical difference in children's
readiness to succeed in school and life;
(c) Washington's competitiveness in the global economy requires a
world-class education system that starts early and supports life-long
learning;
(d) Washington state currently makes substantial investments in
voluntary child care and early learning services and supports, but
because services are fragmented across multiple state agencies, and
early learning providers lack the supports and incentives needed to
improve the quality of services they provide, many parents have
difficulty accessing high quality early learning services;
(e) A more cohesive and integrated voluntary early learning system
would result in greater efficiencies for the state, increased
partnership between the state and the private sector, improved access
to high quality early learning services, and better employment and
early learning outcomes for families and all children; and
(f) Voluntary high quality preschool opportunities for all three
and four-year olds will help children succeed in school and life.
(2) The legislature finds that the early years of a child's life
are critical to the child's healthy brain development and that the
quality of caregiving during the early years can significantly impact
the child's intellectual, social, and emotional development.
(3) The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To establish the department of early learning;
(b) To coordinate and consolidate state activities relating to
child care and early learning programs;
(c) To safeguard and promote the health, safety, and well-being of
children receiving child care and early learning assistance, which is
paramount over the right of any person to provide care;
(d) To provide tools to promote the hiring of suitable providers of
child care by:
(i) Providing parents with access to information regarding child
care providers;
(ii) Providing parents with child care licensing action histories
regarding child care providers; and
(iii) Requiring background checks of applicants for employment in
any child care facility licensed or regulated under current law;
(e) To promote linkages and alignment between early learning
programs and elementary schools and support the transition of children
and families from prekindergarten environments to kindergarten;
(f) To promote the development of a sufficient number and variety
of adequate child care and early learning facilities, both public and
private; and
(g) To license agencies and to assure the users of such agencies,
their parents, the community at large and the agencies themselves that
adequate minimum standards are maintained by all child care and early
learning facilities.
(4) This chapter does not expand the state's authority to license
or regulate activities or programs beyond those licensed or regulated
under existing law.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.215.020 and 2007 c 394 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of early learning is created as an executive
branch agency. The department is vested with all powers and duties
transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and duties
as may be authorized by law.
(2) The primary duties of the department are to implement state
early learning policy and to coordinate, consolidate, and integrate
child care and early learning programs in order to administer programs
and funding as efficiently as possible. The department's duties
include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To support both public and private sectors toward a
comprehensive and collaborative system of early learning that serves
parents, children, and providers and to encourage best practices in
child care and early learning programs;
(b) To make early learning resources available to parents and
caregivers;
(c) To carry out activities, including providing clear and easily
accessible information about quality and improving the quality of early
learning opportunities for young children, in cooperation with the
nongovernmental private-public partnership;
(d) To administer child care and early learning programs;
(e) To establish certification for preschool programs serving three
and four-year old children, including a timeline for requiring all
preschools to become certified;
(f) To standardize internal financial audits, oversight visits,
performance benchmarks, and licensing criteria, so that programs can
function in an integrated fashion;
(((f))) (g) To support the implementation of the nongovernmental
private-public partnership and cooperate with that partnership in
pursuing its goals including providing data and support necessary for
the successful work of the partnership;
(((g))) (h) To work cooperatively and in coordination with the
early learning council;
(((h))) (i) To collaborate with the K-12 school system at the state
and local levels to ensure appropriate connections and smooth
transitions between early learning and K-12 programs; ((and
(i))) (j) To develop preschool programs for voluntary attendance by
three and four-year old children under section 5 of this act;
(k) To review the early childhood education and assistance program
and head start program standards to make recommendations for improving
program quality;
(l) To work with the federal agency administering the head start
program to integrate the state and federal programs to better serve
children and families;
(m) To develop, coordinate, and implement services and programs for
children from birth to age three that support families and caregivers
through a continuum of options including but not limited to programs or
services provided in community settings such as health care offices,
libraries, children's museums, and park and recreation programs; and
(n) Upon the development of an early learning information system,
to make available to parents timely inspection and licensing action
information through the internet and other means.
(3) The department's programs shall be designed in a way that
respects and preserves the ability of parents and legal guardians to
direct the education, development, and upbringing of their children,
and that recognizes and honors cultural and linguistic diversity. The
department shall include parents and legal guardians in the development
of policies and program decisions affecting their children.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.215.090 and 2007 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The early learning advisory council is established to advise
the department on statewide early learning community needs and
progress.
(2) The council shall work in conjunction with the department to
develop a statewide early learning plan that crosses systems and
sectors to promote alignment of private and public sector actions,
objectives, and resources, and to ensure school readiness. The council
shall update the plan at least every five years after the initial plan
is completed in 2010.
(3) The council shall include diverse, statewide representation
from public, nonprofit, and for-profit entities. Its membership shall
reflect regional, racial, and cultural diversity to adequately
represent the needs of all children and families in the state.
(4) Council members shall serve two-year terms. However, to
stagger the terms of the council, the initial appointments for twelve
of the members shall be for one year. Once the initial one-year to
two-year terms expire, all subsequent terms shall be for two years,
with the terms expiring on June 30th of the applicable year. The terms
shall be staggered in such a way that, where possible, the terms of
members representing a specific group do not expire simultaneously.
(5) The council shall consist of not more than twenty-five members,
as follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint at least one representative from
each of the following: The department, the office of financial
management, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the higher education coordinating board, and the
state board for community and technical colleges;
(b) One representative from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, to be appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction;
(c) The governor shall appoint at least seven leaders in early
childhood education, with at least one representative with experience
or expertise in each of the following areas: Children with
disabilities, the K-12 system, family day care providers, and child
care centers;
(d) Two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus, and two members of the senate, one from each caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate, respectively;
(e) Two parents, one of whom serves on the department's parent
advisory council, to be appointed by the governor;
(f) Two representatives of the private-public partnership created
in RCW 43.215.070, to be appointed by the partnership board;
(g) One representative designated by sovereign tribal governments;
and
(h) One representative from the Washington federation of
independent schools.
(6) The council shall be cochaired by one representative of a state
agency and one nongovernmental member, to be elected by the council for
two-year terms.
(7) Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW 43.03.240 and reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060.
(8) The department shall provide staff support to the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The all start voluntary preschool program for three and four-year old children is created. The department shall phase-in all start
as funds are available. It is the intent that all start begin in
September 2013 and that opportunities for all start be available to all
three and four-year old children by September 2020. The program shall
be implemented first in areas that have state-funded all-day
kindergarten programs. In implementing the program, the department
shall:
(a) Establish a schedule of state support and copayments based upon
the ability to pay for families at or below two hundred percent of the
federal poverty guidelines;
(b) Establish criteria for eligible providers that provide for a
service delivery system that includes both public and private entities,
including criteria that requires programs to obtain preschool
certification under RCW 43.215.020;
(c) Establish program criteria including, but not limited to,
program hours, length of program year, class size, and ratios of
children to early childhood educators;
(d) Establish criteria for early childhood educators including, but
not limited to, requirements for credentialing, background screening,
and professional development;
(e) Establish performance measures and collect data to evaluate the
achievement of children over time as required under RCW 43.215.080;
(f) Require curricula options that are developmentally appropriate
and promote creativity and include but are not limited to helping
children acquire language and literacy skills, large and small motor
skills, learn through hands-on experiences, and acquire social and
emotional skills including successful participation in learning
activities as an individual and as part of a group;
(g) Require programs to provide for family participation; and
(h) Require programs to have plans to help the children and
families transition to kindergarten and to have strong connections with
other early learning providers in the community and the public schools
in the community.
(2) The department may adopt rules as needed to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall charge fees for the certification and for the
renewal of certification. The fees shall be set at a sufficient level
to defray the costs of the certification. All such fees shall be fixed
by rule adopted under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05
RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.215.010 and 2006 c 263 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
The board of directors of any school district shall have the power
to establish and maintain preschools and to provide before-and-after-school and vacation care in connection with the common schools of said
district located at such points as the board shall deem most suitable
for the convenience of the public, for the care and instruction of
infants and children residing in said district. The board shall
establish such courses, activities, rules, and regulations governing
preschools and before-and-after-school care as it may deem best:
PROVIDED, That these courses and activities shall meet the minimum
standard for such preschools as established by the United States
department of health, education and welfare, or its successor agency,
the department of early learning, and the superintendent of public
instruction. Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the
board of directors may fix a reasonable charge for the care and
instruction of children attending such schools. The board may, if
necessary, supplement such funds as are received for the superintendent
of public instruction or any agency of the federal government, by an
appropriation from the general school fund of the district.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.215.410 and 2006 c 265 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall administer a state-supported early
childhood education and assistance program to assist eligible children
with educational, social, health, nutritional, and cultural development
to enhance their opportunity for success in the common school system.
Eligible children shall be admitted to approved early childhood
programs to the extent that the legislature provides funds, and
additional eligible children may be admitted to the extent that grants
and contributions from community sources provide sufficient funds for
a program equivalent to that supported by state funds.
(2) Without reducing services to eligible children, programs may
admit additional children with incomes above the eligibility criteria
set under RCW 43.215.405 and may charge a fee for the portion of the
program services that the child receives. If state funds are available
the department may establish a schedule of state support and copayments
for families with incomes above the eligibility criteria set under RCW
43.215.405 and at or under two hundred percent of the federal poverty
guidelines. The department may charge fees for families above two
hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines.

--- END ---