BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In 1995, the legislature passed a truancy
law known as the Becca bill. The law requires school districts to file
truancy petitions in the juvenile court when students accumulate a
specific number of unexcused absences. As a result of this law, the
annual number of petitions increased from ninety-one in 1994 to over
fifteen thousand in 1997, and has remained around this number since
that time. In order to accommodate this mandate, the state provides
funds to reimburse the school district for their costs associated with
the truancy provisions in the amount of three million six hundred
thousand dollars per biennium, as well as the courts in the amount of
sixteen million five hundred thousand dollars per biennium. The court
process resulting from the petitions can lead to multiple hearings, for
which students are required to have legal representation, legal
interventions, and detention. This process costs the school districts
two million seven hundred thousand dollars per year, which is
approximately one and one-half times the one million eight hundred
thousand dollars allocated by the state. By streamlining this process
for only middle and high school students, the state will continue to
address truancy and reduce school districts' administrative and
paperwork load.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.015 and 1999 c 319 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a parent enrolls a child who is six or seven years of age in
a public school, the child is required to attend and that parent has
the responsibility to ensure the child attends for the full time that
school is in session. An exception shall be made to this requirement
for children whose parents formally remove them from enrollment if the
child is less than eight years old and a petition has not been filed
against the parent under subsection (3) of this section. The
requirement to attend school under this subsection does not apply to a
child enrolled in a public school part-time for the purpose of
receiving ancillary services. A child required to attend school under
this subsection may be temporarily excused upon the request of his or
her parent for purposes agreed upon by the school district and parent.
(2) If a six or seven year-old child is required to attend public
school under subsection (1) of this section and that child has
unexcused absences, the public school in which the child is enrolled
((shall)) may:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing, by e-mail, or by telephone whenever the child has
failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month
during the current school year;
(b) Request a conference or conferences to be conducted by
telephone or in person with the custodial parent, parents, or guardian
and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for
the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two
unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If
a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place
within thirty days of the second unexcused absence, then the school
district may schedule this conference on that day; and
(c) Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These
steps shall include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school
program or school or course assignment, providing more individualized
or remedial instruction, offering assistance in enrolling the child in
available alternative schools or programs, or assisting the parent or
child to obtain supplementary services that may help eliminate or
ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school.
(3) If a child required to attend public school under subsection
(1) of this section has seven unexcused absences in a month or ten
unexcused absences in a school year, the school district ((shall)) may
file a petition for civil action as provided in RCW 28A.225.035 against
the parent of the child.
(4) This section does not require a six or seven year old child to
enroll in a public or private school or to receive home-based
instruction. This section only applies to six or seven year old
children whose parents enroll them full time in public school and do
not formally remove them from enrollment as provided in subsection (1)
of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.225.020 and 2009 c 266 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
fails to attend school without valid justification, the public school
in which the child is enrolled as a middle school or high school
student shall:
(a) Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a
notice in writing, by e-mail, or by telephone whenever the child has
failed to attend school after one unexcused absence within any month
during the current school year. School officials shall inform the
parent of the potential consequences of additional unexcused absences.
If the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is not fluent in English,
the preferred practice is to provide this information in a language in
which the custodial parent, parents, or guardian is fluent; and
(b) Schedule a conference or conferences to be conducted by
telephone or in person with the custodial parent, parents, or guardian
and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for
the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two
unexcused absences within any month during the current school year. If
a regularly scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place
within thirty days of the second unexcused absence, then the school
district may schedule this conference on that day((; and)).
(((c))) (2) The school may also take steps to eliminate or reduce
the child's absences. These steps ((shall)) may include, where
appropriate, adjusting the child's school program or school or course
assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction,
providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, referring
the child to a community truancy board, if available, requiring the
child to attend an alternative school or program, or assisting the
parent or child to obtain supplementary services that might eliminate
or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence from school. If the
child's parent does not attend the scheduled conference, the conference
may be conducted with the student and school official. However, the
parent shall be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or
reduce the child's absence.
(((2))) (3) For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence"
means that a child:
(a) Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an
average school day or has failed to comply with a more restrictive
school district policy; and
(b) Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused
absences.
(((3))) (4) If a child transfers from one school district to
another during the school year, the receiving school or school district
shall include the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school
or from the previous school district for purposes of this section, RCW
28A.225.030, and 28A.225.015.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.225.025 and 2009 c 266 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means
a board composed of members of the local community in which the child
attends school. Juvenile courts may establish and operate community
truancy boards. If the juvenile court and the school district agree,
a school district may establish and operate a community truancy board
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. Juvenile courts may
create a community truancy board or may use other entities that exist
or are created, such as diversion units. However, a diversion unit or
other existing entity must agree before it is used as a truancy board.
Duties of a community truancy board shall include, but not be limited
to, recommending methods for improving school attendance such as
assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary services that
might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or suggesting
to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an
alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a
dropout prevention program, or another public or private educational
program.
(2) The legislature finds that utilization of community truancy
boards, or other diversion units that fulfill a similar function, is
the preferred means of intervention when preliminary methods of notice
and parent conferences and taking appropriate steps to eliminate or
reduce unexcused absences have not been effective in securing the
child's attendance at school. The legislature intends to encourage and
support the development and expansion of community truancy boards and
other diversion programs which are effective in promoting school
attendance and preventing the need for more intrusive intervention by
the court. ((Operation of a school truancy board does not excuse a
district from the obligation of filing a petition within the
requirements of RCW 28A.225.015(3).))

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.225.030 and 1999 c 319 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If a child is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010
and ((if the actions taken by a)) the school district takes actions
under RCW 28A.225.020 that are not successful in substantially reducing
an enrolled student's absences from public school, not later than the
seventh unexcused absence by a child within any month during the
current school year or not later than the tenth unexcused absence
during the current school year, the school district ((shall)) may file
a petition and supporting affidavit for a civil action with the
juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010: (a) By the
parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the child. Except
as provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed
with the petition.
(2) The district ((shall not later than)) may, after the fifth
unexcused absence in a month:
(a) Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that
establishes school attendance requirements;
(b) Refer a student to a community truancy board, if available, as
defined in RCW 28A.225.025. The community truancy board shall enter
into an agreement with the student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements and take other appropriate actions to reduce
the child's absences; or
(c) File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is
not an attorney.
(4) If the school district ((fails to)) does not file a petition
under this section, the parent of a child with five or more unexcused
absences in any month during the current school year or upon the tenth
unexcused absence during the current school year may file a petition
with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW 28A.225.010.
(5) Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified
mail, return receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or
the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, personal service is
required.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.225.151 and 1996 c 134 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As required under subsection (2) of this section, ((each
school)) if a school takes additional actions provided in RCW
28A.225.030, it shall document the actions taken ((under RCW
28A.225.030)) and report this information to the school district
superintendent who shall compile the data for all the schools in the
district and prepare an annual school district report for each school
year and submit the report to the superintendent of public instruction.
The reports shall be made upon forms furnished by the superintendent of
public instruction and shall be transmitted as determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.
(2) The reports under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The number of enrolled students and the number of unexcused
absences;
(b) Documentation of the steps taken by the school district under
each subsection of RCW 28A.225.020 at the request of the superintendent
of public instruction. Each year, by May 1st, the superintendent of
public instruction shall select ten school districts to submit the
report at the end of the following school year. The ten districts
shall represent different areas of the state and be of varied sizes.
In addition, the superintendent of public instruction shall require any
district that fails to keep appropriate records to submit a full report
to the superintendent of public instruction under this subsection. All
school districts shall document steps taken under RCW 28A.225.020 in
each student's record, and make those records available upon request
consistent with the laws governing student records;
(c) The number of enrolled students with ten or more unexcused
absences in a school year or five or more unexcused absences in a month
during a school year;
(d) A description of any programs or schools developed to serve
students who have had five or more unexcused absences in a month or ten
in a year including information about the number of students in the
program or school and the number of unexcused absences of students
during and after participation in the program. The school district
shall also describe any placements in an approved private nonsectarian
school or program or certified program under a court order under RCW
28A.225.090; and
(e) The number of petitions filed by a school district with the
juvenile court.
(3) A report required under this section shall not disclose the
name or other identification of a child or parent.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect these
reports from all school districts and prepare an annual report for each
school year to be submitted to the legislature no later than December
15th of each year.

Sec. 7 2009 c 564 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2010) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,607,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2011) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,812,000))
$50,012,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,676,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,693,000))
$139,893,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 ((and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are)) is provided solely for school districts for
petitions to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW
28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the
courts shall develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent
of public instruction to allocate the funding provided in this
subsection. Allocation of this money to school districts shall be
based on the number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts
school districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed
under RCW 28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for
the performance of service of process for any hearing associated with
RCW 28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2010 and $8,253,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2009-11 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives appropriations committee and the senate
ways and means committee no later than 60 days after a fiscal year
ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature and are not for
the purpose of distributing funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $5,700,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for modernization and integration of
the judicial information system.
(a) Of this amount, $1,700,000 is for the development of a
comprehensive enterprise-level information technology strategy and
detailed business and operational plans in support of that strategy,
and $4,000,000 is to continue to modernize and integrate current
systems and enhance case management functionality on an incremental
basis.
(b) The amount provided in this subsection may not be expended
without prior approval by the judicial information system committee in
consultation with the information services board. The administrator
shall regularly submit project plan updates for approval to the
judicial information system committee and the information services
board.
(c) The judicial information system committee and the information
services board shall review project progress on a regular basis and may
require quality assurance plans. The judicial information systems
committee and the information services board shall provide a report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 1,
2011, on the status of the judicial information system modernization
and integration, and the consistency of the project with the state's
architecture, infrastructure and statewide enterprise view of service
delivery.
(5) $3,000,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts, and at state judicial agencies. The administrator for
the courts shall prioritize equipment replacement purchasing and shall
fund those items that are most essential or critical. By October 1,
2010, the administrative office of the courts shall report to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees on expenditures for equipment
under this subsection.
(6) $12,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1954 (sealing juvenile records). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2009, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(7) $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2010 and $106,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2011 are provided solely for the twenty-third superior
court judge position in Pierce county. The funds appropriated in this
subsection shall be expended only if the judge is appointed and serving
on the bench.
(8) It is the intent of the legislature that the reductions in
appropriations in this section shall be achieved, to the greatest
extent possible, by reducing those state government administrative
costs that do not affect direct client services or direct service
delivery or programs. The agency shall, to the greatest extent
possible, reduce spending in those areas that shall have the least
impact on implementing its mission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 564, Laws
of 2009 (uncodified) to read as follows:
The sum of nine hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011,
from the state general fund to the superintendent of public instruction
for the purposes of incentive grants to school districts electing to
participate in the petition process under RCW 28A.225.015 through
28A.225.151.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---