BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that loss of
productive farmland is a critical issue of statewide importance that
puts at risk the long-term viability of agriculture in the state. To
address the issues relating to loss of farmland the legislature, in
2007, created the office of farmland preservation as a program within
the state conservation commission. One of the tasks of the office is
to provide the legislature and governor with an analysis of the factors
contributing to the loss of farmland in the state.
State agencies acquire various interests in real property that
range from easements and leases to purchases in fee simple. Sometimes
agencies will acquire an interest in real property that is currently
used as working agricultural land for the production of food and fiber,
or has the potential for such production. In these acquisitions, the
agency plans for the real property may or may not include the continued
use of the land for agricultural production. When the agency does not
continue agricultural production, these lands may be put to other uses
that will permanently remove productive agricultural lands from future
use. Given the continuing loss of productive agricultural lands, the
legislature intends to gather information to determine the scope and
extent to which state agency acquisition of real property contributes
to this ongoing loss of productive agricultural lands.
The legislature finds that agricultural lands are also acquired and
in some cases converted to other uses by activities that are not
undertaken by state agencies. It is the intent of the legislature to
gather information on the scope and extent of the impact of these
private activities on agricultural lands.
State agencies adopt rules, guidance, and policies that may impact
productive agricultural lands. It is the intent of the legislature to
examine whether additional information is needed to determine the scope
and extent to which agricultural lands may be impacted by these
activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall develop a form and process for an
agriculture impact statement to be completed by any state agency before
the acquisition of an interest in real property when the interest
includes agricultural land as defined in this section. The acquisition
of a water right separate from real property shall not be considered an
interest in real property for the purposes of this section and is not
subject to completion of an agriculture impact statement form.
(2) When developing the agriculture impact statement form and
process, the commission shall consult with affected agencies before
final adoption. The commission may exempt smaller scale acquisitions
and activities from the requirements of this section. The commission
shall work with affected agencies to identify sources of information
that minimize costs to agencies but will still provide the necessary
information.
(3) The commission shall report to the governor and legislature no
later than December 1st of each calendar year, which at a minimum
should provide information on the status of the agriculture impact
statement program, the results of the information submitted to the
commission over the previous year, and other factors the commission
deems appropriate to report that fulfill the purposes of this section
and section 3 of this act. The commission may also make
recommendations to the governor and legislature on issues raised
through the evaluation of the agriculture impact statement forms.
(4)(a) In the first report to the legislature and governor, the
commission shall address the information obtained through the
agriculture impact statement process and other research by the
commission. The first report must contain commission recommendations
on:
(i) The potential applicability of the agriculture impact statement
to agency rule-making actions;
(ii) The potential applicability to acquisition and land use
activities by federal and local governments;
(iii) Whether the agriculture impact statement should be applied to
the state acquisition of an interest in a water right; and
(iv) Whether existing processes adequately provide for the
evaluation of impacts to agricultural lands from other project
activities.
(b) After consultation with local governments and others, the
commission shall make recommendations on how the agriculture impact
statement could be used to track conversions of agricultural land
through private transactions.
(5) An agriculture impact statement completed by an agency pursuant
to this chapter may not be used as the basis for appeal of an agency
action or to otherwise delay or stop the proposed agency activity
described in the agriculture impact statement.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Agriculture impact statement" means the document developed by
the state conservation commission and used by agencies consistent with
this section, and is separate and distinct from the detailed
environmental review documents required under chapter 43.21C RCW and
WAC 197-11-400.
(b) "Agricultural land" includes land that is (i) currently used
for agricultural production, (ii) zoned agricultural land of long-term
commercial significance, or (iii) otherwise zoned as agricultural land
by a local jurisdiction. "Agricultural land" does not include
timberland as defined in RCW 84.40.032.
(c) "Interest in real property" includes an easement, lease, any
interest in fee simple or less than fee simple, a restrictive covenant,
or a deferred purchase mechanism.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and state universities, colleges, and community
colleges shall complete an agriculture impact statement in the form and
process described and adopted by the Washington state conservation
commission pursuant to chapter 89.08 RCW before acquisition of an
interest in real property, except any interest in a water right, as
defined in section 2 of this act. Agricultural land does not include
timberland as defined in RCW 84.40.032.

--- END ---