BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The legislature finds that a
necessary component of bending the health care cost curve is innovative
payment and practice reforms that capitalize on current incentives and
create new incentives in the delivery system to further the goals of
increased quality, accessibility, and affordability.
(b) The legislature further finds that accountable care
organizations have received significant attention in the recent health
care reform debate and have been found by the congressional budget
office to be one of the few comprehensive reform models that can be
relied on to reduce costs.
(c) The legislature further finds that accountable care
organizations present an intriguing path forward on reform that builds
on current provider referral patterns and offers shared savings
payments to providers willing to be held accountable for quality and
costs.
(d) The legislature further finds that the accountable care
organization framework offers a basic method of decoupling volume and
intensity from revenue and profit and is thus a crucial step toward
achieving a truly sustainable health care delivery system.
(2) The legislature declares that collaboration among public
payors, private health carriers, third-party purchasers, health care
delivery systems, and providers to identify appropriate reimbursement
methods to align incentives in support of accountable care
organizations is in the best interest of the public. The legislature
therefore intends to exempt from state antitrust laws, and to provide
immunity from federal antitrust laws through the state action doctrine,
for activities undertaken pursuant to pilots designed and implemented
under section 2 of this act that might otherwise be constrained by such
laws. The legislature does not intend and does not authorize any
person or entity to engage in activities or to conspire to engage in
activities that would constitute per se violations of state and federal
antitrust laws including, but not limited to, agreements among
competing health care providers or health carriers as to the price or
specific level of reimbursement for health care services.
(3) The legislature further finds that public-private partnerships
and joint projects, such as the Washington patient-centered medical
home collaborative administered and funded jointly between the
department of health and the Washington academy of family physicians,
are research-supported, evidence-based primary care delivery projects
that should be encouraged to the fullest extent possible because they
improve health outcomes for patients and increase primary care clinical
effectiveness, thereby reducing the overall costs in our health care
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The administrator shall within available resources appoint a
lead organization by January 1, 2011, to support at least one
integrated health care delivery system and one network of nonintegrated
community health care providers in establishing two distinct
accountable care organization pilot projects. The intent is that at
least two accountable care organization pilot projects be in the
process of implementation no later than January 1, 2012. In order to
obtain expert guidance and consultation in design and implementation of
the pilots, the lead organization shall contract with a recognized
national learning collaborative with a reputable research organization
having expertise in the development and implementation of accountable
care organizations and payment systems.
(2) The lead organization designated by the administrator under
this section shall:
(a) Be representative of health care providers and payors across
the state;
(b) Have expertise and knowledge in medical payment and practice
reform;
(c) Be able to support the costs of its work without recourse to
state funding. The administrator and the lead organization are
authorized and encouraged to seek federal funds, as well as solicit,
receive, contract for, collect, and hold grants, donations, and gifts
to support the implementation of this section and may scale back
implementation to fall within resulting resource parameters;
(d) In collaboration with the health care authority, identify and
convene work groups, as needed, to accomplish the goals of this act;
and
(e) Submit regular reports to the administrator on the progress of
implementing the requirements of this act.
(3) As used in this section, an "accountable care organization" is
an entity that enables networks consisting of health care providers or
a health care delivery system to become accountable for the overall
costs and quality of care for the population they jointly serve and to
share in the savings created by improving quality and slowing spending
growth while relying on the following principles:
(a) Local accountability:
(i) Accountable care organizations must be composed of local
delivery systems; and
(ii) Accountable care organizations spending benchmarks must make
the local system accountable for cost, quality, and capacity;
(b) Appropriate payment and delivery models:
(i) Accountable care organizations with expenditures below
benchmarks are recognized and rewarded with appropriate financial
incentives;
(ii) Payment models have financial incentives that allow
stakeholders to make investments that improve care and slow cost growth
such as health information technology; and
(iii) Patient-centered medical homes are an integral component to
an accountable care organization with a focus on improving patient
outcomes, optimizing the use of health care information technology,
patient registries, and chronic disease management, thereby improving
the primary care team, and achieving cost savings through lowering
health care utilization;
(c) Performance measurement:
(i) Measurement is essential to ensure that appropriate care is
being delivered and that cost savings are not the result of limiting
necessary care; and
(ii) Accountable care organizations must report patient experience
data in addition to clinical process and outcome measures.
(4) The lead organization, subject to available resources, shall
research other opportunities to establish accountable care organization
pilot projects, which may become available through participation in a
demonstration project in medicaid, payment reform in medicare, national
health care reform, or other federal changes that support the
development of accountable care organizations.
(5) The lead organization, subject to available resources, shall
coordinate the accountable care organization selection process with the
primary care medical home reimbursement pilot projects established in
RCW 70.54.380 and the ongoing joint project of the department of health
and the Washington academy of family physicians patient-centered
medical home collaborative being put into practice under section 2,
chapter 295, Laws of 2008, as well as other private and public efforts
to promote adoption of medical homes within the state.
(6) The lead organization shall make a report to the health care
committees of the legislature, by January 1, 2013, on the progress of
the accountable care organization pilot projects, recommendations about
further expansion, and needed changes to the statute to more broadly
implement and oversee accountable care organizations in the state.
(7) As used in this section, "administrator," "health care
provider," "lead organization," and "payor" have the same meaning as
provided in RCW 41.05.036.

--- END ---