BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that state funded
health care coverage programs for the working poor and unemployable are
at imminent risk of elimination due to growing fiscal pressures and the
unsustainable rate at which health care costs increase. The urgent
fiscal crisis is felt by many Washington residents who are experiencing
their own budget difficulties and are now faced with losing the one
option they had for affordable health care coverage.
The legislature further finds that a situation of this magnitude
demands creativity and foresight to maximize state and federal
resources such that health care coverage can be maintained for the
working poor and unemployable. It is understood that this may involve
major restructuring and reordering of existing programs to be
consistent with emerging federal legislation as well as current budget
realities.
The legislature further finds that it is in the interest of the
state to provide seamless coverage options for families through an
insurance exchange that helps subsidize coverage for the poor while
providing a competitive market with quality coverage options for all
residents regardless of income or assets.
The legislature further finds that it would be irresponsible to
implement any restructuring of state medical assistance programs that
would create different classes of coverage based on the eligibility
group in which one happens to be assigned. This hazard is best avoided
through a streamlined approach that empowers individuals to make their
own coverage decisions and provides subsidies where needed to achieve
affordable coverage in the context of a health insurance exchange.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.5222 and 2009 c 545 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall submit a section 1115 demonstration waiver
request, or a series of section 1115 demonstration waiver requests to
the federal department of health and human services to expand and
revise the medical assistance program as codified in Title XIX of the
federal social security act. The waiver request should be designed to
ensure the broadest federal financial participation under Title XIX and
XXI of the federal social security act. To the extent permitted under
federal law, the waiver request should conform with any timely national
health insurance reform developments and shall include the following
components:
(a) Establishment of a single eligibility standard for low-income
persons, including expansion of categorical eligibility to include
childless adults. The department shall request that the single
eligibility standard be phased in such that incremental steps are taken
to cover additional low-income parents and individuals over time, with
the goal of ((offering)) making coverage ((to)) affordable for persons
with household income at or below two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level;
(b) Establishment of a single seamless application and eligibility
determination system for all state low-income medical programs included
in the waiver with explicit flexibility for further coordination with
and eventual merging with an insurance exchange if one is established
in Washington state prior to January 1, 2015. Applications ((may))
must be ((electronic)) made available electronically and may include an
electronic signature for verification and authentication. Eligibility
determinations should maximize federal financing where possible;
(c) The delivery of all low-income coverage programs as a single
program or as part of an insurance exchange if one is established in
Washington state prior to January 1, 2015, ((with)) to include: (i) A
common core benefit package that may be similar to the basic health
benefit package; or (ii) an alternative benefit package approved by the
secretary of the federal department of health and human services,
including the option of supplemental coverage for select categorical
groups, such as children, and individuals who are aged, blind, and
disabled; or (iii) if an insurance exchange is established, at least
one insurance plan that is actuarially equivalent to the basic health
plan benefit package;
(d) A program design, or if an insurance exchange is adopted prior
to January 1, 2015, incentives for authorized insurance plans to
include creative and innovative approaches such as: Coverage for
preventive services with incentives to use appropriate preventive care;
enhanced medical home reimbursement, accountable care organization
payment structure, and bundled payment methodologies; cost-sharing
options; use of care management and care coordination programs to
improve coordination of medical and behavioral health services;
application of an innovative predictive risk model to better target
care management services; and mandatory enrollment in managed care,
((as may be necessary)) only if applicable;
(e) Until an insurance exchange is fully implemented in Washington
state, the ability to impose enrollment limits or benefit design
changes for eligibility groups that were not eligible under the Title
XIX state plan in effect on the date of submission of the waiver
application;
(f) A premium assistance program through an insurance exchange
whereby employers can participate in coverage options for employees and
dependents of employees ((otherwise eligible under the waiver))
regardless of eligibility for subsidies in the exchange or other state
coverage assistance. The waiver should make every effort to maximize
enrollment in employer-sponsored health insurance when it is cost-effective for the state to do so, and the purchase is consistent with
the requirements of Titles XIX and XXI of the federal social security
act. To the extent allowable under federal law and only prior to an
insurance exchange being fully implemented in Washington state, the
department shall require enrollment in available employer-sponsored
coverage as a condition of eligibility for coverage under the waiver;
((and))
(g) The ability to share savings that might accrue to the federal
medicare program, Title XVIII of the federal social security act, from
improved care management for persons who are eligible for both medicare
and medicaid. Through the waiver application process, the department
shall determine whether the state could serve, directly or by contract,
as a medicare special needs plan for persons eligible for both medicare
and medicaid;
(h) An implementation timeline mindful of national health insurance
reform developments, including a detailed plan for the inclusion of
categorically eligible medical assistance populations in an insurance
exchange, subject to the state having fully implemented an insurance
exchange by January 1, 2015; and
(i) The ability to utilize federal matching funds to provide
coverage to eligible medicaid enrollees in the context of an insurance
exchange equal to the level of funding that would exist otherwise,
subject to the state having fully implemented an insurance exchange by
January 1, 2015.
(2)(a) The department shall construct the waiver request around the
conceptual framework of an insurance exchange that would serve any
newly subsidized populations not otherwise eligible for medical
assistance, as well as the current and expanded medical assistance
population. The central goal of the waiver request should be providing
streamlined, seamless coverage to subsidized and nonsubsidized
populations in a competitive health insurance exchange, with adequate
access, affordability, and quality measures employed.
(3) The department shall hold ongoing stakeholder discussions as it
is developing the waiver request, and provide opportunities for public
review and comment as the request is being developed.
(((3))) (4) The department and the health care authority shall
identify statutory changes that may be necessary to ensure successful
and timely implementation of the waiver request as submitted to the
federal department of health and human services as the apple health
((program for adults)) community care program.
(((4))) (5) The legislature must authorize implementation of any
waiver approved by the federal department of health and human services
under this section.

--- END ---