BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.310 and 2007 c 146 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An individual is "unemployed" in any week during which the
individual performs no services and with respect to which no
remuneration is payable to the individual, or in any week of less than
full time work, if the remuneration payable to the individual with
respect to such week is less than one and one-third times the
individual's weekly benefit amount plus five dollars. The commissioner
shall prescribe regulations applicable to unemployed individuals making
such distinctions in the procedures as to such types of unemployment as
the commissioner deems necessary.
(2) An individual is not "unemployed" during any week which falls
totally within a period during which the individual, pursuant to a
collective bargaining agreement or individual employment contract, is
employed full time in accordance with a definition of full time
contained in the agreement or contract, and for which compensation for
full time work is payable. This subsection may not be applied
retroactively to an individual who had no guarantee of work at the
start of such period and subsequently is provided additional work by
the employer.
(3) An individual is not "unemployed" if he or she earned wages in
part-time work as defined in RCW 50.20.119 and accepts suitable work as
defined in RCW 50.20.100.
(4) An officer of a corporation who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, or a corporate officer who is a
family member of an officer who owns ten percent or more of the
outstanding stock of the corporation, whose claim for benefits is based
on any wages with that corporation, is:
(a) Not "unemployed" in any week during the individual's term of
office or ownership in the corporation, even if wages are not being
paid;
(b) "Unemployed" in any week upon dissolution of the corporation or
if the officer permanently resigns or is permanently removed from their
appointment and responsibilities with that corporation in accordance
with its articles of incorporation or bylaws.
As used in this section, "family member" means persons who are
members of a family by blood or marriage as parents, stepparents,
grandparents, spouses, children, brothers, sisters, stepchildren,
adopted children, or grandchildren.

Sec. 2 RCW 50.20.119 and 2006 c 13 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 2, 2005, and before January 2, 2011:
(a) An otherwise eligible individual may not be denied benefits for
any week because the individual is a part-time worker and is available
for, seeks, applies for, or accepts only work of seventeen or fewer
hours per week by reason of the application of RCW 50.20.010(1)(c),
50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating to availability for work and active
search for work, or failure to apply for or refusal to accept suitable
work.
(((2))) (b) For purposes of this ((section)) subsection, "part-time
worker" means an individual who: (((a))) (i) Earned wages in
"employment" in at least forty weeks in the individual's base year; and
(((b))) (ii) did not earn wages in "employment" in more than seventeen
hours per week in any weeks in the individual's base year.
(2) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 2, 2011, an otherwise eligible individual may not be denied
benefits for any week solely because the individual is seeking only
part-time work and is available for, is actively searching for, applies
for, or accepts only part-time work by reason of the application of RCW
50.20.010(1)(c), 50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating to availability
for work and active search for work or failure to apply for or refusal
to accept suitable work, if the department determines that a majority
of the weeks of work in the individual's base period were for part-time
work. For purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Part-time work" means work of fewer than thirty-five hours per
week; and
(b) "Seeking only part-time work" means seeking work that has
comparable hours to the claimant's part-time work experience in the
base period, except that a claimant must be available for at least
twenty hours of work per week.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.20.100 and 2006 c 13 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Suitable work for an individual is employment in an occupation
in keeping with the individual's prior work experience, education, or
training and if the individual has no prior work experience, special
education, or training for employment available in the general area,
then employment which the individual would have the physical and mental
ability to perform. In determining whether work is suitable for an
individual, the commissioner shall also consider the degree of risk
involved to the individual's health, safety, and morals, the
individual's physical fitness, the individual's length of unemployment
and prospects for securing local work in the individual's customary
occupation, the distance of the available work from the individual's
residence, and such other factors as the commissioner may deem
pertinent, including state and national emergencies.
(2) For individuals with base year work experience in agricultural
labor, any agricultural labor available from any employer shall be
deemed suitable unless it meets conditions in RCW 50.20.110 or the
commissioner finds elements of specific work opportunity unsuitable for
a particular individual.
(3) For part-time workers as defined in RCW 50.20.119, suitable
work ((includes)) for an individual in employment in suitable work
under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 3, 2005, and before January 2, 2011, is employment that is for
seventeen or fewer hours per week.
(b) With respect to claims that have an effective date on or after
January 2, 2011, is employment for a number of hours per week that is
comparable to the number of hours worked per week for a majority of
weeks in employment in the individual's base year, but no less than
twenty hours per week.
(4) For individuals who have qualified for unemployment
compensation benefits under RCW 50.20.050 (1)(b)(iv) or (2)(b)(iv), as
applicable, an evaluation of the suitability of the work must consider
the individual's need to address the physical, psychological, legal,
and other effects of domestic violence or stalking.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act
must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the
receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting of federal
unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect January 2, 2011.

--- END ---