BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that continued support
of and medical assistance to our military veterans is of great priority
in the state of Washington. The legislature further finds that the
Washington soldiers' home provides essential shelter, personal and
nursing care, and related services to eligible military veterans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department may receive gifts,
grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from
time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the Washington soldiers' home.
(2) The director of the department or the director's designee
shall:
(a) Deposit moneys received under subsection (1) of this section
into the Washington soldiers' home account created in section 3 of this
act;
(b) Disburse the donated funds to the Washington soldiers' home for
the following purposes: Renovation and maintenance of its physical
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The Washington soldiers' home account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
public and private contributions to the Washington soldiers' home must
be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only for the purposes of section 2 of this act. Only the director
of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added
to chapter 72.36 RCW.

--- END ---