BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.40.030 and 2003 c 53 s 65 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of kidnapping in the second degree if he or
she intentionally abducts another person under circumstances not
amounting to kidnapping in the first degree.
(2) In any prosecution for kidnapping in the second degree, it is
a defense if established by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence that (a) the abduction does not include the use of or intent
to use or threat to use deadly force, and (b) the actor is a relative
of the person abducted, and (c) the actor's sole intent is to assume
custody of that person. Nothing contained in this paragraph shall
constitute a defense to a prosecution for, or preclude a conviction of,
any other crime.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection,
kidnapping in the second degree is a class B felony.
(b) Kidnapping in the second degree with a finding of sexual
motivation under RCW 9.94A.835 or 13.40.135 is a class A felony.
(c) Kidnapping in the second degree of a child fourteen years of
age or younger is a class A felony.

--- END ---