BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are
situations in which insured consumers receive emergency health care
services in a facility participating in a carrier's provider network,
when other health care professionals rendering services in the facility
may not be employees of the facility or participating providers in the
consumer's health benefit plan. In such situations, the consumer is
not aware that the providers are nonparticipating providers. Further,
the consumer may have little or no direct contact with the
nonparticipating providers. The legislature further finds that
consumers should be held harmless for additional charges from
nonparticipating providers for emergency care rendered in a
participating facility. It is the intent of the legislature that
consumers in these emergency situations not be billed for charges in
excess of what the applicable cost sharing would be under the
consumer's health benefit plan for the use of participating providers.
The legislature further finds that some consumers intentionally use
nonparticipating providers, which is the consumers' prerogative under
certain health benefit plans. When consumers intentionally use a
nonparticipating provider, the consumer is only entitled to benefits at
the nonparticipating rate and may be subject to balance billing by the
nonparticipating provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.093 and 1997 c 231 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When conducting a review of the necessity and appropriateness
of emergency services or making a benefit determination for emergency
services:
(a) A health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to
screen and stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson acting
reasonably would have believed that an emergency medical condition
existed. In addition, a health carrier shall not require prior
authorization of such services provided prior to the point of
stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have
believed that an emergency medical condition existed. With respect to
care obtained from a nonparticipating hospital emergency department, a
health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to screen and
stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson would have reasonably
believed that use of a participating hospital emergency department
would result in a delay that would worsen the emergency, or if a
provision of federal, state, or local law requires the use of a
specific provider or facility. In addition, a health carrier shall not
require prior authorization of such services provided prior to the
point of stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would
have believed that an emergency medical condition existed and that use
of a participating hospital emergency department would result in a
delay that would worsen the emergency.
(b) If an authorized representative of a health carrier authorizes
coverage of emergency services, the health carrier shall not
subsequently retract its authorization after the emergency services
have been provided, or reduce payment for an item or service furnished
in reliance on approval, unless the approval was based on a material
misrepresentation about the covered person's health condition made by
the provider of emergency services.
(c) Coverage of emergency services may be subject to applicable
copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles((, and a health carrier may
impose reasonable differential cost-sharing arrangements for emergency
services rendered by nonparticipating providers, if such differential
between cost-sharing amounts applied to emergency services rendered by
participating provider versus nonparticipating provider does not exceed
fifty dollars. Differential cost sharing for emergency services may
not be applied when a covered person presents to a nonparticipating
hospital emergency department rather than a participating hospital
emergency department when the health carrier requires preauthorization
for postevaluation or poststabilization emergency services if:
(i) Due to circumstances beyond the covered person's control, the
covered person was unable to go to a participating hospital emergency
department in a timely fashion without serious impairment to the
covered person's health; or
(ii) A prudent layperson possessing an average knowledge of health
and medicine would have reasonably believed that he or she would be
unable to go to a participating hospital emergency department in a
timely fashion without serious impairment to the covered person's
health)).
(d)(i) For covered emergency services rendered to a covered person
by a nonparticipating health care provider in a participating hospital
on or after January 1, 2011, the benefit level shall be the same as if
those services had been provided by a participating health care
provider. Covered services or treatment rendered at a participating
hospital, including covered ancillary services or treatment rendered by
a nonparticipating provider performing the services or treatment at a
participating hospital, shall be covered at no greater cost to the
covered person than if the services or treatment were obtained from a
participating provider.
(ii) Any attempt by the provider to recover excess funds from the
covered person in a manner inconsistent with this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 18.130.080.
(e) If a health carrier requires preauthorization for
postevaluation or poststabilization services, the health carrier shall
provide access to an authorized representative twenty-four hours a day,
seven days a week, to facilitate review. In order for postevaluation
or poststabilization services to be covered by the health carrier, the
provider or facility must make a documented good faith effort to
contact the covered person's health carrier within thirty minutes of
stabilization, if the covered person needs to be stabilized. The
health carrier's authorized representative is required to respond to a
telephone request for preauthorization from a provider or facility
within thirty minutes. Failure of the health carrier to respond within
thirty minutes constitutes authorization for the provision of
immediately required medically necessary postevaluation and
poststabilization services, unless the health carrier documents that it
made a good faith effort but was unable to reach the provider or
facility within thirty minutes after receiving the request.
(((e))) (f) A health carrier shall immediately arrange for an
alternative plan of treatment for the covered person if a
nonparticipating emergency provider and health plan cannot reach an
agreement on which services are necessary beyond those immediately
necessary to stabilize the covered person consistent with state and
federal laws.
(2) Nothing in this section is to be construed as prohibiting the
health carrier from requiring notification within the time frame
specified in the contract for inpatient admission or as soon thereafter
as medically possible but no less than twenty-four hours. Nothing in
this section is to be construed as preventing the health carrier from
reserving the right to require transfer of a hospitalized covered
person upon stabilization. Follow-up care that is a direct result of
the emergency must be obtained in accordance with the health plan's
usual terms and conditions of coverage. All other terms and conditions
of coverage may be applied to emergency services.
(3) This section does not govern payment for emergency services
rendered to persons who are enrolled in medicare, Title XVIII of the
federal social security act.
(4) If a health plan and a provider cannot reach agreement on
negotiated fees or allowable costs for emergency services, either party
may initiate binding arbitration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) For covered emergency services rendered to a covered person
by a nonparticipating health care provider in a participating hospital
on or after January 1, 2011, the benefit level shall be the same as if
those services had been provided by a participating health care
provider. Covered services or treatment rendered at a participating
hospital, including covered ancillary services or treatment rendered by
a nonparticipating provider performing the services or treatment at a
participating hospital, shall be covered at no greater cost to the
covered person than if the services or treatment were obtained from a
participating provider.
(b) Any attempt by the provider to recover excess funds from the
covered person in a manner inconsistent with this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 18.130.080.
(2) As used in this section, "emergency services" means otherwise
covered health care services medically necessary to evaluate and treat
an emergency medical condition provided in a hospital emergency
department, consistent with RCW 48.43.005.
(3) If a health plan and a provider cannot reach agreement on
negotiated fees or allowable costs for emergency services, either party
may initiate binding arbitration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The insurance commissioner may adopt rules
to implement the provisions of this act.

--- END ---