BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that student
learning experiences are enhanced through many activities selected by
students and parents outside the classroom environment. The
legislature finds that recognizing the value of these educational
activities through awarding high school physical education, visual and
performing arts, and elective credits for participation in these
activities will help encourage parental involvement in their
children's education, improve student learning through encouraging
students to take advantage of a broader variety of educational
opportunities, and provide students with the time to take additional
academic courses during the school day.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2009 c 548 s 111 and 2009 c 223 s 2
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except those
equivalencies established by local high schools or school districts
under RCW 28A.230.097. The purpose of a high school diploma is to
declare that a student is ready for success in postsecondary education,
gainful employment, and citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to
be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide by rule for high school credit equivalencies for physical
education, visual and performing arts, and elective requirements for
educational experiences selected by parents and students.
(5) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(((5))) (6) Students who have taken and successfully completed high
school courses under the circumstances in subsection (((4))) (5) of
this section shall not be required to take an additional competency
examination or perform any other additional assignment to receive
credit.
(((6))) (7) At the college or university level, five quarter or
three semester hours equals one high school credit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
A school district board of directors shall grant high school credit
for certain educational experiences selected by parents and students
consistent with the policies adopted by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. By September 1, 2011, each
school district board of directors shall adopt a policy granting high
school credit for certain educational experiences selected by students
or parents. The policy shall describe the number of credits granted
and the equivalencies for the district's current high school graduation
requirements for physical education, visual and performing arts, and
electives. Experiences qualifying for educational credit shall include
but not be limited to activities under the supervision of the
Washington interscholastic activities association or other nonprofit
voluntary entity responsible for interschool extracurricular
activities; other activities approved by the school board and
recognized by regional organizations; and other activities approved by
the school board.

--- END ---