BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his
or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a
rate of not less than four dollars and ninety cents per hour.
(2) Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than five dollars and
seventy cents per hour.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every
employer shall pay to each of his or her employees who has reached the
age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than six dollars and
fifty cents per hour.
(4)(a) Beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st
as set forth under (b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to
each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years
wages at a rate of not less than the amount established under (b) of
this subsection.
(b) On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th,
the department of labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted
minimum wage rate to maintain employee purchasing power by increasing
or decreasing the current year's minimum wage rate by the increase or
decrease in the rate of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate
shall be calculated to the nearest cent using the consumer price index
for urban wage earners and clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor
index, for the twelve months prior to each September 1st as calculated
by the United States department of labor. Each adjusted minimum wage
rate calculated under this subsection (4)(b) takes effect on the
following January 1st.
(5) The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for
employees under the age of eighteen years.

--- END ---