BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.54.050 and 1997 c 439 s 2 and 1997 c 32 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In conjunction with the programs provided for in RCW
90.54.040(1), whenever it appears necessary to the director in carrying
out the policy of this chapter, the department may by rule adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW:
(((1))) (a) Reserve and set aside waters for beneficial utilization
in the future((,)); and
(((2) When sufficient information and data are lacking to allow for
the making of sound decisions)) (b)(i) When the department has
sufficient information establishing impairment based on sound, reliable
science that has undergone peer review, withdraw various waters of the
state from additional appropriations ((until such data and information
are available)).
(ii) Prior to withdrawing waters of the state from additional
appropriations, the department must establish an alternate available
water source for use in the closed basin.
(iii) Before proposing the adoption of rules to withdraw waters of
the state from additional appropriation, the department shall consult
with the standing committees of the house of representatives and the
senate having jurisdiction over water resource management issues.
(2) Prior to the adoption of a rule under this section, the
department shall conduct a public hearing in each county in which
waters relating to the rule are located. The public hearing shall be
preceded by a notice placed in a newspaper of general circulation
published within each of said counties. Rules adopted ((hereunder))
under this section shall be subject to review in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 34.05.240.

--- END ---