BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.005 and 2008 c 145 s 20 and 2008 c 144 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to
establish the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially
demonstrated differences in utilization or cost attributable to
geographic region, age, family size, and use of wellness activities.
(2) "Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter
70.47 RCW, as revised from time to time.
(3) "Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(e).
(4) "Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered
health services, including the description of how those benefits are to
be administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under
the basic health plan, as revised from time to time.
(5) "Catastrophic health plan" means:
(a) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a
single enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars
and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan
(other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least three
thousand five hundred dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by
the insurance commissioner; and
(b) In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more
than one enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year
deductible of, at a minimum, three thousand five hundred dollars and an
annual out-of-pocket expense required to be paid under the plan (other
than for premiums) for covered benefits of at least six thousand
dollars, both amounts to be adjusted annually by the insurance
commissioner; or
(c) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital
inpatient and outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs
provided in conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient
services, and excludes or substantially limits outpatient physician
services and those services usually provided in an office setting.
In July 2008, and in each July thereafter, the insurance
commissioner shall adjust the minimum deductible and out-of-pocket
expense required for a plan to qualify as a catastrophic plan to
reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for medical
care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United States
department of labor. The adjusted amount shall apply on the following
January 1st.
(6) "Certification" means a determination by a review organization
that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or
procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided,
meets the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness,
level of care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable
health benefit plan.
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during
a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health
plan.
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the
enrollee's health benefit plan.
(10) "Employee" has the same meaning given to the term, as of
January 1, 2008, under section 3(6) of the federal employee retirement
income security act of 1974.
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute
onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead
a prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health
condition exists that requires immediate medical attention, if failure
to provide medical attention would result in serious impairment to
bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or
would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts paid to
health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments,
coinsurance, or deductibles.
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services included in the
covered person's health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues
other than denial of payment for medical services or nonprovision of
medical services, including dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting
time for medical services, provider or staff attitude or demeanor, or
dissatisfaction with service provided by the health carrier.
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices licensed
under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical
facilities licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment
facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes such facilities if
owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:
(a) A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to
practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing
health care services in this state consistent with state law; or
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment.
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or provided
by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service
contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means any policy,
contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide, arrange,
reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:
(a) Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 or 48.83
RCW;
(b) Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter
48.66 RCW;
(c) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under chapter
55, Title 10, United States Code;
(d) Limited health care services offered by limited health care
service contractors in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;
(e) Disability income;
(f) Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance
policy such as automobile personal injury protection coverage and
homeowner guest medical;
(g) Workers' compensation coverage;
(h) Accident only coverage;
(i) Specified disease or illness-triggered fixed payment insurance,
hospital confinement fixed payment insurance, or other fixed payment
insurance offered as an independent, noncoordinated benefit;
(j) Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;
(k) Dental only and vision only coverage; and
(l) Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term
limited purpose or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is
guaranteed renewable while the covered person is enrolled as a regular
full-time undergraduate or graduate student at an accredited higher
education institution, after a written request for such classification
by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial value
of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.
(21) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition, illness,
or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.
(22) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited by a
health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of
a health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a health
carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing.
(23) "Review organization" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined
in RCW 48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or
acting on behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.
(24) "Small employer" or "small group" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision, sole
proprietor, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that employed an average of at least ((two)) one but no more
than fifty employees, during the previous calendar year and employed at
least ((two)) one employee((s)) on the first day of the plan year, is
not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance, and in
which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In
determining the number of employees, companies that are affiliated
companies, or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for
purposes of taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer.
Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for
the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer
shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically
provided, a small employer shall continue to be considered a small
employer until the plan anniversary following the date the small
employer no longer meets the requirements of this definition. A self-employed individual or sole proprietor ((who is covered as a group of
one on the day prior to June 10, 2004, shall also be considered a
"small employer" to the extent that individual or group of one is
entitled to have his or her coverage renewed as provided in RCW
48.43.035(6))) who is covered as a group of one must also: (a) Have
been employed by the same small employer or small group for at least
twelve months prior to application for small group coverage, and (b)
verify that he or she derived at least seventy-five percent of his or
her income from a trade or business through which the individual or
sole proprietor has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he
or she has filed the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040,
schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year, except a self-employed
individual or sole proprietor in an agricultural trade or business,
must have derived at least fifty-one percent of his or her income from
the trade or business through which the individual or sole proprietor
has attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed
the appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, for the previous
taxable year.
(25) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or
facility, given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of
enrollees.
(26) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an activity
consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle
safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the
purpose of improving enrollee health status and reducing health service
costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.43.035 and 2004 c 244 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
For group health benefit plans, the following shall apply:
(1) All health carriers shall accept for enrollment any state
resident within the group to whom the plan is offered and within the
carrier's service area and provide or assure the provision of all
covered services regardless of age, sex, family structure, ethnicity,
race, health condition, geographic location, employment status,
socioeconomic status, other condition or situation, or the provisions
of RCW 49.60.174(2). The insurance commissioner may grant a temporary
exemption from this subsection, if, upon application by a health
carrier the commissioner finds that the clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will be impaired if
a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of additional
eligible individuals.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all
health plans shall contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of
the continuity of coverage of the plan. For the purposes of this
section, a plan is "renewed" when it is continued beyond the earliest
date upon which, at the carrier's sole option, the plan could have been
terminated for other than nonpayment of premium. The carrier may
consider the group's anniversary date as the renewal date for purposes
of complying with the provisions of this section.
(3) The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in health
plans shall not prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a
health plan for:
(a) Nonpayment of premium;
(b) Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the
insurance commissioner;
(c) Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare
benefits by reason of age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement
plan or medicare cost, risk, or other plan offered by the carrier
pursuant to federal laws and regulations;
(d) Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment
amount owed to the carrier and not the provider of health care
services;
(e) Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;
(f) Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or
(g) Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no
longer permit the continued offering of such coverage.
(4) The provisions of this section do not apply in the following
cases:
(a) A carrier has zero enrollment on a product;
(b) A carrier replaces a product and the replacement product is
provided to all covered persons within that class or line of business,
includes all of the services covered under the replaced product, and
does not significantly limit access to the kind of services covered
under the replaced product. The health plan may also allow
unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product;
(c) No sooner than January 1, 2005, a carrier discontinues offering
a particular type of health benefit plan offered for groups of up to
two hundred if: (i) The carrier provides notice to each group of the
discontinuation at least ninety days prior to the date of the
discontinuation; (ii) the carrier offers to each group provided
coverage of this type the option to enroll, with regard to small
employer groups, in any other small employer group plan, or with regard
to groups of up to two hundred, in any other applicable group plan,
currently being offered by the carrier in the applicable group market;
and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue coverage of this type
and in offering the option of coverage under (c)(ii) of this
subsection, the carrier acts uniformly without regard to any health
status-related factor of enrolled individuals or individuals who may
become eligible for this coverage;
(d) A carrier discontinues offering all health coverage in the
small group market or for groups of up to two hundred, or both markets,
in the state and discontinues coverage under all existing group health
benefit plans in the applicable market involved if: (i) The carrier
provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue
offering all such coverage in the state and its intent to discontinue
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans at least one
hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of
coverage under all such existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the
carrier provides notice to each covered group of the intent to
discontinue the existing health benefit plan at least one hundred
eighty days prior to the date of discontinuation. In the case of
discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue any
group health coverage in this state in the applicable group market
involved for a five-year period beginning on the date of the
discontinuation of the last health benefit plan not so renewed. This
subsection (4) does not require a carrier to provide notice to the
commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a health benefit
plan to new applicants when the carrier does not discontinue coverage
of existing enrollees under that health benefit plan; or
(e) A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment
of its service area because the carrier has demonstrated to the
insurance commissioner that the carrier's clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve enrollees would be exceeded.
(5) The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans
deemed by the insurance commissioner to be unique or limited or have a
short-term purpose, after a written request for such classification by
the carrier and subsequent written approval by the insurance
commissioner.
(((6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the
guarantee of continuity of coverage applies to a group of one only if:
(a) The carrier continues to offer any other small employer group plan
in which the group of one was eligible to enroll on the day prior to
June 10, 2004; and (b) the person continues to qualify as a group of
one under the criteria in place on the day prior to June 10, 2004.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to small group policies
issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2011.

--- END ---