BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that there is significant but not
complete overlap between the populations of persons in need of
treatment for alcoholism and substance abuse disorders and persons in
need of treatment for mental disorders. At times, it may be efficient
to colocate services for patients with a spectrum of behavioral health
disorders in the same treatment facility. The legislature directs that
state agencies shall do everything possible to facilitate the efficient
and effective operation of such programs when the programs serve
patients in a safe and clinically appropriate manner consistent with
federal law and regulation.
(2) A facility certified to serve patients in crisis with chemical
dependency and/or mental disorders need not divide these clients into
separate sleeping rooms.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.96A.020 and 2001 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter the following words and phrases
shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Alcoholic" means a person who suffers from the disease of
alcoholism.
(2) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on
alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances
of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological
withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment
of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.
(3) "Approved treatment program" means: (a) A discrete program of
chemical dependency treatment provided by a treatment program certified
by the department of social and health services as meeting standards
adopted under this chapter; or (b) a crisis facility that is certified
by the department as a detoxification, triage, or crisis stabilization
program.
(4) "Chemical dependency" means:
(a) Alcoholism; (b) drug addiction; or (c) dependence on alcohol
and one or more other psychoactive chemicals, as the context requires.
(5) "Chemical dependency program" means expenditures and activities
of the department designed and conducted to prevent or treat alcoholism
and other drug addiction, including reasonable administration and
overhead.
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(7) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" or "specialist"
means a person designated by the county alcoholism and other drug
addiction program coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to
perform the commitment duties described in RCW 70.96A.140 and qualified
to do so by meeting standards adopted by the department.
(8) "Director" means the person administering the chemical
dependency program within the department.
(9) "Drug addict" means a person who suffers from the disease of
drug addiction.
(10) "Drug addiction" means a disease characterized by a dependency
on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and
circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or
psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued,
and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic
functioning.
(11) "Emergency service patrol" means a patrol established under
RCW 70.96A.170.
(12) "Gravely disabled by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals"
or "gravely disabled" means that a person, as a result of the use of
alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals: (a) Is in danger of serious
physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her
essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe
deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by a repeated and
escalating loss of cognition or volitional control over his or her
actions and is not receiving care as essential for his or her health or
safety.
(13) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility, or a long-term alcoholism or drug treatment
facility, or in confinement.
(14) "Incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals"
means that a person, as a result of the use of alcohol or other
psychoactive chemicals, is gravely disabled or presents a likelihood of
serious harm to himself or herself, to any other person, or to
property.
(15) "Incompetent person" means a person who has been adjudged
incompetent by the superior court.
(16) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical
functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol
or other psychoactive chemicals.
(17) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice
medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of
Washington.
(18) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by an individual upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on one's self; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon another, as
evidenced by behavior that has caused the harm or that places another
person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining the harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by an individual upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior that has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The individual has threatened the physical safety of another
and has a history of one or more violent acts.
(19) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care of a minor means a
requested certified inpatient service that is reasonably calculated to:
(a) Diagnose, arrest, or alleviate a chemical dependency; or (b)
prevent the worsening of chemical dependency conditions that endanger
life or cause suffering and pain, or result in illness or infirmity or
threaten to cause or aggravate a handicap, or cause physical deformity
or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative
available.
(20) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen years of age.
(21) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. Parent includes custodian or guardian.
(22) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment.
(23) "Person" means an individual, including a minor.
(24) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means
a physician or chemical dependency counselor as defined in rule by the
department, who is empowered by a certified treatment program with
authority to make assessment, admission, continuing care, and discharge
decisions on behalf of the certified program.
(25) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services.
(26) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency,
detoxification, residential, and outpatient services and care,
including diagnostic evaluation, chemical dependency education and
counseling, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service
care, vocational rehabilitation and career counseling, which may be
extended to alcoholics and other drug addicts and their families,
persons incapacitated by alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals, and
intoxicated persons.
(27) "Treatment program" means an organization, institution, or
corporation, public or private, engaged in the care, treatment, or
rehabilitation of alcoholics or other drug addicts.
(28) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide,
attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage to
property.

--- END ---