BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
SHORT TITLE AND INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 This act may be known and cited as the
jobs act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The legislature intends to create jobs in
every corner of Washington state by issuing bonds, which will catalyze
energy savings and repair work at public schools, state colleges and
universities, and other public buildings.
It is the intent of the legislature that these investments will
create jobs quickly and directly, at a time when the state's residents
need jobs.
The legislature intends that these job-creating projects save
taxpayers money, with an estimated one hundred ninety-one million
dollars saved each year in public schools and buildings through reduced
energy and operational costs, and improve the health and safety of
those buildings. The energy savings are equivalent to the use of an
estimated one hundred thirty thousand houses. It is also the intent of
the legislature that these job-creating projects lead to reduced
pollutants, as the weatherization and energy efficiency projects will
reduce pollution emissions by an estimated amount equivalent to
removing one hundred ninety-five thousand cars from the roads each
year.

PART II
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 (1) For the purpose of creating jobs by
constructing needed capital improvements to public facilities for
energy operational cost savings, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington
in the sum of eight hundred sixty-one million dollars, or so much
thereof as may be required, for this purpose and all costs incidental
thereto. The bonds issued under the authority of this section are
known as jobs act bonds.
(2) Bonds authorized in this section must be sold in the manner, at
the time or times, in amounts, and at such prices as the state finance
committee determines.
(3) The authorization to issue bonds contained in this chapter does
not expire until the full authorization has been issued.
(4) No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale
of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond
retirement account must be used for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.
(2) The state finance committee must, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) Bonds issued under this section and
sections 201 and 202 of this act must state that they are a general
obligation of the state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the
interest thereon, and must contain an unconditional promise to pay the
principal and interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

PART III
APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 (1) The department of commerce, in
consultation with the department of general administration and the
Washington State University energy program, shall administer the jobs
act.
(2) The department of general administration must develop
guidelines that are consistent with national and international energy
savings performance standards for the implementation of energy savings
performance contracting projects by the energy savings performance
contractors by December 31, 2010.
(3) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
and section 302 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Cost-effectiveness" means that the present value to a state
agency, school district, local government, or subdivision of the state
of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a
facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful
life, including any compensation received from a utility or the
Bonneville power administration, is greater than the net present value
of the costs of implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility,
activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, when
discounted at the cost of public borrowing.
(b) "Energy equipment" means energy management systems and any
equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation,
to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or
facility, and the services associated with the equipment, materials, or
supplies, including but not limited to design, engineering, financing,
installation, project management, guarantees, operations, and
maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost may also include
reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or solid waste.
(c) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a
public agency to conduct energy audits and guarantee energy savings
from energy efficiency.
(d) "Operational cost savings" means savings realized from parts,
service fees, capital renewal costs, and other measurable annual
expenses to maintain and repair systems. This definition does not mean
labor savings related to existing facility staff.
(e) "Public facilities" means buildings, building components, and
major equipment or systems owned by state agencies, public school
districts, local governments, and subdivisions of the state.
(f) "Simple payback" means the total project cost including tax and
fees less utility incentives divided by the first year energy savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE

Jobs Act

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for grants to K-12 public
school districts, public higher education institutions, and other
state, locally, and subdivision of the state-owned public facilities
for energy and operational cost savings improvements and related
projects that result in energy and utility and operational cost
savings, as defined in section 301 of this act. Related projects are
those projects that must be completed in order for the energy
efficiency improvement to be effective.
(2) The department of commerce, in consultation with the department
of general administration, and the Washington State University energy
program shall establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate
applications from K-12 public school districts, public higher education
institutions, state agencies, local governments, and subdivisions of
the state. Final grant awards shall be determined by the department of
commerce.
(3) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, as provided in
this subsection:
(a) Round 1: Grants to K-12 public school districts and public
higher education institutions, with at least five percent of the total
grant round for small K-12 school districts with fewer than 1,000 full-time equivalent students.
(b) Round 2: Grants to K-12 public school districts, public higher
education institutions, state agencies, local governments, and
subdivisions of the state. Up to seventy-five percent of the total
grant round must be awarded to K-12 school districts and higher
education institutions. Within the seventy-five percent, at least five
percent of the grants awarded must be for K-12 school districts with
fewer than 1,000 full-time equivalent students.
(c) Additional competitive rounds: Grants shall be distributed the
same as established in (b) of this subsection.
(4) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and
prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio
of nonstate funding sources to state jobs act grant, the higher the
project ranking.
(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings,
the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation
that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from
the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The
documentation must include but is not limited to the following:
(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements; and
(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings. The
energy savings analysis shall be performed by a licensed engineer.
(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds
must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds
quickly is met.
(5) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting
must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings, as defined in
section 301 of this act, for ten years, (b) follow the department of
general administration's energy savings performance contracting project
guidelines developed pursuant to section 301 of this act, and (c)
employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and construction. The
department of commerce may require third-party verification of savings
if a project is not implemented by an energy savings performance
contractor selected by the department of general administration through
the request of qualifications process. Third-party verification must
be conducted either by an energy savings performance contractor
selected by the department of general administration through a request
for qualifications or by a project or educational service district
resource conservation manager.
(6) To intensify competition, the department of commerce may only
award funds to the top eighty-five percent of projects applying in a
round until the department of commerce determines a final round is
appropriate. Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round
may reapply in subsequent rounds.
(7) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the
maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost
benefit.
(8) The department of commerce must use bond proceeds to pay one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five cents per square foot, if the
project does not meet the public owner's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. The public owner must pay the other one-half
of the cost of the preliminary audit if the project does not meet the
public owner's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. The energy
savings performance contractor shall not charge for an investment grade
audit if the project does not meet the public owner's predetermined
cost-effectiveness criteria. The public owner must pay the full price
of an investment grade audit if they do not proceed with a project that
meets the owner's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(9) The department of commerce may charge projects administrative
fees. The department of commerce may pay the department of general
administration and the Washington State University energy program
administration fees in an amount determined through a memorandum of
understanding.
(10) The department of commerce and the department of general
administration must submit a joint report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing
and use of the grant funds, program administrative function, and
administration fees by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are
fully expended and all savings verification requirements are fulfilled.

Appropriation:
Washington Works Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $858,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $858,500,000

PART IV
TECHNICAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 (1) The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act.
(2) The issuance of bonds under this chapter is not deemed to be
the only method to fund projects under this chapter.
(3) The office of the state treasurer must determine a mechanism to
allow individual Washington state residents to purchase jobs act bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 The bonds authorized by this chapter
constitute a legal investment for all state funds or for funds under
state control and all funds of municipal corporations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The state finance committee is authorized
to prescribe the form, terms, conditions, and covenants of the bonds
provided for in this act, the time or times of sale of all or any
portion of them, and the conditions and manner of their sale and
issuance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404 The Washington works account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts from bonds authorized under section
201 of this act must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. The proceeds from the
sale of the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act shall be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be used
exclusively for:
(1) The purposes of sections 301 and 302 of this act, which
includes energy operation cost savings improvements and related
projects that result in energy and operational cost savings for public
schools and other state and locally owned public facilities; and
(2) The payment of the expenses incurred in connection with the
sale and issuance of the bonds.

PART V
REFERENDUM PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 (1) The secretary of state shall submit
sections 101 through 203 of this act to the people for their adoption
and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held
in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 and Article
VIII, section 3 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate their operation.
(2) If the people ratify this act as specified under subsection (1)
of this section, revenues generated shall be spent as detailed in this
act.
(3) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050(6), the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title shall read: "The legislature
has passed House Bill No . . . . (this act), concerning job creation
through school and other public capital projects. This bill would
promote job creation by authorizing bonds to construct energy
operational cost savings improvements and related projects to schools
and other public facilities."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 This act is contingent upon approval by
the voters of sections 101 through 203 of this act. If sections 101
through 203 of this act are not approved by the voters by December 1,
2010, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 Sections 201 through 203, 301, and 401
through 404 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---