BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.633 and 2009 c 375 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An offender who violates any condition or requirement of a
sentence may be sanctioned with up to sixty days' confinement for each
violation.
(b) In lieu of confinement, an offender may be sanctioned with work
release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew,
community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew,
educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through
electronic monitoring, or any other sanctions available in the
community.
(2) If an offender was under community custody pursuant to one of
the following statutes, the offender may be sanctioned as follows:
(a) If the offender was transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.728(((2))), the
offender may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.
(b) If the offender was sentenced under the drug offender
sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.660, the offender may be
sanctioned in accordance with that section.
(c) If the offender was sentenced under the special ((sexual
[sex])) sex offender sentencing alternative set out in RCW 9.94A.670,
the suspended sentence may be revoked and the offender committed to
serve the original sentence of confinement.
(d) If the offender was sentenced to a work ethic camp pursuant to
RCW 9.94A.690, the offender may be reclassified to serve the unexpired
term of his or her sentence in total confinement.
(e) If a sex offender was sentenced pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507, the
offender may be transferred to a more restrictive confinement status to
serve up to the remaining portion of the sentence, less credit for any
period actually spent in community custody or in detention awaiting
disposition of an alleged violation.
(3) If a probationer is being supervised by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210, the probationer may be
sanctioned pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The department
shall have authority to issue a warrant for the arrest of an offender
who violates a condition of community custody, as provided in RCW
9.94A.716. Any sanctions shall be imposed by the department pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.737. The department shall provide a copy of the violation
hearing report to the sentencing court in a timely manner. Nothing in
this subsection is intended to limit the power of the sentencing court
to respond to a probationer's violation of conditions.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (3) of this section, if
any offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence by
committing an assault against a law enforcement officer or other
employee of a law enforcement agency, or employee of the department,
who was performing his or her official duties at the time of the
assault, he or she shall be sanctioned with up to one year in total
confinement. This sanction shall be served consecutive to any other
sanction for any other violation. Under no circumstances may this
sanction and any other confinement period or term of supervision exceed
the maximum sentence allowed.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "law enforcement officer"
means any public employee or volunteer having as a primary function,
the enforcement of criminal laws in general, or any employee or
volunteer of, or any individual commissioned by, any municipal, county,
state, or combination thereof, agency having as its primary function
the enforcement of criminal laws in general.

--- END ---