BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) The superintendent of public
instruction, collaboratively with the state board of education shall
establish a working group to examine the changes and challenges that
are impacting student learning in mathematics and science, and develop
recommendations and a plan to make significant improvement in student
learning in these content areas, especially at the high school level.
The working group shall examine the capacity of the educational system
to address the challenges listed in section 1 of this act, and the
following:
(i) Determining the availability of sufficient and appropriate
diagnostic information and how to improve availability, if necessary;
(ii) Determining the level of alignment between curriculum,
instruction, and assessments and how to improve alignment, if
necessary;
(iii) How to best address the areas of mathematics and science that
are not assessed on the statewide assessments;
(iv) How to ensure that students will have an opportunity to learn
the mathematics and science that will be assessed; and
(v) Other areas deemed relevant by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction, with the state board
of education shall submit a report to the education committees of the
legislature by November 30, 2010. The report shall contain findings
from the examination of the issues under this section, recommendations
for changes, and a timeline for expedited implementation of the
recommended changes.
(2) This section expires September 30, 2011.

--- END ---