BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Biodiversity is essential to Washington residents' health and
to our economic and cultural future. Washington's diverse ecosystems
are the foundation of our vital natural resource economies that produce
food, fiber, fuel, building materials, and medicines. Our ecosystems
make Washington a desirable place to live, recreate, and establish new
enterprises and they provide services such as flood control, water
purification, crop pollination, and carbon storage to reduce the
effects of climate change. Sustaining our biodiversity can keep us
healthy in the face of change.
(b) As our population continues to increase, Washington is
experiencing a dramatic decline in native biodiversity due to habitat
fragmentation, degradation, and conversion to other land uses. Threats
to species and critical ecosystems have resulted in endangered species
listings and the spread of invasive species, which can disrupt natural
processes, our communities, and long-term resource management.
(c) The state biodiversity council, a successful public-private
partnership created by Executive Order 04-02, has provided consistent
leadership in sustaining Washington's biodiversity since 2004.
(d) The state biodiversity council has developed a science-based
biodiversity conservation strategy that holds great promise for
incorporating biodiversity within a multitude of programs including:
Land use planning; voluntary landowner conservation incentives and
assistance programs; and a host of existing federal, state, and local
conservation funding programs. The council developed the strategy
collaboratively with stakeholders and took into account the needs of
communities and working landowners.
(e) State agencies and nongovernmental organizations have
contributed to the state biodiversity council's work with existing
staff, financial contributions, and other resources.
(f) The state has much to gain from implementing the strategy, but
effective implementation will require a guiding entity.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to extend the
Washington biodiversity council to sustain leadership in conserving the
state's ecosystems and natural heritage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Biodiversity" means the variety of different plants, animals,
and microorganisms and the ecosystems and processes they form.
(2) "Council" means the Washington biodiversity council created in
section 3 of this act.
(3) "Scorecard" means a group of environmental indicators that are
developed by the council to measure and report the progress toward
biodiversity conservation goals.
(4) "Strategy" means any biodiversity conservation strategy or
strategies developed or implemented by the council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The Washington biodiversity council is
created to provide ongoing leadership, coordination, and accountability
in the development and implementation of science-based strategies to
guide effective conservation of the state's biodiversity.
(2) The council is a public-private partnership consisting of no
more than twenty-four members appointed by the governor in compliance
with (a) and (b) of this subsection:
(a) One-half of the members appointed by the governor must
represent nongovernmental entities including private landowners,
conservation organizations, business interests, educators, and the
general public; and
(b) One-half of the members appointed by the governor must
represent governmental entities including tribes, the department of
fish and wildlife, the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the Puget Sound partnership, the state parks and recreation
commission, the department of transportation, the conservation
commission, the department of community, trade, and economic
development, local governments, and federal agencies.
(3) Councilmembers must be appointed for terms of four years.
(4) Members whose terms expire shall continue to serve until
reappointed or replaced by a new member.
(5) The council may develop governance policies and procedures.
(6) The recreation and conservation office shall administer all
staff, grants, contracts, and expenses for the council.
(7) Members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The council shall work to promote
biodiversity conservation, explain its vital importance in Washington's
economy and our quality of life, and encourage citizens to advance the
stewardship of our natural heritage for future generations.
(2) The primary duties of the council include:
(a) Leading the development, implementation, and adaptive
management of biodiversity conservation strategies;
(b) Conducting outreach and education on biodiversity and its
importance to our quality of life;
(c) Serving as a convener to coordinate and advance collaborative
approaches;
(d) Promoting efficiencies, innovation, and developing integrated
approaches to conservation by coordinating:
(i) The work of agencies and other organizations working to
implement biodiversity conservation strategies;
(ii) Agency budget requests that affect biodiversity conservation;
and
(iii) The integration of conservation activities between agencies
and other organizations;
(e) Measuring and reporting progress through a statewide
biodiversity scorecard;
(f) Ensuring accountability for biodiversity strategy
implementation.
(3) The council may establish a science advisory panel to ensure
that council decisions and strategies are based on sound science.
(4) The council may establish working groups as needed to create
more coordinated and cohesive approaches to biodiversity conservation.
(5) The council may take actions to create a private nonprofit
corporation that would assist the council in implementing biodiversity
strategies by raising money or other resources or by performing other
activities consistent with council strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The state agencies named in section
3(2)(b) of this act shall:
(a) Participate on the council;
(b) Integrate biodiversity conservation strategy implementation
into the agencies' goals, objectives, land acquisition strategies, and
conservation and education program work plans;
(c) Ensure that appropriate staff participate in any scientific
advisory panel and working groups established by the council;
(d) Create biodiversity conservation efficiencies by integrating
state conservation efforts across agencies and jurisdictions consistent
with council strategies;
(e) Work collaboratively with the councilmembers to implement
strategies; and
(f) Provide access to disclosable data as needed for biodiversity
scorecards and other reports.
(2) The council shall work with the Washington state conservation
commission established under RCW 89.08.030 on how to utilize the strong
statewide network of conservation districts and landowners to promote
and implement the council's landowner incentive and assistance
strategy, public education strategy, and other pertinent strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Beginning January 1, 2011, and every two
years thereafter, the council shall provide the legislature and the
governor with a report on strategy implementation, progress of efforts
to integrate conservation efforts across agencies, and the biennial
biodiversity scorecard.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The Washington biodiversity council and its
powers and duties shall be terminated August 1, 2015, as provided in
section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective August 1,
2016:
(1) Section 1 of this act;
(2) Section 2 of this act;
(3) Section 3 of this act;
(4) Section 4 of this act;
(5) Section 5 of this act; and
(6) Section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

--- END ---