BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.6528 and 2009 c 118 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who proposes to set fires in the course of
agricultural activities shall obtain a permit from an air pollution
control authority, the department of ecology, or a local entity
delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.6530. General permit
criteria of statewide applicability shall be established by the
department, by rule, after consultation with the various air pollution
control authorities.
(a) Permits shall be issued under this section based on seasonal
operations or by individual operations, or both.
(b) Incidental agricultural burning consistent with provisions
established in RCW 70.94.6524 is allowed without applying for any
permit and without the payment of any fee.
(2) The department of ecology, local air authorities, or a local
entity with delegated permit authority shall:
(a) Condition all permits to ((insure)) ensure that the public
interest in air, water, and land pollution and safety to life and
property is fully considered;
(b) Condition all burning permits to minimize air pollution insofar
as practical;
(c) Act upon, within seven days from the date an application is
filed under this section, an application for a permit to set fires in
the course of agricultural burning for controlling diseases, insects,
weed abatement, or development of physiological conditions conducive to
increased crop yield;
(d) Provide convenient methods for issuance and oversight of
agricultural burning permits; and
(e) Work, through agreement, with counties and cities to provide
convenient methods for granting permission for agricultural burning,
including telephone, facsimile transmission, issuance from local city
or county offices, or other methods.
(3) A local air authority administering the permit program under
subsection (2) of this section shall not limit the number of days of
allowable agricultural burning, but may consider the time of year,
meteorological conditions, and other criteria specified in rules
adopted by the department to implement subsection (2) of this section.
(4) In addition to following any other requirements established by
the department to protect air quality pursuant to other laws,
applicants for permits must show that the setting of fires as requested
is the most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding life or
property under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary
to successfully carry out the enterprise in which the applicant is
engaged, or both. Nothing in this section relieves the applicant from
obtaining permits, licenses, or other approvals required by any other
law.
(5) The department of ecology, the appropriate local air authority,
or a local entity with delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW
70.94.6530 at the time the permit is issued shall assess and collect
permit fees for burning under this section. All fees collected shall
be deposited in the air pollution control account created in RCW
70.94.015, except for that portion of the fee necessary to cover local
costs of administering a permit issued under this section. Fees shall
be set by rule by the permitting agency at the level determined by the
task force created by subsection (6) of this section, but fees for
field burning shall not exceed ((two)) three dollars and ((fifty))
seventy-five cents per acre to be burned, or in the case of pile
burning shall not exceed one dollar per ton of material burned.
((After fees are established by rule, any increases in such fees shall
be limited to annual inflation adjustments as determined by the state
office of the economic and revenue forecast council.))
(6) An agricultural burning practices and research task force shall
be established under the direction of the department. The task force
shall be composed of a representative from the department who shall
serve as chair; one representative of eastern Washington local air
authorities; three representatives of the agricultural community from
different agricultural pursuits; one representative of the department
of agriculture; two representatives from universities or colleges
knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of the public
health or medical community; and one representative of the conservation
districts. The task force shall:
(a) Identify best management practices for reducing air contaminant
emissions from agricultural activities and provide such information to
the department and local air authorities;
(b) Determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting
agency pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, based upon the level
necessary to cover the costs of administering and enforcing the permit
programs, to provide funds for research into alternative methods to
reduce emissions from such burning, and to the extent possible be
consistent with fees charged for such burning permits in neighboring
states. The fee level shall provide, to the extent possible, for
lesser fees for permittees who use best management practices to
minimize air contaminant emissions;
(c) Identify research needs related to minimizing emissions from
agricultural burning and alternatives to such burning; and
(d) Make recommendations to the department on priorities for
spending funds provided through this chapter for research into
alternative methods to reduce emissions from agricultural burning.
(7) Conservation districts and the Washington State University
agricultural extension program in conjunction with the department shall
develop public education material for the agricultural community
identifying the health and environmental effects of agricultural
outdoor burning and providing technical assistance in alternatives to
agricultural outdoor burning.
(8)(a) Outdoor burning that is normal, necessary, and customary to
ongoing agricultural activities, that is consistent with agricultural
burning authorized under this section and RCW 70.94.6532, is allowed
within the urban growth area as described in RCW 70.94.6514 if the
burning is not conducted during air quality episodes, or where a
determination of impaired air quality has been made as provided in RCW
70.94.473, and the agricultural activities preceded the designation as
an urban growth area.
(b) Outdoor burning of cultivated orchard trees, whether or not
agricultural crops will be replanted on the land, shall be allowed as
an ongoing agricultural activity under this section if a local
horticultural pest and disease board formed under chapter 15.09 RCW, an
extension office agent with Washington State University that has
horticultural experience, or an entomologist employed by the department
of agriculture, has determined in writing that burning is an
appropriate method to prevent or control the spread of horticultural
pests or diseases.

--- END ---