BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.53.060 and 1984 c 7 s 374 are each amended to read
as follows:
The mayor and city council, or other governing body of any city or
town, or the legislative authority of any county within which there
exists any under-crossing, over-crossing, or grade crossing, or where
any street or highway is proposed to be located or established across
any railroad, or any railroad company whose road is crossed by any
highway, may file with the commission their or its petition in writing,
alleging that the public safety requires the establishment of an under-crossing or over-crossing, or an alteration in the method and manner of
an existing crossing and its approaches, or in the style and nature of
construction of an existing over-crossing, under-crossing, or grade
crossing, or a change in the location of an existing highway or
crossing, the closing or discontinuance of an existing highway
crossing, and the diversion of travel thereon to another highway or
crossing, or if not practicable, to change the crossing from grade or
to close and discontinue the crossing, the opening of an additional
crossing for the partial diversion of travel, and praying that this
relief may be ordered. If the existing or proposed crossing is on a
state road, highway, or parkway, the petition may be filed by the
secretary of transportation or the state parks and recreation
commission. If the existing crossing is adjacent to a project funded
in part or in full by the state of Washington and managed by the
department of transportation, and closure of the crossing is part of
the project, the petition may be filed by the secretary of
transportation or the secretary's designee, or if the petition is filed
by another entity, the secretary of transportation or the secretary's
designee shall intervene as a party in any hearing at which the closure
of the crossing is contested. If the department of transportation is
not a lead agency under chapter 43.21C RCW, a lead agency shall also
intervene as a party in any hearing at which the closure of the
crossing is contested. Upon the petition being filed, the commission
shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition and shall give not
less than twenty days' notice to the petitioner, the railroad company,
and the municipality or county in which the crossing is situated. If
the highway involved is a state highway or parkway, or if the crossing
is adjacent to a project funded in part or in full by the state of
Washington and managed by the department of transportation and closure
of the crossing is part of the project, like notice shall be given to
the secretary of transportation or the state parks and recreation
commission. If the change petitioned for requires that private lands,
property, or property rights be taken, damaged, or injuriously affected
to open up a new route for the highway, or requires that any portion of
any existing highway be vacated and abandoned, twenty days' notice of
the hearing shall be given to the owner or owners of the private lands,
property, and property rights which it is necessary to take, damage, or
injuriously affect, and to the owner or owners of the private lands,
property, or property rights that will be affected by the proposed
vacation and abandonment of the existing highway. The commission shall
also cause notice of the hearing to be published once in a newspaper of
general circulation in the community where the crossing is situated,
which publication shall appear at least two days before the date of
hearing. At the time and place fixed in the notice, all persons and
parties interested are entitled to be heard and introduce evidence. In
the case of a petition for closure of a grade crossing the commission
may order the grade crossing closed without hearing where: (1) Notice
of the filing of the petition is posted at, or as near as practical to,
the crossing; (2) notice of the filing of the petition is published
once in a newspaper of general circulation in the community or area
where the crossing is situated, which publication shall appear within
the same week that the notice referred to in subsection (1) of this
section is posted; and (3) no objections are received by the commission
within twenty days from the date of the publication of the notice.

--- END ---