BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.48.310 and 2009 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 7.48.305 only:
(1) "Agricultural activity" means a condition or activity which
occurs on a farm in connection with the commercial production of farm
products and includes, but is not limited to((,)):
(a) Marketed produce at roadside stands or farm markets;
(b) Noise;
(c) Odors;
(d) Dust;
(e) Fumes;
(f) Operation of machinery and irrigation pumps;
(g) Movement, including, but not limited to, use of current county
road ditches, streams, rivers, canals, and drains, and use of water for
agricultural activities;
(h) Ground and aerial application of seed, fertilizers,
conditioners, and plant protection products;
(i) Keeping of bees for production of agricultural or apicultural
products;
(j) Employment and use of labor;
(k) Roadway movement of equipment and livestock;
(l) Protection from damage by wildlife;
(m) Prevention of trespass;
(n) Construction and maintenance of buildings, fences, roads,
bridges, ponds, drains, waterways, and similar features and maintenance
of streambanks and watercourses; ((and))
(o) Operation of an anaerobic digester, as defined in RCW
82.08.900;
(p) Conversion from one agricultural activity to another, including
a change in the type of plant-related farm product being produced((.
The term includes)); and
(q) Use of new practices and equipment consistent with
technological development within the agricultural industry.
(2) "Farm" means the land, buildings, freshwater ponds, freshwater
culturing and growing facilities, and machinery used in the commercial
production of farm products.
(3) "Farmland" means land or freshwater ponds devoted primarily to
the production, for commercial purposes, of livestock, freshwater
aquacultural, or other farm products.
(4) "Farm product" means those plants ((and)), animals, and
commodities useful to humans and includes, but is not limited to((,)):
(a) Forages and sod crops((,));
(b) Dairy and dairy products((,));
(c) Poultry and poultry products((,));
(d) Livestock, including breeding, grazing, and recreational equine
use((,));
(e) Fruits((,));
(f) Vegetables((,));
(g) Flowers((,));
(h) Seeds((,));
(i) Grasses((,));
(j) Trees((,));
(k) Freshwater fish and fish products((,));
(l) Apiaries and apiary products((,));
(m) Equine and other similar products((, or));
(n) Electricity generated by an anaerobic digester, as defined in
RCW 82.08.900; or
(o) Any other product which incorporates the use of food, feed,
fiber, or fur.
(5) "Forest practice" means any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land, as that term is defined in RCW 76.09.020,
and relating to growing, harvesting, or processing timber. The term
"forest practices" includes, but is not limited to, road and trail
construction, final and intermediate harvesting, precommercial
thinning, reforestation, fertilization, prevention and suppression of
diseases and insects, salvage of trees, brush control, and owning land
where trees may passively grow until one of the preceding activities is
deemed timely by the owner.

--- END ---