BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2009 c 574 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act except as provided in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Subject to the provisions of section 10 of this act, for
academic years 2011-12 through 2017-18, reductions or increases in
full-time tuition fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020, for resident
undergraduate and graduate students shall be determined annually by the
governing boards of the University of Washington, Washington State
University, and Western Washington University.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section,
academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with ((2015-16)) 2014-15,
other than summer term, shall be as charged during the ((2014-15))
2012-13 academic year unless different rates are adopted by the
legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
under RCW 28C.04.610.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, beginning
with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the 2016-17 academic
year, tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11, may increase no
greater than seven percent over the previous academic year in any
institution of higher education. Annual reductions or increases in
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be as
provided in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent
increase limit established in this section. For academic years 2009-10
and 2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide tuition
increases greater than seven percent. To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (((2))) (3) of this section, the legislature may revisit
state appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in
tuition fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) Subject to the provisions of section 10 of this act, for the
University of Washington, Washington State University, and Western
Washington University, beginning with the 2011-12 academic year through
the 2017-18 academic year, any reductions or increases in tuition fees
charged to full-time resident undergraduate and graduate students are
subject to the following conditions:
(a) The average annual compounded rate of change of undergraduate
and graduate full-time tuition fees may not exceed nine percent based
on the preceding fifteen years, or fourteen percent in any year;
(b) The average resident undergraduate full-time tuition fees may
not in any academic year exceed the seventy-fifth percentile of
resident undergraduate tuition and fees at similar public institutions
of higher education in the global challenge states as defined in
subsection (5) of this section; and
(c) Annual approval of an institutional performance agreement by
the committee on higher education performance as required by section 3
of this act.
(3) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(((3))) (4) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the
office of financial management shall report to the governor, the higher
education coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of the total per-student funding
level that represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(((4))) (5) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are
the top performing states on the new economy index published by the
progressive policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy
index ranks states on indicators of their potential to compete in the
new economy. At least once every five years, the office of financial
management shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge
states are appropriate. The office of financial management shall
report its findings to the governor and the legislature.
(((5))) (6) During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of tax credits available through
the American opportunity tax credit provided in the American recovery
and reinvestment act of 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To ensure institutional quality, promote access, and advance
the public mission of public four-year institutions of higher
education, the authority to increase or decrease tuition rates shall be
considered within the context of institutional performance agreements
by the committee on higher education performance. By September 1,
2011, the University of Washington, Washington State University, and
Western Washington University shall each negotiate an institutional
performance agreement with the committee on higher education
performance. The agreement shall include student data on financial aid
from institutional, tuition, and state sources, as well as student
demographics.
(2) For the 2012-13 academic year through the 2017-18 academic
year, each institution of higher education shall submit an annual
report on the negotiated performance agreement to the committee on
higher education performance. Demonstration of satisfactory progress
towards reaching performance outcomes, benchmarks, and goals is
required for approval by the committee on higher education performance.
Individual institutional performance contracts shall be six years in
duration and shall be developed by individual institutions in
cooperation with students, represented and nonrepresented faculty,
staff, and institutional governing boards.
(3) The committee on higher education performance shall be composed
of:
(a) The director of the office of financial management or the
director's designee;
(b) The executive director of the higher education coordinating
board or the executive director's designee;
(c) The chair of the senate ways and means committee or the chair's
designee;
(d) The chair of the senate higher education and workforce
development committee or the chair's designee;
(e) The chair of the house of representatives education
appropriations committee or the chair's designee;
(f) The chair of the house of representatives higher education
committee or the chair's designee;
(g) The ranking member of the senate ways and means committee or
the ranking member's designee;
(h) The ranking member of the senate higher education and workforce
development committee or the ranking member's designee;
(i) The ranking member of the house higher education committee or
the ranking member's designee; and
(j) The ranking member of the house education appropriations
committee or the ranking member's designee.
(4) At a minimum, an individual institutional performance agreement
shall include:
(a) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning cost, quality,
timeliness of student progress toward degrees and certifications, and
articulation between and within the K-12 and higher education systems;
(b) Indicators that measure outcomes concerning recruitment,
retention, and success of students, faculty, and staff, from low-income, diverse, or underrepresented communities;
(c) Benchmarks and goals for long-term degree production, including
discrete benchmarks and goals in areas of high demand and critical
state need; and
(d) The level of state and tuition resources necessary to meet the
performance outcomes, benchmarks, and goals, including per-student
funding goals established in this subsection (4).
(5) This section is subject to the provisions of section 10 of this
act.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.031 and 2003 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the
fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at the
state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short
courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine
station work, experimental station work, correspondence or extension
courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or rentals,
disciplinary and library fines, which colleges and universities shall
have the right to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and
student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income
derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and
facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter
acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income
from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or
the appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be
established by any college or university board of trustees or regents
from time to time. All moneys received as operating fees at any
institution of higher education shall be deposited in a local account
containing only operating fees revenue and related interest: PROVIDED,
That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall be
retained by the institutions for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. The
amount of operating fees retained for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820
shall be reduced by the amounts allocated under section 6 of this act.
Local operating fee accounts shall not be subject to appropriation by
the legislature or allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.15.820 and 2009 c 215 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each institution of higher education, including technical
colleges, shall deposit a minimum of three and one-half percent of
revenues collected from tuition and services and activities fees in an
institutional financial aid fund that is hereby created and which shall
be held locally. The amount of operating fees retained for the
purposes of this section shall be reduced by the amounts allocated
under section 6 of this act. Moneys in the fund shall be used only for
the following purposes: (a) To make guaranteed long-term loans to
eligible students as provided in subsections (3) through (8) of this
section; (b) to make short-term loans as provided in subsection (9) of
this section; (c) to provide financial aid to needy students as
provided in subsection (10) of this section; or (d) to provide
financial aid to students as provided in subsection (11) of this
section.
(2) An "eligible student" for the purposes of subsections (3)
through (8) and (10) of this section is a student registered for at
least three credit hours or the equivalent, who is eligible for
resident tuition and fee rates as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013, and who is a "needy student" as defined in RCW 28B.92.030.
(3) The amount of the guaranteed long-term loans made under this
section shall not exceed the demonstrated financial need of the
student. Each institution shall establish loan terms and conditions
which shall be consistent with the terms of the guaranteed loan program
established by 20 U.S. Code Section 1071 et seq., as now or hereafter
amended. All loans made shall be guaranteed by the Washington student
loan guaranty association or its successor agency. Institutions are
hereby granted full authority to operate as an eligible lender under
the guaranteed loan program.
(4) Before approving a guaranteed long-term loan, each institution
shall analyze the ability of the student to repay the loan based on
factors which include, but are not limited to, the student's
accumulated total education loan burdens and the employment
opportunities and average starting salary characteristics of the
student's chosen fields of study. The institution shall counsel the
student on the advisability of acquiring additional debt, and on the
availability of other forms of financial aid.
(5) Each institution is responsible for collection of guaranteed
long-term loans made under this section and shall exercise due
diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to
insure that maximum repayments are made. Institutions shall cooperate
with other lenders and the Washington student loan guaranty
association, or its successor agency, in the coordinated collection of
guaranteed loans, and shall assure that the guarantability of the loans
is not violated. Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term
loans under this section shall be performed by entities approved for
such servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or
its successor agency: PROVIDED, That institutions be permitted to
perform such servicing if specifically recognized to do so by the
Washington student loan guaranty association or its successor agency.
Collection and servicing of guaranteed long-term loans made by
community colleges under subsection (1) of this section shall be
coordinated by the state board for community and technical colleges and
shall be conducted under procedures adopted by the state board.
(6) Receipts from payment of interest or principal or any other
subsidies to which institutions as lenders are entitled, that are paid
by or on behalf of borrowers of funds under subsections (3) through (8)
of this section, shall be deposited in each institution's financial aid
fund and shall be used to cover the costs of making the guaranteed
long-term loans under this section and maintaining necessary records
and making collections under subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED,
That such costs shall not exceed five percent of aggregate outstanding
loan principal. Institutions shall maintain accurate records of such
costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs, shall
be deposited in the institution's financial aid fund.
(7) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College, and the state board for
community and technical colleges, on behalf of the community colleges
and technical colleges, shall each adopt necessary rules and
regulations to implement this section.
(8) First priority for any guaranteed long-term loans made under
this section shall be directed toward students who would not normally
have access to educational loans from private financial institutions in
Washington state, and maximum use shall be made of secondary markets in
the support of loan consolidation.
(9) Short-term loans, not to exceed one year, may be made from the
institutional financial aid fund to students enrolled in the
institution. No such loan shall be made to any student who is known by
the institution to be in default or delinquent in the payment of any
outstanding student loan. A short-term loan may be made only if the
institution has ample evidence that the student has the capability of
repaying the loan within the time frame specified by the institution
for repayment.
(10) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
that are not used in making long-term or short-term loans may be used
by the institution for locally administered financial aid programs for
needy students, such as need-based institutional employment programs or
need-based tuition and fee scholarship or grant programs. These funds
shall be used in addition to and not to replace institutional funds
that would otherwise support these locally administered financial aid
programs. First priority in the use of these funds shall be given to
needy students who have accumulated excessive educational loan burdens.
An excessive educational loan burden is a burden that will be difficult
to repay given employment opportunities and average starting salaries
in the student's chosen fields of study. Second priority in the use of
these funds shall be given to needy single parents, to assist these
students with their educational expenses, including expenses associated
with child care and transportation.
(11) Any moneys deposited in the institutional financial aid fund
may be used by the institution for a locally administered financial aid
program for high school students enrolled in dual credit programs. If
institutions use funds in this manner, the governing boards of the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall
each adopt necessary rules to implement this subsection. Moneys from
this fund may be used for all educational expenses related to a
student's participation in a dual credit program including but not
limited to tuition, fees, course materials, and transportation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.92 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the University of
Washington, Washington State University, and Western Washington
University shall waive full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students as follows:
(a) Students whose family incomes are at or below fifty percent of
the state's median family income shall receive a waiver equal to one
hundred percent of full-time tuition fees;
(b) Students whose family incomes are greater than fifty percent
and less than seventy-five percent of the state's median family income
shall receive a waiver equal to seventy-five percent of full-time
tuition fees;
(c) Students whose family incomes are at or exceed seventy-five
percent and are less than one hundred percent of the state's median
family income shall receive a waiver equal to fifty percent of full-time tuition fees; and
(d) Students whose family incomes are at or exceed one hundred one
percent and are less than one hundred twenty-five percent of the
state's median family income shall receive a waiver equal to twenty-five percent of full-time tuition fees.
(2)(a) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed four and one-half percent of the state's
median family income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(a) of
this section applies.
(b) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed nine percent of the state's median family
income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(b) of this section
also applies.
(c) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed thirteen and one-half percent of the
state's median family income for a family of four, then subsection
(1)(c) of this section also applies.
(d) If an institution's full-time tuition fees for resident
undergraduate students exceed eighteen percent of the state's median
family income for a family of four, then subsection (1)(d) of this
section also applies.
(3) The waivers required in subsection (1) of this section shall be
reduced by the amount of any state need grant and federal, state, and
institutional scholarships, grants, and waivers.
(4) A student's eligibility for waivers under this section shall be
contingent upon their filing of a free application for federal student
aid (FAFSA).
(5) This section applies beginning with the 2011-12 academic year.
(6) This section is subject to the provisions of section 10 of this
act.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2008 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 10 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 10 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; and
(s) RCW 28B.70.050.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.522;
(b) RCW 28B.15.540;
(c) RCW 28B.15.558; ((and))
(d) RCW 28B.15.621(3); and
(e) Section 6 of this act.
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.920 (Performance agreements--Generally) and 2008 c
160 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.10.921 (Performance agreements -- Contents) and 2008 c
160 s 3; and
(3) RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee -- Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160
s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 3 and 6 of this act expire August
1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15
RCW to read as follows:
Any provision of state law that refers to this section shall apply
only in academic years during which the state student financial program
in chapter 28B.92 RCW funds at least the same percentage of tuition
fees for students with incomes less than seventy percent of the state's
median family income as was actually covered by the program in academic
year 2009-10.

--- END ---