BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.22 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All insurers doing business in this state shall provide a
notice of policy change to each producer receiving an insurance policy
from the insurer under the following circumstances:
(a) The insurance policy covers personal lines or business lines of
casualty insurance, not including medical, workers' compensation,
employers' liability, nuclear liability, or disability insurance; and
(b) The insurance policy contains a material change from either the
last previous standard insurance policy that the insurer provided to
the producer for sale to the public or a material change from the
coverage last previously provided under a policy being renewed.
(2) The notice of policy change must include the change or changes
in coverage, described in plain language on a separate page of paper
prefacing the changed policy or policy being renewed.
(3) Each producer shall communicate the contents of the notice of
policy change to the consumer prior to the consumer's acceptance of the
policy or policy being renewed.
(4) Any policy change not made in compliance with this section is
not effective and is unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All insurers doing business in this state shall provide a
notice of policy change to each producer receiving an insurance policy
from the insurer under the following circumstances:
(a) The insurance policy covers personal lines or business lines of
property insurance; and
(b) The insurance policy contains a material change from either the
last previous standard insurance policy that the insurer provided to
the producer for sale to the public or a material change from the
coverage last previously provided under a policy being renewed.
(2) The notice of policy change must include the change or changes
in coverage, described in plain language on a separate page of paper
prefacing the changed standard policy or policy being renewed.
(3) Each producer shall communicate the contents of the notice of
policy change to the purchaser prior to the purchaser's acceptance of
the policy or policy being renewed.
(4) Any policy change not made in compliance with this section is
not effective and is unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2011, and
applies to insurance policies covered by this act that are issued or
renewed on or after July 1, 2011.

--- END ---