BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4; and
(2) RCW 82.12.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---