BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that underground
economy activity in this state results in lost revenue to the state and
is unfair to law-abiding businesses. The legislature further finds
that agencies that collect taxes on behalf of the state have authority
under current law to issue subpoenas and that the issuance of subpoenas
is a highly useful tool in the investigation of underground activity.
The legislature further finds that in the case of State v. Miles, the
Washington supreme court held that Article 1, section 7 of the state
Constitution requires judicial review of a subpoena under some
circumstances.
(2) The legislature therefore intends to provide a process for the
department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, and the
employment security department to apply for court approval of an agency
investigative subpoena which is authorized under current law in cases
where the agency seeks such approval, or where court approval is
required by Article 1, section 7. The legislature does not intend to
require court approval except where otherwise required by law or
Article 1, section 7. The legislature does not intend to create any
new authority to subpoena records or create any new rights for any
person.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.04.040 and 1987 c 316 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director and his or her authorized assistants ((shall))
have power to issue subpoenas to enforce the attendance and testimony
of witnesses and the production and examination of books, papers,
photographs, tapes, and records before the department in connection
with any claim made to the department, any billing submitted to the
department, or the assessment or collection of premiums. The superior
court ((shall have)) has the power to enforce any such subpoena by
proper proceedings.
(2)(a) The director and his or her authorized assistants may apply
for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a
subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in
the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the
county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in
Thurston county. The application must (i) state that an order is
sought pursuant to this subsection; (ii) adequately specify the
records, documents, or testimony; and (iii) declare under oath that an
investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose
related to an investigation within the department's authority and that
the subpoenaed documents or testimony are reasonably related to an
investigation within the department's authority.
(b) Where the application under this subsection is made to the
satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the
subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law
for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.
(c) The director and his or her authorized assistants may seek
approval and a court may issue an order under this subsection without
prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena
is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.

Sec. 3 RCW 50.12.130 and 1945 c 35 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the discharge of the duties imposed by this title, the
appeal tribunal and any duly authorized representative of the
commissioner shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations,
take depositions, certify to official acts and issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers,
correspondence, memoranda, and other records deemed to be necessary as
evidence in connection with any dispute or the administration of this
title. It shall be unlawful for any person, without just cause, to
fail to comply with subpoenas issued pursuant to the provisions of this
section.
(2)(a) Any authorized representative of the commissioner may apply
for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a
subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in
the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the
county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in
Thurston county. The application must:
(i) State that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection;
(ii) Adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and
(iii) Declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted
for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within
the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or
testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the
department's authority.
(b) Where the application under this subsection is made to the
satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the
subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law
for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.
(c) Any authorized representative of the commissioner may seek
approval and a court may issue an order under this subsection without
prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena
is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department or its duly authorized agent may apply for and
obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in
advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county
where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where
the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county.
The application must:
(a) State that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection;
(b) Adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and
(c) Declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for
a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the
department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony
are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's
authority.
(2) Where the application under this subsection is made to the
satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the
subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law
for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.
(3) The department or its duly authorized agent may seek approval
and a court may issue an order under this subsection without prior
notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is
directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.

--- END ---