BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.27.340 and 1997 c 314 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
a contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200
shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than two hundred
dollars and not more than five thousand dollars.
(2) The director may waive collection in favor of payment of
restitution to a consumer complainant.
(3) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW
18.27.200 for failure to register shall be assessed a fine of not less
than one thousand dollars, nor more than five thousand dollars. For a
first offense, the director may reduce the penalty for failure to
register, but in no case below five hundred dollars, if the person:
Becomes registered within ten days of receiving a notice of infraction
((and the notice of infraction is for a first offense)); and registers
for a department-approved contractor training class under section 2 of
this act within ten days of receiving a notice of infraction, completes
the class within one hundred twenty days of receiving the notice of
infraction, and pays any required class fees upon class registration.
(4) Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited in the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
The department will approve or conduct contractor training classes
and charge a fee, payable upon class registration, that covers the
costs of administering the class. The department may adopt rules
relating to the number of classes to be offered by the department, the
locations of these classes, class fees, and curriculum. In determining
the locations of these classes, the department may consider offering
online classes and ensure that classes are reasonably accessible in
eastern and western Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 60.28.040 and 2009 c 432 s 7 and 2009 c 219 s 7 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the amount of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's successors or assignees with
respect to a public improvement contract wherein the contract price is
thirty-five thousand dollars or more, shall be a lien prior to all
other liens upon the amount of the retained percentage withheld by the
disbursing officer under such contract.
(2) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, after payment of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, from a contractor or the contractor's successors or assignees with
respect to a public improvement contract wherein the contract price is
((twenty)) thirty-five thousand dollars or more, the amount of all
other taxes, increases, and penalties under Title 82 RCW, due and owing
from the contractor, shall be a lien prior to all other liens upon the
amount of the retained percentage withheld by the disbursing officer
under such contract.
(3) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, after payment of all
taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become due under Title 82
RCW, the amount of all taxes, increases, and penalties due or to become
due under Titles 50 and 51 RCW from the contractor or the contractor's
successors or assignees with respect to a public improvement contract
wherein the contract price is ((twenty)) thirty-five thousand dollars
or more, shall be a lien prior to all other liens upon the amount of
the retained percentage withheld by the disbursing officer under such
contract.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the amount of all
other taxes, increases, and penalties due and owing from the contractor
shall be a lien upon the balance of such retained percentage remaining
in the possession of the disbursing officer after all other statutory
lien claims have been paid.
(5) The employees of a contractor or the contractor's successors or
assignees who have not been paid the prevailing wage under such a
public improvement contract shall have a first priority lien against
the bond or retainage prior to all other liens.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.27.020 and 2007 c 436 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every contractor shall register with the department.
(2) It is a gross misdemeanor for any contractor to:
(a) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor without being registered as required by this chapter;
(b) Advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, or perform any work
as a contractor when the contractor's registration is suspended or
revoked;
(c) Use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or
offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor
registration number is required;
(d) Transfer a valid registration to an unregistered contractor or
allow an unregistered contractor to work under a registration issued to
another contractor; or
(e) Subcontract to or use an unregistered contractor.
(3) It is not unlawful for a registered contractor to employ an
unregistered contractor who was registered at the time he or she
entered into a contract with the registered contractor, unless the
registered contractor or his or her representative has been notified in
writing by the department of labor and industries that the contractor
has become unregistered.
(4) All gross misdemeanor actions under this chapter shall be
prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurs.
(5) A person is guilty of a separate gross misdemeanor for each day
worked if, after the person receives a ((citation)) notice of
infraction from the department, the person works while unregistered, or
while his or her registration is suspended or revoked, or works under
a registration issued to another contractor. A person is guilty of a
separate gross misdemeanor for each worksite on which he or she
violates subsection (2) of this section. Nothing in this subsection
applies to a registered contractor.
(6) A person is guilty of a class C felony if, after receiving a
third or subsequent final infraction for working as a contractor while
unregistered, while his or her registration is suspended or revoked, or
under a registration issued to another contractor, he or she works as
a contractor while unregistered, while his or her registration is
suspended or revoked, or under a registration issued to another
contractor.
(7) The director by rule shall establish a two-year audit and
monitoring program for a contractor not registered under this chapter
who becomes registered after receiving an infraction or conviction
under this chapter as an unregistered contractor. The director shall
notify the departments of revenue and employment security of the
infractions or convictions and shall cooperate with these departments
to determine whether any taxes or registration, license, or other fees
or penalties are owed the state.

--- END ---