BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.4282 and 2009 c 535 s 410 are each amended to
read as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts derived from bona fide (1) dues and initiation fees paid to
nonprofit organizations exempt from the federal income tax under Title
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), (c)(4), (c)(5), (c)(6), (c)(8), (c)(10), or
(c)(19) of the federal internal revenue code, as amended as of January
1, 2010, (2) ((dues, (3))) contributions, (((4))) (3) donations,
(((5))) (4) tuition fees, (((6))) (5) charges made by a nonprofit trade
or professional organization for attending or occupying space at a
trade show, convention, or educational seminar sponsored by the
nonprofit trade or professional organization, which trade show,
convention, or educational seminar is not open to the general public,
(((7))) (6) charges made for operation of privately operated
kindergartens, and (((8))) (7) endowment funds. This section may not
be construed to exempt any person, association, or society from tax
liability upon selling tangible personal property, digital goods,
digital codes, or digital automated services, or upon providing
facilities or other services for which a special charge is made to
members or others. If dues are in exchange for any significant amount
of goods or services rendered by the recipient thereof to members
without any additional charge to the member, or if the dues are
graduated upon the amount of goods or services rendered, the value of
such goods or services ((shall)) may not be considered as a deduction
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2010.

--- END ---