BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.42.005 and 2009 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that: The health and safety of its
citizens and environment are of vital interest to the state's long-term
quality of life; Washington state is a national leader in protecting
its environment; and Washington state has a vibrant and diverse economy
that is dependent on the state maintaining high environmental
standards. Further, the legislature finds that a complex and confusing
network of environmental and land use laws and business regulations can
create obstacles to sustainable growth.
It is the intent of the legislature to promote accountability,
timeliness, and predictability for citizens, business, and state,
federal, and local permitting agencies, and to provide information and
assistance on the regulatory process through the creation of the office
of regulatory assistance in the governor's office.
(2) The office of regulatory assistance is created to work to
continually improve the function of environmental and business
regulatory processes by identifying conflicts and overlap in the
state's rules, statutes, and operational practices; the office is to
provide project proponents and business owners with active assistance
for all permitting, licensing, and other regulatory procedures required
for completion of specific projects; and the office is to ensure that
citizens, businesses, and local governments have access to, and clear
information regarding, regulatory processes for permitting and business
regulation, including state rules, permit and license requirements, and
agency rule-making processes.
(3) The legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to
provide direction ((and)), practical resources, and a range of
innovative and optional service delivery options for improving the
regulatory process and for providing assistance through the regulatory
process((es)) on individual projects in furtherance of the state's
goals of governmental transparency and accountability.
(4) The legislature intends that establishing an office of
regulatory assistance will provide these services without abrogating or
limiting the authority of any agency to make decisions on permits,
licenses, regulatory requirements, or agency rule making. The
legislature further intends that the office of regulatory assistance
shall have authority to provide services but shall not have any
authority to make decisions on permits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state of Washington has
implemented a number of successful measures to streamline, coordinate,
and consolidate the multiparty, multijurisdictional permitting and
regulatory decision-making process. The office of regulatory
assistance was developed and implemented at a time when the state faced
a crisis in its economic competitiveness. The multiagency permitting
team for transportation was developed and implemented at a time when
the state's transportation system faced a crisis in public confidence
concerning transportation project delivery. The legislature further
finds that the state of Washington is now facing an economic and
financial crisis that requires immediate action to spur economic
development and the creation of jobs without sacrificing the quality of
the state's environment.
(2) The legislature intends to:
(a) Draw from and extend the benefits of proven permit streamlining
solutions to future project proponents and aid the state's recovery by
authorizing optional multiagency permitting teams modeled after the
multiagency permitting team developed and implemented for state
transportation projects. It is the purpose of this act to provide
willing permit applicants and project proponents with permit
coordination and integrated regulatory decision-making services on a
cost-reimbursed basis; and
(b) Phase-in a revenue-neutral permit streamlining approach to
expedite permit and regulatory decision making while ensuring a high
level of environmental protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The office of regulatory assistance is authorized to develop
and advertise the availability of optional multiagency permitting teams
to provide coordinated permitting and integrated regulatory decision
making starting in the Puget Sound basin.
(b) New expenses associated with operating the optional multiagency
permitting teams must be recovered by the office of regulatory
assistance using existing state cost-reimbursement and interagency
cost-sharing authorities as applicable. The cost-reimbursement process
is subject to the requirements and limitations set forth in RCW
43.42.070. Initial administrative costs and other costs that may not
be recoverable through cost-reimbursement or cost-sharing mechanisms
may be covered by funds from the multiagency permitting team account
created in section 5 of this act.
(c) The director of the office of regulatory assistance must
solicit donations and such other funds as the director deems
appropriate from public and private sources for the purposes of
covering the initial administrative costs and other costs associated
with operation of optional multiagency permitting teams which are not
recoverable through cost-reimbursement or cost-sharing mechanisms. All
such solicited funds must be placed in the multiagency permitting team
account created in section 5 of this act.
(2) Optional multiagency permitting teams must be:
(a) Mobile, capable of traveling or working together as teams,
initially throughout the Puget Sound basin;
(b) Located initially in central Puget Sound;
(c) Staffed by appropriate senior-level permitting and regulatory
decision-making personnel representing the Washington state departments
of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources and having
expertise in regulatory issues relating to the project; and
(d) Managed by the office of regulatory assistance through a team
leader responsible for:
(i) Managing or monitoring team activities to ensure the
cost-reimbursement schedule and agreement is followed;
(ii) Developing and maintaining partnerships and working
relationships with local, state, tribal, and federal organizations not
core to the optional multiagency permitting teams that can be called
upon to join the team on a project-by-project basis;
(iii) Developing, defining, and providing a set of coordinated
permitting and integrated decision-making services consistent with
those set forth in subsection (3) of this section;
(iv) Developing and executing funding agreements with applicants,
project proponents, regulatory agencies, and others as necessary to
ensure the financial viability of the optional multiagency permitting
teams;
(v) Measuring and regularly reporting on team performance, results
and outcomes achieved, including improved: Permitting predictability,
interagency early project coordination, interagency accessibility,
interagency relationships, project delivery, and environmental results,
including the avoidance or prevention of environmental harm and the
effectiveness of mitigation;
(vi) Conducting outreach, marketing, and advertising of team
services and team availability, focusing initially on projects such as
large-scale public, private, and port development projects with complex
aquatics, wetland, or other environmental impacts; environmental
cleanup, restoration, and enhancement projects; aquaculture projects;
and energy, power generation, and utility projects;
(vii) Implementing issue and dispute resolution protocols;
(viii) Incorporating and using virtual tools for online
collaboration to support permitting and regulatory coordination and
expedited decision making; and
(ix) Extending and subsequently implementing the optional
multiagency permitting team approach to other significant geographic
regions of the state.
(3) The optional multiagency permitting teams must at a minimum
work with the office of regulatory assistance to provide the following
core services:
(a) Project scoping, as set forth in RCW 43.42.050 (1) through (4),
to help applicants identify applicable permits and regulatory
approvals;
(b) A preapplication coordination service, which may be combined
with project scoping, to help applicants understand applicable
requirements and plan out with the assistance of the regulatory
agencies an optimally sequenced permitting and regulatory decision-making strategy and approach for the overall project;
(c) Fully coordinated project review as set forth in RCW 43.42.060
to set schedules and agreed-upon time frames for the applicant and
regulatory decision makers consistent with statutory requirements and
with regard to available agency resources and to track, monitor, and
report progress made in meeting those schedules and time frames;
(d) Mitigation coordination to help applicants and regulatory
agencies collaborate on and implement mitigation obligations within a
watershed context so superior environmental results can be achieved
when impacts cannot be avoided or further minimized.
(4) Local and federal permitting and regulatory personnel should be
incorporated into the optional multiagency permitting teams whenever
possible and at least on a project-by-project basis. Moneys recouped
through state cost-reimbursement and interagency cost-sharing
authorities, or as otherwise solicited for deposit into the multiagency
permitting team account created in section 5 of this act, may also be
used to cover local and federal participation.
(5) The optional multiagency permitting teams will provide services
for complex projects requiring multiple permits and regulatory
approvals and having multiple points of regulatory jurisdiction. The
optional multiagency permitting teams are not intended to support state
transportation projects capable of being serviced by multiagency
permitting teams specifically established for state transportation
projects. Use of the optional multiagency permitting teams for a fully
coordinated permit process must be allowed unless the office of
regulatory assistance notifies a project proponent in writing of other
means of effective and efficient project review that are available and
are recommended.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.42.070 and 2009 c 97 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may enter into cost-reimbursement agreements with a
project proponent to recover from the project proponent the reasonable
costs incurred by the office in carrying out the provisions of RCW
43.42.050, 43.42.060, and sections 2 and 3 of this act. The agreement
((shall)) must include the permit agencies that are participating in
the cost-reimbursement project and carrying out permit processing tasks
referenced in the agreement.
(2) The office ((shall)) must maintain policies or guidelines for
coordinating cost-reimbursement agreements with participating agencies,
project proponents, and outside independent consultants. Policies or
guidelines must ensure that, in developing cost-reimbursement
agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated. Contracts with
independent consultants hired by the office under this section must be
based on competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement from a
prequalified consultant roster.
(3) For fully coordinated permit processes, the office ((shall))
must coordinate the negotiation of all cost-reimbursement agreements
executed under RCW 43.21A.690, 43.30.490, 43.70.630, 43.300.080, and
70.94.085. The office, project proponent, and the permit agencies
((shall)) must be signatories to the agreement or agreements. Each
permit agency ((shall)) must manage performance of its portion of the
agreement. Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement shall report directly to the hiring office or permit agency.
Any cost-reimbursement agreement must require that final decisions are
made by the permit agency and not by a hired consultant.
(4) For a fully coordinated project using cost reimbursement, the
office and participating permit agencies ((shall)) must include a cost-reimbursement work plan, including deliverables and schedules for
invoicing and reimbursement in the fully coordinated project work plan
described in RCW 43.42.060. Upon request, the office ((shall)) must
verify that the agencies have met the obligations contained in the
cost-reimbursement work plan and agreement. The cost-reimbursement
agreement ((shall)) must identify the tasks of each agency and the
maximum costs for work conducted under the agreement. The agreement
must include a schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application for comparable projects;
(b) The anticipated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A process for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(5) If a permit agency or the project proponent foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the cost-reimbursement agreement and fully coordinated project work plan, it
((shall)) must notify the office and state the reasons, along with
proposals for resolving the problems and potentially amending the
timelines. The office ((shall)) must notify the participating permit
agencies and the project proponent and, upon agreement of all parties,
adjust the schedule, or, if necessary, coordinate revision of the cost-reimbursement agreement and fully coordinated project work plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
The multiagency permitting team account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from solicitations authorized in section 3 of
this act must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for covering the initial administrative costs of
multiagency permitting teams and such other costs associated with the
teams as may arise that are not recoverable through cost-reimbursement
or cost-sharing mechanisms.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2009 c 479 s 31, 2009 c 472 s 5, and
2009 c 451 s 8 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily
balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search
and rescue account, the budget stabilization account, the capitol
building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the common school
construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county
criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax
equalization account, the data processing building construction
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election
account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account,
the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College
capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the
freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal
account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health
services account, the high capacity transportation account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy
toll lanes operations account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the
local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account,
the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency permitting team
account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the
supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account,
the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation
partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington fruit express account,
the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety
employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state
health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the
state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.131.402 and 2009 c 421 s 10 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, 2012:
(1) RCW 43.42.005 and 2009 c 97 s 1, 2007 c 94 s 1, 2003 c 71 s 1,
& 2002 c 153 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.42.010 and 2007 c 231 s 5, 2003 c 71 s 2, & 2002 c 153
§ 2;
(3) RCW 43.42.020 and 2002 c 153 s 3;
(4) RCW 43.42.030 and 2003 c 71 s 3 & 2002 c 153 s 4;
(5) RCW 43.42.040 and 2003 c 71 s 4 & 2002 c 153 s 5;
(6) RCW 43.42.050 and 2002 c 153 s 6;
(7) RCW 43.42.060 and 2009 c 421 s 8 & 2002 c 153 s 7;
(8) RCW 43.42.070 and 2009 c 97 s 7, 2007 c 94 s 8, 2003 c 70 s 7,
& 2002 c 153 s 8;
(9) ((RCW 43.42.905 and 2002 c 153 s 10;
(10))) RCW 43.42.900 and 2002 c 153 s 11; and
(((11))) (10) RCW 43.42.901 and 2002 c 153 s 12.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---