BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds:
(1) A substantial backlog currently exists for water rights
applications in Washington state;
(2) Due to a recent reduction to the department of ecology's water
rights processing budget, the backlog is not likely to decline unless
an alternative means of processing at least portions of water rights
applications is established; and
(3) The state should expedite the issuance of a water right
certificate for water rights applications by authorizing the water
conservancy boards to do a final examination of a project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.80 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon completion of a water appropriation and putting water to
beneficial use, in order to receive a final water right certificate,
the permit holder must obtain a final examination of the project to
verify its completion and to determine and document the amount of water
that has been appropriated for beneficial use, the location of
diversion or withdrawal and conveyance facilities, and the actual place
of use. A board may carry out a final examination of the project for
a permit holder and submit the report to the department. The board
shall take measurements or make estimates of the maximum diversion or
withdrawal, the capacity of water storage facilities, the acreage
irrigated, the type and number of residences served, the type and
number of stock watered, and other information relevant to making a
final determination of the amount of water beneficially used. The
board shall take photographs of the facilities to document the use or
uses of water and the photographs must be submitted with the examiner's
report to the department. The department shall specify the format and
required content of the reports and may provide a form for that
purpose.
(2) The decision regarding whether to issue a final water right
certificate and in what amounts and other particulars is solely the
responsibility and function of the department.
(3) The director shall review the final examination of a project by
the board and shall affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board
within forty-five days of receipt. The forty-five day time period may
be extended for an additional thirty days by the director or at the
request of the board or applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the board's record of decision becomes the
decision of the department and is appealable as provided by RCW
90.80.090. If the director acts within the prescribed time period, the
director's decision to affirm, modify, or reverse is appealable as
provided by RCW 90.80.090, and the director's decision to remand is
appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.120(3)(b).

--- END ---