BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.88A.010 and 1991 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature takes special note of the contributions made by
nursing assistants in health care facilities whose tasks are arduous
and whose working conditions may be contributing to the high and often
critical turnover among the principal cadre of health care workers who
provide for the basic needs of patients. The legislature also
recognizes the growing shortage of nurses as the proportion of the
elderly population grows and as the acuity of patients in hospitals and
nursing homes becomes generally more severe.
(2) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) Occupational nursing assistants should have a formal system of
educational and experiential qualifications leading to career mobility
and advancement. The establishment of such a system should bring about
a more stabilized workforce in health care facilities, as well as
provide a valuable resource for recruitment into licensed nursing
practice.
((The legislature finds that)) (b) The quality of patient care in
health care facilities is dependent upon the competence of the
personnel who staff their facilities. To assure the availability of
trained personnel in health care facilities the legislature recognizes
the need for training programs for nursing assistants.
((The legislature declares that)) (c) Certified home care aides are
a valuable potential source of nursing assistants who will be needed to
meet the care needs of the state's growing aging population. To assure
continued opportunity for recruitment into nursing practice and career
advancement for certified home care aides, nursing assistant training
programs should recognize the relevant training and experience obtained
by these credentialed professionals.
(d) The registration of nursing assistants and providing for
voluntary certification of those who wish to seek higher levels of
qualification is in the interest of the public health, safety, and
welfare.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.88A.020 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 708 are each amended
to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington nursing care quality
assurance commission.
(4) "Nursing assistant" means an individual, regardless of title,
who, under the direction and supervision of a registered nurse or
licensed practical nurse, assists in the delivery of nursing and
nursing-related activities to patients in a health care facility. The
two levels of nursing assistants are (a) "nursing assistant-certified,"
an individual certified under this chapter, (b) "nursing assistant-registered," an individual registered under this chapter.
(5) "Approved training program" means a nursing assistant-certified
training program approved by the commission to meet the training
requirements of a state-approved nurse aide training and competency
evaluation program within the meaning of 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395i-3(e).
For community college, vocational-technical institutes, skill centers,
and secondary school as defined in chapter 28B.50 RCW, nursing
assistant-certified training programs shall be approved by the
commission in cooperation with the board for community and technical
colleges or the superintendent of public instruction.
(6) "Health care facility" means a nursing home, hospital, hospice
care facility, home health care agency, hospice agency, or other entity
for delivery of health care services as defined by the commission.
(7) "Competency evaluation" means the measurement of an
individual's knowledge and skills as related to safe, competent
performance as a nursing assistant.
(8) "Alternative training" means a nursing assistant-certified
program meeting criteria adopted by the commission under section 3 of
this act to meet the requirements of a state-approved nurse aide
competency evaluation program within the meaning of 42 U.S.C. Sec.
1395i-3(e).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.88A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall adopt criteria for evaluating an
applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's
eligibility to take a qualifying examination for nursing assistant
certification. At least one option adopted by the commission must
allow an applicant to take the examination if he or she:
(a) Is a certified home care aide pursuant to chapter 18.88B RCW;
and
(b) Has successfully completed twenty-four hours of training that
the commission determines is necessary to provide training equivalent
to approved training on topics not addressed in the training specified
for certification as a home care aide. In the commission's discretion,
a portion of these hours may include clinical training.
(2) By January 1, 2011, the commission, in consultation with the
secretary and representatives of consumers, workers, and employers,
shall adopt rules to implement this section and to provide for
credentialing reciprocity to the extent required by this section
between home care aide certification and nursing assistant
certification. The secretary shall also adopt such rules as may be
necessary to implement this section and the credentialing reciprocity
program by January 1, 2011.
(3) Beginning December 1, 2011, the secretary, in consultation with
the commission, shall report annually by December 1st to the governor
and the legislature on the progress made in achieving career
advancement for certified home care aides into nursing practice.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.88A.030 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 52 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) A nursing assistant may assist in the care of individuals as
delegated by and under the direction and supervision of a licensed
(registered) nurse or licensed practical nurse.
(((2))) (b) A health care facility ((shall)) may not assign a
nursing assistant-registered to provide care until the nursing
assistant-registered has demonstrated skills necessary to perform
competently all assigned duties and responsibilities.
(((3))) (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to confer on
a nursing assistant the authority to administer medication unless
delegated as a specific nursing task pursuant to this chapter or to
practice as a licensed (registered) nurse or licensed practical nurse
as defined in chapter 18.79 RCW.
(((4))) (2)(a) A nursing assistant employed in a nursing home must
have successfully obtained certification through: (i) An approved
training program and the competency evaluation within four months after
the date of employment; or (ii) alternative training and the competency
evaluation prior to employment.
(b) Certification is voluntary for nursing assistants working in
health care facilities other than nursing homes unless otherwise
required by state or federal law or regulation.
(((5))) (3) The commission may adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.88A.050 and 1991 c 16 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Set all certification, registration, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees
in the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;
(2) Establish forms, procedures, and examinations necessary to
administer this chapter;
(3) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter;
(4) Issue a registration to any applicant who has met the
requirements for registration;
(5) After January 1, 1990, issue a certificate to any applicant who
has met the education, training, competency evaluation, and conduct
requirements for certification;
(6) Maintain the official record for the department of all
applicants and persons with registrations and certificates;
(7) Exercise disciplinary authority as authorized in chapter 18.130
RCW;
(8) Deny registration to any applicant who fails to meet
requirement for registration;
(9) Deny certification to applicants who do not meet the education,
training, competency evaluation, and conduct requirements for
certification.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.88A.060 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 710 are each amended
to read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the commission
may:
(1) Determine minimum nursing assistant education requirements and
approve training programs;
(2) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of, examinations of training
and competency for applicants for nursing assistant certification;
(3) ((Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to approved training programs, and)) Establish forms((,))
and procedures((, and criteria)) for evaluation of an applicant's
alternative training ((to determine the applicant's eligibility to take
any qualifying examination for certification)) under criteria adopted
pursuant to section 3 of this act;
(4) Define and approve any experience requirement for nursing
assistant certification;
(5) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency evaluation
program for nursing assistants; and
(6) Adopt rules to enable it to carry into effect the provisions of
this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.88A.085 and 2007 c 361 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After January 1, 1990, the secretary shall issue a nursing
assistant certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the
secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:
(a) Successful completion of an approved training program or
successful completion of ((alternate)) alternative training meeting
established criteria ((approved)) adopted by the commission under
section 3 of this act; and
(b) Successful completion of a competency evaluation.
(2) ((The secretary may permit all or a portion of the training
hours earned under chapter 74.39A RCW to be applied toward
certification under this section.
(3))) In addition, applicants shall be subject to the grounds for
denial of certification under chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.88A.140 and 2003 c 140 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice by an individual licensed, certified, or
registered under the laws of this state and performing services within
their authorized scope of practice;
(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the
United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by
the laws of the United States;
(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an
educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of
services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments
from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor;
(4) A nursing assistant, while employed as a personal aide as
defined in RCW 74.39.007 or a long-term care worker as defined in
chapter 74.39A RCW, from accepting direction from an individual who is
self-directing ((their)) his or her care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 RCW 18.88A.115 (Home care aide certification
reciprocity) and 2009 c 580 s 16 & 2009 c 2 s 11 (Initiative Measure
No. 1029) are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any part of this act is found by an
agency of the federal government to be in conflict with federal
requirements, including requirements related to the medicare and
medicaid programs under the federal social security act, that are a
prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state,
the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of
the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and
this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act
in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this
act must meet federal requirements, including requirements related to
the medicare and medicaid programs under the federal social security
act, that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

--- END ---