BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning in 2011, the state health care authority must process as
a complaint an enrollee's expression of dissatisfaction about customer
service or the quality or availability of a health service. The agency
must require that each health plan that provides medical insurance
offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring
entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and
plans created under RCW 41.05.140 must submit a summary of customer
service complaints and appeals to the agency to be included in an
annual report to the legislature. Each annual report must summarize
the complaints and appeals processed by the state health care authority
and contracted carriers in the preceding twelve months, and include an
analysis of any trends identified. The report must be must complete by
September 30th of each year.

--- END ---