BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.04.145 and 2008 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The term "employment" shall not include services which require
registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under chapter 19.28
RCW rendered by an individual when:
(1) The individual has been and will continue to be free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact;
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside of
all the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed;
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes, other than that furnished by the employer for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(6) ((On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business that the
individual is conducting; and
(7))) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual has a valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter
18.27 RCW or an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28
RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.08.181 and 2008 c 102 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of this title, any individual performing services
that require registration under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensing under
chapter 19.28 RCW for remuneration under an independent contract is not
a worker when:
(1) The individual has been, and will continue to be, free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact;
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside all
of the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed;
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes other than that furnished by the employer for which the
business has contracted to furnish services;
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting;
(5) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has an active and valid certificate of registration with the
department of revenue, and an active and valid account with any other
state agencies as required by the particular case, for the business the
individual is conducting for the payment of all state taxes normally
paid by employers and businesses and has registered for and received a
unified business identifier number from the state of Washington; and
(6) ((On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting; and
(7))) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual has a valid contractor registration pursuant to chapter
18.27 RCW or an electrical contractor license pursuant to chapter 19.28
RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.08.195 and 2008 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
As an exception to the definition of "employer" under RCW 51.08.070
and the definition of "worker" under RCW 51.08.180, services performed
by an individual for remuneration shall not constitute employment
subject to this title if it is shown that:
(1) The individual has been and will continue to be free from
control or direction over the performance of the service, both under
the contract of service and in fact; and
(2) The service is either outside the usual course of business for
which the service is performed, or the service is performed outside all
of the places of business of the enterprise for which the service is
performed, or the individual is responsible, both under the contract
and in fact, for the costs of the principal place of business from
which the service is performed; and
(3) The individual is customarily engaged in an independently
established trade, occupation, profession, or business, of the same
nature as that involved in the contract of service, or the individual
has a principal place of business for the business the individual is
conducting that is eligible for a business deduction for federal income
tax purposes; and
(4) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is responsible for filing at the next applicable filing
period, both under the contract of service and in fact, a schedule of
expenses with the internal revenue service for the type of business the
individual is conducting; and
(5) On the effective date of the contract of service, or within a
reasonable period after the effective date of the contract, the
individual has established an account with the department of revenue,
and other state agencies as required by the particular case, for the
business the individual is conducting for the payment of all state
taxes normally paid by employers and businesses and has registered for
and received a unified business identifier number from the state of
Washington((; and
(6) On the effective date of the contract of service, the
individual is maintaining a separate set of books or records that
reflect all items of income and expenses of the business which the
individual is conducting)).

--- END ---