BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No city, county, or statewide elected official may hold more
than one elected position at a time except for voluntary work as
defined by this section.
(2) An elected official holding two elected positions prior to the
effective date of this section may continue to serve in both positions
until the current terms of both offices have expired. After the
current terms of both offices have expired, such elected official may
only hold one elected position at a time.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "voluntary work" is defined
as any city, county, or statewide elected position with compensation of
less than five hundred dollars per month.

--- END ---