BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.180.160 and 2009 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the commission
may not exceed ((six)) seven billion dollars at any time. The
calculation of outstanding indebtedness shall include the initial
principal amount of an issue and shall not include interest that is
either currently payable or that accrues as a part of the face amount
of an issue payable at maturity or earlier redemption. Outstanding
indebtedness shall not include notes or bonds as to which the
obligation of the commission has been satisfied and discharged by
refunding or for which payment has been provided by reserves or
otherwise.
(2) One billion dollars of the outstanding indebtedness of the
commission is for the primary purpose of implementing the workforce
housing program to increase opportunities for nonprofit organizations
and public agencies to purchase, acquire, build, and own real property
to be used for affordable housing for low and moderate-income
households. The workforce housing program is intended to provide these
opportunities for public agencies and nonprofit organizations,
including material participating nonprofit organizations or nonprofit
managing members of a partnership, limited liability company, or
equivalent organization, through the issuance of tax exempt or taxable
revenue bonds issued by the commission in conjunction with a state
subsidy necessary to make bond issues to finance affordable housing
properties financially feasible. The program is intended to provide
financing for affordable housing that will meet the following income
and rent restrictions during the period of initial bond indebtedness
and thereafter:
(a) During the period of initial bond indebtedness under the
program, the owner of the property must meet one of the following
requirements: A minimum of twenty percent of the units will be
occupied by households earning less than fifty percent of area median
income and an additional thirty-one percent of the units will be
occupied by persons earning less than eighty percent of area median
income; or forty percent of the units will be occupied by households
earning less than sixty percent of area median income and an additional
eleven percent of the units will be occupied by households earning less
than eighty percent of area median income.
(b) After the initial bond indebtedness is retired, the rents
charged for units in the project will be adjusted to be sufficient to
pay reasonable operation and maintenance expenses, including necessary
capital needs, and to make reasonable deposits into a reserve account
with the intent of providing affordable housing to very low or low-income households for the remaining useful life of the property. The
reasonableness of the rent levels must be periodically approved by the
commission based on information provided by the owner of the property
about income, expenses, and necessary reserve levels. The
determination of the commission regarding the reasonableness of the
rent levels will be final.
(c) The commission will enter into a recorded regulatory agreement
with the borrower at the time of the issuance of bonds under the
program for the purpose of ensuring that the property will meet the
income and rent restrictions established in this section. The
commission may charge such compliance fees as necessary to ensure
enforcement of the income and rent restrictions during the useful life
of the property.
(3) If no state subsidies are available to make the program in
subsection (2) of this section feasible; then the commission may pass
a resolution stating these facts and authorize the use of a portion of
the one billion dollars of indebtedness intended for the program to
support its other bond programs until such time as the one billion
dollars is exhausted or state subsidies are available to make the
program feasible.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.86.100 and 2001 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The federal ((tax reform act)) internal revenue code of 1986
defined as "code" in RCW 39.86.110, imposes ((an annual)) ceilings on
the aggregate amount of ((federally tax-exempt private activity))
certain types of bonds, including tax-exempt private activity bonds
((for housing, student loans, exempt facilities, small issue
industrial, redevelopment, and certain public utility projects)) and
other types, that may be issued during any calendar year by or on
behalf of states and their political subdivisions. ((In 2001, the
ceiling will be increased to sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per
capita and in 2002 the ceiling will be increased to seventy-five
dollars per capita, to be indexed annually, for 2003 and every year
thereafter. However, a study by the department of community
development indicates that the dollar amount of the state ceiling is
considerably less than the anticipated dollar amount for which issuers
would need an allocation from the state ceiling.)) The ((tax reform
act of 1986)) code provides a formula for allocating the annual tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling among various issuers of private
activity bonds for housing, student loans, exempt facilities, and
redevelopment projects within a state, but permits each state to enact
a different allocation method that is appropriate to that state's
needs. In addition, congress might, from time to time, amend the code
by authorizing state ceilings on additional types of bonds. The
purpose of this chapter is to provide a flexible and efficient method
of allocating the annual state ceiling in Washington in a manner that
recognizes the need of the state and its political subdivisions to
finance activities or projects that satisfy a substantial public
purpose.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.86.110 and 2009 c 565 s 23 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means the department of commerce.
(2) (("Board" means the community economic revitalization board
established under chapter 43.160 RCW.
(3))) "Bond use category" means: (a) Any of the following
categories of bonds which are subject to the annual state tax-exempt
private activity bond ceiling: (((a))) (i) Housing, (((b))) (ii)
student loans, (((c))) (iii) small issue, (((d))) (iv) exempt facility,
(((e))) (v) redevelopment, (((f) public utility; and (g))) and (vi)
remainder; and (b) any other categories of bonds described in the code
for which there is a separate ceiling, with the exception of bonds
designated solely for school district purposes.
(((4))) (3) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, or other obligations of an
issuer.
(((5))) (4) "Carryforward" is an allocation or reallocation of the
state ceiling which is carried from one calendar year to a later year,
in accordance with the code.
(((6))) (5) "Code" means the federal internal revenue code of 1986
as it exists on May 8, 1987. It also means the code as amended after
May 8, 1987, but only if the amendments are approved by the agency
under RCW 39.86.180.
(((7))) (6) "Director" means the director of the agency or the
director's designee.
(((8))) (7) "Exempt facility" means the bond use category which
includes all bonds which are exempt facility bonds as described in the
code, except those for qualified residential rental projects.
(((9))) (8) "Firm and convincing evidence" means documentation that
satisfies the director that the issuer is committed to the prompt
financing of, and will issue ((tax exempt)) bonds for, the project or
program for which it requests an allocation from the state ceiling.
(((10))) (9) "Housing" means the bond use category which includes:
(a) Mortgage revenue bonds and mortgage credit certificates as
described in the code; and (b) exempt facility bonds for qualified
residential rental projects as described in the code.
(((11))) (10) "Initial allocation" means the portion or dollar
value of the annual state tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling
which initially in each calendar year is allocated to a bond use
category for the issuance of private activity bonds, in accordance with
RCW 39.86.120.
(((12))) (11) "Issuer" means the state, any agency or
instrumentality of the state, any political subdivision, or any other
entity authorized to issue ((private activity)) bonds under state law.
(12) "Original allocation" means any allocation of bond authority
by a mandatory formula in the code, except for the initial allocations
of the annual state ceiling on tax-exempt private activity bonds.
(13) "Private activity bonds" means obligations that are private
activity bonds as defined in the code or bonds for purposes described
in section 1317(25) of the ((tax reform act)) federal internal revenue
code of 1986.
(14) "Program" means the activities for which housing bonds or
student loan bonds may be issued.
(15) (("Public utility" means the bond use category which includes
those bonds described in section 1317(25) of the tax reform act of
1986.
(16))) "Redevelopment" means the bond use category which includes
qualified redevelopment bonds as described in the code.
(((17))) (16) "Remainder" means that portion of the annual state
tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling remaining after initial
allocations are made under RCW 39.86.120 for any other bond use
category.
(((18))) (17) "Small issue" means the bond use category which
includes all industrial development bonds that constitute qualified
small issue bonds, as described in the code.
(((19))) (18) "State" means the state of Washington.
(((20))) (19) "State ceiling" means the volume limitation for each
calendar year on ((tax-exempt private activity)) specific bond((s))
types, including tax-exempt private activity bonds and other bonds, as
imposed by the code.
(((21))) (20) "Student loans" means the bond use category which
includes qualified student loan bonds as described in the code.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 39.86 RCW
to read as follows:
Original allocations or any reallocations of state bond ceilings
other than the tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling must be
determined by formula as provided in the code, or by department rule if
no formula is provided in the code.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.86.120 and 2001 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section,
the initial allocation of the state ceiling shall be for each year as
follows:

BOND USE
CATEGORY
((2001
2002 and
THEREAFTER
ALTERNATIVE
ALLOCATION))
2010 and
THEREAFTER

Housing ((27.5% 30.0%)) 32.0%

Small Issue ((24.5% 24.0%)) 25.0%

Exempt Facility ((19.5% 19.0%)) 20.0%

Student Loans ((14.5% 14.0%)) 15.0%

Public Utility ((10.0% 10.0%)) 0.0%

Remainder and
Redevelopment ((4.0% 3.0%)) 8.0%

(2) Initial allocations may be modified by the agency only to
reflect an issuer's carryforward amount. Any reduction of the initial
allocation shall be added to the remainder and be available for
allocation or reallocation, except as provided in subsection (6) of
this section.
(3) The remainder shall be allocated by the agency among one or
more issuers from any bond use category with regard to the criteria
specified in RCW 39.86.130.
(4) Should any bond use category no longer be subject to the state
ceiling due to federal or state provisions of law, the agency shall
divide the amount of that initial allocation among the remaining
categories as necessary or appropriate with regard to the criteria
specified in RCW 39.86.130. ((Upon the earlier of: (a) Exhaustion of
the seven hundred fifty million dollar authority under I.R.C. 1317(25),
or any new federal legislation increasing the amount of authority, or
creating additional authority; or (b) waiver of the authority described
under (a) of this subsection due to alternative federal authority that
does not use a state volume cap, then the alternative allocation
schedule in subsection (1) of this section will be used.))
(5)(a) Prior to ((September 1)) July 1st of each calendar year, any
available portion of an initial allocation may be allocated or
reallocated only to an issuer within the same bond use category, except
that the remainder category, or portions thereof, may be allocated at
any time to any bond use category.
(b) Beginning ((September 1)) July 1st of each calendar year, the
agency may allocate or reallocate any available portion of the state
ceiling to any bond use category with regard to the criteria specified
in RCW 39.86.130.
(6) If no qualified allocation request for an initial allocation
from the student loan category is received by April 1st of any calendar
year, the initial allocation for student loans must be transferred to
the housing category.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.86.130 and 1987 c 297 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In granting an allocation, reallocation, or carryforward of the
state ceiling as provided in this chapter, the agency shall consider
existing state priorities and other such criteria, including but not
limited to, the following criteria:
(a) Need of issuers to issue ((private activity)) bonds within a
bond use category subject to a state ceiling;
(b) Amount of the state ceiling available;
(c) Public benefit and purpose to be satisfied, including economic
development, educational opportunity, and public health, safety, or
welfare;
(d) Cost or availability of alternative methods of financing for
the project or program; and
(e) Certainty of using the allocation which is being requested.
(2) In determining whether to allocate an amount of the state
ceiling to an issuer within any bond use category, the agency shall
consider, but is not limited to, the following criteria for each of the
bond use categories:
(a) Housing: Criteria which comply with RCW 43.180.200.
(b) Student loans: Criteria which comply with the applicable
provisions of Title 28B RCW and rules adopted by the Washington higher
education ((coordinating board or applicable state agency dealing with
student financial aid)) facilities authority.
(c) Small issue: ((Recommendation by the board regarding how the
amount of the state ceiling set aside for the small issue bond use
category shall be allocated among issuers.)) Factors which may
include:
(i) The number of employment opportunities the project is likely to
create or retain in relation to the amount of the bond issuance;
(ii) The level of unemployment existing in the geographic area
likely to be affected by the project;
(iii) A commitment to providing employment opportunities to low-income persons in cooperation with the employment security department;
(iv) Geographic distribution of projects;
(v) The number of persons who will benefit from the project;
(vi) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section; and
(vii) Order in which requests were received((; and
(viii) Requirements of the board's umbrella bond program)).
(d) Exempt facility or redevelopment: Factors which may include:
(i) State issuance needs;
(ii) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section;
(iii) Order in which requests were received;
(iv) The proportionate number of persons in relationship to the
size of the community who will benefit from the project; and
(v) The unique timing and issuance needs of large scale projects
that may require allocations in more than one year.
(e) Public utility: Factors which may include:
(i) Consistency with criteria identified in subsection (1) of this
section; and
(ii) Timing needs for issuance of bonds over a multi-year period.

Sec. 7 RCW 39.86.140 and 1987 c 297 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No issuer may receive an allocation of the state ceiling
without a certificate of approval from the agency.
(2)(((a))) For each state ceiling allocation request, an issuer
shall submit to the agency, no sooner than ninety days prior to the
beginning of a calendar year for which an allocation of the state
ceiling is being requested, a form identifying:
(((i))) (a) The amount of the allocation sought;
(((ii))) (b) The bond use category from which the allocation sought
would be made;
(((iii))) (c) The project or program for which the allocation is
requested;
(((iv))) (d) The financing schedule for which the allocation is
needed; and
(((v))) (e) Any other such information required by the agency,
including information which corresponds to the allocation criteria of
RCW 39.86.130.
(((b) Nothing in (a) of this subsection precludes a public utility
issuer from filing and the agency from considering a request at such
times as may be appropriate in order to meet the criteria set forth in
RCW 39.86.130(2)(e)(ii).))
(3) The agency may approve or deny an allocation for all or a
portion of the issuer's request. Any denied request, however, shall
remain on file with the agency for the remainder of the calendar year
and shall be considered for receiving any allocation, reallocation, or
carryforward of unused portions of the state ceiling during that
period.
(4) After receiving an allocation request, the agency shall mail to
the requesting issuer a written certificate of approval or notice of
denial for an allocation amount, by a date no later than the latest of
the following:
(a) ((Forty-five days from May 8, 1987;
(b))) February 1st of the calendar year((, other than 1987,)) for
which the request is made;
(((c))) (b) Fifteen days from the date the agency receives an
allocation request; or
(((d))) (c) Fifteen days from the date the agency receives a
recommendation by the board with regard to a small issue allocation
request, should the board choose to review individual requests.
(5)(a) For requests of the state ceiling of any calendar year, the
following applies to all bond use categories except housing ((and
student loans)):
(i) Except for housing ((and student loans)), any allocations
granted prior to April 1st, for which bonds have not been issued by
((September 1)) July 1st of the same calendar year, shall revert to the
agency on ((September 1)) July 1st of the same calendar year for
reallocation unless an extension or carryforward is granted;
(ii) Except for housing ((and student loans,)) any allocations
granted on or after April 1st, for which bonds have not been issued by
((December 15)) October 15th of the same calendar year, shall revert to
the agency on ((December 15)) October 15th of the same calendar year
for reallocation unless an extension or carryforward is granted.
(b) For each calendar year, any housing ((or student loan))
allocations, for which bonds have not been issued by December 15th of
the same calendar year, shall revert to the agency on December 15th of
the same calendar year for reallocation unless an extension or
carryforward is granted.
(6) An extension of the deadlines provided by subsection (5) of
this section may be granted by the agency for the approved allocation
amount or a portion thereof, based on:
(a) Firm and convincing evidence that the bonds will be issued
before the end of the calendar year if the extension is granted; and
(b) Any other criteria the agency deems appropriate.
(7) If an issuer determines that bonds subject to the state ceiling
will not be issued for the project or program for which an allocation
was granted, the issuer shall promptly notify the agency in writing so
that the allocation may be canceled and the amount may be available for
reallocation.
(8) Bonds subject to the state ceiling may be issued only to
finance the project or program for which a certificate of approval is
granted.
(9) Within three business days of the date that bonds for which an
allocation of the state ceiling is granted have been delivered to the
original purchasers, the issuer shall mail to the agency a written
notification of the bond issuance. In accordance with chapter 39.44
RCW, the issuer shall also complete bond issuance information on the
form provided by the agency.
(10) If the total amount of ((tax-exempt)) bonds issued under the
authority of a state ceiling for a project or program is less than the
amount allocated, the remaining portion of the allocation shall revert
to the agency for reallocation in accordance with the criteria in RCW
39.86.130. If the amount of ((tax-exempt)) bonds actually issued under
the authority of a state ceiling is greater than the amount allocated,
the entire allocation shall be disallowed.

Sec. 8 RCW 39.86.150 and 1987 c 297 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning ((September 1)) July 1st of each calendar year, the
agency may allocate or reallocate any portions of the annual state tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling for which no certificate of
approval is in effect. Reallocations may also be made from the
remainder category at any time during the year.
(2) Prior to the end of each calendar year, the agency shall
allocate or reallocate any unused portions of the state ceiling among
one or more issuers as carryforward, to be used within three years, in
accordance with the code and relevant criteria described in RCW
39.86.130.
(3) Reallocations of state bond ceilings other than the annual tax-exempt private activity bond ceiling may be made by the agency in
accordance with the code or as established in agency rule when not
specified in the code.

Sec. 9 RCW 39.86.170 and 1987 c 297 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
A fee schedule shall be established by rule by the agency to assist
in support of bond allocation activities. Fees shall reflect costs
actually incurred or expected to be incurred by the agency in its bond
allocation and bond users clearinghouse activities.

Sec. 10 RCW 39.86.190 and 2009 c 518 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
By February 1st of each even-numbered year, the agency shall
summarize for the legislature each previous year's bond allocation
requests and issuance. Beginning in ((June of 1988)) February 2010 and
thereafter in ((June)) February of each even-numbered year, the agency
shall also submit a biennial report summarizing usage of the bond
allocation proceeds and any policy concerns for future bond
allocations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 39.86.200 (Ratification) and 1987 c 297
s 11 are each repealed.

--- END ---