BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
It is the policy of the state of Washington that all commissioned,
appointed, and elected law enforcement personnel be truthful and honest
in the conduct of their official business.

--- END ---