BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.60.240 and 1995 c 259 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided for in (c) of this subsection, after the
filing of any complaint, the chairperson of the commission shall refer
it to the appropriate section of the commission's staff for prompt
((investigation and ascertainment of the facts alleged in)) review and
evaluation of the complaint. If the facts as stated in the complaint
do not constitute an unfair practice under this chapter, a finding of
no reasonable cause may be made without further investigation. If the
facts as stated could constitute an unfair practice under this chapter,
a full investigation and ascertainment of the facts shall be conducted.
(b) If the complainant has limitations related to language
proficiency or cognitive or other disability, as part of the review and
evaluation under (a) of this subsection, the commission's staff must
contact the complainant directly and make appropriate inquiry of the
complainant as to the facts of the complaint.
(c) After the filing of a complaint alleging an unfair practice in
a real estate transaction pursuant to RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.225,
the chairperson of the commission shall refer it to the appropriate
section of the commission's staff for prompt investigation and
ascertainment of the facts alleged in the complaint.
(2) The investigation shall be limited to the alleged facts
contained in the complaint. The results of the investigation shall be
reduced to written findings of fact, and a finding shall be made that
there is or that there is not reasonable cause for believing that an
unfair practice has been or is being committed. A copy of ((said)) the
findings shall be provided to the complainant and to the person named
in such complaint, hereinafter referred to as the respondent.
(3) If the finding is made that there is reasonable cause for
believing that an unfair practice has been or is being committed, the
commission's staff shall immediately endeavor to eliminate the unfair
practice by conference, conciliation, and persuasion.
If an agreement is reached for the elimination of such unfair
practice as a result of such conference, conciliation, and persuasion,
the agreement shall be reduced to writing and signed by the respondent,
and an order shall be entered by the commission setting forth the terms
of said agreement. No order shall be entered by the commission at this
stage of the proceedings except upon such written agreement, except
that during the period beginning with the filing of complaints alleging
an unfair practice with respect to real estate transactions pursuant to
RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.225, and ending with the filing of a
finding of reasonable cause or a dismissal by the commission, the
commission staff shall, to the extent feasible, engage in conciliation
with respect to such complaint. Any conciliation agreement arising out
of conciliation efforts by the commission shall be an agreement between
the respondent and the complainant and shall be subject to the approval
of the commission. Each conciliation agreement shall be made public
unless the complainant and respondent otherwise agree and the
commission determines that disclosure is not required to further the
purposes of this chapter.
If no such agreement can be reached, a finding to that effect shall
be made and reduced to writing, with a copy thereof provided to the
complainant and the respondent.
(4) The commission may adopt rules, including procedural time
requirements, for processing complaints alleging an unfair practice
with respect to real estate transactions pursuant to RCW 49.60.222
through 49.60.225 and which may be consistent with the federal fair
housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.), but which
in no case shall exceed or be more restrictive than the requirements or
standards of such act.

--- END ---