BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.63 RCW
to read as follows:
The mission of the state universities, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, includes commercializing research that benefits the
intermediate and long-term economic vitality of Washington and
developing and strengthening university-industry relationships through
the conduct of research, company and job creation, or state economic
development programs. The state universities shall:
(1) Provide leading-edge collaborative research and technology
transfer opportunities;
(2) Provide substantial opportunities for training undergraduate
and graduate students through direct involvement in research and
industry interactions; and
(3) Provide a forum for effective interaction between the state's
technology-based industries and its academic institutions through
promotion of faculty collaboration with industry, particularly within
Washington.

--- END ---