BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.31C.020 and 2000 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, in cooperation with the department of revenue,
the employment security department, and the office of financial
management, may approve applications submitted by local governments for
an area's designation as a community empowerment zone under this
chapter. The application for designation shall be in the form and
manner and contain such information as the department may prescribe,
provided that the application shall:
(a) Contain information sufficient for the director to determine if
the criteria established in RCW 43.31C.030 have been met;
(b) Be submitted on behalf of the local government by its chief
elected official, or, if none, by the governing body of the local
government;
(c) Contain a five-year community empowerment plan that meets the
requirements of RCW 43.31C.040; and
(d) Certify that area residents were given the opportunity to
participate in the development of the five-year community empowerment
strategy required under RCW 43.31C.040.
(2) No local government shall submit more than two areas to the
department for possible designation as a community empowerment zone
under this chapter.
(3)(a) The director may designate up to six community empowerment
zones, statewide, from among the applications submitted for designation
as a community empowerment zone.
(b) The director shall make determinations of designated community
empowerment zones on the basis of the following factors:
(i) The strength and quality of the local government commitments to
meet the needs identified in the five-year community empowerment plan
required under RCW 43.31C.040.
(ii) The level of private sector commitment of additional resources
and contribution to the community empowerment zone.
(iii) The potential for revitalization of the area as a result of
designation as a community empowerment zone.
(iv) Other factors the director deems necessary.
(c) The determination of the director as to the areas designated as
community empowerment zones shall be final.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 43.31C.050, an area that was
designated a community empowerment zone before January 1, 1996, under
this section, automatically and without additional action by the local
government continues its designation under this chapter.
(5) The department may not designate additional community
empowerment zones after January 1, 2004, but may amend or rescind
designation of community empowerment zones in accordance with RCW
43.31C.050.
(6) The department may designate additional community empowerment
zones after January 1, 2010, if (a) a county that already contains a
designated community empowerment zone makes the application; and (b)
the area the county seeks to have designated meets the criteria
established in RCW 43.31C.030 except such area need not meet the
requirements in both RCW 43.31C.030(1) (b) and (c) but must meet at
least one of the requirements.

--- END ---