BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant" means a nonprofit corporation that has submitted an
application to a sponsor to obtain approval to operate an innovation
partnership school. The nonprofit corporation must either be a public
benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490, or a
nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that has applied for
tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code
of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)). The nonprofit corporation may not
be a sectarian or religious organization and must meet all of the
requirements for a public benefit nonprofit corporation before
receiving any funding under section 11 of this act.
(2) "Board of directors" means the board of directors of the public
benefit nonprofit corporation that manages and operates the innovation
partnership school.
(3) "Innovation partnership school" means a public school managed
by an applicant's board of directors and operating independently of any
school district board under a partnership agreement approved in
accordance with this chapter.
(4) "Partnership agreement" means a contract between an applicant
and a sponsor. The partnership agreement establishes, in accordance
with this chapter, the terms and conditions for the management,
operation, and educational program of the innovation partnership
school.
(5) "Sponsor" means:
(a) The school district in which the innovation partnership school
is located; or
(b) Any state or regional university as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
Innovation partnership schools sponsored under this subsection (5)(b)
shall be approved by the governing board of the sponsoring institution
or by an official or agency designated by and accountable to the
governing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOLS--POWERS. (1)
The innovation partnership school's board of directors may hire,
manage, and discharge any innovation partnership school employee in
accordance with the terms of this chapter and that school's partnership
agreement.
(2) The innovation partnership school's board of directors may
enter into a contract with any school district, or any other public or
private entity, also empowered to enter into contracts, for any and all
real property, equipment, goods, supplies, and services, including
educational instructional services.
(3) Innovation partnership schools may rent, lease, or own
property, but may not acquire property by eminent domain. All
partnership agreements and innovation partnership school contracts with
other public and private entities must include provisions regarding the
disposition of the property if the innovation partnership school fails
to open as planned, closes, or the charter is revoked or not renewed.
Innovation partnership schools may accept gifts and donations from
other governmental and private entities, excluding sectarian or
religious organizations. Innovation partnership schools may not accept
any gifts or donations the conditions of which violate this chapter.
(4) Neither an innovation partnership school sponsor nor the school
district in which the innovation partnership school is located is
liable for acts or omissions of an innovation partnership school,
including acts or omissions related to the application, the partnership
agreement, the operation, and the performance of the innovation
partnership school.
(5) Innovation partnership schools may not charge tuition, levy
taxes, or issue tax-backed bonds, however they may charge fees for
optional noncredit extracurricular events.
(6) Innovation partnership schools may issue secured and unsecured
debt to manage cash flow, improve operations, or finance the
acquisition of real property or equipment. No such issuance
constitutes an obligation, either general, special, or moral of the
state, the innovation partnership school sponsor, the school district
in which the innovation partnership school is located, or any other
political subdivision or agency of the state. Neither the full faith
and credit nor the taxing power of (a) the state, (b) the innovation
partnership school sponsor, (c) the school district in which the
innovation partnership school is located or (d) any other political
subdivision or agency of the state may be pledged for the payment of
such debt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 LEGAL STATUS. An innovation partnership
school is a public school including one or more grades, kindergarten
through twelve, operated by a public benefit nonprofit corporation,
according to the terms of a renewable five-year contract granted by a
sponsor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOLS--EXEMPTIONS.
(1) An innovation partnership school shall operate independently of any
school district board, under a partnership agreement approved by a
sponsor under this chapter.
(2) Innovation partnership schools are exempt from all state
statutes and rules applicable to school districts and school district
boards of directors except as provided in this chapter and in the
school's approved partnership agreement.
(3) An innovation partnership school's board of directors may elect
to comply with one or more provisions of the statutes or rules that are
applicable to school districts and school district boards of directors.
(4) All approved innovation partnership schools must:
(a) Comply with state and federal health, safety, and civil rights
laws applicable to school districts;
(b) Participate in the elementary, middle school, and high school
standards, requirements, and assessment examinations as required in
chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(c) Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW
28A.410.010, however innovation partnership schools may, like other
public schools, hire noncertificated instructional staff of unusual
competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.260;
(d) Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW
28A.400.303;
(e) Be subject to the same financial and audit requirements as a
school district;
(f) Comply with the annual school performance report under RCW
28A.655.110;
(g) Report at least annually to its sponsor and to parents of
children enrolled at the innovation partnership school on progress
toward the student performance goals specified in the partnership
agreement; and
(h) Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ADMISSION REQUIREMENTS. (1) An innovation
partnership school must enroll all students who submit a timely
application. If capacity is insufficient to enroll all students who
submit a timely application, the innovation partnership school must
give enrollment priority to students who reside within the school
district boundaries in which the innovation partnership school is
physically located. Priority also must be given to siblings of
students who are currently enrolled in the school. Schools that
convert to innovation partnership schools must also give priority to
the students who are currently enrolled in the school. When too many
students of equal priority have applied, a lottery shall be used to
select the specific students who are offered admission.
(2) An innovation partnership school may not limit admission based
on race, religion, ethnicity, national origin, gender, income level,
intellectual ability, disabling condition, proficiency in the English
language, or athletic ability. An innovation partnership school may
limit admission to students within a given age group or grade level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT APPLICATION--PARTNERING PROCESS. (1) An applicant may apply to a sponsor to
establish an innovation partnership school as provided in this section.
(2) An application for an innovation partnership school may be
submitted to any qualified sponsor.
(3) If an applicant applies to the local school district for
sponsorship, the local school district board of directors must hold a
public hearing in the school district on the application within sixty
days of receipt of the application. The school board must either
accept or reject the application within thirty days after the hearing.
The thirty-day deadline for acceptance or rejection of the innovation
partnership school application may be extended for an additional thirty
days if both parties agree in writing.
(4) If the local school board rejects the application, the school
board must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the
rejection. The applicant may submit a revised application for the
school board's reconsideration. The school board may provide
assistance to improve the application. If the school board rejects the
application after submission of a revised application, the school board
must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection.
(5) If an applicant applies to a state or regional university as
identified in section 1(5) of this act, the state or regional
university must comply with the procedures specified in subsections (1)
through (4) of this section for consideration of innovation partnership
school applications. Such a state or regional university sponsor is
not bound by another sponsor's findings or decision to deny the
application, if any.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain copies
of all approved innovation partnership school applications. Any
interested person may obtain copies of those applications from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(7) Only the local school district may sponsor the conversion of a
conventional public school to an innovation partnership school.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. (1) The
innovation partnership school application is a proposed contract and
must include:
(a) The identification and description of the nonprofit corporation
submitting the application, including the names and descriptions of the
individuals who will operate the school;
(b) The nonprofit corporation's articles of incorporation, bylaws,
and most recent financial statement and balance sheet;
(c) A mission statement for the proposed school, consistent with
the description of legislative intent in this chapter;
(d) A description of the school's educational program, including
curriculum and instructional strategies;
(e) A description of the school's admissions policy and marketing
program, including deadlines for applications or admission;
(f) A description of student performance standards that must meet
those established in chapter 28A.655 RCW;
(g) A description of the plan for evaluating student performance
and the procedures for taking corrective action in the event that
student performance at the innovation partnership school falls below
standards established in its partnership agreement;
(h) A description of the financial plan for the school. The plan
shall include: (i) A proposed five-year budget of projected revenues
and expenditures; (ii) a plan for starting the school; (iii) a
five-year facilities plan; (iv) evidence supporting student enrollment
projections of at least twenty students; and (v) a description of major
contracts planned for equipment and services, leases, improvements,
purchases of real property, and insurance;
(i) A description of the proposed financial management procedures,
including annual audits of the school's financial and administrative
operations, which shall meet or exceed generally accepted standards of
management and public accounting;
(j) An assessment of the school's potential legal liability and a
description of the types and limits of insurance coverage the nonprofit
corporation plans to obtain that are adequate. For purposes of this
subsection, a liability policy of between one million and five million
dollars is required;
(k) A description of the procedures to discipline and dismiss
students; and
(l) A description of the procedures to assure the health and safety
of students, employees, and guests of the school and to comply with
applicable federal and state health and safety laws, rules, and
regulations.
(2) Additional consideration must be given to applications that
include collaboration with innovation partnership zones established in
RCW 43.330.270.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 APPROVAL CRITERIA. A sponsor or alternate
sponsor may approve an application for an innovation partnership
school, if in its reasonable judgment, after exercising due diligence
and good faith, the sponsor or alternate sponsor finds:
(1) The applicant is a public benefit nonprofit corporation and the
individuals it proposes to manage the school are qualified to operate
an innovation partnership school and implement the proposed educational
program;
(2) The mission statement is consistent with the description of
legislative intent and restrictions on innovation partnership school
operations in this chapter;
(3) The school's proposed educational program is free from
religious or sectarian influence;
(4) The school's proposed educational program includes student
academic performance standards that meet those determined under chapter
28A.655 RCW;
(5) The application includes a viable plan for evaluating pupil
performance and procedures for taking appropriate corrective action in
the event that pupil performance at the innovation partnership school
falls below standards established in its charter;
(6) The school's educational program, including curriculum and
instructional strategies, is likely to improve student performance as
measured under section 4 of this act;
(7) The application includes school performance standards, which
must meet those determined under the statewide accountability system
adopted by the legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130;
(8) The school's admissions policy and marketing program is
consistent with state and federal law;
(9) The financial plan for the school is designed to reasonably
support the innovation partnership school's educational program based
on a review of the proposed five-year budget of projected revenues,
expenditures, and facilities;
(10) The school's financial and administrative operations,
including its annual audits, meet or exceed generally accepted
standards of accounting and management;
(11) The assessment of the school's potential legal liability, and
the types and limits of insurance coverage the school plans to obtain,
are adequate. For purposes of this subsection, a liability policy of
between one million and five million dollars is required;
(12) The procedures the school plans to follow for discipline and
dismissal of students are reasonable and comply with federal law;
(13) The procedures the school plans to follow to assure the health
and safety of students, employees, and guests of the school comply with
applicable state and federal health and safety laws and regulations;
and
(14) The public benefit nonprofit corporation has been approved or
conditionally approved by the internal revenue service for tax exempt
status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26
U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT--AMENDMENT. (1) A
partnership agreement application approved by a sponsor with any
changes constitutes a partnership agreement.
(2) A partnership agreement may be amended during its term at the
request of the innovation partnership school board of directors and on
the approval of the sponsor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 PARTNERSHIP AGREEMENT RENEWAL AND
REVOCATION. (1) An approved plan to establish an innovation
partnership school is effective for five years from the first day of
operation. At the conclusion of the first three years of operation,
the innovation partnership school may apply for renewal to its sponsor
or an eligible sponsor under section 1(5) of this act. A request for
renewal must be submitted no later than six months before the
expiration of the partnership agreement. If the request is to a
potentially new sponsor, the new sponsor shall follow the procedures in
section 6 of this act.
(2) Within the first three years of operation, and at least once
every three years thereafter, an innovation partnership school shall
apply to the Washington state quality award program established in RCW
43.06.335, or for the Malcolm Baldridge national quality award.
(3) An innovation partnership school renewal application must
include:
(a) A report on the progress of the innovation partnership school
in achieving the goals, student performance standards, and other terms
of the partnership agreement; and
(b) A financial statement that discloses the costs of
administration, instruction, and other expenditure objects and
activities of the innovation partnership school.
(4) The sponsor may reject the application for renewal if any of
the following occurred:
(a) The innovation partnership school materially violated its
contract with the sponsor, as set forth in the partnership agreement;
(b) The students enrolled in the innovation partnership school
failed to meet student performance standards identified in the
partnership agreement;
(c) The innovation partnership school failed to meet generally
accepted standards of fiscal management; or
(d) The innovation partnership school violated provisions in law
that have not been waived in accordance with this chapter.
(5) A sponsor shall give written notice of its decision to grant or
deny the innovation partnership school's request for renewal within
three months of receiving the request for renewal. If its decision is
to deny the request, the sponsor shall provide the innovation
partnership school with a reasonable opportunity to correct each
identified deficiency in its operation. At the request of the board of
directors of the innovation partnership school, the sponsor shall
review its denial of the request for renewal after the innovation
partnership school has corrected any identified deficiencies, and may,
in its discretion, reverse its previous decision and grant the
innovation partnership school's request for renewal.
(6) The sponsor may revoke a previously approved partnership
agreement before the expiration of the term of the partnership
agreement, and before application for renewal, for any of the reasons
specified in subsection (4) of this section. Except in cases of
emergency where the health and safety of children are at risk, a
partnership agreement may not be revoked unless the sponsor first
provides written notice of the specific violations alleged, a public
hearing, and a reasonable opportunity for the innovation partnership
school to correct the identified areas of concern. The sponsor of an
innovation partnership school shall provide for an appeal process upon
a determination by the sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a
partnership agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 FUNDING. (1) If the sponsor is a school
district:
(a) For purposes of funding, students in innovation partnership
schools shall be considered students of the sponsoring district for
general fund apportionment purposes. Without violating the provisions
of section 12 of this act, the sponsoring school district shall provide
prompt and timely funding for innovation partnership schools on a per
student basis in amounts the schools would have received if the
students were enrolled in a conventional public school in the district
except that an innovation partnership school shall not generate
eligibility for small school assistance. Funding for innovation
partnership schools shall include regular apportionment, categorical,
and nonbasic education funds, as appropriate and shall be based on
enrollment and other financial information submitted by the innovation
partnership school to the school district as is required to determine
state apportionment amounts;
(b) Local levy moneys approved by the voters before the effective
date of a partnership agreement between a school district and an
applicant shall not be allocated to an innovation partnership school
unless the sponsoring school district determines it has received
sufficient authority from voters to allocate maintenance and operation
excess tax levy money to the innovation partnership school. For levies
approved after the effective date of a partnership agreement,
innovation partnership schools shall be included in levy planning,
budgets, and funding distribution in the same manner as other schools
in the district; and
(c) An innovation partnership school is eligible for state matching
funds for common school construction if a sponsoring school district
determines it has received voter approval of local capital funds for
the project.
(2) Conventional public schools that convert to innovation
partnership schools shall receive funding in the same manner as other
district-sponsored innovation partnership schools.
(3) If the sponsor is not a school district, students in the
innovation partnership school shall still be considered students of the
district in which the innovation partnership school is located for
general fund apportionment purposes. Without violating the provisions
of section 12 of this act, the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide prompt and timely funding for innovation partnership
schools on a per student basis in amounts the schools would have
received if the students were enrolled in a conventional public school
in the district except that an innovation partnership school shall not
generate eligibility for small school assistance. The funding shall
include regular apportionment, categorical, and nonbasic education
funds and shall be based on enrollment and other financial information
submitted by the innovation partnership school to the school district
and the superintendent of public instruction, as is required to
determine state apportionment amounts.
(4) No local levy money may be allocated to an innovation
partnership school if the innovation partnership school is sponsored by
any public agency other than the local school district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 ADMINISTRATION FEE. To offset costs of
oversight and administering the partnership agreement, a sponsor may
retain up to three percent of state funding and local excess levy
funding, if applicable, that is being driven to the innovation
partnership school. Except for the administration fee in this section,
no other offsets or deductions are allowed, whether for central
administration or other off-site support services, from an innovation
partnership school's per-pupil share of state appropriations, local
levies, or other funds, unless the innovation partnership school has
voluntarily contracted with its sponsor to obtain specific additional
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOL ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT. The innovation partnership school assistance account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
appropriations shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only to provide financial grants to approved
innovation partnership schools for start-up costs. Innovation
partnership schools may receive up to two hundred fifty dollars per
student for start-up costs. Only the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Start-up moneys shall be distributed to schools with approved
partnership agreements on a first-come, first-served basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RULES--GRANTS. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement
section 13 of this act. If an applicant for an innovation partnership
school receives a grant under section 13 of this act and fails to begin
operating an innovation partnership school within the next eighteen
months, the applicant must immediately reimburse the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for the amount of the grant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 LEAVES OF ABSENCE. If a school district
employee makes a written request for an extended leave of absence to
work at an innovation partnership school, the school district shall
grant the request. The school district may require that the request
for a leave be made up to ninety days before the employee would
otherwise have to report for duty. The leave shall be granted for up
to three years. If the employee returns to the school district within
the three-year period, the employee shall be hired before the district
hires anyone else with fewer years of service, with respect to any
position for which the returning employee is certificated or otherwise
qualified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 STUDY OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOLS.
The Washington institute for public policy shall study the
implementation and effectiveness of chapter . . ., Laws of 2010 (this
act). The institute shall make recommendations to the legislature
about the effectiveness of innovation partnership schools and the
impact of innovation partnership schools. The institute shall also
recommend changes to this chapter including improvements that could be
made to the application and approval process. A preliminary report of
the study is due to the legislature by September 1, 2012, and a final
report is due September 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 NUMBER OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOLS.
(1) The maximum number of partnership agreements that can be granted
under this chapter is twenty in any given year commencing January 1,
2011, for the first four years. These annual allocations shall be
cumulative so that if the maximum is not reached in any given year the
maximum shall be increased accordingly for the successive years.
(2) A sponsor may not sponsor an innovation partnership school in
a school district with a student enrollment of less than one thousand
students until January 1, 2013.
(3) For purposes of monitoring compliance with this section and
providing information to new innovation partnership school applicants,
the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain a running total
of the projected and actual enrollment at innovation partnership
schools and the number of partnership agreements granted.
(4) For purposes of implementing this subsection, a sponsor shall
notify the office of the superintendent of public instruction when it
receives an innovation partnership school application, when it approves
an innovation partnership school, and when an innovation partnership
school is renewed or terminated.
(5) The maximum number of innovation partnership schools allowed
under this section does not include conventional public schools
converting to innovation partnership schools.

Sec. 18 RCW 28A.150.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.055 are
each amended to read as follows:
Public schools ((shall)) means the common schools as referred to in
Article IX of the state Constitution and those schools and institutions
of learning having a curriculum below the college or university level
as now or may be established by law and maintained at public expense,
including innovation partnership schools under chapter 28A. . . . RCW
(the new chapter created in section 25 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING RIGHTS OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES. This chapter applies to charter public schools under
chapter 28A. . . . RCW (the new chapter created in section 25 of this
act) and the innovation partnership school's employees included in the
bargaining unit. The bargaining unit of employees of innovation
partnership schools must be limited to the employees of the innovation
partnership school and must be separate from other bargaining units in
the school district or educational service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING RIGHTS OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES. This chapter applies to collective bargaining agreements
between innovation partnership schools and the employees of innovation
partnership schools included in the bargaining unit. The bargaining
unit of employees of innovation partnership schools must be limited to
the employees of the innovation partnership school and must be separate
from other bargaining units in the school district or educational
service district.

Sec. 21 RCW 41.59.080 and 1998 c 244 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission, upon proper application for certification as an
exclusive bargaining representative or upon petition for change of unit
definition by the employer or any employee organization within the time
limits specified in RCW 41.59.070(3), and after hearing upon reasonable
notice, shall determine the unit appropriate for the purpose of
collective bargaining. In determining, modifying or combining the
bargaining unit, the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and
working conditions of the educational employees; the history of
collective bargaining; the extent of organization among the educational
employees; and the desire of the educational employees; except that:
(1) A unit including nonsupervisory educational employees shall not
be considered appropriate unless it includes all such nonsupervisory
educational employees of the employer; and
(2) A unit that includes only supervisors may be considered
appropriate if a majority of the employees in such category indicate by
vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; and
(3) A unit that includes only principals and assistant principals
may be considered appropriate if a majority of such employees indicate
by vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; and
(4) A unit that includes both principals and assistant principals
and other supervisory employees may be considered appropriate if a
majority of the employees in each category indicate by vote that they
desire to be included in such a unit; and
(5) A unit that includes supervisors and/or principals and
assistant principals and nonsupervisory educational employees may be
considered appropriate if a majority of the employees in each category
indicate by vote that they desire to be included in such a unit; and
(6) A unit that includes only employees in vocational-technical
institutes or occupational skill centers may be considered to
constitute an appropriate bargaining unit if the history of bargaining
in any such school district so justifies; and
(7) Notwithstanding the definition of collective bargaining, a unit
that contains only supervisors and/or principals and assistant
principals shall be limited in scope of bargaining to compensation,
hours of work, and the number of days of work in the annual employment
contracts; and
(8) The bargaining unit of certificated employees of school
districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher
education that are education providers under chapter 28A.193 RCW must
be limited to the employees working as education providers to juveniles
in each adult correctional facility maintained by the department of
corrections and must be separate from other bargaining units in school
districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher
education; and
(9) The bargaining unit for employees of innovation partnership
schools as defined in section 1 of this act must be limited to the
employees of the innovation partnership school and must be separate
from other bargaining units in the school district or educational
service district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
RETIREMENT PLAN BENEFITS OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES. (1) Innovation partnership schools are employers and
innovation partnership school teachers are members under this chapter.
(2) This section takes effect only if the department receives
determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States
department of labor that such participation does not jeopardize the
status of these retirement systems as governmental plans under the
federal employees' retirement income security act and the internal
revenue code.
(3) "Innovation partnership school" has the definition in section
1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan
3" to read as follows:
RETIREMENT PLAN BENEFITS OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES. (1) Innovation partnership schools are employers and
innovation partnership school employees other than teachers are members
under this chapter.
(2) This section takes effect only if the department receives
determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States
department of labor that such participation does not jeopardize the
status of these retirement systems as governmental plans under the
federal employees' retirement income security act and the internal
revenue code.
(3) "Innovation partnership school" has the definition in section
1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2,
and plan 3" to read as follows:
RETIREMENT PLAN BENEFITS OF INNOVATION PARTNERSHIP SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES. (1) Innovation partnership schools are employers and
innovation partnership school employees other than teachers are members
under this chapter. RCW 41.40.750 applies to innovation partnership
school employees who are not in plan 1 under this chapter on September
1, 2010.
(2) This section takes effect only if the department receives
determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States
department of labor that such participation does not jeopardize the
status of these retirement systems as governmental plans under the
federal employees' retirement income security act and the internal
revenue code.
(3) "Innovation partnership school" has the definition in section
1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 1 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 INTEGRATION WITH OTHER STATUTES. Within
one year of the effective date of this section, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall develop and recommend
legislation, if any is necessary, to bring Title 28A RCW into
compliance with this act. Any failure to pass any such legislation
does not, however, affect the validity and enforceability of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 Section 23 of this act takes effect
September 1, 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 Except for section 23 of this act, this act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

--- END ---